BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND
INTENT.
(1) The legislature finds that habitat mitigation banks are an important tool
for providing compensatory mitigation for unavoidable impacts to fish and
wildlife habitat conservation areas. The legislature further finds that the
benefits of habitat mitigation banks include:

(a) Maintenance of the
ecological functioning of a habitat conservation area by consolidating
compensatory mitigation into a single large parcel rather than in separate,
isolated individual parcels;

(b) Increased potential
for the establishment and long-term management of successful mitigation by
bringing together financial resources, planning, and scientific expertise not
practicable for many project-specific mitigation proposals;

(c) Increased certainty
over the success of mitigation and reduction of temporal losses of fish and
wildlife habitat areas since habitat mitigation banks are typically implemented
and functioning in advance of project impacts;

(d) Potential enhanced
protection and preservation of the state's most valuable fish and wildlife
habitat;

(e) A reduction in
permit processing times and increased opportunity for more cost-effective
compensatory mitigation for development projects; and

(f) The ability to
provide compensatory mitigation in an efficient, predictable, and economically
and environmentally responsible manner.

Therefore, the
legislature declares that it is the policy of the state to authorize habitat
mitigation banking.

(2) The purpose of this
chapter is to support the establishment and operation of habitat mitigation
banks by:

(a) Authorizing state
agencies and local governments, as well as private entities, to achieve the
goals of this chapter;

(b) Providing a
predictable, efficient regulatory framework, including timely review of habitat
mitigation bank proposals and approval of habitat mitigation bank credits for
projects; and

(c) Establishing a
preference for the use of habitat mitigation bank credits for transportation
projects of statewide significance over individual, isolated, on-site
mitigation.

The legislature intends
that, in the development and adoption of rules for habitat mitigation banks,
the department establish and use a collaborative process involving interested
public agencies and private entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. APPLICABILITY. (1) This
chapter applies to the establishment, operation, and maintenance of public and
private fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat mitigation banks,
including the review and certification of mitigation banks and the approval of
the use of credits from habitat mitigation banks for mitigation of proposed
impacts of public and private projects, including but not limited to public
transportation projects.

(2) This chapter does
not create any new authority for regulating fish, wildlife, or fish and
wildlife habitat conservation areas or habitat mitigation banks beyond what is
specifically provided for in this chapter. No authority is granted to the
department under this chapter to adopt rules or guidance that apply to fish,
wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat conservation projects other than habitat
mitigation banks under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Bank
sponsor" means any public or private entity responsible for establishing
and, in most circumstances, operating a bank.

(2) "Banking
instrument" means the documentation of agency and bank sponsor concurrence
on the objectives and administration of the bank that describes in detail the
physical and legal characteristics of the bank, including the service area and
how the bank will be established and operated.

(3) "Compensatory
mitigation" means the preservation, restoration, enhancement, or creation
of fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat areas for the purpose of
compensating for adverse impacts to habitat areas resulting from a proposed
development project.

(4) "Creation"
means the establishment of fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat area
functions and values in an area, either on or off the project site, where none
previously existed.

(5) "Credit"
means a unit of trade representing the increase in the ecological value of the
site, as measured by acreage, functions, or values, or by some other assessment
method.

(6)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(7)
"Enhancement" means actions taken within an existing fish, wildlife,
or fish and wildlife habitat area to increase or augment one or more functions
or values of the area. "Enhancement" may also include actions taken
to improve the functions provided by a buffer or upland area.

(8) "Habitat"
means the environmental conditions surrounding the location where a particular
species of fish or wildlife lives, including air, water, soil, mineral
elements, moisture, temperature, and topography.

(9) "Habitat
mitigation bank" or "bank" means a site where fish, wildlife, or
fish and wildlife habitat is preserved, restored, enhanced, or created for the
purpose of providing compensatory mitigation in advance of authorized impacts
to similar habitat areas.

(10) "Impact"
means the effect or consequence of a proposed action, as identified by the
state agency or local government issuing the project permit, in particular upon
fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas and specific to
an element of the habitat for a particular species.

(11) "Performance
standards" means measurable benchmarks for a specific project objective,
in particular to allow evaluation of the characteristics associated with
certified habitat mitigation banks.

(12)
"Practicable" means available and capable of being done after taking
into consideration cost, existing technology, and logistics in light of overall
project purposes.

(13)
"Preservation" means the protection of ecologically important fish,
wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat area through the implementation of
appropriate legal and physical mechanisms. "Preservation" may
include protection of the functions provided by a buffer or upland area to
ensure the protection or enhancement of the habitat area.

(14)
"Restoration" means actions taken to intentionally reestablish fish,
wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat areas at a site where functional and
valuable habitat previously existed but where functional and valuable habitat
no longer exists.

(15) "Service
area" means the designated geographic area in which a bank can reasonably
be expected to provide appropriate compensatory mitigation.

(16)
"Transportation project of statewide significance" means a project or
combination of projects that cross multiple city or county jurisdictional
boundaries or connects major state destinations in support of the state's
economy and are so designated by the department of transportation and approved
by the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives.
The transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives may
also designate such projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. RULES. Subject to the
requirements of this chapter, the department, through a collaborative process
involving interested public agencies and private entities, shall adopt rules
for:

(1) Certification,
operation, and monitoring of fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat
mitigation banks. The rules must include procedures to assure that:

(a) Priority is given
to banks providing for the restoration of degraded or former habitat areas;

(b) Banks involving the
creation and enhancement of fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat are
certified only where there are adequate assurances of success and that the bank
will result in an overall environmental benefit; and

(c) Banks involving the
preservation of fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat are certified only
when the preservation is in conjunction with the restoration, enhancement, or
creation of a fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat, or in other
exceptional circumstances as determined by the department consistent with this
chapter;

(2) Determination,
release, and use of credits from banks, provided that:

(a) Procedures
regarding credits must authorize the use and sale of credits to offset adverse
impacts and the phased release of credits as different levels of the
performance standards are met;

(b) Linear projects,
including but not limited to transportation projects of statewide significance,
transmission or distribution lines, pipelines, and railways, may use bank
credits for compensatory mitigation of all adverse impacts of projects even
though all of the project's impacts are not located within the bank's service
area if (i) at least one impact from the project is located within the bank's
service area and (ii) appropriate compensation is provided for impacts lying
outside the bank's service area; and

(c) Use of habitat
mitigation banks for transportation projects of statewide significance are
preferred over individual, isolated, on-site mitigation;

(3) Public involvement
in the certification of banks, using existing statutory authority;

(4) Coordination of
governmental agencies;

(5) Establishment of
criteria for determining service areas for each bank;

(6) Performance
standards; and

(7) Long-term
management, financial assurances, and remediation for certified banks.

Before adopting rules under
this chapter, the department shall submit the proposed rules to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature. By January 30, 2002, the department
shall submit a report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature
on its progress in developing rules under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. CERTIFICATION OF BANKS.
(1) The department may certify only those banks that meet the requirements of
this chapter. Certification shall be accomplished through a banking
instrument. The local jurisdiction in which the bank is located shall be
signatory to the banking instrument.

(2) State agencies and
local governments may approve use of credits from a bank for any compensatory
mitigation required under a permit issued or approved by that state agency or
local government for the proposed impacts of a specific public or private
project. For public transportation projects of statewide significance, use of
credits from a bank may be approved for any mitigation of impacts of a proposed
project even though all of the project's impacts are not located within the
bank's service area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. USE OF CREDITS. If the
permitting agency has identified an impact of a proposed project on a habitat
conservation area for which compensatory mitigation is required, the department
and the permitting agency may approve use of credits from a bank that provide
appropriate compensatory mitigation for the project impacts. Credits from a bank
may be approved if:

(1) The credits
represent the restoration, enhancement, or creation of habitat of like kind to
the habitat areas on which the proposed project will cause impacts; or

(2) Use of credits from
a bank is environmentally preferable to on-site compensation.

For transportation
projects of statewide significance permit applications that require mitigation
for impacts on a habitat conservation area, the department and the permitting
agency shall authorize use of credits from a certified bank for the applicant
public agency that will provide appropriate compensatory mitigation for the
project impacts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. INTERPRETATION OF CHAPTER
AND RULES. This chapter and rules adopted under this chapter shall to the
extent possible be interpreted to be consistent with applicable federal
regulation and guidance on the use of habitat mitigation banking.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

---
END ---