BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.60.120 and 1993 c
427 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the department
acquires or constructs, maintains, and operates any ferry crossings upon or
toll bridges over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters,
there shall not be constructed, operated, or maintained any other ferry
crossing upon or bridge over any such waters within ten miles of any such
crossing or bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting such
bridges or ferry crossings in existence, and being operated and maintained
under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the location of the ferry
crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the department.

(2) The ten-mile
distance in subsection (1) of this section means ten statute miles measured by
airline distance. The ten-mile restriction shall be applied by comparing the
two end points (termini) of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry
crossing.

(3) A commercial
ferry operator may apply to the Washington utilities and transportation
commission under chapter 81.84 RCW for a waiver from the ten-mile restriction:

(a) If the applying
commercial ferry operator is applying to operate passenger-only ferry service
along a route that is not served by Washington State Ferries at the time of the
application, the commission shall grant the waiver. For purposes of this
section, a route is not served by Washington State Ferries if Washington State
Ferries does not provide service between two termini that are each within ten
miles of the termini of the route proposed by the commercial ferry operator.

(b) If the applying
commercial ferry operator is applying to provide a service other than that
described in (a) of this subsection, the Washington utilities and
transportation commission may, upon written petition of a commercial ferry
operator certificated or applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW,
and upon notice and hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The
waiver must not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to
waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is not
limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion mitigation,
air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the Washington state ferry
system. The commission shall act upon a request for a waiver within ninety
days after the conclusion of the hearing.

(4) A waiver granted
under subsection (3) of this section is effective for a period of five
years from the date of issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes
permanent unless appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own
motion, the department, or an interested party.

(((4)))
(5) The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry crossing or
toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters that
would infringe upon any franchise lawfully issued by the state and in existence
and being exercised at the time of the location of the ferry crossing or toll
bridge by the department, without first acquiring the rights granted to such
franchise holder under the franchise.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.64.090 and 1983 c
15 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, if any party assumes the
operation and maintenance of any ferry or ferry system by rent, lease, or
charter from the department of transportation, such party shall assume and be
bound by all the provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such
operation of any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall
provide that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions,
and seniority rights of employees will be established by the marine employees'
commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of this chapter and it
shall further provide that all labor disputes shall be adjudicated in
accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.

(2) If
a commercial ferry operator is operating a passenger-only ferry service and has
received a waiver under RCW 47.60.120(3), the operator may enter into an
agreement with Washington State Ferries to rent or lease terminal space for
purposes of loading and unloading the passenger-only ferry. A commercial ferry
operator who qualifies under this subsection is not subject to the restrictions
of subsection (1) of this section.

---
END ---