BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c
206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The state department of
transportation and the local authorities are authorized to reserve all or any
portion of any highway under their respective jurisdictions, including any
designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of public
transportation vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a
specified number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy
resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a
highway facility may be declared to be effective at ((all times)) any
time Monday through Friday or at other specified times of day or on
specified days, but may never be effective on Saturday or Sunday.
Violation of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate
authority under this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.52.025 and 1974
ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Highway
authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities and towns, in
addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter, shall also have, and
may exercise, relative to limited access facilities, any and all additional
authority, now or hereafter vested in them relative to highways or streets
within their respective jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit
the use of such limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or
traffic. Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive or
preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, or
private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of passengers
when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway
facility or will aid in the conservation of energy resources. Regulations
authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be
declared to be effective at ((all)) any time Monday through
Friday or at other specified times of day or on specified days,
but may never be effective on Saturday or Sunday.

---
END ---