BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2002 c 5 s 205
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Sections
201 through 204 of this act and RCW 41.06.380(2) are null and void if new
transportation revenues do not become law by January 1, 2003. ((Sections
201 through 204 of this act and RCW 41.06.380(2) are effective only for the
period consistent with the new transportation revenues, after which time these
provisions will expire.))

--- END ---