BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department is
exempt from obtaining any permit issued by a county, city, or town, regarding a
transportation project of statewide significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140
and designated in RCW 47.05.021(3), including, but not limited to, any permit
issued under chapter 90.58 RCW, any permit related to regulation of critical
areas under chapter 36.70A RCW, and any permit required for filling, grading,
building, or construction, or any other permit required for a transportation
project of statewide significance, that would otherwise be issued under a local
ordinance meeting the definition of a development regulation under chapter
35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, 36.70A, or 36.70B RCW.

(2) For transportation
projects of statewide significance, the department shall serve as the lead
entity for all review required under the State Environmental Policy Act (SEPA),
chapter 43.21C RCW. Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the
ability of local governments to participate in the SEPA process as provided for
in

chapter 43.21C
RCW.

--- END ---