BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.02 RCW to read as follows:

Transportation‑related
impact fees for residential construction may only be collected by the county,
city, or town imposing the impact fee either:

(1) At the time of
title transfer to the occupant;

(2) Twelve months after
the building permit is issued;

(3) At the time of
final inspection of the residence; or

(4) At the
time the certificate of occupancy is issued.

--- END ---