BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes the critical importance of providing and securing sufficient water
to meet the needs of people, farms, and fish. The legislature finds that an
effective way to meet the water needs of people, farms, and fish is through
strategies developed and implemented at the local watershed level. The
objectives of these strategies are to supply water in sufficient quantities to
satisfy the following three water resource objectives:

(1) Providing
sufficient water for residential, commercial, and industrial needs;

(2) Providing
sufficient water for productive fish populations; and

(3) Providing
sufficient water for productive agriculture.

The legislature affirms
its intent to provide continued support for watershed strategies and provides
the tools in this bill to assist local watersheds in meeting these objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added to
chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall, through a network of water masters appointed under this chapter, stream
patrollers appointed under chapter 90.08 RCW, and other assigned compliance
staff to the extent such a network is funded, achieve compliance with the water
laws and rules of the state of Washington in the following sequence:

(a) The department
shall prepare and distribute technical and educational information to the
general public to assist the public in complying with the requirements of their
water rights and applicable water laws;

(b) When the department
determines that a violation has occurred or is about to occur, it shall first
attempt to achieve voluntary compliance. As part of this first response, the
department shall offer information and technical assistance to the person in
writing identifying one or more means to accomplish the person's purposes
within the framework of the law; and

(c) If education and
technical assistance do not achieve compliance the department shall issue a
notice of violation, a formal administrative order under RCW 43.27A.190, or
assess penalties under RCW 90.03.600 unless the noncompliance is corrected
expeditiously or the department determines no impairment or harm.

(2) Nothing in the
section is intended to prevent the department of ecology from taking immediate
action to cause a violation to be ceased immediately if in the opinion of the
department the nature of the violation is causing harm to other water rights or
to public resources.

(3) The
department of ecology shall to the extent practicable station its compliance
personnel within the watershed communities they serve. To the extent
practicable, compliance personnel shall be distributed evenly among the regions
of the state.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.46.010 and 2001 c
69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Greywater" means wastewater having the consistency and strength of
residential domestic type wastewater. Greywater includes wastewater from
sinks, showers, and laundry fixtures, but does not include toilet or urinal
waters.

(2) "Land
application" means application of treated effluent for purposes of
irrigation or landscape enhancement for residential, business, and governmental
purposes.

(3) "Person"
means any state, individual, public or private corporation, political
subdivision, governmental subdivision, governmental agency, municipality,
copartnership, association, firm, trust estate, or any other legal entity
whatever.

(4) "Reclaimed
water" means effluent derived in any part from sewage from a wastewater
treatment system that has been adequately and reliably treated, so that as a
result of that treatment, it is suitable for a beneficial use or a controlled
use that would not otherwise occur and is no longer considered wastewater.

(5) "Sewage"
means water-carried human wastes from residences, buildings, industrial and
commercial establishments, or other places, together with such ground water
infiltration, surface waters, or industrial wastewater as may be present.

(6) "User"
means any person who uses reclaimed water.

(7)
"Wastewater" means water and wastes discharged from homes,
businesses, and industry to the sewer system.

(8) "Beneficial
use" means the use of reclaimed water, that has been transported from the
point of production to the point of use without an intervening discharge to the
waters of the state, for a beneficial purpose.

(9) "Direct
recharge" means the controlled subsurface addition of water directly to
the ground water basin that results in the replenishment of ground water.

(10) "Ground water
recharge criteria" means the contaminant criteria found in the drinking
water quality standards adopted by the state board of health pursuant to
chapter 43.20 RCW and the department of health pursuant to chapter 70.119A RCW.

(11) "Planned
ground water recharge project" means any reclaimed water project designed
for the purpose of recharging ground water, via direct recharge or surface
percolation.

(12) "Reclamation
criteria" means the criteria set forth in the water reclamation and reuse
interim standards and subsequent revisions adopted by the department of ecology
and the department of health.

(13) "Streamflow
augmentation" means the discharge of reclaimed water to rivers and streams
of the state or other surface water bodies, but not wetlands.

(14) "Surface
percolation" means the controlled application of water to the ground
surface for the purpose of replenishing ground water.

(15) "Wetland or
wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface water or
ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under
normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted
to life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps,
marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands regulated under this chapter shall
be delineated in accordance with the manual adopted by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.58.380.

(16) "Constructed
beneficial use wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally constructed on
nonwetland sites to produce or replace natural wetland functions and values.
Constructed beneficial use wetlands are considered "waters of the
state."

(17) "Constructed
treatment wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally constructed on
nonwetland sites and managed for the primary purpose of wastewater or storm
water treatment. Constructed treatment wetlands are considered part of the
collection and treatment system and are not considered "waters of the
state."

(18) "Agricultural
industrial process water" means water that has been used for the purpose
of ((agriculture [agricultural])) agricultural processing and has
been adequately and reliably treated, so that as a result of that treatment, it
is suitable for other agricultural water use.

(19) "Agricultural
processing" means the processing of crops or milk to produce a product
primarily for wholesale or retail sale for human or animal consumption,
including but not limited to potato, fruit, vegetable, and grain processing.

(20) "Agricultural
water use" means the use of water for irrigation and other uses related to
the production of agricultural products. These uses include, but are not
limited to, construction, operation, and maintenance of agricultural facilities
and livestock operations at farms, ranches, dairies, and nurseries. Examples
of these uses include, but are not limited to, dust control, temperature
control, and fire control.

(21)
"Industrial reuse water" means water that has been used for the
purpose of industrial processing and has been adequately and reliably treated
so that, as a result of that treatment, it is suitable for other uses.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.46.030 and 1992 c
204 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
health shall, in coordination with the department of ecology, adopt a single
set of standards, procedures, and guidelines on or before August 1, 1993, for
the industrial and commercial use of reclaimed water.

(2) The department of
health may issue a reclaimed water permit for industrial and commercial uses of
reclaimed water to the generator of reclaimed water who may then distribute the
water, subject to provisions in the permit governing the location, rate, water
quality, and purposes of use.

(3) The department of
health in consultation with the advisory committee established in RCW
90.46.050, shall develop recommendations for a fee structure for permits issued
under subsection (2) of this section. Fees shall be established in amounts to
fully recover, and not exceed, expenses incurred by the department of health in
processing permit applications and modifications, monitoring and evaluating
compliance with permits, and conducting inspections and supporting the reasonable
overhead expenses that are directly related to these activities. Permit fees
may not be used for research or enforcement activities. The department of
health shall not issue permits under this section until a fee structure has
been established.

(4) A permit under this
section for use of reclaimed water may be issued only to a municipal,
quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity or to the holder of a waste
discharge permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW.

(5) The authority and
duties created in this section are in addition to any authority and duties
already provided in law with regard to sewage and wastewater collection,
treatment, and disposal for the protection of health and safety of the state's
waters. Nothing in this section limits the powers of the state or any
political subdivision to exercise such authority.

(6) The department
of health may implement the requirements of this section through the department
of ecology by execution of a formal agreement between the departments. Upon
execution of such an agreement, the department of ecology may issue reclaimed
water permits for industrial and commercial uses of reclaimed water by issuance
of permits under chapter 90.48 RCW, and may establish and collect fees as
required for permits issued under chapter 90.48 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.46.130 and 2001 c
69 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, facilities that reclaim water under this
chapter shall not impair any existing water right downstream from any
freshwater discharge points of such facilities unless compensation or
mitigation for such impairment is agreed to by the holder of the affected water
right.

(2) Agricultural water
use of agricultural industrial process water and use of industrial reuse
water under this chapter shall not impair existing water rights within the
water source that is the source of supply for the agricultural processing plant
or the industrial processing and, if the water source is surface water,
the existing water rights are downstream from the agricultural processing
plant's discharge points existing on July 22, 2001, or from the industrial
processing's discharge points existing on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 90.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The permit to use
industrial reuse water shall be the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW to
the owner of the plant that is the source of the industrial process water, who
may then distribute the water according to provisions in the permit governing the
location, rate, water quality, and purpose. In cases where the department of
ecology determines that a proposed use may pose a significant risk to public
health, the department shall refer the permit application to the department of
health for review and consultation.

(2) The owner of the
industrial plant who obtains a permit under this section has the exclusive
right to the use of any industrial reuse water generated from the plant and to
the distribution of such water. Use and distribution of the water by the owner
is exempt from the permit requirements of RCW 90.03.250, 90.03.380, 90.44.060,
and 90.44.100.

(3) Nothing in this
section affects any right to reuse industrial process water in existence on or
before the effective date of this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 90.38.020 and 2001 c
237 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department
may acquire water rights, including but not limited to storage rights, by
purchase, lease, gift, or other appropriate means other than by condemnation,
from any person or entity or combination of persons or entities. Once
acquired, such rights are trust water rights. A water right acquired by the
state that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall
be administered as a trust water right in compliance with that condition.

(b) If ((an aquatic
species is listed as threatened or endangered under federal law for a body of
water, or is listed as depressed or threatened by reason of inadequate stream
flows under state law, and)) the holder of a right to water from ((the))
a body of water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water
right to the trust water system to assist in providing ((those))
instream flows on a temporary or permanent basis, the department shall accept
the donation on such terms as the person may prescribe as long as the donation
satisfies the requirements of subsection (4) of this section and the other
applicable requirements of this chapter and the terms prescribed are relevant
and material to protecting any interest in the water right retained by the
donor. Once accepted, such rights are trust water rights within the conditions
prescribed by the donor.

(2) The department may
make such other arrangements, including entry into contracts with other persons
or entities as appropriate to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter can be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) The trust water
rights may be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed the extent to
which the water right was exercised during the five years before the donation
nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the donor
plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the
water right was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water
right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request that
the department review the impairment claim. If the department determines that
exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising a
portion of that trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this
section is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.38.902, the
trust water right shall be altered by the department to eliminate the
impairment. Any decision of the department to alter or not alter a trust water
right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section is appealable to the
pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's
status as a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of the
validity or quantity of the water right.

(5) Any water right
conveyed to the trust water right system as a gift that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the
department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is deductible
for federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the
water right.

(6) If the department
acquires a trust water right by lease ((in an area in which a drought order
has been issued under RCW 43.83B.405 and is in effect at the time the
department leases the water right)), the amount of the trust water right
shall not exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the
five years before the acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of
the water right remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion
of the water right leased by the department exceed the extent to which the
water right was exercised during the five years before the acquisition. A
water right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a
trust water right leased under this subsection may request that the department
review the impairment claim. If the department determines that exercising the
trust water right resulting from the leasing or exercising (([of])) of
a portion of that trust water right leased under this subsection is impairing
existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.38.902, the trust water right
shall be altered by the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision
of the department to alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under
this subsection is appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW
43.21B.230. The department's leasing of a trust water right under this
subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of the water right.

(7) For a water right
donated to or acquired by the trust water rights program on a temporary basis,
the full quantity of water diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right before
the donation or acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights program
and shall revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when the
trust period ends.

Sec. 8. RCW 90.42.040 and 2001 c
237 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All trust water
rights acquired by the state shall be placed in the state trust water rights
program to be managed by the department. Trust water rights acquired by the
state shall be held or authorized for use by the department for instream flows,
irrigation, municipal, or other beneficial uses consistent with applicable
regional plans for pilot planning areas, or to resolve critical water supply
problems. To the extent practicable and subject to legislative appropriation,
trust water rights acquired in an area with an approved watershed plan
developed under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be consistent with that plan if the
plan calls for such acquisition.

(2) The department
shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington
for each permanent trust water right conveyed to the state indicating the reach
or reaches of the stream, the quantity, and the use or uses to which it may be
applied. A superseding certificate shall be issued that specifies the amount
of water the water right holder would continue to be entitled to as a result of
the water conservation project. The superseding certificate shall retain the
same priority date as the original right. For nonpermanent conveyances, the
department shall issue certificates or such other instruments as are necessary
to reflect the changes in purpose or place of use or point of diversion or
withdrawal.

(3) A trust water right
retains the same priority date as the water right from which it originated, but
as between them the trust right shall be deemed to be inferior in priority
unless otherwise specified by an agreement between the state and the party
holding the original right.

(4) Exercise of a trust
water right may be authorized only if the department first determines that
neither water rights existing at the time the trust water right is established,
nor the public interest will be impaired. If impairment becomes apparent
during the time a trust water right is being exercised, the department shall
cease or modify the use of the trust water right to eliminate the impairment.

(5) Before any trust
water right is created or modified, the department shall, at a minimum, require
that a notice be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in
the county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made,
and in other newspapers as the department determines is necessary, once a week
for two consecutive weeks. At the same time the department shall send a notice
containing pertinent information to all appropriate state agencies, potentially
affected local governments and federally recognized tribal governments, and
other interested parties.

(6) RCW 90.14.140
through 90.14.230 have no applicability to trust water rights held by the department
under this chapter or exercised under this section.

(7) RCW 90.03.380 has
no applicability to trust water rights acquired by the state through the
funding of water conservation projects.

(8) Subsections (4) and
(5) of this section do not apply to a trust water right resulting from a
donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b) or to a trust
water right leased under RCW 90.42.080(8) if the period of the lease does not
exceed five years. However, the department shall provide the notice described
in subsection (5) of this section the first time the trust water right
resulting from the donation is exercised.

(9) Where a portion
of an existing water right that is acquired or donated to the trust water
rights program will assist in achieving established instream flows, the
department shall process the change or amendment of the existing right without
conducting a review of the extent and validity of the portion of the water
right that will remain with the water right holder.

Sec. 9. RCW 90.42.080 and 2001 c
237 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The state may
acquire all or portions of existing water rights, by purchase, gift, or other
appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any person or entity or
combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust water
rights. A water right acquired by the state that is expressly conditioned to
limit its use to instream purposes shall be administered as a trust water right
in compliance with that condition.

(b) If ((an aquatic
species is listed as threatened or endangered under federal law for a body of
water, or is listed as depressed or threatened by reason of inadequate stream
flow under state law, and)) the holder of a right to water from ((the))
a body of water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water
right to the trust water system to assist in providing ((those))
instream flows on a temporary or permanent basis, the department shall accept
the donation on such terms as the person may prescribe as long as the donation
satisfies the requirements of subsection (4) of this section and the other
applicable requirements of this chapter and the terms prescribed are relevant
and material to protecting any interest in the water right retained by the
donor. Once accepted, such rights are trust water rights within the conditions
prescribed by the donor.

(2) The department may
enter into leases, contracts, or such other arrangements with other persons or
entities as appropriate, to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter may be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) Trust water rights
may be acquired by the state on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed the extent to
which the water right was exercised during the five years before the donation
nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the donor
plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the
water right was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water
right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request that
the department review the impairment claim. If the department determines that
exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising a
portion of that trust water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section
is impairing existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.42.070, the trust
water right shall be altered by the department to eliminate the impairment.
Any decision of the department to alter or not to alter a trust water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section is appealable to the pollution
control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's status as
a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of the validity or
quantity of the water right.

(5) The provisions of
RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to donations for instream flows
described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, but do apply to other transfers
of water rights under this section.

(6) No funds may be
expended for the purchase of water rights by the state pursuant to this section
unless specifically appropriated for this purpose by the legislature.

(7) Any water right
conveyed to the trust water right system as a gift that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the
department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is
deductible for federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity
conveying the water right.

(8) If the department
acquires a trust water right by lease ((in an area in which a drought order
has been issued under RCW 43.83B.405 and is in effect at the time the
department leases the water right)), the amount of the trust water right
shall not exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during the
five years before the acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of
the water right remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion
of the water right leased by the department exceed the extent to which the
water right was exercised during the five years before the acquisition. A
water right holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a
trust water right leased under this subsection may request that the department
review the impairment claim. If the department determines that exercising the
trust water right resulting from the leasing or exercising (([of])) of
a portion of that trust water right leased under this subsection is impairing
existing water rights in violation of RCW 90.42.070, the trust water right
shall be altered by the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision
of the department to alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under
this subsection is appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW
43.21B.230. The department's leasing of a trust water right under this
subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of the water right.

(9) For a water right
donated to or acquired by the trust water rights program on a temporary basis,
the full quantity of water diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right before
the donation or acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights program
and shall revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when the
trust period ends.

Sec. 10. RCW 90.03.370 and 2000 c
98 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) All
applications for reservoir permits ((shall be)) are subject to
the provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320. But the party or parties
proposing to apply to a beneficial use the water stored in any such reservoir
shall also file an application for a permit, to be known as the secondary
permit, which shall be in compliance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250
through 90.03.320. Such secondary application shall refer to such reservoir as
its source of water supply and shall show documentary evidence that an
agreement has been entered into with the owners of the reservoir for a
permanent and sufficient interest in said reservoir to impound enough water for
the purposes set forth in said application. When the beneficial use has been
completed and perfected under the secondary permit, the department shall take
the proof of the water users under such permit and the final certificate of
appropriation shall refer to both the ditch and works described in the
secondary permit and the reservoir described in the primary permit. The
department may accept for processing a single application form covering both a
proposed reservoir and a proposed secondary permit or permits for use of water
from that reservoir.

(b) The department
shall expedite processing applications for the following types of storage
proposals:

(i) Development of
storage facilities that will not require a new water right for diversion or
withdrawal of the water to be stored;

(ii) Adding or
changing one or more purposes of use of stored water;

(iii) Adding to the
storage capacity of an existing storage facility; and

(iv) Applications
for secondary permits to secure use from existing storage facilities.

(c) A secondary permit
for the beneficial use of water shall not be required for use of water stored
in a reservoir where the water right for the source of the stored water
authorizes the beneficial use.

(2)(a) For the purposes
of this section, "reservoir" includes, in addition to any surface
reservoir, any naturally occurring underground geological formation where water
is collected and stored for subsequent use as part of an underground artificial
storage and recovery project. To qualify for issuance of a reservoir permit an
underground geological formation must meet standards for review and mitigation
of adverse impacts identified, for the following issues:

(i) Aquifer
vulnerability and hydraulic continuity;

(ii) Potential
impairment of existing water rights;

(iii) Geotechnical
impacts and aquifer boundaries and characteristics;

(iv) Chemical
compatibility of surface waters and ground water;

(v) Recharge and
recovery treatment requirements;

(vi) System operation;

(vii) Water rights and
ownership of water stored for recovery; and

(viii) Environmental
impacts.

(b) Standards for
review and standards for mitigation of adverse impacts for an underground
artificial storage and recovery project shall be established by the department
by rule. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320,
analysis of each underground artificial storage and recovery project and each
underground geological formation for which an applicant seeks the status of a
reservoir shall be through applicant-initiated studies reviewed by the
department.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "underground artificial storage and recovery project"
means any project in which it is intended to artificially store water in the
ground through injection, surface spreading and infiltration, or other
department-approved method, and to make subsequent use of the stored water.
However, (a) this subsection does not apply to irrigation return flow, or to
operational and seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of land, or to
water that is artificially stored due to the construction, operation, or
maintenance of an irrigation district project, or to projects involving water
reclaimed in accordance with chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130 applies
to those instances of claimed artificial recharge occurring due to the
construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district project or
operational and seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of land, as
well as other forms of claimed artificial recharge already existing at the time
a ground water subarea is established.

(4) Nothing in chapter
98, Laws of 2000 changes the requirements of existing law governing issuance of
permits to appropriate or withdraw the waters of the state.

(5) The department
shall report to the legislature by December 31, 2001, on the standards for
review and standards for mitigation developed under subsection (3) of this
section and on the status of any applications that have been filed with the
department for underground artificial storage and recovery projects by that
date.

(6) Where needed to
ensure that existing storage capacity is effectively and efficiently used to
meet multiple purposes, the department may authorize reservoirs to be filled
more than once per year or more than once per season of use.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 43.155 RCW to read as follows:

The water conservation
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
federal funding dedicated to water conservation under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 3831 shall
be deposited in the account. In addition, the legislature may appropriate
money to the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
Expenditures from the account shall be used for the development and support of
water conservation as defined by 16 U.S.C. Sec. 3831. Only the public works
board or its designee may make expenditures from the account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Section 11 of this act is
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---