BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.70.180 and 2001 c
272 s 10 and 2001 c 64 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Each of the following
acts or practices is unlawful:

(1) To cause or permit
to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, broadcasted,
televised, or disseminated in any manner whatsoever, any statement or
representation with regard to the sale, lease, or financing of a vehicle which
is false, deceptive, or misleading, including but not limited to the following:

(a) That no down
payment is required in connection with the sale of a vehicle when a down
payment is in fact required, or that a vehicle may be purchased for a smaller
down payment than is actually required;

(b) That a certain
percentage of the sale price of a vehicle may be financed when such financing
is not offered in a single document evidencing the entire security transaction;

(c) That a certain
percentage is the amount of the service charge to be charged for financing,
without stating whether this percentage charge is a monthly amount or an amount
to be charged per year;

(d) That a new vehicle
will be sold for a certain amount above or below cost without computing cost as
the exact amount of the factory invoice on the specific vehicle to be sold;

(e) That a vehicle will
be sold upon a monthly payment of a certain amount, without including in the
statement the number of payments of that same amount which are required to
liquidate the unpaid purchase price.

(2)(a) To
incorporate within the terms of any purchase and sale or lease agreement any
statement or representation with regard to the sale, lease, or financing of a
vehicle which is false, deceptive, or misleading, including but not limited to
terms that include as an added cost to the selling price or capitalized cost of
a vehicle an amount for licensing or transfer of title of that vehicle which is
not actually due to the state, unless such amount has in fact been paid by the
dealer prior to such sale. However, an amount not to exceed thirty-five
dollars per vehicle sale or lease may be charged by a dealer to recover
administrative costs for collecting motor vehicle excise taxes, licensing and
registration fees and other agency fees, verifying and clearing titles,
transferring titles, perfecting, releasing, or satisfying liens or other
security interests, and other administrative and documentary services rendered
by a dealer in connection with the sale or lease of a vehicle and in carrying
out the requirements of this chapter or any other provisions of state law.

(b) A dealer may
charge the documentary service fee in (a) of this subsection under the
following conditions:

(i) The documentary
service fee is disclosed in writing to a prospective purchaser or lessee before
the execution of a purchase and sale or lease agreement;

(ii) The documentary
service fee is not represented to the purchaser or lessee as a fee or charge
required by the state to be paid by either the dealer or prospective purchaser
or lessee;

(iii) The
documentary service fee is separately designated from the selling price or
capitalized cost of the vehicle and from any other taxes, fees, or charges; and

(iv) Dealers
disclose in any advertisement that a documentary service fee in an amount up to
thirty-five dollars may be added to the sale price or the capitalized cost.

For the purposes of
this subsection (2), the term "documentary service fee" means the
optional amount charged by a dealer to provide the services specified in (a) of
this subsection.

(3) To set up, promote,
or aid in the promotion of a plan by which vehicles are to be sold or leased to
a person for a consideration and upon further consideration that the purchaser
or lessee agrees to secure one or more persons to participate in the plan by
respectively making a similar purchase and in turn agreeing to secure one or
more persons likewise to join in said plan, each purchaser or lessee being
given the right to secure money, credits, goods, or something of value,
depending upon the number of persons joining the plan.

(4) To commit, allow,
or ratify any act of "bushing" which is defined as follows: Taking
from a prospective buyer or lessee of a vehicle a written order or offer to
purchase or lease, or a contract document signed by the buyer or lessee, which:

(a) Is subject to the
dealer's, or his or her authorized representative's future acceptance, and the
dealer fails or refuses within three calendar days, exclusive of Saturday,
Sunday, or legal holiday, and prior to any further negotiations with said buyer
or lessee, either (i) to deliver to the buyer or lessee the dealer's signed
acceptance, or (ii) to void the order, offer, or contract document and tender
the return of any initial payment or security made or given by the buyer or
lessee, including but not limited to money, check, promissory note, vehicle
keys, a trade-in, or certificate of title to a trade-in; or

(b) Permits the dealer
to renegotiate a dollar amount specified as trade-in allowance on a vehicle
delivered or to be delivered by the buyer or lessee as part of the purchase
price or lease, for any reason except:

(i) Failure to disclose
that the vehicle's certificate of ownership has been branded for any reason,
including, but not limited to, status as a rebuilt vehicle as provided in RCW
46.12.050 and 46.12.075; or

(ii) Substantial
physical damage or latent mechanical defect occurring before the dealer took
possession of the vehicle and which could not have been reasonably discoverable
at the time of the taking of the order, offer, or contract; or

(iii) Excessive
additional miles or a discrepancy in the mileage. "Excessive additional
miles" means the addition of five hundred miles or more, as reflected on
the vehicle's odometer, between the time the vehicle was first valued by the
dealer for purposes of determining its trade-in value and the time of actual
delivery of the vehicle to the dealer. "A discrepancy in the
mileage" means (A) a discrepancy between the mileage reflected on the
vehicle's odometer and the stated mileage on the signed odometer statement; or
(B) a discrepancy between the mileage stated on the signed odometer statement
and the actual mileage on the vehicle; or

(c) Fails to comply
with the obligation of any written warranty or guarantee given by the dealer
requiring the furnishing of services or repairs within a reasonable time.

(5) To commit any
offense relating to odometers, as such offenses are defined in RCW 46.37.540,
46.37.550, 46.37.560, and 46.37.570. A violation of this subsection is a class
C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) For any vehicle
dealer or vehicle salesperson to refuse to furnish, upon request of a
prospective purchaser or lessee, for vehicles previously registered to a
business or governmental entity, the name and address of the business or
governmental entity.

(7) To commit any other
offense under RCW 46.37.423, 46.37.424, or 46.37.425.

(8) To commit any
offense relating to a dealer's temporary license permit, including but not
limited to failure to properly complete each such permit, or the issuance of
more than one such permit on any one vehicle. However, a dealer may issue a
second temporary permit on a vehicle if the following conditions are met:

(a) The lienholder
fails to deliver the vehicle title to the dealer within the required time
period;

(b) The dealer has
satisfied the lien; and

(c) The dealer has
proof that payment of the lien was made within two calendar days, exclusive of
Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, after the sales contract has been
executed by all parties and all conditions and contingencies in the sales
contract have been met or otherwise satisfied.

(9) For a dealer,
salesperson, or mobile home manufacturer, having taken an instrument or cash
"on deposit" from a purchaser or lessee prior to the delivery of the
bargained-for vehicle, to commingle the "on deposit" funds with
assets of the dealer, salesperson, or mobile home manufacturer instead of
holding the "on deposit" funds as trustee in a separate trust account
until the purchaser or lessee has taken delivery of the bargained-for vehicle.
Delivery of a manufactured home shall be deemed to occur in accordance with RCW
46.70.135(5). Failure, immediately upon receipt, to endorse "on
deposit" instruments to such a trust account, or to set aside "on
deposit" cash for deposit in such trust account, and failure to deposit
such instruments or cash in such trust account by the close of banking hours on
the day following receipt thereof, shall be evidence of intent to commit this
unlawful practice: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a motor vehicle dealer may keep a
separate trust account which equals his or her customary total customer
deposits for vehicles for future delivery. For purposes of this section,
"on deposit" funds received from a purchaser of a manufactured home means
those funds that a seller requires a purchaser to advance before ordering the
manufactured home, but does not include any loan proceeds or moneys that might
have been paid on an installment contract.

(10) For a dealer or
manufacturer to fail to comply with the obligations of any written warranty or
guarantee given by the dealer or manufacturer requiring the furnishing of goods
and services or repairs within a reasonable period of time, or to fail to
furnish to a purchaser or lessee, all parts which attach to the manufactured
unit including but not limited to the undercarriage, and all items specified in
the terms of a sales or lease agreement signed by the seller and buyer or
lessee.

(11) For a vehicle
dealer to pay to or receive from any person, firm, partnership, association, or
corporation acting, either directly or through a subsidiary, as a buyer's agent
for consumers, any compensation, fee, purchase moneys or funds that have been
deposited into or withdrawn out of any account controlled or used by any
buyer's agent, gratuity, or reward in connection with the purchase, sale, or
lease of a new motor vehicle.

(12) For a buyer's
agent, acting directly or through a subsidiary, to pay to or to receive from
any motor vehicle dealer any compensation, fee, gratuity, or reward in
connection with the purchase, sale, or lease of a new motor vehicle. In
addition, it is unlawful for any buyer's agent to engage in any of the
following acts on behalf of or in the name of the consumer:

(a) Receiving or paying
any purchase moneys or funds into or out of any account controlled or used by
any buyer's agent;

(b) Signing any vehicle
purchase orders, sales contracts, leases, odometer statements, or title
documents, or having the name of the buyer's agent appear on the vehicle
purchase order, sales contract, lease, or title; or

(c) Signing any other
documentation relating to the purchase, sale, lease, or transfer of any new
motor vehicle.

It is unlawful for a
buyer's agent to use a power of attorney obtained from the consumer to
accomplish or effect the purchase, sale, lease, or transfer of ownership
documents of any new motor vehicle by any means which would otherwise be
prohibited under (a) through (c) of this subsection. However, the buyer's
agent may use a power of attorney for physical delivery of motor vehicle
license plates to the consumer.

Further, it is unlawful
for a buyer's agent to engage in any false, deceptive, or misleading
advertising, disseminated in any manner whatsoever, including but not limited to
making any claim or statement that the buyer's agent offers, obtains, or
guarantees the lowest price on any motor vehicle or words to similar effect.

(13) For a buyer's
agent to arrange for or to negotiate the purchase, or both, of a new motor
vehicle through an out-of-state dealer without disclosing in writing to the
customer that the new vehicle would not be subject to chapter 19.118 RCW. This
subsection also applies to leased vehicles. In addition, it is unlawful for
any buyer's agent to fail to have a written agreement with the customer that:
(a) Sets forth the terms of the parties' agreement; (b) discloses to the
customer the total amount of any fees or other compensation being paid by the
customer to the buyer's agent for the agent's services; and (c) further
discloses whether the fee or any portion of the fee is refundable.

(14) Being a
manufacturer, other than a motorcycle manufacturer governed by chapter 46.94
RCW, to:

(a) Coerce or attempt
to coerce any vehicle dealer to order or accept delivery of any vehicle or
vehicles, parts or accessories, or any other commodities which have not been
voluntarily ordered by the vehicle dealer: PROVIDED, That recommendation,
endorsement, exposition, persuasion, urging, or argument are not deemed to constitute
coercion;

(b) Cancel or fail to
renew the franchise or selling agreement of any vehicle dealer doing business
in this state without fairly compensating the dealer at a fair going business
value for his or her capital investment which shall include but not be limited
to tools, equipment, and parts inventory possessed by the dealer on the day he
or she is notified of such cancellation or termination and which are still
within the dealer's possession on the day the cancellation or termination is
effective, if: (i) The capital investment has been entered into with
reasonable and prudent business judgment for the purpose of fulfilling the
franchise; and (ii) the cancellation or nonrenewal was not done in good faith.
Good faith is defined as the duty of each party to any franchise to act in a
fair and equitable manner towards each other, so as to guarantee one party
freedom from coercion, intimidation, or threats of coercion or intimidation
from the other party: PROVIDED, That recommendation, endorsement, exposition,
persuasion, urging, or argument are not deemed to constitute a lack of good
faith;

(c) Encourage, aid,
abet, or teach a vehicle dealer to sell or lease vehicles through any false,
deceptive, or misleading sales or financing practices including but not limited
to those practices declared unlawful in this section;

(d) Coerce or attempt
to coerce a vehicle dealer to engage in any practice forbidden in this section
by either threats of actual cancellation or failure to renew the dealer's
franchise agreement;

(e) Refuse to deliver
any vehicle publicly advertised for immediate delivery to any duly licensed
vehicle dealer having a franchise or contractual agreement for the retail sale
or lease of new and unused vehicles sold or distributed by such manufacturer
within sixty days after such dealer's order has been received in writing unless
caused by inability to deliver because of shortage or curtailment of material,
labor, transportation, or utility services, or by any labor or production
difficulty, or by any cause beyond the reasonable control of the manufacturer;

(f) To provide under
the terms of any warranty that a purchaser or lessee of any new or unused
vehicle that has been sold or leased, distributed for sale or lease, or
transferred into this state for resale or lease by the vehicle manufacturer may
only make any warranty claim on any item included as an integral part of the
vehicle against the manufacturer of that item.

Nothing in this section
may be construed to impair the obligations of a contract or to prevent a
manufacturer, distributor, representative, or any other person, whether or not
licensed under this chapter, from requiring performance of a written contract
entered into with any licensee hereunder, nor does the requirement of such
performance constitute a violation of any of the provisions of this section if
any such contract or the terms thereof requiring performance, have been freely
entered into and executed between the contracting parties. This paragraph and
subsection (14)(b) of this section do not apply to new motor vehicle
manufacturers governed by chapter 46.96 RCW.

(15) Unlawful transfer
of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle as defined in RCW 19.116.050.

(16) To knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner of a vehicle to
repossess and return or resell the vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound under chapter 46.55 RCW. However,
compliance with chapter 62A.9A RCW in repossessing, selling, leasing, or
otherwise disposing of the vehicle, including providing redemption rights to
the debtor, is not a violation of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 63.14.010 and 1999 c
113 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In this chapter, unless
the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Goods"
means all chattels personal when purchased primarily for personal, family, or
household use and not for commercial or business use, but not including money
or, except as provided in the next sentence, things in action. The term includes
but is not limited to merchandise certificates or coupons, issued by a retail
seller, to be used in their face amount in lieu of cash in exchange for goods
or services sold by such a seller and goods which, at the time of sale or
subsequently, are to be so affixed to real property as to become a part
thereof, whether or not severable therefrom;

(2) "Lender credit
card" means a card or device under a lender credit card agreement pursuant
to which the issuer gives to a cardholder residing in this state the privilege
of obtaining credit from the issuer or other persons in purchasing or leasing
property or services, obtaining loans, or otherwise, and the issuer of which is
not: (a) Principally engaged in the business of selling goods; or (b) a
financial institution;

(3) "Lender credit
card agreement" means an agreement entered into or performed in this state
prescribing the terms of retail installment transactions pursuant to which the
issuer may, with the buyer's consent, purchase or acquire one or more retail
sellers' indebtedness of the buyer under a sales slip or memorandum evidencing
the purchase, lease, loan, or otherwise to be paid in accordance with the
agreement. The issuer of a lender credit card agreement shall not be
principally engaged in the business of selling goods or be a financial
institution;

(4) "Financial
institution" means any bank or trust company, mutual savings bank, credit
union, or savings and loan association organized pursuant to the laws of any
one of the United States of America or the United States of America, or the
laws of a foreign country if also qualified to conduct business in any one of
the United States of America or pursuant to the laws of the United States of
America;

(5)
"Services" means work, labor, or services of any kind when purchased
primarily for personal, family, or household use and not for commercial or
business use whether or not furnished in connection with the delivery,
installation, servicing, repair, or improvement of goods and includes repairs,
alterations, or improvements upon or in connection with real property, but does
not include services for which the price charged is required by law to be
determined or approved by or to be filed, subject to approval or disapproval,
with the United States or any state, or any department, division, agency,
officer, or official of either as in the case of transportation services;

(6) "Retail
buyer" or "buyer" means a person who buys or agrees to buy goods
or obtain services or agrees to have services rendered or furnished, from a
retail seller;

(7) "Retail
seller" or "seller" means a person engaged in the business of
selling goods or services to retail buyers;

(8) "Retail
installment transaction" means any transaction in which a retail buyer
purchases goods or services from a retail seller pursuant to a retail
installment contract, a retail charge agreement, or a lender credit card
agreement, as defined in this section, which provides for a service charge, as
defined in this section, and under which the buyer agrees to pay the unpaid
principal balance in one or more installments or which provides for no service
charge and under which the buyer agrees to pay the unpaid balance in more than
four installments;

(9) "Retail
installment contract" or "contract" means a contract, other than
a retail charge agreement, a lender credit card agreement, or an instrument
reflecting a sale made pursuant thereto, entered into or performed in this
state for a retail installment transaction. The term "retail installment
contract" may include a chattel mortgage, a conditional sale contract, and
a contract in the form of a bailment or a lease if the bailee or lessee
contracts to pay as compensation for their use a sum substantially equivalent
to or in excess of the value of the goods sold and if it is agreed that the
bailee or lessee is bound to become, or for no other or a merely nominal
consideration, has the option of becoming the owner of the goods upon full
compliance with the provisions of the bailment or lease. The term "retail
installment contract" does not include: (a) A "consumer lease,"
heretofore or hereafter entered into, as defined in RCW 63.10.020; (b) a lease
which would constitute such "consumer lease" but for the fact that:
(i) It was entered into before April 29, 1983; (ii) the lessee was not a
natural person; (iii) the lease was not primarily for personal, family, or
household purposes; or (iv) the total contractual obligations exceeded
twenty-five thousand dollars; or (c) a lease-purchase agreement under chapter
63.19 RCW;

(10) "Retail
charge agreement," "revolving charge agreement," or "charge
agreement" means an agreement between a retail buyer and a retail seller
that is entered into or performed in this state and that prescribes the terms of
retail installment transactions with one or more sellers which may be made
thereunder from time to time and under the terms of which a service charge, as
defined in this section, is to be computed in relation to the buyer's unpaid
balance from time to time;

(11) "Service
charge" however denominated or expressed, means the amount which is paid
or payable for the privilege of purchasing goods or services to be paid for by
the buyer in installments over a period of time. It does not include the
amount, if any, charged for insurance premiums, delinquency charges, attorneys'
fees, court costs, any vehicle dealer administrative fee under RCW 46.12.042, any
vehicle dealer documentary service fee under RCW 46.70.180(2), or official
fees;

(12) "Sale
price" means the price for which the seller would have sold or furnished
to the buyer, and the buyer would have bought or obtained from the seller, the
goods or services which are the subject matter of a retail installment
transaction. The sale price may include any taxes, registration and license
fees, any vehicle dealer administrative fee, any vehicle dealer documentary
service fee, and charges for transferring vehicle titles, delivery,
installation, servicing, repairs, alterations, or improvements;

(13) "Official
fees" means the amount of the fees prescribed by law and payable to the
state, county, or other governmental agency for filing, recording, or otherwise
perfecting, and releasing or satisfying, a retained title, lien, or other
security interest created by a retail installment transaction;

(14) "Time
balance" means the principal balance plus the service charge;

(15) "Principal
balance" means the sale price of the goods or services which are the
subject matter of a retail installment contract less the amount of the buyer's
down payment in money or goods or both, plus the amounts, if any, included
therein, if a separate identified charge is made therefor and stated in the
contract, for insurance, any vehicle dealer administrative fee, any vehicle
dealer documentary service fee, and official fees; and the amount actually
paid or to be paid by the retail seller pursuant to an agreement with the buyer
to discharge a security interest or lien on like-kind goods traded in or lease
interest in the circumstance of a lease for like goods being terminated in
conjunction with the sale pursuant to a retail installment contract;

(16) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, corporation, association, or
any other group, however organized;

(17) "Rate"
means the percentage which, when multiplied times the outstanding balance for
each month or other installment period, yields the amount of the service charge
for such month or period.

Sec. 3. RCW 63.14.130 and 1999 c
113 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The service charge
shall be inclusive of all charges incident to investigating and making the
retail installment contract or charge agreement and for the privilege of making
the installment payments thereunder and no other fee, expense or charge
whatsoever shall be taken, received, reserved or contracted therefor from the
buyer, except for any vehicle dealer administrative fee under RCW 46.12.042 or
for any vehicle dealer documentary service fee under RCW 46.70.180(2).

(1) The service charge,
in a retail installment contract, shall not exceed the dollar amount or rate
agreed to by contract and disclosed under RCW 63.14.040(1)(h).

(2) The service charge
in a retail charge agreement, revolving charge agreement, lender credit card
agreement, or charge agreement, shall not exceed the schedule or rate agreed to
by contract and disclosed under RCW 63.14.120(1). If the service charge so
computed is less than one dollar for any month, then one dollar may be charged.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If House Bill No. 2969 is
not ratified by the voters by January 1, 2003, this act is null and void.

---
END ---