BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
an employee or an employee organization, directly or indirectly, to induce,
instigate, encourage, authorize, ratify, or participate in a strike.

(2) It is unlawful for
an employer to authorize, consent to, or condone a strike, to conduct a
lockout, to pay or agree to pay an employee for any day in which the employee
participates in a strike, or to pay or agree to pay any increase in
compensation or benefits to an employee in response to or as a result of a
strike or any act that violates subsection (1) of this section. It is unlawful
for any representative of the employer to authorize, ratify, or participate in
any violation of this subsection.

(3)(a) If a violation
of subsection (1) or (2) of this section occurs, or is imminently threatened,
any citizen domiciled within the jurisdictional boundaries of the state may
petition the superior court of the county in which the labor dispute exists for
an injunction restraining the violation or imminently threatened violation.
Rules of civil procedure regarding injunctions apply to the action. However,
the court shall grant a temporary injunction if it appears to the court that a
violation has occurred or is imminently threatened; the plaintiff need not show
that the violation or threatened violation would greatly or irreparably injure
him or her. A bond may not be required of the plaintiff unless the court
determines that a bond is necessary in the public interest.

(b) Failure to comply
with any temporary or permanent injunction granted under this subsection is
contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. The court may impose a
penalty of up to ten thousand dollars for an employee organization or the
employer, for each day during which the failure to comply continues. The
sanctions for an employee found to be in contempt shall be as provided in
chapter 7.21 RCW. An individual or an employee organization that makes an
active good faith effort to comply fully with the injunction shall not be
deemed to be in contempt.

(4) Nothing in this
section prevents new or renewed bargaining and agreement within the scope of
bargaining, as defined by this chapter, at any time. However, the parties may
not agree to a provision regarding suspension or modification of any
court-ordered penalty provided in this section and any such agreement is void.

(5) Each of the
remedies and penalties provided by this section is separate and several and is
in addition to any other legal or equitable remedy or penalty.

(6) In addition to the
remedies and penalties provided by this section, the successful litigant is
entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in the
litigation.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.06.150 and 1999 c
297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall adopt
rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter, as now or
hereafter amended, and with the best standards of personnel administration,
regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1) The reduction,
dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2) Certification of
names for vacancies, including departmental promotions, with the number of
names equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be filled, such names
representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists: PROVIDED, That
when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score among the names
certified, their names shall also be certified;

(3) Examinations for
all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4) Appointments;

(5) Training and career
development;

(6) Probationary
periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees,
depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry level state
park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7) Transfers;

(8) Sick leaves and
vacations;

(9) Hours of work;

(10) Layoffs when
necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to seniority;

(11) Determination of
appropriate bargaining units within any agency: PROVIDED, That in making such
determination the board shall consider the duties, skills, and working
conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining by the
employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of organization
among the employees, and the desires of the employees;

(12) Certification and
decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives: PROVIDED, That after
certification of an exclusive bargaining representative and upon the
representative's request, the director shall hold an election among employees
in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to require as a
condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive bargaining
representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of
employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment
constitutes cause for dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than
once in each twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following
the date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of
thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the director shall hold an
election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind such condition of
employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this clause, membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment
of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation,
reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete
membership rights: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right
of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such public employee is a
member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the
program of the union as designated by such employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money equivalent to regular
union dues minus any included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance
programs, and such employee shall not be a member of the union but is entitled
to all the representation rights of a union member;

(13) Agreements between
agencies and certified exclusive bargaining representatives providing for
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on all personnel matters over
which the appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit of such agency
may lawfully exercise discretion;

(14) Written agreements
may contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee organization dues
upon authorization by the employee member and for the cancellation of such
payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice by the employee with
the appointing authority and the employee organization((: PROVIDED, That
nothing contained herein permits or grants to any employee the right to strike
or refuse to perform his or her official duties));

(15) Adoption and
revision of a comprehensive classification plan for all positions in the
classified service, based on investigation and analysis of the duties and
responsibilities of each such position.

(a) The board shall not
adopt job classification revisions or class studies unless implementation of
the proposed revision or study will result in net cost savings, increased
efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or services, and the proposed
revision or study has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b) Beginning July 1,
1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the requirements of (a) of this
subsection:

(i) The board may
approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from adjustments to
the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only if:

(A) The implementation
will not result in additional net costs and the proposed implementation has
been approved by the director of financial management in accordance with
chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B) The implementation
will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of all such actions
approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium
does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature specifically for this
purpose; or

(C) The implementation
is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are defined as
emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare, which do not
exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section 718(2), chapter 18, Laws of
1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii) The board shall
approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments to the
classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and retention
difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii) Adjustments made
to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt from (b)(i)
through (ii) of this subsection.

(c) Reclassifications,
class studies, and salary adjustments to be implemented during the 1997-99 and
subsequent fiscal biennia are governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW
41.06.152;

(16) Allocation and
reallocation of positions within the classification plan;

(17) Adoption and
revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in
Washington state private industries and other governmental units but the rates
in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to attain
comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and that, for
institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be competitive for
positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which an
institution of higher education or related board is located, such adoption and
revision subject to approval by the director of financial management in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(18) Increment
increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on length of
service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as to permit
them to retain job status in the classified service;

(19) Optional lump sum
relocation compensation approved by the agency director, whenever it is
reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in accepting a
transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must provide lump sum
compensation within existing resources. If the person receiving the relocation
payment terminates or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than
layoff, disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency director,
within one year of the date of the employment, the state is entitled to
reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;

(20) Providing for
veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with recognition of
preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for veterans and
their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving
spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to their
unbroken state service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in the
military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active
military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred
in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and
who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of
this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section "veteran"
does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more
years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess
of five hundred dollars per month;

(21) Permitting agency
heads to delegate the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote
employees within their agencies if such agency heads do not have specific
statutory authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may not authorize
such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major subdivision of
the agency;

(22) Assuring persons
who are or have been employed in classified positions before July 1, 1993, will
be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and promotion in respect to
classified positions covered by this chapter;

(23) Affirmative action
in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training, and career
development; development and implementation of affirmative action goals and
timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and timetables.

The board shall consult
with the human rights commission in the development of rules pertaining to affirmative
action. The department of personnel shall transmit a report annually to the
human rights commission which states the progress each state agency has made in
meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.06.020 and 1993 c
281 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the words used in this chapter have the meaning
given in this section.

(1) "Agency"
means an office, department, board, commission, or other separate unit or
division, however designated, of the state government and all personnel
thereof; it includes any unit of state government established by law, the
executive officer or members of which are either elected or appointed, upon
which the statutes confer powers and impose duties in connection with
operations of either a governmental or proprietary nature.

(2) "Board"
means the Washington personnel resources board established under the provisions
of RCW 41.06.110, except that this definition does not apply to the words
"board" or "boards" when used in RCW 41.06.070.

(3) "Classified
service" means all positions in the state service subject to the
provisions of this chapter.

(4) "Competitive
service" means all positions in the classified service for which a
competitive examination is required as a condition precedent to appointment.

(5) "Comparable
worth" means the provision of similar salaries for positions that require
or impose similar responsibilities, judgments, knowledge, skills, and working
conditions.

(6)
"Noncompetitive service" means all positions in the classified
service for which a competitive examination is not required.

(7)
"Department" means an agency of government that has as its governing
officer a person, or combination of persons such as a commission, board, or
council, by law empowered to operate the agency responsible either to (a) no other
public officer or (b) the governor.

(8) "Career
development" means the progressive development of employee capabilities to
facilitate productivity, job satisfaction, and upward mobility through work
assignments as well as education and training that are both state-sponsored and
are achieved by individual employee efforts, all of which shall be consistent
with the needs and obligations of the state and its agencies.

(9)
"Training" means activities designed to develop job-related knowledge
and skills of employees.

(10)
"Director" means the director of personnel appointed under the
provisions of RCW 41.06.130.

(11) "Affirmative
action" means a procedure by which racial minorities, women, persons in
the protected age category, persons with disabilities, Vietnam-era veterans,
and disabled veterans are provided with increased employment opportunities. It
shall not mean any sort of quota system.

(12) "Institutions
of higher education" means the University of Washington, Washington State
University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University,
Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and the various
state community colleges.

(13) "Related
boards" means the state board for community and technical colleges; and
such other boards, councils, and commissions related to higher education as may
be established.

(14) "Labor
dispute" means a controversy concerning terms or conditions of employment,
or concerning the association or representation of persons in negotiating,
fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of
their public employment, regardless of whether the disputants in the
controversy stand in the proximate relation of employer and employee.

(15)
"Lockout" means the refusal of the employer, in connection with a
labor dispute, to permit its employees to commence or continue the full
performance of their normal duties and services as employees.

(16)
"Strike" means any concerted action by employees or employee
organizations, in connection with a labor dispute, to suspend, curtail,
interrupt, withhold, or otherwise fail or refuse to perform fully their normal
duties or services as employees.

---
END ---