BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.12.010 and 2001 c
188 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1)(a) "Value of
the article used" shall mean the consideration, whether money, credit,
rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in
terms of money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser
to the seller for the article of tangible personal property, the use of which
is taxable under this chapter. The term includes, in addition to the
consideration paid or given or contracted to be paid or given, the amount of
any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article used.
In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted,
produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value thereof,
the value of the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character under such rules as the department of revenue may
prescribe.

(b) In case the
articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the articles so
used shall be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to the value of
such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character
under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction,
repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to become an
ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such
articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such
articles so used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of
such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price
measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under
such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(c) In the case of
articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state which are
brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in any period
of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are temporarily used for
business purposes by the person in this state, the value of the article used
shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08
RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.

(d) In the case of
articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the manufacture or
production of products sold or to be sold to the department of defense of the
United States, the value of the articles used shall be determined according to
the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e) In the case of an
article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a prototype for the
development of a new or improved product, the value of the article used shall
be determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new or improved product
when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into
the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered for
sale.

(f) In the case of an
article purchased with a direct pay permit under RCW 82.32.087, the value of
the article used shall be determined by the retail selling price, as defined in
RCW 82.08.010, of such article if but for the use of the direct pay permit the
transaction would have been subject to sales tax;

(2) "Use,"
"used," "using," or "put to use" shall have their
ordinary meaning, and shall mean the ((first act within this state by which
the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of)) exercise
of any right or power over tangible personal property incident to the ownership
of the tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include
installation, storage, distribution or display, withdrawal from storage,
or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption within
this state. With respect to property distributed to persons within this
state by a consumer as defined in subsection (5) of this section, the use of
the property shall be deemed to be by the consumer;

(3)
"Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word
"consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

(4)
"Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at retail
and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this
chapter;

(5) The meaning
ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes imposed
under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer," in addition to the
meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable,
shall also mean any person who distributes or displays, or causes to be
distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal property, except
newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or
services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2002.

---
END ---