BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any hotel that has
been notified by the department of corrections that a person, classified as a
risk level III sex offender, has taken on lodging or accommodations at such
hotel shall provide notice to its guests of such offender lodging there.

(2) A
hotel that provides notice under this section is immune from civil liability
resulting from the notice unless it is shown that the hotel is acting with
gross negligence or in bad faith.

--- END ---