BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.155 RCW to read as follows:

The water conservation
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
federal funding dedicated to water conservation under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 3831 shall
be deposited in the account. In addition, the legislature may appropriate
money to the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
Expenditures from the account shall be used for the development and support of
water conservation as defined by 16 U.S.C. Sec. 3831. Only the public works
board or its designee may make expenditures from the account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---