BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.575 and 1989 c
87 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall promulgate rules consistent with the treatment of resources provisions of
section 1924 of the social security act entitled "Treatment of Income and
Resources for Certain Institutionalized Spouses," in determining the
allocation of resources between the institutionalized and community spouse.

(2) In the interest of
supporting the community spouse the department shall allow the maximum resource
allowance amount permissible under the social security act for the community
spouse for persons institutionalized before July 1, 2002.

(3) For persons
institutionalized on or after July 1, 2002, the department, in the interest of
supporting the community spouse, shall allow up to a maximum of thirty thousand
dollars in resources for the community spouse. For the fiscal biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the maximum
resource allowance amount for the community spouse shall be adjusted for
economic trends and conditions by increasing the amount allowable by the
consumer price index as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.
However, in no case shall the amount allowable exceed the maximum resource
allowance permissible under the social security act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---