BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The select
committee on pension policy is created. The select committee consists of:

(a) Four members of the
senate ways and means committee appointed by the president of the senate, two
of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom are members of the
minority party;

(b) Four members of the
house of representatives appropriations committee appointed by the speaker, two
of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom are members of the
minority party;

(c) Four active members
or representatives from organizations of active members of the state retirement
systems appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms;

(d) Two retired members
or representatives of retired members' organizations of the state retirement
systems appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms, with no two
members from the same system; and

(e) Two employer
representatives of members of the state retirement systems appointed by the
governor for staggered three-year terms.

(2)(a) The term of
office of each member of the house of representatives or senate serving on the
committee runs from the close of the session in which he or she is appointed
until the close of the next regular session held in an odd-numbered year. If a
successor is not appointed during a session, the member's term continues until
the member is reappointed or a successor is appointed. The term of office for
a committee member who is a member of the house of representatives or the
senate who does not continue as a member of the senate or house of
representatives ceases upon the convening of the next session of the
legislature during the odd-numbered year following the member's appointment, or
upon the member's resignation, whichever is earlier. All vacancies of
positions held by members of the legislature must be filled from the same
political party and from the same house as the member whose seat was vacated.

(b) Following the terms
of members and representatives appointed under subsection (1)(d) of this
section, the retiree positions shall be rotated to ensure that each system has
an opportunity to have a retiree representative on the committee.

(3) The committee shall
elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson.

(4) The committee shall
establish an executive committee of four members, including the chairperson and
the vice-chairperson.

(5) Nonlegislative
members of the select committee serve without compensation, but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) The office of state
actuary under chapter 44.44 RCW shall provide staff and technical support to
the committee.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.50.110 and 1998 c
341 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this section, all expenses of the
administration of the department ((and)), the expenses of
administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses of the
administration of the office of the state actuary created in chapters 2.10,
2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, ((and)) 43.43, and 44.44
RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems expense fund.

(2) In order to
reimburse the department of retirement systems expense fund on an equitable
basis the department shall ascertain and report to each employer, as defined in
RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray
its proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the
retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium
or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in an
amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the
administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's members bears
to the total salaries of all members in the entire system. It shall then be
the duty of all such employers to include in their budgets or otherwise provide
the amounts so required.

(3) The department
shall compute and bill each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of each month for the amount due for that
month to the department of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall
be paid as are its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer
shall be made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department.
However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing
based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall be at
the end of each such quarter.

(4) The director may
adjust the expense fund contribution rate for each system at any time when
necessary to reflect unanticipated costs or savings in administering the
department.

(5) An employer who
fails to submit timely and accurate reports to the department may be assessed
an additional fee related to the increased costs incurred by the department in
processing the deficient reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be
deposited in the retirement system expense fund.

(a) Every six months
the department shall determine the amount of an employer's fee by reviewing the
timeliness and accuracy of the reports submitted by the employer in the
preceding six months. If those reports were not both timely and accurate the
department may prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.

(b) An additional fee
assessed by the department under this subsection shall not exceed fifty percent
of the standard fee.

(c) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this section.

(6) Expenses other than
those under RCW 41.34.060(((2))) (3) shall be paid pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 44.44.040 and 1987 c
25 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of the state
actuary shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) Perform all
actuarial services for the department of retirement systems, including all
studies required by law. ((Reimbursement for such services shall be made to
the state actuary pursuant to the provisions of RCW 39.34.130 as now or
hereafter amended.))

(2) Advise the
legislature and the governor regarding pension benefit provisions, and funding
policies and investment policies of the state investment board.

(3) Consult with the
legislature and the governor concerning determination of actuarial assumptions
used by the department of retirement systems.

(4) Prepare a report,
to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on each pension bill introduced in
the legislature which briefly explains the financial impact of the bill. The
actuarial fiscal note shall include: (a) The statutorily required contribution
for the biennium and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of
the increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c) any
change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An actuarial
fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which are offered in
committee or on the floor of the house of representatives or the senate to any
pension bill. However, a majority of the members present may suspend the
requirement for an actuarial fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of
the house of representatives or the senate.

(5) Provide such
actuarial services to the legislature as may be requested from time to time.

(6) Provide staff and
assistance to the committee established under RCW ((46.44.050)) 44.44.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

The select committee on
pension policy has the following powers and duties:

(1) Study pension
issues, develop pension policies for public employees in state retirement
systems, and make recommendations to the legislature; and

(2) Study the financial
condition of the state pension systems, develop funding policies, and make
recommendations to the legislature.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.32.570 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 10 s 3 and 2001 c 317 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly benefit reduction over one hundred
percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in
subsequent months.

(2) Any retired teacher
or retired administrator who enters service in any public educational
institution in Washington state and who has satisfied the break in employment
requirement of subsection (1) of this section shall cease to receive pension
payments while engaged in such service, after the retiree has rendered service
for more than one thousand five hundred hours in a school year. When a retired
teacher or administrator renders service beyond eight hundred sixty-seven
hours, the department shall collect from the employer the applicable employer
retirement contributions for the entire duration of the member's employment
during that fiscal year.

(3) The department
shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the
use of this section for the ((joint)) select committee on pension
policy.

(4) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than five
hundred twenty-five hours per year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.40.037 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2)(a) A retiree from
plan 1 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1)
of this section and who enters employment with an employer may continue to
receive pension payments while engaged in such service for up to one thousand
five hundred hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of
pension. When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred sixty-seven
hours, the department shall collect from the employer the applicable employer
retirement contributions for the entire duration of the member's employment
during that calendar year.

(b) A retiree from plan
2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection
(1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a
calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010,
or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in
RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or
her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not
accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However,
if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.

(4) The department shall
collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the use of
this section for the ((joint)) select committee on pension
policy.

(5) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than five months
in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.45.100 and 1998 c
283 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The pension funding
council is hereby created. The council consists of the:

(a) Director of the
department of retirement systems;

(b)
Director of the office of financial management;

(c) Chair and ranking
minority member of the house of representatives appropriations committee; and

(d) Chair and ranking
minority member of the senate ways and means committee.

The council may select
officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The pension funding
council shall adopt changes to economic assumptions and contribution rates by
an affirmative vote of at least four members.

(3) The council may
appoint or remove the state actuary by a two-thirds vote of the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. RCW 41.54.061 is
decodified.

Sec. 9. RCW 44.04.260 and 2001 c
259 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The joint legislative
audit and review committee, the legislative transportation committee, the ((joint))
select committee on pension policy, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, and the joint legislative systems committee
are subject to such operational policies, procedures, and oversight as are
deemed necessary by the facilities and operations committee of the senate and
the executive rules committee of the house of representatives to ensure
operational adequacy of the agencies of the legislative branch. As used in
this section, "operational policies, procedures, and oversight"
includes the development process of biennial budgets, contracting procedures,
personnel policies, and compensation plans, selection of a chief administrator,
facilities, and expenditures. This section does not grant oversight authority
to the facilities and operations committee of the senate over any standing
committee of the house of representatives or oversight authority to the
executive rules committee of the house of representatives over any standing
committee of the senate.

Sec. 10. RCW 44.44.030 and 2001 c
259 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to RCW
44.04.260, the state actuary shall have the authority to select and employ such
research, technical, clerical personnel, and consultants as the actuary deems
necessary, whose salaries shall be fixed by the actuary and approved by the ((joint
committee on pension policy)) pension funding council, and who shall
be exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06
RCW.

(2) All actuarial
valuations and experience studies performed by the office of the state actuary
shall be signed by a member of the American academy of actuaries. If the state
actuary is not such a member, the state actuary, after approval by the ((committee))
council, shall contract for a period not to exceed two years with a
member of the American academy of actuaries to assist in developing actuarial
valuations and experience studies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 44.44.015 (Administration) and 2001
c 259 s 10;

(2) RCW 44.44.050 (Joint committee on
pension policy--Membership, terms, leadership) and 1987 c 25 s 4; and

(3) RCW 44.44.060 (Joint committee on
pension policy--Powers and duties) and 1987 c 25 s 5.

---
END ---