BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act may be known and
cited as "the truth in lobbying act."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature finds
that the wrongful use by a person or organization of personal information
belonging to another person or organization for the purposes of influencing the
policies or conduct of government is harmful to the integrity of the person or
organization whose personal identity is misappropriated, the legislative
process, sound public policy, and the democratic underpinnings of
representative government.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Every person or
organization who uses the name of another person or organization for the
purpose of influencing or affecting the policy or conduct, or any proposed
policy or conduct, of any branch or level of government, or as supporting or
opposing any policy or conduct, or any proposed policy or conduct, of any
branch or level of government, without the prior knowledge and consent of the
other person or organization, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A person or organization
has a private cause of action against any person or organization that violates
section 2 of this act. A plaintiff bringing an action under this act may sue
to recover economic damages and to enjoin any subsequent or ongoing violations
of section 2 of this act. If the plaintiff prevails, in addition to damages
proven, the plaintiff shall be awarded costs, reasonable attorneys' fees, and
statutory damages of five hundred dollars per violation as established by a
preponderance of the evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. If, upon all the
evidence, the court finds that the respondent has not committed a violation of
section 2 of this act, the court shall dismiss the complaint and may include an
award of costs and reasonable attorneys' fees in favor of the respondent if the
court concludes the complaint was groundless.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 2 through 5 of
this act are each added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

---
END ---