BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county
legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the county
voters, and if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, fix
and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter for
the purposes designated in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) The tax authorized
in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and shall
be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
county. The rate of tax shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of
a use tax.

(3) Money received from
any tax imposed under this section shall be used solely for the purpose of
economic development.

(4) For
the purposes of this section, "economic development" means
development related to: Manufacturing, processing, research, production,
assembly, tooling, warehousing, airports, docks and wharves, mass commuting
facilities, high-speed intercity rail facilities, pollution control, solid
waste disposal, energy generating, conservation, or transmission facilities,
and sports facilities and industrial parks.

--- END ---