BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.56.115 and 1983 c
147 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Judgments founded on
the tortious conduct of the state of Washington or of the political
subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi municipal corporations of the
state, whether acting in their governmental or proprietary capacities, shall
bear interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the
((maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on)) equivalent coupon
issue yield (as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve
system) of the average bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as
determined at the first bill market auction conducted during the calendar month
immediately preceding the date of entry thereof((: PROVIDED, That)).
In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a
verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or
partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the
judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict
was rendered.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The rate of interest
required by section 1 of this act applies to the accrual of interest:

(1) As of the date of
entry of judgment with respect to a judgment that is entered on or after the
effective date of this act;

(2) As of the effective
date of this act with respect to a judgment that was entered before the
effective date of this act and that is still accruing interest on the effective
date of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.52.025 and 1986 c
60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each month
the state treasurer shall compute the highest rate of interest permissible
under RCW 19.52.020(1), and the rate of interest required by RCW 4.56.115,
for the succeeding calendar month. The treasurer shall file ((this rate))
these rates with the state code reviser for publication in the next
available issue of the Washington State Register in compliance with RCW
34.08.020(8).

---
END ---