BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the marine waters located in and adjacent to the Strait of Juan de Fuca
between the state of Washington and Canada are some of the most pristine and
diverse marine waters in the United States and include irreplaceable natural resources.
The area includes such national treasures as the Olympic Coast national marine
sanctuary and the Olympic national park, is home to five federally recognized
Indian reservations, holds one of the largest sea bird colonies on the west
coast, and is the habitat for several threatened and endangered species.

The legislature also
finds that the marine waters are of great environmental and economic importance
to not only the state of Washington, but also to the people of Canada and the
United States. The legislature also recognizes that the marine vessel traffic
on these waters presents risks of accidents and oil spills which would be
devastating to the environment and to the economy.

The legislature
recognizes that transits by commercial vessels through the Strait of Juan de
Fuca have been projected by the United States coast guard to increase by fifty
percent from 2000 to 2025. Volumes of petroleum movement, including cargo and
bunker oil, are conservatively projected to increase by nearly four billion
gallons by 2025. The legislature also recognizes that this growth in
commercial vessel transits, including increased transits by high risk or
priority 1 cargo vessels, and petroleum movement constitute a significant and
growing increase in projected oil spill frequency.

The legislature finds
that the recent placement of a rescue tug at Neah Bay has provided a valuable
service, assisting disabled commercial vessels and preventing major oil
spills. The legislature also realizes that the tug may also escort high risk
vessels, provide lifesaving capabilities, operate as a spill response
deployment platform during major casualties, and assist during salvage
operations. The legislature believes that a dedicated fund should be
established and funded to allow for the continuation of this proven safety
measure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.56 RCW to read as follows:

The rescue tug safety
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from private
contributions, foreign funds, federal funds, and legislative appropriations
made to fund the rescue tugs must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used solely for the placement of dedicated rescue tugs in Washington
waters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---