BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To provide greater
awareness of the causes and prevention approaches to musculoskeletal disorders,
the department shall:

(a) Provide
musculoskeletal disorder awareness educational materials to employers and
employees;

(b) Work with employers
and employees to develop ergonomics education and training programs;

(c) Work with employers
and employees to identify technical approaches and best practices to assist in
preventing workplace injuries and illnesses; and

(d) Work with employers
and employees to develop general and industry specific voluntary guidelines and
education materials.

(2) The department
shall provide periodic information to the industries deemed appropriate by the
department on practices, equipment, and products that have been identified by
the department as being effective in reducing musculoskeletal disorders.

(3) Rules dealing with
musculoskeletal disorders, adopted on May 26, 2000, by the director, and
codified as WAC 296-62-05101 through 296-62-05176, shall have no force or
effect and are hereby repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---