BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.110 and 1999 c
221 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county, city-county, city, or town, by local law and
ordinance, and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and rules
adopted under this chapter, may provide for the taxing of any gambling activity
authorized by this chapter within its jurisdiction, the tax receipts to go to
the county, city-county, city, or town so taxing the activity. Any such tax
imposed by a county alone shall not apply to any gambling activity within a
city or town located in the county but the tax rate established by a county, if
any, shall constitute the tax rate throughout the unincorporated areas of such
county.

(2) The operation of
punch boards and pull-tabs are subject to the following conditions:

(a) Chances may only be
sold to adults;

(b) The price of a
single chance may not exceed one dollar;

(c) No punch board or
pull-tab license may award as a prize upon a winning number or symbol being
drawn the opportunity of taking a chance upon any other punch board or
pull-tab;

(d) All prizes
available to be won must be described on an information flare. All merchandise
prizes must be on display within the immediate area of the premises in which
any such punch board or pull-tab is located. Upon a winning number or symbol
being drawn, a merchandise prize must be immediately removed from the display
and awarded to the winner. All references to cash or merchandise prizes, with
a value over twenty dollars, must be removed immediately from the information
flare when won, or such omission shall be deemed a fraud for the purposes of
this chapter; and

(e) When any person
wins money or merchandise from any punch board or pull-tab over an amount
determined by the commission, every licensee shall keep a public record of the
award for at least ninety days containing such information as the commission
shall deem necessary.

(3)(a) Taxation of
bingo and raffles shall never be in an amount greater than five percent of the
gross receipts from a bingo game or raffle less the amount awarded as cash or
merchandise prizes.

(b) Taxation of
amusement games shall only be in an amount sufficient to pay the actual costs
of enforcement of the provisions of this chapter by the county, city or town
law enforcement agency and in no event shall such taxation exceed two percent
of the gross receipts from the amusement game less the amount awarded as prizes.

(c) No tax shall be
imposed under the authority of this chapter on bingo or amusement games when
such activities or any combination thereof are conducted by any bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter, which organization
has no paid operating or management personnel and has gross receipts from bingo
or amusement games, or a combination thereof, not exceeding five thousand
dollars per year, less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes.

(d) No tax shall be imposed
on the first ((ten)) fifteen thousand dollars of gross receipts
less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes from raffles conducted by
any bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter.

(e) Taxation of punch
boards and pull-tabs for bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations is
based on gross receipts from the operation of the games less the amount awarded
as cash or merchandise prizes, and shall not exceed a rate of ten percent. At
the option of the county, city-county, city, or town, the taxation of punch
boards and pull-tabs for commercial stimulant operators may be based on gross
receipts from the operation of the games, and may not exceed a rate of five
percent, or may be based on gross receipts from the operation of the games less
the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes, and may not exceed a rate of
ten percent.

(f) Taxation of social
card games may not exceed twenty percent of the gross revenue from such games.

(4) Taxes
imposed under this chapter become a lien upon personal and real property used
in the gambling activity in the same manner as provided for under RCW
84.60.010. The lien shall attach on the date the tax becomes due and shall
relate back and have priority against real and personal property to the same
extent as ad valorem taxes.

--- END ---