BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
67.70.040(1)(f), the commission may offer on-line games in which the drawing or
selection of winning tickets occurs more than once every twenty-four hours.

(2) The multiple day
draw account is created as a separate account outside the state treasury. The
account is managed, maintained, and controlled by the commission and consists
of all revenues received from the sale of lottery tickets for on-line games in
which the drawing or selection of winners occurs more than once every twenty-four
hours, and all other moneys credited or transferred to it from any other fund
or source under law. The account is allotted according to chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

The net
revenues, if any, in the multiple daily draw account shall be deposited in the
general fund.

---
END ---