BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.89.080 and 1998 c
74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any county
legislative authority may provide by resolution for revenues by fixing rates
and charges for the furnishing of service to those served or receiving benefits
or to be served or to receive benefits from any storm water control facility ((or
contributing to an increase of surface water runoff)). In fixing rates and
charges, the county legislative authority may in its discretion consider: (1)
Services furnished or to be furnished; (2) benefits received or to be received;
(3) the character and use of land ((or its water runoff characteristics));
(4) the nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW 24.03.490, of the
land user; (5) income level of persons served or provided benefits under this
chapter, including senior citizens and disabled persons; or (6) any other
matters which present a reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. The
service charges and rates collected shall be deposited in a special fund or
funds in the county treasury to be used only for the purpose of paying all or
any part of the cost and expense of maintaining and operating storm water
control facilities, all or any part of the cost and expense of planning,
designing, establishing, acquiring, developing, constructing and improving any
of such facilities, or to pay or secure the payment of all or any portion of
any issue of general obligation or revenue bonds issued for such purpose. Rates
and charges may not be fixed or altered based on the water runoff
characteristics of the property served except with regard to a landfill as
defined in RCW 70.95.030.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.94.140 and 1997 c
447 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Every county, in the
operation of a system of sewerage and/or water, shall have full jurisdiction
and authority to manage, regulate, and control it and to fix, alter, regulate,
and control the rates and charges for the service and facilities to those to
whom such service and facilities are available, and to levy charges for
connection to the system. The rates for availability of service and
facilities, and connection charges so charged must be uniform for the same
class of customers or service and facility. Rates and charges may not be
fixed or altered based on the water runoff characteristics of the property
served except with regard to a landfill as defined in RCW 70.95.030.

In classifying
customers served, service furnished or made available by such system of
sewerage and/or water, or the connection charges, the county legislative authority
may consider any or all of the following factors:

(1) The difference in
cost of service to the various customers within or without the area;

(2) The difference in
cost of maintenance, operation, repair and replacement of the various parts of
the systems;

(3) The different
character of the service and facilities furnished various customers;

(4) The quantity and
quality of the sewage and/or water delivered and the time of its delivery;

(5) Capital
contributions made to the system or systems, including, but not limited to,
assessments;

(6) The cost of
acquiring the system or portions of the system in making system improvements
necessary for the public health and safety;

(7) The nonprofit
public benefit status, as defined in RCW 24.03.490, of the land user; and

(8) Any other matters
which present a reasonable difference as a ground for distinction.

A county may provide
assistance to aid low-income persons in connection with services provided under
this chapter.

The service charges and
rates shall produce revenues sufficient to take care of the costs of
maintenance and operation, revenue bond and warrant interest and principal
amortization requirements, and all other charges necessary for the efficient
and proper operation of the system.

Sec. 3. RCW 86.15.160 and 1986 c
278 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter the supervisors may authorize:

(1) An annual excess ad
valorem tax levy within any zone or participating zones when authorized by the
voters of the zone or participating zones under RCW 84.52.052 and 84.52.054;

(2) An assessment upon
property, including state property, specially benefited by flood control
improvements or storm water control improvements imposed under chapter 86.09
RCW;

(3) Within any zone or
participating zones an annual ad valorem property tax levy of not to exceed
fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value when the levy will not take
dollar rates that other taxing districts may lawfully claim and that will not
cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional and/or statutory
limitations, and the additional levy, or any portion thereof, may also be made
when dollar rates of other taxing units is released therefor by agreement with
the other taxing units from their authorized levies;

(4) A charge, under RCW
36.89.080, for the furnishing of service to those who are receiving or will
receive benefits from storm water control facilities ((and who are
contributing to an increase in surface water runoff)). Except as otherwise
provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity and public property, including the
state and state property, shall be liable for the charges to the same extent a
private person and privately owned property is liable for the charges, and in
setting these rates and charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services,
such as stream improvements or donation of property;

(5) The
creation of local improvement districts and utility local improvement
districts, the issuance of improvement district bonds and warrants, and the
imposition, collection, and enforcement of special assessments on all property,
including any state-owned or other publicly-owned property, specially benefited
from improvements in the same manner as provided for counties by chapter 36.94
RCW.

---
END ---