BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.21.315 and 1994 c
50 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No city or town shall
enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that fails to conform to the
limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952
(1985)" issued by the federal communications commission. An ordinance or
regulation adopted by a city or town with respect to amateur radio antennas
shall conform to the limited federal preemption, that states local regulations
that involve placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health,
safety, or aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably accommodate
amateur communications, and to represent the minimal practicable regulation to
accomplish the local authority's legitimate purpose. However, no city or
town shall restrict an amateur radio antenna height to less than seventy feet
unless the restriction is necessary to achieve a clearly defined health,
safety, or aesthetic consideration.

Sec. 2. RCW 35A.21.260 and 1994
c 50 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No code
city shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that fails to conform to
the limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952
(1985)" issued by the federal communications commission. An ordinance or
regulation adopted by a code city with respect to amateur radio antennas shall
conform to the limited federal preemption, that states local regulations that
involve placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health, safety, or
aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably accommodate amateur
communications, and to represent the minimal practicable regulation to
accomplish the local authority's legitimate purpose. However, no code city
shall restrict an amateur radio antenna height to less than seventy feet unless
the restriction is necessary to achieve a clearly defined health, safety, or
aesthetic consideration.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.32.600 and 1994 c
50 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No county
shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that fails to conform to the
limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952
(1985)" issued by the federal communications commission. An ordinance or
regulation adopted by a county with respect to amateur radio antennas shall
conform to the limited federal preemption, that states local regulations that
involve placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health, safety, or
aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably accommodate amateur
communications, and to represent the minimal practicable regulation to
accomplish the local authority's legitimate purpose. However, no county
shall restrict an amateur radio antenna height to less than seventy feet unless
the restriction is necessary to achieve a clearly defined health, safety, or
aesthetic consideration.

---
END ---