BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.32.040 and 1982 c
10 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
RCW 9A.32.030(2), any person convicted of the crime of murder in the first
degree shall be sentenced ((to life imprisonment)) as provided in
chapter 10.95 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.110 and 2000 c
75 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before imposing a
sentence upon a defendant, the court shall conduct a sentencing hearing. The
sentencing hearing shall be held within forty court days following conviction.
Upon the motion of either party for good cause shown, or on its own motion, the
court may extend the time period for conducting the sentencing hearing.

Except in cases where
the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for life
without the possibility of release or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 ((for
the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree)), sentenced to death,
the court may order the department to complete a risk assessment report. If
available before sentencing, the report shall be provided to the court.

Unless specifically
waived by the court, the court shall order the department to complete a
chemical dependency screening report before imposing a sentence upon a
defendant who has been convicted of a violation of the uniform controlled
substances act under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit
such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW where the court finds that the
offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense.
In addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the
department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence upon a
defendant who has been convicted of a felony sexual offense. The department of
corrections shall give priority to presentence investigations for sexual offenders.
If the court determines that the defendant may be a mentally ill person as
defined in RCW 71.24.025, although the defendant has not established that at
the time of the crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was
incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the crime, the
court shall order the department to complete a presentence report before
imposing a sentence.

The court shall
consider the risk assessment report and presentence reports, if any, including
any victim impact statement and criminal history, and allow arguments from the
prosecutor, the defense counsel, the offender, the victim, the survivor of the
victim, or a representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law
enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.

If the court is
satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has a criminal
history, the court shall specify the convictions it has found to exist. All of
this information shall be part of the record. Copies of all risk assessment
reports and presentence reports presented to the sentencing court and all
written findings of facts and conclusions of law as to sentencing entered by
the court shall be sent to the department by the clerk of the court at the
conclusion of the sentencing and shall accompany the offender if the offender
is committed to the custody of the department. Court clerks shall provide,
without charge, certified copies of documents relating to criminal convictions
requested by prosecuting attorneys.

(2) To prevent wrongful
disclosure of information related to mental health services, as defined in RCW
71.05.445 and 71.34.225, a court may take only those steps necessary during a
sentencing hearing or any hearing in which the department presents information
related to mental health services to the court. The steps may be taken on
motion of the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or on the court's own
motion. The court may seal the portion of the record relating to information
relating to mental health services, exclude the public from the hearing during
presentation or discussion of information relating to mental health services,
or grant other relief to achieve the result intended by this subsection, but
nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the subsequent release
of information related to mental health services as authorized by RCW
71.05.445, 71.34.225, or 72.09.585. Any person who otherwise is permitted to
attend any hearing pursuant to chapter 7.69 or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded
from the hearing solely because the department intends to disclose or discloses
information related to mental health services.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2000 c
225 s 5, 2000 c 119 s 17, and 2000 c 66 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI((Aggravated))
Murder 1 (RCW ((10.95.020)) 9A.32.030)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

((Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)))

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five hundred
dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.440 and 2000 c
119 s 28 and 2000 c 28 s 17 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Decision not to
prosecute.

STANDARD: A
prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question or would result in decreased respect for the law.

GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The following are
examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the standard.

(a) Contrary to
Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent of
the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b) Antiquated Statute
- It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in question is
antiquated in that:

(i) It has not been
enforced for many years; and

(ii) Most members of
society act as if it were no longer in existence; and

(iii) It serves no
deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv) The statute has
not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This reason is not to
be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law in question is
unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c) De Minimus
Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the violation of law is
only technical or insubstantial and where no public interest or deterrent
purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d) Confinement on
Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because the accused has
been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of confinement; and

(i) Conviction of the
new offense would not merit any additional direct or collateral punishment;

(ii) The new offense is
either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly aggravated; and

(iii) Conviction of the
new offense would not serve any significant deterrent purpose.

(e) Pending Conviction
on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge because the accused
is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another county; and

(i) Conviction of the
new offense would not merit any additional direct or collateral punishment;

(ii) Conviction in the
pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii) The new offense
is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly aggravated; and

(iv) Conviction of the
new offense would not serve any significant deterrent purpose.

(f) High
Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on, prosecution
witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of prosecuting the
offense in question. This reason should be limited to minor cases and should
not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g) Improper Motives of
Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because the motives of the
complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no public purpose, would
defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or would result in
decreased respect for the law.

(h) Immunity - It may
be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given to an accused in
order to prosecute another where the accused's information or testimony will
reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible for more
serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the public
interest.

(i) Victim Request - It
may be proper to decline to charge because the victim requests that no criminal
charges be filed and the case involves the following crimes or situations:

(i) Assault cases where
the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii) Crimes against
property, not involving violence, where no major loss was suffered;

(iii) Where doing so
would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care should be taken to
insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not the product of
threats or pressure by the accused.

The presence of these
factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a prosecution which has been
commenced.

Notification

The prosecutor is
encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law enforcement
personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2) Decision to
prosecute.

(a) STANDARD:

Crimes against persons
will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which, when considered
with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised
under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable and objective fact-finder.
With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW 9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, 9A.44.073,
9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020 the
prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or diversions intended to place
the accused in a program of treatment or counseling, so that treatment, if
determined to be beneficial, can be provided pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.

Crimes against
property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of such
convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

See table below for the
crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION
OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES
AGAINST PERSONS

((Aggravated
Murder))

1st Degree Murder

2nd Degree Murder

1st Degree Manslaughter

2nd Degree Manslaughter

1st Degree Kidnapping

2nd Degree Kidnapping

1st Degree Assault

2nd Degree Assault

3rd Degree Assault

1st Degree Assault of a
Child

2nd Degree Assault of a
Child

3rd Degree Assault of a
Child

1st Degree Rape

2nd Degree Rape

3rd Degree Rape

1st Degree Rape of a
Child

2nd Degree Rape of a
Child

3rd Degree Rape of a
Child

1st Degree Robbery

2nd Degree Robbery

1st Degree Arson

1st Degree Burglary

1st Degree Extortion

2nd Degree Extortion

Indecent Liberties

Incest

Vehicular Homicide

Vehicular Assault

1st Degree Child
Molestation

2nd Degree Child
Molestation

3rd Degree Child
Molestation

1st Degree Promoting
Prostitution

Intimidating a Juror

Communication with a
Minor

Intimidating a Witness

Intimidating a Public
Servant

Bomb Threat (if against
person)

Unlawful Imprisonment

Promoting a Suicide
Attempt

Riot (if against
person)

Stalking

Custodial Assault

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Counterfeiting (if a
violation of RCW 9.16.035(4))

CRIMES
AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES

2nd Degree
Arson

1st Degree
Escape

2nd Degree Escape

2nd Degree Burglary

1st Degree Theft

2nd Degree Theft

1st Degree Perjury

2nd Degree Perjury

1st Degree Introducing
Contraband

2nd Degree Introducing
Contraband

1st Degree Possession
of Stolen Property

2nd Degree Possession
of Stolen Property

Bribery

Bribing a Witness

Bribe received by a
Witness

Bomb Threat (if against
property)

1st Degree Malicious
Mischief

2nd Degree Malicious
Mischief

1st Degree Reckless
Burning

Taking a Motor Vehicle
without Authorization

Forgery

2nd Degree Promoting
Prostitution

Tampering with a
Witness

Trading in Public
Office

Trading in Special
Influence

Receiving/Granting
Unlawful Compensation

Bigamy

Eluding a Pursuing Police
Vehicle

Willful Failure to
Return from Furlough

Escape from Community
Custody

Riot (if against
property)

1st Degree Theft of
Livestock

2nd Degree Theft of
Livestock

ALL OTHER UNCLASSIFIED
FELONIES

Selection of
Charges/Degree of Charge

(i) The prosecutor
should file charges which adequately describe the nature of defendant's
conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are necessary to ensure
that the charges:

(A) Will significantly
enhance the strength of the state's case at trial; or

(B) Will result in
restitution to all victims.

(ii) The
prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea. Overcharging
includes:

(A)
Charging a higher degree;

(B) Charging additional
counts.

This standard is
intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which demonstrate the
nature and seriousness of a defendant's criminal conduct, but to decline to
charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication. Crimes which do
not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same course of conduct,
do not all have to be charged.

(b)
GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

(i) Police
Investigation

A prosecuting attorney
is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the necessary factual
investigation which must precede the decision to prosecute. The prosecuting
attorney shall ensure that a thorough factual investigation has been conducted
before a decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary circumstances the
investigation should include the following:

(A) The interviewing of
all material witnesses, together with the obtaining of written statements
whenever possible;

(B) The completion of
necessary laboratory tests; and

(C) The obtaining, in
accordance with constitutional requirements, of the suspect's version of the
events.

If the initial
investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist upon further
investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify what the
investigation needs to include.

(ii) Exceptions

In certain situations,
a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal complaint before the
investigation is complete if:

(A) Probable cause
exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(B) The suspect
presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee if not apprehended; or

(C) The arrest of the
suspect is necessary to complete the investigation of the crime.

In the event that the
exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting attorney shall obtain a
commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to complete the
investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation does not
produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the complaint
should be dismissed.

(iii) Investigation
Techniques

The prosecutor should
be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were used in the case
investigation including:

(A) Polygraph testing;

(B) Hypnosis;

(C) Electronic
surveillance;

(D) Use of informants.

(iv) Pre-Filing
Discussions with Defendant

Discussions with the
defendant or his/her representative regarding the selection or disposition of
charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential agreements can
be reached.

(v) Pre-Filing
Discussions with Victim(s)

Discussions with the
victim(s) or victims' representatives regarding the selection or disposition of
charges may occur before the filing of charges. The discussions may be
considered by the prosecutor in charging and disposition decisions, and should
be considered before reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding these
decisions.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.560 and 2000 c
28 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the
statutory maximum sentence or any other provision of this chapter, a persistent
offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for life without the
possibility of release or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of ((aggravated))
murder in the first degree, sentenced to death. In addition, no offender
subject to this section may be eligible for community custody, earned release
time, furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release,
or any other form of release as defined under RCW 9.94A.150 (1), (2), (3), (4),
(6), (8), or (9), or any other form of authorized leave from a correctional
facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer or officers,
except: (1) In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment;
or (2) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the
case of an offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree.

Sec. 6. RCW 10.95.030 and 1993 c
479 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, any person convicted of the crime of ((aggravated))
first degree murder shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility
of release or parole. A person sentenced to life imprisonment under this
section shall not have that sentence suspended, deferred, or commuted by any
judicial officer and the indeterminate sentence review board or its successor
may not parole such prisoner nor reduce the period of confinement in any manner
whatsoever including but not limited to any sort of good‑time
calculation. The department of social and health services or its successor or
any executive official may not permit such prisoner to participate in any sort
of release or furlough program.

(2) If, pursuant to a
special sentencing proceeding held under RCW 10.95.050, the trier of fact finds
that there are not sufficient mitigating circumstances to merit leniency, the
sentence shall be death. In no case, however, shall a person be sentenced to
death if the person was mentally retarded at the time the crime was committed,
under the definition of mental retardation set forth in (a) of this
subsection. A diagnosis of mental retardation shall be documented by a
licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist designated by the court, who is
an expert in the diagnosis and evaluation of mental retardation. The defense must
establish mental retardation by a preponderance of the evidence and the court
must make a finding as to the existence of mental retardation.

(a) "Mentally
retarded" means the individual has: (i) Significantly subaverage general
intellectual functioning; (ii) existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive
behavior; and (iii) both significantly subaverage general intellectual
functioning and deficits in adaptive behavior were manifested during the
developmental period.

(b) "General
intellectual functioning" means the results obtained by assessment with
one or more of the individually administered general intelligence tests
developed for the purpose of assessing intellectual functioning.

(c) "Significantly
subaverage general intellectual functioning" means intelligence quotient
seventy or below.

(d) "Adaptive
behavior" means the effectiveness or degree with which individuals meet
the standards of personal independence and social responsibility expected for
his or her age.

(e) "Developmental
period" means the period of time between conception and the eighteenth
birthday.

Sec. 7. RCW 10.95.050 and 1981 c
138 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a defendant is
adjudicated guilty of ((aggravated)) first degree murder, whether by
acceptance of a plea of guilty, by verdict of a jury, or by decision of the
trial court sitting without a jury, a special sentencing proceeding shall be
held ((if a notice of special sentencing proceeding was filed and served as
provided by RCW 10.95.040)). No sort of plea, admission, or agreement may
abrogate the requirement that a special sentencing proceeding be held.

(2) A jury shall decide
the matters presented in the special sentencing proceeding unless a jury is
waived in the discretion of the court and with the consent of the defendant and
the prosecuting attorney.

(3) If the defendant's
guilt was determined by a jury verdict, the trial court shall reconvene the
same jury to hear the special sentencing proceeding. The proceeding shall
commence as soon as practicable after completion of the trial at which the
defendant's guilt was determined. If, however, unforeseen circumstances make
it impracticable to reconvene the same jury to hear the special sentencing
proceeding, the trial court may dismiss that jury and convene a jury pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section.

(4) If the defendant's
guilt was determined by plea of guilty or by decision of the trial court
sitting without a jury, or if a retrial of the special sentencing proceeding is
necessary for any reason including but not limited to a mistrial in a previous
special sentencing proceeding or as a consequence of a remand from an appellate
court, the trial court shall impanel a jury of twelve persons plus whatever
alternate jurors the trial court deems necessary. The defense and prosecution
shall each be allowed to peremptorily challenge twelve jurors. If there is
more than one defendant, each defendant shall be allowed an additional
peremptory challenge and the prosecution shall be allowed a like number of
additional challenges. If alternate jurors are selected, the defense and
prosecution shall each be allowed one peremptory challenge for each alternate
juror to be selected and if there is more than one defendant each defendant
shall be allowed an additional peremptory challenge for each alternate juror to
be selected and the prosecution shall be allowed a like number of additional
challenges.

Sec. 8. RCW 10.95.060 and 1981 c
138 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the commencement
of the special sentencing proceeding, the trial court shall instruct the jury
as to the nature and purpose of the proceeding and as to the consequences of
its decision, as provided in RCW 10.95.030.

(2) At the special
sentencing proceeding both the prosecution and defense shall be allowed to make
an opening statement. The prosecution shall first present evidence and then
the defense may present evidence. Rebuttal evidence may be presented by each
side. Upon conclusion of the evidence, the court shall instruct the jury and
then the prosecution and defense shall be permitted to present argument. The
prosecution shall open and conclude the argument.

(3) The court shall
admit any relevant evidence which it deems to have probative value regardless
of its admissibility under the rules of evidence, including hearsay evidence
and evidence of the defendant's previous criminal activity regardless of
whether the defendant has been charged or convicted as a result of such
activity. The defendant shall be accorded a fair opportunity to rebut or offer
any hearsay evidence.

In addition to evidence
of whether or not there are sufficient mitigating circumstances to merit
leniency, if the jury sitting in the special sentencing proceeding has not
heard evidence of the ((aggravated)) first degree murder of which the
defendant stands convicted, both the defense and prosecution may introduce
evidence concerning the facts and circumstances of the murder.

(4) Upon conclusion of
the evidence and argument at the special sentencing proceeding, the jury shall
retire to deliberate upon the following question: "Having in mind the
crime of which the defendant has been found guilty, are you convinced beyond a
reasonable doubt that there are not sufficient mitigating circumstances to
merit leniency?"

In order to return an
affirmative answer to the question posed by this subsection, the jury must so
find unanimously.

Sec. 9. RCW 10.95.090 and 1981 c
138 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

If any sentence of
death imposed pursuant to this chapter is commuted by the governor, or held to
be invalid by a final judgment of a court after all avenues of appeal have been
exhausted by the parties to the action, or if the death penalty established by
this chapter is held to be invalid by a final judgment of a court which is
binding on all courts in the state, the sentence for ((aggravated))
first degree murder if there was an affirmative response to the question posed
by RCW 10.95.060(4) shall be life imprisonment as provided in RCW 10.95.030(1).

Sec. 10. RCW 10.95.120 and 1981 c
138 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

In all cases in which a
person is convicted of ((aggravated)) first degree murder, the trial
court shall, within thirty days after the entry of the judgment and sentence,
submit a report to the clerk of the supreme court of Washington, to the
defendant or his or her attorney, and to the prosecuting attorney which
provides the information specified under subsections (1) through (8) of this
section. The report shall be in the form of a standard questionnaire prepared
and supplied by the supreme court of Washington and shall include the following:

(1) Information about
the defendant, including the following:

(a) Name, date of
birth, gender, marital status, and race and/or ethnic origin;

(b) Number and ages of
children;

(c) Whether his or her
parents are living, and date of death where applicable;

(d) Number of children
born to his or her parents;

(e) The defendant's
educational background, intelligence level, and intelligence quotient;

(f) Whether a
psychiatric evaluation was performed, and if so, whether it indicated that the
defendant was:

(i) Able to distinguish
right from wrong;

(ii) Able to perceive
the nature and quality of his or her act; and

(iii) Able to cooperate
intelligently with his or her defense;

(g) Any character or
behavior disorders found or other pertinent psychiatric or psychological
information;

(h) The work record of
the defendant;

(i) A list of the
defendant's prior convictions including the offense, date, and sentence
imposed; and

(j) The length of time
the defendant has resided in Washington and the county in which he or she was
convicted.

(2) Information about
the trial, including:

(a) The defendant's
plea;

(b) Whether defendant
was represented by counsel;

(c) Whether there was
evidence introduced or instructions given as to defenses to ((aggravated))
first degree murder, including excusable homicide, justifiable homicide,
insanity, duress, entrapment, alibi, intoxication, or other specific defense;

(d) Any other offenses
charged against the defendant and tried at the same trial and whether they
resulted in conviction; and

(e) ((What
aggravating circumstances were alleged against the defendant and which of these
circumstances was found to have been applicable; and

(f))) Names and charges filed against other
defendant(s) if tried jointly and disposition of the charges.

(3) Information
concerning the special sentencing proceeding, including:

(a) The date the
defendant was convicted and date the special sentencing proceeding commenced;

(b) Whether the jury
for the special sentencing proceeding was the same jury that returned the
guilty verdict, providing an explanation if it was not;

(c) Whether there was
evidence of mitigating circumstances;

(d) Whether there was,
in the court's opinion, credible evidence of the mitigating circumstances as
provided in RCW 10.95.070;

(e) The jury's answer
to the question posed in RCW 10.95.060(4);

(f) The sentence
imposed.

(4) Information about
the victim, including:

(a) Whether he or she
was related to the defendant by blood or marriage;

(b) The victim's
occupation and whether he or she was an employer or employee of the defendant;

(c) Whether the victim
was acquainted with the defendant, and if so, how well;

(d) The length of time
the victim resided in Washington and the county;

(e) Whether the victim
was the same race and/or ethnic origin as the defendant;

(f) Whether the victim
was the same sex as the defendant;

(g) Whether the victim
was held hostage during the crime and if so, how long;

(h) The nature and
extent of any physical harm or torture inflicted upon the victim prior to
death;

(i) The victim's age;
and

(j) The type of weapon
used in the crime, if any.

(5) Information about
the representation of the defendant, including:

(a) Date counsel
secured;

(b) Whether counsel was
retained or appointed, including the reason for appointment;

(c) The length of time
counsel has practiced law and nature of his or her practice; and

(d) Whether the same
counsel served at both the trial and special sentencing proceeding, and if not,
why not.

(6) General
considerations, including:

(a) Whether the race
and/or ethnic origin of the defendant, victim, or any witness was an apparent
factor at trial;

(b) What percentage of
the county population is the same race and/or ethnic origin of the defendant;

(c) Whether members of
the defendant's or victim's race and/or ethnic origin were represented on the
jury;

(d) Whether there was
evidence that such members were systematically excluded from the jury;

(e) Whether the sexual
orientation of the defendant, victim, or any witness was a factor in the trial;

(f) Whether any
specific instruction was given to the jury to exclude race, ethnic origin, or
sexual orientation as an issue;

(g) Whether there was
extensive publicity concerning the case in the community;

(h) Whether the jury
was instructed to disregard such publicity;

(i) Whether the jury
was instructed to avoid any influence of passion, prejudice, or any other
arbitrary factor when considering its verdict or its findings in the special
sentencing proceeding;

(j) The nature of the
evidence resulting in such instruction; and

(k) General comments of
the trial judge concerning the appropriateness of the sentence considering the
crime, defendant, and other relevant factors.

(7) Information about
the chronology of the case, including the date that:

(a) The defendant was
arrested;

(b) Trial began;

(c) The verdict was
returned;

(d) Post-trial motions
were ruled on;

(e) Special sentencing
proceeding began;

(f) Sentence was
imposed;

(g) Trial judge's
report was completed; and

(h) Trial judge's
report was filed.

(8) The trial judge
shall sign and date the questionnaire when it is completed.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.43.830 and 1999 c
45 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840.

(1)
"Applicant" means:

(a) Any prospective
employee who will or may have unsupervised access to children under sixteen
years of age or developmentally disabled persons or vulnerable adults during
the course of his or her employment or involvement with the business or
organization;

(b) Any prospective
volunteer who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children
under sixteen years of age, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable
adults during the course of his or her employment or involvement with the
business or organization under circumstances where such access will or may
involve groups of (i) five or fewer children under twelve years of age, (ii)
three or fewer children between twelve and sixteen years of age, (iii)
developmentally disabled persons, or (iv) vulnerable adults; or

(c) Any prospective
adoptive parent, as defined in RCW 26.33.020.

(2) "Business or
organization" means a business or organization licensed in this state, any
agency of the state, or other governmental entity, that educates, trains,
treats, supervises, houses, or provides recreation to developmentally disabled
persons, vulnerable adults, or children under sixteen years of age, including
but not limited to public housing authorities, school districts, and
educational service districts.

(3) "Civil
adjudication" means a specific court finding of sexual abuse or
exploitation or physical abuse in a dependency action under RCW 13.34.040 or in
a domestic relations action under Title 26 RCW. In the case of vulnerable
adults, civil adjudication means a specific court finding of abuse or financial
exploitation in a protection proceeding under chapter 74.34 RCW. It does not
include administrative proceedings. The term "civil adjudication" is
further limited to court findings that identify as the perpetrator of the abuse
a named individual, over the age of eighteen years, who was a party to the
dependency or dissolution proceeding or was a respondent in a protection
proceeding in which the finding was made and who contested the allegation of
abuse or exploitation.

(4) "Conviction
record" means "conviction record" information as defined in RCW
10.97.030(3) relating to a crime against children or other persons committed by
either an adult or a juvenile. It does not include a conviction for an offense
that has been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate of
rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the
rehabilitation of the person convicted, or a conviction that has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a
finding of innocence. It does include convictions for offenses for which the
defendant received a deferred or suspended sentence, unless the record has been
expunged according to law.

(5) "Crime against
children or other persons" means a conviction of any of the following
offenses: ((Aggravated murder;)) First or second degree murder;
first or second degree kidnaping; first, second, or third degree assault;
first, second, or third degree assault of a child; first, second, or third
degree rape; first, second, or third degree rape of a child; first or second
degree robbery; first degree arson; first degree burglary; first or second
degree manslaughter; first or second degree extortion; indecent liberties;
incest; vehicular homicide; first degree promoting prostitution; communication
with a minor; unlawful imprisonment; simple assault; sexual exploitation of
minors; first or second degree criminal mistreatment; child abuse or neglect as
defined in RCW 26.44.020; first or second degree custodial interference; first
or second degree custodial sexual misconduct; malicious harassment; first,
second, or third degree child molestation; first or second degree sexual misconduct
with a minor; patronizing a juvenile prostitute; child abandonment; promoting
pornography; selling or distributing erotic material to a minor; custodial
assault; violation of child abuse restraining order; child buying or selling;
prostitution; felony indecent exposure; criminal abandonment; or any of these
crimes as they may be renamed in the future.

(6) "Crimes
relating to drugs" means a conviction of a crime to manufacture, delivery,
or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance.

(7) "Crimes
relating to financial exploitation" means a conviction for first, second,
or third degree extortion; first, second, or third degree theft; first or
second degree robbery; forgery; or any of these crimes as they may be renamed in
the future.

(8) "Disciplinary
board final decision" means any final decision issued by a disciplining
authority under chapter 18.130 RCW or the secretary of the department of health
for the following businesses or professions:

(a) Chiropractic;

(b) Dentistry;

(c) Dental hygiene;

(d) Massage;

(e) Midwifery;

(f) Naturopathy;

(g) Osteopathic
medicine and surgery;

(h) Physical therapy;

(i) Physicians;

(j) Practical nursing;

(k) Registered nursing;
and

(l) Psychology.

"Disciplinary
board final decision," for real estate brokers and salespersons, means any
final decision issued by the director of the department of licensing for real
estate brokers and salespersons.

(9)
"Unsupervised" means not in the presence of:

(a) Another employee or
volunteer from the same business or organization as the applicant; or

(b) Any relative or
guardian of any of the children or developmentally disabled persons or
vulnerable adults to which the applicant has access during the course of his or
her employment or involvement with the business or organization.

(10) "Vulnerable
adult" means "vulnerable adult" as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW,
except that for the purposes of requesting and receiving background checks
pursuant to RCW 43.43.832, it shall also include adults of any age who lack the
functional, mental, or physical ability to care for themselves.

(11) "Financial
exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of a vulnerable adult or
that adult's resources for another person's profit or advantage.

(12) "Agency"
means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or facility
which receives, provides services to, houses or otherwise cares for vulnerable
adults.

Sec. 12. RCW 43.330.190 and 1999
c 303 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Counties may submit a
petition for relief to the office of public defense for reimbursement of
extraordinary criminal justice costs. Extraordinary criminal justice costs are
defined as those associated with investigation, prosecution, indigent defense,
jury impanelment, expert witnesses, interpreters, incarceration, and other
adjudication costs of ((aggravated)) murder cases.

(1) The office of
public defense, in consultation with the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall
develop procedures for processing the petitions, for auditing the veracity of
the petitions, and for prioritizing the petitions. Prioritization of the
petitions shall be based on, but not limited to, such factors as
disproportionate fiscal impact relative to the county budget, efficient use of
resources, and whether the costs are extraordinary and could not be reasonably
accommodated and anticipated in the normal budget process.

(2) Before January 1st
of each year, the office of public defense, in consultation with the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs, shall develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives a prioritized list of
submitted petitions that are recommended for funding by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 10.95.020 (Definition) and 1998 c
305 s 1; and

(2) RCW 10.95.040 (Special sentencing
proceeding--Notice--Filing--Service) and 1981 c 138 s 4.

---
END ---