BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.71.010 and 1965 c
9 s 29.71.010 are each amended to read as follows:

On the
Tuesday next after the first Monday of November in the year in which a
president of the United States is to be elected there shall be elected as many
electors of president and vice-president of the United States as there
are senators and representatives in congress allotted to this state. The
electors shall be elected based on the number of votes cast for each of the
three parties receiving the most votes in the state divided by the aggregate
number of votes cast for the three parties receiving the most votes in the
state. All three parties shall elect at least one elector.

--- END ---