BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.71.010 and 1965 c
9 s 29.71.010 are each amended to read as follows:

On the
Tuesday next after the first Monday of November in the year in which a
president of the United States is to be elected there shall be elected as many
electors of president and vice-president of the United States as there
are senators and representatives in congress allotted to this state. A
number of electors which corresponds to the number of representatives in
congress from this state shall be elected based on the party receiving the most
votes within the various congressional districts. The remaining electors shall
be elected based on the party receiving the most votes throughout the state.

--- END ---