BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is important that the
state of Washington provide adequate access to outdoor recreation
opportunities, while at the same time ensuring that such access is compatible
with prudent land management and species protection under the forests and fish
agreement and the department of natural resources habitat conservation plan.
The legislature recognizes that nonhighway road access is a critical component
of outdoor recreation opportunity, either as a means for reaching a recreation
destination, or as part of the recreation experience itself. As road access
decreases on federal and private lands due to road closures, public use of
roads on state-owned lands is increasing. This places a greater burden, from
potential overuse of roads and increased public misuse, on state land
management agencies such as the department of natural resources. The
legislature also recognizes the importance of fully understanding the
feasibility and associated costs of increasing public access to public lands,
while maintaining the safety of the public and employees of land management
agencies and avoiding additional environmental impacts or loss of public
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The department of natural
resources shall undertake a study of state trust lands and report back to the
legislature by July 1, 2003, concerning:

(1) Problems created by
vandalism, garbage, and illegal materials dumping, other misuses of public
resources, and the causes of such problems;

(2) Recommendations on
how to collaboratively approach these problems, including issues of law
enforcement;

(3) Recommendations on
needed state legislation;

(4) The estimated costs
to implement such recommendations; and

(5) An analysis of road
standards, current and anticipated public use of roads on public lands, the
estimated costs associated with ensuring that roads are maintained to standards
that will provide a greater value to the state land management agencies, and
the public's future use and benefit. This analysis must be consistent with
road maintenance and abandonment plans required under the forests and fish
agreement. Special consideration must be given to forest roads and public
access issues in the Cascade foothills region of Snohomish, King, and Pierce
counties.

In carrying out the
study, the department of natural resources must involve federal and state land
management agencies, including, but not limited to, the United States
department of agriculture, the United States forest service, the bureau of land
management, the national park service, the United States fish and wildlife
service, the Washington department of fish and wildlife, the state parks and
recreation commission, and the interagency committee for outdoor recreation.
The department of natural resources must also involve representatives of
private landowners, county parks, recreation groups, members of the disabled
community, and the federally recognized tribes in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The sum of one
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to
the department of natural resources for the purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of one
hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to
the department of natural resources for the purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null
and void.

---
END ---