BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.480 and 1998 c
191 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

All hunting licenses
shall, upon written application, be issued at the reduced rate of a youth
hunting license fee for the following individuals:

(1) A resident sixty-five
years old or older who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States
armed forces having a service-connected disability;

(2) Residents who are
honorably discharged veterans of the United States armed forces with a thirty
percent or more service-connected disability; ((and))

(3) An honorably
discharged veteran of the United States armed forces who is a resident and is
confined to a wheelchair; and

(4)
Residents who are honorably discharged veterans of foreign wars of the United
States armed forces.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.490 and 1998 c
191 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

A combination fishing
license shall, upon written application, be issued at the reduced rate of five
dollars to the following individuals:

(1) Residents who are
honorably discharged veterans of the United States armed forces with a thirty
percent or more service-connected disability;

(2) Residents who
are honorably discharged veterans of foreign wars of the United States armed
forces;

(3) A person who
is blind;

(((3))) (4)
A person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 with
documentation of the disability certified by a physician licensed to practice
in this state; and

(((4)))
(5) A person who is physically disabled and confined to a wheelchair.

---
END ---