BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.44 RCW to read as follows:

Authorized
emergency vehicles may exceed the gross weight limitations contained in RCW
46.44.041 and 46.44.042 without a special permit or additional fees as
prescribed by chapter 46.44 RCW, but only while engaged in reasonably necessary
operation.

--- END ---