BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2000 c
28 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.145, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving
payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering
daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is
responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.137, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or
9.94A.383, served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall
assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions
of community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(5) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.040, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(6) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins
either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or
at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(7) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender.

(8) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for
out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered
the same as probation by other states.

(9)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(10)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(11)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(12) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(13) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(14) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(15)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(16) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community service
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(17) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be
withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means
compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as
wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other
provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or
other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation,
specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement
programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title
74 RCW.

(18) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to
persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex
offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(19) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(20) "Earned
release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW
9.94A.150.

(21) "Escape"
means:

(a) Escape in the first
degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful
failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from
work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for
supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(22) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(23) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(24) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(25) "Home
detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders
wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic
surveillance.

(26) "Legal
financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior
court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may
include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a
result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident
resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(27) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(28) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(29)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(30) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(31) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.360;
provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most serious
offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse,
kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the
first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of sexual motivation;
or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection (31)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child
in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender committed
the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes
a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was
eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(32) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(33)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(34) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm
done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk,
the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(35) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual
physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended
vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(36) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies;
or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(37) "Sex
offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony
that is a violation of((:

(i))) chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW
9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of
RCW 9A.64.020;

(iii) ((RCW 9.68A.090))
A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070
or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(38) "Sexual
motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant
committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(39) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(40) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the
maximum penalty for a crime.

(41) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(42) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(43) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(44) "Violent
offense" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by
shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular
assault; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(45) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.135.

(46) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.137 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life management
skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.

(47) "Work
release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who
are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.44.130 and 2000 c
91 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any adult or
juvenile residing whether or not the person has a fixed residence, or who is a
student, is employed, or carries on a vocation in this state who has been found
to have committed or has been convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping
offense, or who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter
10.77 RCW of committing any sex offense or kidnapping offense, shall register
with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or
place of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified in this section.
Where a person required to register under this section is in custody of the
state department of corrections, the state department of social and health
services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile
detention facility as a result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the
person shall also register at the time of release from custody with an official
designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the person. In addition,
any such adult or juvenile who is admitted to a public or private institution
of higher education shall, within ten days of enrolling or by the first
business day after arriving at the institution, whichever is earlier, notify
the sheriff for the county of the person's residence of the person's intent to
attend the institution. Persons required to register under this section who
are enrolled in a public or private institution of higher education on June 11,
1998, must notify the county sheriff immediately. The sheriff shall notify the
institution's department of public safety and shall provide that department
with the same information provided to a county sheriff under subsection (3) of
this section.

(2) This section may
not be construed to confer any powers pursuant to RCW 4.24.500 upon the public
safety department of any public or private institution of higher education.

(3)(a) The person shall
provide the following information when registering: (i) Name; (ii) address;
(iii) date and place of birth; (iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which
convicted; (vi) date and place of conviction; (vii) aliases used; (viii) social
security number; (ix) photograph; and (x) fingerprints.

(b) Any person who
lacks a fixed residence shall provide the following information when
registering: (i) Name; (ii) date and place of birth; (iii) place of
employment; (iv) crime for which convicted; (v) date and place of conviction;
(vi) aliases used; (vii) social security number; (viii) photograph; (ix)
fingerprints; and (x) where he or she plans to stay.

(4)(a) Offenders shall
register with the county sheriff within the following deadlines. For purposes
of this section the term "conviction" refers to adult convictions and
juvenile adjudications for sex offenses or kidnapping offenses:

(i) OFFENDERS IN
CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders who committed a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 28, 1991, are in custody, as a
result of that offense, of the state department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, a local division of youth services,
or a local jail or juvenile detention facility, and (B) kidnapping offenders
who on or after July 27, 1997, are in custody of the state department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local
division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility,
must register at the time of release from custody with an official designated
by the agency that has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within
three days forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the
county of the offender's anticipated residence. The offender must also
register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the county
sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a
resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of
employment or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender
shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register. Failure to
register at the time of release and within twenty-four hours of release
constitutes a violation of this section and is punishable as provided in
subsection (10) of this section.

When the agency with
jurisdiction intends to release an offender with a duty to register under this
section, and the agency has knowledge that the offender is eligible for
developmental disability services from the department of social and health
services, the agency shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of
the release. Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender
is to be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in
meeting the initial registration requirement under this section. Failure to
provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for any violation of
this section.

(ii) OFFENDERS NOT IN
CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on July 28,
1991, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate
sentence review board or under the department of correction's active
supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state department
of social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for sex
offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must register within
ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who, on July 27, 1997, are not
in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review
board or under the department of correction's active supervision, as defined by
the department of corrections, the state department of social and health
services, or a local division of youth services, for kidnapping offenses
committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of
July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex offender who was
required to register under this subsection (4)(a)(ii) as of July 28, 1991, or a
kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27, 1997, shall not relieve
the offender of the duty to register or to reregister following a change in
residence. The obligation to register shall only cease pursuant to RCW
9A.44.140.

(iii) OFFENDERS UNDER
FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on or after July 23, 1995, and
kidnapping offenders who, on or after July 27, 1997, as a result of that
offense are in the custody of the United States bureau of prisons or other
federal or military correctional agency for sex offenses committed before, on,
or after February 28, 1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or
after July 27, 1997, must register within twenty-four hours from the time of
release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if
the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school,
or place of employment or vocation. Sex offenders who, on July 23, 1995, are
not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of
prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military
parole board for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990,
must register within ten days of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on
July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United
States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole
commission, or military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before,
on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997. A
change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to register
under this subsection (4)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a kidnapping offender
required to register as of July 27, 1997 shall not relieve the offender of the
duty to register or to reregister following a change in residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or
place of employment or vocation. The obligation to register shall only cease
pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE
CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders who are convicted of a sex offense
on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex offense that was committed on or after
February 28, 1990, and kidnapping offenders who are convicted on or after July
27, 1997, for a kidnapping offense that was committed on or after July 27,
1997, but who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon
sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff to register immediately upon
completion of being sentenced.

(v) OFFENDERS WHO ARE
NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON RESIDENTS. Sex offenders and kidnapping
offenders who move to Washington state from another state or a foreign country
that are not under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections, the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the state department of social and
health services at the time of moving to Washington, must register within
thirty days of establishing residence or reestablishing residence if the person
is a former Washington resident. The duty to register under this subsection
applies to sex offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a foreign
country, federal or military statutes, or Washington state for offenses
committed on or after February 28, 1990, and to kidnapping offenders convicted
under the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military
statutes, or Washington state for offenses committed on or after July 27,
1997. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders from other states or a foreign
country who, when they move to Washington, are under the jurisdiction of the
department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the
department of social and health services must register within twenty-four hours
of moving to Washington. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall
notify the offender of the registration requirements before the offender moves
to Washington.

(vi) OFFENDERS FOUND
NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not
guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of (A) committing a sex
offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 23,
1995, is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of
social and health services, or (B) committing a kidnapping offense on, before,
or after July 27, 1997, and who on or after July 27, 1997, is in custody, as a
result of that finding, of the state department of social and health services,
must register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the county
sheriff for the county of the person's residence. The state department of
social and health services shall provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its
custody of the duty to register. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not
guilty by reason of insanity of committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, but who was released before July 23, 1995, or any adult or
juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity of committing a
kidnapping offense but who was released before July 27, 1997, shall be required
to register within twenty-four hours of receiving notice of this registration
requirement. The state department of social and health services shall make
reasonable attempts within available resources to notify sex offenders who were
released before July 23, 1995, and kidnapping offenders who were released
before July 27, 1997. Failure to register within twenty-four hours of release,
or of receiving notice, constitutes a violation of this section and is
punishable as provided in subsection (10) of this section.

(vii) OFFENDERS WHO
LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person who lacks a fixed residence and leaves the
county in which he or she is registered and enters and remains within a new
county for twenty-four hours is required to register with the county sheriff
not more than twenty-four hours after entering the county and provide the
information required in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(viii) OFFENDERS WHO
LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE UNDER SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a
fixed residence and who are under the supervision of the department shall
register in the county of their supervision.

(ix) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE
TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders
required to register in Washington, who move to another state, or who work,
carry on a vocation, or attend school in another state shall register a new
address, fingerprints, and photograph with the new state within ten days after
establishing residence, or after beginning to work, carry on a vocation, or
attend school in the new state. The person must also send written notice
within ten days of moving to the new state or to a foreign country to the
county sheriff with whom the person last registered in Washington state. The
county sheriff shall promptly forward this information to the Washington state
patrol.

(b) Failure to register
within the time required under this section constitutes a per se violation of
this section and is punishable as provided in subsection (10) of this section.
The county sheriff shall not be required to determine whether the person is
living within the county.

(c) An arrest on
charges of failure to register, service of an information, or a complaint for a
violation of this section, or arraignment on charges for a violation of this
section, constitutes actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged
with the crime of failure to register under this section who asserts as a
defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register immediately
following actual notice of the duty through arrest, service, or arraignment.
Failure to register as required under this subsection (4)(c) constitutes
grounds for filing another charge of failing to register. Registering
following arrest, service, or arraignment on charges shall not relieve the
offender from criminal liability for failure to register prior to the filing of
the original charge.

(d) The deadlines for
the duty to register under this section do not relieve any sex offender of the
duty to register under this section as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.

(5)(a) If any person
required to register pursuant to this section changes his or her residence
address within the same county, the person must send written notice of the
change of address to the county sheriff within seventy-two hours of moving. If
any person required to register pursuant to this section moves to a new county,
the person must send written notice of the change of address at least fourteen
days before moving to the county sheriff in the new county of residence and
must register with that county sheriff within twenty-four hours of moving. The
person must also send written notice within ten days of the change of address
in the new county to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered.
The county sheriff with whom the person last registered shall promptly forward
the information concerning the change of address to the county sheriff for the
county of the person's new residence. Upon receipt of notice of change of
address to a new state, the county sheriff shall promptly forward the
information regarding the change of address to the agency designated by the new
state as the state's offender registration agency.

(b) It is an
affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed to send a notice at
least fourteen days in advance of moving as required under (a) of this
subsection that the person did not know the location of his or her new
residence at least fourteen days before moving. The defendant must establish
the defense by a preponderance of the evidence and, to prevail on the defense,
must also prove by a preponderance that the defendant sent the required notice
within twenty-four hours of determining the new address.

(6)(a) Any person
required to register under this section who lacks a fixed residence shall
provide written notice to the sheriff of the county where he or she last
registered within fourteen days after ceasing to have a fixed residence. The
notice shall include the information required by subsection (3)(b) of this
section, except the photograph and fingerprints. The county sheriff may, for
reasonable cause, require the offender to provide a photograph and
fingerprints. The sheriff shall forward this information to the sheriff of the
county in which the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside
in another county.

(b) A person who lacks
a fixed residence must report in person to the sheriff of the county where he
or she is registered. If he or she has been classified as a risk level I sex
or kidnapping offender, he or she must report monthly. If he or she has been
classified as a risk level II or III sex or kidnapping offender, he or she must
report weekly. The lack of a fixed residence is a factor that may be
considered in determining a sex offender's risk level.

(c) If any person
required to register pursuant to this section does not have a fixed residence,
it is an affirmative defense to the charge of failure to register, that he or
she provided written notice to the sheriff of the county where he or she last
registered within fourteen days after ceasing to have a fixed residence and has
subsequently complied with the requirements of subsections (4)(a)(vii) or
(viii) and (6) of this section. To prevail, the person must prove the defense by
a preponderance of the evidence.

(7) A sex offender
subject to registration requirements under this section who applies to change
his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any other law shall submit a copy of the
application to the county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and
to the state patrol not fewer than five days before the entry of an order
granting the name change. No sex offender under the requirement to register
under this section at the time of application shall be granted an order
changing his or her name if the court finds that doing so will interfere with
legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall be denied when
the name change is requested for religious or legitimate cultural reasons or in
recognition of marriage or dissolution of marriage. A sex offender under the
requirement to register under this section who receives an order changing his
or her name shall submit a copy of the order to the county sheriff of the
county of the person's residence and to the state patrol within five days of
the entry of the order.

(8) The county sheriff
shall obtain a photograph of the individual and shall obtain a copy of the
individual's fingerprints.

(9) For the purpose of
RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330:

(a) "Sex
offense" means:

(i) Any offense
defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030 ((and any violation of RCW
9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor), 9.68A.050 (dealing in depictions of
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct), 9.68A.060 (sending, bringing into
state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct), 9.68A.090
(communication with minor for immoral purposes), 9.68A.100 (patronizing juvenile
prostitute), or));

(ii) Any violation
under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree)((,
as well as));

(iii) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be classified as a sex offense under this subsection; and

(iv) Any gross
misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal
solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as
a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030 or this subsection.

(b) "Kidnapping
offense" means: (i) The crimes of kidnapping in the first degree,
kidnapping in the second degree, and unlawful imprisonment, as defined
in chapter 9A.40 RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the
minor's parent; (ii) any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a
criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an
offense that is classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection
(9)(b); and (iii) any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under
this subsection (9)(b).

(c) "Employed"
or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is full-time or
part-time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or for an aggregate
period of time exceeding thirty days during any calendar year. A person is
employed or carries on a vocation whether the person's employment is
financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of government or
educational benefit.

(d) "Student"
means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or part-time basis, in any
public or private educational institution. An educational institution includes
any secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of
higher education.

(10) A person who
knowingly fails to register with the county sheriff or notify the county
sheriff, or who changes his or her name without notifying the county sheriff
and the state patrol, as required by this section is guilty of a class C felony
if the crime for which the individual was convicted was a felony sex offense as
defined in subsection (9)(a) of this section or a federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
sex offense as defined in subsection (9)(a) of this section. If the crime was
other than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be other than a felony, violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor.

(11) A person who
knowingly fails to register or who moves within the state without notifying the
county sheriff as required by this section is guilty of a class C felony if the
crime for which the individual was convicted was a felony kidnapping offense as
defined in subsection (9)(b) of this section or a federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
kidnapping offense as defined in subsection (9)(b) of this section. If the
crime was other than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an
offense that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---