BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.08.195 and 1995 c
159 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1) "Border
area" means any incorporated city or town, or unincorporated area,
located within seven miles of the Washington-Canadian border or any
unincorporated area that is a point of land surrounded on three sides by saltwater
and adjacent to the Canadian border.

(2) "Border area
per-capita law-enforcement spending" equals total per capita expenditures
in a border area on: Law enforcement operating costs, court costs, law
enforcement-related insurance, and detention expenses, minus funds allocated to
a border area under RCW 66.08.190 and 66.08.196.

(3)
"Border-crossing traffic total" means the number of vehicles,
vessels, and aircraft crossing into the United States through a United States
customs service border crossing that enter into the border area during a
federal fiscal year, using border crossing statistics and criteria included in
guidelines adopted by the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Border-related crime statistic" means the sum of infractions and
citations issued, and arrests of persons permanently residing outside
Washington state in a border area during a calendar year.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.08.196 and 1997 c
451 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Distribution of funds
to border areas under RCW 66.08.190 and 66.24.290 (1)(a) and (4) shall be as
follows:

(1) Sixty-five percent
of the funds shall be distributed to border areas ratably based on border area
traffic totals;

(2) Twenty-five percent
of the funds shall be distributed to border areas ratably based on
border-related crime statistics; and

(3) Ten percent of the
funds shall be distributed to border areas ratably based upon border area per
capita law enforcement spending.

Distributions
to an unincorporated area ((that is a point of land surrounded on three
sides by saltwater and adjacent to the Canadian border)) shall be made to
the county in which such an area is located and may only be spent on services
provided to that area.

---
END ---