BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Communities all over the
state of Washington have experienced an increase in the illegal manufacture of
methamphetamine. Illegal methamphetamine labs create a significant threat to
the health and safety of the people of the state. Some of the chemicals and
compounds used to make methamphetamine, and the toxic wastes the process
generates, are hazards to the public health. Increases in crime, violence, and
the abuse and neglect of children present at laboratory sites are also
associated with the increasing number of illegal laboratory sites. The drugs
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, and phenylpropanolamine, which are used in the
illegal manufacture of methamphetamine, have been identified as factors in the
increase in the number of illegal methamphetamine labs. Therefore, it is the
intent of the legislature to place restrictions on the sale and possession of
those three drugs in order to reduce the proliferation of illegal
methamphetamine laboratories and the associated threats to public health and
safety.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.43.010 and 1998 c
245 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Beginning July
1, 1988,)) A report to the state board of pharmacy shall be
submitted in accordance with this chapter by a manufacturer, wholesaler,
retailer, or other person who sells, transfers, or otherwise furnishes to any
person ((in this state)) any of the following substances or their salts
or isomers:

(a) Anthranilic acid;

(b) Barbituric acid;

(c) Chlorephedrine;

(d) Diethyl malonate;

(e) D-lysergic acid;

(f) Ephedrine;

(g) Ergotamine
tartrate;

(h) Ethylamine;

(i) Ethyl malonate;

(j) Ethylephedrine;

(k) Lead acetate;

(l) Malonic acid;

(m) Methylamine;

(n) ((Methylformanide))
Methylformamide;

(o) Methylephedrine;

(p) Methylpseudoephedrine;

(q) N-acetylanthranilic
acid;

(r) Norpseudoephedrine;

(s) Phenylacetic acid;

(t)
Phenylpropanolamine;

(u) Piperidine;

(v) Pseudoephedrine;
and

(w) Pyrrolidine.

(2) The state board of
pharmacy shall administer this chapter and may, by rule adopted pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW, add a substance to or remove a substance from the list in
subsection (1) of this section. In determining whether to add or remove a substance,
the board shall consider the following:

(a) The likelihood that
the substance is useable as a precursor in the illegal production of a
controlled substance as defined in chapter 69.50 RCW;

(b) The availability of
the substance;

(c) The relative appropriateness
of including the substance in this chapter or in chapter 69.50 RCW; and

(d) The extent and
nature of legitimate uses for the substance.

(3)(a) ((Beginning
on July 1, 1988,)) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other
person shall, before selling, transferring, or otherwise furnishing any
substance specified in subsection (1) of this section to ((a)) any
person ((in this state)), require proper identification from the
purchaser.

(b) For the purposes of
this subsection, "proper identification" means((, in the case of a
face-to-face purchase,)):

(i) A motor
vehicle operator's license or other official state-issued identification of the
purchaser containing a photograph of the purchaser, and includes the
residential or mailing address of the purchaser, other than a post office box
number((,));

(ii) The motor
vehicle license number of any motor vehicle owned or operated by the
purchaser((,));

(iii) A letter
of authorization from any business for which any substance specified in
subsection (1) of this section is being furnished, which includes the business
license number and address of the business((,));

(iv) A
description of how the substance is to be used((,)); and

(v) The
signature of the purchaser.

The person selling,
transferring, or otherwise furnishing any substance specified in subsection (1)
of this section shall affix his or her signature as a witness to the signature
and identification of the purchaser. ((The state board of pharmacy shall
provide by rule for the proper identification of purchasers in other than
face-to-face purchases.))

(c) A violation of or
a failure to comply with this subsection is a misdemeanor.

(4) ((Beginning on
July 1, 1988,)) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other
person who sells, transfers, or otherwise furnishes the substance specified in
subsection (1) of this section to ((a)) any person ((in this
state)) shall, not less than twenty-one days before delivery of the
substance, submit a report of the transaction, which includes the
identification information specified in subsection (3) of this section to the
state board of pharmacy. However, the state board of pharmacy may authorize
the submission of the reports on a monthly basis with respect to repeated, regular
transactions between the furnisher and the recipient involving the same
substance if the state board of pharmacy determines that either of the
following exist:

(a) A pattern of
regular supply of the substance exists between the manufacturer, wholesaler,
retailer, or other person who sells, transfers, or otherwise furnishes such
substance and the recipient of the substance; or

(b) The recipient has
established a record of using the substance for lawful purposes.

(5) Any person
specified in subsection (4) of this section who does not submit a report as
required by ((that)) subsection (4) of this section is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.43.020 and 1988 c
147 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Beginning on
July 1, 1988,)) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other
person ((subject to any other reporting requirements in this chapter,))
who receives from a source outside of this state any substance specified in RCW
69.43.010(1)((,)) shall submit a report of such transaction to the state
board of pharmacy under rules adopted by the board.

(2) Any person
specified in subsection (1) of this section who does not submit a report as
required by subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any manufacturer or
wholesaler who sells, transfers, or otherwise furnishes any substance specified
in RCW 69.43.010(1) to any person in a suspicious transaction shall report the
transaction in writing to the state board of pharmacy.

(2) Any person
specified in subsection (1) of this section who does not submit a report as
required by subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "suspicious transaction" means a sale or transfer to
which any of the following applies:

(a) The circumstances
of the sale or transfer would lead a reasonable person to believe that the substance
is likely to be used for the purpose of unlawfully manufacturing a controlled
substance under chapter 69.50 RCW, based on such factors as the amount
involved, the method of payment, the method of delivery, and any past dealings
with any participant in the transaction. The state board of pharmacy shall
adopt by rule criteria for determining whether a transaction is suspicious,
taking into consideration the recommendations in appendix A of the report to
the United States attorney general by the suspicious orders task force under
the federal comprehensive methamphetamine control act of 1996.

(b) The transaction
involves payment for any substance specified in RCW 69.43.010(1) in cash or
money orders in a total amount of more than two hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any manufacturer or
wholesaler who sells, transfers, or otherwise furnishes any substance specified
in RCW 69.43.010(1) to any person shall maintain a record of each such sale or
transfer. The records must contain:

(a) The name of the
substance;

(b) The quantity of the
substance sold, transferred, or furnished;

(c) The date the
substance was sold, transferred, or furnished;

(d) The name and
address of the person buying or receiving the substance; and

(e) The method of and
amount of payment for the substance.

(2) The records of
sales and transfers required by this section shall be available for inspection
by the state board of pharmacy and its authorized representatives and shall be
maintained for two years.

(3) A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

A manufacturer,
wholesaler, retailer, or other person who sells, transfers, or otherwise
furnishes any substance specified in RCW 69.43.010(1) and who is subject to the
reporting or recordkeeping requirements of this chapter may satisfy the
requirements by submitting to the state board of pharmacy, and its authorized
representatives:

(1) Computer readable
data from which all of the required information may be readily derived; or

(2) Copies of reports
that are filed under federal law that contain all of the information required
by the particular reporting or recordkeeping requirement of this chapter which
it is submitted to satisfy.

Sec. 7. RCW 69.43.040 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 441 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
health, in accordance with rules developed by the state board of pharmacy shall
provide a common reporting form for the substances in RCW 69.43.010 that
contains at least the following information:

(a) Name of the
substance;

(b) Quantity of the
substance sold, transferred, or furnished;

(c) The date the
substance was sold, transferred, or furnished;

(d) The name and
address of the person buying or receiving the substance; and

(e) The name and
address of the manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other person selling,
transferring, or furnishing the substance.

(2) Monthly reports
authorized under ((subsection (1)(e) of this section)) RCW
69.43.010(4) may be computer-generated in accordance with rules adopted by
the department.

Sec. 8. RCW 69.43.090 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 443 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any manufacturer,
wholesaler, retailer, or other person who sells, transfers, or otherwise
furnishes any substance specified in RCW 69.43.010 to ((a)) any
person ((in this state)) or who receives from a source outside of the
state any substance specified in RCW 69.43.010 shall obtain a permit for the
conduct of that business from the state board of pharmacy. However, a permit
shall not be required of any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other
person for the sale, transfer, furnishing, or receipt of any drug that contains
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or of any cosmetic that
contains a substance specified in RCW 69.43.010(1), if such drug or cosmetic is
lawfully sold, transferred, or furnished over the counter without a
prescription or by a prescription under chapter 69.04 or 69.41 RCW.

(2) Applications for
permits shall be filed with the department in writing and signed by the
applicant, and shall set forth the name of the applicant, the business in which
the applicant is engaged, the business address of the applicant, and a full
description of any substance sold, transferred, or otherwise furnished, or
received.

(3) The board may grant
permits on forms prescribed by it. The permits shall be effective for not more
than one year from the date of issuance.

(4) Each applicant
shall pay at the time of filing an application for a permit a fee determined by
the department.

(5) A permit granted
under this chapter may be renewed on a date to be determined by the board, and
annually thereafter, upon the filing of a renewal application and the payment
of a permit renewal fee determined by the department.

(6) Permit fees charged
by the department shall not exceed the costs incurred by the department in
administering this chapter.

(7) Selling,
transferring, or otherwise furnishing, or receiving any substance specified in
RCW 69.43.010 without a required permit, is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered with, the
department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee thereof, knowingly
to sell, transfer, or to otherwise furnish, in a single transaction:

(a) More than three
packages of one or more products that he or she knows to contain ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of
isomers; or

(b) A single package of
any product that he or she knows to contain more than three grams of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of
isomers, or a combination of any of these substances.

(2) It is unlawful for
a person who is not a manufacturer, wholesaler, pharmacy, practitioner,
shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor licensed by or registered with the department
of health under chapter 18.64 RCW to purchase or acquire, in any twenty-four
hour period, more than the quantities of the substances specified in subsection
(1) of this section.

(3) A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any person who
possesses more than fifteen grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, or a
combination of any of those substances, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) This section does
not apply to any of the following:

(a) A pharmacist or
other authorized person who sells or furnishes ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers upon the
prescription of a practitioner, as defined in RCW 69.41.010;

(b) A practitioner who
administers or furnishes ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine,
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers to his or her patients;

(c) A pharmacy,
manufacturer, or wholesaler licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW;

(d) A person in the
course of his or her business of selling, transporting, or storing ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of
isomers, for a person described in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection; or

(e) A person in
possession of more than fifteen grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers in their home or
residence under circumstances consistent with typical medicinal or household
use as indicated by, but not limited to, storage location and possession of
products in a variety of strengths, brands, types, purposes, and expiration
dates.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

Sections 9 and 10 of
this act do not apply to:

(1) Pediatric products
primarily intended for administration to children under twelve years of age,
according to label instructions, either: (a) In solid dosage form whose
individual dosage units do not exceed fifteen milligrams of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine; or (b) in liquid form whose recommended
dosage, according to label instructions, does not exceed fifteen milligrams of
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine per five milliliters of
liquid product;

(2) Pediatric liquid
products primarily intended for administration to children under two years of
age for which the recommended dosage does not exceed two milliliters and the
total package content does not exceed one fluid ounce; or

(3) Products that the
state board of pharmacy, upon application of a manufacturer, exempts by rule
from sections 9 and 10 of this act because the product has been formulated in
such a way as to effectively prevent the conversion of the active ingredient
into methamphetamine, or its salts or precursors.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
other penalties provided for in this chapter or in chapter 18.64 RCW, the state
board of pharmacy may impose a civil penalty, not to exceed ten thousand
dollars for each violation, on any licensee or registrant who has failed to
comply with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter. In the case
of a continuing violation, every day the violation continues shall be
considered a separate violation.

(2) The state board of
pharmacy may waive the suspension or revocation of a license or registration
issued under chapter 18.64 RCW, or waive any civil penalty under this chapter,
if the licensee or registrant establishes that he or she acted in good faith to
prevent violations of this chapter, and the violation occurred despite the
licensee's or registrant's exercise of due diligence. In making such a
determination, the state board of pharmacy may consider evidence that an
employer trained employees on how to sell, transfer, or otherwise furnish
substances specified in RCW 69.43.010(1) in accordance with applicable laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter is
applicable and uniform throughout this state and in all counties, cities, code
cities, and towns therein. A county, city, code city, or town may not adopt or
enforce any ordinance, pertaining to this chapter, which prohibits conduct that
is not prohibited under this chapter, or defining violations or penalties
different from those provided under this chapter. However, this section does
not preclude a county, city, code city, or town from revoking, canceling,
suspending, or otherwise limiting a business or professional license it has
issued for conduct that violates any provision of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 69.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To prevent
violations of section 9 of this act, every licensee and registrant under
chapter 18.64 RCW, who sells at retail any products containing ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of
isomers, shall do either or may do both of the following:

(a) Program scanners,
cash registers, or other electronic devices used to record sales in a manner
that will alert persons handling transactions to potential violations of
section 9(1) of this act and/or prevent such violations; or

(b) Place one or more
signs on the premises to notify customers of the prohibitions of section 9 of
this act. Any such sign may, but is not required to, conform to the language
and format prepared by the department of health under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The department of
health shall prepare language and format for a sign summarizing the
prohibitions in sections 9 and 10 of this act and make the language and format
available to licensees and registrants under chapter 18.64 RCW, for voluntary use
in their places of business to inform customers and employees of the
prohibitions. Nothing in this section requires the department of health to
provide licensees or registrants with copies of signs, or any licensee or
registrant to use the specific language or format prepared by the department
under this subsection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---