BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.41.130 and 1991 c
3 s 335 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
authorized to deny, suspend, revoke, or modify a license or provisional license
in any case in which it finds that there has been a failure or refusal to
comply with the requirements of this chapter or the standards or rules adopted
under this chapter. RCW 43.70.115 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.

The
department is authorized to assess a civil fine or civil penalty in any case in
which it finds the licensee failed to report an event that is required by
statute or rule to be reported to the department. The civil fine or civil
penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per incident unreported. The
department is authorized to approve expenditure of the civil penalty by the
licensee on improvements that would ensure future compliance in reporting, or
reduce future incidents. Assessment of a civil fine or civil penalty is
subject to the provisions of chapters 34.05 and 43.05 RCW and RCW 43.70.095.
The department may adopt rules to implement the civil fines or civil penalties
referenced in this section.

--- END ---