BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
intends by this act to

_6 allow for a procedure that will help prevent wildfires
during

_7 times of extreme fire danger by allowing some
prohibitions on

_8 outdoor burning. The legislature does not intend for
this power to

_9 be utilized to deal with air pollution or public health

10 concerns. Those problems are addressed through the
Washington clean

11 air act, chapter 70.94 RCW.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 48.48

13 RCW to read as follows:

14 (1) Whenever the director of fire protection finds
that

15 conditions of extreme fire hazard exist and that state
resources

16 or the protection of life and property may be in danger
due to

p. 1 SSB
5019

_1 wildfire, the director of fire protection may recommend
to the

_2 governor that the governor forbid outdoor burning on
public and

_3 private land within specific portions of the state.

_4 (2) Prior to making such a recommendation to the
governor, the

_5 director of fire protection must consult with:

_6 (a) The commissioner of public lands;

_7 (b) The director of the department of ecology;

_8 (c) The director of the department of agriculture;
and

_9 (d) The director of the state parks and recreation
commission.

10 (3) Upon receiving such a recommendation from the
director of

11 fire protection, and if the governor finds that state
resources or

12 the protection of life and property are in danger due to
wildfire,

13 then the governor may issue an executive order forbidding
outdoor

14 burning within specific portions of the state. The
order is

15 effective until rescinded by the governor. The order may
allow for

16 specific exceptions to be made where the governor
determines that

17 certain outdoor burning will not unduly endanger state
resources

18 nor the protection of life and property, and subject to

19 limitations and conditions as recommended by the
director of fire

20 protection. Such exceptions may be made prior to
issuance of the

21 order and also at any time the order is in effect.

22 (4) It is unlawful for any person to conduct or
cause to be

23 conducted outdoor burning at any time and place that is
forbidden

24 by an executive order issued under subsection (3) of
this

25 section. An intentional violation of this section is a
gross

26 misdemeanor. A knowing violation of this section is a
class 1 civil

27 infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW. For the purposes of
this

28 subsection, the terms "intentional violation"
and "knowing

29 violation" have the same meaning as defined in RCW
9A.08.010.

30 (5) In addition to the penalty provided in
subsection (4) of

31 this section, any injured party may bring a civil cause
of action

32 in superior court for a violation of an executive order
issued

33 under subsection (3) of this section. A person may be
liable under

34 such an action for actual damages and reasonable
attorneys' fees,

35 court costs, and investigative costs incurred in
bringing the

36 action.

37 (6) For the purposes of this section, "outdoor
burning" means

SSB 5019 p. 2

_1 the combustion of material of any type in an open fire
or in an

_2 outdoor container.

_3 (7) The chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the

_4 director of fire protection, may adopt rules necessary
to

_5 implement this section.

_6 (8) The provisions of this section may be enforced
by any

_7 general or limited authority Washington peace officer,
as those

_8 terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020, and by a district,
city,

_9 county, or state fire authority.

10 (9) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
authorizing a

11 recommendation to forbid outdoor burning nor an order to
forbid

12 outdoor burning for purposes other than to control
wildfires. This

13 section does not authorize such recommendations or
orders for air

14 pollution nor public health reasons, which are regulated
under the

15 Washington clean air act, chapter 70.94 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5019