BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the recovery of threatened or endangered salmon stocks listed under the
endangered species act is best accomplished through preventative measures.
Upstream migrating adult salmon and spawners are vulnerable to poaching, disturbance
from human recreational activities, and instream hydraulic projects. Low
streamflow conditions, high water temperatures, presence of fish disease
pathogens, degraded water quality, and a host of other factors may cause adult
salmon or spawners to be more susceptible to human activities. The prevention
of harm to threatened or endangered salmon requires that some rivers or streams
be closed to human access during critical times of the year and that the
closure decisions be made on a case-by-case basis by the fish and wildlife
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) When, in the opinion
of the commission, any river or stream is subject to any abnormal streamflow
condition, the commission may designate the river or stream as an area subject
to closure, and the commission shall adopt rules for the protection thereof.

(2) All rules shall be
published in newspapers of general circulation in the counties where the region
of the river or stream subject to closure is situated for the length of time as
the commission may determine.

(3) When, in the
opinion of the commission, it becomes necessary to close the region of a river
or stream to entry, posters carrying the wording "Region of abnormal
streamflow conditions-CLOSED TO ENTRY-except as provided by section 2 of this
act" and indicating the beginning and ending dates of the closures shall
be posted on the public highways entering the regions.

(4) The rules shall be
in force from the time specified therein, but when, in the opinion of the
commission, the closed river or stream region continues to be exposed to
abnormal streamflow conditions, or ceases to be so exposed, the commission may
extend, suspend, or terminate the closure by proclamation.

(5) This section does
not authorize the commission to prohibit the conduct of industrial operations,
public work, or access of permanent residents to their own property within the
closed area, but no one legally entering the region may use the area for
recreational purposes which are prohibited to the general public under the
terms of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. In times and localities
of abnormal streamflow conditions, the commission may issue an order suspending
any or all hydraulic permits or privileges authorized by chapter 77.55 RCW and
may prohibit absolutely the alteration of the natural flow or bed of any salt
or fresh waters in these locations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A person violating
section 2 of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A person violating
section 3 of this act is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The departments of
natural resources, fish and wildlife, and ecology shall coordinate the closure
of any lands, streams, or rivers to improve abnormal streamflow conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. For the purposes of
sections 2, 3, and 5 of this act, "abnormal streamflow conditions"
means an atypical disturbance to a stream or river, which includes low
streamflow, water-borne pathogens, degraded water quality, high water
temperatures, or any other factor which negatively impacts threatened or
endangered salmon.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act are each added to chapter 77.85 RCW.

---
END ---