BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The director must place
department

_6 employees or trained volunteers on certain commercial net
fishing

_7 boats. The catch observers must be placed on boats that
are

_8 authorized to commercially fish for salmon in areas where
salmon

_9 stocks listed under the endangered species act are known
to occur

10 in mixed stock areas. The intent of the catch observers
is to

11 document the degree of catch of threatened or endangered
fish

12 during each commercial net fishery, and to reduce the
level of

13 threatened or endangered salmon caught to an absolute

14 minimum. Catch observers must also be utilized to
estimate the

15 immediate or delayed mortality rate of endangered or
threatened

16 salmon caught and released within each net fishery.

17 The director must use the best statistical methods to
determine

18 the number and distribution of catch observers in each
commercial

p. 1 SB
5021

_1 salmon net fishery in order to achieve statistically
valid

_2 sampling of the threatened or endangered component of
the catch in

_3 each fishery. In no case may such a net fishery be
authorized

_4 without prior arrangements for placement of a
statistically valid

_5 number of catch observers on the boats participating in
the

_6 fishery.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The commission may not
authorize a

_8 commercial net fishery for salmon in any geographic area
where

_9 threatened or endangered salmon are known to occur without

10 ensuring that the director will place sufficient catch
observers

11 on the boats that participate in the fishery in compliance
with

12 section 1 of this act.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The director must
provide the data

14 generated by catch observers under section 1 of this act
to the

15 treaty Indian tribes, federal fisheries management
agencies, and

16 to the public. Data from the catch observer program must
be

17 included in the department's comprehensive biennial report
of all

18 department operations, as required in RCW 77.04.120.

19 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each

20 added to chapter 77.12 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5021 p. 2