BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.2401 and 1996
c 186 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW
42.17.240, the term "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief
administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, ((the administrator
of the office of marine safety,)) the administrator of the Washington basic
health plan, the director of the department of services for the blind, the
director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the director
of community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of corrections,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the chairman
of the energy facility site evaluation council, the secretary of the state
finance committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish
and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board,
the director of the gambling commission, the director of general
administration, the secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington
state health care authority, the executive secretary of the health care
facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher education
facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission,
the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary
of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of the department of
information services, the director of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation, the executive director of the state investment board, the director
of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery
commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the director of personnel,
the executive director of the public disclosure commission, the director of
retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health
services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of
the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the
utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the
president of each of the regional and state universities and the president of
The Evergreen State College, each district and each campus president of each
state community college;

(2) Each professional
staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional
staff member of the legislature; and

(4)
Central Washington University board of trustees, board of trustees of each
community college, each member of the state board for community and technical
colleges, state convention and trade center board of directors, committee for
deferred compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State College
board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, each member of the Washington health services commission, higher
education coordinating board, higher education facilities authority, horse
racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission,
indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals,
information services board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board,
liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission,
public pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public employees' benefits
board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax appeals,
transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities
and transportation commission, Washington state maritime commission, Washington
personnel resources board, Washington public power supply system executive
board, Washington State University board of regents, Western Washington
University board of trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

--- END ---