BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 79A.05

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 In addition to other duties the commission may from
time to

_7 time impose, it is the duty of the director to, on or
before

_8 December 1st of each even-numbered year, provide to the

_9 legislature a comprehensive summary report of all state
parks and

10 recreation operations to reflect the previous fiscal
period.

11 (1) The summary report shall include, but not be
limited to,

12 descriptions of all department activities including:
Revenues

13 generated, program costs, capital expenditures, personnel,
special

14 projects, condition of the infrastructure, new and ongoing

15 research, environmental controls, cooperative projects,

16 intergovernmental agreements, outlines of ongoing
litigation, and

17 recent court decisions and orders on major issues with the

18 potential for state liability.

p. 1 SB
5023

_1 (2) The summary report shall describe the operation
of the park

_2 system including park utilization details and trends,

_3 opportunities to improve services, and public desires
for new

_4 services.

_5 (3) The summary report may include other information
and

_6 recommendations as the director deems useful.

_7 (4) The summary report must be delivered to the
chairs of the

_8 following legislative committees or their successor
committees:

_9 (a) Senate natural resources, parks, and recreation;

10 (b) Senate ways and means;

11 (c) Senate transportation;

12 (d) House natural resources;

13 (e) House appropriations;

14 (f) House capital budget; and

15 (g) House transportation.

16 (5) One copy of the summary report must also be
delivered to

17 the staff of each of the committees. The summary report
must be

18 made available to the public.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5023 p. 2