BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature
finds that:

_6 (a) All lands known as public parks and parkways, and

_7 recreational, natural, cultural, and historic sites are
unique

_8 public treasures preserved for the benefit, vitality, and

_9 enjoyment of the public; and

10 (b) All lands administered by the state parks and
recreation

11 commission are significant to the state of Washington,
requiring

12 thoughtful stewardship and appropriate use to ensure their

13 preservation for and availability to future generations;
and

14 (c) All of the public ought to be able to enjoy these
lands

15 without any sort of fee for basic parkland access,
including day

16 use fees and daytime parking fees. Basic parkland access
fees are

17 not conducive to maximizing public access to these lands
which all

p. 1 ESSB
5024

_1 members of the public have helped to pay for.
Automobile parking

_2 fees also encourage park visitors to park on neighboring
land,

_3 causing disruption to citizens that are located near
parks.

_4 (2) Based on the foregoing, the legislature declares
that it is

_5 the mission of the commission to acquire, operate,
enhance, and

_6 protect a diverse system of recreational, cultural,
historic, and

_7 natural sites, and foster outdoor recreation and
environmental

_8 education statewide to provide enjoyment and enrichment
for all, a

_9 valued legacy to future generations, and perpetuate the
character

10 and culture of the citizenry.

11 (3) Towards these ends, in addition to the policies
set forth

12 in RCW 79A.05.305, the state parks and recreation
commission,

13 using its own resources and through partnerships with
private and

14 public entities shall:

15 (a) Protect and preserve natural, recreational,
cultural, and

16 historical resources of significance to the state;

17 (b) Foster public enjoyment, understanding,
appreciation, and

18 safe use of these resources through education;

19 (c) Host a wide range of public recreation
experiences to renew

20 the human spirit;

21 (d) Welcome visitors from all cultural, ethnic, and
social

22 backgrounds, as well as seniors, youth, and the
physically and

23 mentally challenged;

24 (e) Provide safe, attractive, high-quality
facilities and

25 programs to those who use the state's park system;

26 (f) Promote state and community tourism and economic
vitality;

27 and

28 (g) Ensure that parks are open to all individuals,
regardless

29 of means, by not charging any sort of fee for basic
parkland

30 access including daytime parking fees, except that the
commission

31 may charge a boat moorage fee.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 79A.05

33 RCW to read as follows:

34 In addition to other duties the commission may from
time to

35 time impose, it is the duty of the director to, on or
before

36 December 1st of each even-numbered year, provide to the

ESSB 5024 p. 2

_1 legislature a comprehensive summary report of all state
parks and

_2 recreation operations to reflect the previous fiscal
period.

_3 (1) The summary report shall include, but not be
limited to,

_4 descriptions of all department activities including:
Revenues

_5 generated, program costs, capital expenditures,
personnel, special

_6 projects, condition of the infrastructure, new and
ongoing

_7 research, environmental controls, cooperative projects,

_8 intergovernmental agreements, outlines of ongoing
litigation, and

_9 recent court decisions and orders on major issues with
the

10 potential for state liability.

11 (2) The summary report shall describe the operation
of the park

12 system including park utilization details and trends,

13 opportunities to improve services, and public desires
for new

14 services.

15 (3) The summary report may include other information
and

16 recommendations as the director deems useful.

17 (4) The summary report must be delivered to the
chairs of the

18 following legislative committees or their successor
committees:

19 (a) Senate natural resources, parks, and shorelines;

20 (b) Senate ways and means;

21 (c) Senate transportation;

22 (d) House natural resources;

23 (e) House appropriations;

24 (f) House capital budget; and

25 (g) House transportation.

26 (5) One copy of the summary report must also be
delivered to

27 the staff of each of the committees. The summary report
must be

28 made available to the public.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 ESSB
5024