BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The Washington state
health care authority, in consultation with the department of social and health
services, shall contract with a qualified independent entity to conduct a study
to determine the feasibility of aggregating the purchase and distribution of
prescription drugs for all of the following:

(a) Participants in the
medicaid program;

(b) Enrollees in the
medicare program;

(c) Members and others
who purchase health care services through the health benefits program of the
public employees' benefits board;

(d) Any other
individuals on whose behalf the state, county, or local government entity
provides funds or subsidizes, in whole or in part, the purchase of prescription
drugs or prescription drug benefits;

(e) Washington
residents fifty-five years of age or older who have limited or no insurance
coverage for prescription drugs; and

(f) Washington
residents less than fifty-five years of age who have limited or no insurance
coverage for prescription drugs.

(2) The study required
by subsection (1) of this section must specifically and separately assess the
feasibility of including in the aggregate large Washington private sector
purchasers of prescription drugs. The study shall assess possible effects that
the inclusion of these purchasers could have on the economy, specifically
relating to prescription drug manufacturers, biotechnology firms, and
pharmacies, and shall evaluate the extent to which inclusion of these
purchasers would be marginally cost‑effective relative to the aggregate
specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)(a) The study shall
determine the impact that an aggregate purchasing program would have on the
medicaid contract drug program, including the extent to which the purchasing
program would increase or reduce the net cost of drugs in the medicaid program.

(b) The study shall
recommend the optimal configuration, if any, of an aggregate purchasing
program, based on the following factors:

(i) The state's funding
capabilities;

(ii) The extent to
which the program could be implemented in accordance with existing federal law;
and

(iii) The extent to
which the program would not reduce the scope of benefits, or access to
medically necessary medications for program participants.

(c) If an alternative
program is deemed feasible, the study shall identify the number of individuals
who would be eligible or required to participate in the alternative program,
and the specific steps that would be necessary to implement the alternative
program, including any necessary changes to state law.

(4) Nothing in this
section shall permit, or be construed to permit, a breach of the
confidentiality of contracts or agreements between the medicaid program and
pharmaceutical manufacturers.

(5) Upon the request of
the Washington state health care authority, each entity set forth in subsection
(1) of this section shall designate an individual to provide information
regarding the entity's program, for purposes of completing the study.

(6) The Washington
state health care authority, within eighteen months after securing full funding
for the study, shall submit the results of the study to the legislature and the
governor. If the results of the study indicate that the program is not
feasible or would result in a reduction in the quality of care for program
beneficiaries, that fact shall be clearly stated. A program proposed under
this section to aggregate the purchase of prescription drugs by more than one
of the entities set forth in subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this section
shall not be implemented without the enactment of a statute.

(7) The Washington
state health care authority and the department of social and health services
may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources that
are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of
the purposes of this act, and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from
the public or private sources according to their terms, unless receipt of the
gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum
of . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from
the general fund to the Washington state health care authority for the purposes
of this act.

---
END ---