BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.02.070 and 1995 c
292 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the request of the
person requesting the record, the health care provider or facility shall
certify the record furnished and may charge for such certification in
accordance with RCW 36.18.016(5). No record need be certified until the fee is
paid. The certification shall be affixed to the record and disclose:

(1) The identity of the
patient;

(2) The kind of health
care information involved;

(3) The identity of the
person to whom the information is being furnished;

(4) The identity of the
health care provider or facility furnishing the information;

(5) The number of pages
of the health care information;

(6) The date on which
the health care information is furnished; and

(7) That the
certification is to fulfill and meet the requirements of this section.

In a
court of law, health care providers' billing statements certified under this
section for treatment provided to a patient are presumed to be the reasonable
value of health care treatment and are admissible in evidence to establish the
charges are usual and customary charges in the community. The presumption that
the charges are reasonable and customary may be rebutted by a preponderance of
the evidence. The presumption does not shift the burden of proof that the
medical treatment was for medical conditions proximately caused by another's
fault.

--- END ---