BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that access to

_7 prescription drugs is vital to the health of many
Washington

_8 residents. However, increased cost and utilization of
such drugs is

_9 straining the resources of many individuals, and public
and

10 private entities. The legislature therefore creates
this pharmacy

11 access program with the intention of implementing
strategies to

12 reduce the cost of prescription drugs to the state and
assuring

13 state residents of continued access to necessary, appropriate,
and

14 affordable medications.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The department
shall award

16 prescription drug information and education grants to
local

17 government or nonprofit organizations for the design and

p. 1 SSB
5030

_1 implementation of programs intended to inform and train
persons

_2 age sixty-five and older in the safe and appropriate use
of

_3 prescription and nonprescription medications.

_4 (2) The grants shall be awarded on a competitive
basis, using

_5 the following criteria:

_6 (a) The demonstrated ability of the applicant
organization to

_7 effectively administer such a program, including
appropriate

_8 outreach and follow-up;

_9 (b) The financial and in-kind resources that the
applicant

10 organization will bring to the program in addition to
those funded

11 by the grant;

12 (c) The extent to which the proposed program design
reflects a

13 comprehensive understanding of issues related to the
safe and

14 appropriate use of prescription drugs by seniors, and
how to

15 effectively communicate with the target audience;

16 (d) The extent to which the proposed program
reflects a

17 collaborative effort between the applicant organization
and other

18 health care providers and programs in the location to be
served,

19 including doctors, pharmacists, and long-term care
providers;

20 (e) The extent to which the proposed program will
serve as a

21 model that can be replicated by other organizations
around the

22 state; and

23 (f) Any other criteria deemed appropriate by the
department to

24 ensure the quality and cost-effectiveness of the
programs funded.

25 In awarding the grants, the department shall make
every effort

26 to ensure that the programs are geographically dispersed
around

27 the state. No single program shall be awarded more than
twenty-five

28 thousand dollars annually.

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The Washington
medications outreach

30 initiative is created within the department. The
initiative shall:

31 (1) Identify and assist eligible persons age
sixty-five and

32 older in enrolling in the state medical assistance
program under

33 this chapter; and

34 (2) Assist persons in procuring free or low-cost
medications

35 from the drug assistance programs of pharmaceutical
manufacturers

36 by:

SSB 5030 p. 2

_1 (a) Evaluating the likelihood of success of a person
obtaining

_2 free or low-cost medications from a participating
manufacturer

_3 under the guidelines formulated;

_4 (b) Assisting persons with the preparation of an
application

_5 for medications to a participating manufacturer;

_6 (c) Coordinating and assisting physicians and others
authorized

_7 to prescribe medications with communications, including

_8 applications, made on behalf of a person to a
participating

_9 manufacturer for the purpose of obtaining approval of
the person

10 in any voluntary drug assistance program; and

11 (d) Working with participating manufacturers to
simplify the

12 system whereby eligible persons access voluntary drug
assistance

13 programs.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The department may
implement any senior

15 prescription drug assistance program authorized and
funded by the

16 federal government in accordance with the standards
established

17 under that authorization.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The department shall
submit and, upon

19 approval, implement a section 1115 demonstration waiver
request to

20 the federal health care financing administration to
establish a

21 prescription drug assistance program. The program must
create an

22 expanded coverage group composed of any medicare-covered

23 individual with no medicare supplement policy or retiree
health

24 benefit plan that covers drugs, and other individuals
with

25 household incomes up to three hundred percent of the
federal

26 poverty level, as adjusted annually by the federal
department of

27 health and human services, who do not have insurance
coverage or

28 other health benefits for prescription drugs.
Individuals in this

29 expanded coverage group will receive a financial subsidy
for

30 prescription drugs equal to the average rebate paid to
the

31 medicaid program under Title XIX of the federal social
security

32 act by pharmaceutical manufacturers.

33 Sec. 6. RCW
41.05.021 and 1999 c 372 s 4 are each amended to read

34 as follows:

35 (1) The Washington state health care authority is
created

p. 3 SSB
5030

_1 within the executive branch. The authority shall have
an

_2 administrator appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the

_3 senate. The administrator shall serve at the pleasure
of the

_4 governor. The administrator may employ up to seven
staff members,

_5 who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any
additional

_6 staff members as are necessary to administer this chapter.
The

_7 administrator may delegate any power or duty vested in
him or her

_8 by this chapter, including authority to make final
decisions and

_9 enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW.

10 The primary duties of the authority shall be to:
Administer state

11 employees' insurance benefits and retired or disabled
school

12 employees' insurance benefits; administer the basic
health plan

13 pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased
health care

14 programs in order to maximize cost containment in these
programs

15 while ensuring access to quality health care; and
implement state

16 initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques
for

17 efficient administration that have potential application
to all

18 state-purchased health services. The authority's duties
include,

19 but are not limited to, the following:

20 (a) To administer health care benefit programs for
employees

21 and retired or disabled school employees as specifically

22 authorized in RCW 41.05.065 and in accordance with the
methods

23 described in RCW 41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other
provisions of

24 this chapter;

25 (b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs
and to

26 explore options for cost containment and delivery
alternatives for

27 those programs that are consistent with the purposes of
those

28 programs, including, but not limited to:

29 (i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons
for whom

30 the state purchases health care to appropriately utilize
and

31 purchase health care services, including the development
of

32 flexible benefit plans to offset increases in individual
financial

33 responsibility;

34 (ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that
encourage cost

35 containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery

36 systems, utilization review, and prospective payment
methods, and

37 that ensure access to quality care, including assuring
reasonable

SSB 5030 p. 4

_1 access to local providers, especially for employees
residing in

_2 rural areas;

_3 (iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to
purchase drugs

_4 effectively, including the development of a drug
formulary as

_5 provided in RCW 70.14.050, the development of
consolidated

_6 prescription drug purchasing strategies, and more
effective use of

_7 pharmacy-based services in the delivery of any
prescription drug

_8 benefit;

_9 (iv) Development of recommendations and methods for
purchasing

10 medical equipment and supporting services on a volume
discount

11 basis; and

12 (v) Development of data systems to obtain
utilization data from

13 state-purchased health care programs in order to
identify cost

14 centers, utilization patterns, provider and hospital
practice

15 patterns, and procedure costs, utilizing the information
obtained

16 pursuant to RCW 41.05.031;

17 (c) To analyze areas of public and private health
care

18 interaction;

19 (d) To provide information and technical and
administrative

20 assistance to the board;

21 (e) To review and approve or deny applications from
counties,

22 municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the
state to

23 provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance
programs to

24 their employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW

25 41.04.205, setting the premium contribution for approved
groups as

26 outlined in RCW 41.05.050;

27 (f) To appoint a health care policy technical
advisory

28 committee as required by RCW 41.05.150;

29 (g) To establish billing procedures and collect
funds from

30 school districts and educational service districts under
RCW

31 28A.400.400 in a way that minimizes the administrative
burden on

32 districts; and

33 (h) To promulgate and adopt rules consistent with
this chapter

34 as described in RCW 41.05.160.

35 (2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public
employees'

36 benefits board may implement strategies to promote
managed

37 competition among employee health benefit plans.
Strategies may

38 include but are not limited to:

p. 5 SSB
5030

_1 (a) Standardizing the benefit package;

_2 (b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit
package;

_3 (c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent
of the

_4 lowest priced qualified plan within a geographical area;

_5 (d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this
subsection

_6 with regards to: Efficiencies in health service
delivery, cost

_7 shifts to subscribers, access to and choice of managed
care plans

_8 state-wide, and quality of health services. The health
care

_9 authority shall also advise on the value of
administering a

10 benchmark employer-managed plan to promote competition
among

11 managed care plans.

12 Sec. 7. RCW
41.05.026 and 1991 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read

13 as follows:

14 (1) When soliciting proposals for the purpose of
awarding

15 contracts for goods or services, the administrator
shall, upon

16 written request by the bidder, exempt from public
inspection and

17 copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other
information

18 contained in the bidder's proposal that relate to the
bidder's

19 unique methods of conducting business or of determining
prices or

20 premium rates to be charged for services under terms of
the

21 proposal.

22 (2) Actuarial formulas, statistics, cost and
utilization data,

23 or other proprietary information submitted upon request
of the

24 administrator or board by a contracting insurer, health
care

25 service contractor, health maintenance organization, or
vendor may

26 be withheld at any time from public inspection when
necessary to

27 preserve trade secrets or prevent unfair competition.

28 (3) Proprietary information submitted upon
request of the

29 administrator by any insurer, vendor, or other person
or entity

30 for the purpose of analyzing and developing cost
containment

31 options, delivery alternatives, and consolidated
purchasing for

32 state-purchased health care programs may be withheld
at any time

33 from public inspection when necessary to preserve
trade secrets or

34 prevent unfair competition.

35 (4) The board may hold an executive session
during any regular

36 or special meeting to discuss information submitted in
accordance

37 with subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

SSB 5030 p. 6

_1 Sec. 8. RCW
70.14.050 and 1986 c 303 s 10 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 (1) Each agency listed in ((RCW 70.14.010)) subsection
(5) of

_4 this section shall individually or in cooperation
with other

_5 agencies take any necessary actions to control costs
without

_6 reducing the quality of care when reimbursing for or
purchasing

_7 drugs. To accomplish this purpose, each agency shall
investigate

_8 the feasibility of and may establish a drug formulary
designating

_9 which drugs may be paid for through their health care
programs.

10 For purposes of this section, a drug formulary means a
list of

11 drugs, either inclusive or exclusive, that defines which
drugs are

12 eligible for reimbursement by the agency.

13 (2) In developing the drug formulary authorized by
this

14 section, agencies:

15 (a) Shall prohibit reimbursement for drugs that are
determined

16 to be ineffective by the United States food and drug

17 administration;

18 (b) Shall adopt rules in order to ensure that less
expensive

19 generic drugs will be substituted for brand name drugs
in those

20 instances where the quality of care is not diminished;

21 (c) Where possible, may authorize reimbursement for
drugs only

22 in economical quantities;

23 (d) May limit the prices paid for drugs by such
means as

24 central purchasing, volume contracting, or setting
maximum prices

25 to be paid;

26 (e) Shall consider the approval of drugs with lower
abuse

27 potential in substitution for drugs with significant
abuse

28 potential; and

29 (f) May take other necessary measures to control
costs of drugs

30 without reducing the quality of care.

31 (3) Agencies may provide for reasonable exceptions
to the drug

32 formulary required by this section.

33 (4) Agencies may establish medical advisory
committees, or

34 utilize committees already established, to assist in the

35 development of the drug formulary required by this
section.

36 (5) This section applies to the department of
social and health

p. 7 SSB
5030

_1 services, the health care authority, the department
of health, the

_2 department of labor and industries, the department of
veterans

_3 affairs, and the department of corrections.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. No later than January
1, 2002, the

_5 administrator of the health care authority shall submit
to the

_6 governor and the legislature a progress report regarding
the

_7 implementation of efforts to coordinate state agency
drug

_8 purchasing pursuant to RCW 41.05.021(1)(b)(iii),
including an

_9 explanation of and rationale for the strategies
developed, and the

10 timeline for implementation.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) The sum of one
hundred twenty-five

12 thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is

13 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002,
from the

14 general fund to the department of social and health
services, all

15 of which the department of social and health services
must award

16 to local governments and nonprofit organizations under
section 2

17 of this act.

18 (2) The sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars, or as

19 much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal

20 year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the
department

21 of social and health services, all of which the
department of

22 social and health services must award to local
governments and

23 nonprofit organizations under section 2 of this act.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. Sections 2 through 5
of this act are each

25 added to chapter 74.09 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5030 p. 8