BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that families

_8 receiving temporary assistance for needy families face
many

_9 barriers to economic success. According to recent
studies, lack of

10 reliable transportation to work and to school and child
care sites

11 is one of the primary barriers to consistent
employment. Families

12 without reliable transportation are faced with the
struggle to get

13 children to school and child care sites, and parents to
work, in

14 situations where public transportation is lacking or

15 impractical. Families that own cars are sometimes
unable to pay for

16 adequate maintenance. The result can be losing a job
because of

17 poor attendance, another setback in a life of struggle.

18 Unlike some of the other, less tangible, primary
barriers to

p. 1 SSB
5031

_1 employment such as mental health conditions or alcohol
or

_2 substance abuse problems, the lack of a reliable means
of

_3 transportation can be solved in some cases, by providing
the

_4 family with access to its own vehicle.

_5 The legislature finds that other states have created
programs

_6 called "wheels to work," to provide qualifying
adults receiving

_7 temporary assistance for needy families with a method of
acquiring

_8 a vehicle in order to stabilize their employment. These
programs

_9 have met with some success.

10 The legislature intends that Washington establish a
wheels to

11 work program, as a public-private partnership, to
provide

12 qualified families on temporary assistance for needy
families with

13 the ability to own a vehicle. The legislature intends
to study the

14 costs and benefits of the wheels to work program.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 74.08A

16 RCW to read as follows:

17 (1) The wheels to work program is established in the

18 department. The program will accept donated vehicles
and provide

19 them for lease to qualified adults who are receiving
temporary

20 assistance for needy families at the time of application
for the

21 program. The department shall contract with a private
nonprofit

22 entity to operate the program in three locations, one in
Pierce

23 county, one in Yakima county, and one in Spokane
county. The

24 program shall be expanded statewide one year after
implementation.

25 (2) The entity under contract with the department
shall

26 determine the acceptability of donated vehicles, based
upon the

27 needs of the program and the budget constraints of the
entity. The

28 entity shall only accept driveable vehicles, and shall
not accept

29 vehicles for parts or scrap, but may accept charitable
donations

30 of funds to use in the repair or maintenance of the
donated

31 vehicles. The entity shall assume title on acceptance
of the

32 donated vehicle, and shall provide a receipt for tax
purposes to

33 the vehicle donor.

34 (3) In addition to obtaining donated vehicles for
the wheels to

35 work program, the department may, at its election,
choose to make

36 interagency arrangements with state and local government
motor

37 pools in order to acquire government surplus vehicles
for use in

SSB 5031 p. 2

_1 the program. The department may also purchase vehicles
from the

_2 commercial market for use in the program, if the
vehicles meet

_3 recipient asset and resource considerations and are
inspected and

_4 certified by an independent mechanic before their use by

_5 recipients. The department may coordinate with local
community and

_6 technical colleges for the refurbishing and maintenance
of

_7 vehicles.

_8 (4) Upon donation of a vehicle and transfer of
title, the donor

_9 is not liable for any damage, repair, emissions
compliance,

10 vehicle insurance, or determination of vehicle safety.

11 (5) To qualify for the program, an applicant must be
receiving

12 temporary assistance for needy families at the time of

13 application; have a verifiable job or a bona fide job
offer for

14 which the vehicle is essential transportation; possess a
valid

15 Washington driver's license; and be insurable. The
department shall

16 certify to the entity that the applicant for a vehicle
is

17 qualified to participate in the program. Donated
vehicles shall be

18 available for a twelve-month lease for thirty dollars
per month to

19 participants. For the first six months of the lease
term, the

20 department shall cover the cost of the participant's car
insurance

21 premium. At the end of six months, the qualified
participant shall

22 provide insurance for the vehicle, and continue paying
thirty

23 dollars per month for an additional six-month lease
term. During

24 the twelve months of the total lease term, the entity
shall

25 provide all necessary repairs to the vehicle and ensure
emissions

26 compliance, except that the participant shall be
responsible for

27 normal vehicle maintenance. At the end of the
twelve-month lease

28 term, title to the vehicle shall be transferred to the

29 participant.

30 (6) If the participant leaves employment without
good cause,

31 the participant has sixty days to find new employment or
the

32 vehicle shall be returned to the entity and the lease
canceled.

33 (7) If the participant leasing the vehicle is
convicted of any

34 felony in violation of Title 9 or 9A RCW, or of a
driving-related

35 offense pursuant to RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, 46.61.504,

36 46.61.520, 46.61.522, or 46.61.5249, after the inception
of the

37 lease, the leased vehicle shall be returned to the
entity and the

38 lease canceled. For the purposes of this section, a
person has been

p. 3 SSB
5031

_1 "convicted," whether in an adult court or
adjudicated in a

_2 juvenile court, at such time as a plea of guilty has
been

_3 accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed,
notwithstanding

_4 the pendency of any future proceedings including but not
limited

_5 to sentencing or disposition, posttrial or post
fact-finding

_6 motions, and appeals. Conviction includes a dismissal
entered after

_7 a period of probation, suspension, or deferral of
sentence.

_8 (8) The participant shall be the only driver of the
vehicle

_9 during the lease term.

10 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 82.08

11 RCW to read as follows:

12 (1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply
to sales of

13 vehicles to the department of social and health services
or

14 nonprofit entities for use in the wheels for work
program provided

15 in section 2 of this act.

16 (2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply
to sales of

17 vehicles to qualified recipients by the department of
social and

18 health services or nonprofit entities under the wheels
for work

19 program provided in section 2 of this act.

20 (3) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply
to the lease

21 of vehicles to qualified recipients by the department of
social

22 and health services or nonprofit entities under the
wheels for

23 work program provided in section 2 of this act.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 82.12

25 RCW to read as follows:

26 (1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in
respect to

27 the use of vehicles by the department of social and
health

28 services or nonprofit entities for use in the wheels for
work

29 program provided in section 2 of this act.

30 (2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in
respect to

31 the use of a vehicle by a qualified recipient if the
vehicle is

32 acquired by the qualified recipient under the wheels for
work

33 program provided in section 2 of this act.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The department of
social and health

35 services shall contract with the Washington state
institute for

SSB 5031 p. 4

_1 public policy to perform a study of the wheels for work
program,

_2 including at the minimum a cost-benefit analysis, and an

_3 evaluation of the extent to which access to a personal
vehicle

_4 enabled the family on assistance to progress toward
economic

_5 independence.

_6 The institute for public policy shall, as part of
the pilot

_7 project evaluation, develop protocols for selection from
the pool

_8 of WorkFirst clients eligible for wheels to work
transportation

_9 assistance, in order to assure random assignment of
clients and

10 enable clear identification of the costs and benefits
attributable

11 to the pilot program.

12 The institute for public policy shall report to the
legislature

13 two years after the implementation of the program, on
the progress

14 of the study. The report shall include, without
limitation, a

15 comparison of program administration expenditures versus

16 reductions, if any, in the use of welfare grants, food
stamps,

17 medical assistance, and WorkFirst support services, such
as child

18 care subsidies, clothing expenses, and other types of

19 transportation assistance. Any participant benefits,
such as

20 increased earnings, shall also be included.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If any part of this
act is found to be in

22 conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition

23 to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting

24 part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of
the

25 conflict and with respect to the agencies directly
affected, and

26 this finding does not affect the operation of the
remainder of

27 this act in its application to the agencies concerned.
Rules

28 adopted under this act must meet federal requirements
that are a

29 necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary
for the immediate

31 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

32 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

33 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SSB
5031