BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.12.005 and 1998
c 334 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1) The term
"department" means the department of labor and industries.

(2) The term
"director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's designated representative.

(3) The term
"employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, business
trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in any
business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and employs one or
more employees and for the purposes of RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 and
49.12.450 also includes the state, any state institution, any state agency,
political subdivisions of the state, and any municipal corporation or
quasi-municipal corporation.

(4) The term
"employee" means an employee who is employed in the business of the
employee's employer whether by way of manual labor or otherwise.

(5) The term
"conditions of labor" shall mean and include the conditions of rest
and meal periods for employees including provisions for personal privacy,
practices, methods and means by or through which labor or services are
performed by employees and includes bona fide physical qualifications in
employment, but shall not include conditions of labor otherwise governed by
statutes and rules and regulations relating to industrial safety and health
administered by the department.

(6) The term
"temporary services agency" means any individual or entity that is
engaged in the business of furnishing individuals to perform services on a
part-time or temporary basis for a third party.

(7) The term
"personnel files" means records kept by an employer, in any form,
that are used or have been used to determine the employee's qualification for
employment, promotion, additional compensation, or employment termination, or
other disciplinary action.

(8) For the
purpose of chapter 16, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess. a minor is defined to be a
person of either sex under the age of eighteen years.

Sec. 2. RCW 49.12.250 and 1985
c 336 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an employer
keeps a personnel file on an employee, the employer shall, at least annually,
upon the request of that employee, permit that employee to inspect and copy
without charges, except a reasonable copying charge, any or all of his or her
own personnel file(s). These file(s) shall be retained by the employer for a
minimum of three years after the employee ceases work for that employer.

(2) Each
employer shall make such file(s) available locally within ((a reasonable
period of time)) fifteen business days after the employee requests
the file(s).

(((2))) (3)
An employee annually may petition that the employer review all information in
the employee's personnel file(s) that are regularly maintained by the employer
as a part of his business records or are subject to reference for information
given to persons outside of the company. The employer shall determine if there
is any irrelevant or erroneous information in the file(s), and shall remove all
such information from the file(s). If an employee does not agree with the
employer's determination, the employee may at his or her request have placed in
the employee's personnel file a statement containing the employee's rebuttal or
correction. Nothing in this subsection prevents the employer from removing
information more frequently.

(((3))) (4)
A former employee shall retain the right of rebuttal or correction ((for a
period not to exceed two years)).

(5) Individuals
performing personal services for, or for the benefit of, a third party pursuant
to a contract with a temporary services agency shall be, for the purposes of
this section and RCW 49.12.050, employees of both the temporary services agency
and the third party.

(6) The director
shall assess any employer found to be in violation of this section, or rules or
orders adopted or issued pursuant to this section, a civil penalty of not less
than five hundred dollars a day for each violation. Each and every violation
shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing
violation, every day's continuance shall be a separate and distinct violation.
Any penalty amount set in excess of five thousand dollars shall be set by the
director in consideration of any previous history of violations by the
violator.

(7) In addition to
any other penalty provided by law, an employee whose request to inspect and
copy personnel files has been denied in violation of this section may bring an
action in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover damages for the
violation in the amount of five thousand dollars. The court shall award
reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff.

(8) A criminal
action need not be brought against an employer for that employer to be civilly
liable under this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 49.12.260 and 1985
c 336 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW ((49.12.240 and))
49.12.250 ((do)) does not apply to the records of an employee
relating to the investigation of a possible criminal offense. RCW ((49.12.240
and)) 49.12.250 ((do)) does not apply to information or
records compiled in preparation for an impending lawsuit which would not be
available to another party under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending
in the superior courts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 49.12.240 (Employee inspection of
personnel file) and 1985 c 336 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---