BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 29.71.020
and 1990 c 59 s 69 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) In the year in which a presidential election
is held, each

_7 major political party and each minor political party or

_8 independent candidate convention held under chapter 29.24
RCW that

_9 nominates candidates for president and vice-president of
the

10 United States shall nominate one congressional district
elector

11 representing each congressional district of this state
and two at

12 large presidential electors ((for this)) representing
the whole

13 state. The party or convention shall file with the
secretary of

14 state a certificate signed by the presiding officer of the

15 convention at which the presidential electors were chosen,
listing

16 the names and addresses of the presidential electors,
and the

17 congressional district for each elector nominated to
represent a

18 congressional district. Each presidential elector
shall execute and

p. 1 SB
5034

_1 file with the secretary of state a pledge that, as an
elector, he

_2 or she will vote for the candidates nominated by that
party. The

_3 names of presidential electors shall not appear on the
ballots.

_4 (2) The votes cast statewide for
candidates for president and

_5 vice-president of each political party shall be counted
for the

_6 candidates for at large presidential electors of
that political

_7 party. The candidates for at large presidential
electors

_8 representing the party of the candidates for
president and vice-

_9 president receiving the most votes statewide will be
the at large

10 presidential electors for the state.

11 (3) The votes cast in a congressional district
for candidates

12 for president and vice-president of each political
party must be

13 counted for the candidate for congressional district
presidential

14 elector of that party. The candidate for
congressional district

15 elector representing the party of the candidates for
president and

16 vice-president receiving the most votes in the congressional

17 district will be the congressional district elector
for that

18 district.

19 Sec. 2. RCW 29.71.040
and 1977 ex.s. c 238 s 2 are each amended to

20 read as follows:

21 The congressional district and at large electors
of the

22 president and vice-president selected under RCW
29.71.020 shall

23 convene at the seat of government on the day fixed by
federal

24 statute, at the hour of twelve o'clock noon of that day.
If there

25 is any vacancy in the office of an elector occasioned by
death,

26 refusal to act, neglect to attend, or otherwise, the
electors

27 present shall immediately proceed to fill it by viva voce,
and

28 plurality of votes. When all of the electors have appeared
and the

29 vacancies have been filled they shall constitute the
college of

30 electors of the state of Washington, and shall proceed to
perform

31 the duties required of them by the Constitution and laws of
the

32 United States. Each congressional district elector
shall vote for

33 the presidential and vice-presidential candidates who
received the

34 highest number of votes in the district the elector

35 represents. Each at large elector shall vote for the
presidential

36 and vice-presidential candidates who received the
highest number

37 of votes in this state. Any elector who votes for a
person or

SB 5034 p. 2

_1 persons not nominated by the party of which he or she is
an

_2 elector, or in a manner otherwise inconsistent with
this section,

_3 shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to a fine of
one

_4 thousand dollars.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5034