BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.320.080 and 1993
c 472 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of
financial institutions shall maintain an office at the state capitol, but may
with the consent of the governor also maintain branch offices at other
convenient business centers in this state. The director shall keep books of
record of all moneys received or disbursed by the director into or from the ((banking
examination fund, the credit union examination fund, the securities)) financial
services regulation fund, and any other accounts maintained by the
department of financial institutions.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.320.110 and 1995
c 238 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a
local fund known as the "((banking examination)) financial
services regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received
by the divisions of the department of financial institutions ((from
banks, savings banks, foreign bank branches, savings and loan associations,
consumer loan companies, check cashers and sellers, trust companies and
departments, and escrow agents)), except for the division of securities
which shall deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, and which
shall be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment ((and));
the payment of salaries, wages, and utilities((,)); the
establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs required for the
proper regulation of ((these companies)) individuals and entities
subject to regulation by the department. The state treasurer shall be the
custodian of the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization
of the director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order
to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.44.121 and 1999 c
30 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
charge and collect the following fees as established by rule by the director:

(1) A fee for filing an
original or a renewal application for an escrow agent license, a fee for each
application for an additional licensed location, a fee for an application for a
change of address for an escrow agent, annual fees for the first office or
location and for each additional office or location, and under RCW 43.135.055
the director shall set the annual fee for an escrow agent license up to five
hundred sixty-five dollars in fiscal year 2000.

(2) A fee for filing an
original or a renewal application for an escrow officer license, a fee for an
application for a change of address for each escrow officer license being so
changed, a fee to activate an inactive escrow officer license or transfer an
escrow officer license, and under RCW 43.135.055 the director shall set the
annual fee for an escrow officer license up to two hundred thirty-five dollars
in fiscal year 2000.

(3) A fee for filing an
application for a duplicate of an escrow agent license or of an escrow officer
license lost, stolen, destroyed, or for replacement.

(4) A fee for providing
license examinations.

(5) An hourly audit
fee. In setting this fee, the director shall ensure that every examination and
audit, or any part of the examination or audit, of any person licensed or
subject to licensing in this state requiring travel and services outside this
state by the director or by employees designated by the director, shall be at
the expense of the person examined or audited at the hourly rate established by
the director, plus the per diem compensation and actual travel expenses
incurred by the director or his or her employees conducting the examination or
audit. When making any examination or audit under this chapter, the director
may retain attorneys, appraisers, independent certified public accountants, or
other professionals and specialists as examiners or auditors, the cost of which
shall be borne by the person who is the subject of the examination or audit.

In establishing these
fees, the director shall set the fees at a sufficient level to defray the costs
of administering this chapter.

All fees
received by the director under this chapter shall be paid into the state
treasury to the credit of the ((banking examination)) financial
services regulation fund.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.146.205 and 1997
c 106 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application for a
mortgage broker license under this chapter shall be in writing and in the form
prescribed by the director. The application shall contain at least the
following information:

(a) The name, address,
date of birth, and social security number of the applicant, and any other
names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by the
applicant, unless waived by the director;

(b) If the applicant is
a partnership or association, the name, address, date of birth, and social
security number of each general partner or principal of the association, and
any other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by
the members, unless waived by the director;

(c) If the applicant is
a corporation, the name, address, date of birth, and social security number of
each officer, director, registered agent, and each principal stockholder, and
any other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by
the officers, directors, registered agents, and principal stockholders unless
waived by the director;

(d) The street address,
county, and municipality where the principal business office is to be located;

(e) The name, address,
date of birth, and social security number of the applicant's designated broker,
and any other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used
by the designated broker and a complete set of the designated broker's
fingerprints taken by an authorized law enforcement officer; and

(f) Such other
information regarding the applicant's or designated broker's background,
financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness as the
director may require by rule.

(2) The director may
exchange fingerprint data with the federal bureau of investigation.

(3) At the time of
filing an application for a license under this chapter, each applicant shall
pay to the director the appropriate application fee in an amount determined by
rule of the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086 to cover, but not exceed,
the cost of processing and reviewing the application. The director shall
deposit the moneys in the ((banking examination)) financial services
regulation fund, unless the consumer services account is created as a
dedicated, nonappropriated account, in which case the director shall deposit
the moneys in the consumer services account.

(4)(a) Each applicant
for a mortgage broker's license shall file and maintain a surety bond, in an
amount of not greater than sixty thousand dollars nor less than twenty thousand
dollars which the director deems adequate to protect the public interest,
executed by the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a
surety business in this state as surety. The bonding requirement as
established by the director may take the form of a uniform bond amount for all
licensees or the director may establish by rule a schedule establishing a range
of bond amounts which shall vary according to the annual average number of loan
originators or independent contractors of a licensee. The bond shall run to
the state of Washington as obligee, and shall run first to the benefit of the
borrower and then to the benefit of the state and any person or persons who
suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or its loan originator's violation of
any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. The bond
shall be conditioned that the obligor as licensee will faithfully conform to
and abide by this chapter and all rules adopted under this chapter, and shall
reimburse all persons who suffer loss by reason of a violation of this chapter
or rules adopted under this chapter. Borrowers shall be given priority over
the state and other persons. The state and other third parties shall be
allowed to receive distribution pursuant to a valid claim against the remainder
of the bond. In the case of claims made by any person or entity who is not a
borrower, no final judgment may be entered prior to one hundred eighty days
following the date the claim is filed. The bond shall be continuous and may be
canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the director of
its intent to cancel the bond. The cancellation shall be effective thirty days
after the notice is received by the director. Whether or not the bond is
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise extended, replaced, or
modified, including increases or decreases in the penal sum, it shall be
considered one continuous obligation, and the surety upon the bond shall not be
liable in an aggregate or cumulative amount exceeding the penal sum set forth
on the face of the bond. In no event shall the penal sum, or any portion
thereof, at two or more points in time be added together in determining the
surety's liability. The bond shall not be liable for any penalties imposed on
the licensee, including, but not limited to, any increased damages or
attorneys' fees, or both, awarded under RCW 19.86.090. The applicant may
obtain the bond directly from the surety or through a group bonding arrangement
involving a professional organization comprised of mortgage brokers if the
arrangement provides at least as much coverage as is required under this
subsection.

(b) In lieu of a surety
bond, the applicant may, upon approval by the director, file with the director
a certificate of deposit, an irrevocable letter of credit, or such other
instrument as approved by the director by rule, drawn in favor of the director
for an amount equal to the required bond.

(c) In lieu of the surety
bond or compliance with (b) of this subsection, an applicant may obtain
insurance or coverage from an association comprised of mortgage brokers that is
organized as a mutual corporation for the sole purpose of insuring or
self-insuring claims that may arise from a violation of this chapter. An
applicant may only substitute coverage under this subsection for the
requirements of (a) or (b) of this subsection if the director, with the consent
of the insurance commissioner, has authorized such association to organize a
mutual corporation under such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the
director to ensure that the corporation is operated in a financially
responsible manner to pay any claims within the financial responsibility limits
specified in (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.146.228 and 1997
c 106 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
establish fees by rule in accordance with RCW 43.24.086 sufficient to cover,
but not exceed, the costs of administering this chapter. These fees may
include:

(1) An annual
assessment paid by each licensee on or before a date specified by rule;

(2) An investigation
fee to cover the costs of any investigation of the books and records of a
licensee or other person subject to this chapter; and

(3) An application fee
to cover the costs of processing applications made to the director under this
chapter.

Mortgage
brokers shall not be charged investigation fees for the processing of
complaints when the investigation determines that no violation of this chapter
occurred or when the mortgage broker provides a remedy satisfactory to the
complainant and the director and no order of the director is issued. All
moneys, fees, and penalties collected under the authority of this chapter shall
be deposited into the ((banking examination)) financial services
regulation fund, unless the consumer services account is created as a
dedicated, nonappropriated account, in which case all moneys, fees, and
penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the consumer
services account.

Sec. 6. RCW 19.146.280 and 1997
c 106 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established the mortgage brokerage commission consisting of five commission
members who shall act in an advisory capacity to the director on mortgage
brokerage issues.

(2) The director shall
appoint the members of the commission, weighing the recommendations from
professional organizations representing mortgage brokers. At least three of
the commission members shall be mortgage brokers licensed under this chapter
and at least one shall be exempt from licensure under RCW 19.146.020(1)(f). No
commission member shall be appointed who has had less than five years'
experience in the business of residential mortgage lending. In addition, the
director or a designee shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the
commission. Voting members of the commission shall serve for two-year terms
with three of the initial commission members serving one-year terms. The
department shall provide staff support to the commission.

(3) The commission may
establish a code of conduct for its members. Any commissioner may bring a
motion before the commission to remove a commissioner for failing to conduct
themselves in a manner consistent with the code of conduct. The motion shall
be in the form of a recommendation to the director to dismiss a specific commissioner
and shall enumerate causes for doing so. The commissioner in question shall
recuse himself or herself from voting on any such motion. Any such motion must
be approved unanimously by the remaining four commissioners. Approved motions
shall be immediately transmitted to the director for review and action.

(4) Members of the
commission shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses incurred in carrying
out the provisions of this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. All costs and expenses associated with the commission shall be paid
from the ((banking examination)) financial services regulation
fund, unless the consumer services account is created as a dedicated,
nonappropriated account, in which case all costs and expenses shall be paid
from the consumer services account.

(5) The commission
shall advise the director on the characteristics and needs of the mortgage
brokerage profession.

(6) The department, in
consultation with other applicable agencies of state government, shall conduct
a continuing review of the number and type of consumer complaints arising from
residential mortgage lending in the state. The department shall report its
findings to the senate committee on financial institutions and house of
representatives committee on financial institutions and insurance along with
recommendations for any changes in the licensing requirements of this chapter,
biennially by December 1st of each even-numbered year.

Sec. 7. RCW 31.35.050 and 1994 c
92 s 254 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director is
authorized to charge a fee for the estimated direct and indirect costs for
examination and supervision by the director of an agricultural lender or a
subsidiary of an agricultural lender. Excess examiner time shall be billed at
a reasonable rate established by rule.

(2) All such fees shall
be deposited in the ((banking examination)) financial services
regulation fund and administered consistent with the provisions of RCW
43.320.110.

Sec. 8. RCW 31.35.080 and 1994 c
92 s 257 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
adopt rules to enforce the intent and purposes of this chapter. Such rules
shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Disclosure of
conflicts of interest;

(b) Prohibition of
false statements made to the director on any form required by the director or
during any examination; or

(c) Prevention of fraud
and undue influence within an agricultural lender.

(2) A violation of any
provision of this chapter or any rule of the director adopted under this
chapter by an agent, employee, officer, or director of the agricultural lender
shall be punishable by a fine, established by the director, not to exceed one
hundred dollars for each offense. Each day's continuance of the violation
shall be a separate and distinct offense. All fines shall be credited to the
((banking examination)) financial services regulation fund.

(3) The director may
issue and serve upon an agricultural lender a notice of charges if, in the
opinion of the director, the agricultural lender is violating or has violated
the law, rule, or any condition imposed in writing by the director or any
written agreement made by the director.

(a) The notice shall
contain a statement of the facts constituting the alleged violation or practice
and shall fix a time and place at which a hearing will be held to determine
whether an order to cease and desist should issue against the agricultural
lender. The hearing shall be set not earlier than ten days nor later than
thirty days after service of the notice unless a later date is set by the
director at the request of the agricultural lender.

Unless the agricultural
lender appears at the hearing by a duly authorized representative, it shall be
deemed to have consented to the issuance of the cease and desist order. In the
event of consent or if, upon the record made at the hearing, the director finds
that any violation or practice specified in the notice of charges has been established,
the director may issue and serve upon the agricultural lender an order to cease
and desist from the violation or practice. The order may require the
agricultural lender and its directors, officers, employees, and agents to cease
and desist from the violation or practice and may require the agricultural
lender to take affirmative action to correct the conditions resulting from the
violation or practice.

(b) A cease and desist
order shall become effective at the expiration of ten days after the service of
the order upon the agricultural lender concerned, except that a cease and
desist order issued upon consent shall become effective at the time specified
in the order and shall remain effective as provided in the order unless it is
stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by action of the director or a
reviewing court.

Sec. 9. RCW 31.40.070 and 1994 c
92 s 266 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director is
authorized to charge a fee for the estimated direct and indirect costs of the
following:

(a) An application for
a license and the investigation thereof;

(b) An application for
approval to acquire control of a licensee and the investigation thereof;

(c) An application for
approval for a licensee to merge with another corporation, an application for
approval for a licensee to purchase all or substantially all of the business of
another person, or an application for approval for a licensee to sell all or
substantially all of its business or of the business of any of its offices to
another licensee and the investigation thereof;

(d) An annual license;

(e) An examination by
the director of a licensee or a subsidiary of a licensee. Excess examiner time
shall be billed at a reasonable rate established by rule.

(2) A fee for filing an
application with the director shall be paid at the time the application is
filed with the director.

(3) All such fees shall
be deposited in the ((banking examination)) financial services
regulation fund and administered consistent with the provisions of RCW
43.320.110.

Sec. 10. RCW 31.40.110 and 1994 c
92 s 270 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
adopt rules to enforce the intent and purposes of this chapter. Such rules
shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) Disclosure of
conflicts of interest;

(b) Prohibition of
false statements made to the director on any form required by the director or
during any examination requested by the director; or

(c) Prevention of fraud
and undue influence by a licensee.

(2) A violation of any
provision of this chapter or any rule of the director adopted under this
chapter by an agent, employee, officer, or director of the licensee shall be
punishable by a fine, established by the director, not to exceed one hundred
dollars for each offense. Each day's continuance of the violation shall be a
separate and distinct offense. Each such fine shall be credited to the ((banking
examination)) financial services regulation fund.

Sec. 11. RCW 31.45.030 and 1995 c
18 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 31.45.020, no check casher or seller may engage in business without
first obtaining a license from the director in accordance with this chapter. A
license is required for each location where a licensee engages in the business
of cashing or selling checks or drafts.

(2) Each application for
a license shall be in writing in a form prescribed by the director and shall
contain the following information:

(a) The legal name,
residence, and business address of the applicant and, if the applicant is a
partnership, association, or corporation, of every member, officer, and
director thereof;

(b) The location where
the initial registered office of the applicant will be located in this state;

(c) The complete
address of any other locations at which the applicant proposes to engage in
business as a check casher or seller;

(d) Such other data,
financial statements, and pertinent information as the director may require
with respect to the applicant, its directors, trustees, officers, members, or
agents.

(3) Any information in
the application regarding the personal residential address or telephone number
of the applicant is exempt from the public records disclosure requirements of
chapter 42.17 RCW.

(4) The application
shall be filed together with an investigation and supervision fee established
by rule by the director. Such fees collected shall be deposited to the credit
of the ((banking examination)) financial services regulation fund
in accordance with RCW 43.320.110.

(5)(a) Before granting
a license to sell checks, drafts, or money orders under this chapter, the
director shall require that the licensee file with the director a surety bond
running to the state of Washington, which bond shall be issued by a surety
insurer which meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW, and be in a format
acceptable to the director. The director shall adopt rules to determine the
penal sum of the bond that shall be filed by each licensee. The bond shall be
conditioned upon the licensee paying all persons who purchase checks, drafts,
or money orders from the licensee the face value of any check, draft, or money
order which is dishonored by the drawee bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association due to insufficient funds or by reason of the account having been closed.
The bond shall only be liable for the face value of the dishonored check,
draft, or money order, and shall not be liable for any interest or
consequential damages.

(b) Before granting a
small loan endorsement under this chapter, the director shall require that the
licensee file with the director a surety bond, in a format acceptable to the
director, issued by a surety insurer that meets the requirements of chapter
48.28 RCW. The director shall adopt rules to determine the penal sum of the
bond that shall be filed by each licensee. A licensee who wishes to engage in
both check selling and making small loans may combine the penal sums of the
bonding requirements and file one bond in a form acceptable to the director.
The bond shall run to the state of Washington as obligee, and shall run to the
benefit of the state and any person or persons who suffer loss by reason of the
licensee's violation of this chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter.
The bond shall only be liable for damages suffered by borrowers as a result of
the licensee's violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter,
and shall not be liable for any interest or consequential damages.

(c) The bond shall be
continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written
notice to the director and licensee of its intent to cancel the bond. The
cancellation is effective thirty days after the notice is received by the
director. Whether or not the bond is renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued,
or otherwise extended, replaced, or modified, including increases or decreases
in the penal sum, it shall be considered one continuous obligation, and the
surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate or cumulative amount
exceeding the penal sum set forth on the face of the bond. In no event shall
the penal sum, or any portion thereof, at two or more points in time be added
together in determining the surety's liability. The bond shall not be liable
for any liability of the licensee for tortious acts, whether or not such
liability is imposed by statute or common law, or is imposed by contract. The
bond shall not be a substitute or supplement to any liability or other
insurance required by law or by the contract. If the surety desires to make
payment without awaiting court action against it, the penal sum of the bond
shall be reduced to the extent of any payment made by the surety in good faith
under the bond.

(d) Any person who is a
purchaser of a check, draft, or money order from the licensee having a claim
against the licensee for the dishonor of any check, draft, or money order by
the drawee bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association due to
insufficient funds or by reason of the account having been closed, or who
obtained a small loan from the licensee and was damaged by the licensee's
violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, may bring suit
upon such bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in which the
check, draft, or money order was purchased, or in the superior court of a
county in which the licensee maintains a place of business. Jurisdiction shall
be exclusively in the superior court. Any such action must be brought not
later than one year after the dishonor of the check, draft, or money order on
which the claim is based. In the event valid claims against a bond or deposit
exceed the amount of the bond or deposit, each claimant shall only be entitled
to a pro rata amount, based on the amount of the claim as it is valid against
the bond, or deposit, without regard to the date of filing of any claim or
action.

(e) In lieu of the
surety bond required by this section, the applicant for a check seller license
may file with the director a deposit consisting of cash or other security
acceptable to the director in an amount equal to the penal sum of the required
bond. In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the applicant for a
small loan endorsement may file with the director a deposit consisting of cash
or other security acceptable to the director in an amount equal to the penal
sum of the required bond, or may demonstrate to the director net worth in
excess of three times the amount of the penal sum of the required bond.

The director may adopt
rules necessary for the proper administration of the security or to establish
reporting requirements to ensure that the net worth requirements continue to be
met. A deposit given instead of the bond required by this section is not an
asset of the licensee for the purpose of complying with the liquid asset provisions
of this chapter. A deposit given instead of the bond required by this section
is a fund held in trust for the benefit of eligible claimants under this
section and is not an asset of the estate of any licensee that seeks protection
voluntarily or involuntarily under the bankruptcy laws of the United States.

(f) Such security may
be sold by the director at public auction if it becomes necessary to satisfy
the requirements of this chapter. Notice of the sale shall be served upon the
licensee who placed the security personally or by mail. If notice is served by
mail, service shall be addressed to the licensee at its address as it appears
in the records of the director. Bearer bonds of the United States or the state
of Washington without a prevailing market price must be sold at public
auction. Such bonds having a prevailing market price may be sold at private
sale not lower than the prevailing market price. Upon any sale, any surplus
above amounts due shall be returned to the licensee, and the licensee shall
deposit with the director additional security sufficient to meet the amount
required by the director. A deposit given instead of the bond required by this
section shall not be deemed an asset of the licensee for the purpose of
complying with the liquid asset provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 12. RCW 31.45.050 and 1996 c
13 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant and
licensee shall pay to the director an investigation fee and an annual
assessment fee in an amount determined by rule of the director as necessary to
cover the operation of the program. In establishing the fees, the director
shall differentiate between check cashing and check selling and making small
loans, and consider at least the volume of business, level of risk, and
potential harm to the public related to each activity. The fees collected
shall be deposited to the credit of the ((banking examination)) financial
services regulation fund in accordance with RCW 43.320.110.

(2) If a licensee
intends to do business at a new location, to close an existing place of
business, or to relocate an existing place of business, the licensee shall
provide written notification of that intention to the director no less than
thirty days before the proposed establishing, closing, or moving of a place of
business.

Sec. 13. RCW 31.45.077 and 1995 c
18 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each application
for a small loan endorsement to a check casher or check seller license must be
in writing and in a form prescribed by the director and shall contain the
following information:

(a) The legal name,
residence, and business address of the applicant, and if the applicant is a
partnership, corporation, or association, the name and address of every member,
partner, officer, and director thereof;

(b) The street and
mailing address of each location where the licensee will engage in the business
of making small loans;

(c) A surety bond, or
other security allowed under RCW 31.45.030, in the amount required; and

(d) Any other pertinent
information, including financial statements, as the director may require with
respect to the licensee and its directors, officers, trustees, members, or
employees.

(2) Any information in
the application regarding the licensee's personal residential address or
telephone number is exempt from the public records disclosure requirements of
chapter 42.17 RCW.

(3) The application
shall be filed together with an investigation and supervision fee established
by rule by the director. Fees collected shall be deposited to the credit of
the ((banking examination)) financial services regulation fund in
accordance with RCW 43.320.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. All funds in the banking
examination fund under RCW 43.320.110, credit unions examination fund under RCW
43.320.120, and securities regulation fund under RCW 43.320.130 shall be
transferred and credited to the financial services regulation fund on the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.320.120 (Credit unions examination
fund) and 1993 c 472 s 26 & 1981 c 241 s 2; and

(2) RCW 43.320.130 (Securities regulation
fund) and 1993 c 472 s 27.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---