BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the period
August 19, 2001, through August 25, 2001, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does
not apply to sales of clothing and footwear for human use if the consideration
given or contracted to be given for the clothing or footwear is less than
eighty-five dollars per item, including any charge for alteration, but
exclusive of sales and use taxes and delivery charges.

(2) The exemption under
this section includes fabric, thread, yarn, buttons, snaps, hooks, zippers, and
other items used or consumed to make or repair exempt clothing if the item
becomes a physical component of such clothing.

(3) The exemption under
this section does not apply to costumes or rented formal wear; items made from
real or imitation pearls, precious or semiprecious stones, jewels, or metals;
athletic equipment not suitable for general use; or protective devices such as
motorcycle helmets.

(4) The department may
adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the period
August 19, 2001, through August 25, 2001, the provisions of this chapter do not
apply with respect to the use of clothing and footwear for human use if the
consideration given or contracted to be given for the clothing or footwear is less
than eighty-five dollars per item, including any charge for alteration, but
exclusive of sales and use taxes and delivery charges.

(2) The exemption under
this section includes fabric, thread, yarn, buttons, snaps, hooks, zippers, and
other items used or consumed to make or repair exempt clothing if the item
becomes a physical component of such clothing.

(3) The exemption under
this section does not apply to costumes or rented formal wear; items made from
real or imitation pearls, precious or semiprecious stones, jewels, or metals;
athletic equipment not suitable for general use; or protective devices such as
motorcycle helmets.

(4) The department may
adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---