BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.36.045 and 1987 c
346 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor
shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a security envelope in which to seal
the ballot after voting, a larger envelope in which to return the security
envelope, and instructions on how to mark the ballot and how to return it to
the county auditor. The larger return envelope shall contain a declaration by
the absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he or she
has not voted in any other jurisdiction at this election, together with a
summary of the penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of this
chapter. The return envelope shall provide space for the voter to indicate the
date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath. A
summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter shall be printed
on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space for the voter's
signature. The signature of the voter on the return envelope shall affirm and
attest to the statements regarding the qualifications of that voter and to the
validity of the ballot. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters, the signed declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent
of a voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has
been issued. The voter shall be instructed to either return the ballot to the
county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first class postage,
if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate county auditor ((no
later than the day of the election or primary for which the ballot was issued))
in accordance with the time requirements of RCW 29.36.060.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.36.060 and 1991 c
81 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The opening and
subsequent processing of return identification envelopes for any primary
or election may begin on or after the tenth day prior to such primary or
election. The opening of the security envelopes and tabulation of absentee
ballots shall not commence until after 8:00 ((o'clock)) p.m. on the day
of the primary or election.

After opening the
return identification envelopes, the county canvassing board or its
representative shall place all of the ((ballot)) inner security
envelopes in containers that can be secured with numbered seals. These sealed
containers shall be stored in a secure location until after 8:00 ((o'clock))
p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee ballots that are to be
tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be taken from the inner security
envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to prepare these
ballots for tabulation before sealing the containers.

The canvassing board
shall examine the postmark, statement, and signature on each return identification
envelope containing the security envelope and absentee ballot. ((They))
An absentee ballot may be counted only if the return identification envelope
was signed by the date of the primary or election for which it was issued and
is in the office of the county auditor by 5:00 p.m. on the day after the
primary or election for which it was issued. However, an absentee ballot from
an out-of-state, overseas, or service voter may be counted if it was mailed no
later than the day of the primary or election for which it was issued. The
canvassing board or its representative shall verify that the voter's
signature is the same as that in the registration files for that voter. For ((absentee
voters other than)) out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters, if the postmark is illegible, the date on the return identification
envelope to which the voter attests shall determine the validity, as to the ((time
of voting)) date of mailing, of that absentee ballot under this
chapter. For any absentee voter, a variation between the signature of the
voter on the return envelope and that in the registration files due to the
substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as
the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.36.126 and 1993 c
417 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt of the
mail ballot, the voter shall mark it, sign the return identification envelope
supplied with the ballot, and comply with the instructions provided with the
ballot. The voter may return the marked ballot to the county auditor. The
ballot must be returned in the return identification envelope. ((If)) Whether
mailed or returned otherwise, a ballot must be ((postmarked not later
than the date of the election. Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the
office of the county auditor or the designated place of deposit not later than
8:00 p.m. on the date of the election)) returned in accordance with the
time requirements as provided for an absentee ballot under RCW 29.36.060.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.36.139 and 1993 c
417 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A mail ballot shall
be counted only if it is returned in the return identification envelope, if the
envelope is signed by the registered voter to whom the ballot is issued and
was returned in accordance with the time requirements as provided for an
absentee ballot under RCW 29.36.060, and if the signature is verified as
provided in this subsection. The county auditor shall verify the signature of
each voter on the return identification envelope with the signature on the
voter's registration record. A person who votes or attempts to vote more than
once in a mail ballot election is subject to the penalties provided in chapter
29.85 RCW.

(2) Any
mail ballot may be challenged in the same manner as an absentee ballot.

---
END ---