BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that access to preventive and restorative oral health services by low-income
children is currently restricted by complex regulatory, financial, cultural,
and geographic barriers that have resulted in a large number of children
suffering unnecessarily from dental disease. The legislature also finds that
very early exposure to oral health care can reverse this disease in many cases,
thereby significantly reducing costs of providing dental services to low-income
populations.

It is the intent of the
legislature to address the problem of poor access to oral health care by
providing for school-based sealant programs through the endorsement of dental
hygienists.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A dental hygienist
licensed under this chapter may apply for endorsement by the department of
health as a school sealant endorsed dental hygienist upon completion of the
Washington state sealant guidelines and training as developed or approved by
the department of health. The secretary of health may adopt rules to implement
sections 2 through 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) For low-income,
rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public
health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, dental hygienists who
are school sealant endorsed under section 2 of this act may assess for and
apply sealants in public and private school-based, school-linked sealant
programs.

(2) A dental hygienist
endorsed under section 2 of this act shall refer in writing each sealant
patient to a dentist for follow-up care.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The school sealant
endorsement program will accept applications upon the establishment of the
endorsement course by the secretary, or by July 1, 2002, whichever is sooner.
The secretary of health may impose a fee for implementation of this section and
sections 2 and 3 of this act.

(2) The department of
health shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2005, on the impact of
granting school sealant endorsements to dental hygienists to assess for and
apply sealants in public and private school-based, school-linked sealant
programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 2 through 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 18.29 RCW.

---
END ---