BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.320 and 1999 c
400 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Actual
construction work shall be commenced on any project for which permit has been
granted within such reasonable time as shall be prescribed by the department,
and shall thereafter be prosecuted with diligence and completed within the time
prescribed by the department. The department, in fixing the time for the
commencement of the work, or for the completion thereof and the application of
the water to the beneficial use prescribed in the permit, shall take into
consideration the cost and magnitude of the project and the engineering and
physical features to be encountered, and shall allow such time as shall be
reasonable and just under the conditions then existing, having due regard for
the public welfare and public interests affected. For good cause shown, the
department shall extend the time or times fixed as aforesaid, and shall grant
such further period or periods as may be reasonably necessary, having due
regard to the good faith of the applicant and the public interests affected.
Good cause includes: (1) Prevention or restriction of water use by
operation of federal laws for the time or times fixed for commencing work,
completing work, and applying water to beneficial use otherwise authorized
under a water right permit issued for a federal reclamation project; (2)
water projects directly affected by a state or federally imposed moratorium on
further withdrawals from a water source; and (3) moratoriums placed on
construction projects located on the Columbia river from 1991 through 2000.
For conditions that meet the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this
section, the schedule shall extend for four years from the date the moratorium
was removed. In fixing construction schedules and the time, or extension
of time, for application of water to beneficial use for municipal water supply
purposes, the department shall also take into consideration the term and amount
of financing required to complete the project, delays that may result from
planned and existing conservation and water use efficiency measures implemented
by the public water system, and the supply needs of the public water system's
service area, consistent with an approved comprehensive plan under chapter
36.70A RCW, or in the absence of such a plan, a county-approved comprehensive
plan under chapter 36.70 RCW or a plan approved under chapter 35.63 RCW, and
related water demand projections prepared by public water systems in accordance
with state law. An existing comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A or 36.70
RCW, plan under chapter 35.63 RCW, or demand projection may be used. If the
terms of the permit or extension thereof, are not complied with the department
shall give notice by registered mail that such permit will be canceled unless
the holders thereof shall show cause within sixty days why the same should not
be so canceled. If cause is not shown, the permit shall be canceled.

--- END ---