BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.230.070 and 1994
c 245 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
life-threatening dangers of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) and its
prevention shall be taught in the public schools of this state. AIDS
prevention education shall be limited to the discussion of the life-threatening
dangers of the disease, its spread, and prevention. Students shall receive
such education at least once each school year beginning no later than the fifth
grade.

(2) Each district board
of directors shall adopt an AIDS prevention education program which is
developed in consultation with teachers, administrators, parents, and other
community members including, but not limited to, persons from medical, public
health, and mental health organizations and agencies so long as the curricula
and materials developed for use in the AIDS education program either (a) are
the model curricula and resources under subsection (3) of this section, or (b)
are developed by the school district and approved for medical accuracy by the
office on AIDS established in RCW 70.24.250. If a district elects to use
curricula developed by the school district, the district shall submit to the
office on AIDS a copy of its curricula and an affidavit of medical accuracy
stating that the material in the district-developed curricula has been compared
to the model curricula for medical accuracy and that in the opinion of the
district the district-developed materials are medically accurate. Upon
submission of the affidavit and curricula, the district may use these materials
until the approval procedure to be conducted by the office of AIDS has been
completed.

(3) Model curricula and
other resources available from the superintendent of public instruction may be
reviewed by the school district board of directors, in addition to materials
designed locally, in developing the district's AIDS education program. The
model curricula shall be reviewed for medical accuracy by the office on AIDS
established in RCW 70.24.250 within the department of social and health
services.

(4) Each school
district shall, at least one month before teaching AIDS prevention education in
any classroom, conduct at least one presentation during weekend and evening
hours for the parents and guardians of students concerning the curricula and
materials that will be used for such education. The parents and guardians
shall be notified by the school district of the presentation and that the
curricula and materials are available for inspection. The parents or
guardians may attend the presentation but are not required to attend.

(5) No student may
be required to participate in AIDS prevention education if the student's parent
or guardian, having attended at least one of the district presentations in
the prior three years, objects in writing to the participation.

(((5))) (6)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction with the assistance of
the office on AIDS shall update AIDS education curriculum material as newly
discovered medical facts make it necessary.

(((6))) (7)
The curriculum for AIDS prevention education shall be designed to teach
students which behaviors place a person dangerously at risk of infection with
the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and methods to avoid such risk
including, at least:

(a) The dangers of drug
abuse, especially that involving the use of hypodermic needles; and

(b) The dangers of
sexual intercourse, with or without condoms.

(((7)))
(8) The program of AIDS prevention education shall stress the
life-threatening dangers of contracting AIDS and shall stress that abstinence
from sexual activity is the only certain means for the prevention of the spread
or contraction of the AIDS virus through sexual contact. It shall also teach
that condoms and other artificial means of birth control are not a certain
means of preventing the spread of the AIDS virus and reliance on condoms puts a
person at risk for exposure to the disease.

--- END ---