BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An employee of the
department who is a limited authority Washington peace officer under RCW
10.93.020 may use reasonable force to detain, search, or remove persons who
enter or remain without permission within a correctional facility or
institutional grounds or whenever, upon probable cause, it appears to such
employee that a person has committed or is attempting to commit a crime, or
possesses contraband within a correctional facility or institutional grounds.
Should any person be detained, the department shall immediately notify a local
law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the correctional facility or
institutional grounds of the detainment. The department is authorized to detain
the person for a reasonable time to search the person and confiscate any
contraband, and until custody of the person and any illegal contraband can be
transferred to a law enforcement officer when appropriate. An employee of the
department who is a limited authority Washington peace officer under RCW
10.93.020 may use that force necessary in the protection of persons and
properties located within the confines of the correctional facility or
institutional grounds.

(2) The rights granted
in subsection (1) of this section are in addition to any others that may exist
by law including, but not limited to, the rights granted in RCW 9A.16.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---