BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No child may be
placed or remain in a specific out-of-home placement under this chapter or
chapter 13.34 RCW when there is a conflict of interest on the part of any adult
residing in the home in which the child is to be or has been placed. A
conflict of interest exists when:

(a) There is an adult
in the home who, as a result of: (i) His or her employment; and (ii) an
allegation of abuse or neglect of the child, conducts or has conducted an
investigation of the allegation; or

(b) The child has been,
is, or is likely to be a witness in any pending cause of action against any
adult in the home when the cause includes: (i) An allegation of abuse or
neglect against the child or any sibling of the child; or (ii) a claim of
damages resulting from wrongful interference with the parent-child relationship
of the child and his or her biological or adoptive parent.

(2) For purposes of
this section, "investigation" means the exercise of professional
judgment in the review of allegations of abuse or neglect by: (a) Law
enforcement personnel; (b) persons employed by, or under contract with, the
state; (c) persons licensed to practice law and their employees; and (d) mental
health professionals as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) The prohibition set
forth in subsection (1) of this section may not be waived or deferred by the
department under any circumstance or at the request of any person, regardless
of who has made the request or the length of time of the requested placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When the secretary
has reasonable cause to believe that an employee has knowingly violated the
conflict of interest provisions in section 1 of this act, notwithstanding any
rule adopted under chapter 41.06 RCW, the secretary shall immediately suspend the
employee.

(2) The secretary shall
immediately institute proceedings to terminate the employment of any person who
is found by the department, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, to have
knowingly violated the conflict of interest provisions in section 1 of this
act.

(3) When the secretary
has reasonable cause to believe that the employee of a contractor has knowingly
violated the conflict of interest provisions in section 1 of this act, the
secretary shall require the employee of a contractor to be immediately removed
from any employment position which would permit the employee to make or
influence placement decisions.

(4) The secretary shall
disqualify for employment with a contractor in any position which would permit
the employee to make or influence placement decisions, any person who is found
by the department, based upon a preponderance of evidence, to have knowingly
violated the conflict of interest provisions of section 1 of this act.

(5) The secretary, when
considering the renewal of a contract with a contractor who has taken action
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, shall require the contractor to
demonstrate that there has been significant progress made in reducing the
likelihood that the contractor's employees would knowingly violate the conflict
of interest provisions in section 1 of this act. The secretary shall not renew
a contract unless he or she determines that significant progress has been made.

(6) For
purposes of RCW 50.20.060, a person terminated under this section shall be
considered discharged for misconduct.

---
END ---