BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.12

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 An owner who has made a bona fide sale or transfer of a

_7 vehicle, delivered possession of the vehicle to a
purchaser, and

_8 met all the requirements of RCW 46.12.102 will immediately
have

_9 their name(s) removed from the title and registration of
the

10 vehicle by the department.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5050