BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.96A.100 and 1999
c 42 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless rules of court require
or this title ((requires)) provides otherwise, or unless a court
orders otherwise:

(1) A judicial
proceeding under RCW 11.96A.090 is to be commenced by filing a petition with
the court;

(2) A summons must be
served in accordance with this chapter and, where not inconsistent with these
rules, the procedural rules of court, however, if the proceeding is
commenced as an action incidental to an existing judicial proceeding relating
to the same trust or estate or nonprobate asset, notice must be provided by
summons only with respect to those parties who were not already parties to the
existing judicial proceedings;

(3) The summons need
only contain the following language or substantially similar language:

SUPERIOR
COURT OF WASHINGTON

FOR
(. . .) COUNTY

IN RE
. . . . . . )

) No.
. . .

) Summons

)

TO THE RESPONDENT OR OTHER
INTERESTED PARTY: A petition has been filed in the superior court of
Washington for (. . .) County. Petitioner's claim is stated in the
petition, a copy of which is served upon you with this summons.

In order to defend against
or to object to the petition, you must answer the petition by stating your
defense or objections in writing, and by serving your answer upon the person
signing this summons not later than five days before the date of the hearing on
the petition. Your failure to answer within this time limit might result in a
default judgment being entered against you without further notice. A default
judgment grants the petitioner all that the petitioner seeks under the petition
because you have not filed an answer.

If you wish to seek the
advice of a lawyer, you should do so promptly so that your written answer, if
any, may be served on time.

This summons is issued
under RCW 11.96A.100(3).

(Signed)
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Print or Type
Name

Dated:
. . . . . .

Telephone Number:
. . . . . .

(4) Subject to other
applicable statutes and court rules, the clerk of each of the superior courts
shall fix the time for any hearing on a matter on application by a party, and
no order of the court shall be required to fix the time or to approve the form
or content of the notice of a hearing;

(5) The answer to the
petition and any counterclaims or cross-claims must be served on the parties or
the parties' virtual representatives and filed with the court at least five
days before the date of the hearing, and all replies to the counterclaims and
cross-claims must be served on the parties or the parties' virtual
representatives and filed with the court at least two days before the date of
the hearing;

(6) Proceedings under
this chapter are subject to the mediation and arbitration provisions of this
chapter. Except as specifically provided in RCW 11.96A.310, the provisions of
chapter 7.06 RCW do not apply;

(7) Testimony of
witnesses may be by affidavit;

(8) Unless requested
otherwise by a party in a petition or answer, the initial hearing must be a
hearing on the merits to resolve all issues of fact and all issues of law;

(9) Any party may move
the court for an order relating to a procedural matter, including discovery,
and for summary judgment, in the original petition, answer, response, or reply,
or in a separate motion, or at any other time; and

(10) If the initial
hearing is not a hearing on the merits or does not result in a resolution of
all issues of fact and all issues of law, the court may enter any order it
deems appropriate, which order may (a) resolve such issues as it deems proper,
(b) determine the scope of discovery, and (c) set a schedule for further
proceedings for the prompt resolution of the matter.

Sec. 2. RCW 11.96A.230 and 1999
c 42 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((If a special
representative has not commenced a proceeding for approval of the agreement
under RCW 11.96A.240,)) Any party, or a party's legal
representative, may file the written agreement or a memorandum summarizing the
written agreement with the court having jurisdiction over the estate or trust.
((However,)) The agreement or a memorandum of its terms may ((not))
be filed within thirty days of the agreement's execution by all parties ((without))
only with the written consent of the special representative. ((The
person filing the agreement or memorandum shall within five days of the filing
mail or deliver a copy of the agreement and a notice of the filing to each
party whose address is known. Proof of mailing or delivery of the notice must
be filed with the court.)) The agreement or a memorandum of its terms
may be filed after a special representative has commenced a proceeding under
RCW 11.96A.240 only after the court has determined that the special
representative has adequately represented and protected the parties
represented. Failure to complete any action authorized or required under
this subsection does not cause the written agreement to be ineffective and the
agreement is nonetheless binding and conclusive on all persons interested in
the estate or trust. ((Notice must be in substantially the following form.

CAPTION NOTICE
OF FILING OF

OF CASE AGREEMENT
OR MEMORANDUM

OF
AGREEMENT

Notice is hereby
given that the attached document or a memorandum summarizing its provisions was
filed by the undersigned in the above entitled court on . . .

DATED:
. . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Party
or party's legal representative)))

(2) On filing the
agreement or memorandum, the agreement will be deemed approved by the court and
is equivalent to a final court order binding on all persons interested in the
estate or trust.

(((3) If all parties
or their virtual representatives waive the notice required by this section, the
agreement will be deemed approved by the court and is equivalent to a final
court order binding on all persons interested in the estate or trust effective upon
the date of filing.))

Sec. 3. RCW 11.96A.250 and 1999
c 42 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The personal
representative or trustee may petition the court having jurisdiction over the
matter for the appointment of a special representative to represent a person
who is interested in the estate or trust and: (i) Who is a minor; (ii) who is
incompetent or disabled; (iii) who is yet unborn or unascertained; or (iv)
whose identity or address is unknown. The petition may be heard by the court
without notice.

(b) In appointing
the special representative the court shall give due consideration and deference
to any nomination(s) made in the petition, the special skills required in the
representation, and the need for a representative who will act independently
and prudently. The nomination of a person as special representative by the
personal representative or trustee and the person's willingness to serve as
special representative are not grounds by themselves for finding a lack of
independence, however, the court may consider any interests that the nominating
fiduciary may have in the estate or trust in making the determination.

(c) The special
representative may enter into a binding agreement on behalf of the person or
beneficiary. The special representative may be appointed for more than one
person or class of persons if the interests of such persons or class are not in
conflict. The petition shall be verified. The petition and order
appointing the special representative may be in the following form:

CAPTION PETITION
FOR APPOINTMENT

OF CASE OF
SPECIAL REPRESENTATIVE

UNDER
RCW 11.96A.250

The undersigned
petitioner petitions the court for the appointment of a special representative
in accordance with RCW 11.96A.250 and shows the court as follows:

1. Petitioner.
Petitioner . . . is the qualified and presently acting (personal
representative) (trustee) of the above (estate) (trust) having been named
(personal representative) (trustee) under (describe will and reference probate
order or describe trust instrument).

2. Issue Concerning
(Estate) (Trust) Administration. A question concerning administration of the
(estate) (trust) has arisen as to (describe issue, for example: Related to
interpretation, construction, administration, distribution). The issues are
appropriate for determination under RCW 11.96A.250.

3. Beneficiaries. The
beneficiaries of the (estate) (trust) include persons who are unborn, unknown,
or unascertained persons, or who are under eighteen years of age.

4. Special
Representative. The nominated special representative . . . is a
lawyer licensed to practice before the courts of this state or an individual
with special skill or training in the administration of estates or trusts. The
nominated special representative does not have an interest in the affected
estate or trust and is not related to any person interested in the estate or
trust. The nominated special representative is willing to serve. The
petitioner has no reason to believe that the nominated special representative
will not act in an independent and prudent manner and in the best interests of
the represented parties. (It is recommended that the petitioner also include
information specifying the particular skills of the nominated special
representative that relate to the matter in issue.)

5. Resolution.
Petitioner desires to achieve a resolution of the questions that have arisen
concerning the (estate) (trust). Petitioner believes that proceeding in
accordance with the procedures permitted under RCW 11.96A.210 through
11.96A.250 would be in the best interests of the (estate) (trust) and the
beneficiaries.

((5.)) 6.
Request of Court. Petitioner requests that . . ., . . . an
attorney licensed to practice in the State of Washington.

(OR)

. . . .
an individual with special skill or training in the administration of estates
or trusts

be appointed special representative
for those beneficiaries who are not yet adults, as well as for the unborn,
unknown, and unascertained beneficiaries, as provided under RCW 11.96A.250.

DATED this
. . . day of . . . . ., . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Petitioner
or petitioner's

legal
representative)

VERIFICATION

I certify under
penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of Washington that the foregoing
is true and correct.

DATED
. . . . . ., 2000, at
. . . . . ., Washington.

. . . . . . . . .

(Petitioner
or other person

having
knowledge)

CAPTION ORDER
FOR APPOINTMENT

OF CASE OF
SPECIAL REPRESENTATIVE

THIS MATTER having come
on for hearing before this Court on Petition for Appointment of Special
Representative filed herein, and it appearing that it would be in the best
interests of the (estate) (trust) described in the Petition to appoint a
special representative to address the issues that have arisen concerning the
(estate) (trust) and the Court finding that the facts stated in the Petition
are true, now, therefore,

IT IS ORDERED that
. . . is appointed under RCW 11.96A.250 as special representative for
the (estate) (trust) beneficiaries who are not yet adult age, and for unborn,
unknown, or unascertained beneficiaries to represent their respective interests
in the (estate) (trust) as provided in RCW 11.96A.250. The special
representative shall be discharged of responsibility with respect to the
(estate) (trust) at such time as a written agreement is executed resolving the
present issues, all as provided in that statute, or if an agreement is not
reached within six months from entry of this Order, the special representative
appointed under this Order shall be discharged of responsibility, subject to
subsequent reappointment under RCW 11.96A.250.

DONE IN OPEN COURT this
. . . day of . . . . ., . . . .

. . . . . .
. . . . . . . . .

JUDGE/COURT
COMMISSIONER

(2) Upon appointment
by the court, the special representative shall file a certification made under
penalty of perjury in accordance with RCW 9A.72.085 that he or she (a) is not
interested in the estate or trust; (b) is not related to any person interested
in the estate or trust; (c) is willing to serve; and (d) will act
independently, prudently, and in the best interests of the represented parties.

(3) The special
representative must be a lawyer licensed to practice before the courts of this
state or an individual with special skill or training in the administration of
estates or trusts. The special representative may not have an interest in the
affected estate or trust, and may not be related to a person interested in the
estate or trust. The special representative is entitled to reasonable
compensation for services that must be paid from the principal of the estate or
trust whose beneficiaries are represented.

(((3))) (4)
The special representative shall be discharged from any responsibility and
shall have no further duties with respect to the estate or trust or with
respect to any person interested in the estate or trust, on the earlier of:
(a) The expiration of six months from the date the special representative was
appointed unless the order appointing the special representative provides
otherwise, or (b) the execution of the written agreement by all parties or
their virtual representatives. Any action against a special representative
must be brought within the time limits provided by RCW 11.96A.070(3)(c)(i).

Sec. 4. RCW 11.96A.300 and 1999
c 42 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notice of
mediation. A party may cause the matter to be subject to mediation by service
of written notice of mediation on all parties or the parties' virtual
representatives as follows:

(a) If no hearing has
been set. If no hearing on the matter has been set, by serving notice in
substantially the following form before any petition setting a hearing on the
matter is filed with the court:

NOTICE OF
MEDIATION UNDER RCW 11.96A.300

To: (Parties)

Notice is
hereby given that the following matter shall be resolved by mediation under RCW
11.96A.300:

(State nature
of matter)

This matter must be
resolved using the mediation procedures of RCW 11.96A.300 unless a petition
objecting to mediation is filed with the superior court within twenty days of
service of this notice. If a petition objecting to mediation is not filed
within the twenty-day period, RCW 11.96A.300(4) requires you to furnish to all
other parties or their virtual representatives a list of acceptable mediators
within thirty days of your receipt of this notice.

(Optional: Our list of
acceptable mediators is as follows:)

DATED:
. . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Party
or party's legal representative)

(b) If a hearing has
been set. If a hearing on the matter has been set, by filing and serving
notice in substantially the following form at least three days prior to the
hearing that has been set on the matter:

NOTICE OF MEDIATION
UNDER RCW 11.96A.300

To: (Parties)

Notice is hereby given that
the following matter shall be resolved by mediation under RCW 11.96A.300:

(State nature of matter)

This matter must be
resolved using the mediation procedures of RCW 11.96A.300 unless the court
determines at the hearing set for . . . o'clock on
. . . . . , (identify place of already set hearing),
that mediation shall not apply pursuant to RCW 11.96A.300(3). If the court
determines that mediation shall not apply, the court may decide the matter at
the hearing, require arbitration, or direct other judicial proceedings.

(Optional: Our list of
acceptable mediators is as follows:)

DATED:
. . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Party
or party's legal representative)

(2) Procedure when
notice of mediation served before a hearing is set. The following provisions
apply when notice of mediation is served before a hearing on the matter is set:

(a) The written notice
required in subsection (1)(a) of this section may be served at any time without
leave of the court.

(b) Any party may
object to a notice of mediation under subsection (1)(a) of this section by
filing a petition with the superior court and serving the petition on all
parties or the parties' virtual representatives. The party objecting to notice
of mediation under subsection (1)(a) of this section must file and serve the
petition objecting to mediation no later than twenty days after receipt of the
written notice of mediation. The petition may include a request for
determination of matters subject to judicial resolution under RCW 11.96A.080
through 11.96A.200, and may also request that the matters in issue be decided
at the hearing.

(c) The hearing on the
petition objecting to mediation must be heard no later than twenty days after
the filing of that petition.

(d) The party objecting
to mediation must give notice of the hearing to all other parties at least ten
days before the hearing and must include a copy of the petition.

At the hearing, the court
shall order that mediation proceed except for good cause shown. Such order
shall not be subject to appeal or revision. If the court determines that the
matter should not be subject to mediation, the court shall dispose of the matter
by: (i) Deciding the matter at that hearing, but only if the petition
objecting to mediation contains a request for that relief, (ii) requiring
arbitration, or (iii) directing other judicial proceedings.

(3) Procedure when
notice of mediation served after hearing set. If the written notice of
mediation required in subsection (1)(b) of this section is timely filed and
served by a party and another party objects to mediation, by petition or orally
at the hearing, the court shall order that mediation proceed except for good
cause shown. Such order shall not be subject to appeal or revision. If the
court determines that the matter should not be subject to mediation, the court
shall dispose of the matter by: (a) Deciding the matter at that hearing, (b)
requiring arbitration, or (c) directing other judicial proceedings.

(4) Selection of
mediator; mediator qualifications.

(a) If a petition
objecting to mediation is not filed as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, or if a court determines that mediation shall apply, each party shall,
within thirty days of receipt of the initial notice or within twenty days after
the court determination, whichever is later, furnish all other parties or the
parties' virtual representatives a list of qualified and acceptable mediators.
If the parties cannot agree on a mediator within ten days after the list is
required to be furnished, a party may petition the court to appoint a
mediator. All parties may submit a list of qualified and acceptable mediators
to the court no later than the date on which the hearing on the petition is to
be held. At the hearing the court shall select a qualified mediator from lists
of acceptable mediators provided by the parties.

(b) A qualified
mediator must be: (i) An attorney licensed to practice before the courts of
this state having at least five years of experience in estate and trust
matters, (ii) an individual, who may be an attorney, with special skill or
training in the administration of trusts and estates, or (iii) an individual,
who may be an attorney, with special skill or training as a mediator. The
mediator may not have an interest in an affected estate, trust, or nonprobate
asset, and may not be related to a party.

(5) Date for
mediation. Upon designation of a mediator by the parties or court appointment
of a mediator, the mediator and the parties or the parties' virtual
representatives shall establish a date for the mediation. If a date cannot be
agreed upon within ten days of the designation or appointment of the mediator,
a party may petition the court to set a date for the mediation session.

(6) Duration of
mediation. The mediation must last at least three hours unless the matter is
earlier resolved.

(7) Mediation
agreement. A resolution of the matter that is the subject of the mediation
must be evidenced by a nonjudicial dispute resolution agreement under RCW ((11.96A.090))
11.96A.220.

(8) Costs of
mediation. Costs of the mediation, including reasonable compensation for the
mediator's services, shall be borne equally by the parties. The details of
those costs and fees, including the compensation of the mediator, must be set
forth in a mediation agreement between the mediator and all parties to the
matter. Each party shall bear its own costs and expenses, including legal fees
and witness expenses, in connection with the mediation proceeding: (a) Except
as may occur otherwise as provided in RCW 11.96A.320, or (b) unless the matter
is not resolved by mediation and the arbitrator or court finally resolving the matter
directs otherwise.

Sec. 5. RCW 11.96A.310 and 1999
c 42 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When arbitration
available. Arbitration under RCW 11.96A.260 through 11.96A.320 is available
only if:

(a) A party has first
petitioned for mediation under RCW 11.96A.300 and such mediation has been
concluded;

(b) The court has
determined that mediation under RCW 11.96A.300 is not required and has not
ordered that the matter be disposed of in some other manner;

(c) All of the parties
or the parties' virtual representatives have agreed not to use the mediation
procedures of RCW 11.96A.300; or

(d) The court has
ordered that the matter must be submitted to arbitration.

(2) Commencement of
arbitration. Arbitration must be commenced as follows:

(a) If the matter is
not settled through mediation under RCW 11.96A.300, or the court orders that
mediation is not required, a party may commence arbitration by serving written
notice of arbitration on all other parties or the parties' virtual
representatives. The notice must be served no later than twenty days after the
later of the conclusion of the mediation procedure, if any, or twenty days
after entry of the order providing that mediation is not required. If
arbitration is ordered by the court under RCW 11.96A.300(3), arbitration must
proceed in accordance with the order.

(b) If the parties or
the parties' virtual representatives agree that mediation does not apply and
have not agreed to another procedure for resolving the matter, a party may
commence arbitration without leave of the court by serving written notice of
arbitration on all other parties or the parties' virtual representatives at any
time before or at the initial judicial hearing on the matter. After the initial
judicial hearing on the matter, the written notice required in subsection (1)
of this section may only be served with leave of the court.

Any notice required by
this section must be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF ARBITRATION
UNDER RCW 11.96A.310

To: (Parties)

Notice is hereby given that
the following matter must be resolved by arbitration under RCW 11.96A.310:

(State nature of matter)

The matter must be resolved
using the arbitration procedures of RCW 11.96A.310 unless a petition objecting
to arbitration is filed with the superior court within twenty days of receipt
of this notice. If a petition objecting to arbitration is not filed within the
twenty-day period, RCW 11.96A.310 requires you to furnish to all other parties
or the parties' virtual representatives a list of acceptable ((mediators))
arbitrators within thirty days of your receipt of this notice.

(Optional: Our list of
acceptable arbitrators is as follows:)

DATED:
. . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Party
or party's legal representative)

(3) Objection to
arbitration. A party may object to arbitration by filing a petition with the
superior court and serving the petition on all parties or the parties' virtual
representatives. The objection to arbitration may be filed at any time unless
a written notice of arbitration has been served, in which case the objection to
arbitration must be filed and served no later than twenty days after receipt of
the written notice of arbitration. The hearing on the objection to arbitration
must be heard no later than twenty days after the filing of that petition. The
party objecting to arbitration must give notice of the hearing to all parties
at least ten days before the hearing and shall include a copy of the petition.
At the hearing, the court shall order that arbitration proceed except for good
cause shown. Such order shall not be subject to appeal or revision. If the
court determines that the matter should not be subject to arbitration, the
court shall dispose of the matter by: (a) Deciding the matter at that hearing,
but only if the petition objecting to arbitration contains a request for such
relief; or (b) directing other judicial proceedings.

(4) Selection of
arbitrator; qualifications of arbitrator.

(a) If a petition
objecting to arbitration is not filed as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, or if a court determines that arbitration must apply, each party
shall, within thirty days of receipt of the initial notice or within twenty
days after the court determination, whichever is later, furnish all other
parties or the parties' virtual representatives a list of acceptable
arbitrators. If the parties cannot agree on an arbitrator within ten days
after the list is required to be furnished, a party may petition the court to
appoint an arbitrator. All parties may submit a list of qualified and
acceptable arbitrators to the court no later than the date on which the hearing
on the petition is to be held. At the hearing the court shall select a
qualified arbitrator from lists of acceptable arbitrators provided by the
parties.

(b) A qualified
arbitrator must be an attorney licensed to practice before the courts of this
state having at least five years of experience in trust or estate matters or
five years of experience in litigation or other formal dispute resolution
involving trusts or estates, or an individual, who may be an attorney, with
special skill or training with respect to the matter. The arbitrator may be the
same person selected and used as a mediator under the mediation procedures of
RCW 11.96A.300.

(5) Arbitration rules.
Arbitration must be under chapter 7.06 RCW, mandatory arbitration of civil
actions, as follows:

(a) Chapter 7.06 RCW,
the superior court mandatory arbitration rules adopted by the supreme court,
and any local rules for mandatory arbitration adopted by the superior court
apply to this title. If the superior court has not adopted chapter 7.06 RCW, then
the local rules for mandatory arbitration applicable in King county apply,
except all the duties of the director of arbitration must be performed by the
presiding judge of the superior court.

(b) If a party has
already filed a petition with the court with respect to the matter that will be
the subject of the arbitration proceedings, then all other parties to the
arbitration proceedings who have not yet filed a reply thereto must file a
reply with the arbitrator within ten days of the date on which the arbitrator
is selected or appointed.

(c) The arbitration
provisions of this subsection apply to all matters in dispute. The dollar
limits and restrictions to monetary damages of RCW 7.06.020 do not apply to
arbitrations under this subsection. To the extent any provision in this title
is inconsistent with chapter 7.06 RCW or the rules referenced in (a) of this
subsection, the provisions of this title control.

(d) The compensation of
the arbitrator must be set by written agreement between the parties and the
arbitrator. The arbitrator must be compensated at the arbitrator's stated rate
of compensation for acting as an arbitrator of disputes in trusts, estates, and
nonprobate matters unless the parties or the parties' virtual representatives
agree otherwise.

(e) Unless directed
otherwise by the arbitrator in accord with subsection (6) of this section or
RCW 11.96A.320, or unless the matter is not resolved by arbitration and the
court finally resolving the matter directs otherwise:

(i) Costs of the
arbitration, including compensation for the arbitrator's services, must be
borne equally by the parties participating in the arbitration, with the details
of those costs and fees to be set forth in an arbitration agreement between the
arbitrator and all parties to the matter; and

(ii) A party shall bear
its own costs and expenses, including legal fees and witness expenses, in
connection with the arbitration proceeding.

(f) The arbitrator and
the parties shall execute a written agreement setting forth the terms of the
arbitration and the process to be followed. This agreement must also contain
the fee agreement provided in (d) of this subsection. A dispute as to this
agreement must be resolved by the director of arbitration.

(g) The rules of
evidence and discovery applicable to civil causes of action before the superior
court as defined in RCW 11.96A.290 apply, unless the parties have agreed
otherwise or the arbitrator rules otherwise.

(6) Costs of
arbitration. The arbitrator may order costs, including reasonable attorneys'
fees and expert witness fees, to be paid by any party to the proceedings as
justice may require.

(7) Decision of
arbitrator. The arbitrator shall issue a final decision in writing within
thirty days of the conclusion of the final arbitration hearing. ((The final
decision may be appealed by filing a notice of appeal with the superior court
within thirty days of the issuance of the written decision in the arbitration
proceeding. If an appeal is not filed as provided in this section, the arbitration
decision is conclusive and binding on all parties.)) Promptly after the
issuance of the decision, the arbitrator shall serve each of the parties to the
proceedings with a copy of the written arbitration decision. Proof of service
shall be filed with the court. Service shall be made in conformity with CR
5(b) of the rules for superior court.

(8) Arbitration
decision may be filed with the court((; appeal)). The
arbitrator or any party to the arbitration may file the arbitrator's
decision with the clerk of the superior court((, together with proof of
service thereof on the parties. Within twenty days after such filing, any
aggrieved party may file with the clerk a written notice of appeal and request
for a trial de novo in the superior court on all issues of law and fact. Such
trial de novo shall thereupon be held, including a right to jury, if demanded.

If no appeal has
been filed at the expiration of twenty days following filing of the
arbitrator's decision and award, a judgment shall be entered and may be
presented to the court by any party, on notice, which judgment when entered
shall have the same force and effect as judgments in civil actions)) at any time after its issuance. Notice of
such filing shall be promptly given to each party to the arbitration
proceedings.

(9) Appeal. (a) The
final decision of the arbitrator may be appealed by filing a notice of appeal
with the superior court requesting a trial de novo on all issues of law and
fact. The notice of appeal must be filed within thirty days after the date on
which the decision was served on the party filing the notice of appeal. A
trial de novo shall then be held, including a right to jury, if demanded.

(b) If an appeal is
not filed within the time provided in (a) of this subsection, the arbitration
decision is conclusive and binding on all parties. If the arbitrator's
decision has been filed with the clerk of the superior court, a judgment shall
be entered and may be presented to the court by any party on ten days' prior
notice. The judgment when entered shall have the same force and effect as
judgments in civil actions.

(10)
Costs on appeal of arbitration decision. The prevailing party in any such de
novo superior court decision after an arbitration result must be awarded costs,
including expert witness fees and attorneys' fees, in connection with the
judicial resolution of the matter. Such costs shall be charged against the
nonprevailing parties in such amount and in such manner as the court determines
to be equitable. The provisions of this subsection take precedence over the
provisions of RCW 11.96A.150 or any other similar provision.

---
END ---