BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.40.081 and 1987 c
444 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

DEFENSES, LIABILITY, AND PROTECTION OF
TRANSFEREE. (a) A transfer or obligation is not voidable
under RCW 19.40.041(a)(1) against a person who took in good faith and for a
reasonably equivalent value or against any subsequent transferee or obligee.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, to the extent a transfer is voidable in an action by
a creditor under RCW 19.40.071(a)(1), the creditor may recover judgment for the
value of the asset transferred, as adjusted under subsection (c) of this
section, or the amount necessary to satisfy the creditor's claim, whichever is
less. The judgment may be entered against:

(1) The first
transferee of the asset or the person for whose benefit the transfer was made;
or

(2) Any subsequent
transferee other than a good-faith transferee or obligee who took for value or
from any subsequent transferee or obligee.

(c) If the judgment
under subsection (b) of this section is based upon the value of the asset
transferred, the judgment must be for an amount equal to the value of the asset
at the time of the transfer, subject to adjustment as the equities may require.

(d) Notwithstanding
voidability of a transfer or an obligation under this chapter, a good-faith
transferee or obligee is entitled, to the extent of the value given the debtor
for the transfer or obligation, to:

(1) A lien on or a
right to retain any interest in the asset transferred;

(2) Enforcement of any
obligation incurred; or

(3) A reduction in the
amount of the liability on the judgment.

(e) A transfer is not
voidable under RCW 19.40.041(a)(2) or 19.40.051 if the transfer results from:

(1) Termination of a
lease upon default by the debtor when the termination is pursuant to the lease
and applicable law; or

(2) Enforcement of a
security interest in compliance with Article ((9)) 9A of Title
62A RCW.

(f) A transfer is not
voidable under RCW 19.40.051(b):

(1) To the extent the
insider gave new value to or for the benefit of the debtor after the transfer
was made unless the new value was secured by a valid lien;

(2) If made in the
ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the debtor and the insider;
or

(3) If made pursuant to
a good-faith effort to rehabilitate the debtor and the transfer secured present
value given for that purpose as well as an antecedent debt of the debtor.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.163.130 and 1998
c 48 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

NONRECOURSE REVENUE
BONDS‑-ISSUANCE. (1) The authority may issue its nonrecourse revenue
bonds in order to obtain the funds to carry out the programs authorized in this
chapter. The bonds shall be special obligations of the authority, payable
solely out of the special fund or funds established by the authority for their
repayment.

(2) Any bonds issued
under this chapter may be secured by a financing document between the authority
and the purchasers or owners of such bonds or between the authority and a
corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of
a trust company within or without the state.

(a) The financing
document may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and funds held
or to be received by the authority, any present or future contract or other
rights to receive the same, and the proceeds thereof.

(b) The financing
document may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights,
security, and remedies of bondowners as may be reasonable and proper,
including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions
defining defaults and providing for remedies in the event of default which may
include the acceleration of maturities, restrictions on the individual rights
of action by bondowners, and covenants setting forth duties of and limitations
on the authority in conduct of its programs and the management of its property.

(c) In addition to
other security provided in this chapter or otherwise by law, bonds issued by
the authority may be secured, in whole or in part, by financial guaranties, by
insurance or by letters of credit issued to the authority or a trustee or any
other person, by any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company or other
financial institution, within or without the state. The authority may pledge
or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and funds held or to be received
by the authority, any present or future contract or other rights to receive the
same, and the proceeds thereof, as security for such guaranties or insurance or
for the reimbursement by the authority to any issuer of such letter of credit
of any payments made under such letter of credit.

(3) Without limiting
the powers of the authority contained in this chapter, in connection with each
issue of its obligation bonds, the authority shall create and establish one or
more special funds, including, but not limited to debt service and sinking
funds, reserve funds, project funds, and such other special funds as the
authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient.

(4) Any security
interest created against the unexpended bond proceeds and against the special
funds created by the authority shall be immediately valid and binding against
the money and any securities in which the money may be invested without
authority or trustee possession. The security interest shall be prior to any
party having any competing claim against the moneys or securities, without
filing or recording under Article ((9)) 9A of the Uniform
Commercial Code, Title 62A RCW, and regardless of whether the party has notice
of the security interest.

(5) The bonds may be
issued as serial bonds, term bonds or any other type of bond instrument
consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The bonds shall bear such date
or dates; mature at such time or times; bear interest at such rate or rates,
either fixed or variable; be payable at such time or times; be in such
denominations; be in such form; bear such privileges of transferability,
exchangeability, and interchangeability; be subject to such terms of redemption;
and be sold at public or private sale, in such manner, at such time or times,
and at such price or prices as the authority shall determine. The bonds shall
be executed by the manual or facsimile signatures of the authority's chair and
either its secretary or executive director, and may be authenticated by the
trustee (if the authority determines to use a trustee) or any registrar which
may be designated for the bonds by the authority.

(6) Bonds may be issued
by the authority to refund other outstanding authority bonds, at or prior to
maturity of, and to pay any redemption premium on, the outstanding bonds.
Bonds issued for refunding purposes may be combined with bonds issued for the
financing or refinancing of new projects. Pending the application of the
proceeds of the refunding bonds to the redemption of the bonds to be redeemed,
the authority may enter into an agreement or agreements with a corporate
trustee regarding the interim investment of the proceeds and the application of
the proceeds and the earnings on the proceeds to the payment of the principal
of and interest on, and the redemption of, the bonds to be redeemed.

(7) The bonds of the
authority may be negotiable instruments under Title 62A RCW.

(8) Neither the members
of the authority, nor its employees or agents, nor any person executing the
bonds shall be personally liable on the bonds or be subject to any personal
liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

(9) The authority may
purchase its bonds with any of its funds available for the purchase. The
authority may hold, pledge, cancel or resell the bonds subject to and in
accordance with agreements with bondowners.

(10) The authority
shall not exceed five hundred million dollars in total outstanding debt at any
time.

(11) The state finance
committee shall be notified in advance of the issuance of bonds by the
authority in order to promote the orderly offering of obligations in the
financial markets.

(12) The authority may
not issue any bonds after June 30, 2004.

Sec. 3. RCW 60.10.010 and 1969 c
82 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS. As used
in this chapter:

(1) The term "lien
debtor" means the person who is obligated, owes payment or other
performance. Where the lien debtor and the owner of the collateral are not the
same person, the term "lien debtor" means the owner of the
collateral.

(2)
"Collateral" means the property subject to a statutory lien.

(3) "Lien
holder" means a person who, by statute, has acquired a lien on the
property of the lien debtor, or such person's successor in interest.

(4) "Secured
party" has the same meaning as used in Article ((9)) 9A of
the Uniform Commercial Code (Title 62A RCW).

Sec. 4. RCW 60.11.030 and 2000 c
250 s 9A-826 are each amended to read as follows:

ATTACHMENT AND
EFFECTIVENESS OF LIEN ON CROPS AND PROCEEDS‑-FILING. (1) Upon the later
of both: (a) Execution of the lease or other agreement, or commencement of
delivery of such supplies, and/or of provision of such services giving rise to
the crop lien; and (b) filing a financing statement as required by RCW
62A.9A-310 and subsection (3) of this section, the crop liens described in RCW
60.11.020 (1) and (2) shall become effective and attach to the subject crop for
all sums then and thereafter due and owing the lien holder under this chapter,
and those liens shall continue in all identifiable cash proceeds of the crop.

(2) Upon the delivery
of an orchard crop by the lien debtor or another handler to a handler without
the necessity of filing, the crop lien described in RCW 60.11.020(3) shall
become effective and attach to and be perfected in the delivered orchard crop
for all sums then and thereafter due and owing the lien holder under this
chapter, and the lien shall continue and be perfected in all proceeds of the
orchard crop. ((Upon filing a financing statement as required by RCW 62A.9A‑310
and subsection (3) of this section, an effective crop lien described in RCW
60.11.020(3) that has attached to the delivered orchard crop shall be
perfected.))

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 60.11.040(4) with respect to the lien of a landlord, and except for the
lien of a handler on orchard crops as provided in RCW 60.11.020(3), the lien
holder must file the required financing statement during the period after the
commencement of delivery of such supplies and/or of provision of such services,
but before the completion of the harvest of the crops for which the lien is
claimed, or in the case of a lien for furnishing work or labor, before the end
of the fortieth day after the cessation of the work or labor for which the lien
is claimed. If the lien holder under the crop liens described in RCW 60.11.020
(1) or (2) is to be allowed costs, disbursements, and attorneys' fees, the lien
holder must also mail a copy of such financing statement to the last known
address of the debtor by certified mail, return receipt requested, within ten
days after filing the financing statement.

Sec. 5. RCW 60.11.904 and 2000 c
250 s 9A-835 are each amended to read as follows:

All statements filed
with the department of licensing under this chapter ((prior to)) before
July 1, 2001, shall satisfy the requirements of RCW 62A.9A-310 and 60.11.030
for filing a financing statement ((for up to five years from the date they
were originally filed if and so long as they are found and reported in a search
of financing statements performed by the department of licensing)).

Sec. 6. RCW 60.13.040 and 1987 c
189 s 7 and 1987 c 148 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A producer or
commercial fisherman claiming a processor or preparer lien may file a statement
evidencing the lien with the department of licensing after payment from the
processor, conditioner, or preparer to the producer or fisherman is due and
remains unpaid. For purposes of this subsection and RCW 60.13.050, payment is
due on the date specified in the contract, or if not specified, then within
thirty days from time of delivery.

(2) The statement shall
be in ((writing, verified)) a record, authenticated by the
producer or fisherman, and shall contain in substance the following
information:

(a) A true statement of
the amount demanded after deducting all credits and offsets;

(b) The name of the
processor, conditioner, or preparer who received the agricultural product or
fish to be charged with the lien;

(c) A description
sufficient to identify the agricultural product or fish to be charged with the
lien;

(d) A statement that
the amount claimed is a true and bona fide existing debt as of the date of the
filing of the notice evidencing the lien;

(e) The date on which
payment was due for the agricultural product or fish to be charged with the
lien; and

(f) The department of
licensing may by rule prescribe standard filing forms, fees, and uniform
procedures for filing with, and obtaining information from, filing officers.

Sec. 7. RCW 60.56.015 and 1993 c
53 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

An agister who holds a
lien under RCW 60.56.010 shall perfect the lien by (1) posting notice of the
lien in a conspicuous location on the premises where the lien holder is keeping
the animal or animals, (2) providing a copy of the posted notice to the owner
of the animal or animals, and (3) providing a copy of the posted notice to any
lien creditor as defined in RCW ((62A.9-301(3))) 62A.9A-102(52)
if the amount of the agister lien is in excess of one thousand five hundred
dollars. A lien creditor may be determined through a search under RCW ((62A.9-409))
62A.9A-523 and 62A.9A-526. The lien holder is entitled to collect from
the buyer, the seller, or the person selling on a commission basis if there is
a failure to make payment to the perfected lien holder.

Sec. 8. RCW 62A.1-105 and 2000 c
250 s 9A-801 are each amended to read as follows:

TERRITORIAL APPLICATION
OF THE TITLE; PARTIES' POWER TO CHOOSE APPLICABLE LAW. (1) Except as provided
hereafter in this section, when a transaction bears a reasonable relation to
this state and also to another state or nation the parties may agree that the
law either of this state or of such other state or nation shall govern their
rights and duties. Failing such agreement this Title applies to transactions
bearing an appropriate relation to this state.

(2) Where one of the
following provisions of this Title specifies the applicable law, that provision
governs and a contrary agreement is effective only to the extent permitted by
the law (including the conflict of laws rules) so specified:

Rights of creditors
against sold goods. RCW 62A.2-402.

Applicability of the
Article on Leases. RCW 62A.2A-105 and 62A.2A‑106.

Applicability of the
Article on Bank Deposits and Collections. RCW 62A.4-102.

Governing law in the
Article on Funds Transfers. RCW 62A.4A‑507.

Letters of Credit. RCW
62A.5-116.

Applicability of the
Article on Investment Securities. RCW 62A.8‑110.

Law governing
perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of
security interests and agricultural liens. RCW 62A.9A‑301 through
62A.9A‑307.

Sec. 9. RCW 62A.1-201 and 2000 c
250 s 9A-802 are each amended to read as follows:

GENERAL DEFINITIONS.
Subject to additional definitions contained in the subsequent Articles of this
Title which are applicable to specific Articles or Parts thereof, and unless the
context otherwise requires, in this Title:

(1) "Action"
in the sense of a judicial proceeding includes recoupment, counterclaim,
set-off, suit in equity and any other proceedings in which rights are
determined.

(2) "Aggrieved
party" means a party entitled to resort to a remedy.

(3)
"Agreement" means the bargain of the parties in fact as found in
their language or by implication from other circumstances including course of
dealing or usage of trade or course of performance as provided in this Title (RCW
62A.1-205, RCW 62A.2-208, and RCW 62A.2A‑207). Whether an agreement has
legal consequences is determined by the provisions of this Title, if
applicable; otherwise by the law of contracts (RCW 62A.1-103). (Compare
"Contract".)

(4) "Bank"
means any person engaged in the business of banking.

(5) "Bearer"
means the person in possession of an instrument, document of title, or
certificated security payable to bearer or indorsed in blank.

(6) "Bill of
lading" means a document evidencing the receipt of goods for shipment
issued by a person engaged in the business of transporting or forwarding goods,
and includes an airbill. "Airbill" means a document serving for air
transportation as a bill of lading does for marine or rail transportation, and
includes an air consignment note or air waybill.

(7) "Branch"
includes a separately incorporated foreign branch of a bank.

(8) "Burden of
establishing" a fact means the burden of persuading the triers of fact
that the existence of the fact is more probable than its non-existence.

(9) "Buyer in
ordinary course of business" means a person that buys goods in good faith,
without knowledge that the sale violates the rights of another person in the
goods, and in the ordinary course from a person, other than a pawnbroker, in
the business of selling goods of that kind. A person buys goods in the
ordinary course if the sale to the person comports with the usual or customary
practices in the kind of business in which the seller is engaged or with the
seller's own usual or customary practices. A person that sells oil, gas, or
other minerals at the wellhead or minehead is a person in the business of
selling goods of that kind. A buyer in ordinary course of business may buy for
cash, by exchange of other property, or on secured or unsecured credit, and may
acquire goods or documents of title under a pre-existing contract for sale.
Only a buyer that takes possession of the goods or has a right to recover the
goods from the seller under Article 62A.2 RCW may be a buyer in ordinary course
of business. A person that acquires goods in a transfer in bulk or as security
for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt is not a buyer in
ordinary course of business.

(10)
"Conspicuous": A term or clause is conspicuous when it is so written
that a reasonable person against whom it is to operate ought to have noticed
it. A printed heading in capitals (as: NON-NEGOTIABLE BILL OF LADING) is
conspicuous. Language in the body of a form is "conspicuous" if it
is in larger or other contrasting type or color. But in a telegram any stated
term is "conspicuous". Whether a term or clause is
"conspicuous" or not is for decision by the court.

(11)
"Contract" means the total legal obligation which results from the
parties' agreement as affected by this Title and any other applicable rules of
law. (Compare "Agreement".)

(12)
"Creditor" includes a general creditor, a secured creditor, a lien
creditor and any representative of creditors, including an assignee for the
benefit of creditors, a trustee in bankruptcy, a receiver in equity and an
executor or administrator of an insolvent debtor's or assignor's estate.

(13)
"Defendant" includes a person in the position of defendant in a
cross-action or counterclaim.

(14)
"Delivery" with respect to instruments, documents of title, chattel
paper, or certificated securities means voluntary transfer of possession.

(15) "Document of
title" includes bill of lading, dock warrant, dock receipt, warehouse
receipt or order for the delivery of goods, and also any other document which
in the regular course of business or financing is treated as adequately
evidencing that the person in possession of it is entitled to receive, hold and
dispose of the document and the goods it covers. To be a document of title a document
must purport to be issued by or addressed to a bailee and purport to cover
goods in the bailee's possession which are either identified or are fungible
portions of an identified mass.

(16) "Fault"
means wrongful act, omission or breach.

(17)
"Fungible" with respect to goods or securities means goods or
securities of which any unit is, by nature or usage of trade, the equivalent of
any other like unit. Goods which are not fungible shall be deemed fungible for
the purposes of this Title to the extent that under a particular agreement or
document unlike units are treated as equivalents.

(18)
"Genuine" means free of forgery or counterfeiting.

(19) "Good
faith" means honesty in fact in the conduct or transaction concerned.

(20) "Holder"
with respect to a negotiable instrument, means the person in possession if the
instrument is payable to bearer or, in the case of an instrument payable to an
identified person, if the identified person is in possession.
"Holder" with respect to a document of title means the person in
possession if the goods are deliverable to bearer or to the order of the person
in possession.

(21) To
"honor" is to pay or to accept and pay, or where a credit so engages
to purchase or discount a draft complying with the terms of the credit.

(22) "Insolvency
proceedings" includes any assignment for the benefit of creditors or other
proceedings intended to liquidate or rehabilitate the estate of the person
involved.

(23) A person is
"insolvent" who either has ceased to pay his or her debts in the
ordinary course of business or cannot pay his or her debts as they become due
or is insolvent within the meaning of the federal bankruptcy law.

(24) "Money"
means a medium of exchange authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government
and includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental
organization or by agreement between two or more nations.

(25) A person has
"notice" of a fact when

(a) he or she has
actual knowledge of it; or

(b) he or she has
received a notice or notification of it; or

(c) from all the facts
and circumstances known to him or her at the time in question he or she has
reason to know that it exists.

A person "knows"
or has "knowledge" of a fact when he or she has actual knowledge of
it. "Discover" or "learn" or a word or phrase of similar
import refers to knowledge rather than to reason to know. The time and
circumstances under which a notice or notification may cease to be effective
are not determined by this Title.

(26) A person "notifies"
or "gives" a notice or notification to another by taking such steps
as may be reasonably required to inform the other in ordinary course whether or
not such other actually comes to know of it. A person "receives" a
notice or notification when

(a) it comes to his or
her attention; or

(b) it is duly
delivered at the place of business through which the contract was made or at
any other place held out by him or her as the place for receipt of such
communications.

(27) Notice, knowledge
or a notice or notification received by an organization is effective for a
particular transaction from the time when it is brought to the attention of the
individual conducting that transaction, and in any event from the time when it
would have been brought to his or her attention if the organization had
exercised due diligence. An organization exercises due diligence if it
maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the
person conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the
routines. Due diligence does not require an individual acting for the
organization to communicate information unless such communication is part of
his or her regular duties or unless he or she has reason to know of the
transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the
information.

(28)
"Organization" includes a corporation, government or governmental
subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or
association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any
other legal or commercial entity.

(29) "Party",
as distinct from "third party", means a person who has engaged in a
transaction or made an agreement within this Title.

(30) "Person"
includes an individual or an organization (See RCW 62A.1-102).

(31)
"Presumption" or "presumed" means that the trier of fact
must find the existence of the fact presumed unless and until evidence is
introduced which would support a finding of its nonexistence.

(32)
"Purchase" includes taking by sale, discount, negotiation, mortgage,
pledge, lien, security interest, issue or re-issue, gift or any other voluntary
transaction creating an interest in property.

(33)
"Purchaser" means a person who takes by purchase.

(34) "Remedy"
means any remedial right to which an aggrieved party is entitled with or
without resort to a tribunal.

(35)
"Representative" includes an agent, an officer of a corporation or
association, and a trustee, executor or administrator of an estate, or any
other person empowered to act for another.

(36) "Rights"
includes remedies.

(37) "Security
interest" means an interest in personal property or fixtures which secures
payment or performance of an obligation, except for lease-purchase agreements
under chapter 63.19 RCW. The term also includes any interest of a consignor
and a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, a payment intangible, or a promissory
note in a transaction that is subject to Article ((9[A])) 9A.
The special property interest of a buyer of goods on identification of such
goods to a contract for sale under RCW 62A.2-401 is not a "security
interest", but a buyer may also acquire a "security interest" by
complying with Article ((9[A])) 9A. Except as otherwise
provided in RCW 62A.2-505, the right of a seller or lessor of goods under
Article 2 or 2A to retain or acquire possession of the goods is not a
"security interest," but a seller or lessor may also acquire a
"security interest" by complying with Article ((9[A])) 9A.
The retention or reservation of title by a seller of goods notwithstanding
shipment or delivery to the buyer (RCW 62A.2-401) is limited in effect to a
reservation of a "security interest."

Whether a transaction
creates a lease or security interest is determined by the facts of each case.
However, a transaction creates a security interest if the consideration the
lessee is to pay the lessor for the right to possession and use of the goods is
an obligation for the term of the lease not subject to termination by the
lessee, and:

(a) The original term
of the lease is equal to or greater than the remaining economic life of the
goods;

(b) The lessee is bound
to renew the lease for the remaining economic life of the goods or is bound to
become the owner of the goods;

(c) The lessee has an
option to renew the lease for the remaining economic life of the goods for no
additional consideration or nominal additional consideration upon compliance
with the lease agreement; or

(d) The lessee has an
option to become the owner of the goods for no additional consideration or
nominal additional consideration upon compliance with the lease agreement.

A transaction does not
create a security interest merely because it provides that:

(a) The present value
of the consideration the lessee is obligated to pay the lessor for the right to
possession and use of the goods is substantially equal to or is greater than
the fair market value of the goods at the time the lease is entered into;

(b) The lessee assumes
risk of loss of the goods, or agrees to pay taxes, insurance, filing,
recording, or registration fees, or service or maintenance costs with respect
to the goods;

(c) The lessee has an
option to renew the lease or to become the owner of the goods;

(d) The lessee has an
option to renew the lease for a fixed rent that is equal to or greater than the
reasonably predictable fair market rent for the use of the goods for the term
of the renewal at the time the option is to be performed;

(e) The lessee has an
option to become the owner of the goods for a fixed price that is equal to or
greater than the reasonably predictable fair market value of the goods at the
time the option is to be performed; or

(f) The amount of
rental payments may or will be increased or decreased by reference to the
amount realized by the lessor upon sale or disposition of the goods.

For purposes of this subsection
(37):

(a) Additional
consideration is not nominal if (i) when the option to renew the lease is
granted to the lessee the rent is stated to be the fair market rent for the use
of the goods for the term of the renewal determined at the time the option is
to be performed, or (ii) when the option to become the owner of the goods is
granted to the lessee the price is stated to be the fair market value of the
goods determined at the time the option is to be performed. Additional
consideration is nominal if it is less than the lessee's reasonably predictable
cost of performing under the lease agreement if the option is not exercised;

(b) "Reasonably
predictable" and "remaining economic life of the goods" are to
be determined with reference to the facts and circumstances at the time the
transaction is entered into; and

(c) "Present
value" means the amount as of a date certain of one or more sums payable
in the future, discounted to the date certain. The discount is determined by
the interest rate specified by the parties if the rate is not manifestly
unreasonable at the time the transaction is entered into; otherwise, the
discount is determined by a commercially reasonable rate that takes into
account the facts and circumstances of each case at the time the transaction
was entered into.

(38) "Send"
in connection with any writing or notice means to deposit in the mail or
deliver for transmission by any other usual means of communication with postage
or cost of transmission provided for and properly addressed and in the case of
an instrument to an address specified thereon or otherwise agreed, or if there
be none to any address reasonable under the circumstances. The receipt of any
writing or notice within the time at which it would have arrived if properly
sent has the effect of a proper sending.

(39) "Signed"
includes any symbol executed or adopted by a party with present intention to
authenticate a writing.

(40) "Surety"
includes guarantor.

(41)
"Telegram" includes a message transmitted by radio, teletype, cable,
any mechanical method of transmission, or the like.

(42) "Term"
means that portion of an agreement which relates to a particular matter.

(43)
"Unauthorized" signature means one made without actual, implied or
apparent authority and includes a forgery.

(44)
"Value". Except as otherwise provided with respect to negotiable
instruments and bank collections (RCW 62A.3-303, RCW 62A.4‑210, and RCW
62A.4-211) a person gives "value" for rights if he or she acquires
them

(a) in return for a
binding commitment to extend credit or for the extension of immediately
available credit whether or not drawn upon and whether or not a charge-back is
provided for in the event of difficulties in collection; or

(b) as security for or
in total or partial satisfaction of a preexisting claim; or

(c) by accepting
delivery pursuant to a pre-existing contract for purchase; or

(d) generally, in
return for any consideration sufficient to support a simple contract.

(45) "Warehouse
receipt" means a receipt issued by a person engaged in the business of
storing goods for hire.

(46)
"Written" or "writing" includes printing, typewriting or
any other intentional reduction to tangible form.

Sec. 10. RCW 62A.2A-303 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-809 are each amended to read as follows:

ALIENABILITY OF PARTY'S
INTEREST UNDER LEASE CONTRACT OR OF LESSOR'S RESIDUAL INTEREST IN GOODS;
DELEGATION OF PERFORMANCE; TRANSFER OF RIGHTS. (1) As used in this section,
"creation of a security interest" includes the sale of a lease
contract that is subject to Article ((9[A])) 9A, Secured
Transactions, by reason of RCW 62A.9A‑109(a)(3).

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section and RCW 62A.9A‑407, a provision in a
lease agreement which (a) prohibits the voluntary or involuntary transfer,
including a transfer by sale, sublease, creation or enforcement of a security
interest, or attachment, levy, or other judicial process, of an interest of a
party under the lease contract or of the lessor's residual interest in the
goods, or (b) makes such a transfer an event of default, gives rise to the
rights and remedies provided in subsection (4) of this section, but a transfer
that is prohibited or is an event of default under the lease agreement is
otherwise effective.

(3) A provision in a
lease agreement which (((i)[(a)])) (a) prohibits a transfer of a
right to damages for default with respect to the whole lease contract or of a
right to payment arising out of the transferor's due performance of the
transferor's entire obligation, or (((ii)[(b)])) (b) makes such a
transfer an event of default, is not enforceable, and such a transfer is not a
transfer that materially impairs the prospect of obtaining return performance
by, materially changes the duty of, or materially increases the burden or risk
imposed on, the other party to the lease contract within the purview of
subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Subject to
subsection (3) of this section and RCW 62A.9A‑407:

(a) If a transfer is
made which is made an event of default under a lease agreement, the party to
the lease contract not making the transfer, unless that party waives the
default or otherwise agrees, has the rights and remedies described in RCW
62A.2A-501(2);

(b) If subsection
(4)(a) of this section is not applicable and if a transfer is made that (i) is
prohibited under a lease agreement or (ii) materially impairs the prospect of
obtaining return performance by, materially changes the duty of, or materially
increases the burden or risk imposed on, the other party to the lease contract,
unless the party not making the transfer agrees at any time to the transfer in
the lease contract or otherwise, then, except as limited by contract, (A) the
transferor is liable to the party not making the transfer for damages caused by
the transfer to the extent that the damages could not reasonably be prevented
by the party not making the transfer and (B) a court having jurisdiction may
grant other appropriate relief, including cancellation of the lease contract or
an injunction against the transfer.

(5) A transfer of
"the lease" or of "all my rights under the lease," or a
transfer in similar general terms, is a transfer of rights and, unless the
language or the circumstances, as in a transfer for security, indicate the
contrary, the transfer is a delegation of duties by the transferor to the
transferee. Acceptance by the transferee constitutes a promise by the
transferee to perform those duties. The promise is enforceable by either the
transferor or the other party to the lease contract.

(6) Unless otherwise
agreed by the lessor and the lessee, a delegation of performance does not
relieve the transferor as against the other party of any duty to perform or of
any liability for default.

(7) In a consumer
lease, to prohibit the transfer of an interest of a party under the lease
contract or to make a transfer an event of default, the language must be
specific, by a writing, and conspicuous.

Sec. 11. RCW 62A.2A-306 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-306 are each amended to read as follows:

PRIORITY OF CERTAIN
LIENS ARISING BY OPERATION OF LAW. ((If a person in the ordinary course of
his or her business furnishes services or materials with respect to goods
subject to a lease contract, a lien upon those goods in the possession of that
person given by statute or rule of law for those materials or services takes
priority over any interest of the lessor or lessee under the lease contract or
this Article unless the lien is created by statute and the statute provides
otherwise or unless the lien is created by rule of law and the rule of law
provides otherwise.)) (a) "Possessory lien." In this
section, "possessory lien" has the meaning defined in RCW 62A.9A-333.

(b) Priority of
possessory lien. A possessory lien on goods subject to a lease contract
has priority over any interest of the lessor or the lessee under the lease
contract or this Article only if the lien is created by a statute that
expressly so provides.

(c) A preparer lien
or processor lien properly created pursuant to chapter 60.13 RCW or a
depositor's lien created pursuant to chapter 22.09 RCW takes priority over any
perfected or unperfected security interest.

Sec. 12. RCW 62A.3-102 and 1993 c
229 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

SUBJECT MATTER. (a)
This Article applies to negotiable instruments. It does not apply to money, to
payment orders governed by Article 4A, or to securities governed by Article 8.

(b) If there is
conflict between this Article and Article 4 or ((9)) 9A, Articles
4 and ((9)) 9A govern.

(c) Regulations of the
Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and operating circulars of the
Federal Reserve Banks supersede any inconsistent provision of this Article to
the extent of the inconsistency.

Sec. 13. RCW 62A.4-210 and 2000 c
250 s 9A-813 are each amended to read as follows:

SECURITY INTEREST OF
COLLECTING BANK IN ITEMS, ACCOMPANYING DOCUMENTS AND PROCEEDS. (a) A
collecting bank has a security interest in an item and any accompanying
documents or the proceeds of either:

(1) In case of an item
deposited in an account, to the extent to which credit given for the item has
been withdrawn or applied;

(2) In case of an item
for which it has given credit available for withdrawal as of right, to the
extent of the credit given whether or not the credit is drawn upon or there is
a right of charge-back; or

(3) If it makes an
advance on or against the item.

(b) If credit given for
several items received at one time or pursuant to a single agreement is
withdrawn or applied in part, the security interest remains upon all the items,
any accompanying documents or the proceeds of either. For the purpose of this
section, credits first given are first withdrawn.

(c) Receipt by a
collecting bank of a final settlement for an item is a realization on its
security interest in the item, accompanying documents, and proceeds. So long
as the bank does not receive final settlement for the item or give up possession
of the item or accompanying documents for purposes other than collection, the
security interest continues to that extent and is subject to Article ((9[A]))
9A, but:

(1) No security
agreement is necessary to make the security interest enforceable RCW 62A.9A‑203(b)(3)(A);

(2) No filing is
required to perfect the security interest; and

(3) The
security interest has priority over conflicting perfected security interests in
the item, accompanying documents, or proceeds.

Sec. 14. RCW 62A.8-110 and 2000 c
250 s 9A-817 are each amended to read as follows:

APPLICABILITY;
CHOICE OF LAW. (1) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction, as specified in
subsection (4) of this section, governs:

(a) The validity of a
security;

(b) The rights and
duties of the issuer with respect to registration of transfer;

(c) The effectiveness
of registration of transfer by the issuer;

(d) Whether the issuer
owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a security; and

(e) Whether an adverse
claim can be asserted against a person to whom transfer of a certificated or
uncertificated security is registered or a person who obtains control of an
uncertificated security.

(2) The local law of
the securities intermediary's jurisdiction, as specified in subsection (5) of
this section, governs:

(a) Acquisition of a
security entitlement from the securities intermediary;

(b) The rights and
duties of the securities intermediary and entitlement holder arising out of a
security entitlement;

(c) Whether the
securities intermediary owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a security
entitlement; and

(d) Whether an adverse
claim can be asserted against a person who acquires a security entitlement from
the securities intermediary or a person who purchases a security entitlement or
interest therein from an entitlement holder.

(3) The local law of
the jurisdiction in which a security certificate is located at the time of
delivery governs whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person to
whom the security certificate is delivered.

(4) "Issuer's
jurisdiction" means the jurisdiction under which the issuer of the
security is organized or, if permitted by the law of that jurisdiction, the law
of another jurisdiction specified by the issuer. An issuer organized under the
law of this state may specify the law of another jurisdiction as the law
governing the matters specified in subsection (1)(b) through (e) of this
section.

(5) The following rules
determine a "securities intermediary's jurisdiction" for purposes of
this section:

(a) If an agreement
between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the
securities account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the
securities intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this part, this Article,
or ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW, that
jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.

(b) If (((5)))(a)
of this ((section [(a) of this subsection])) subsection does not
apply and an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement
holder governing the securities account expressly provides that the agreement
is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the
securities intermediary's jurisdiction.

(c) If neither (((5)))(a)
nor (b) of this ((section [(a) nor (b) of this subsection])) subsection
applies, and an agreement between the securities intermediary and its
entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides that the
securities account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction,
that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.

(d) If (((5)))(a),
(b), and (c) of this ((section [(a), (b), and (c) of this subsection])) subsection
do not apply, the securities intermediary's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in
which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the
entitlement holder's account is located.

(e) If (a), (b), (c),
and (d) of this subsection do not apply, the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the
securities intermediary is located.

(6) A
securities intermediary's jurisdiction is not determined by the physical
location of certificates representing financial assets, or by the jurisdiction
in which is organized the issuer of the financial asset with respect to which
an entitlement holder has a security entitlement, or by the location of
facilities for data processing or other recordkeeping concerning the account.

Sec. 15. RCW 62A.8-510 and 2000 c
250 s 9A-820 are each amended to read as follows:

RIGHTS OF PURCHASER OF
SECURITY ENTITLEMENT FROM ENTITLEMENT HOLDER. (1) In a case not covered by the
priority rules in Article ((9[A])) 9A or the rules stated in
subsection (3) of this section, an action based on an adverse claim to a
financial asset or security entitlement, whether framed in conversion,
replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory, may not be
asserted against a person who purchases a security entitlement, or an interest
therein, from an entitlement holder if the purchaser gives value, does not have
notice of the adverse claim, and obtains control.

(2) If an adverse claim
could not have been asserted against an entitlement holder under RCW 62A.8-502,
the adverse claim cannot be asserted against a person who purchases a security
entitlement, or an interest therein, from the entitlement holder.

(3) In a case not
covered by the priority rules in Article ((9[A])) 9A, a purchaser
for value of a security entitlement, or an interest therein, who obtains
control has priority over a purchaser of a security entitlement, or an interest
therein, who does not obtain control. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (4) of this section, purchasers who have control rank according to
priority in time of:

(a) The purchaser's
becoming the person for whom the securities account, in which the security
entitlement is carried, is maintained, if the purchaser obtained control under
RCW 62A.8‑106(((d)(1) [(4)(a)])) (4)(a);

(b) The securities
intermediary's agreement to comply with the purchaser's entitlement orders with
respect to security entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities
account in which the security entitlement is carried, if the purchaser obtained
control under RCW 62A.8‑106(((d)(2) [(4)(b)])) (4)(b); or

(c) If the purchaser
obtained control through another person under RCW 62A.8‑106(((d)(3)
[(4)(c)])) (4)(c), the time on which priority would be based under
this subsection if the other person were the secured party.

(4) A
securities intermediary as purchaser has priority over a conflicting purchaser
who has control unless otherwise agreed by the securities intermediary.

Sec. 16. RCW 62A.9A-102 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-102 are each amended to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS AND INDEX
OF DEFINITIONS. (a) Article ((9[A])) 9A definitions. In
this Article:

(1)
"Accession" means goods that are physically united with other goods
in such a manner that the identity of the original goods is not lost.

(2)(A)
"Account," except as used in "account for," means a right
to payment of a monetary obligation, whether or not earned by performance, (i)
for property that has been or is to be sold, leased, licensed, assigned, or
otherwise disposed of, (ii) for services rendered or to be rendered, (iii) for
a policy of insurance issued or to be issued, (iv) for a secondary obligation
incurred or to be incurred, (v) for energy provided or to be provided, (vi) for
the use or hire of a vessel under a charter or other contract, (vii) arising
out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for
use with the card, or (viii) as winnings in a lottery or other game of chance
operated or sponsored by a state, governmental unit of a state, or person
licensed or authorized to operate the game by a state or governmental unit of a
state. The term includes health-care-insurance receivables.

(B) The term does not
include (i) rights to payment evidenced by chattel paper or an instrument, (ii)
commercial tort claims, (iii) deposit accounts, (iv) investment property, (v)
letter-of-credit rights or letters of credit, or (vi) rights to payment for
money or funds advanced or sold, other than rights arising out of the use of a
credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card.

(3) "Account
debtor" means a person obligated on an account, chattel paper, or general
intangible. The term does not include persons obligated to pay a negotiable
instrument, even if the instrument constitutes part of chattel paper.

(4)
"Accounting," except as used in "accounting for," means a
record:

(A) Authenticated by a
secured party;

(B) Indicating the
aggregate unpaid secured obligations as of a date not more than thirty-five
days earlier or thirty-five days later than the date of the record; and

(C) Identifying the
components of the obligations in reasonable detail.

(5) "Agricultural
lien" means an interest, other than a security interest, in farm products:

(A) Which secures
payment or performance of an obligation for:

(i) Goods or services
furnished in connection with a debtor's farming operation; or

(ii) Rent on real
property leased by a debtor in connection with its farming operation;

(B) Which is created by
statute in favor of a person that:

(i) In the ordinary
course of its business, furnished goods or services to a debtor in connection
with a debtor's farming operation; or

(ii) Leased real
property to a debtor in connection with the debtor's farming operation; and

(C) Whose effectiveness
does not depend on the person's possession of the personal property.

(6) "As-extracted
collateral" means:

(A) Oil, gas, or other
minerals that are subject to a security interest that:

(i) Is created by a
debtor having an interest in the minerals before extraction; and

(ii) Attaches to the
minerals as extracted; or

(B) Accounts arising
out of the sale at the wellhead or minehead of oil, gas, or other minerals in
which the debtor had an interest before extraction.

(7)
"Authenticate" means:

(A) To sign; or

(B) To execute or
otherwise adopt a symbol, or encrypt or similarly process a record in whole or
in part, with the present intent of the authenticating person to identify the
person and adopt or accept a record.

(8) "Bank"
means an organization that is engaged in the business of banking. The term
includes savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions, and trust
companies.

(9) "Cash
proceeds" means proceeds that are money, checks, deposit accounts, or the
like.

(10) "Certificate
of title" means a certificate of title with respect to which a statute
provides for the security interest in question to be indicated on the
certificate as a condition or result of the security interest's obtaining
priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral.

(11) "Chattel
paper" means a record or records that evidence both a monetary obligation
and a security interest in specific goods, a security interest in specific
goods and software used in the goods, a security interest in specific goods and
license of software used in the goods, a lease of specific goods, or a lease of
specific goods and license of software used in the goods. In this subsection,
"monetary obligation" means a monetary obligation secured by the goods
or owed under a lease of the goods and includes a monetary obligation with
respect to software used in the goods. The term "chattel paper" does
not include (A) charters or other contracts involving the use or hire of
a vessel or (B) records that evidence a right to payment arising out of the
use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the
card. If a transaction is evidenced by records that include an instrument
or series of instruments, the group of records taken together constitutes
chattel paper.

(12)
"Collateral" means the property subject to a security interest or
agricultural lien. The term includes:

(A) Proceeds to which a
security interest attaches;

(B) Accounts, chattel
paper, payment intangibles, and promissory notes that have been sold; and

(C) Goods that are the
subject of a consignment.

(13) "Commercial
tort claim" means a claim arising in tort with respect to which:

(A) The claimant is an
organization; or

(B) The claimant is an
individual, and the claim:

(i) Arose in the course
of the claimant's business or profession; and

(ii) Does not include
damages arising out of personal injury to, or the death of, an individual.

(14) "Commodity
account" means an account maintained by a commodity intermediary in which
a commodity contract is carried for a commodity customer.

(15) "Commodity
contract" means a commodity futures contract, an option on a commodity
futures contract, a commodity option, or another contract if the contract or option
is:

(A) Traded on or
subject to the rules of a board of trade that has been designated as a contract
market for such a contract pursuant to federal commodities laws; or

(B) Traded on a foreign
commodity board of trade, exchange, or market, and is carried on the books of a
commodity intermediary for a commodity customer.

(16) "Commodity
customer" means a person for which a commodity intermediary carries a
commodity contract on its books.

(17) "Commodity
intermediary" means a person that:

(A) Is registered as a
futures commission merchant under federal commodities law; or

(B) In the ordinary
course of its business, provides clearance or settlement services for a board
of trade that has been designated as a contract market pursuant to federal
commodities law.

(18)
"Communicate" means:

(A) To send a written
or other tangible record;

(B) To transmit a
record by any means agreed upon by the persons sending and receiving the
record; or

(C) In the case of
transmission of a record to or by a filing office, to transmit a record by any
means prescribed by filing-office rule.

(19)
"Consignee" means a merchant to which goods are delivered in a
consignment.

(20)
"Consignment" means a transaction, regardless of its form, in which a
person delivers goods to a merchant for the purpose of sale and:

(A) The merchant:

(i) Deals in goods of
that kind under a name other than the name of the person making delivery;

(ii) Is not an
auctioneer; and

(iii) Is not generally
known by its creditors to be substantially engaged in selling the goods of
others;

(B) With respect to
each delivery, the aggregate value of the goods is one thousand dollars or more
at the time of delivery;

(C) The goods are not consumer
goods immediately before delivery; and

(D) The transaction
does not create a security interest that secures an obligation.

(21)
"Consignor" means a person that delivers goods to a consignee in a
consignment.

(22) "Consumer
debtor" means a debtor in a consumer transaction.

(23) "Consumer
goods" means goods that are used or bought for use primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes.

(24)
"Consumer-goods transaction" means a consumer transaction in which:

(A) An individual
incurs a consumer obligation; and

(B) A security interest
in consumer goods secures the obligation.

(25) "Consumer
obligation" means an obligation which:

(A) Is incurred as part
of a transaction entered into primarily for personal, family, or household
purposes; and

(B) Arises from an
extension of credit, or commitment to extend credit, in an aggregate amount not
exceeding forty thousand dollars, or is secured by personal property used or
expected to be used as a principal dwelling.

"Consumer
obligor" means an obligor who is an individual and who incurred a consumer
obligation.

(26) "Consumer
transaction" means a transaction in which (A) an individual incurs a
consumer obligation, (B) a security interest secures the obligation, and (C)
the collateral is held or acquired primarily for personal, family, or household
purposes. The term includes consumer-goods transactions.

(27) "Continuation
statement" means an amendment of a financing statement which:

(A) Identifies, by its
file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates; and

(B) Indicates that it
is a continuation statement for, or that it is filed to continue the
effectiveness of, the identified financing statement.

(28) "Debtor"
means:

(A) A person having an
interest, other than a security interest or other lien, in the collateral,
whether or not the person is an obligor;

(B) A seller of
accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes; or

(C) A consignee.

(29) "Deposit
account" means a demand, time, savings, passbook, or similar account
maintained with a bank. The term does not include investment property or
accounts evidenced by an instrument.

(30)
"Document" means a document of title or a receipt of the type
described in RCW 62A.7‑201(2).

(31) "Electronic
chattel paper" means chattel paper evidenced by a record or records
consisting of information stored in an electronic medium.

(32)
"Encumbrance" means a right, other than an ownership interest, in real
property. The term includes mortgages and other liens on real property.

(33)
"Equipment" means goods other than inventory, farm products, or
consumer goods.

(34) "Farm
products" means goods, other than standing timber, with respect to which
the debtor is engaged in a farming operation and which are:

(A) Crops grown,
growing, or to be grown, including:

(i) Crops produced on
trees, vines, and bushes; and

(ii) Aquatic goods
produced in aquacultural operations;

(B) Livestock, born or
unborn, including aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations;

(C) Supplies used or
produced in a farming operation; or

(D) Products of crops
or livestock in their unmanufactured states.

(35) "Farming
operation" means raising, cultivating, propagating, fattening, grazing, or
any other farming, livestock, or aquacultural operation.

(36) "File
number" means the number assigned to an initial financing statement
pursuant to RCW 62A.9A‑519(a).

(37) "Filing
office" means an office designated in RCW 62A.9A‑501 as the place to
file a financing statement.

(38)
"Filing-office rule" means a rule adopted pursuant to RCW 62A.9A‑526.

(39) "Financing
statement" means a record or records composed of an initial financing
statement and any filed record relating to the initial financing statement.

(40) "Fixture
filing" means the filing of a financing statement covering goods that are
or are to become fixtures and satisfying RCW 62A.9A‑502 (a) and (b). The
term includes the filing of a financing statement covering goods of a transmitting
utility which are or are to become fixtures.

(41)
"Fixtures" means goods that have become so related to particular real
property that an interest in them arises under real property law.

(42) "General
intangible" means any personal property, including things in action, other
than accounts, chattel paper, commercial tort claims, deposit accounts,
documents, goods, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights,
letters of credit, money, and oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction. The
term includes payment intangibles and software.

(43) "Good
faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial
standards of fair dealing.

(44) "Goods"
means all things that are movable when a security interest attaches. The term includes
(A) fixtures, (B) standing timber that is to be cut and removed under a
conveyance or contract for sale, (C) the unborn young of animals, (D) crops
grown, growing, or to be grown, even if the crops are produced on trees, vines,
or bushes, and (E) manufactured homes. The term also includes a computer
program embedded in goods and any supporting information provided in connection
with a transaction relating to the program if (i) the program is associated
with the goods in such a manner that it customarily is considered part of the
goods, or (ii) by becoming the owner of the goods, a person acquires a right to
use the program in connection with the goods. The term does not include a
computer program embedded in goods that consist solely of the medium in which
the program is embedded. The term also does not include accounts, chattel
paper, commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, general
intangibles, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, letters
of credit, money, or oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction or a
manufactured home converted to real property under chapter 65.20 RCW.

(45) "Governmental
unit" means a subdivision, agency, department, county, parish,
municipality, or other unit of the government of the United States, a state, or
a foreign country. The term includes an organization having a separate
corporate existence if the organization is eligible to issue debt on which
interest is exempt from income taxation under the laws of the United States.

(46) "Health-care-insurance
receivable" means an interest in or claim under a policy of insurance
which is a right to payment of a monetary obligation for health-care goods or
services provided.

(47)
"Instrument" means a negotiable instrument or any other writing that
evidences a right to the payment of a monetary obligation, is not itself a
security agreement or lease, and is of a type that in ordinary course of
business is transferred by delivery with any necessary indorsement or
assignment. The term does not include (A) investment property, (B) letters of
credit, (C) writings that evidence a right to payment arising out of the use of
a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card,
(D) writings that do not contain a promise or order to pay, or (E) writings
that are expressly nontransferable or nonassignable.

(48)
"Inventory" means goods, other than farm products, which:

(A) Are leased by a
person as lessor;

(B) Are held by a
person for sale or lease or to be furnished under a contract of service;

(C) Are furnished by a
person under a contract of service; or

(D) Consist of raw
materials, work in process, or materials used or consumed in a business.

(49) "Investment
property" means a security, whether certificated or uncertificated,
security entitlement, securities account, commodity contract, or commodity
account.

(50) "Jurisdiction
of organization," with respect to a registered organization, means the
jurisdiction under whose law the organization is organized.

(51)
"Letter-of-credit right" means a right to payment or performance
under a letter of credit, whether or not the beneficiary has demanded or is at
the time entitled to demand payment or performance. The term does not include
the right of a beneficiary to demand payment or performance under a letter of
credit.

(52) "Lien
creditor" means:

(A) A creditor that has
acquired a lien on the property involved by attachment, levy, or the like;

(B) An assignee for
benefit of creditors from the time of assignment;

(C) A trustee in
bankruptcy from the date of the filing of the petition; or

(D) A receiver in
equity from the time of appointment.

(53) "Manufactured
home" means a manufactured home or mobile home as defined in RCW
46.04.302.

(54) [Reserved]

(55)
"Mortgage" means a consensual interest in real property, including
fixtures, which secures payment or performance of an obligation.

(56) "New
debtor" means a person that becomes bound as debtor under RCW 62A.9A‑203(d)
by a security agreement previously entered into by another person.

(57) "New
value" means (A) money, (B) money's worth in property, services, or new
credit, or (C) release by a transferee of an interest in property previously
transferred to the transferee. The term does not include an obligation
substituted for another obligation.

(58) "Noncash
proceeds" means proceeds other than cash proceeds.

(59)
"Obligor" means a person that, with respect to an obligation secured
by a security interest in or an agricultural lien on the collateral, (A) owes
payment or other performance of the obligation, (B) has provided property other
than the collateral to secure payment or other performance of the obligation,
or (C) is otherwise accountable in whole or in part for payment or other
performance of the obligation. The term does not include issuers or nominated
persons under a letter of credit.

(60) "Original
debtor", except as used in RCW 62A.9A-310(c), means a person that,
as debtor, entered into a security agreement to which a new debtor has become bound
under RCW 62A.9A‑203(d).

(61) "Payment
intangible" means a general intangible under which the account debtor's
principal obligation is a monetary obligation.

(62) "Person
related to," with respect to an individual, means:

(A) The spouse of the
individual;

(B) A brother,
brother-in-law, sister, or sister-in-law of the individual;

(C) An ancestor or
lineal descendant of the individual or the individual's spouse; or

(D) Any other relative,
by blood or marriage, of the individual or the individual's spouse who shares
the same home with the individual.

(63) "Person
related to," with respect to an organization, means:

(A) A person directly
or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the
organization;

(B) An officer or
director of, or a person performing similar functions with respect to, the
organization;

(C) An officer or
director of, or a person performing similar functions with respect to, a person
described in (((64) [(63)])) (63)(A) of this subsection;

(D) The spouse of an
individual described in (((64) [(63)])) (63)(A), (B), or (C) of
this subsection; or

(E) An individual who
is related by blood or marriage to an individual described in (((64) [(63)]))
(63)(A), (B), (C), or (D) of this subsection and shares the same home
with the individual.

(64)
"Proceeds", except as used in RCW 62A.9A-609(b), means the
following property:

(A) Whatever is
acquired upon the sale, lease, license, exchange, or other disposition of
collateral;

(B) Whatever is
collected on, or distributed on account of, collateral;

(C) Rights arising out
of collateral;

(D) To the extent of
the value of collateral, claims arising out of the loss, nonconformity, or
interference with the use of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage
to, the collateral; or

(E) To the extent of
the value of collateral and to the extent payable to the debtor or the secured
party, insurance payable by reason of the loss or nonconformity of, defects or
infringement of rights in, or damage to, the collateral.

(65) "Promissory
note" means an instrument that evidences a promise to pay a monetary
obligation, does not evidence an order to pay, and does not contain an
acknowledgment by a bank that the bank has received for deposit a sum of money
or funds.

(66)
"Proposal" means a record authenticated by a secured party, which
includes the terms on which the secured party is willing to accept collateral
in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures pursuant to RCW
62A.9A‑620, 62A.9A‑621, and 62A.9A‑622.

(67)
"Public-finance transaction" means a secured transaction in
connection with which:

(A) Debt securities are
issued;

(B) All or a portion of
the securities issued have an initial stated maturity of at least twenty years;
and

(C) The debtor,
obligor, secured party, account debtor or other person obligated on collateral,
assignor or assignee of a secured obligation, or assignor or assignee of a
security interest is a state or a governmental unit of a state.

(68) "Pursuant to
commitment," with respect to an advance made or other value given by a
secured party, means pursuant to the secured party's obligation, whether or not
a subsequent event of default or other event not within the secured party's
control has relieved or may relieve the secured party from its obligation.

(69)
"Record," except as used in "for record," "of
record," "record or legal title," and "record owner,"
means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or which is stored in
an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(70) "Registered
organization" means an organization organized solely under the law of a
single state or the United States and as to which the state or the United
States must maintain a public record showing the organization to have been
organized.

(71) "Secondary
obligor" means an obligor to the extent that:

(A) The obligor's
obligation is secondary; or

(B) The obligor has a
right of recourse with respect to an obligation secured by collateral against
the debtor, another obligor, or property of either.

(72) "Secured
party" means:

(A) A person in whose
favor a security interest is created or provided for under a security
agreement, whether or not any obligation to be secured is outstanding;

(B) A person that holds
an agricultural lien;

(C) A consignor;

(D) A person to which
accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes have been sold;

(E) A trustee,
indenture trustee, agent, collateral agent, or other representative in whose
favor a security interest or agricultural lien is created or provided for; or

(F) A person that holds
a security interest arising under RCW 62A.2‑401, 62A.2‑505, 62A.2‑711(3),
62A.2A‑508(5), 62A.4‑210, or 62A.5‑118.

(73) "Security
agreement" means an agreement that creates or provides for a security
interest.

(74) "Send,"
in connection with a record or notification, means:

(A) To deposit in the
mail, deliver for transmission, or transmit by any other usual means of
communication, with postage or cost of transmission provided for, addressed to
any address reasonable under the circumstances; or

(B) To cause the record
or notification to be received within the time that it would have been received
if properly sent under (((75) [(74)])) (A) of this subsection.

(75)
"Software" means a computer program and any supporting information
provided in connection with a transaction relating to the program. The term
does not include a computer program that is included in the definition of
goods.

(76) "State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States.

(77) "Supporting
obligation" means a letter-of-credit right or secondary obligation that
supports the payment or performance of an account, chattel paper, a document, a
general intangible, an instrument, or investment property.

(78) "Tangible
chattel paper" means chattel paper evidenced by a record or records
consisting of information that is inscribed on a tangible medium.

(79) "Termination
statement" means an amendment of a financing statement which:

(A) Identifies, by its
file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates; and

(B) Indicates either
that it is a termination statement or that the identified financing statement
is no longer effective.

(80) "Transmitting
utility" means a person primarily engaged in the business of:

(A) Operating a
railroad, subway, street railway, or trolley bus;

(B) Transmitting
communications electrically, electromagnetically, or by light;

(C) Transmitting goods
by pipeline or sewer; or

(D) Transmitting or
producing and transmitting electricity, steam, gas, or water.

(b) Definitions in
other Articles. The following definitions in other Articles apply to this
Article:

"Applicant." RCW
62A.5‑102.

"Beneficiary." RCW
62A.5‑102.

"Broker." RCW
62A.8‑102.

"Certificated
security." RCW 62A.8‑102.

"Check." RCW
62A.3‑104.

"Clearing
corporation." RCW 62A.8‑102.

"Contract for
sale." RCW 62A.2‑106.

"Customer." RCW
62A.4‑104.

"Entitlement
holder." RCW 62A.8‑102.

"Financial
asset." RCW 62A.8‑102.

"Holder in due
course." RCW 62A.3‑302.

"Issuer" with
respect to

a letter of credit

or letter-of-credit
right. RCW 62A.5‑102.

"Issuer" with
respect to a

security. RCW
62A.8‑201.

"Lease." RCW
62A.2A‑103.

"Lease
agreement." RCW 62A.2A‑103.

"Lease
contract." RCW 62A.2A‑103.

"Leasehold
interest." RCW 62A.2A‑103.

"Lessee." RCW
62A.2A‑103.

"Lessee in ordinary
course

of business." RCW
62A.2A‑103.

"Lessor." RCW
62A.2A‑103.

"Lessor's residual

interest." RCW
62A.2A‑103.

"Letter of
credit." RCW 62A.5‑102.

"Merchant." RCW
62A.2‑104.

"Negotiable
instrument." RCW 62A.3‑104.

"Nominated
person." RCW 62A.5‑102.

"Note." RCW
62A.3‑104.

"Proceeds of a
letter

of credit." RCW
62A.5‑114.

"Prove." RCW
62A.3‑103.

"Sale." RCW
62A.2‑106.

"Securities
account." RCW 62A.8‑501.

"Securities
intermediary." RCW 62A.8‑102.

"Security." RCW
62A.8‑102.

"Security
certificate." RCW 62A.8‑102.

"Security
entitlement." RCW 62A.8‑102.

"Uncertificated
security." RCW 62A.8‑102.

(c) Article 1
definitions and principles. Article 1 contains general definitions and
principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this
Article.

Sec. 17. RCW 62A.9A-104 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-104 are each amended to read as follows:

CONTROL OF DEPOSIT ACCOUNT.
(a) Requirements for control. A secured party has control of a deposit
account if:

(1) The secured party
is the bank with which the deposit account is maintained;

(2) The debtor, secured
party, and bank have agreed in an authenticated record that the bank will
comply with instructions originated by the secured party directing disposition
of the funds in the deposit account without further consent by the
debtor; or

(3) The secured party
becomes the bank's customer with respect to the deposit account.

(b) Debtor's right
to direct disposition. A secured party that has satisfied subsection (a)
of this section has control, even if the debtor retains the right to direct the
disposition of funds from the deposit account.

Sec. 18. RCW 62A.9A-105 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-105 are each amended to read as follows:

CONTROL OF ELECTRONIC
CHATTEL PAPER. A secured party has control of electronic chattel paper if the
record or records comprising the chattel paper are created, stored, and
assigned in such a manner that:

(1) A single
authoritative copy of the record or records exists which is unique,
identifiable and, except as otherwise provided in (([subsections])) subsections
(4), (5), and (6) of this section, unalterable;

(2) The authoritative
copy identifies the secured party as the assignee of the record or records;

(3) The authoritative
copy is communicated to and maintained by the secured party or its designated
custodian;

(4) Copies or revisions
that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made
only with the participation of the secured party;

(5) Each copy of the
authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy
that is not the authoritative copy; and

(6) Any revision of the
authoritative copy is readily identifiable as an authorized or unauthorized
revision.

Sec. 19. RCW 62A.9A-107 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-107 are each amended to read as follows:

CONTROL OF
LETTER-OF-CREDIT RIGHT. A secured party has control of a letter-of-credit
right to the extent of any right to payment or performance by the issuer or any
nominated person if the issuer or nominated person has consented to an
assignment of proceeds of the letter of credit under RCW 62A.5‑114(((c)
[(3)])) (3) or otherwise applicable law or practice.

Sec. 20. RCW 62A.9A-201 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-201 are each amended to read as follows:

GENERAL EFFECTIVENESS
OF SECURITY AGREEMENT. (a) General effectiveness. Except as otherwise
provided in the Uniform Commercial Code, a security agreement is effective
according to its terms between the parties, against purchasers of the
collateral, and against creditors.

(b) Applicable
consumer laws and other law. A transaction subject to this Article is
subject to any applicable rule of law which establishes a different rule for
consumers and (((i) [(1)])) (1) any other statute or regulation
that regulates the rates, charges, agreements, and practices for loans, credit
sales, or other extensions of credit and (((ii) [(2)])) (2) any
consumer-protection statute or regulation.

(c) Other applicable
law controls. In case of conflict between this Article and a rule of law,
statute, or regulation described in subsection (b) of this section, the rule of
law, statute, or regulation controls. Failure to comply with a statute or
regulation described in subsection (b) of this section has only the effect the
statute or regulation specifies.

(d) Further
deference to other applicable law. This Article does not:

(1) Validate any rate,
charge, agreement, or practice that violates a rule of law, statute, or
regulation described in subsection (b) of this section; or

(2) Extend the
application of the rule of law, statute, or regulation to a transaction not
otherwise subject to it.

Sec. 21. RCW 62A.9A-208 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-208 are each amended to read as follows:

ADDITIONAL DUTIES OF
SECURED PARTY HAVING CONTROL OF COLLATERAL. (a) Applicability of section. This
section applies to cases in which there is no outstanding secured obligation
and the secured party is not committed to make advances, incur obligations, or
otherwise give value.

(b) Duties of
secured party after receiving demand from debtor. Within ten days after
receiving an authenticated demand by the debtor:

(1) A secured party
having control of a deposit account under RCW 62A.9A‑104(a)(2) shall send
to the bank with which the deposit account is maintained an authenticated
statement that releases the bank from any further obligation to comply with
instructions originated by the secured party;

(2) A secured party
having control of a deposit account under RCW 62A.9A‑104(a)(3) shall:

(A) Pay the debtor the
balance on deposit in the deposit account; or

(B) Transfer the
balance on deposit into a deposit account in the debtor's name;

(3) A secured party,
other than a buyer, having control of electronic chattel paper under RCW 62A.9A‑105
shall:

(A) Communicate the
authoritative copy of the electronic chattel paper to the debtor or its
designated custodian;

(B) If the debtor
designates a custodian that is the designated custodian with which the
authoritative copy of the electronic chattel paper is maintained for the
secured party, communicate to the custodian an authenticated record releasing
the designated custodian from any further obligation to comply with
instructions originated by the secured party and instructing the custodian to
comply with instructions originated by the debtor; and

(C) Take appropriate
action to enable the debtor or its designated custodian to make copies of or
revisions to the authoritative copy which add or change an identified assignee
of the authoritative copy without the consent of the secured party;

(4) A secured party
having control of investment property under RCW 62A.8‑106(((d)(2)
[(4)(b)])) (4)(b) or 62A.9A‑106(b) shall send to the
securities intermediary or commodity intermediary with which the security
entitlement or commodity contract is maintained an authenticated record that
releases the securities intermediary or commodity intermediary from any further
obligation to comply with entitlement orders or directions originated by the
secured party; and

(5) A secured party
having control of a letter-of-credit right under RCW 62A.9A‑107 shall
send to each person having an unfulfilled obligation to pay or deliver proceeds
of the letter of credit to the secured party an authenticated release from any
further obligation to pay or deliver proceeds of the letter of credit to the
secured party.

Sec. 22. RCW 62A.9A-301 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-301 are each amended to read as follows:

LAW GOVERNING
PERFECTION AND PRIORITY OF SECURITY INTERESTS. Except as otherwise provided in
RCW 62A.9A‑303 through 62A.9A‑306, the following rules determine
the law governing perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and
the priority of a security interest in collateral:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, while a debtor is located in a jurisdiction, the
local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or
nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in collateral.

(2) While collateral is
located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs
perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a
possessory security interest in that collateral.

(3) Except as otherwise
provided in (([subsection])) subsection (4) of this section,
while negotiable documents, goods, instruments, money, or tangible chattel
paper is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs:

(A) Perfection of a
security interest in the goods by filing a fixture filing;

(B) Perfection of a
security interest in timber to be cut; and

(C) The effect of
perfection or nonperfection and the priority of a nonpossessory security
interest in the collateral.

(4) The local law of
the jurisdiction in which the wellhead or minehead is located governs
perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a
security interest in as-extracted collateral.

Sec. 23. RCW 62A.9A-305 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-305 are each amended to read as follows:

LAW GOVERNING
PERFECTION AND PRIORITY OF SECURITY INTERESTS IN INVESTMENT PROPERTY. (a)
Governing law: General rules. Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(c) of this section, the following rules apply:

(1) While a security
certificate is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction
governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority
of a security interest in the certificated security represented thereby.

(2) The local law of
the issuer's jurisdiction as specified in RCW 62A.8‑110(((d) [(4)]))
(4) governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and
the priority of a security interest in an uncertificated security.

(3) The local law of
the securities intermediary's jurisdiction as specified in RCW 62A.8‑110(((e)
[(5)])) (5) governs perfection, the effect of perfection or
nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a security
entitlement or securities account.

(4) The local law of the
commodity intermediary's jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of
perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a
commodity contract or commodity account.

(b) Commodity
intermediary's jurisdiction. The following rules determine a commodity
intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this part:

(1) If an agreement
between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the
commodity account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the
commodity intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this part, this Article,
or the Uniform Commercial Code, that jurisdiction is the commodity
intermediary's jurisdiction.

(2) If (1) of this
subsection does not apply and an agreement between the commodity intermediary
and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that
the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that
jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction.

(3) If neither (1) nor
(2) of this subsection applies and an agreement between the commodity
intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly
provides that the commodity account is maintained at an office in a particular
jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction.

(4) If (1) through (3)
of this subsection do not apply, the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction is
the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the
office serving the commodity customer's account is located.

(5) If (1) through (4)
of this subsection do not apply, the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction is
the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the commodity
intermediary is located.

(c) When perfection
governed by law of jurisdiction where debtor located. The local law of the
jurisdiction in which the debtor is located governs:

(1) Perfection of a
security interest in investment property by filing;

(2) Automatic
perfection of a security interest in investment property created by a broker or
securities intermediary; and

(3) Automatic
perfection of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account
created by a commodity intermediary.

Sec. 24. RCW 62A.9A-306 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-306 are each amended to read as follows:

LAW GOVERNING
PERFECTION AND PRIORITY OF SECURITY INTERESTS IN LETTER-OF-CREDIT RIGHTS. (a)
Governing law: ((Issuers)) Issuer's or nominated person's
jurisdiction. Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the local law of
the issuer's jurisdiction or a nominated person's jurisdiction governs
perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a
security interest in a letter-of-credit right if the issuer's jurisdiction or
nominated person's jurisdiction is a state.

(b) Issuer's or
nominated person's jurisdiction. For purposes of this part, an issuer's
jurisdiction or nominated person's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction whose law
governs the liability of the issuer or nominated person with respect to the
letter-of-credit right as provided in RCW 62A.5‑116.

(c) When section not
applicable. This section does not apply to a security interest that is
perfected only under RCW 62A.9A‑308(d).

Sec. 25. RCW 62A.9A-311 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-311 are each amended to read as follows:

PERFECTION OF SECURITY
INTERESTS IN PROPERTY SUBJECT TO CERTAIN STATUTES, REGULATIONS, AND TREATIES.
(a) Security interest subject to other law. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (d) of this section, the filing of a financing statement
is not necessary or effective to perfect a security interest in property
subject to:

(1) A statute,
regulation, or treaty of the United States whose requirements for a security
interest's obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect
to the property preempt RCW 62A.9A‑310(a);

(2) RCW 46.12.095 or
88.02.070, or chapter 65.12 RCW; or

(3) A
certificate-of-title statute of another jurisdiction which provides for a
security interest to be indicated on the certificate as a condition or result
of the security interest's obtaining priority over the rights of a lien
creditor with respect to the property.

(b) Compliance with
other law. Compliance with the requirements of a statute, regulation, or
treaty described in subsection (a) of this section for obtaining priority over
the rights of a lien creditor is equivalent to the filing of a financing
statement under this Article. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d)
of this section, RCW 62A.9A‑313, and 62A.9A‑316 (d) and (e) for
goods covered by a certificate of title, a security interest in property
subject to a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subsection (a) of this
section may be perfected only by compliance with those requirements, and a
security interest so perfected remains perfected notwithstanding a change in
the use or transfer of possession of the collateral.

(c) Duration and
renewal of perfection. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of
this section and RCW 62A.9A‑316 (d) and (e), duration and renewal of
perfection of a security interest perfected by compliance with the requirements
prescribed by a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subsection (a) of
this section are governed by the statute, regulation, or treaty. In other
respects, the security interest is subject to this Article.

(d) Inapplicability
to certain inventory. During any period in which collateral subject to
RCW 46.12.095 or 88.02.070, or chapter 65.12 RCW is inventory held for sale
or lease by a person or leased by that person as lessor and that person is in
the business of selling ((or leasing)) goods of that kind, this section
does not apply to a security interest in that collateral created by that person
((as debtor)).

Sec. 26. RCW 62A.9A-313 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-313 are each amended to read as follows:

WHEN POSSESSION BY OR
DELIVERY TO SECURED PARTY PERFECTS SECURITY INTEREST WITHOUT FILING. (a) Perfection
by possession or delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b)
of this section, a secured party may perfect a security interest in negotiable
documents, goods, instruments, money, or tangible chattel paper by taking
possession of the collateral. A secured party may perfect a security interest
in certificated securities by taking delivery of the certificated securities
under RCW 62A.8‑301.

(b) Goods covered by
certificate of title. With respect to goods covered by a certificate of
title issued by this state, a secured party may perfect a security interest in
the goods by taking possession of the goods only in the circumstances described
in RCW 62A.9A‑316(d).

(c) Collateral in
possession of person other than debtor. With respect to collateral other
than certificated securities and goods covered by a document, a secured party
takes possession of collateral in the possession of a person other than the
debtor, the secured party, or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the
ordinary course of the debtor's business, when:

(1) The person in
possession authenticates a record acknowledging that it holds possession of the
collateral for the secured party's benefit; or

(2) The person takes
possession of the collateral after having authenticated a record acknowledging
that it will hold possession of collateral for the secured party's benefit.

(d) Time of
perfection by possession; continuation of perfection. If perfection of a
security interest depends upon possession of the collateral by a secured party,
perfection occurs no earlier than the time the secured party takes possession
and continues only while the secured party retains possession.

(e) Time of
perfection by delivery; continuation of perfection. A security interest in
a certificated security in registered form is perfected by delivery when
delivery of the certificated security occurs under RCW 62A.8‑301 and
remains perfected by delivery until the debtor obtains possession of the
security certificate.

(f) Acknowledgment not
required. A person in possession of collateral is not required to
acknowledge that it holds possession for a secured party's benefit.

(g) Effectiveness of
acknowledgment; no duties or confirmation. If a person acknowledges that
it holds possession for the secured party's benefit:

(1) The acknowledgment
is effective under subsection (c) of this section or RCW 62A.8‑301(([(1)](a)))
(1), even if the acknowledgment violates the rights of a debtor; and

(2) Unless the person
otherwise agrees or law other than this Article otherwise provides, the person
does not owe any duty to the secured party and is not required to confirm the
acknowledgment to another person.

(h) Secured party's
delivery to person other than debtor. A secured party having possession of
collateral does not relinquish possession by delivering the collateral to a
person other than the debtor or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in
the ordinary course of the debtor's business if the person was instructed
before the delivery or is instructed contemporaneously with the delivery:

(1) To hold possession
of the collateral for the secured party's benefit; or

(2) To redeliver the
collateral to the secured party.

(i) Effect of
delivery under subsection (h); no duties or confirmation. A secured party
does not relinquish possession, even if a delivery under subsection (h) of this
section violates the rights of a debtor. A person to which collateral is
delivered under subsection (h) of this section does not owe any duty to the
secured party and is not required to confirm the delivery to another person
unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this Article otherwise
provides.

Sec. 27. RCW 62A.9A-317 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-317 are each amended to read as follows:

INTERESTS THAT TAKE
PRIORITY OVER OR TAKE FREE OF SECURITY INTEREST OR AGRICULTURAL LIEN. (a) Conflicting
security interests and rights of lien creditors. A security interest or
agricultural lien is subordinate to the rights of:

(1) A person entitled
to priority under RCW 62A.9A‑322; and

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (e) of this section, a person that becomes a lien
creditor before the earlier of the time:

(A) The security
interest or agricultural lien is perfected; or

(B) One of the
conditions specified in RCW 62A.9A-203(b)(3) is met and a financing
statement covering the collateral is filed.

(b) Buyers that
receive delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this
section, a buyer, other than a secured party, of tangible chattel paper,
documents, goods, instruments, or a security certificate takes free of a
security interest or agricultural lien if the buyer gives value and receives
delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural
lien and before it is perfected.

(c) Lessees that
receive delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this
section, a lessee of goods takes free of a security interest or agricultural
lien if the lessee gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without
knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is
perfected.

(d) Licensees and
buyers of certain collateral. A licensee of a general intangible or a
buyer, other than a secured party, of accounts, electronic chattel paper,
general intangibles, or investment property other than a certificated security
takes free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives value without
knowledge of the security interest and before it is perfected.

(e) Purchase-money
security interest. Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A‑320
and 62A.9A‑321, if a person files a financing statement with respect to a
purchase-money security interest before or within twenty days after the debtor
receives delivery of the collateral, the security interest takes priority over
the rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor which arise between the time
the security interest attaches and the time of filing.

Sec. 28. RCW 62A.9A-322 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-322 are each amended to read as follows:

PRIORITIES AMONG
CONFLICTING SECURITY INTERESTS IN AND AGRICULTURAL LIENS ON SAME COLLATERAL.
(a) General priority rules. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, priority among conflicting security interests and agricultural liens
in the same collateral is determined according to the following rules:

(1) Conflicting
perfected security interests and agricultural liens rank according to priority
in time of filing or perfection. Priority dates from the earlier of the time a
filing covering the collateral is first made or the security interest or
agricultural lien is first perfected, if there is no period thereafter when
there is neither filing nor perfection.

(2) A perfected
security interest or agricultural lien has priority over a conflicting
unperfected security interest or agricultural lien.

(3) The first security
interest or agricultural lien to attach or become effective has priority if
conflicting security interests and agricultural liens are unperfected.

(b) Time of
perfection: Proceeds and supporting obligations. For the purposes (([of]))
of subsection (a)(1) of this section:

(1) The time of filing
or perfection as to a security interest in collateral is also the time of
filing or perfection as to a security interest in proceeds; and

(2) The time of filing
or perfection as to a security interest in collateral supported by a supporting
obligation is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest
in the supporting obligation.

(c) Special priority
rules: Proceeds and supporting obligations. Except as otherwise provided
in subsection (f) of this section, a security interest in collateral which
qualifies for priority over a conflicting security interest under RCW 62A.9A‑327,
62A.9A‑328, 62A.9A‑329, 62A.9A‑330, or 62A.9A‑331 also
has priority over a conflicting security interest in:

(1) Any supporting
obligation for the collateral; and

(2) Proceeds of the
collateral if:

(A) The security
interest in proceeds is perfected;

(B) The proceeds are
cash proceeds or of the same type as the collateral; and

(C) In the case of
proceeds that are proceeds of proceeds, all intervening proceeds are cash
proceeds, proceeds of the same type as the collateral, or an account relating
to the collateral.

(d) First-to-file
priority rule for certain collateral. Subject to subsection (e) of this
section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, if
a security interest in chattel paper, deposit accounts, negotiable documents,
instruments, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights is perfected by a
method other than filing, conflicting perfected security interests in proceeds
of the collateral rank according to priority in time of filing.

(e) Applicability of
subsection (d) of this section. Subsection (d) of this section applies
only if the proceeds of the collateral are not cash proceeds, chattel paper,
negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter-of-credit
rights.

(f) Limitations on
subsections (a) through (e) of this section. Subsections (a) through (e)
of this section are subject to:

(1) Subsection (g) of
this section and the other provisions of this part;

(2) RCW 62A.4‑210
with respect to a security interest of a collecting bank;

(3) RCW 62A.5‑118
with respect to a security interest of an issuer or nominated person; and

(4) RCW 62A.9A‑110
with respect to a security interest arising under Article 2 or 2A.

(g) Priority under
agricultural lien statute. A perfected agricultural lien on collateral has
priority over a conflicting security interest in or agricultural lien on the
same collateral if the statute creating the agricultural lien so provides.
Conflicts as to priority between and among security interests in crops and
agricultural liens subject to chapter 60.11 RCW are governed by the provisions
of that chapter.

Sec. 29. RCW 62A.9A-328 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-328 are each amended to read as follows:

PRIORITY OF SECURITY
INTERESTS IN INVESTMENT PROPERTY. The following rules govern priority among
conflicting security interests in the same investment property:

(1) A security interest
held by a secured party having control of investment property under RCW 62A.9A‑106
has priority over a security interest held by a secured party that does not
have control of the investment property.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in (([subsections])) subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, conflicting security interests held by secured parties each of which
has control under RCW 62A.9A‑106 rank according to priority in time of:

(a) If the collateral
is a security, obtaining control;

(b) If the collateral
is a security entitlement carried in a securities account and:

(i) If the secured
party obtained control under RCW 62A.8‑106(((d)(1) [(4)(a)])) (4)(a),
the secured party's becoming the person for which the securities account is
maintained;

(ii) If the secured
party obtained control under RCW 62A.8‑106(((d)(2) [(4)(b)])) (4)(b),
the securities intermediary's agreement to comply with the secured party's
entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried or to be carried
in the securities account; or

(iii) If the secured
party obtained control through another person under RCW 62A.8‑106(((d)(3)
[(4)(c)])) (4)(c), the time on which priority would be based under
this paragraph if the other person were the secured party; or

(C) If the collateral
is a commodity contract carried with a commodity intermediary, the satisfaction
of the requirement for control specified in RCW 62A.9A‑106(b)(2) with
respect to commodity contracts carried or to be carried with the commodity intermediary.

(3) A security interest
held by a securities intermediary in a security entitlement or a securities
account maintained with the securities intermediary has priority over a
conflicting security interest held by another secured party.

(4) A security interest
held by a commodity intermediary in a commodity contract or a commodity account
maintained with the commodity intermediary has priority over a conflicting
security interest held by another secured party.

(5) A security interest
in a certificated security in registered form which is perfected by taking
delivery under RCW 62A.9A‑313(a) and not by control under RCW 62A.9A‑314
has priority over a conflicting security interest perfected by a method other
than control.

(6) Conflicting
security interests created by a broker, securities intermediary, or commodity
intermediary which are perfected without control under RCW 62A.9A‑106
rank equally.

(7) In all other cases,
priority among conflicting security interests in investment property is governed
by RCW 62A.9A‑322 and 62A.9A‑323.

Sec. 30. RCW 62A.9A-331 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-331 are each amended to read as follows:

PRIORITY OF RIGHTS OF
PURCHASERS OF INSTRUMENTS, DOCUMENTS, AND SECURITIES UNDER OTHER ARTICLES;
PRIORITY OF INTERESTS IN FINANCIAL ASSETS AND SECURITY ENTITLEMENTS UNDER
ARTICLE 8. (a) Rights under Articles 3, 7, and 8 not limited. This
Article does not limit the rights of a holder in due course of a negotiable
instrument, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly
negotiated, or a protected purchaser of a security. These holders or
purchasers take priority over an earlier security interest, even if perfected,
to the extent provided in Articles 3, 7, and 8.

(b) Protection under
Article 8. This Article does not limit the rights of or impose liability
on a person to the extent that the person is protected against the assertion of
((an adverse)) a claim under Article 8.

(c) Filing not
notice. Filing under this Article does not constitute notice of a claim or
defense to the holders, or purchasers, or persons described in subsections (a)
and (b) of this section.

Sec. 31. RCW 62A.9A-333 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-333 are each amended to read as follows:

PRIORITY OF CERTAIN
LIENS ARISING BY OPERATION OF LAW. (a) "Possessory lien." In
this section, "possessory lien" means an interest, other than a
security interest or an agricultural lien:

(1) Which secures
payment or performance of an obligation for services or materials furnished
with respect to goods by a person in the ordinary course of the person's
business;

(2) Which is created by
statute or rule of law in favor of the person; and

(3) Whose effectiveness
depends on the person's possession of the goods.

(b) Priority of
possessory lien. A possessory lien on goods has priority over a security
interest in the goods only if the lien is created by a statute that expressly so
provides ((otherwise)).

(c) A preparer lien
or processor lien properly created pursuant to chapter 60.13 RCW or a
depositor's lien created pursuant to chapter 22.09 RCW takes priority over any
perfected or unperfected security interest.

Sec. 32. RCW 62A.9A-334 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-334 are each amended to read as follows:

PRIORITY OF SECURITY
INTERESTS IN FIXTURES AND CROPS. (a) Security interest in fixtures under
this Article. A security interest under this Article may be created in
goods that are fixtures or may continue in goods that become fixtures. A
security interest does not exist under this Article in ordinary building
materials incorporated into an improvement on land.

(b) Security
interest in fixtures under real-property law. This Article does not
prevent creation of an encumbrance upon fixtures under real property law.

(c) General rule:
Subordination of security interest in fixtures. In cases not governed by
subsections (d) through (h) of this section, a security interest in fixtures is
subordinate to a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the
related real property other than the debtor.

(d) Fixtures
purchase-money priority. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h) of
this section, a perfected security interest in fixtures has priority over a
conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if the
debtor has an interest of record in, or is in possession of, the real property
and:

(1) The security
interest is a purchase-money security interest;

(2) The interest of the
encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods become fixtures; and

(3) The security
interest is perfected by a fixture filing before the goods become fixtures or
within twenty days thereafter.

(e) Priority of
security interest in fixtures over interests in real property. A perfected
security interest in fixtures has priority over a conflicting interest of an
encumbrancer or owner of the real property if:

(1) The debtor has an
interest of record in the real property or is in possession of the real
property and the security interest:

(A) Is perfected by a
fixture filing before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record;
and

(B) Has priority over
any conflicting interest of a predecessor in title of the encumbrancer or
owner;

(2) Before the goods
become fixtures, the security interest is perfected by any method permitted by
this Article and the fixtures are readily removable:

(A) Factory or office
machines;

(B) Equipment that is
not primarily used or leased for use in the operation of the real property; or

(C) Replacements of
domestic appliances that are consumer goods; or

(3) The conflicting
interest is a lien on the real property obtained by legal or equitable
proceedings after the security interest was perfected by any method permitted
by this Article.

(f) Priority based
on consent, disclaimer, or right to remove. A security interest in
fixtures, whether or not perfected, has priority over a conflicting interest of
an encumbrancer or owner of the real property if:

(1) The encumbrancer or
owner has, in an authenticated record, consented to the security interest or
disclaimed an interest in the goods as fixtures; or

(2) The debtor has a
right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner.

(g) Continuation of
subsection (f)(2) priority. The priority of the security interest
under subsection (f)(2) of this section continues for a reasonable time
if the debtor's right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer or owner
terminates.

(h) Priority of
construction mortgage. A mortgage is a construction mortgage to the extent
that it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an improvement
on land, including the acquisition cost of the land, if a recorded record of
the mortgage so indicates. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (e) and
(f) of this section, a security interest in fixtures is subordinate to a
construction mortgage if a record of the mortgage is recorded before the goods
become fixtures and the goods become fixtures before the completion of the
construction. A mortgage has this priority to the same extent as a
construction mortgage to the extent that it is given to refinance a
construction mortgage.

(i) Priority of
security interest in crops. A perfected security interest in crops growing
on real property has priority over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or
owner of the real property if the debtor has an interest of record in or is in
possession of the real property.

(j) Subsection (i)
prevails. Subsection (i) of this section prevails over inconsistent provisions
of any other statute except RCW 60.11.050.

Sec. 33. RCW 62A.9A-336 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-336 are each amended to read as follows:

COMMINGLED GOODS. (a) "Commingled
goods." In this section, "commingled goods" means goods
that are physically united with other goods in such a manner that their
identity is lost in a product or mass.

(b) No security
interest in commingled goods as such. A security interest does not exist
in commingled goods as such. However, a security interest may attach to a
product or mass that results when goods become commingled goods.

(c) Attachment of
security interest to product or mass. If collateral becomes commingled
goods, a security interest attaches to the product or mass.

(d) Perfection of
security interest. If a security interest in collateral is perfected
before the collateral becomes commingled goods, the security interest that
attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c) of this section is
perfected.

(e) Priority of
security interest. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this
section, the other provisions of this part determine the priority of a security
interest that attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c) of this
section.

(f) Conflicting
security interests in product or mass. If more than one security interest
attaches to the product or mass under subsection (c) of this section, the
following rules determine priority:

(1) A security interest
that is perfected under subsection (d) of this section has priority over a
security interest that is unperfected at the time the collateral becomes
commingled goods.

(2) If more than one
security interest is perfected under subsection (d) of this section, the
security interests rank equally in proportion to the value of the
collateral at the time it became commingled goods.

Sec. 34. RCW 62A.9A-406 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-406 are each amended to read as follows:

DISCHARGE OF ACCOUNT
DEBTOR; NOTIFICATION OF ASSIGNMENT; IDENTIFICATION AND PROOF OF ASSIGNMENT;
RESTRICTIONS ON ASSIGNMENT OF ACCOUNTS, CHATTEL PAPER, PAYMENT INTANGIBLES, AND
PROMISSORY NOTES INEFFECTIVE. (a) Discharge of account debtor; effect of
notification. Subject to subsections (b) through (i) of this section, an account
debtor on an account, chattel paper, or a payment intangible may discharge its
obligation by paying the assignor until, but not after, the account debtor
receives a notification, authenticated by the assignor or the assignee, that
the amount due or to become due has been assigned and that payment is to be
made to the assignee. After receipt of the notification, the account debtor
may discharge its obligation by paying the assignee and may not discharge the
obligation by paying the assignor.

(b) When
notification ineffective. Subject to subsection (h) of this section,
notification is ineffective under subsection (a) of this section:

(1) If it does not
reasonably identify the rights assigned;

(2) To the extent that
an agreement between an account debtor and a seller of a payment intangible
limits the account debtor's duty to pay a person other than the seller and the
limitation is effective under law other than this Article; or

(3) At the option of an
account debtor, if the notification notifies the account debtor to make less
than the full amount of any installment or other periodic payment to the
assignee, even if:

(A) Only a portion of
the account, chattel paper, or ((general)) payment intangible has
been assigned to that assignee;

(B) A portion has been
assigned to another assignee; or

(C) The account debtor
knows that the assignment to that assignee is limited.

(c) Proof of
assignment. Subject to subsection (h) of this section, if requested by the
account debtor, an assignee shall seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the
assignment has been made. Unless the assignee complies, the account debtor may
discharge its obligation by paying the assignor, even if the account debtor has
received a notification under subsection (a) of this section.

(d) Term restricting
assignment generally ineffective. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (e) of this section and RCW 62A.2A‑303 and 62A.9A‑407,
and subject to subsection (h) of this section, a term in an agreement between
an account debtor and an assignor or in a promissory note is ineffective to the
extent that it:

(1) Prohibits,
restricts, or requires the consent of the account debtor or person obligated on
the promissory note to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment,
perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in, the account, chattel
paper, payment intangible, or promissory note; or

(2) Provides that the
assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement
of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of
recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under
the account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note.

(e) Inapplicability
of subsection (d) to certain sales. Subsection (d) of this section does
not apply to the sale of a payment intangible or promissory note.

(f) [Reserved]

(g) Subsection
(b)(3) not waivable. Subject to subsection (h) of this section, an account
debtor may not waive or vary its option under subsection (b)(3) of this
section.

(h) Rule for
individual under other law. This section is subject to law other than this
Article which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an
individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or
household purposes.

(i) Inapplicability
to health-care-insurance receivable. This section does not apply to an
assignment of a health-care-insurance receivable.

Sec. 35. RCW 62A.9A-407 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-407 are each amended to read as follows:

RESTRICTIONS ON
CREATION OR ENFORCEMENT OF SECURITY INTEREST IN LEASEHOLD INTEREST OR IN
LESSOR'S RESIDUAL INTEREST. (a) Term restricting assignment generally
ineffective. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this
section, a term in a lease agreement is ineffective to the extent that it:

(1) Prohibits,
restricts, or requires the consent of a party to the lease to the assignment or
transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a
security interest in, an interest of a party under the lease contract or
in the lessor's residual interest in the goods; or

(2) Provides that the
assignment or transfer or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement
of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of
recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under
the lease.

(b) Effectiveness of
certain terms. Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.2A‑303(7), a
term described in subsection (a)(2) of this section is effective to the extent
that there is:

(1) A transfer by the
lessee of the lessee's right of possession or use of the goods in violation of
the term; or

(2) A delegation of a
material performance of either party to the lease contract in violation of the
term.

(c) Security
interest not material impairment. The creation, attachment, perfection, or
enforcement of a security interest in the lessor's interest under the lease
contract or the lessor's residual interest in the goods is not a transfer that
materially impairs the lessee's prospect of obtaining return performance or
materially changes the duty of or materially increases the burden or risk
imposed on the lessee within the purview of RCW 62A.2A‑303(4) unless, and
then only to the extent that, enforcement actually results in a delegation of
material performance of the lessor.

Sec. 36. RCW 62A.9A-509 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-509 are each amended to read as follows:

PERSONS ENTITLED TO
FILE A RECORD. (a) Person entitled to file record. A person may file
an initial financing statement, amendment that adds collateral covered by a
financing statement, or amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement
only if:

(1) The debtor authorizes
the filing in an authenticated record or pursuant to subsection (b) or (c)
of this section; or

(2) The person holds an
agricultural lien that has become effective at the time of filing and the
financing statement covers only collateral in which the person holds an
agricultural lien.

(b) Security
agreement as authorization. By authenticating or becoming bound as debtor
by a security agreement, a debtor or new debtor authorizes the filing of an
initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering:

(1) The collateral
described in the security agreement; and

(2) Property that
becomes collateral under RCW 62A.9A‑315(a)(2), whether or not the
security agreement expressly covers proceeds.

(c) Acquisition of
collateral as authorization. By acquiring collateral in which a security
interest or agricultural lien continues under RCW 62A.9A‑315(a)(1), a debtor
authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment,
covering the collateral and property that becomes collateral under RCW 62A.9A‑315(a)(2).

(d) Person entitled
to file certain amendments. A person may file an amendment other than an
amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement or an amendment
that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if:

(1) The secured party
of record authorizes the filing; or

(2) The amendment is a
termination statement for a financing statement as to which the secured party
of record has failed to file or send a termination statement as required by RCW
62A.9A‑513 (a) or (c), the debtor authorizes the filing, and the
termination statement indicates that the debtor authorized it to be filed.

(e) Multiple secured
parties of record. If there is more than one secured party of record for a
financing statement, each secured party of record may authorize the filing of
an amendment under subsection (d) of this section.

Sec. 37. RCW 62A.9A-513 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-513 are each amended to read as follows:

TERMINATION STATEMENT.
(a) Consumer goods. A secured party shall cause the secured party of
record for a financing statement to file a termination statement for the
financing statement if the financing statement covers consumer goods and:

(1) There is no
obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no
commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

(2) The debtor did not
authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

(b) Time for
compliance with subsection (a) of this section. To comply with subsection
(a) of this section, a secured party shall cause the secured party of record to
file the termination statement:

(1) Within one month
after there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing
statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or
otherwise give value; or

(2) If earlier, within
twenty days after the secured party receives an authenticated demand from a
debtor.

(c) Other
collateral. In cases not governed by subsection (a) of this section,
within twenty days after a secured party receives an authenticated demand from
a debtor, the secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a
financing statement to send to the debtor a termination statement for the
financing statement or file the termination statement in the filing office if:

(1) Except in the case
of a financing statement covering accounts or chattel paper that has been sold
or goods that are the subject of a consignment, there is no obligation secured
by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make
an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value;

(2) The financing
statement covers accounts or chattel paper that has been sold but as to which
the account debtor or other person obligated has discharged its obligation;

(3) The financing
statement covers goods that were the subject of a consignment to the debtor but
are not in the debtor's possession; or

(4) The debtor did not
authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

(d) Effect of filing
termination statement. Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A‑510,
upon the filing of a termination statement with the filing office, the
financing statement to which the termination statement relates ceases to be
effective. Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-510, for purposes of
RCW 62A.9A‑519(g), 62A.9A-522(a), and 62A.9A-523(c), the filing with the
filing office of a termination statement relating to a financing statement that
indicates that the debtor is a transmitting utility also causes the
effectiveness of the financing statement to lapse.

Sec. 38. RCW 62A.9A-516 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-516 are each amended to read as follows:

WHAT CONSTITUTES
FILING; EFFECTIVENESS OF FILING. (a) What constitutes filing. Except
as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, communication of a
record to a filing office and tender of the filing fee or acceptance of the
record by the filing office constitutes filing.

(b) Refusal to
accept record; filing does not occur. Filing does not occur with respect
to a record that a filing office refuses to accept because:

(1) The record is not
communicated by a method or medium of communication authorized by the filing
office;

(2) An amount equal to
or greater than the applicable filing fee is not tendered or, in the case of
a filing office described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(1), an amount equal to the
applicable filing fee is not tendered;

(3) The filing office
is unable to index the record because:

(A) In the case of an
initial financing statement, the record does not provide a name for the debtor;

(B) In the case of an
amendment or correction statement, the record:

(i) Does not identify
the initial financing statement as required by RCW 62A.9A‑512 or 62A.9A‑518,
as applicable; or

(ii) Identifies an
initial financing statement whose effectiveness has lapsed under RCW 62A.9A‑515;

(C) In the case of an
initial financing statement that provides the name of a debtor identified as an
individual or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor identified as an
individual which was not previously provided in the financing statement to
which the record relates, the record does not identify the debtor's last name;
or

(D) In the case of a
record filed or recorded in the filing office described in RCW 62A.9A‑501(a)(1),
the record does not provide a name for the debtor or a sufficient
description of the real property to which ((it)) the record
relates;

(4) In the case of an
initial financing statement or an amendment that adds a secured party of
record, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the secured
party of record;

(5) In the case of an
initial financing statement or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor
which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the
amendment relates, the record does not:

(A) Provide a mailing
address for the debtor;

(B) Indicate whether
the debtor is an individual or an organization; or

(C) If the financing
statement indicates that the debtor is an organization, provide:

(i) A type of
organization for the debtor;

(ii) A jurisdiction of
organization for the debtor; or

(iii) An organizational
identification number for the debtor or indicate that the debtor has none;

(6) In the case of an
assignment reflected in an initial financing statement under RCW 62A.9A‑514(a)
or an amendment filed under RCW 62A.9A‑514(b), the record does not
provide a name and mailing address for the assignee; or

(7) In the case of a
continuation statement, the record is not filed within the six-month period
prescribed by RCW 62A.9A‑515(d).

(c) Rules applicable
to subsection (b) of this section. For purposes of subsection (b) of this
section:

(1) A record does not
provide information if the filing office is unable to read or decipher the
information; and

(2) A record that does
not indicate that it is an amendment or identify an initial financing statement
to which it relates, as required by RCW 62A.9A‑512, 62A.9A‑514, or
62A.9A‑518, is an initial financing statement.

(d) Refusal to
accept record; record effective as filed record. A record that is
communicated to the filing office with tender of the filing fee, but which the
filing office refuses to accept for a reason other than one set forth in
subsection (b) of this section, is effective as a filed record except as
against a purchaser of the collateral which gives value in reasonable reliance
upon the absence of the record from the files.

Sec. 39. RCW 62A.9A-520 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-520 are each amended to read as follows:

ACCEPTANCE AND REFUSAL
TO ACCEPT RECORD. (a) Mandatory refusal to accept record. ((A))
The filing office described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(2) shall refuse
to accept a record for filing for a reason set forth in RCW 62A.9A‑516(b)
((and)). A filing office described in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(1) shall
refuse to accept a record for filing for a reason set forth in RCW
62A.9A-516(b) (1) through (4) and any filing office may refuse to accept a
record for filing only for a reason set forth in RCW 62A.9A‑516(b).

(b) Communication
concerning refusal. If a filing office refuses to accept a record for
filing, it shall communicate to the person that presented the record the fact
of and reason for the refusal and the date and time the record would have been
filed had the filing office accepted it. The communication must be made at the
time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office rule but, in the case of a
filing office described in RCW 62A.9A‑501(a)(2), in no event more than
two business days after the filing office receives the record.

(c) When filed
financing statement effective. A filed financing statement satisfying RCW
62A.9A‑502 (a) and (b) is effective, even if the filing office is
required to refuse to accept it for filing under subsection (a) of this
section. However, RCW 62A.9A‑338 applies to a filed financing statement
providing information described in RCW 62A.9A‑516(b)(5) which is
incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed.

(d) Separate
application to multiple debtors. If a record communicated to a filing
office provides information that relates to more than one debtor, this part
applies as to each debtor separately.

Sec. 40. RCW 62A.9A-523 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-523 are each amended to read as follows:

INFORMATION FROM FILING
OFFICE; SALE OR LICENSE OF RECORDS. (a) Acknowledgment of filing written
record. If a person that files a written record requests an acknowledgment
of the filing, the filing office shall send to the person an image of the
record showing the number assigned to the record pursuant to RCW 62A.9A‑519(a)(1)
and the date and time of the filing of the record. However, if the person furnishes
a copy of the record to the filing office, the filing office may instead:

(1) Note upon the copy
the number assigned to the record pursuant to RCW 62A.9A‑519(a)(1) and
the date and time of the filing of the record; and

(2) Send the copy to
the person.

(b) Acknowledgment
of filing other record. If a person files a record other than a written
record, the filing office shall communicate to the person an acknowledgment
that provides:

(1) The information in
the record;

(2) The number assigned
to the record pursuant to RCW 62A.9A‑519(a)(1); and

(3) The date and time
of the filing of the record.

(c) Communication of
requested information. The filing office shall communicate or otherwise
make available in a record the following information to any person that
requests it:

(1) Whether there is on
file on a date and time specified by the filing office, but not a date earlier
than three business days before the filing office receives the request, any
financing statement that:

(A) Designates a
particular debtor or, if the request so states, designates a particular debtor
at the address specified in the request;

(B) Has not lapsed
under RCW 62A.9A‑515 with respect to all secured parties of record; and

(C) If the request so
states, has lapsed under RCW 62A.9A‑515 and a record of which is
maintained by the filing office under RCW 62A.9A‑522(a);

(2) The date and time
of filing of each financing statement; and

(3) The information
provided in each financing statement.

(d) Medium for
communicating information. In complying with its duty under subsection (c)
of this section, the filing office may communicate information in any medium.
However, if requested, the filing office shall communicate information by
issuing a record that can be admitted into evidence in the courts of this state
without extrinsic evidence of its authenticity.

(e) Timeliness of
filing office performance. The filing office described in RCW
62A.9A-501(a)(2) shall perform the acts required by subsections (a) through
(d) of this section at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office
rule, but not later than two business days after the filing office receives the
request.

(f) Public
availability of records. At least weekly, the filing office described
in RCW 62A.9A-501(a)(2) shall offer to sell or license to the public on a
nonexclusive basis, in bulk, copies of all records filed in it under this part,
in every medium from time to time available to the filing office. If
information provided pursuant to this section includes a list of individuals,
disclosure of the list is specifically authorized.

Sec. 41. RCW 62A.9A-608 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-608 are each amended to read as follows:

APPLICATION OF PROCEEDS
OF COLLECTION OR ENFORCEMENT; LIABILITY FOR DEFICIENCY AND RIGHT TO SURPLUS.
(a) Application of proceeds, surplus, and deficiency if obligation secured.
If a security interest or agricultural lien secures payment or performance of
an obligation, the following rules apply:

(1) A secured party
shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of collection or
enforcement under ((this section)) RCW 62A.9A-607 in the
following order to:

(A) The reasonable
expenses of collection and enforcement and, to the extent provided for by
agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorneys' fees and legal
expenses incurred by the secured party;

(B) The satisfaction of
obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which
the collection or enforcement is made; and

(C) The satisfaction of
obligations secured by any subordinate security interest in or other lien on
the collateral subject to the security interest or agricultural lien under
which the collection or enforcement is made if the secured party receives an
authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is
completed.

(2) If requested by a
secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall
furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time.
Unless the holder complies, the secured party need not comply with the holder's
demand under (1)(C) of this subsection.

(3) A secured party
need not apply or pay over for application noncash proceeds of collection and
enforcement under ((this section)) RCW 62A.9A-607 unless the
failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A secured party that
applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a
commercially reasonable manner.

(4) A secured party
shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus, and the obligor is liable
for any deficiency.

(b) No surplus or
deficiency in sales of certain rights to payment. If the underlying
transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or
promissory notes, the debtor is not entitled to any surplus, and the obligor is
not liable for any deficiency.

Sec. 42. RCW 62A.9A-613 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-613 are each amended to read as follows:

CONTENTS AND FORM OF
NOTIFICATION BEFORE DISPOSITION OF COLLATERAL: GENERAL. Except in a
consumer-goods transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) The contents of a
notification of disposition are sufficient if the notification:

(A) Describes the debtor
and the secured party;

(B) Describes the
collateral that is the subject of the intended disposition;

(C) States the method
of intended disposition;

(D) States that the
debtor is entitled to an accounting of the unpaid indebtedness and states the charge,
if any, for an accounting; and

(E) States the time and
place of a public ((sale)) disposition or the time after which
any other disposition is to be made.

(2) Whether the
contents of a notification that lacks any of the information specified in (([subsection]))
subsection (1) of this section are nevertheless sufficient is a question
of fact.

(3) The contents of a
notification providing substantially the information specified in (([subsection]))
subsection (1) of this section are sufficient, even if the notification
includes:

(A) Information not
specified by (([subsection])) subsection (1) of this section; or

(B) Minor errors that
are not seriously misleading.

(4) A particular
phrasing of the notification is not required.

(5) The following form
of notification and the form appearing in RCW 62A.9A‑614(3), when
completed, each provides sufficient information:

NOTIFICATION
OF DISPOSITION OF COLLATERAL

To: [Name of debtor, obligor, or
other person to which the notification is sent]

From: [Name, address, and
telephone number of secured party]

Name of Debtor(s): [Include only if debtor(s)
are not an addressee]

[For a public
disposition:]

We will sell [or lease
or license, as applicable] the [describe collateral] [to the highest qualified
bidder] in public as follows:

Day and Date:

Time:

Place:

[For a private
disposition:]

We will sell [or lease or
license, as applicable] the [describe collateral] privately sometime after [day and date] .

You are entitled to an
accounting of the unpaid indebtedness secured by the property that we intend to
sell [or lease or license, as applicable] [for a charge of $ ]. You may request an
accounting by calling us at [telephone number] .

Sec. 43. RCW 62A.9A-615 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-615 are each amended to read as follows:

APPLICATION OF PROCEEDS
OF DISPOSITION; LIABILITY FOR DEFICIENCY AND RIGHT TO SURPLUS. (a) Application
of proceeds. A secured party shall apply or pay over for application the
cash proceeds of disposition under RCW 62A.9A-610 in the following order
to:

(1) The reasonable
expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing, and
disposing, and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by
law, reasonable attorneys' fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured
party;

(2) The satisfaction of
obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which
the disposition is made;

(3) The satisfaction of
obligations secured by any subordinate security interest in or other
subordinate lien on the collateral if:

(A) The secured party
receives from the holder of the subordinate security interest or other lien an
authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is
completed; and

(B) In a case in which
a consignor has an interest in the collateral, the subordinate security
interest or other lien is senior to the interest of the consignor; and

(4) A secured party
that is a consignor of the collateral if the secured party receives from the
consignor an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the
proceeds is completed.

(b) Proof of
subordinate interest. If requested by a secured party, a holder of a
subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of
the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder does so, the
secured party need not comply with the holder's demand under subsection (a)(3)
of this section.

(c) Application of
noncash proceeds. A secured party need not apply or pay over for
application noncash proceeds of disposition under ((this section)) RCW
62A.9A-610 unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable.
A secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds
shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner.

(d) Surplus or
deficiency if obligation secured. If the security interest under which a
disposition is made secures payment or performance of an obligation, after
making the payments and applications required by subsection (a) of this section
and permitted by subsection (c) of this section:

(1) Unless subsection
(a)(4) of this section requires the secured party to apply or pay over cash
proceeds to a consignor, the secured party shall account to and pay a debtor
for any surplus; and

(2) The obligor is
liable for any deficiency.

(e) No surplus or
deficiency in sales of certain rights to payment. If the underlying
transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or
promissory notes:

(1) The debtor is not
entitled to any surplus; and

(2) The obligor is not
liable for any deficiency.

(f) [Reserved]

(g) Cash proceeds
received by junior secured party. A secured party that receives cash
proceeds of a disposition in good faith and without knowledge that the receipt
violates the rights of the holder of a security interest or other lien that is
not subordinate to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the
disposition is made:

(1) Takes the cash
proceeds free of the security interest or other lien;

(2) Is not obligated to
apply the proceeds of the disposition to the satisfaction of obligations
secured by the security interest or other lien; and

(3) Is not obligated to
account to or pay the holder of the security interest or other lien for any
surplus.

Sec. 44. RCW 62A.9A-625 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-625 are each amended to read as follows:

REMEDIES FOR SECURED
PARTY'S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH ARTICLE. (a) Judicial orders concerning
noncompliance. If it is established that a secured party is not proceeding
in accordance with this Article, a court may order or restrain collection,
enforcement, or disposition of collateral on appropriate terms and conditions.

(b) Damages for
noncompliance. Subject to subsections (c), (d), and (f) of this section, a
person is liable for damages in the amount of any loss caused by a failure to
comply with this Article or by filing a false statement under RCW 62A.9A-607(b)
or 62A.9A-619. Loss caused by a failure to comply ((with a request under
RCW 62A.9A‑210)) may include loss resulting from the debtor's
inability to obtain, or increased costs of, alternative financing.

(c) Persons entitled
to recover damages; statutory damages in consumer-goods transaction.
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A‑628:

(1) A person that, at
the time of the failure, was a debtor, was an obligor, or held a security
interest in or other lien on the collateral may recover damages under
subsection (b) of this section for its loss; and

(2) If the collateral
is consumer goods, a person that was a debtor or a secondary obligor at the
time a secured party failed to comply with this part may recover for that
failure in any event an amount not less than the credit service charge plus ten
percent of the principal amount of the obligation or the time-price
differential plus ten percent of the cash price.

(d) Recovery when
deficiency eliminated or reduced. A debtor whose deficiency is eliminated
under RCW 62A.9A‑626 may recover damages for the loss of any surplus.
However, a debtor or secondary obligor ((whose deficiency is eliminated or
reduced under RCW 62A.9A‑626)) may not ((otherwise)) recover
under subsection (b) or (c)(2) of this section for noncompliance with
the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition,
or acceptance to the extent that its deficiency is eliminated or reduced
under RCW 62A.9A-626.

(e) Statutory
damages: Noncompliance with specified provisions. In addition to any
damages recoverable under subsection (b) of this section, the debtor, consumer
obligor, or person named as a debtor in a filed record, as applicable, may
recover five hundred dollars in each case from a person that:

(1) Fails to comply
with RCW 62A.9A‑208;

(2) Fails to comply
with RCW 62A.9A‑209;

(3) Files a record that
the person is not entitled to file under RCW 62A.9A‑509(a);

(4) Fails to cause the
secured party of record to file or send a termination statement as required by
RCW 62A.9A‑513 (a) or (c) within twenty days after the secured party
receives an authenticated demand from a debtor;

(5) Fails to comply
with RCW 62A.9A‑616(b)(1) and whose failure is part of a pattern, or
consistent with a practice, of noncompliance; or

(6) Fails to comply
with RCW 62A.9A‑616(b)(2).

(f) Statutory
damages: Noncompliance with RCW 62A.9A‑210. A debtor or consumer
obligor may recover damages under subsection (b) of this section and, in
addition, five hundred dollars in each case from a person that, without
reasonable cause, fails to comply with a request under RCW 62A.9A‑210. A
recipient of a request under RCW 62A.9A‑210 which never claimed an
interest in the collateral or obligations that are the subject of a request
under RCW 62A.9A‑210 has a reasonable excuse for failure to comply with
the request within the meaning of this subsection.

(g) Limitation of
security interest: Noncompliance with RCW 62A.9A‑210. If a secured
party fails to comply with a request regarding a list of collateral or a
statement of account under RCW 62A.9A‑210, the secured party may claim a
security interest only as shown in the list or statement included in the
request as against a person that is reasonably misled by the failure.

Sec. 45. RCW 62A.9A-628 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-628 are each amended to read as follows:

NONLIABILITY AND
LIMITATION ON LIABILITY OF SECURED PARTY; LIABILITY OF SECONDARY OBLIGOR. (a) Limitation
of liability ((to debtor or obligor)) of secured party for
noncompliance with article. Unless a secured party knows that a person
is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of the person, and knows how to
communicate with the person:

(1) The secured party
is not liable to the person, or to a secured party or lienholder that has filed
a financing statement against the person, for failure to comply with this
Article; and

(2) The secured party's
failure to comply with this Article does not affect the liability of the person
for a deficiency.

(b) Limitation of
liability ((to debtor, obligor, another secured party, or lienholder)) based
on status as secured party. A secured party is not liable because of
its status as secured party:

(1) To a person that is
a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows:

(A) That the person is
a debtor or obligor;

(B) The identity of the
person; and

(C) How to communicate
with the person; or

(2) To a secured party
or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the
secured party knows:

(A) That the person is
a debtor; and

(B) The identity of the
person.

(c) Limitation of
liability if reasonable belief that transaction not a consumer-goods
transaction or consumer transaction. A secured party is not liable to any
person, and a person's liability for a deficiency is not affected, because of
any act or omission arising out of the secured party's reasonable belief that a
transaction is not a consumer-goods transaction or a consumer transaction or
that goods are not consumer goods, if the secured party's belief is based on
its reasonable reliance on:

(1) A debtor's
representation concerning the purpose for which collateral was to be used,
acquired, or held; or

(2) An obligor's
representation concerning the purpose for which a secured obligation was
incurred.

(d) Limitation of
liability for statutory damages. A secured party is not liable to any
person under RCW 62A.9A‑625(c)(2) for its failure to comply with RCW
62A.9A‑616.

(e) Limitation of
multiple liability for statutory damages. A secured party is not liable
under RCW 62A.9A‑625(c)(2) more than once with respect to any one secured
obligation.

Sec. 46. RCW 62A.9A-702 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-702 are each amended to read as follows:

SAVINGS CLAUSE. (a) Preeffective-date
transactions or liens. Except as otherwise provided in this section, ((chapter
250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW applies to a transaction or
lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or
created before July 1, 2001.

(b) Continuing
validity. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section
and RCW 62A.9A‑703 through ((62A.9A‑708)) section 53 of
this act:

(1) Transactions and
liens that were not governed by Article 62A.9 RCW, were validly entered into or
created before July 1, 2001, and would be subject to ((chapter 250, Laws of
2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW if they had been entered into or created
after July 1, 2001, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from those
transactions and liens remain valid after July 1, 2001; and

(2) The transactions
and liens may be terminated, completed, consummated, and enforced as required
or permitted by ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW
or by the law that otherwise would apply if ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000))
Article 62A.9A RCW had not taken effect.

(c) Preeffective-date
proceedings. ((Chapter 250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW
does not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2001.

Sec. 47. RCW 62A.9A-703 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-703 are each amended to read as follows:

SECURITY INTEREST
PERFECTED BEFORE EFFECTIVE DATE. (a) Continuing priority over lien
creditor: Perfection requirements satisfied. A security interest that is
enforceable immediately before July 1, 2001, and would have priority over the
rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time is a perfected
security interest under ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A
RCW if, ((when [on or before])) on or before July 1, 2001,
the applicable requirements for enforceability and perfection under ((chapter
250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW are satisfied without further
action.

(b) Continuing
priority over lien creditor: Perfection requirements not satisfied.
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A‑705, if, immediately before
July 1, 2001, a security interest is enforceable and would have priority over
the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time, but the
applicable requirements for enforceability or perfection under ((chapter
250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW are not satisfied ((when
[on or before])) on or before July 1, 2001, the security interest:

(1) Is a perfected
security interest for one year after July 1, 2001;

(2) Remains enforceable
thereafter only if the security interest becomes enforceable under RCW 62A.9A‑203
before the year expires; and

(3) Remains perfected
thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under ((chapter
250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW are satisfied before the year
expires.

Sec. 48. RCW 62A.9A-704 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-704 are each amended to read as follows:

SECURITY INTEREST
UNPERFECTED BEFORE EFFECTIVE DATE. A security interest that is enforceable
immediately before July 1, 2001, but which would be subordinate to the rights
of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time:

(1) Remains an
enforceable security interest for one year after July 1, 2001;

(2) Remains enforceable
thereafter if the security interest becomes enforceable under RCW 62A.9A‑203
((when [on or before])) on or before July 1, 2001, or within one
year thereafter; and

(3) Becomes perfected:

(A) Without further
action, ((when [on or before])) on July 1, 2001, if the
applicable requirements for perfection under ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000))
Article 62A.9A RCW are satisfied before or at that time; or

(B) When the applicable
requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied
after that time.

Sec. 49. RCW 62A.9A-705 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-705 are each amended to read as follows:

EFFECTIVENESS OF ACTION
TAKEN BEFORE EFFECTIVE DATE. (a) Preeffective-date action; one-year
perfection period unless reperfected. If action, other than the filing of
a financing statement, is taken before July 1, 2001, and the action would have
resulted in priority of a security interest over the rights of a person that
becomes a lien creditor had the security interest become enforceable before
July 1, 2001, the action is effective to perfect a security interest that attaches
under ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW within one
year after July 1, 2001. An attached security interest becomes unperfected one
year after July 1, 2001, unless the security interest becomes a perfected
security interest under ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A
RCW before the expiration of that period.

(b) Preeffective-date
filing. The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2001, is
effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy
the applicable requirements for perfection under ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000))
Article 62A.9A RCW.

(c) Preeffective-date
filing in jurisdiction formerly governing perfection. ((Chapter 250,
Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A RCW does not render ineffective an
effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2001, is filed and satisfies
the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction
governing perfection as provided in former RCW ((62A.9A‑103))
62A.9-103. However, except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) and
(e) of this section and RCW 62A.9A‑706, the financing statement ceases to
be effective at the earlier of:

(1) The time the
financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of the
jurisdiction in which it is filed; or

(2) June 30, 2006.

(d) Continuation
statement. The filing of a continuation statement after July 1, 2001, does
not continue the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before July 1,
2001. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement after July
1, 2001, and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing
perfection as provided in Part 3, the effectiveness of a financing statement
filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2001, continues
for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

(e) Application of
subsection (c)(2) of this section to transmitting utility financing statement.
Subsection (c)(2) of this section applies to a financing statement that, before
July 1, 2001, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the
applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction
governing perfection as provided in former RCW ((62A.9A‑103))
62A.9-103 only to the extent that Part 3 provides that the law of a
jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is
filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the
financing statement.

(f) Application of
Part 5. A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed
before July 1, 2001, and a continuation statement filed after July 1, 2001, is
effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of Part 5 for
an initial financing statement.

Sec. 50. RCW 62A.9A-706 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-706 are each amended to read as follows:

WHEN INITIAL FINANCING
STATEMENT SUFFICES TO CONTINUE EFFECTIVENESS OF FINANCING STATEMENT. (a) Initial
financing statement in lieu of continuation statement. The filing of an
initial financing statement in the office specified in RCW 62A.9A‑501
continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001,
if:

(1) The filing of an
initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a
security interest under ((chapter 250, Laws of 2000)) Article 62A.9A
RCW;

(2) The
preeffective-date financing statement was filed in an office in another state
or another office in this state; and

(3) The initial
financing statement satisfies subsection (c) of this section.

(b) Period of
continued effectiveness. The filing of an initial financing statement
under subsection (a) of this section continues the effectiveness of the
preeffective-date financing statement:

(1) If the initial
financing statement is filed before July 1, 2001, for the period provided in
RCW 62A.9‑403 with respect to a financing statement; and

(2) If the initial
financing statement is filed after July 1, 2001, for the period provided in RCW
62A.9A‑515 with respect to an initial financing statement.

(c) Requirements for
initial financing statement under subsection (a) of this section. To be
effective for purposes of subsection (a) of this section, an initial financing
statement must:

(1) Satisfy the
requirements of Part 5 for an initial financing statement;

(2) Identify the
preeffective-date financing statement by indicating the office in which the
financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file
numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation
statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

(3) Indicate that the
preeffective-date financing statement remains effective.

Sec. 51. RCW 62A.9A-707 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-707 are each amended to read as follows:

((PERSONS ENTITLED
TO FILE INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT OR CONTINUATION STATEMENT. A person may
file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part
if:

(1) The secured
party of record authorizes the filing; and

(2) The filing is
necessary under this part:

(A) To continue the
effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001; or

(B) To perfect or
continue the perfection of a security interest.))

AMENDMENT OF
PREEFFECTIVE-DATE FINANCING STATEMENT. (a) Preeffective-date financing
statement. In this section, "preeffective-date financing
statement" means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001.

(b) Applicable
law. On or after July 1, 2001, a person may add or delete collateral
covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the
information provided in, a preeffective-date financing statement only in
accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in
Part 3. However, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement
also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which
the financing statement is filed.

(c) Method of
amending: General rule. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of
this section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security
interest, the information in a preeffective-date financing statement may be
amended on or after July 1, 2001 only if:

(1) The
preeffective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office
specified in RCW 62A.9A-501;

(2) An amendment is
filed in the office specified in RCW 62A.9A‑501 concurrently with, or
after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that
satisfies RCW 62A.9A-706(c); or

(3) An initial
financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies RCW
62A.9A-706(c) is filed in the office specified in RCW 62A.9A-501.

(d) Method of
amending: Continuation. If the law of this state governs perfection of a
security interest, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement
may be continued only under RCW 62A.9A-705 (d) and (f) or 62A.9A-706.

(e) Method of
amending: Additional termination rule. Whether or not the law of this
state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a
preeffective-date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated on
or after July 1, 2001, by filing a termination statement in the office in which
the preeffective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing
statement that satisfies RCW 62A.9A‑706(c) has been filed in the office
specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in
Part 3 as the office in which to file a financing statement.

Sec. 52. RCW 62A.9A-708 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-708 are each amended to read as follows:

((PRIORITY. (a) Law
governing priority. Chapter 250, Laws of 2000 determines the priority of
conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the
claims were established before July 1, 2001, Article 62A.9 RCW determines
priority.

(b) Priority if
security interest becomes enforceable under RCW 62A.9A‑203. For
purposes of RCW 62A.9A‑322(a), the priority of a security interest that
becomes enforceable under RCW 62A.9A‑203 dates from July 1, 2001, if the
security interest is perfected under chapter 250, Laws of 2000 by the filing of
a financing statement before July 1, 2001, which would not have been effective
to perfect the security interest under Article 62A.9 RCW. This subsection does
not apply to conflicting security interests each of which is perfected by the
filing of such a financing statement.)) PERSONS ENTITLED TO FILE INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT OR
CONTINUATION STATEMENT. A person may file an initial financing statement or a
continuation statement under this part if:

(1) The secured
party of record authorizes the filing; and

(2) The filing is
necessary under this part:

(A) To continue the
effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001; or

(B) To perfect or
continue the perfection of a security interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
53. A new section is added
to Article 62A.9A RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.9A-709, to read as follows:

PRIORITY. (a) Law
governing priority. Article 62A.9A RCW determines the priority of
conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the
claims were established before July 1, 2001, Article 62A.9 RCW determines
priority.

(b) Priority if
security interest becomes enforceable under RCW 62A.9A‑203. For
purposes of RCW 62A.9A‑322(a), the priority of a security interest that
becomes enforceable under RCW 62A.9A‑203 dates from July 1, 2001, if the
security interest is perfected under Article 62A.9A RCW by the filing of a
financing statement before July 1, 2001, which would not have been effective to
perfect the security interest under Article 62A.9 RCW. This subsection does
not apply to conflicting security interests each of which is perfected by the
filing of such a financing statement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
54. RCW 60.11.9001 (Transition rule for
existing filings) and 2000 c 250 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 55. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---