BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.98.130 and 1985 c
30 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

((If any)) No
provision of an instrument creating a trust, including the provisions of any
further trust created, ((or any)) and no other disposition of
property made pursuant to exercise of a power of appointment granted in or
created through authority under such instrument ((violates)) is
invalid under the rule against perpetuities, ((neither such provision
nor any other provisions of the trust, or such further trust or other
disposition, is thereby rendered invalid during any of the following periods:

(1) The twenty-one)) or any similar statute or common law,
during the one hundred fifty years following the effective date of the
instrument.

(((2) The period
measured by any life or lives in being or conceived at the effective date of
the instrument if by the terms of the instrument the trust is to continue for
such life or lives.

(3) The period
measured by any portion of any life or lives in being or conceived at the
effective date of the instrument if by the terms of the instrument the trust is
to continue for such portion of such life or lives; and

(4) The twenty-one
years following the expiration of the periods specified in (2) and (3) above.))

Thereafter, unless
the trust assets have previously become distributable or vested, the provision
or other disposition of property is deemed to have been rendered invalid under
the rule against perpetuities.

Sec. 2. RCW 11.98.140 and 1985 c
30 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

If, during ((any
period in which)) the one hundred fifty years following the effective
date of an instrument creating a trust, ((as described in RCW 11.98.130,
or any provision thereof, is not to be rendered invalid by the rule against
perpetuities,)) any of the trust assets should by the terms of the
instrument or pursuant to any further trust or other disposition resulting from
exercise of the power of appointment granted in or created through authority
under such instrument, become distributable or any beneficial interest in any
of the trust assets should by the terms of the instrument, or such further
trust or other disposition become vested, such assets shall be distributed and
such beneficial interest shall validly vest in accordance with the instrument,
or such further trust or other disposition.

Sec. 3. RCW 11.98.150 and 1985 c
30 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

If, at the ((expiration
of any period in which)) end of the one hundred fifty years following
the effective date of an instrument creating a trust, ((as described in
RCW 11.98.009, or any provision thereof, is not to be rendered invalid by the
rule against perpetuities,)) any of the trust assets have not by the terms
of the trust instrument become distributable or vested, then the assets shall
be distributed as the superior court having jurisdiction directs, giving effect
to the general intent of the creator of the trust or person exercising a power
of appointment in the case of any further trust or other disposition of
property made pursuant to the exercise of a power of appointment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies to any
irrevocable trust with an effective date on or after January 1, 2002. Unless
the trust instrument otherwise provides, this act does not apply to: (1) Any
irrevocable trust with an effective date prior to January 1, 2002; or (2) a
revocable inter vivos trust or testamentary trust with an effective date on or
after January 1, 2002, if at all times after the date of enactment the creator
of the revocable inter vivos trust or testamentary trust was not competent to
revoke, amend, or modify the instrument.

---
END ---