BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.260 and 1992 c
212 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any member
whose public school service is interrupted by active service to the United
States as a member of its military, naval or air service, or to the state of
Washington, as a member of the legislature, may upon becoming reemployed in the
public schools, receive credit for that service upon presenting satisfactory
proof, and contributing to the member reserve, either in a lump sum or
installments, amounts determined by the director. Except that no military
service credit in excess of five years shall be established or reestablished
after July 1, 1961, unless the service was actually rendered during time of
war.

(2)(a) After
completing twenty-five years of creditable service, any member may have service
in the armed forces that was performed prior to membership in the retirement
system credited to him or her as a member. However, the total number of years
of military service credit from all sources, as authorized by any statute, may
not exceed five years.

(b) The member must
also contribute to the member reserve, either in a lump sum or installments,
amounts determined by the director.

(c)
This section does not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning
of RCW 41.04.005. Military service shall not be credited to any member who is
receiving full military retirement benefits pursuant to Title 10 United States
Code.

--- END ---