BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35A.01.070 and 1994
c 223 s 24 and 1994 c 81 s 66 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

Where used in this
title with reference to procedures established by this title in regard to a
change of plan or classification of government, unless a different meaning is
plainly required by the context:

(1)
"Classify" means a change from a city of the first or second class,
an unclassified city, or a town, to a code city.

(2)
"Classification" means either that portion of the general law under
which a city or a town operates under Title 35 RCW as a first or second class
city, unclassified city, or town, or otherwise as a code city.

(3)
"Organize" means to provide for officers after becoming a code city,
under the same general plan of government under which the city operated prior
to becoming a code city, pursuant to RCW 35A.02.055.

(4)
"Organization" means the general plan of government under which a city
operates.

(5) "Plan of
government" means a mayor-council form of government under chapter 35A.12
RCW, council-manager form of government under chapter 35A.13 RCW, or a
mayor-council, council-manager, or commission form of government in general
that is retained by a noncharter code city as provided in RCW 35A.02.130,
without regard to variations in the number of elective offices or whether
officers are elective or appointive.

(6)
"Reclassify" means changing from a code city to the classification,
if any, held by such a city immediately prior to becoming a code city.

(7)
"Reclassification" means changing from city or town operating under
Title 35 RCW to a city operating under Title 35A RCW, or vice versa; a change
in classification.

(8)
"Reorganize" means changing the plan of government under which a city
or town operates to a different general plan of government((, for which an
election of new officers under RCW 35A.02.050 is required)). A city or
town shall not be deemed to have reorganized simply by increasing or decreasing
the number of members of its legislative body.

(9)
"Reorganization" means a change in general plan of government ((where
an election of all new officers is required in order to accomplish this change))
under which a city operates, but an increase or decrease in the number
of members of its legislative body shall not be deemed to constitute a
reorganization.

Sec. 2. RCW 35A.06.030 and 1994
c 223 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

By use of the
resolution for election or petition for election methods described in RCW
35A.06.040, any noncharter code city which has operated for more than six
consecutive years under one of the optional plans of government authorized by
this title, or for more than a combined total of six consecutive years under a
particular plan of government both as a code city and under the same general
plan under Title 35 RCW immediately prior to becoming a code city, may abandon
such organization and may reorganize and adopt another plan of government
authorized for noncharter code cities, but only after having been a noncharter
code city for more than one year or a city after operating for more than six
consecutive years under a particular plan of government as a noncharter code
city: PROVIDED, That these limitations shall not apply to a city seeking to
adopt a charter.

In
reorganization under a different general plan of government as a noncharter
code city, officers shall ((all be elected as provided in RCW 35A.02.050))
serve the remainder of their terms. If a city with a mayor-council plan of
government is reorganized with a council-manager plan of government, the mayor
shall serve as a councilmember for the remainder of his or her term. If a city
with a council-manager plan of government is reorganized with a mayor-council
plan of government, the mayor shall be elected as provided in RCW 35A.02.050.
When a noncharter code city adopts a plan of government other than those
authorized under Title 35A RCW, such city ceases to be governed under this
optional municipal code ((and)), shall be classified as a city or
town of the class selected in the proceeding for adoption of such new plan,
with the powers granted to such class under the general law, and shall elect
officers as provided in RCW 35A.02.050.

Sec. 3. RCW 35A.06.060 and 1979
ex.s. c 18 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

If a
majority of votes cast at the election favor abandonment of the general plan of
government under which the noncharter code city is then organized and
reorganization under the different general plan proposed in the resolution or
petition, the officers to be elected shall be those prescribed by the plan of
government so adopted, and they shall be elected as provided in RCW ((35A.02.050))
35A.06.030. If the city is ((to remain a noncharter code city, or if
the city is abandoning optional municipal code status, they)) adopting a
plan of government other than those authorized under this title, the officers
shall be elected at the next succeeding general municipal election. Upon the
election, qualification, and assumption of office by such officers the
reorganization of the government of such municipality shall be complete and
such municipality shall thereafter be governed under such plan. If the plan so
adopted is not a plan authorized for noncharter code cities, upon the election,
qualification, and assumption of office by such officers the municipality shall
cease to be a noncharter code city governed under the provisions of this
optional municipal code and shall revert to the classification selected and
shall be governed by the general laws relating to municipalities of such class
with the powers conferred by law upon municipalities of such class. Such change
of classification shall not affect the then existing property rights or
liabilities of the municipal corporation.

Sec. 4. RCW 35A.08.030 and 1967
ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.030 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
body of any city having ten thousand or more inhabitants may, by resolution,
provide for submission to the voters of the question whether the city shall
become a charter code city and be governed in accordance with a charter to be
adopted by the voters under the provisions of this title. The legislative body
must provide for such an election upon receipt of a sufficient petition
therefor signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten
percent of the votes cast at the last general municipal election therein. The
question may be submitted to the voters at the next general municipal election
if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days or at a special
election held for that purpose not less than ninety nor more than one hundred
and eighty days after the passage of the resolution or the filing of the
certificate of sufficiency of the petition. At such election provision shall
also be made for the election of fifteen freeholders who, upon a favorable vote
on the question, shall constitute the charter commission charged with the duty
of framing a charter for submission to the voters. If the vote in favor of
adopting a charter receives forty percent or less of the total vote on the
question of charter adoption, no new election on the question of charter
adoption may be held for a period of two years from the date of the election in
which the charter proposal failed.

---
END ---