BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.52.065 and 1991
sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state shall levy for
collection in the following year for the support of common schools of the state
a tax ((of three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value)) at the rate specified in subsection (2) of this section upon
the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to the
state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue.

(2) The rate of
state tax in subsection (1) of this section shall be as follows:

(a) Three dollars
and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes levied for
collection in 2000, and before;

(b) Three dollars
per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes levied for collection in 2001;
and

(c) For taxes levied
for collection in 2002 and for each year thereafter, the greater of one dollar
per thousand dollars of assessed value or the rate imposed in the previous year
reduced by twenty cents. On December 1, 2001, and on December 1st of each year
thereafter, the department shall determine the growth in state personal income
for the previous calendar year as published by the bureau of economic
analysis. If the growth is equal to or less than zero, then the reduction in
the state rate for taxes collected the following year shall not be made.

(3) As used in
this section, "the support of common schools" includes the payment of
the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction projects
for the common schools.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.52.043 and 1995 c
99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within and subject to
the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax
levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named
shall be as follows:

(1) Levies of the
senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the state shall
not exceed ((three dollars and sixty cents)) the dollar rate per
thousand dollars of assessed value specified in RCW 84.52.065 adjusted
to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by
the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the
common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar and
eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy by any road
district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or town shall not
exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase its
levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and
forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for general
county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district
within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.

(2) The aggregate
levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the
state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all
taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns,
port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this
subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing
law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c)
levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230;
(d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed
under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing for very
low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; and (f) the portions of levies
by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.52.050 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
hereinafter provided, the aggregate of all tax levies upon real and personal
property by the state and all taxing districts, now existing or hereafter
created, shall not in any year exceed ((one percentum)) the following
percentage of the true and fair value of such property in money: ((PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That))

(a) For taxes levied
for collection in 2000, and before, 1.0 percent;

(b) For taxes levied
for collection in 2001, 0.94 percent; and

(c) For taxes levied
for collection in 2002 and for each year thereafter, the greater of 0.74 or the
percentage from the previous year reduced by two one-hundredths of one
percent. On December 1, 2001, and on December 1st of each year thereafter, the
department shall determine the growth in state personal income for the previous
calendar year as published by the bureau of economic analysis. If the growth
is equal to or less than zero, then the reduction in the percentage for taxes
collected the following year shall not be made.

(2) Nothing
herein shall prevent levies at the rates now provided by law by or for any port
or public utility district. The term "taxing district" for the purposes
of this section shall mean any political subdivision, municipal corporation,
district, or other governmental agency authorized by law to levy, or have
levied for it, ad valorem taxes on property, other than a port or public
utility district. Such aggregate limitation or any specific limitation imposed
by law in conformity therewith may be exceeded only as authorized by law and in
conformity with the provisions of Article VII, section 2(a), (b), or (c) of the
Constitution of the state of Washington.

(3) Nothing
herein contained shall prohibit the legislature from allocating or reallocating
the authority to levy taxes between the taxing districts of the state and its
political subdivisions in a manner which complies with the aggregate tax
limitation set forth in this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.58.150 and 1984 c
186 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A solid waste
disposal district shall not have the power to levy an annual levy without voter
approval, but it shall have the power to levy a tax, in excess of the ((one
percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the
district for a one year period to be used for operating or capital purposes
whenever authorized by the electors of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052
and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

A solid waste disposal
district may issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, subject
to the limitations prescribed in RCW 39.36.020(1), and may provide for the
retirement of the bonds by voter-approved bond retirement tax levies pursuant
to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056. Such
general obligation bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter
39.46 RCW.

A solid waste disposal
district may issue revenue bonds to fund its activities. Such revenue bonds
may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in
RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, such revenue bonds may be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 36.60.040 and 1983 c
303 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A county rail district
is not authorized to impose a regular ad valorem property tax levy but may:

(1) Levy an ad valorem
property tax, in excess of the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW
84.52.050, upon the property within the district for a one-year period to
be used for operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the voters of
the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the
state Constitution.

(2) Provide for the
retirement of voter approved general obligation bonds, issued for capital
purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies, in
excess of the one percent limitation, whenever authorized by the voters of the
district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and
RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.69.145 and 1994 c
156 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A park and
recreation district may impose regular property tax levies in an amount equal
to sixty cents or less per thousand dollars of assessed value of property in
the district in each year for six consecutive years when specifically
authorized so to do by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof
approving a proposition authorizing the levies submitted at a special election
or at the regular election of the district, at which election the number of
voters voting "yes" on the proposition shall constitute three-fifths
of a number equal to forty per centum of the number of voters voting in such
district at the last preceding general election when the number of voters
voting on the proposition does not exceed forty per centum of the number of
voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general election;
or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof voting on the
proposition if the number of voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty per
centum of the number of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding
general election. A proposition authorizing the tax levies shall not be
submitted by a park and recreation district more than twice in any twelve-month
period. Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW 29.30.111. In the event a
park and recreation district is levying property taxes, which in combination
with property taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the ((one
percent)) limitation provided for in ((Article 7, section 2, of our
state Constitution)) RCW 84.52.050 result in taxes in excess of the
limitation provided for in RCW 84.52.043, the park and recreation district
property tax levy shall be reduced or eliminated before the property tax levies
of other taxing districts are reduced.

(2) The
limitation in RCW 84.55.010 shall not apply to the first levy imposed under
this section following the approval of the levies by the voters under
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 36.73.060 and 1987 c
327 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A transportation
benefit district may levy an ad valorem property tax in excess of the ((one
percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050 upon the property within the
district for a one-year period whenever authorized by the voters of the
district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state
Constitution.

(2) A district may
provide for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation bonds, issued
for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax
levies in excess of the one percent limitation whenever authorized by the
voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state
Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.83.030 and 1983 c
130 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A service district
may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the ((one percent))
limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the district for a
one-year period whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to
RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) A service district
may provide for the retirement of voter approved general obligation bonds,
issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property
tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever authorized by the
voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state
Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 9. RCW 36.100.050 and 1988
ex.s. c 1 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the ((one percent))
limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the district for a
one-year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever
authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article
VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) A public facilities
district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation
bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem
property tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever
authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b)
of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec. 10. RCW 67.38.130 and 1984 c
131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of a
cultural arts, stadium and convention district may levy or cause to levy the
following ad valorem taxes:

(1) Regular ad valorem
property tax levies in an amount equal to twenty-five cents or less per
thousand dollars of the assessed value of property in the district in each year
for six consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority
of at least three-fifths of the electors thereof approving a proposition
authorizing the levies submitted at a general or special election, at which
election the number of persons voting "yes" on the proposition shall
constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percentum of the total votes
cast in such taxing district at the last preceding general election; or by a
majority of at least three-fifths of the electors thereof voting on the
proposition when the number of electors voting yes on the proposition exceeds
forty percentum of the total votes cast in such taxing district in the last
preceding general election. Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW 29.30.111.

In the event a cultural
arts, stadium and convention district is levying property taxes, which in
combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the
((one percent)) limitation provided for in ((Article VII, section 2,
of our state Constitution)) RCW 84.52.050 result in taxes in excess
of the limitation provided for in RCW 84.52.043, the cultural arts, stadium and
convention district property tax levy shall be reduced or eliminated before the
property tax levies of other taxing districts are reduced: PROVIDED, That no
cultural arts, stadium, and convention district may pledge anticipated revenues
derived from the property tax herein authorized as security for payments of
bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section: PROVIDED, FURTHER,
That such limitation shall not apply to property taxes approved pursuant to
subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

The limitation in RCW
84.55.010 shall apply to levies after the first levy authorized under this
section following the approval of such levy by voters pursuant to this section.

(2) An annual excess ad
valorem property tax for general district purposes when authorized by the
district voters in the manner prescribed by ((section 2,)) Article VII,
section 2 of the state Constitution and by RCW 84.52.052.

(3) Multi-year excess
ad valorem property tax levies used to retire general obligation bond issues
when authorized by the district voters in the manner prescribed by ((section
2,)) Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution and by
RCW 84.52.056.

The
district shall include in its regular property tax levy for each year a sum
sufficient to pay the interest and principal on all outstanding general
obligation bonds issued without voter approval pursuant to RCW 67.38.110 and
may include a sum sufficient to create a sinking fund for the redemption of all
outstanding bonds.

Sec. 11. RCW 84.52.010 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as is permitted
under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in specific amounts.

The rate percent of all
taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts
coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and fixed by the
county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by
law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for
purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be determined, calculated
and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
taxing districts respectively.

When a county assessor
finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to
the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the
limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor shall recompute
and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1) The full certified
rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town
purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the
limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take precedence
over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that
required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW
84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district
that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent))
limitation under RCW 84.52.050 exceeds ((one percent of the true and
fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050,
then these levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by
a metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true
and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050
or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the ((one percent)) limitation under RCW
84.52.050 still exceeds ((one percent of the true and fair value of any
property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050, then the levies
imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed
under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall
be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies that
are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until
the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of
any property or eliminated.

(2) The certified rates
of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts
imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to
bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:

(a) First, the
certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized
under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated;

(b) Second, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c) Third, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire
protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d) Fourth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(e) Fifth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In determining whether
the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the
limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in that
section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as apportioned to
the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW 84.48.080 without
regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec. 12. RCW 84.69.020 and 1999
sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

On the order of the
county treasurer, ad valorem taxes paid before or after delinquency shall be
refunded if they were:

(1) Paid more than
once;

(2) Paid as a result of
manifest error in description;

(3) Paid as a result of
a clerical error in extending the tax rolls;

(4) Paid as a result of
other clerical errors in listing property;

(5) Paid with respect
to improvements which did not exist on assessment date;

(6) Paid under levies
or statutes adjudicated to be illegal or unconstitutional;

(7) Paid as a result of
mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by any person exempted from paying
real property taxes or a portion thereof pursuant to RCW 84.36.381 through
84.36.389, as now or hereafter amended;

(8) Paid as a result of
mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by either a public official or
employee or by any person with respect to real property in which the person
paying the same has no legal interest;

(9) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the county board of equalization
and ordered reduced by the board;

(10) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the state board of tax appeals
and ordered reduced by the board: PROVIDED, That the amount refunded under
subsections (9) and (10) of this section shall only be for the difference
between the tax paid on the basis of the appealed valuation and the tax payable
on the valuation adjusted in accordance with the board's order;

(11) Paid as a state
property tax levied upon property, the assessed value of which has been
established by the state board of tax appeals for the year of such levy:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the amount refunded shall only be for the difference
between the state property tax paid and the amount of state property tax which
would, when added to all other property taxes within the ((one percent))
limitation of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution equal ((one
percent)) the percentage under RCW 84.52.050 of the assessed value
established by the board;

(12) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation which was adjudicated to be unlawful or excessive:
PROVIDED, That the amount refunded shall be for the difference between the
amount of tax which was paid on the basis of the valuation adjudged unlawful or
excessive and the amount of tax payable on the basis of the assessed valuation
determined as a result of the proceeding;

(13) Paid on property
acquired under RCW 84.60.050, and canceled under RCW 84.60.050(2);

(14) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW 84.48.065;

(15) Paid on the basis
of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW 84.40.039; or

(16) Abated under RCW
84.70.010.

No refunds under the
provisions of this section shall be made because of any error in determining
the valuation of property, except as authorized in subsections (9), (10), (11),
and (12) of this section nor may any refunds be made if a bona fide purchaser has
acquired rights that would preclude the assessment and collection of the
refunded tax from the property that should properly have been charged with the
tax. Any refunds made on delinquent taxes shall include the proportionate
amount of interest and penalties paid. The county treasurer may deduct from
moneys collected for the benefit of the state's levy, refunds of the state levy
including interest on the levy as provided by this section and chapter 84.68
RCW.

The county treasurer of
each county shall make all refunds determined to be authorized by this section,
and by the first Monday in February of each year, report to the county
legislative authority a list of all refunds made under this section during the
previous year. The list is to include the name of the person receiving the
refund, the amount of the refund, and the reason for the refund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---