BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.10.010 and 1994 c
132 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the traditional process of awarding public works contracts in lump sum to
the lowest responsible bidder is a fair and objective method of selecting a
contractor. However, under certain circumstances, alternative public works contracting
procedures may best serve the public interest if such procedures are
implemented in an open and fair process based on objective and equitable
criteria. The purpose of this chapter is to authorize the use of certain
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures by state agencies
and ((large)) municipalities under limited circumstances, to prescribe
appropriate requirements to ensure that such contracting procedures serve the
public interest, and to establish a process for evaluation of such contracting
procedures.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.10.020 and 2000 c
209 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Alternative
public works contracting procedure" means the design-build and the general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedures authorized in RCW
39.10.050 and 39.10.060, respectively.

(2) "Public
body" means the state department of general administration; the University
of Washington; Washington State University; Central Washington University;
Eastern Washington University; Western Washington University; The Evergreen
State College; every city with a population greater than ((one hundred
fifty)) seventy thousand and any public authority chartered by
such city under RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as
provided in RCW 39.10.120(4); ((every city authorized to use the
design-build procedure for a water system demonstration project under RCW
39.10.065(3);)) every county with a population greater than ((four))
three hundred ((fifty)) thousand; every port district with ((a
population)) total revenues greater than ((five hundred thousand))
fifteen million dollars per year; every public utility district with
revenues from energy sales greater than sixty-five million dollars per year;
and those school districts proposing projects that are considered and approved
by the school district project review board under RCW 39.10.115.

(3) "Public works
project" means any work for a public body within the definition of the
term public work in RCW 39.04.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 39.10.050 and 1997 c
376 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, and after complying with RCW 39.10.030, the following
public bodies may utilize the design-build procedure of public works
contracting for public works projects authorized under this section: The state
department of general administration; the University of Washington; Washington
State University; Central Washington University; Eastern Washington
University; Western Washington University; The Evergreen State College;
every city with a population greater than ((one hundred fifty)) seventy
thousand and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730
through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW 39.10.120(4);
every county with a population greater than ((four)) three
hundred ((fifty)) thousand; ((and)) every port district with ((a
population)) total revenues greater than ((five hundred thousand))
fifteen million dollars per year; and every public utility district with
revenues from energy sales greater than sixty-five million dollars per year.
The authority granted to port districts in this section is in addition to and
does not affect existing contracting authority under RCW 53.08.120 and
53.08.130. The authority granted to public utility districts in this
section and in RCW 39.10.060 is in addition to and does not affect existing
contracting authority under chapter 54.04 RCW. For the purposes of this
section, "design-build procedure" means a contract between a public
body and another party in which the party agrees to both design and build the
facility, portion of the facility, or other item specified in the contract.

(2) Public bodies
authorized under this section may utilize the design-build procedure for public
works projects valued over ((ten)) twelve million dollars, or
on and after January 1, 2010, valued over sixteen million dollars, where:

(a) The construction
activities or technologies to be used are highly specialized and a design-build
approach is critical in developing the construction methodology or implementing
the proposed technology; or

(b) The project design
is repetitive in nature and is an incidental part of the installation or
construction; or

(c) Regular interaction
with and feedback from facilities users and operators during design is not
critical to an effective facility design.

(3) Public bodies
authorized under this section may also use the design-build procedure for the
following projects that meet the criteria in subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this
section:

(a) The construction or
erection of preengineered metal buildings or prefabricated modular buildings,
regardless of cost; or

(b) The construction of
new student housing projects valued over five million dollars.

(4) Contracts for
design-build services shall be awarded through a competitive process utilizing
public solicitation of proposals for design-build services. The public body
shall publish at least once in a legal newspaper of general circulation
published in or as near as possible to that part of the county in which the
public work will be done, a notice of its request for proposals for
design-build services and the availability and location of the request for
proposal documents. The request for proposal documents shall include:

(a) A detailed
description of the project including programmatic, performance, and technical
requirements and specifications, functional and operational elements, minimum
and maximum net and gross areas of any building, and, at the discretion of the
public body, preliminary engineering and architectural drawings;

(b) The reasons for
using the design-build procedure;

(c) A description of
the qualifications to be required of the proposer including, but not limited
to, submission of the proposer's accident prevention program;

(d) A description of
the process the public body will use to evaluate qualifications and proposals,
including evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors. Evaluation
factors shall include, but not be limited to: Proposal price; ability of professional
personnel; past performance on similar projects; ability to meet time and
budget requirements; ability to provide a performance and payment bond for the
project; recent, current, and projected work loads of the firm; location; and
the concept of the proposal;

(e) The form of the
contract to be awarded;

(f) The maximum
allowable construction cost and minority and women enterprise total project
goals;

(g) The amount to be
paid to finalists submitting best and final proposals who are not awarded a design-build
contract; and

(h) Other information
relevant to the project.

(5) The public body
shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals based on the factors,
weighting, and process identified in the request for proposals. Based on its
evaluation, the public body shall select not fewer than three nor more than
five finalists to submit best and final proposals. The public body may, in its
sole discretion, reject all proposals. Design-build contracts shall be awarded
using the procedures in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(a) Best and final
proposals shall be evaluated and scored based on the factors, weighting, and
process identified in the initial request for proposals. The public body may
score the proposals using a system that measures the quality and technical
merits of the proposal on a unit price basis. Final proposals may not be
considered if the proposal cost is greater than the maximum allowable
construction cost identified in the initial request for proposals. The public
body shall initiate negotiations with the firm submitting the highest scored
best and final proposal. If the public body is unable to execute a contract
with the firm submitting the highest scored best and final proposal,
negotiations with that firm may be suspended or terminated and the public body
may proceed to negotiate with the next highest scored firm. Public bodies
shall continue in accordance with this procedure until a contract agreement is
reached or the selection process is terminated.

(b) If the public body
determines that all finalists are capable of producing plans and specifications
that adequately meet project requirements, the public body may award the
contract to the firm that submits the responsive best and final proposal with
the lowest price.

(6) The
firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and payment bond for the
contracted amount. The public body shall provide appropriate honorarium
payments to finalists submitting best and final proposals who are not awarded a
design-build contract. Honorarium payments shall be sufficient to generate
meaningful competition among potential proposers on design-build projects.

Sec. 4. RCW 39.10.060 and 2000 c
209 s 2 and 2000 c 194 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, and after complying with RCW 39.10.030, ((the
following)) a public ((bodies)) body may utilize the
general contractor/construction manager procedure of public works contracting
for public works projects authorized under subsection (2) of this section((:
The state department of general administration; the University of Washington;
Washington State University; every city with a population greater than one
hundred fifty thousand; every county with a population greater than four
hundred fifty thousand; every port district with a population greater than five
hundred thousand; and those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board under RCW
39.10.115)). For the purposes of this section, "general
contractor/construction manager" means a firm with which a public body has
selected and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to be guaranteed
by the firm, after competitive selection through formal advertisement and
competitive bids, to provide services during the design phase that may include
life-cycle cost design considerations, value engineering, scheduling, cost
estimating, constructability, alternative construction options for cost
savings, and sequencing of work, and to act as the construction manager and
general contractor during the construction phase.

(2) Except those school
districts proposing projects that are considered and approved by the school
district project review board, public bodies authorized under this
section may utilize the general contractor/construction manager procedure for
public works projects valued over ((ten)) twelve million dollars,
or on and after January 1, 2010, valued over sixteen million dollars,
where:

(a) Implementation of
the project involves complex scheduling requirements; or

(b) The project
involves construction at an existing facility which must continue to operate
during construction; or

(c) The involvement of
the general contractor/construction manager during the design stage is critical
to the success of the project.

(3) Public bodies
should select general contractor/construction managers early in the life of
public works projects, and in most situations no later than the completion of
schematic design.

(4) Contracts for the
services of a general contractor/construction manager under this section shall
be awarded through a competitive process requiring the public solicitation of
proposals for general contractor/construction manager services. The public
solicitation of proposals shall include: A description of the project,
including programmatic, performance, and technical requirements and
specifications when available; the reasons for using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure; a description of the qualifications
to be required of the proposer, including submission of the proposer's accident
prevention program; a description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and the
relative weight of factors; the form of the contract to be awarded; the
estimated maximum allowable construction cost; minority and women business
enterprise total project goals, where applicable; and the bid instructions to
be used by the general contractor/construction manager finalists. Evaluation
factors shall include, but not be limited to: Ability of professional
personnel, past performance in negotiated and complex projects, and ability to
meet time and budget requirements; the scope of work the general
contractor/construction manager proposes to self-perform and its ability to
perform it; location; recent, current, and projected work loads of the firm;
and the concept of their proposal. A public body shall establish a committee
to evaluate the proposals. After the committee has selected the most qualified
finalists, these finalists shall submit final proposals, including sealed bids
for the percent fee, which is the percentage amount to be earned by the general
contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit, on the estimated
maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for the detailed
specified general conditions work. The public body shall select the firm
submitting the highest scored final proposal using the evaluation factors and
the relative weight of factors published in the public solicitation of
proposals.

(5) The maximum
allowable construction cost may be negotiated between the public body and the
selected firm after the scope of the project is adequately determined to
establish a guaranteed contract cost for which the general contractor/construction
manager will provide a performance and payment bond. The guaranteed contract
cost includes the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions
work, the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, the percent fee on the
negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, and sales tax. If the public
body is unable to negotiate a satisfactory maximum allowable construction cost
with the firm selected that the public body determines to be fair, reasonable,
and within the available funds, negotiations with that firm shall be formally
terminated and the public body shall negotiate with the next highest scored
firm and continue until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated.
If the maximum allowable construction cost varies more than fifteen percent
from the bid estimated maximum allowable construction cost due to requested and
approved changes in the scope by the public body, the percent fee shall be
renegotiated.

(6) All subcontract
work shall be competitively bid with public bid openings. Subcontract work
shall not be issued for bid until the public body has approved, in consultation
with the office of minority and women's business enterprises or the equivalent
local agency, a plan prepared by the general contractor/construction manager
for attaining applicable minority and women business enterprise total project
goals that equitably spreads women and minority enterprise opportunities to as
many firms in as many bid packages as is practicable. When critical to the
successful completion of a subcontractor bid package and after publication
of notice of intent to determine bidder eligibility in a legal newspaper of
general circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the
county in which the public work will be done at least twenty days before
requesting qualifications from interested subcontract bidders, the owner
and general contractor/construction manager may ((evaluate for)) determine
subcontractor bidding eligibility ((a subcontractor's ability, time,
budget, and specification requirements based on the subcontractor's performance
of those items on previous projects)) using the following evaluation
criteria:

(a) Adequate
financial resources or the ability to secure such resources;

(b) History of
successful completion of a contract of similar type and scope;

(c) Project
management and project supervision personnel with experience on similar
projects and the availability of such personnel for the project;

(d) Current and
projected workload and the impact the project will have on the subcontractor's
current and projected workload;

(e) Ability to
accurately estimate the subcontract bid package scope of work;

(f) Ability to meet
subcontract bid package shop drawing and other coordination procedures;

(g) Eligibility to
receive an award under applicable laws and regulations; and

(h) Ability to meet
subcontract bid package scheduling requirements.

The owner and
general contractor/construction manager shall weigh the evaluation criteria and
determine a minimum acceptable score to be considered an eligible subcontract
bidder.

After publication of
notice of intent to determine bidder eligibility, subcontractors requesting
eligibility shall be provided the evaluation criteria and weighting to be used
by the owner and general contractor/construction manager to determine eligible
subcontract bidders. After the owner and general contractor/construction
manager determine eligible subcontract bidders, subcontractors requesting
eligibility shall be provided the results and scoring of the subcontract bidder
eligibility determination.

Subcontract bid
packages shall be awarded to the responsible bidder submitting the low
responsive bid. The requirements of RCW 39.30.060 apply to each subcontract
bid package. All subcontractors who bid work over three hundred thousand
dollars shall post a bid bond and all subcontractors who are awarded a contract
over three hundred thousand dollars shall provide a performance and payment
bond for their contract amount. All other subcontractors shall provide a
performance and payment bond if required by the general contractor/construction
manager. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is
prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for
bids is made for the project. Except as provided for under subsection (7) of
this section, bidding on subcontract work by the general
contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is prohibited. The general
contractor/construction manager may negotiate with the low-responsive bidder in
accordance with RCW 39.10.080 or, if unsuccessful in such negotiations, rebid.

(7) The general
contractor/construction manager, or its subsidiaries, may bid on subcontract
work if:

(a) The work within the
subcontract bid package is customarily performed by the general
contractor/construction manager;

(b) The bid opening is
managed by the public body; and

(c) Notification of the
general contractor/construction manager's intention to bid is included in the
public solicitation of bids for the bid package.

In no event may the
value of subcontract work performed by the general contractor/construction
manager exceed thirty percent of the negotiated maximum allowable construction
cost.

(8) A public body may
include an incentive clause in any contract awarded under this section for
savings of either time or cost or both from that originally negotiated. No
incentives granted may exceed five percent of the maximum allowable
construction cost. If the project is completed for less than the agreed upon
maximum allowable construction cost, any savings not otherwise negotiated as
part of an incentive clause shall accrue to the public body. If the project is
completed for more than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost,
excepting increases due to any contract change orders approved by the public
body, the additional cost shall be the responsibility of the general
contractor/construction manager.

Sec. 5. RCW 39.10.110 and 1997 c
376 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established a ((temporary independent oversight)) public works
procurement committee to review the utilization of the alternative public
works contracting procedures authorized under this chapter, to evaluate
potential future utilization of other alternative contracting procedures,
including, but not limited to, contractor prequalification, and, if desired by
the committee, to review traditional public works contracting procedures used
by state agencies and municipalities. The committee shall also pursue the
development of a mentoring program for expansion of the authorities in this
chapter to other public bodies. The membership of the committee shall
include: Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major
caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; two members
of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the
senate; representatives from the appropriate segments of the construction,
contracting, subcontracting, and design industries, appointed by the governor;
representatives from appropriate labor organizations, appointed by the
governor; representatives from public bodies authorized to use the alternative
public works contracting procedures under this chapter, appointed by the
governor; a representative from the office of minority and women's business
enterprises, appointed by the governor; and a representative from the office of
financial management, appointed by the governor. The governor shall maintain a
balance between representatives from public agencies and the private sector
when appointing members to the committee, and shall consider the
recommendations of the established organizations representing the construction,
contracting, subcontracting, and design industries and organized labor in
making the industry and labor appointments.

(2) ((The committee
shall meet beginning after July 1, 1994.)) A chair or cochairs shall be
selected from among the committee's membership. Staff support for the
committee shall be provided by the agencies and organizations represented on
the committee.

(3) Public bodies
utilizing the alternative contracting procedures authorized under this chapter
shall provide any requested information concerning implementation of projects
under this chapter to the committee in a timely manner, excepting any trade
secrets or proprietary information.

(4) The committee shall
report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature by December ((10,
2000,)) 10th of each year concerning its findings and
recommendations.

Sec. 6. 2000 c 138 s 106
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

A report on the use of
the small works roster shall be made to the ((independent oversight)) public
works procurement committee established under RCW 39.10.110 prior to the
2003 legislative session.

Sec. 7. RCW 39.10.115 and 2000 c
209 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The school district
project review board is established to review school district proposals
submitted by school districts to use alternative public works contracting
procedures. The board shall select and approve qualified projects based upon
an evaluation of the information submitted by the school district under
subsection (2) of this section. The membership of the board shall be selected
by the ((independent oversight)) public works procurement committee
as established under RCW 39.10.110 and shall include the following
representatives, each having experience with public works or commercial
construction: One representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction; one representative from the office of financial management;
two representatives from the construction industry, one of whom works for a
construction company with gross annual revenues of twenty million dollars or
less; one representative from the specialty contracting industry; one
representative from organized labor; one representative from the design
industry; one representative from a public body previously authorized under
this chapter to use an alternative public works contracting procedure who has
experience using such alternative contracting procedures; one representative
from school districts with ten thousand or more annual average full-time
equivalent pupils; and one representative from school districts with fewer than
ten thousand average full-time equivalent pupils. Each member shall be
appointed for a term of three years, with the first three-year term commencing
after June 8, 2000. Any member of the school district project review board who
is directly affiliated with any applicant before the board must recuse him or
herself from consideration of the application.

(2) A school district
seeking to use alternative contracting procedures authorized under this chapter
shall file an application with the school district project review board. The
application form shall require the district to submit a detailed statement of
the proposed project, including the school district's name; student population
based upon October full-time equivalents; the current projected total budget
for the project, including the estimated construction costs, costs for
professional services, equipment and furnishing costs, off-site costs, contract
administration costs, and other related project costs; the anticipated project
design and construction schedule; a summary of the school district's
construction activity for the preceding six years; and an explanation of why
the school district believes the use of an alternative contracting procedure is
in the public interest and why the school district is qualified to use an
alternative contracting procedure, including a summary of the relevant
experience of the school district's management team. The applicant shall also
provide in a timely manner any other information concerning implementation of
projects under this chapter requested by the school district project review
board to assist in its consideration.

(3) Any school district
whose application is approved by the school district project review board shall
comply with the public notification and review requirements in RCW 39.10.030.

(4) Any school district
whose application is approved by the school district project review board shall
not use as an evaluation factor whether a contractor submitting a bid for the
approved project has had prior general contractor/construction manager
procedure experience.

(5) The school district
project review board shall prepare and issue a report reviewing the use of the
alternative public works contracting procedures by school districts. The board
shall report to the ((independent oversight)) public works procurement
committee at least sixty days before the ((oversight)) committee is
required to report to the legislature under RCW 39.10.110(4).

Sec. 8. RCW 39.10.120 and 1997 c
376 s 7 and 1997 c 220 s 404 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the alternative public works
contracting procedures authorized under this chapter are limited to public
works contracts signed before July 1, ((2001)) 2007. Methods of
public works contracting authorized by RCW 39.10.050 and 39.10.060 shall remain
in full force and effect until completion of contracts signed before July 1, ((2001))
2007.

(2) For the purposes of
a baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, the design-build contracting
procedures under RCW 39.10.050 shall remain in full force and effect until
completion of contracts signed before December 31, 1997.

(3) For the purposes of
a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, the design-build
contracting procedures under RCW 39.10.050 shall remain in full force and
effect until completion of contracts signed before December 31, 2002.

(4) A public
authority chartered by a city that is a public body may utilize an alternative
public works contracting procedure under this chapter only after receiving
specific authorization on a project-by-project basis from the governing body of
the city. For purposes of public authorities authorized to use alternative
public works contracting procedures under this chapter, the city chartering any
such public authority shall itself comply with RCW 39.10.030 on behalf of the
public authority.

Sec. 9. RCW 39.10.902 and 1997 c
376 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective July 1, ((2001)) 2007:

(1) RCW 39.10.010 and section
1 of this act & 1994 c 132 s 1;

(2) RCW 39.10.020 and section
2 of this act, 2000 c 209 s 1, 1997 c 376 s 1, & 1994 c 132 s 2;

(3) RCW 39.10.030 and 1997
c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;

(4) RCW 39.10.040 and
1994 c 132 s 4;

(5) RCW 39.10.050 and section
3 of this act, 1997 c 376 s 3, & 1994 c 132 s 5;

(6) RCW 39.10.060 and section
4 of this act, 2000 c 209 s 2, 2000 c 194 s 1, 1997 c 376 s 4, 1996 c 18 s 6,
& 1994 c 132 s 6;

(7) RCW 39.10.065 and
1997 c 376 s 5;

(8) RCW 39.10.067
and 2000 c 209 s 3;

(9) RCW
39.10.070 and 1994 c 132 s 7;

(((9))) (10)
RCW 39.10.080 and 1994 c 132 s 8;

(((10))) (11)
RCW 39.10.090 and 1994 c 132 s 9;

(((11))) (12)
RCW 39.10.100 and 1994 c 132 s 10;

(((12))) (13)
RCW 39.10.110 and section 5 of this act, 1997 c 376 s 6, & 1994 c
132 s 11;

(((13))) (14)
RCW 39.10.115 and section 7 of this act & 2000 c 209 s 4;

(15) RCW
39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13; and

(((14))) (16)
RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14((; and

(15) RCW 39.10.902
and 1994 c 132 s 15)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---