BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 39.04

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) A state agency or local government may award
contracts of

_7 any value for the design, fabrication, and installation of

_8 building engineering systems by: (a) Using a competitive
bidding

_9 process or request for proposals process where bidders are

10 required to provide final specifications and a bid price
for the

11 design, fabrication, and installation of building
engineering

12 systems, with the final specifications being approved by an

13 appropriate design, engineering, and/or public regulatory
body; or

14 (b) using a competitive bidding process where bidders are
required

15 to provide final specifications for the final design,
fabrication,

16 and installation of building engineering systems as part of
a

17 larger project with the final specifications for the
building

18 engineering systems portion of the project being approved
by an

p. 1 SB
5061

_1 appropriate design, engineering, and/or public
regulatory body. The

_2 provisions of chapter 39.80 RCW do not apply to the
design of

_3 building engineering systems that are included as part
of a

_4 contract described under this section.

_5 (2) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

_6 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

_7 (a) "Building engineering systems" means
those systems where

_8 contracts for the systems customarily have been awarded
with a

_9 requirement that the contractor provide final approved

10 specifications, including fire alarm systems, building
sprinkler

11 systems, pneumatic tube systems, extensions of heating,

12 ventilation, or air conditioning control systems,
chlorination and

13 chemical feed systems, emergency generator systems,
building

14 signage systems, pile foundations, and curtain wall
systems.

15 (b) "Local government" means any county,
city, town, school

16 district, or other special district, municipal
corporation, or

17 quasi-municipal corporation.

18 (c) "State agency" means the department of
general

19 administration, the state parks and recreation
commission, the

20 department of fish and wildlife, the department of
natural

21 resources, any institution of higher education as
defined under

22 RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by

23 the department of general administration to engage in
building,

24 renovation, remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair

25 activities.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5061 p. 2