BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 30.42.140 and 1994 c
92 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director, without previous notice, shall visit the office of an alien bank
doing business in this state pursuant to this chapter at least once ((in
each year)) every eighteen months, and more often if necessary, for
the purpose of making a full investigation into the condition of such office,
and for that purpose they are hereby empowered to administer oaths and to
examine under oath any director or member of its governing body, officer,
employee, or agent of such alien bank or office. The director shall make such
other full or partial examination as he or she deems necessary. The director
shall collect, from each alien bank for each examination of the conditions of
its office in this state, the estimated actual cost of such examination.

--- END ---