BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.36.030 and 1991 c
81 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

If the information
contained in a request for an absentee ballot received by the county auditor is
complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote under federal or
state law, the county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the primary or
election for which the absentee ballot was requested. Otherwise, the county
auditor shall notify the applicant of the reason or reasons why the request
cannot be accepted.

At each general
election in an even-numbered year, each absentee voter shall also be given a
separate ballot containing the names of the candidates that have filed for the
office of precinct committee officer ((unless fewer than two candidates have
filed for the same political party in the absentee voter's precinct)). The
ballot shall provide space for writing in the name of additional candidates.

When
mailing an absentee ballot to a registered voter temporarily outside the state
or to an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter, the county
auditor shall send a copy of the state voters' and candidates' pamphlet with
the absentee ballot. The county auditor shall mail all absentee ballots and
related material to voters outside the territorial limits of the United States
and the District of Columbia under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

--- END ---