BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.36.010 and 1993 c
408 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) A jury is a body of
persons temporarily selected from the qualified inhabitants of a particular district,
and invested with power‑-

(a) To present or
indict a person for a public offense.

(b) To try a question
of fact.

(2) "Court"
when used without further qualification means any superior court or court of
limited jurisdiction in the state of Washington.

(3) "Judge"
means every judicial officer authorized to hold or preside over a court. For
purposes of this chapter "judge" does not include court commissioners
or referees.

(4) "Juror"
means any person summoned for service on a petit jury, grand jury, or jury of
inquest as defined in this chapter.

(5) "Grand
jury" means those twelve persons impaneled by a superior court to hear,
examine, and investigate evidence concerning criminal activity and corruption.

(6) "Petit
jury" means a body of persons twelve or less in number in the superior
court and six in number in courts of limited jurisdiction, drawn by lot from
the jurors in attendance upon the court at a particular session, and sworn to
try and determine a question of fact.

(7) "Jury of
inquest" means a body of persons six or fewer in number, but not fewer
than four persons, summoned before the coroner or other ministerial officer, to
inquire of particular facts.

(8) "Jury source
list" means the list of all registered voters for any county, merged with
a list of licensed drivers and identicard holders who reside in the county.
The list shall specify each person's name and residence address and conform to
the methodology and standards set pursuant to the provisions of RCW 2.36.054 or
by supreme court rule. The list shall be filed with the superior court by the
county auditor.

(9) "Master jury
list" means the list of prospective jurors from which jurors summoned to
serve will be randomly selected. The master jury list shall be either randomly
selected from the jury source list or may be an exact duplicate of the jury
source list.

(10) "Jury
term" means a period of time of one or more days, not exceeding one month,
during which summoned jurors must be available to report for juror service.

(11) "Juror
service" means the period of time a juror is required to be present at the
court facility. This period of time may not ((extend beyond the end of the
jury term, and may not exceed two weeks, except to complete a trial to which
the juror was assigned during the two-week period)) exceed two days
during any jury term, except to complete a trial to which the juror was
assigned.

(12)
"Jury panel" means those persons randomly selected for jury service
for a particular jury term.

--- END ---