BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.88A.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
recognizes the necessity of developing a uniform and coordinated procedure for
determining the expected fiscal and incidence impact of bills and
resolutions on state government. The legislature also recognizes that
developing such statements ((of fiscal impact)), which shall be known as
fiscal notes and incidence notes, requires the designation of a state
agency to be principally responsible therefor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.88A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of
financial management shall, in cooperation with appropriate legislative
committees and legislative staff, establish a procedure for the provision of
incidence notes for any bill or proposal that increases, decreases, or
redistributes state government revenues by more than five million dollars per
fiscal year, for any of the following taxes:

(a) State and local
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW and RCW
81.104.170;

(b) Motor vehicle and
special fuels taxes under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW;

(c) King county
restaurant and bar taxes under chapter 82.14 RCW;

(d) Local admissions
taxes under RCW 35.21.280 and 36.38.010;

(e) Leasehold excise
taxes under chapter 82.29A RCW;

(f) State and local
property taxes under chapter 84.52 RCW;

(g) Public utility
district privilege taxes under chapter 54.28 RCW;

(h) Aircraft fuel taxes
under chapter 82.42 RCW;

(i) Camper and travel
trailer and boat excise taxes under chapters 82.50 and 82.49 RCW;

(j) State business and
occupation taxes under chapter 82.04 RCW;

(k) State public
utility taxes including garbage collection under chapter 82.16 RCW and RCW
82.18.020;

(l) Local utility taxes
under chapter 35.21 RCW;

(m) Insurance premiums
taxes under chapter 48.14 RCW;

(n) Timber excise taxes
under chapter 84.33 RCW;

(o) Carbonated beverage
syrup taxes under chapter 82.64 RCW;

(p) Food fish and
shellfish taxes under chapter 82.27 RCW;

(q) Cigarette and
tobacco products taxes under chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW;

(r) Liquor, beer, and
wine taxes under RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.210, and 66.24.290;

(s) Local gambling
taxes under RCW 9.46.110;

(t) State and local
real estate excise taxes under chapters 82.45 and 82.46 RCW;

(u) Estate taxes under
chapter 83.100 RCW;

(v) State and local
rental car taxes under RCW 82.08.020(2), 82.14.049, and 82.14.360(2);

(w) State and local
hotel‑motel taxes under chapter 67.28 RCW and RCW 67.40.090 and
36.100.040; and

(x) State and local
telephone taxes under chapter 82.14B RCW.

(2) To the extent data
is available on the changes in the distribution of the tax burden that are
affected by the bill or resolution, the note shall report on the incidence
effects that would result if the bill were enacted. The note may present
information using system-wide measures by income classes, taxpayer
characteristics, or other relevant categories. The note may include analysis
of the effect of the bill or resolution on representative taxpayers. The note
must include a statement of the incidence assumptions that were used in
computing the burdens. An incidence analysis shall use the broadest measure of
economic income for which reliable data is available.

(3) An incidence impact
note shall indicate the incidence impact for the first full year in which the
bill or resolution will be effective. Incidence impacts shall be calculated
using the procedures contained in instructions issued by the office of
financial management.

(4) In establishing an
incidence impact analysis called for under this chapter, the office of
financial management shall coordinate the development of fiscal notes with all
state agencies affected.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.88A.030 and 1986
c 158 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

When a fiscal or incidence
note is prepared and approved as to form, accuracy, and completeness by the
office of financial management, which depicts the expected ((fiscal))
impact of a bill or resolution, copies shall be filed immediately with:

(1) The chairperson of
the committee to which the bill or resolution was referred upon introduction in
the house of origin;

(2) The senate
committee on ways and means, or its successor; and

(3) The house
committees on ((revenue)) finance and appropriations, or their
successors.

Whenever possible, ((such
fiscal)) the note shall be provided prior to or at the time the bill
or resolution is first heard by the committee of reference in the house of
origin.

When a fiscal or
incidence note has been prepared for a bill or resolution, a copy of the ((fiscal))
note shall be placed in the bill books or otherwise attached to the bill or
resolution and shall remain with the bill or resolution throughout the
legislative process insofar as possible.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.88A.040 and 1979
c 151 s 148 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial
management shall also provide a fiscal or incidence note on any
legislative proposal at the request of any legislator. Such ((fiscal))
note shall be returned to the requesting legislator, and copies shall be filed
with the appropriate legislative committees pursuant to RCW 43.88A.030 at the
time such proposed legislation is introduced in either house.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.88A.900 and 1977
ex.s. c 25 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
shall prevent either house of the legislature from acting on any bill or
resolution before it as otherwise provided by the state Constitution, by law,
and by the rules and joint rules of the senate and house of representatives,
nor shall the lack of any fiscal note or incidence impact analysis as
provided in this chapter or any error in the accuracy thereof affect the
validity of any measure otherwise duly passed by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In January of every
odd‑numbered year, the department shall submit to the legislature before
the regular session a report on the overall incidence of each of the taxes
listed in section 2(1) of this act.

(2) The
report shall present information on the distribution of the tax burden (a) by
overall income distribution, using a system-wide incidence measure with
appropriate measures of equality and inequality, (b) by income classes,
including at a minimum deciles of the income distribution, and (c) by other
appropriate taxpayer characteristics.

---
END ---