BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 79.90

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 Persons who live aboard their vessel at moorage on
public

_7 aquatic lands should receive comparable consideration as
those

_8 persons who live aboard their vessel at moorage on private
aquatic

_9 lands. In negotiating and establishing the terms and
conditions for

10 leases of public aquatic land to be used for vessel
moorage, the

11 department of natural resources shall address the subject
of

12 vessels used as a liveaboard in an equitable manner similar
to the

13 practices applied to liveaboard moorage on private aquatic
land.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5073