BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Until recently, little
attention has been given to the detection, treatment, and prevention of disease
as specifically related to the unique needs and experiences of women, including
racial and ethnic minority women. The purpose of establishing the women's
health advisory committee is to provide input to the department in order to
achieve equity in policy considerations and decisions affecting women's health,
including the administration, funding, and delivery of medical care and health
care-related services, and additional opportunities for basic and applied
research directly affecting women's health.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The women's health
advisory committee is created. The governor shall appoint the fifteen members
of the committee. Committee members shall serve for a term of two years, which
may be renewed, and shall serve without any compensation or type of
reimbursement. The committee shall include one member from each major caucus
of the house of representatives and the senate, two representatives from the
department of health, one representative from the department of social and
health services, two representatives from statewide women's health advocacy
organizations, one representative from the University of Washington school of
public health, one representative from the office of the insurance
commissioner, one representative from the health care industry, two
representatives from organizations representing the health concerns of women of
color, and one representative who is or has been a consumer of public health
programs or services.

The committee shall
elect one of its members as chair. In any situation requiring a vote, the
chair shall cast the deciding vote. The committee shall meet no less than
twice per calendar year at dates specified by the chair or a majority of the
members.

The department shall
provide administrative and clerical assistance to the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The women's health
advisory committee shall advise the department around women's health, with
special attention to the unique needs and challenges of racial and ethnic
minority women, with regard to:

(1) Strategic planning
to improve the department's public health services and programs targeting
women;

(2) Analysis of
departmental policies regarding specific issues related to women's health by
racial and ethnic categories;

(3) Coordination of
pilot projects and planning projects funded by the state that are related to
women's health;

(4) Dispersing
information to the public regarding women's health, data, strategies, and
programs that address women's health issues, including, but not limited to,
cardiovascular disease, pregnancy, breast and cervical cancers, AIDS,
osteoporosis, and menopause, as well as issues that impact women's health,
including substance abuse, domestic violence, housing, teenage pregnancy, and
sexual assault;

(5) The identification
of public and private sources of funding for initiatives in women's health; and

(6) Ways to encourage
innovative responses by public and private entities that seek to address
women's health issues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each added to chapter 43.70 RCW.

---
END ---