BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 46.25.060
and 1989 c 178 s 8 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1)(a) No person may be issued a commercial driver's
license

_7 unless that person is a resident of this state and has
passed a

_8 knowledge and skills test for driving a commercial motor
vehicle

_9 that complies with minimum federal standards established by

10 federal regulation enumerated in 49 C.F.R. part 383,
subparts G

11 and H, and has satisfied all other requirements of the
CMVSA in

12 addition to other requirements imposed by state law or
federal

13 regulation. The tests must be prescribed and conducted by
the

14 department. In addition to the fee charged for issuance or
renewal

15 of any license, the applicant shall pay a fee of no more
than ten

16 dollars for each classified knowledge examination,
classified

17 endorsement knowledge examination, or any combination of

18 classified license and endorsement knowledge examinations.
The

p. 1 SB
5075

_1 applicant shall pay a fee of no more than fifty dollars
for each

_2 classified skill examination or combination of
classified skill

_3 examinations conducted by the department.

_4 (b) The department may authorize a person, including
an agency

_5 of this or another state, an employer, a private driver
training

_6 facility, or other private institution, or a department,
agency,

_7 or instrumentality of local government, to administer
the skills

_8 test specified by this section under the following
conditions:

_9 (i) The test is the same which would otherwise be
administered

10 by the state;

11 (ii) The third party has entered into an agreement
with the

12 state that complies with the requirements of 49 C.F.R.
part

13 383.75; and

14 (iii) The director has adopted rules as to the third
party

15 testing program and the development and justification
for fees

16 charged by any third party.

17 (2) In counties made up entirely of islands, if
the third party

18 tester is otherwise qualified, the department may not
refuse to

19 enter into or renew an agreement with the tester
based upon the

20 department's determination that there is not enough
need for the

21 tester in that county.

22 (3) The department may waive the skills test
specified in this

23 section for a commercial driver's license applicant who
meets the

24 requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 383.77.

25 (((3))) (4) A commercial driver's
license or commercial

26 driver's instruction permit may not be issued to a
person while

27 the person is subject to a disqualification from driving
a

28 commercial motor vehicle, or while the person's driver's
license

29 is suspended, revoked, or canceled in any state, nor may
a

30 commercial driver's license be issued to a person who
has a

31 commercial driver's license issued by any other state
unless the

32 person first surrenders all such licenses, which must be
returned

33 to the issuing state for cancellation.

34 (((4))) (5)(a) A commercial driver's
instruction permit may be

35 issued to an individual who holds a valid automobile or
classified

36 driver's license.

37 (b) A commercial driver's instruction permit may not
be issued

38 for a period to exceed six months. Only one renewal or
reissuance

SB 5075 p. 2

_1 may be granted within a two-year period. The holder of
a commercial

_2 driver's instruction permit may drive a commercial motor
vehicle

_3 on a highway only when accompanied by the holder of a
commercial

_4 driver's license valid for the type of vehicle driven who
occupies

_5 a seat beside the individual for the purpose of giving
instruction

_6 in driving the commercial motor vehicle. An application
for a

_7 commercial driver's instruction permit shall be
accompanied by a

_8 fee of five dollars. The department shall forthwith
transmit the

_9 fees collected for commercial driver's instruction
permits to the

10 state treasurer.

11 Sec. 2. RCW 46.25.010
and 1996 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read

12 as follows:

13 The definitions set forth in this section apply
throughout this

14 chapter.

15 (1) "Alcohol" means any substance containing
any form of

16 alcohol, including but not limited to ethanol, methanol,
propanol,

17 and isopropanol.

18 (2) "Alcohol concentration" means:

19 (a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters

20 of blood; or

21 (b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten
liters

22 of breath.

23 (3) "Commercial driver's license" (CDL) means
a license issued

24 in accordance with the requirements of this chapter to an

25 individual that authorizes the individual to drive a class
of

26 commercial motor vehicle.

27 (4) The "commercial driver's license information
system"

28 (CDLIS) is the information system established pursuant to
the

29 CMVSA to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information
related

30 to the licensing and identification of commercial motor
vehicle

31 drivers.

32 (5) "Commercial driver's instruction permit"
means a permit

33 issued under RCW 46.25.060(((4))) (5).

34 (6) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor
vehicle designed

35 or used to transport passengers or property:

36 (a) If the vehicle has a gross weight rating of 26,001
or more

37 pounds;

p. 3 SB
5075

_1 (b) If the vehicle is designed to transport sixteen
or more

_2 passengers, including the driver;

_3 (c) If the vehicle is transporting hazardous
materials and is

_4 required to be identified by a placard in accordance
with 49

_5 C.F.R. part 172, subpart F; or

_6 (d) If the vehicle is a school bus as defined in RCW
46.04.521

_7 regardless of weight or size.

_8 (7) "Conviction" has the definition set
forth in RCW 46.20.270.

_9 (8) "Disqualification" means a prohibition
against driving a

10 commercial motor vehicle.

11 (9) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be
in physical control

12 of a motor vehicle in any place open to the general
public for

13 purposes of vehicular traffic. For purposes of RCW
46.25.100,

14 46.25.110, and 46.25.120, "drive" includes operation
or physical

15 control of a motor vehicle anywhere in the state.

16 (10) "Drugs" are those substances as
defined by RCW 69.04.009.

17 (11) "Employer" means any person,
including the United States,

18 a state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns
or leases

19 a commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive
a

20 commercial motor vehicle.

21 (12) "Gross vehicle weight rating" (GVWR)
means the value

22 specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded
weight of a

23 single or a combination or articulated vehicle, or the
registered

24 gross weight, where this value cannot be determined.
The GVWR of a

25 combination or articulated vehicle, commonly referred to
as the

26 "gross combined weight rating" or GCWR, is the
GVWR of the power

27 unit plus the GVWR of the towed unit or units.

28 (13) "Hazardous materials" has the same
meaning found in

29 Section 103 of the Hazardous Materials Transportation
Act (49 App.

30 U.S.C. 1801 et seq.).

31 (14) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle,
machine, tractor,

32 trailer, or semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical
power

33 used on highways, or any other vehicle required to be
registered

34 under the laws of this state, but does not include a
vehicle,

35 machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailer operated
exclusively on

36 a rail.

37 (15) "Out-of-service order" means a
temporary prohibition

38 against driving a commercial motor vehicle.

SB 5075 p. 4

_1 (16) "Serious traffic violation" means:

_2 (a) Excessive speeding, defined as fifteen miles per
hour or

_3 more in excess of the posted limit;

_4 (b) Reckless driving, as defined under state or
local law;

_5 (c) A violation of a state or local law relating to
motor

_6 vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation,
arising

_7 in connection with an accident or collision resulting in
death to

_8 any person; and

_9 (d) Any other violation of a state or local law
relating to

10 motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking
violation,

11 that the department determines by rule to be serious.

12 (17) "State" means a state of the United
States and the

13 District of Columbia.

14 (18) "Tank vehicle" means a vehicle that
is designed to

15 transport a liquid or gaseous material within a tank
that is

16 either permanently or temporarily attached to the
vehicle or the

17 chassis. Tank vehicles include, but are not limited to
cargo tanks

18 and portable tanks. However, this definition does not
include

19 portable tanks having a rated capacity under one
thousand gallons.

20 (19) "United States" means the fifty
states and the District of

21 Columbia.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5075