BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 47.60

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 The department shall adopt necessary rules and
procedures to

_8 allow the use of credit and debit cards to make a
reservation on

_9 or pay the fare for international ferry routes. In no
event may the

10 use of credit or debit cards authorized by this section
create a

11 loss of revenue to the state.

12 The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon
the credit

13 of the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of
the state

14 Constitution.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SSB
5076