BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.14.060 and 1979
ex.s. c 153 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of
the civil service commission:

(1) To make suitable
rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions hereof. Such rules
and regulations shall provide in detail the manner in which examinations may be
held, and appointments, promotions, reallocations, transfers, reinstatements,
demotions, suspensions, and discharges shall be made, and may also provide for
any other matters connected with the general subject of personnel administration,
and which may be considered desirable to further carry out the general purposes
of this chapter, or which may be found to be in the interest of good personnel
administration. The rules and regulations and any amendments thereof shall be
printed, mimeographed, or multigraphed for free public distribution. Such
rules and regulations may be changed from time to time.

(2) To give practical
tests which shall consist only of subjects which will fairly determine the
capacity of persons examined to perform duties of the position to which
appointment is to be made. Such tests may include tests of physical fitness or
manual skill or both.

(3) To make
investigations concerning and report upon all matters touching the enforcement
and effect of the provisions of this chapter, and the rules and regulations
prescribed hereunder; to inspect all departments, offices, places, positions,
and employments affected by this chapter, and ascertain whether this chapter
and all such rules and regulations are being obeyed. Such investigations may
be made by the commission or by any commissioner designated by the commission
for that purpose. Not only must these investigations be made by the commission
as aforesaid, but the commission must make like investigation on petition of a
citizen, duly verified, stating that irregularities or abuses exist, or setting
forth in concise language, in writing, the necessity for such investigation.
In the course of such investigation the commission or designated commissioner,
or chief examiner, may administer oaths, subpoena and require the attendance of
witnesses and the production by them of books, papers, documents, and accounts
appertaining to the investigation and also cause the deposition of witnesses
residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by
law for like depositions in civil actions in the superior court; and the oaths
administered and the subpoenas issued hereunder shall have the same force and
effect as the oaths administered and subpoenas issued by a superior court judge
in his judicial capacity; and the failure of any person so subpoenaed to comply
with the provisions of this section shall be deemed a violation of this
chapter, and punishable as such.

(4) To conduct hearings
and investigations in accordance with this chapter and by the rules of practice
and procedure adopted by the commission, and in the conduct thereof neither the
commission, nor designated commissioner shall be bound by technical rules of
evidence. No informality in any proceedings or hearing, or in the manner of
taking testimony before the commission or designated commissioner, shall
invalidate any order, decision, rule, or regulation made, approved, or
confirmed by the commission: PROVIDED, That no order, decision, rule, or
regulation made by any designated commissioner conducting any hearing or
investigation alone shall be of any force or effect whatsoever unless and until
concurred in by at least one of the other two members.

(5) To hear and
determine appeals or complaints respecting the allocation of positions, the
rejection of an examinee, and such other matters as may be referred to the
commission.

(6) To provide for,
formulate, and hold competitive tests to determine the relative qualifications
of persons who seek employment in any class or position and as a result thereof
establish eligible lists for the various classes of positions, and provide that
persons laid off, or who have accepted voluntary demotion in lieu of layoff,
because of curtailment of expenditures, reduction in force, and for like
causes, head the list in the order of their seniority, to the end that they
shall be the first to be reemployed or reinstated in their former job class.

(7) To certify to the
appointing authority, when a vacant position is to be filled, on written
request, the names of the three persons highest on the eligible list for the
class. If there is no such list, to authorize a provisional or temporary
appointment list for such class. ((Such temporary provisional appointment
shall not continue for a period longer than four months; nor shall any person
receive more than one provisional appointment or serve more than four months as
provisional appointee in any one fiscal year.)) A temporary appointment
expires after four months. However, the appointing authority may extend the
temporary appointment beyond the four-month period if the commission certifies
that it continues to use due diligence in advertising and testing for the
position. If, after one year from the date the initial temporary appointment
was first made, there are less than three persons on the eligible list for the
class, then the appointing authority may fill the position with any person or
persons on the eligible list.

(8) To
keep such records as may be necessary for the proper administration of this
chapter.

--- END ---