BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.030 and 1990 c
42 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for proceeds
from fees for vehicle licensing for vehicles paying such fees under RCW
46.16.070 and 46.16.085, and as otherwise provided for in chapter 46.16 RCW,
all fees received by the director for vehicle licenses under the provisions of
chapter 46.16 RCW shall be forwarded to the state treasurer, accompanied by a
proper identifying detailed report, and be deposited to the credit of the motor
vehicle fund, except that the proceeds from the vehicle license fee and renewal
license fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer as hereinafter provided.
After July 1, ((1981, that portion)) 2002, $20.35 of each vehicle
license fee ((in excess of $7.40 and that portion)) and $20.35 of
each renewal license fee ((in excess of $3.40)) shall be deposited in
the state patrol highway account in the motor vehicle fund((, hereby created)).
Vehicle license fees, renewal license fees, and all other funds in the state
patrol highway account shall be for the sole use of the Washington state patrol
for highway activities of the Washington state patrol, subject to proper
appropriations and reappropriations therefor, for any fiscal biennium after
June 30, 1981, and twenty-seven and three-tenths percent of the proceeds from
$7.40 of each vehicle license fee and twenty-seven and three-tenths percent
of the proceeds from $3.40 of each renewal license fee shall be deposited
each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations account. Any remaining
amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal license fees that are not deposited
in the Puget Sound ferry operations account shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16.0621 and 2000
1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) License tab fees
shall be thirty dollars per year for motor vehicles, regardless of year, value,
make, or model, beginning January 1, 2000.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "license tab fees" are defined as the general fees paid
annually for licensing motor vehicles, including cars, sport utility vehicles,
motorcycles, ((and)) motor homes, and nonmotorized vehicles including
trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623. Trailers licensed under
RCW 46.16.065, 46.16.068, or 46.16.085 are not required to pay license tab fees
under this section.

(3) The provisions
of this section regarding nonmotorized vehicles become effective with vehicle
registrations due or to become due September 1, 2002, or thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Any fee increases
provided in this act do not constitute new transportation revenue for the
purposes of chapter 5, Laws of 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---