BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 79.90.470
and 1984 c 221 s 5 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) The use of state-owned aquatic lands for
public utility

_7 lines owned by a governmental entity shall be granted
without

_8 charge by an agreement, permit, or other instrument if the
use is

_9 consistent with the purposes of RCW 79.90.450 through
79.90.460

10 and does not obstruct navigation or other public uses.

11 (2) The use of state-owned aquatic lands by a
county, city, or

12 town for purposes of a highway or street right-of-way
must be

13 granted without charge by an agreement, permit, or other

14 instrument if the use is consistent with the purposes of
RCW

15 79.90.450 through 79.90.460 and does not obstruct
navigation or

16 other public uses.

17 (3) Use for public parks or public recreation
purposes shall be

18 granted without charge if the aquatic lands and
improvements are

p. 1 SB
5080

_1 available to the general public on a first-come,
first-served

_2 basis and are not managed to produce a profit for the
operator or

_3 a concessionaire.

_4 (4) The department may lease state-owned
tidelands that are in

_5 front of state parks only with the approval of the state
parks and

_6 recreation commission. The department may lease bedlands
in front

_7 of state parks only after the department has consulted
with the

_8 state parks and recreation commission.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5080 p. 2