BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
adopt rules to regulate the activities of persons and facilities that care for
and rehabilitate injured, diseased, or abandoned wildlife. Upon adoption of
such rules by the department, it is unlawful for any person to possess wildlife
for the purpose of rehabilitation without first obtaining a current and valid
permit to do so under rules adopted by this section.

(2) The department must
inspect each person or facility permitted under this section at least every
three years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of thirty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund to the department of fish and wildlife for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2002, solely for a pilot project that will provide financial
support in the form of grants to persons or facilities permitted under section
1 of this act for the rehabilitation of native wildlife species.

---
END ---