BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.45

_7 RCW to read as follows:

_8 A capital facility fee is imposed upon each sale of
real

_9 property at the rate of one percent of the selling price.
The

10 proceeds from this fee shall be deposited in the capital facility

11 subaccount of the public works assistance account created
in RCW

12 43.155.050. Low-income housing is exempt from this fee.

13 Sec. 2. RCW 43.155.050
and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 918 and 1995 c

14 376 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

15 (1) The public works assistance account is
hereby established

16 in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public
works

17 assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when
authorized by

p. 1 SB
5083

_1 the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money
in the

_2 public works assistance account shall be used to make
loans and to

_3 give financial guarantees to local governments for
public works

_4 projects. Moneys in the account may also be
appropriated to

_5 provide for state match requirements under federal law
for

_6 projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under

_7 the drinking water assistance account. ((During the
1995-97

_8 fiscal biennium, moneys in the public works
assistance account may

_9 be appropriated for transfer to the flood control
assistance

10 account to be used for flood control assistance,
including grants

11 under chapter 86.26 RCW. To the extent that moneys
in the public

12 works assistance account are not appropriated during
the 1995-97

13 fiscal biennium for public works or flood control
assistance, the

14 legislature may direct their transfer to the state
general fund.

15 In awarding grants under chapter 86.26 RCW, the
department of

16 ecology shall give strong preference to local
governments that

17 have: (1) Implemented, or are in the process of
implementing, an

18 ordinance that establishes a flood plain policy that
is

19 substantially more stringent than minimum federal
requirements;

20 (2) completed a comprehensive flood control plan
meeting the

21 requirements of RCW 86.12.200; or (3) constructed, or
are in the

22 process of constructing, a system of overtopping
dikes or levees

23 that allow public access.))

24 (2) The capital facility subaccount is created
within the

25 public works assistance account. All moneys
collected from the

26 statewide fee imposed by section 1 of this act shall
be placed in

27 the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be
appropriated for

28 any capital project as defined by RCW 82.46.010(6).

29 Sec. 3. RCW 82.02.020
and 1997 c 452 s 21 are each amended to read

30 as follows:

31 Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28 and
82.14

32 RCW, the state preempts the field of imposing taxes upon
retail

33 sales of tangible personal property, the use of tangible
personal

34 property, parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW

35 67.16.060, conveyances, and cigarettes, and no county,
town, or

36 other municipal subdivision shall have the right to impose
taxes

37 of that nature. ((Except as provided in RCW 82.02.050
through

SB 5083 p. 2

_1 82.02.090,)) No county, city, town, or
other municipal corporation

_2 shall impose any tax, fee, or charge, either direct or
indirect,

_3 on the construction or reconstruction of residential
buildings,

_4 commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or on any
other

_5 building or building space or appurtenance thereto, or
on the

_6 development, subdivision, classification, or
reclassification of

_7 land. However, this section does not preclude
dedications of land

_8 or easements within the proposed development or plat which
the

_9 county, city, town, or other municipal corporation can
demonstrate

10 are reasonably necessary as a direct result of the
proposed

11 development or plat to which the dedication of land or
easement is

12 to apply.

13 This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements
with

14 counties, cities, towns, or other municipal corporations
that

15 allow a payment in lieu of a dedication of land or to
mitigate a

16 direct impact that has been identified as a consequence
of a

17 proposed development, subdivision, or plat. A local
government

18 shall not use such voluntary agreements for local
off-site

19 transportation improvements within the geographic
boundaries of

20 the area or areas covered by an adopted transportation
program

21 authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such voluntary
agreement is

22 subject to the following provisions:

23 (1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account
and may only

24 be expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by
the

25 parties to mitigate the identified, direct impact;

26 (2) The payment shall be expended in all cases
within five

27 years of collection; and

28 (3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded
with interest

29 at the rate applied to judgments to the property owners
of record

30 at the time of the refund; however, if the payment is
not expended

31 within five years due to delay attributable to the
developer, the

32 payment shall be refunded without interest.

33 No county, city, town, or other municipal
corporation shall

34 require any payment as part of such a voluntary
agreement which

35 the county, city, town, or other municipal corporation
cannot

36 establish is reasonably necessary as a direct result of
the

37 proposed development or plat.

38 Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns,
counties, or

p. 3 SB
5083

_1 other municipal corporations from collecting reasonable
fees from

_2 an applicant for a permit or other governmental approval
to cover

_3 the cost to the city, town, county, or other municipal
corporation

_4 of processing applications, inspecting and reviewing
plans, or

_5 preparing detailed statements required by chapter 43.21C
RCW.

_6 This section does not limit the existing authority
of any

_7 county, city, town, or other municipal corporation to
impose

_8 special assessments on property specifically benefitted
thereby in

_9 the manner prescribed by law.

10 Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities,
or towns

11 from imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to
impose

12 water, sewer, natural gas, drainage utility, and
drainage system

13 charges: PROVIDED, That no such charge shall exceed the

14 proportionate share of such utility or system's capital
costs

15 which the county, city, or town can demonstrate are
attributable

16 to the property being charged: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
these

17 provisions shall not be interpreted to expand or
contract any

18 existing authority of counties, cities, or towns to
impose such

19 charges.

20 Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation
benefit

21 district from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW
36.73.120

22 nor prohibits the legislative authority of a county,
city, or town

23 from approving the imposition of such fees within a
transportation

24 benefit district.

25 Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities,
or towns

26 from imposing transportation impact fees authorized
pursuant to

27 chapter 39.92 RCW.

28 Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities,
or towns

29 from requiring property owners to provide relocation
assistance to

30 tenants under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.

31 This section does not apply to special purpose
districts formed

32 and acting pursuant to Titles 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is
the

33 authority conferred by these titles affected.

34

35 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The following
acts or parts of acts are each

36 repealed:

37 (1) RCW 82.02.050 (Impact fees‑-Intent‑-Limitations)
and 1994 c

38 257 s 24, 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 6, & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17
s 43;

SB 5083 p. 4

_1 (2) RCW 82.02.060 (Impact fees‑-Local
ordinances‑-Required

_2 provisions) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 44;

_3 (3) RCW 82.02.070 (Impact fees‑-Retained
in special accounts‑-

_4 Limitations on use‑-Administrative appeals) and
1990 1st ex.s. c

_5 17 s 46;

_6 (4) RCW 82.02.080 (Impact fees‑-Refunds)
and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s

_7 47;

_8 (5) RCW 82.02.090 (Impact fees‑-Definitions)
and 1990 1st ex.s. c

_9 17 s 48; and

10 (6) RCW 82.02.100 (Impact
fees--Exception, mitigation fees paid

11 under chapter 43.21C RCW) and 1992 c 219 s 2.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5083