BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 28A.210

_7 RCW to read as follows:

_8 Public school districts may provide for the
administration of

_9 glucagon to students who experience severe hypoglycemia
when the

10 students are in the custody of the school district,
pursuant to

11 chapter 18.79 RCW, if the glucagon is provided in
compliance with:

12 (1) Rules adopted under section 3 of this act by the
state

13 nursing care quality assurance commission, and the
instructions of

14 a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner

15 issued under the rules; and

16 (2) Written policies of the school district that are
adopted to

17 implement this section and are developed in accordance
with

18 chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW.

p. 1 SSB
5085

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 28A.210

_2 RCW to read as follows:

_3 (1) If a school employee provides for the
administration of

_4 glucagon to a student under chapter 18.79 RCW and this
chapter in

_5 substantial compliance with: (a) Rules adopted by the
state nursing

_6 care quality assurance commission and the instructions
of a

_7 registered nurse or advanced registered nurse
practitioner issued

_8 under such rules, and (b) written policies of the school
district,

_9 then the employee, the employee's school district and
school of

10 employment shall not be liable in any criminal action or
for civil

11 damages in their individual, marital, governmental,
corporate, or

12 other capacity as a result of providing glucagon.

13 (2) Administering glucagon to any student under
chapter 18.79

14 RCW and this chapter may be discontinued by a public
school

15 district, and the school district, school, or its
employees shall

16 not be liable in any criminal action or for civil
damages in their

17 individual, marital, governmental, corporate, or other
capacity as

18 a result of the discontinuance: PROVIDED, That the
public school

19 district has first provided actual notice orally or in
writing in

20 advance of the date of discontinuance to a parent or
legal

21 guardian of the student or other person having legal
control over

22 the student: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the public school
district

23 otherwise provides for the administration of glucagon of
the

24 student to the extent required by federal or state law.

25 (3) To be eligible to administer glucagon, an
employee not

26 licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, shall file, without
coercion by

27 the employer, a voluntary written, current, and
unexpired letter

28 of intent stating the employee's willingness to
administer

29 glucagon in compliance with established guidelines. If
a public

30 school employee who is not licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW

31 chooses not to file a letter under this section, the
employee

32 shall not be subject to any employer reprisal or
disciplinary

33 action for refusing to file a letter.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 18.79

35 RCW to read as follows:

36 (1) In accordance with the rules adopted by the
commission,

SSB 5085 p. 2

_1 public school districts may provide for the
administration of

_2 glucagon to students in severe hypoglycemia when the
students are

_3 in the custody of the school district.

_4 (2) After consultation with staff of the
superintendent of

_5 public instruction, the commission shall adopt rules in
accordance

_6 with chapter 34.05 RCW, that provide for the following
and such

_7 other matters as the commission deems necessary to the
proper

_8 implementation of this section:

_9 (a) A requirement for a written, current, and
unexpired request

10 from a parent, legal guardian, or other person having
legal

11 control over the student that the school district
provide for the

12 administering of glucagon to the student;

13 (b) A requirement for a written, current, and
unexpired request

14 from a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57
RCW that

15 administering glucagon to a student be provided for
during the

16 hours when school is in session or the hours when the
student is

17 under the supervision of school officials;

18 (c) A requirement for written, current, and
unexpired

19 instructions from an advanced registered nurse
practitioner or a

20 registered nurse licensed under this chapter regarding

21 administration of glucagon that include: (i) A
designation of the

22 school district employee or employees who may administer
the

23 glucagon, and (ii) a description of the nature and
extent of any

24 required supervision; and

25 (d) The nature and extent of acceptable training
that shall:

26 (i) Be provided by a physician, advanced registered
nurse

27 practitioner, or registered nurse licensed under chapter
18.71 or

28 18.57 RCW, or this chapter, and (ii) be required of
school

29 district employees who administer the glucagon to the
student

30 under this section, except that a licensed practical
nurse

31 licensed under this chapter is exempt from training.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5085