BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.84 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of false reporting in the first degree if, with knowledge that the information
reported, conveyed, or circulated is false, he or she initiates or circulates a
false report or warning of an alleged occurrence or impending occurrence of a
fire, explosion, crime, catastrophe, or emergency knowing that the false report
creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another person
or causes a governmental entity or combination of governmental entities to
incur expenses that exceed fifty thousand dollars.

(2) False reporting in
the first degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.84.040 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.84.040 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of false reporting in the second degree if, with knowledge that
the information reported, conveyed, or circulated is false, he or she
initiates or circulates a false report or warning of an alleged occurrence or
impending occurrence of a fire, explosion, crime, catastrophe, or emergency
knowing that such false report is likely to cause: Evacuation of a
building, place of assembly, or transportation facility((, or to cause));
public inconvenience or alarm; or fire, police, or rescue personnel to
initiate a response to the false report.

(2) False
reporting in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---