BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.305 and 1997 c
291 s 6 and 1997 c 241 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The department shall
continue to issue the categories of special plates issued by the department
under the sections repealed under section 12 (1) through (7), chapter 250, Laws
of 1990. Special license plates issued under those repealed sections before
January 1, 1991, are valid to the extent and under the conditions provided in
those repealed sections. The following conditions, limitations, or
requirements apply to certain special license plates issued after January 1,
1991:

(1) A horseless
carriage plate and a plate or plates issued for collectors' vehicles more than
thirty years old, upon payment of the initial fees required by law and the
additional special license plate fee established by the department, are valid
for the life of the vehicle for which application is approved by the
department. When a single plate is issued, it shall be displayed on the rear
of the vehicle.

(2) The department may
issue special license plates denoting amateur radio operator status only to
persons having a valid official radio operator license issued by the federal
communications commission.

(3) The department
shall issue one set of special license plates to each resident of this state
who has been awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor for use on a passenger
vehicle registered to that person. The department shall issue the plate
without the payment of licensing fees and motor vehicle excise tax.

(4) The department may
issue for use on only one motor vehicle owned by the qualified applicant
special license plates denoting that the recipient of the plate is a survivor
of the attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, to persons meeting all of
the following criteria:

(a) Is a resident of
this state;

(b) Was a member of the
United States Armed Forces on December 7, 1941;

(c) Was on station on
December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at
Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three
miles;

(d) Received an
honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces; and

(e) Is certified by a
Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor survivors association as
satisfying the qualifications in (c) of this subsection.

The department may
issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any deceased Pearl Harbor survivor
who met the requirements of this subsection. If the surviving spouse
remarries, he or she shall return the special plates to the department within
fifteen days and apply for regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a
resident of this state.

The department shall
issue these plates upon payment by the applicant of all other license fees, but
the department may not set or charge an additional fee for these special
license plates.

(5)(a) The
department shall issue one set of special license plates to each resident of
this state who has been awarded the law enforcement medal of honor under
chapter 41.72 RCW for use on a passenger vehicle registered to that person.

(b) The department
may issue these plates to the surviving spouse of any person awarded the law
enforcement medal of honor posthumously. If the surviving spouse remarries, he
or she shall return the special plates to the department within fifteen days
and apply for regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a resident of this
state.

(6)
The department shall replace, free of charge, special license plates issued
under subsections (3) and (4) of this section if they are lost, stolen,
damaged, defaced, or destroyed. Such plates shall remain with the persons upon
transfer or other disposition of the vehicle for which they were initially
issued, and may be used on another vehicle registered to the recipient in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 46.16.316(1).

--- END ---