BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.18.010 and 1990 c
59 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

Candidates for the
following offices shall be nominated at partisan primaries held pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter:

(1) Congressional
offices;

(2) All state offices
except (a) judicial offices and (b) the office of superintendent of public instruction;

(3) All
county offices except (a) judicial offices and sheriff and (b) those
offices where a county home rule charter provides otherwise.

--- END ---