BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.56.730 and 1984 c
7 s 287 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the public health, safety, and welfare require that all
state ferries be designated "No Smoking" areas ((be
established on all state ferries since there is a significant number of our
citizens who are nonsmokers)). The department ((is hereby authorized
and directed to adopt rules pursuant to the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, to establish and)) shall clearly designate all
areas on all state operated ferries ((that are expressly reserved for use by
nonsmokers)) as "No Smoking" areas.

--- END ---