BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

It is a traffic
infraction for a driver of a motor vehicle intending to board a Washington
state ferry, to: (1) Block a residential driveway while waiting to board the
ferry; or (2) move in front of another vehicle in a queue already waiting to
board the ferry, without the authorization of a state ferry system employee.
Vehicles qualifying for preferential loading privileges under rules adopted by
the department of transportation are exempt from this subsection. In addition
to any other penalty imposed for a violation of this section, the driver shall
be directed to immediately move the motor vehicle to the end of the queue of
vehicles waiting to board the ferry.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall take steps to mitigate problems associated with lengthy ferry
queues, including the blockage of residential driveways, by implementing
appropriate mitigation procedures and any feasible infrastructure changes to
enforce section 1 of this act.

---
END ---