BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 16.08.070 and 1987 c
94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 16.08.070 through 16.08.100.

(1) "Potentially
dangerous dog" means any dog that when unprovoked: (a) Inflicts bites on
a human or a domestic animal either on public or private property, or (b)
chases or approaches a person upon the streets, sidewalks, or any public
grounds in a menacing fashion or apparent attitude of attack, or any dog with a
known propensity, tendency, or disposition to attack unprovoked, to cause
injury, or to cause injury or otherwise to threaten the safety of humans or
domestic animals.

(2) "Dangerous
dog" means any dog that ((according to the records of the appropriate
authority,)) (a) ((has inflicted)) inflicts severe injury on
a human being without provocation on public or private property, (b) ((has
killed)) kills a domestic animal without provocation while off the
owner's property, or (c) has been previously found to be potentially dangerous because
of injury inflicted on a human, the owner having received notice of such
and the dog again aggressively bites, attacks, or endangers the safety of
humans or domestic animals.

(3) "Severe
injury" means any physical injury that results in broken bones or
disfiguring lacerations requiring multiple sutures or cosmetic surgery.

(4) "Proper
enclosure of a dangerous dog" means, while on the owner's property, a
dangerous dog shall be securely confined indoors or in a securely enclosed and
locked pen or structure, suitable to prevent the entry of young children and
designed to prevent the animal from escaping. Such pen or structure shall have
secure sides and a secure top, and shall also provide protection from the
elements for the dog.

(5) "Animal
control authority" means an entity acting alone or in concert with other
local governmental units for enforcement of the animal control laws of the
city, county, and state and the shelter and welfare of animals.

(6) "Animal control
officer" means any individual employed, contracted with, or appointed by
the animal control authority for the purpose of aiding in the enforcement of
this chapter or any other law or ordinance relating to the licensure of
animals, control of animals, or seizure and impoundment of animals, and
includes any state or local law enforcement officer or other employee whose
duties in whole or in part include assignments that involve the seizure and
impoundment of any animal.

(7) "Owner"
means any person, firm, corporation, organization, or department possessing,
harboring, keeping, having an interest in, or having control or custody of an
animal.

Sec. 2. RCW 16.08.080 and 1989 c
26 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any city or
county that has a notification and appeal process in place as of the effective
date of this act with regard to determining a dog within its jurisdiction to be
dangerous may continue to utilize its process. A city or county animal control
authority that seeks to declare a dog within its jurisdiction, as defined in
subsection (7) of this section, to be dangerous must serve notice upon the dog
owner in person or by regular and certified mail, return receipt requested.

(2) The notice must
state: The statutory basis for the proposed action; the reasons the authority
considers the animal dangerous; a statement that the dog is subject to
registration and controls required by this chapter, including a recitation of
the controls in subsection (6) of this section; and an explanation of the
owner's rights and of the proper procedure for appealing a decision finding the
dog dangerous.

(3) The authority
must make a final determination regarding the dog within thirty days of the
date of delivering or mailing the notice. Before the final determination, the
owner may request a meeting with the authority and at that meeting present
reasons the dog should not be declared dangerous. If the owner requests a
meeting, the authority must schedule one within the twenty-day period following
the date of delivering or mailing the notice. The authority must issue its
final determination in a written order including: Citation of the statutory
basis for the action; a brief statement of the facts supporting the final
determination; and the signature of the person who made the determination. The
authority must deliver the order to the owner in person or mail the order to
the owner by regular and certified mail, return receipt requested.

(4) If the local
jurisdiction has provided for an administrative appeal of the final
determination, the owner must follow the appeal procedure set forth by that
jurisdiction. If the local jurisdiction has not provided for an administrative
appeal, the owner may appeal a municipal authority's final determination that
the dog is dangerous to the municipal court, and may appeal a county animal
control authority's or county sheriff's final determination that the dog is
dangerous to the district court. The owner must make such appeal within twenty
days of receiving the final determination. While the appeal is pending, the
authority may order that the dog be confined or controlled in compliance with
RCW 16.08.090. If the dog is determined to be dangerous, the owner must pay
all costs of confinement and control.

(5) It is
unlawful for an owner to have a dangerous dog in the state without a
certificate of registration issued under this section. This section and RCW
16.08.090 and 16.08.100 shall not apply to police dogs as defined in RCW
4.24.410.

(((2))) (6)
Unless a city or county has a more restrictive code requirement, the animal
control authority of the city or county in which an owner has a dangerous dog
shall issue a certificate of registration to the owner of such animal if the
owner presents to the animal control unit sufficient evidence of:

(a) A proper enclosure
to confine a dangerous dog and the posting of the premises with a clearly
visible warning sign that there is a dangerous dog on the property. In
addition, the owner shall conspicuously display a sign with a warning symbol
that informs children of the presence of a dangerous dog;

(b) A surety bond
issued by a surety insurer qualified under chapter 48.28 RCW in a form
acceptable to the animal control authority in the sum of at least two
hundred fifty thousand dollars, payable to any person injured by the ((vicious))
dangerous dog; or

(c) A policy of
liability insurance, such as homeowner's insurance, issued by an insurer
qualified under Title 48 RCW in the amount of at least two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, insuring the owner for any personal injuries inflicted by the
dangerous dog.

(((3))) (7)(a)(i)
If an owner has the dangerous dog in an incorporated area that is serviced by
both a city and a county animal control authority, the owner shall obtain a
certificate of registration from the city authority;

(((b))) (ii)
If an owner has the dangerous dog in an incorporated or unincorporated area
served only by a county animal control authority, the owner shall obtain a
certificate of registration from the county authority;

(((c))) (iii)
If an owner has the dangerous dog in an incorporated or unincorporated area
that is not served by an animal control authority, the owner shall obtain a
certificate of registration from the office of the local sheriff.

(((4))) (b)
This subsection does not apply if a city or county does not allow dangerous
dogs within its jurisdiction.

(8) Cities and
counties may charge an annual fee, in addition to regular dog licensing fees,
to register dangerous dogs.

(9) Nothing in this
section limits a local authority in placing additional restrictions upon owners
of dangerous dogs. This section does not require a local authority to allow a
dangerous dog within its jurisdiction.

Sec. 3. RCW 16.08.100 and 1987 c
94 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any dangerous dog
shall be immediately confiscated by an animal control authority if the: (a)
Dog is not validly registered under RCW 16.08.080; (b) owner does not secure
the liability insurance coverage required under RCW 16.08.080; (c) dog is not
maintained in the proper enclosure; or (d) dog is outside of the
dwelling of the owner, or outside of the proper enclosure and not under
physical restraint of the responsible person. The owner must pay the costs
of confinement and control. The animal control authority must serve notice
upon the dog owner in person or by regular and certified mail, return receipt
requested, specifying the reason for the confiscation of the dangerous dog,
that the owner is responsible for payment of the costs of confinement and
control, and that the dog will be destroyed in an expeditious and humane manner
if the deficiencies for which the dog was confiscated are not corrected within
twenty days. The animal control authority shall destroy the confiscated
dangerous dog in an expeditious and humane manner if any deficiencies required
by this subsection are not corrected within twenty days of notification.
In addition, the owner shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable in
accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.

(2) If a dangerous dog
of an owner with a prior conviction under this chapter attacks or bites a
person or another domestic animal, the dog's owner is guilty of a class C
felony, punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021. In addition, the
dangerous dog shall be immediately confiscated by an animal control authority,
placed in quarantine for the proper length of time, and thereafter destroyed in
an expeditious and humane manner.

(3) The owner of any
dog that aggressively attacks and causes severe injury or death of any human,
whether or not the dog has previously been declared potentially
dangerous or dangerous, shall be guilty of a class C felony punishable in
accordance with RCW 9A.20.021. In such a prosecution, the state has the
burden of showing that the owner of the dog either knew or should have known
that the dog was potentially dangerous as defined in this chapter. In
addition, the dog shall be immediately confiscated by an animal control authority,
placed in quarantine for the proper length of time, and thereafter destroyed in
an expeditious and humane manner.

(4) Any
person entering a dog in a dog fight is guilty of a class C felony punishable
in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.

---
END ---