BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
70.95.240 and 2000 c 154 s 3 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) After the adoption of regulations or ordinances
by any

_7 county, city, or jurisdictional board of health
providing for the

_8 issuance of permits as provided in RCW 70.95.160, it
shall be

_9 unlawful for any person to dump or deposit or permit the
dumping

10 or depositing of any solid waste onto or under the surface
of the

11 ground or into the waters of this state except at a
solid waste

12 disposal site for which there is a valid permit. This
section

13 does not:

14 (a) Prohibit a person from dumping or depositing
solid waste

15 resulting from his or her own activities onto or under
the surface

16 of ground owned or leased by him or her when such action
does not

17 violate statutes or ordinances, or create a nuisance;

18 (b) Apply to a person using a waste-derived soil
amendment that

19 has been approved by the department under RCW 70.95.205;
or

p. 1 SB
5093

_1 (c) Apply to the application of commercial
fertilizer that has

_2 been registered with the department of agriculture as
provided in

_3 RCW 15.54.325, and that is applied in accordance with
the

_4 standards established in RCW 15.54.800(3).

_5 (2)(a) It is a class 3 civil infraction as defined
in RCW

_6 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less than
or equal to

_7 one cubic foot.

_8 (b) It is a class 1 civil infraction as defined in
RCW 7.80.120

_9 for a person to litter in an amount greater than one
cubic foot in

10 an ((unincorporated)) incorporated area of
a county. Unless

11 suspended or modified by a court, the person shall also
pay a

12 litter cleanup fee of twenty-five dollars per cubic foot
of

13 litter. The court may, in addition to or in lieu of
part or all

14 of the cleanup fee, order the person to pick up and
remove litter

15 from the property, with prior permission of the legal
owner or, in

16 the case of public property, of the agency managing the
property.

17 (c) It is a misdemeanor for a person to litter in an
amount

18 greater than one cubic foot but less than one cubic yard
in an

19 unincorporated area of a county. The person shall also
pay a

20 litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the
actual cost

21 of cleanup, or fifty dollars per cubic foot of litter,
whichever

22 is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the

23 restitution payment to the landowner and one-half of the

24 restitution payment to the jurisdictional health
department

25 investigating the incident. The court may, in addition
to or in

26 lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution payment,
order the

27 person to pick up and remove litter from the property,
with prior

28 permission of the legal owner or, in the case of public
property,

29 of the agency managing the property. The court may
suspend or

30 modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time

31 offender under this section, if the person cleans up and
properly

32 disposes of the litter.

33 (d) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to litter
in an

34 amount of one cubic yard or more in an unincorporated
area of a

35 county. The person shall also pay a litter cleanup
restitution

36 payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or
one hundred

37 dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater.
The court

38 shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to
the

SB 5093 p. 2

_1 landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the

_2 jurisdictional health department investigating the
incident. The

_3 court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of
the cleanup

_4 restitution payment, order the person to pick up and
remove litter

_5 from the property, with prior permission of the legal
owner or, in

_6 the case of public property, of the agency managing the
property.

_7 The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup
restitution

_8 payment for a first-time offender under this section, if
the

_9 person cleans up and properly disposes of the litter.

10 (e) If a junk vehicle is abandoned in violation of
this

11 chapter, RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's removal,
disposal,

12 and sale, and the penalties that may be imposed against
the person

13 who abandoned the vehicle.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5093