BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there are still areas of the state that have very high levels of
unemployment despite strong statewide economic growth.

The legislature also
finds that additional incentives are needed to promote economic stimulation and
new employment opportunities in these distressed areas, and that these
incentives are essential to increase economic growth in distressed areas.

The legislature intends
to accomplish this by providing a sales and use tax exemption on machinery and
equipment and buildings used by businesses that establish call centers in
distressed areas of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a person, located in an eligible area,
of machinery and equipment used directly in a call center operation, or to
sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and
equipment, but only if the purchaser provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller
shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to constructing or improving of buildings or other
structures, or sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to constructing or improving of buildings or other structures, located
in eligible areas, that are used directly as a call center, but only if the
purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.

(3) For purposes of
this section:

(a)
"Buildings" means only those structures used directly in a call
center operation. If a building is used partly for a call center operation and
partly for other purposes, the applicable tax exemption shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department. The term "buildings" also includes machinery and
equipment that is permanently affixed to and becomes a physical part of a
building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air conditioning,
plumbing, phones, or electrical.

(b) "Call
centers" means a business operation employing fifty or more employees, who
are engaged in telecommunications business activities involving financial
transactions, technical support operations, and customer services.

(c) "Eligible
area" means a community empowerment zone, as defined in chapter 43.31C RCW
and a county with fewer than one hundred persons per square mile or a county
smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as determined annually by the
office of financial management and published by the department of revenue
effective for the period July 1st through June 30th.

(d)(i) "Machinery
and equipment" means commercial fixtures, devices, and support facilities,
and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component thereof,
including repair parts and replacement parts. "Machinery and equipment"
includes electronic communications equipment, communications systems
infrastructure components, computer software, computer hardware, associated
support equipment that is necessary to maintain the communications operations
of a call center, and office furniture.

(ii) "Machinery
and equipment" does not include:

(A) Hand-powered tools;
and

(B) Property with a
useful life of less than one year.

(4) A person claiming
the exemption under this section shall make an annual report to the
department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: The type of activity, the location of the person, how
long the person has been located in the county, and the taxpayer name and
registration number. The report must be filed by January 30th of each year in
which the exemption was claimed during the previous year. Failure to file a
report will not result in the loss of eligibility under this section. However,
the department, through its research division, shall contact taxpayers who have
not filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the
taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the data and information
necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply in respect to the use by a business, located within
an eligible area, of machinery and equipment used directly in a call center.

(2) The definitions in
section 2 of this act apply to this section.

(3) A
person claiming the exemption under this section shall make an annual report to
the department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: The type of activity, the location of the person, how
long the person has been located in the county, and the taxpayer name and
registration number. The report must be filed by January 30th of each year in
which the exemption was claimed during the previous year. Failure to file a
report will not result in the loss of eligibility under this section. However,
the department, through its research division, shall contact taxpayers who have
not filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer
in the filing of the report, so that the data and information necessary to
measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.

---
END ---