BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 82.62.030
and 1999 c 164 s 306 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) A person shall be allowed a credit against the tax
due

_7 under chapter 82.04 RCW as provided in this section. The
credit

_8 shall equal: (a) Four thousand dollars for each qualified

_9 employment position with wages and benefits greater than
forty

10 thousand dollars annually that is directly created in an
eligible

11 business and (b) two thousand dollars for each qualified

12 employment position with wages and benefits less than or
equal to

13 forty thousand dollars annually that is directly created in
an

14 eligible business.

15 (2) The department shall keep a running total of all
credits

16 granted under this chapter during each fiscal year. The

17 department shall not allow any credits which would cause
the

18 tabulation to exceed seven million five hundred thousand
dollars

19 in any fiscal year. If all or part of an application for
credit

p. 1 SB
5095

_1 is disallowed under this subsection, the disallowed
portion shall

_2 be carried over for approval the next fiscal year. However,
the

_3 applicant's carryover into the next fiscal year is only
permitted

_4 if the tabulation for the next fiscal year does not
exceed the cap

_5 for that fiscal year as of the date on which the
department has

_6 disallowed the application.

_7 (3) No recipient may use the tax credits to
decertify a union

_8 or to displace existing jobs in any community empowerment
zone, as

_9 defined in RCW 43.31C.020, in the state.

10 (4) No recipient may receive a tax credit on taxes
which have

11 not been paid during the taxable year.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5095 p. 2