BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 1.20 RCW

_5 to read as follows:

_6 (1) Each public entity shall display the national
league of

_7 families' POW/MIA flag along with the flag of the United
States

_8 and the flag of the state upon or near the principal
building of

_9 the public entity on the following days: (a) Armed
Forces Day on

10 the third Saturday in May; (b) Memorial Day on the last
Monday in

11 May; (c) Flag Day on June 14; (d) Independence Day on
July 4; (e)

12 National POW/MIA Recognition Day; and (f) Veterans' Day
on

13 November 11. If the designated day falls on a Saturday
or Sunday,

14 then the POW/MIA flag will be displayed on the preceding
Friday.

15 (2) The governor's veterans affairs advisory
committee shall

16 provide information to public entities regarding the
purchase and

17 display of the POW/MIA flag upon request.

p. 1 SSB
5097

_1 (3) As used in this section, "public
entity" means every state

_2 agency, including each institution of higher education,
and every

_3 county, city, and town.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5097 p. 2