BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 70.02.010
and 1993 c 448 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:

_7 (1) "Audit" means an assessment, evaluation,
determination, or

_8 investigation of a health care provider by a person not
employed

_9 by or affiliated with the provider to determine compliance
with:

10 (a) Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or
scientific

11 standards;

12 (b) A private or public program of payments to a health
care

13 provider; or

14 (c) Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or

15 certification.

16 (2) "Directory information" means information
disclosing the

17 presence, and for the purpose of identification, the name,

18 residence, sex, and the general health condition of a
particular

p. 1 SB
5098

_1 patient who is a patient in a health care facility or
who is

_2 currently receiving emergency health care in a health
care

_3 facility.

_4 (3) "General health condition" means the
patient's health

_5 status described in terms of "critical,"
"poor," "fair," "good,"

_6 "excellent," or terms denoting similar
conditions.

_7 (4) "Health care" means any care, service,
or procedure

_8 provided by a health care provider:

_9 (a) To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's
physical or

10 mental condition; or

11 (b) That affects the structure or any function of
the human

12 body.

13 (5) "Health care facility" means a
hospital, clinic, nursing

14 home, laboratory, office, or similar place where a
health care

15 provider provides health care to patients.

16 (6) "Health care information" means any
information, whether

17 oral or recorded in any form or medium, that identifies
or can

18 readily be associated with the identity of a patient and
directly

19 relates to the patient's health care. The term includes
any record

20 of disclosures of health care information.

21 (7) "Health care provider" means a person
who is licensed,

22 certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by the
law of this

23 state to provide health care in the ordinary course of
business or

24 practice of a profession.

25 (8) "Institutional review board" means any
board, committee, or

26 other group formally designated by an institution, or
authorized

27 under federal or state law, to review, approve the
initiation of,

28 or conduct periodic review of research programs to
assure the

29 protection of the rights and welfare of human research
subjects.

30 (9) "Maintain," as related to health care
information, means to

31 hold, possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that

32 information.

33 (10) "Patient" means an individual who
receives or has received

34 health care. The term includes a deceased individual
who has

35 received health care.

36 (11) "Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust,

37 estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture,

SB 5098 p. 2

_1 government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any
other legal

_2 or commercial entity.

_3 (12) "Reasonable fee" means the charges
for duplicating ((or

_4 searching)) the record, but shall not exceed
sixty-five cents per

_5 page for the first thirty pages and fifty cents per page
for all

_6 other pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching
and handling

_7 may be charged not to exceed fifteen dollars. A
health care

_8 provider may not charge a second clerical fee to
produce the

_9 medical bill; one clerical fee may be charged for
both the

10 treatment records and bills for treatment with the
health care

11 provider. The clerical fee for a health care
provider who permits

12 an independent medical records copying service to
retrieve and

13 duplicate the medical records shall not exceed ten
dollars. These

14 amounts shall be adjusted biennially in accordance with
changes in

15 the consumer price index, all consumers, for
Seattle-Tacoma

16 metropolitan statistical area as determined by the
secretary of

17 health. However, where editing of records by a health
care provider

18 is required by statute and is done by the provider
personally, the

19 fee may be the usual and customary charge for a basic
office

20 visit.

21 (13) "Third-party payor" means an insurer
regulated under Title

22 48 RCW authorized to transact business in this state or
other

23 jurisdiction, including a health care service
contractor, and

24 health maintenance organization; or an employee welfare
benefit

25 plan; or a state or federal health benefit program.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5098