BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
48.43.540 and 2000 c 5 s 13 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 Any carrier that offers a health plan and any
self-insured

_8 health plan subject to the jurisdiction of Washington
state shall

_9 designate a medical director who is licensed under
chapter 18.57

10 or 18.71 RCW. However, a naturopathic or complementary
alternative

11 health plan, which provides solely complementary
alternative

12 health care to individuals, groups, or health plans, may
have a

13 medical director licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW. A
carrier that

14 offers dental only coverage shall designate a dental
director who

15 is licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW. A health
plan or self-

16 insured health plan that offers only religious
nonmedical

17 treatment or religious nonmedical nursing care shall not
be

18 required to have a medical director.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SSB
5099