BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the current backlog of pending water rights applications is unacceptable
and that it is essential to facilitate more expeditious processing and
eliminate the backlog as soon as possible. Agriculture, business, and
individuals are unable to carry out plans and are suffering economic harm
because of the delay in processing water rights applications. By this act, the
legislature intends to remove some of the complexity in the processing of water
rights applications that is the result of judicial interpretations of existing
law and, thereby, to make processing itself more expeditious and, also, to make
the law more clear and, thereby, to help avoid additional delay caused by
litigation. The legislature intends to allow pending applications for changes,
transfers, or amendments of existing water rights to be processed independently
of pending applications for new water rights and without regard to possible
impairment of pending applications for new water rights for the same source of
supply. The legislature intends to address both surface water and ground water
and does not intend to divert resources away from or in any other way to deter
the processing of applications for new water rights.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.03.380 and 1997 c
442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others
and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of
priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use,
point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation
of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such
change results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used
under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive
quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted
pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most
recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of
diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person having
an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written application
therefor with the department, and the application shall not be granted until
notice of the application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it
shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made without injury or
detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a
certificate in duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such change
of point of diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and
be made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to
the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the
same effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.

(2) If an application
for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to
another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive
concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or
impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place
of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation
district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors
of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district,
and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This section shall
not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of
water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through
90.42.070.

(5) Beginning on the
effective date of this section and until June 30, 2005, pending applications
for new water rights are not entitled to protection from impairment, injury, or
detriment when an application for a change, transfer, or amendment of an
existing surface or ground water right is considered.

(6) Beginning on the
effective date of this section and until June 30, 2005, applications relating
to existing surface or ground water rights may be processed and decisions on
them rendered independently of processing and rendering decisions on pending
applications for new water rights within the same source of supply without
regard to the date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.

(7) Beginning on the
effective date of this section and until June 30, 2005, notwithstanding any
other existing authority to process applications, an application relating to an
existing surface or ground water right may be processed ahead of a previously
filed application, when sufficient information necessary to the investigations,
determinations, and findings required under RCW 90.03.290 on the previously
filed application, when sufficient information for a decision on the previously
filed application is not available and the applicant for the previously filed
application is sent written notice that explains what information is not
available and why and informs the applicant that processing of the next
application in order of filing will begin. No such previously filed
application shall lose its priority date.

(8) Beginning
January 1, 2002, and ending January 1, 2004, the department shall report to the
legislature by January 1st of each year on the results of processing
applications under subsections (5) through (7) of this section and, in the
report due on January 1, 2004, shall provide an evaluation and make
recommendations regarding modification of any of the provisions of these
subsections.

(9) Any right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred or any rule or order adopted or
decision made under subsections (5) through (8) of this section survive after
June 30, 2005, in any proceeding instituted under or with regard to those
subsections.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
authorizes the processing of applications relating to existing water rights to
stop the processing of applications for new water rights. The processing of
applications assigned priority by rule shall not stop the processing of other
applications, and at least half of the resources available to the department
for processing applications shall be devoted to the processing of nonpriority
applications.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---