BE IT
ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.27.010 and 1997 c 314 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation who or which, in
the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or offers to undertake,
or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve,
move, wreck or demolish, for another, any building, highway, road, railroad,
excavation or other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to
real estate or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting
or other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or
works in connection therewith or who installs or repairs roofing or siding; or,
who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members of more
than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single building permit
except as otherwise provided herein. "Contractor" includes any
person, firm, ((or)) corporation, or other entity covered by this
subsection, whether or not registered as required under this chapter.

(2) "Department"
means the department of labor and industries.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.

(4)
"General contractor" means a contractor whose business operations
require the use of more than two unrelated building trades or crafts whose work
the contractor shall superintend or do in whole or in part. "General
contractor" shall not include an individual who does all work personally
without employees or other "specialty contractors" as defined in this
section. The terms "general contractor" and "builder" are
synonymous.

(((3)))
(5) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.

(6)
"Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter and that
the contractor's registration has been revoked.

(7)
"Registration suspension" means a written notice from the department
that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter and that the
contractor's registration has been suspended for a specified time, or until the
contractor shows evidence of compliance with this chapter.

(8)
"Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons owning
or leasing real property upon which one single-family residence is to be built
or upon which there is a single-family residence to which improvements are to
be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of
any construction.

(9)
"Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do not
fall within the ((foregoing)) definition of "general
contractor".

(((4)))
(10) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, ((or))
corporation, or other entity doing work as a contractor without being
registered in compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered
contractor" includes contractors whose registration is expired ((for
more than thirty days beyond the renewal date or has been)), revoked, or
suspended. "Unregistered contractor" does not include a
contractor who has maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned
account required by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty
or fewer days.

(((5)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(6)
"Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.

(7)))
(11) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment that has not
been satisfied either through payment, court approved settlement, discharge in
bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW 19.72.070.

(12)
"Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city, town,
or county of a contractor registration card that is current on its face,
checking the department's contractor registration data base, or calling the
department to confirm that the contractor is registered.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.27.030 and 1998 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an application under
oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and which shall include the
following information pertaining to the applicant:

(a)
Employer social security number.

(b) Unified
business identifier number, if required by the department of revenue.

(c)
Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees
working in Washington, as follows:

(i)
The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii)
The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii)
For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an
agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement,
filing a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the
workers' compensation law in the applicant's state or province of domicile
certifying that the applicant has secured the payment of compensation under the
other state's or province's workers' compensation law.

(((c)))
(d) Employment security department number.

(((d)))
(e) State excise tax registration number.

(((e)))
(f) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted
for the information required by (((b))) (c) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (((c))) (d)
and (((d))) (e) of this subsection.

(((f)))
(g) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty
contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.

(((g)))
(h) The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm or
partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the applicant is an
individual proprietorship, or the name and address of the corporate officers
and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is a corporation or the name
and address of all members of other business entities. The information
contained in such application is a matter of public record and open to public
inspection.

(2)
The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage information
provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(((b))) (c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the coverage of an
individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws
of another state, the department may notify the other state that the applicant
is employing employees in Washington.

(3)(a)
The department shall deny an application for registration if: (i) The
applicant has been previously ((registered)) performing work subject
to this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, ((or))
corporation, or other entity and the department has notice that
the applicant has an unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action
based on this chapter ((that was incurred during a previous registration
under this chapter)) or the applicant owes the department money for
penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a final
judgment; (ii) the applicant was a principal or officer of a partnership,
corporation, or other entity that either has an unsatisfied final judgment
against it in an action that was incurred for work performed subject to this
chapter or owes the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under
this chapter as a result of a final judgment; or (iii) the applicant does not
have a valid unified business identifier number, if required by the department
of revenue.

(b)
The department shall suspend an active registration if (i) the department has
notice that the registrant is a sole proprietor or a principal or officer of a
registered contractor that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for
work within the scope of this chapter; or (ii) the applicant does not maintain
a valid unified business identifier number, if required by the department of
revenue.

(4)
The department shall not deny an application or suspend a registration because
of an unsatisfied final judgment if the applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied
final judgment was determined by the director to be the result of the fraud or
negligence of another party.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.27.040 and 1997 c 314 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond issued by a surety
insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW in the sum of ((six))
twelve thousand dollars if the applicant is a general contractor and ((four))
six thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty contractor. If no
valid bond is already on file with the department at the time the application
is filed, a bond must accompany the registration application. The bond shall
have the state of Washington named as obligee with good and sufficient surety
in a form to be approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and
may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the
director ((of its intent to cancel the bond)). A cancellation or
revocation of the bond or withdrawal of the surety from the bond automatically
suspends the registration issued to the registrant until a new bond or
reinstatement notice has been filed and approved as provided in this section.
The bond shall be conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons
performing labor, including employee benefits, for the contractor, will pay all
taxes and contributions due to the state of Washington, and will pay all
persons furnishing labor or material or renting or supplying equipment to the
contractor and will pay all amounts that may be adjudged against the contractor
by reason of breach of contract including negligent or improper work in the
conduct of the contracting business. A change in the name of a business or a
change in the type of business entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes
of this section so long as one of the original applicants for such bond
maintains partial ownership in the business covered by the bond.

(2)
((Any contractor registered as of July 1, 1997, who maintains such
registration in accordance with this chapter shall be in compliance with this
chapter until the next annual renewal of the contractor's certificate of
registration. At that time)) At the time of initial registration or
renewal, the contractor shall provide a bond((, cash deposit,)) or
other security deposit as required by this chapter and comply with all of the
other provisions of this chapter before the department shall issue or
renew the contractor's certificate of registration. Any contractor
registered as of July 1, 2001, who maintains that registration in accordance
with this chapter is in compliance with this chapter until the next renewal of
the contractor's certificate of registration.

(3)
Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the contractor for any
of the items referred to in this section may bring suit upon the bond or
deposit in the superior court of the county in which the work was done or of
any county in which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The surety
issuing the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond. Action
upon the bond or deposit ((shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one year from
the date of expiration of the certificate of registration in force at the time))
brought by a residential homeowner for breach of contract by a party to the
construction contract shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint
with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within two years from the date
the claimed contract work was substantially completed or abandoned. Action
upon the bond or deposit brought by any other authorized party shall be
commenced by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk of the appropriate
superior court within one year from the date the claimed labor was
performed and benefits accrued, taxes and contributions owing the state of
Washington became due, materials and equipment were furnished, or the claimed
contract work was substantially completed or abandoned. Service of
process in an action against the contractor, the contractor's bond, or the
deposit shall be exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of
the summons and complaint and a fee ((of)) adopted by rule of not
less than ten dollars to cover the ((handling)) costs shall be
served by registered or certified mail, or other delivery service requiring
notice of receipt, upon the department at the time suit is started and the
department shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all
suits so commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives the
((ten-dollar)) fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The
service shall constitute service on the registrant and the surety for suit upon
the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and complaint
or a copy thereof to the registrant at the address listed in the registrant's
application and to the surety within ((forty-eight hours)) two days
after it shall have been received.

(4) The
total amount paid from a bond or deposit required by this section to claimants
other than residential homeowners must not exceed fifty percent of the bond
amount.

(5)
The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate amount in excess
of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant
to this chapter for an infraction. The liability of the surety shall not
cumulate where the bond has been renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or
otherwise extended. The surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the
department and the parties, tender to the clerk of the court having
jurisdiction of the action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the
amount of the bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond shall be
exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending at any one time exceed the
amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be satisfied from the bond in
the following order:

(a)
Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee benefits;

(b)
Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction contract;

(c) Registered
or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;

(d)
Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;

(e)
Any court costs, interest, and attorney's fees plaintiff may be entitled to
recover. The surety is not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit
of its bond.

A
payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to the extent of
any payment made by the surety.

(((5)))
(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section against the
contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of contract by a party
to a construction contract, is entitled to costs, interest, and reasonable
attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond is not liable in an aggregate amount
in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed
pursuant to this chapter for an infraction.

(7)
If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon the bond so
furnished that there ((shall not be)) is not in effect a bond ((undertaking))
in the full amount prescribed in this section, ((the department shall
suspend)) the registration of the contractor is automatically suspended
until the bond liability in the required amount unimpaired by unsatisfied
judgment claims is furnished. ((If the bond becomes fully impaired, a new
bond must be furnished at the rates prescribed by this section.

(6)))
(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the contractor
may file with the department a deposit consisting of cash or other security
acceptable to the department.

(((7)))
(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against the
registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute upon the
security held by the department by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied
final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the department within one
year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of
such certified copy the department shall pay or order paid from the deposit,
through the registry of the superior court which rendered judgment, towards the
amount of the unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment by the department
shall be the order of receipt by the department, but the department shall have
no liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.

(((8)))
(10) The director may require an applicant applying to renew or reinstate a
registration or applying for a new registration to file a bond of up to three
times the normally required amount, if the director determines that an
applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate officer, owner, or partner
of a current applicant, has had in the past five years (a) two or more
unsatisfied judgments in actions under this chapter involving a residential
owner of a single-family dwelling; or (b) three or more judgments in actions
based on this chapter on three or more different structures by three or more different
owner claimants.

(11)
The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper administration of the
security.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.27.050 and 1987 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
At the time of registration and subsequent reregistration, the applicant shall
furnish insurance or financial responsibility in the form of an assigned
account in the amount of ((twenty)) fifty thousand dollars for
injury or damages to property, and ((fifty)) one hundred thousand
dollars for injury or damage including death to any one person, and ((one))
two hundred thousand dollars for injury or damage including death to
more than one person ((or financial responsibility to satisfy these amounts)).

(2)
((Failure to maintain insurance or financial responsibility relative to the
contractor's activities shall be cause to suspend or deny the contractor his or
her or their registration.)) An expiration, cancellation, or revocation
of the insurance policy or withdrawal of the insurer from the insurance policy
automatically suspends the registration issued to the registrant until a new
insurance policy or reinstatement notice has been filed and approved as
provided in this section.

(3)(a)
Proof of financial responsibility authorized in this section may be given by
providing, in the amount required by subsection (1) of this section, an
assigned account acceptable to the department. The assigned account shall be
held by the department to satisfy any execution on a judgment issued against
the contractor for damage to property or injury or death to any person
occurring in the contractor's contracting operations, according to the
provisions of the assigned account agreement. The department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the assigned account.

(b)
The assigned account filed with the director as proof of financial
responsibility shall be canceled at the expiration of three years after:

(i)
The contractor's registration has expired or been revoked; or

(ii)
The contractor has furnished proof of insurance as required by subsection (1)
of this section;

if, in
either case, no legal action has been instituted against the contractor or on
the account at the expiration of the three-year period.

(c)
If a contractor chooses to file an assigned account as authorized in this
section, the contractor shall, on any contracting project, notify each person
with whom the contractor enters into a contract or to whom the contractor
submits a bid that the contractor has filed an assigned account in lieu of
insurance and that recovery from the account for any claim against the
contractor for property damage or personal injury or death occurring in the
project requires the claimant to obtain a court judgment.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.27.060 and 1997 c 314 s 6 and 1997 c 58 s 817 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1) A
certificate of registration shall be valid for ((one)) two years
and shall be renewed on or before the expiration date. The department shall
issue to the applicant a certificate of registration upon compliance with the
registration requirements of this chapter.

(2)
If the department approves an application, it shall issue a certificate of
registration to the applicant. ((The certificate shall be valid for:

(a)
One year;

(b)
Until the bond expires; or

(c)
Until the insurance expires, whichever comes first. The department shall place
the expiration date on the certificate.

(3)
A contractor may supply a short-term bond or insurance policy to bring its
registration period to the full one year.

(4)))
(3) If a contractor's surety bond or other security has an unsatisfied
judgment against it or is canceled, or if the contractor's insurance policy is
canceled, the contractor's registration shall be automatically suspended on the
effective date of the impairment or cancellation. The department shall mail
notice of the suspension to the contractor's address on the certificate of
registration by certified and by first class mail within ((forty-eight hours))
two days after suspension.

(((5)))
(4) Renewal of registration is valid on the date the department receives
the required fee and proof of bond and liability insurance, if sent by
certified mail or other means requiring proof of delivery. The receipt or
proof of delivery shall serve as the contractor's proof of renewed registration
until he or she receives verification from the department.

(((6)))
(5) The department shall immediately suspend the certificate of registration
of a contractor who has been certified by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a
residential or visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. The certificate
of registration shall not be reissued or renewed unless the person provides to
the department a release from the department of social and health services
stating that he or she is in compliance with the order and the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for certification during the
suspension.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is
added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If an unregistered contractor defaults in a payment, penalty, or fine due to
the department, the director or the director's designee may issue a notice of
assessment certifying the amount due. The notice must be served upon the
contractor by mailing the notice to the contractor by certified mail to the
contractor's last known address or served in the manner prescribed for the
service of a summons in a civil action.

(2) A
notice of assessment becomes final thirty days from the date the notice was
served upon the contractor unless a written request for reconsideration is
filed with the department or an appeal is filed in a court of competent
jurisdiction in the manner specified in RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598. The
request for reconsideration must set forth with particularity the reason for
the contractor's request. The department, within thirty days after receiving a
written request for reconsideration, may modify or reverse a notice of
assessment, or may hold a notice of assessment in abeyance pending further
investigation. If a final decision of a court in favor of the department is
not appealed within the time allowed by law, then the amount of the unappealed
assessment, or such amount of the assessment as is found due by the final
decision of the court, is final.

(3)
The director or the director's designee may file with the clerk of any county
within the state, a warrant in the amount of the notice of assessment, plus
interest, penalties, and a filing fee of twenty dollars. The clerk of the county
in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court
cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the
judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant,
the name of the contractor mentioned in the warrant, the amount of payment,
penalty, fine due on it, or filing fee, and the date when the warrant was
filed. The aggregate amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien
upon the title to, and interest in, all real and personal property of the
contractor against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a
civil case docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon
the warrant in all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect
to execution or other process issued against rights or property upon judgment
in a court of competent jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed is sufficient to
support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the state in a manner
provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied. The
clerk of the court is entitled to a filing fee which will be added to the
amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the contractor
within three days of filing with the clerk.

(4)
The director or the director's designee may issue to any person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the
state, a public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and order to
withhold and deliver property of any kind whatsoever when he or she has reason
to believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm, corporation,
other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state, property that is or will become due,
owing, or belonging to a contractor upon whom a notice of assessment has been
served by the department for payments, penalties, or fines due to the
department. The effect of a notice and order is continuous from the date the
notice and order is first made until the liability out of which the notice and
order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time.
The department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable by
reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the notice and
order was made that the notice and order has been released.

The
notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by the sheriff of the
county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified mail, return receipt requested,
or by an authorized representative of the director. A person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the
state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom service has been
made shall answer the notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of
service, under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters
inquired of in the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if
the party served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of the
department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the director or
the director's authorized representative. The director shall hold the property
in trust for application on the contractor's indebtedness to the department, or
for return without interest, in accordance with a final determination of a
petition for review. In the alternative, the party shall furnish a good and
sufficient surety bond satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final
determination of liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to
answer the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may
render judgment by default against the party for the full amount claimed by the
director in the notice, together with costs. If a notice is served upon a
contractor and the property subject to it is wages, the contractor may assert
in the answer all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage
earner is entitled.

(5)
In addition to the procedure for collection of a payment, penalty, or fine due
to the department as set forth in this section, the department may recover
civil penalties imposed under this chapter in a civil action in the name of the
department brought in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the
violation is alleged to have occurred.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.27.090 and 1997 c 314 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
registration provisions of this chapter ((does)) do not apply
to:

(1)
An authorized representative of the United States government, the state of
Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county, township, irrigation
district, reclamation district, or other municipal or political corporation or
subdivision of this state;

(2)
Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of their office;

(3)
Public utilities operating under the regulations of the utilities and
transportation commission in construction, maintenance, or development work
incidental to their own business;

(4)
Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the discovering or
producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing, abandoning, or other
operation of any petroleum or gas well or any surface or underground mine or
mineral deposit when performed by an owner or lessee;

(5)
The sale or installation of any finished products, materials, or articles of
merchandise ((which)) that are not actually fabricated into and
do not become a permanent fixed part of a structure;

(6)
Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of personal property((,
except this chapter shall apply to all mobile/manufactured housing. A
mobile/manufactured home may be installed, set up, or repaired by the
registered or legal owner, by a contractor registered under this chapter)) performed
by the registered or legal owner, or by a mobile/manufactured home retail
dealer or manufacturer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty
service and repairs under chapter 46.70 RCW;

(7)
Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on within the
limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the legal jurisdiction
of the federal government;

(8)
Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment without
fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of, the work of the
contractor;

(9)
Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or more contracts,
the aggregate contract price of which for labor and materials and all other
items is less than five hundred dollars, such work or operations being
considered as of a casual, minor, or inconsequential nature. The exemption
prescribed in this subsection does not apply in any instance wherein the work
or construction is only a part of a larger or major operation, whether
undertaken by the same or a different contractor, or in which a division of the
operation is made into contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for
the purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption prescribed
in this subsection does not apply to a person who advertises or puts out any
sign or card or other device which might indicate to the public that he or she
is a contractor, or that he or she is qualified to engage in the business of
contractor;

(10)
Any construction or operation incidental to the construction and repair of
irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted irrigation districts
or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying, agriculture, viticulture,
horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or to clearing or other work upon
land in rural districts for fire prevention purposes; except when any of the
above work is performed by a registered contractor;

(11)
An owner who contracts for a project with a registered contractor;

(12)
Any person working on his or her own property, whether occupied by him or her
or not, and any person working on his or her personal residence, whether owned
by him or her or not but this exemption shall not apply to any person otherwise
covered by this chapter who constructs an improvement on his or her own
property with the intention and for the purpose of selling the improved
property;

(13)
Owners of commercial properties who use their own employees to do maintenance,
repair, and alteration work in or upon their own properties;

(14)
A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting solely in his or
her professional capacity, an electrician licensed under the laws of the state
of Washington, or a plumber licensed under the laws of the state of Washington
or licensed by a political subdivision of the state of Washington while
operating within the boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption
provided in this subsection is applicable only when the licensee is operating
within the scope of his or her license;

(15)
Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as an employee of a
registered contractor with wages as his or her sole compensation or as an
employee with wages as his or her sole compensation;

(16)
Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as required by RCW
47.28.070, with the department of transportation to perform highway
construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;

(17)
A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who subcontracts the
installation, set-up, or repair work to actively registered contractors. This
exemption only applies to the installation, set-up, or repair of the
mobile/manufactured homes that were manufactured or sold by the
mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.27.100 and 1997 c 314 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 18.27.065 for partnerships and joint ventures, no
person who has registered under one name as provided in this chapter shall
engage in the business, or act in the capacity, of a contractor under any other
name unless such name also is registered under this chapter.

(2)
All advertising and all contracts, correspondence, cards, signs, posters,
papers, and documents which show a contractor's name or address shall show the
contractor's name or address as registered under this chapter.

(3)(a)
All advertising that shows the contractor's name or address shall show the
contractor's current registration number. The registration number may be
omitted in an alphabetized listing of registered contractors stating only the
name, address, and telephone number: PROVIDED, That signs on motor vehicles
subject to RCW 46.16.010 and on-premise signs shall not constitute advertising
as provided in this section. All materials used to directly solicit business
from retail customers who are not businesses shall show the contractor's
current registration number. A contractor shall not use a false or expired
registration number in purchasing or offering to purchase an advertisement for
which a contractor registration number is required. Advertising by airwave
transmission shall not be subject to this subsection (3)(a).

(b)
The director may issue a subpoena to any person or entity selling any
advertising subject to this section for the name, address, and telephone number
provided to the seller of the advertising by the purchaser of the advertising.
The subpoena must have enclosed a stamped, self-addressed envelope and blank
form to be filled out by the seller of the advertising. If the seller of the
advertising has the information on file, the seller shall, within a reasonable
time, return the completed form to the department. The subpoena must be issued
((before forty-eight hours)) no more than two days after the
expiration of the issue or publication containing the advertising or after the
broadcast of the advertising. The good-faith compliance by a seller of
advertising with a written request of the department for information concerning
the purchaser of advertising shall constitute a complete defense to any civil
or criminal action brought against the seller of advertising arising from such
compliance. Advertising by airwave or electronic transmission is subject to
this subsection (3)(b).

(4)
No contractor shall advertise that he or she is bonded and insured because of
the bond required to be filed and sufficiency of insurance as provided in this
chapter.

(5) A
contractor shall not falsify a registration number and use it, or use an
expired registration number, in connection with any solicitation or
identification as a contractor. All individual contractors and all partners,
associates, agents, salesmen, solicitors, officers, and employees of
contractors shall use their true names and addresses at all times while engaged
in the business or capacity of a contractor or activities related thereto.

(6)
Any advertising by a person, firm, or corporation soliciting work as a
contractor when that person, firm, or corporation is not registered pursuant to
this chapter is a violation of this chapter.

(7)(a)
The finding of a violation of this section by the director at a hearing held in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, shall
subject the person committing the violation to a penalty of not more than ((five))
ten thousand dollars as determined by the director.

(b)
Penalties under this section shall not apply to a violation determined to be an
inadvertent error.

Sec.
9. RCW
18.27.110 and 1997 c 314 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No city, town or county shall issue a construction building permit for work
which is to be done by any contractor required to be registered under this
chapter without verification that such contractor is currently registered as
required by law. When such verification is made, nothing contained in this
section is intended to be, nor shall be construed to create, or form the basis
for any liability under this chapter on the part of any city, town or county,
or its officers, employees or agents. However, failure to verify the
contractor registration number results in liability to the city, town, or
county to a penalty to be imposed according to RCW 18.27.100(((7))) (6)(a).

(2)
At the time of issuing the building permit, all cities, towns, or counties are responsible
for:

(a)
Printing the contractor registration number on the building permit; and

(b)
Providing a written notice to the building permit applicant informing them of
contractor registration laws and the potential risk and monetary liability to the
homeowner for using an unregistered contractor.

(3)
If a building permit is obtained by an applicant or contractor who falsifies
information to obtain an exemption provided under RCW 18.27.090, the building
permit shall be forfeited.

Sec.
10. RCW
18.27.114 and 1997 c 314 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any contractor agreeing to perform any contracting project: (a) For the
repair, alteration, or construction of four or fewer residential units or
accessory structures on such residential property when the bid or contract
price totals one thousand dollars or more; or (b) for the repair, alteration,
or construction of a commercial building when the bid or contract price totals
one thousand dollars or more but less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide
the customer with the following disclosure statement in substantially the
following form using lower case and upper case twelve-point and bold type where
appropriate, prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE
TO CUSTOMER

((This
contractor is registered with the state of Washington, registration no.
. . . ., as a general/specialty contractor and has posted with
the state a bond or cash deposit of $6,000/$4,000 for the purpose of satisfying
claims against the contractor for negligent or improper work or breach of
contract in the conduct of the contractor's business. The expiration date of
this contractor's registration is . . . . . . This
bond or cash deposit may not be sufficient to cover a claim which might arise
from the work done under your contract. If any supplier of materials used in
your construction project or any employee of the contractor or subcontractor is
not paid by the contractor or subcontractor on your job, your property may be
liened to force payment. If you wish additional protection, you may request
the contractor to provide you with original "lien release" documents
from each supplier or subcontractor on your project. The contractor is
required to provide you with further information about lien release documents
if you request it. General information is also available from the department
of labor and industries."))

This
contractor is registered with the state of Washington, registration no.
. . ., and has posted with the state a bond or deposit of
. . . . . for the purpose of satisfying claims against the
contractor for breach of contract including negligent or improper work in the
conduct of the contractor's business. The expiration date of this contractor's
registration is . . . . ..

THIS BOND OR DEPOSIT MIGHT NOT BE SUFFICIENT TO COVER A CLAIM THAT
MIGHT ARISE FROM THE WORK DONE UNDER YOUR CONTRACT.

This
bond or deposit is not for your exclusive use because it covers all work
performed by this contractor. The bond or deposit is intended to pay valid
claims up to . . . . . that you and other customers,
suppliers, subcontractors, or taxing authorities may have.

FOR GREATER PROTECTION YOU MAY WITHHOLD A PERCENTAGE OF YOUR CONTRACT.

You
may withhold a contractually defined percentage of your construction contract
as retainage for a stated period of time to provide protection to you and help
insure that your project will be completed as required by your contract.

YOUR PROPERTY MAY BE LIENED.

If
a supplier of materials used in your construction project or an employee or
subcontractor of your contractor or subcontractors is not paid, your property
may be liened to force payment and you could pay twice for the same work.

FOR ADDITIONAL PROTECTION, YOU MAY REQUEST THE CONTRACTOR TO PROVIDE
YOU WITH ORIGINAL "LIEN RELEASE" DOCUMENTS FROM EACH SUPPLIER OR
SUBCONTRACTOR ON YOUR PROJECT.

The
contractor is required to provide you with further information about lien
release documents if you request it. General information is also available
from the state Department of Labor and Industries."

(2) A contractor
subject to this section shall notify any consumer to whom notice is required
under subsection (1) of this section if the contractor's registration has
expired or is revoked or suspended by the department prior to completion or
other termination of the contract with the consumer.

(3) No contractor
subject to this section may bring or maintain any lien claim under chapter
60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this section applies without alleging
and proving that the contractor has provided the customer with a copy of the
disclosure statement as required in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) This section does
not apply to contracts authorized under chapter 39.04 RCW or to contractors
contracting with other contractors.

(5) Failure to comply
with this section shall constitute an infraction under the provisions of this
chapter.

(6) The department
shall produce model disclosure statements, and public service announcements
detailing the information needed to assist contractors and contractors'
customers to comply under this section. As necessary, the department shall
periodically update these education materials.

Sec. 11. RCW 60.04.031 and 1992 c
126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, every person furnishing professional services,
materials, or equipment for the improvement of real property shall give the
owner or reputed owner notice in writing of the right to claim a lien. If the
prime contractor is in compliance with the requirements of RCW 19.27.095,
60.04.230, and 60.04.261, this notice shall also be given to the prime
contractor as described in this subsection unless the potential lien claimant
has contracted directly with the prime contractor. The notice may be given at
any time but only protects the right to claim a lien for professional services,
materials, or equipment supplied after the date which is sixty days before:

(a) Mailing the notice
by certified or registered mail to the owner or reputed owner; or

(b) Delivering or
serving the notice personally upon the owner or reputed owner and obtaining
evidence of delivery in the form of a receipt or other ((acknowledgement))
acknowledgment signed by the owner or reputed owner or an affidavit of
service.

In the case of new
construction of a single-family residence, the notice of a right to claim a
lien may be given at any time but only protects the right to claim a lien for
professional services, materials, or equipment supplied after ((a)) the
date ((which is ten days before)) the notice is given as described in
this subsection.

(2) Notices of a right
to claim a lien shall not be required of:

(a) Persons who
contract directly with the owner or the owner's common law agent;

(b) Laborers whose
claim of lien is based solely on performing labor; or

(c) Subcontractors who
contract for the improvement of real property directly with the prime
contractor, except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(3) Persons who furnish
professional services, materials, or equipment in connection with the repair,
alteration, or remodel of an existing owner-occupied single-family residence or
appurtenant garage or in connection with the new construction of a
single-family residence for a residential homeowner:

(a) Who contract
directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or ((their)) the
owner's common law agent shall not be required to send a written notice of
the right to claim a lien and shall have a lien for the full amount due under
their contract, as provided in RCW 60.04.021; or

(b) Who do not contract
directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or ((their)) the
owner's common law agent shall give notice of the right to claim a lien to
the ((owner-occupier)) owner. Liens of persons furnishing
professional services, materials, or equipment who do not contract directly
with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or ((their)) the
owner's common law agent may only be satisfied from amounts not yet paid to
the prime contractor by the owner at the time the notice described in this
section is received, regardless of whether amounts not yet paid to the prime
contractor are due, and these liens may not be satisfied if the owner or the
owner's common law agent has paid the contractor, prior to receipt of the lien
notice, for the services or supplies for which the lien is claimed. For
the purposes of this subsection "received" means actual receipt of
notice by personal service, or registered or certified mail, or three days
after mailing by registered or certified mail, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, or
legal holidays.

(4) The notice of right
to claim a lien described in subsection (1) of this section, shall include but
not be limited to the following information and shall substantially be in the
following form, using lower-case and upper-case ten-point type where
appropriate.

NOTICE
TO OWNER

IMPORTANT:
READ BOTH SIDES OF THIS NOTICE

CAREFULLY.

PROTECT
YOURSELF FROM PAYING TWICE

To: ............. Date:..........................

Re: (description
of property: Street address or general location.)

From: ..........................................................

AT THE REQUEST OF: (Name of person ordering the
professional services, materials, or equipment)

THIS IS NOT A LIEN‑-THIS
NOTICE IS MEANT TO PROVIDE YOU WITH INFORMATION NECESSARY TO PROPERLY MANAGE
YOUR CONSTRUCTION PROJECT: This notice is sent to you to tell you who is
providing professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your property and to advise you of the rights of these persons and your responsibilities.
Also take note that laborers on your project may claim a lien without sending
you a notice.

OWNER/OCCUPIER
OF EXISTING

RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY AND/OR

NEW
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

Under Washington law, those
who furnish labor, professional services, materials, or equipment for the
repair, remodel, or alteration of your owner-occupied principal residence and
who are not paid, have a right to enforce their claim for payment against your
property. This claim is known as a construction lien.

The law limits the amount
that a lien claimant can claim against your property. If the improvement to
your property is the construction of a new single-family residence, a lien may
be claimed for all professional services, materials, or equipment furnished
after the date this notice was given to you or mailed to you. Claims may
only be made against that portion of the contract price you have not yet paid
to your prime contractor as of the time this notice was given to you or three
days after this notice was mailed to you. Review the back of this notice for
more information and ways to avoid lien claims.

COMMERCIAL
((AND/OR NEW

RESIDENTIAL)) PROPERTY

We have or will be providing
professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of your
commercial ((or new residential)) project. In the event you or your
contractor fail to pay us, we may file a lien against your property. A lien
may be claimed for all professional services, materials, or equipment furnished
after a date that is sixty days before this notice was given to you or mailed
to you((, unless the improvement to your property is the construction of a
new single-family residence, then ten days before this notice was given to you
or mailed to you)).

Sender: ....................................................

Address: ...................................................

Telephone: .................................................

Brief description of
professional services, materials, or equipment provided or to be provided: ....................................

IMPORTANT
INFORMATION

ON
REVERSE SIDE

IMPORTANT
INFORMATION

FOR
YOUR PROTECTION

This notice is sent to
inform you that we have or will provide professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of your property. We expect to be paid by the
person who ordered our services, but if we are not paid, we have the right to
enforce our claim by filing a construction lien against your property.

LEARN more about the lien
laws and the meaning of this notice by discussing them with your contractor,
suppliers, Department of Labor and Industries, the firm sending you this
notice, your lender, or your attorney.

COMMON METHODS TO AVOID
CONSTRUCTION LIENS: There are several methods available to protect your
property from construction liens. The following are two of the more commonly
used methods.

DUAL
PAYCHECKS (Joint Checks): When paying your contractor for services or
materials, you may make checks payable jointly to the contractor and the firms
furnishing you this notice.

LIEN
RELEASES: You may require your contractor to provide lien releases signed by
all the suppliers and subcontractors from whom you have received this notice.
If they cannot obtain lien releases because you have not paid them, you may use
the dual payee check method to protect yourself.

YOU SHOULD TAKE APPROPRIATE
STEPS TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY FROM LIENS.

YOUR PRIME CONTRACTOR AND
YOUR CONSTRUCTION LENDER ARE REQUIRED BY LAW TO GIVE YOU WRITTEN INFORMATION
ABOUT LIEN CLAIMS. IF YOU HAVE NOT RECEIVED IT, ASK THEM FOR IT.

* * *
* * * * * * * * * *

(5) Every potential lien
claimant providing professional services where no improvement as defined in RCW
60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) has been commenced, and the professional services
provided are not visible from an inspection of the real property may record in
the real property records of the county where the property is located a notice
which shall contain the professional service provider's name, address,
telephone number, legal description of the property, the owner or reputed
owner's name, and the general nature of the professional services provided. If
such notice is not recorded, the lien claimed shall be subordinate to the
interest of any subsequent mortgagee and invalid as to the interest of any
subsequent purchaser if the mortgagee or purchaser acts in good faith and for a
valuable consideration acquires an interest in the property prior to the
commencement of an improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b)
without notice of the professional services being provided. The notice
described in this subsection shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE
OF FURNISHING

PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES

That on the (day) day of (month and
year) , (name of
provider) began providing professional services upon or
for the improvement of real property legally described as follows:

[Legal
Description

is
mandatory]

The general nature of
the professional services provided is..

.................................................................

The owner or reputed owner
of the real property is...............

.................................................................

...................................

(Signature)

...................................

(Name
of Claimant)

...................................

(Street
Address)

...................................

(City,
State, Zip Code)

...................................

(Phone
Number)

(6) A lien authorized
by this chapter shall not be enforced unless the lien claimant has complied
with the applicable provisions of this section.

(7) For the purposes
of this section "commercial property" includes residential property
that is not owned by a residential homeowner.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.27.310 and 1993 c
454 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative
law judge shall conduct contractors' notice of infraction cases pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The burden of proof
is on the department to establish the commission of the infraction by a
preponderance of the evidence. The notice of infraction shall be dismissed if
the defendant establishes that, at the time the ((notice was issued)) work
was performed, the defendant was registered by the department, without
suspension, or was exempt from registration.

(3) After consideration
of the evidence and argument, the administrative law judge shall determine
whether the infraction was committed. If it has not been established that the
infraction was committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in
the record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the infraction
was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue findings of fact and
conclusions of law in its decision and order determining whether the infraction
was committed.

(4) An appeal from the
administrative law judge's determination or order shall be to the superior
court. The decision of the superior court is subject only to discretionary
review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.27.320 and 1993 c
454 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrative law
judge shall dismiss the notice of infraction at any time upon written
notification from the department that the contractor named in the notice of
infraction was registered, without suspension, at the time the ((notice of
infraction was issued)) work was performed.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.27.340 and 1997 c
314 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (3) of this section, a contractor found to have
committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 shall be assessed a monetary
penalty of not less than two hundred dollars and not more than five thousand
dollars.

(2) The director may
waive collection in favor of payment of restitution to a consumer complainant.

(3) A contractor found
to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 for failure to register
shall be assessed a fine of not less than one thousand dollars, nor more than
five thousand dollars. The director may reduce the penalty for failure to
register, but in no case below five hundred dollars, if the person becomes
registered within ten days of receiving a notice of infraction and the notice
of infraction is for a first offense.

(((4) Monetary
penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Increase consumer
awareness of the requirements of this chapter and the methods available to
consumers to protect themselves against loss;

(2) Increase contractor
awareness of the obligations imposed on contractors by this chapter;

(3) Use reasonable
means to increase awareness, including but not limited to offering workshops,
distributing brochures, and operating consumer and contractor internet and
phone hotlines;

(4) Distribute model
construction contracts and make them available to consumers and contractors;
and

(5) Arrange for the
airing of public service announcements on radio and television regarding
consumer and contractor education services offered by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

The contractor
registration account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from registration,
penalties, and other sources under this chapter must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the administration and
enforcement of this chapter and to provide consumer education on issues related
to this chapter and contractor education on contractor obligations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that unregistered contractors in Washington state harm the public, their
workers, and contractors who have registered, and that it is contrary to public
policy to allow unregistered contractors to continue doing business illegally.
Unregistered contractors commonly fail to: Pay taxes which results in state
taxpayers having to subsidize their illegal business activities; protect their
workers with workers' compensation insurance; comply with worker safety and
health laws; cover their workers with unemployment compensation; and comply
with many other state laws and requirements. The legislature also finds that
past coordinated efforts by agencies to identify unregistered contractors have
demonstrated their effectiveness but have not been continued. It is the
intention of the legislature that the department of labor and industries, the
employment security department, and the department of revenue actively engage
in cooperative enforcement efforts to reduce the number of unregistered
contractors.

(2) The department of
labor and industries, the employment security department, and the department of
revenue shall establish an unregistered contractors enforcement team. The team
shall develop a written plan to coordinate the activities of the participating
agencies to enforce the state's contractor registration laws and rules,
workers' compensation laws and rules, unemployment compensation laws and rules,
sales tax laws and rules, excise tax laws and rules, as well as any other state
laws and rules deemed appropriate by the team. In developing the plan, the
team shall seek the input and advice of interested stakeholders who support the
work of the team. The plan shall set out mechanisms to:

(a) Identify
unregistered contractors doing business in Washington state; cite unregistered
contractors for any violations of this chapter and other business and employer
requirements; and apply the appropriate sanctions;

(b) Refer unregistered
contractors for audit and assessment for all unpaid taxes, workers'
compensation premiums, state unemployment contributions, and associated
interest and penalties; and

(c) Ensure that
unregistered contractors either cease doing business or make a good faith
effort to comply with the laws of the state of Washington for those doing
construction contracting.

The team's plan shall
include provisions to minimize the time and costs imposed on registered
contractors in determining if they are properly registered under this chapter.

The team shall also
develop any recommendations its members feel would assist them in more
effectively carrying out the requirements of this section and, by January 1st
of each year, forward those recommendations in writing to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature and to the departments that contribute
members to the team.

(3) By September 1,
2001, the director or the director's designee shall call the initial meeting of
the unregistered contractors enforcement team. The team shall complete its
first plan by December 1, 2001, and begin implementation by January 1, 2002. The
team may make revisions to its plan as the team deems necessary to assure the
maximum effectiveness of the team's efforts.

(4) The team shall, on
a quarterly basis, aggregate data on its efforts. The data shall include but
not be limited to: The number of contractors contacted as a part of
implementing the team's plan; the number of citations or other actions taken
against contractors for violations of this chapter or other laws or
regulations; and the number of contractors referred for audit. For each set of
numbers the team shall specify whether the contractors were registered or
unregistered. The team shall make the quarterly data available to interested
parties who request to receive the updates.

(5) The director shall
provide the necessary administrative support for the team's meetings and
activities.

(6) This section
expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 82.01 RCW to read as follows:

The director shall
designate at least one individual from the department who has experience in
identifying unregistered businesses and assessing such businesses for unpaid
taxes to participate in the unregistered contractors enforcement team
established in section 17 of this act. The director shall, each fiscal year,
allocate a minimum of one-half full-time employees and necessary support from
the department's budget to implement the plan of the team to identify
unregistered contractors, impose appropriate sanctions for violations of this
chapter, and refer them for appropriate audits and assessments.

This section expires
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 50.08 RCW to read as follows:

The commissioner shall
designate at least one individual from the employment security department who
has experience in identifying businesses that fail to meet their unemployment
compensation contribution requirements and assessing such businesses for unpaid
contributions to participate on the unregistered contractors enforcement team
established in section 17 of this act. The commissioner shall, each fiscal
year, allocate a minimum of one-half full-time employees and necessary support
from the employment security department's budget to implement the plan of the
team to identify unregistered contractors, impose appropriate sanctions for
violations of this chapter, and refer them for appropriate audits and
assessments.

This section expires
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

The director of labor
and industries shall designate at least one individual from the department of
labor and industries' programs to enforce chapter 18.27 RCW who has experience
in identifying unregistered contractors and enforcing the requirements of this
chapter on such individuals, and at least one individual from the department's
programs to implement Title 51 RCW who has experience in identifying businesses
that fail to meet their state industrial insurance contribution requirements
and assessing such businesses for unpaid premiums to participate on the
unregistered contractors enforcement team established in section 17 of this
act. The director of labor and industries shall, each fiscal year, allocate a
minimum of one-half full-time employees and necessary support from the
department of labor and industries' budget from each division to implement the
plan of the team to identify unregistered contractors and refer them for audit
and assessment. The director shall authorize individuals from any agency who
are implementing the team's plan to issue violations and citations authorized
by this act for failing to be a registered contractor.

This section expires
July 1, 2005.

Sec. 21. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions
for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income
account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior
to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the contractor registration account,
the county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan
2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington
State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings
required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under
RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government
pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial
management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary
to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this
subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the contractor registration account,
the county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the
state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer
fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the county
arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services account,
the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 23. RCW 18.27.075 and 1983 c
74 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may not
set a fee higher than ((fifty)) one hundred dollars for issuing
or renewing a certificate of registration during the 2001-2003 biennium.
The department shall revise this amount at least once every two years for the
purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by the fiscal growth
factor under chapter 43.135 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. Section 21 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. Section 22 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---