BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.08

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply
to:

_8 (a) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal
property

_9 consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in
respect to the

10 construction of new buildings or other structures, or
the

11 expansion or renovation of existing buildings or other
structures

12 for the purpose of increasing floor space or patient
capacity, for

13 use as a nonprofit hospital in a rural county; and

14 (b) Sales of machinery and equipment related to the
buildings

15 or other structures exempt under (a) of this subsection.

16 (2) Subsection (1) of this section only applies to
labor and

17 services, machinery and equipment, or other tangible
personal

18 property that is acquired before the construction is
complete.

p. 1 SB
5102

_1 (3) To be exempt under this section, the buildings
or

_2 structures and the machinery and equipment must be
financed with

_3 money donated to the nonprofit hospital for such
construction and

_4 acquisition. Application for exemption under this
section must be

_5 made before initiation of the construction or
acquisition of the

_6 machinery or equipment. The application shall be made
to the

_7 department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The

_8 application shall contain information regarding the
location of

_9 the hospital, the source of the moneys to be used for
the

10 construction or acquisition, and any other information
required by

11 the department. The department shall rule on the
application within

12 sixty days. The department shall issue a sales and use
tax

13 exemption certificate for state and local sales and use
taxes due

14 under this chapter and chapters 82.12 and 82.14 RCW for
each

15 approved application.

16 (4) For purposes of this section and section 2 of
this act:

17 (a) "Hospital" means a hospital as defined
in RCW 70.41.020.

18 (b) "Machinery and equipment" means
tangible personal property

19 of a capital nature which has a useful life of one year
or more

20 that is of the type that would be depreciated for
federal income

21 tax purposes under section 168 of the federal internal
revenue

22 code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 168), including such items
as medical

23 fixtures and devices, furniture, computers, and beds,
and tangible

24 personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component thereof.

25 (c) "Nonprofit" means an organization
exempt from federal

26 income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue

27 code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)).

28 (d) "Rural county" means a county with a
population density of

29 less than one hundred persons per square mile, as
determined by

30 the office of financial management and published each
year by the

31 department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.12

33 RCW to read as follows:

34 (1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with
respect to

35 the use by a nonprofit hospital in a rural county of
machinery and

36 equipment for which a sales and use tax exemption
certificate was

37 issued under section 1 of this act.

SB 5102 p. 2

_1 (2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply
to this

_2 section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5102