BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.34.230 and 1995 c
318 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Conservation futures
are a useful tool for counties to preserve lands of public interest for future
generations. Counties are encouraged to use some conservation futures as one
tool for salmon restoration purposes.

For the purpose of
acquiring conservation futures ((as well as)) and other rights
and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, and
for maintaining and operating any property acquired, a county may levy an
amount not to exceed ((six and one-quarter)) ten cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation against the assessed valuation of all
taxable property within the county. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not
apply to the tax levy authorized in this section. Any rights or interests
in real property acquired under this section must be located within the
assessing county.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.34.240 and 1971
ex.s. c 243 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Conservation futures
are a useful tool for counties to preserve lands of public interest for future
generations. Counties are encouraged to use some conservation futures as one
tool for salmon restoration purposes.

(1) Any board of
county commissioners may establish by resolution a special fund which may be
termed a conservation futures fund to which it may credit all taxes levied
pursuant to RCW 84.34.230. Amounts placed in this fund ((may)) shall
be used ((solely)) for the purpose of acquiring rights and interests in
real property pursuant to the terms of RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, and for
the maintenance and operation of any property acquired. The amount of revenue
used for maintenance and operations of parks and recreational facilities may
not exceed ten percent of the total amount collected from the tax levied under
RCW 84.34.230 in the preceding calendar year. Revenues from this tax may not
be used to supplant existing maintenance and operation funding. Any rights or
interests in real property acquired under this section must be located within
the assessing county.

(2)
Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting in any manner methods
and funds otherwise available to a county for financing the acquisition of such
rights and interests in real property.

---
END ---