BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
67.08.002 and 1999 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

_7 in this section apply throughout this chapter.

_8 (1) "Amateur" means a person who engages
in athletic activities

_9 as a pastime and not as a professional.

10 (2) "Boxing" means a contest in which the
contestants exchange

11 blows with their fists, but does not include
professional

12 wrestling.

13 (3) "Chiropractor" means a person
licensed under chapter 18.25

14 RCW as a doctor of chiropractic or under the laws of
any

15 jurisdiction in which that person resides.

16 (4) "Department" means the
department of licensing.

17 (((4))) (5) "Director" means
the director of the department of

18 licensing or the director's designee.

p. 1 SSB
5105

_1 (((5))) (6) "Event"
includes, but is not limited to, a boxing,

_2 wrestling, or martial arts contest, sparring,
fisticuffs, match,

_3 show, or exhibition.

_4 (((6))) (7) "Event
physician" means the physician licensed

_5 under RCW 67.08.100 and who is responsible for the
activities

_6 described in RCW 67.08.090.

_7 (((7))) (8) "Face value"
means the dollar value of a ticket or

_8 order, which value must reflect the dollar amount that
the

_9 customer is required to pay or, for a complimentary
ticket, would

10 have been required to pay to purchase a ticket with
equivalent

11 seating priority, in order to view the event.

12 (((8))) (9) "Gross receipts"
means the amount received from the

13 face value of all tickets sold and complimentary tickets
redeemed.

14 (((9))) (10) "Kickboxing"
means a type of boxing in which blows

15 are delivered with the hand and any part of the leg
below the hip,

16 including the foot.

17 (((10))) (11) "Martial arts"
means a type of boxing including

18 sumo, judo, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, pankration,
muay thai,

19 or other forms of full-contact martial arts or
self-defense

20 conducted on a full-contact basis.

21 (((11))) (12) "Physician"
means a person licensed under chapter

22 18.57, 18.36A, or 18.71 RCW as a physician or a person
holding an

23 osteopathic or allopathic physician license under the
laws of any

24 jurisdiction in which the person resides.

25 (((12))) (13) "Professional"
means a person who has received or

26 competed for money or other articles of value for
participating in

27 an event.

28 (((13))) (14) "Promoter"
means a person, and includes any

29 officer, director, employee, or stockholder of a
corporate

30 promoter, who produces, arranges, stages, holds, or
gives an event

31 in this state involving a professional boxing, martial
arts, or

32 wrestling event, or shows or causes to be shown in this
state a

33 closed circuit telecast of a match involving a
professional

34 participant whether or not the telecast originates in
this state.

35 (((14))) (15) "Wrestling
exhibition" or "wrestling show" means

36 a form of sports entertainment in which the participants
display

37 their skills in a physical struggle against each other
in the ring

SSB 5105 p. 2

_1 and either the outcome may be predetermined or the
participants do

_2 not necessarily strive to win, or both.

_3 Sec. 2. RCW
67.08.090 and 1999 c 282 s 6 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 (1) Each contestant for boxing((, kickboxing, or
martial arts))

_6 events shall be examined within twenty-four hours before
the

_7 contest by an event physician licensed by the
department. Each

_8 contestant for kickboxing or martial arts events
shall be examined

_9 within twenty-four hours before the contest by either
an event

10 physician or a chiropractor licensed by the
department. The event

11 physician or chiropractor shall report in writing
and over his or

12 her signature before the event the physical condition of
each and

13 every contestant to the inspector present at such
contest. No

14 contestant whose physical condition is not approved by
the event

15 physician or chiropractor shall be permitted to
participate in any

16 event. Blank forms for event physicians' or
chiropractors' reports

17 shall be provided by the department and all questions
upon such

18 blanks shall be answered in full. ((The)) Event
physicians and

19 chiropractors shall be paid a fee and travel
expenses by the

20 promoter.

21 (2) The department may require that an event
physician be

22 present at a wrestling event. The promoter shall pay
the event

23 physician present at a wrestling event. A boxing,
kickboxing, or

24 martial arts event may not be held unless an event
physician

25 licensed by the department is present throughout the
event. In

26 addition to the event physician, a licensed
chiropractor may be

27 included as a licensed official at a kickboxing or
martial arts

28 event.

29 (3) Any physician licensed under RCW 67.08.100 may
be selected

30 by the department as the event physician. The event physician

31 present at any contest shall have authority to stop any
event when

32 in the event physician's opinion it would be dangerous
to a

33 contestant to continue, and in such event it shall be
the event

34 physician's duty to stop the event.

35 (4) The department may have a participant in a
wrestling event

36 examined by an event physician licensed by the
department prior to

p. 3 SSB
5105

_1 the event. A participant in a wrestling event whose
condition is

_2 not approved by the event physician shall not be
permitted to

_3 participate in the event.

_4 (5) Each contestant for boxing, kickboxing, martial
arts, or

_5 wrestling events may be subject to a random urinalysis
or chemical

_6 test within twenty-four hours before or after a
contest. An

_7 applicant or licensee who refuses or fails to submit to
the

_8 urinalysis or chemical test is subject to disciplinary
action

_9 under RCW 67.08.240. If the urinalysis or chemical test
is positive

10 for substances prohibited by rules adopted by the
director,

11 disciplinary action shall be taken under RCW 67.08.240.

12 Sec. 3. RCW
67.08.100 and 1999 c 282 s 7 are each amended to read

13 as follows:

14 (1) The department upon receipt of a properly
completed

15 application and payment of a nonrefundable fee, may
grant an

16 annual license to an applicant for the following: (a)
Promoter; (b)

17 manager; (c) boxer; (d) second; (e) wrestling
participant; (f)

18 inspector; (g) judge; (h) timekeeper; (i) announcer; (j)
event

19 physician; (k) chiropractor; (l) referee; (((l)))
(m) matchmaker;

20 (((m))) (n) kickboxer; and (((n))) (o)
martial arts participant.

21 (2) The application for the following types of licenses
shall

22 include a physical performed by a physician, as defined
in RCW

23 67.08.002, which was performed by the physician with a
time period

24 preceding the application as specified by rule: (a)
Boxer; (b)

25 wrestling participant; (c) kickboxer; (d) martial arts

26 participant; and (e) referee.

27 (3) Any license may be revoked, suspended, or denied
by the

28 director for a violation of this chapter or a rule
adopted by the

29 director.

30 (4) No person shall participate or serve in any of
the above

31 capacities unless licensed as provided in this chapter.

32 (5) The referees, judges, timekeepers, event
physicians,

33 chiropractors, and inspectors for any boxing,
kickboxing, or

34 martial arts event shall be designated by the
department from

35 among licensed officials.

36 (6) The referee for any wrestling event shall be
provided by

37 the promoter and shall be licensed as a wrestling
participant.

SSB 5105 p. 4

_1 (7) The department shall immediately suspend the
license or

_2 certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant
to RCW

_3 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a

_4 person who is not in compliance with a support order.
If the person

_5 has continued to meet all other requirements for
reinstatement

_6 during the suspension, reissuance of the license or
certificate

_7 shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a
release

_8 issued by the department of social and health services
stating

_9 that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

10 (8) A person may not be issued a license if the
person has an

11 unpaid fine outstanding to the department.

12 (9) A person may not be issued a license unless they
are at

13 least eighteen years of age.

14 (10) This section shall not apply to contestants or

15 participants in events at which only amateurs are
engaged in

16 contests and/or fraternal organizations and/or veterans'

17 organizations chartered by congress or the defense
department or

18 any recognized amateur sanctioning body recognized by
the

19 department, holding and promoting athletic events and
where all

20 funds are used primarily for the benefit of their
members. Upon

21 request of the department, a promoter, contestant, or
participant

22 shall provide sufficient information to reasonably
determine

23 whether this chapter applies.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SSB
5105