BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 48.23

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 Life insurers shall develop and implement
underwriting

_7 standards and procedures designed to detect and prevent
the

_8 purchase of juvenile life insurance for speculative or
fraudulent

_9 purposes. These standards and procedures shall be made
available

10 for review by the commissioner.

11 Life insurers shall maintain records of underwriting
rejections

12 of applications for life insurance on juvenile lives for
a period

13 of ten years.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SSB
5106