BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A rural county
that is otherwise subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.040, after reaching
an agreement with its cities to consider a proposal to implement this section,
may develop a proposal for alternative methods of achieving the planning goals
established by RCW 36.70A.020. Such alternative methods shall not take the
place of any requirement in this chapter unless a written alternative methods agreement
has first been executed pursuant to this section.

(b) The authority
provided by this subsection may not be used to change the authority of a growth
management hearings board to hear and determine petitions related to (b)(i),
(ii), and (iii) of this subsection or to modify substantive requirements of
this chapter, including but not limited to:

(i) Requirements for
the designation and protection of critical areas or for the designation and
conservation of natural resource lands under RCW 36.70A.060(2), 36.70A.170, and
36.70A.172;

(ii) The requirement to
establish a process for the siting of essential public facilities pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.200; or

(iii) The requirement
to adopt a capital facilities plan element pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070(3).

(c) Before adopting any
alternative methods of achieving the planning goals established by RCW
36.70A.020, and before adopting any development regulations to implement those
alternative methods, a rural county shall provide an opportunity for public
participation consistent with RCW 36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140. An ordinance or
resolution proposing or adopting an alternative methods agreement and a copy of
the proposed and adopted alternative methods agreement must be submitted to the
department in the same manner as provided in RCW 36.70A.106 for submittal of
proposed and adopted comprehensive plans and development regulations.

(2) For purposes of
this section, "rural county" means a county with a population density
of less than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the period
July 1st to June 30th. "Alternative methods agreement" means a
written agreement, reflecting all aspects of this section, that has been executed
by the county and at least sixty percent of the cities in the county, so long
as those cities represent a total of seventy-five percent or more of the
population within incorporated areas of the county.

(3) The alternative
methods agreement adopted pursuant to this section shall be consistent with
achieving the goals of RCW 36.70A.020 and shall ensure that adequate public
facilities and services are provided concurrent with development. The
agreement must provide:

(a) A long-term vision
for the countywide region;

(b) Alternative methods
for achieving the goals of RCW 36.70A.020;

(c) A plan for
amending, if needed, countywide planning policies adopted pursuant to RCW
36.70A.210;

(d) Consistency and
coordination among local governments, including special purpose districts;

(e) A strategy for
addressing other issues, as appropriate, to meet local, regional, and statewide
needs; and

(f) Performance-based
monitoring that provides for periodic reviews and adjustments, if needed, to
achieve the goals of RCW 36.70A.020.

(4) The alternative
methods agreement adopted pursuant to this section may substitute for all or
part of the comprehensive plan required under RCW 36.70A.040, subject to the
limitations in this section. The alternative methods agreement shall be
implemented through the adoption of development regulations that are consistent
with the agreement and the goals of RCW 36.70A.020.

(5) A
rural county that chooses to use an alternative methods agreement shall submit
a report to the department on the results of its performance-based monitoring,
pursuant to subsection (3)(f) of this section, at least every five years,
beginning with the date the alternative methods agreement is executed.

--- END ---