BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 79A.05.070
and 1999 c 249 s 307 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 The commission may:

_8 (1) Make rules and regulations for the proper
administration of

_9 its duties;

10 (2) Accept any grants of funds made with or without a
matching

11 requirement by the United States, or any agency thereof,
for

12 purposes in keeping with the purposes of this chapter;
accept

13 gifts, bequests, devises and endowments for purposes in
keeping

14 with such purposes; enter into cooperative agreements with
and

15 provide for private nonprofit groups to use state park
property

16 and facilities to raise money to contribute gifts, grants,
and

17 support to the commission for the purposes of this
chapter. The

18 commission may assist the nonprofit group in a cooperative
effort

p. 1 SB
5109

_1 by providing necessary agency personnel and services, if

_2 available. However, none of the moneys raised may inure
to the

_3 benefit of the nonprofit group, except in furtherance of
its

_4 purposes to benefit the commission as provided in this
chapter.

_5 The agency and the private nonprofit group shall agree
on the

_6 nature of any project to be supported by such gift or
grant prior

_7 to the use of any agency property or facilities for
raising

_8 money. Any such gifts may be in the form of
recreational

_9 facilities developed or built in part or in whole for
public use

10 on agency property, provided that the facility is
consistent with

11 the purposes of the agency;

12 (3) Require certification by the commission of all
parks and

13 recreation workers employed in state aided or state
controlled

14 programs;

15 (4) Act jointly, when advisable, with the United
States, any

16 other state agencies, institutions, departments, boards,
or

17 commissions in order to carry out the objectives and

18 responsibilities of this chapter;

19 (5) Grant franchises and easements for any
legitimate purpose

20 on parks or parkways, for such terms and subject to such

21 conditions and considerations as the commission shall
specify;

22 (6) Charge such fees for services, utilities, and
use of

23 facilities as the commission shall deem proper,
except that the

24 commission shall not charge fees for basic parkland
access;

25 (7) Enter into agreements whereby individuals or
companies may

26 rent undeveloped parks or parkway land for grazing,
agricultural,

27 or mineral development purposes upon such terms and
conditions as

28 the commission shall deem proper, for a term not to
exceed ten

29 years;

30 (8) Determine the qualifications of and employ a
director of

31 parks and recreation who shall receive a salary as fixed
by the

32 governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040 and

33 determine the qualifications and salary of and employ
such other

34 persons as may be needed to carry out the provisions
hereof; and

35 (9) Without being limited to the powers hereinbefore

36 enumerated, the commission shall have such other powers
as in the

37 judgment of a majority of its members are deemed
necessary to

38 effectuate the purposes of this chapter: PROVIDED, That
the

SB 5109 p. 2

_1 commission shall not have power to supervise directly
any local

_2 park or recreation district, and no funds shall be made
available

_3 for such purpose.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

_5 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

_6 the state government and its existing public institutions,
and

_7 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5109