BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 69.60

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) Ephedrine products may only be sold in packages
with counts

_8 of forty-eight or less.

_9 (2) No retailer may knowingly sell to a single
customer, in any

10 twenty-four hour period, more than three packages of a
product

11 containing ephedrine in counts of forty-eight or less per
package

12 or containing a total weight of more than three grams of
ephedrine

13 per package.

14 (3) No customer may purchase or acquire, in any
twenty-four

15 hour period, more than three packages of a product
containing

16 ephedrine in counts of forty-eight or less per package or

17 containing a total weight of more than three grams of
ephedrine

18 per package.

p. 1 SB
5110

_1 (4) No person may possess more than fifteen grams of
ephedrine.

_2 (5) Subsections (1) through (4) of this section do
not apply to

_3 the sale, purchase, or possession of ephedrine dispensed
by

_4 prescription as provided in chapter 69.41 RCW.

_5 (6) Subsections (3) and (4) of this section do not
apply to the

_6 purchase or possession of ephedrine by shopkeepers
required to

_7 register under RCW 18.64.044.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 69.60

_9 RCW to read as follows:

10 A person convicted of violating section 1 of this act
is guilty

11 of a gross misdemeanor punishable by a fine of no more than
five

12 thousand dollars, imprisonment of no more than one year, or
by

13 both fine and imprisonment.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5110 p. 2