BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes the state's interest in protecting charitable trusts. Charitable
trusts are distinct from private trusts. Charitable trusts primarily benefit
the general public or a segment of the public, rather than specific persons.
The promotion of health is a commonly recognized charitable purpose. Certain
health care service contractors and health maintenance organizations have
established charitable trusts using state nonprofit incorporation statutes.
Market pressures have forced nonprofit health care service contractors and
health maintenance organizations to consider various corporate structures,
including for profit structures, that would permit issuance of stock to
shareholders. Reconfiguring corporate structure from nonprofit to for profit
compromises the value of the charitable trust because the for profit structure
introduces a fiduciary duty to shareholders, which can conflict with the
original charitable purpose.

The attorney general
represents the public interest in securing enforcement of charitable trusts.
However, statutory provisions are needed to clarify the role of the attorney
general and provide regulatory authority to the insurance commissioner to
assure preservation of the fair market value of the charitable trust when the
corporate structure is altered.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.43.005 and 2000 c
79 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless otherwise
specifically provided, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Adjusted
community rate" means the rating method used to establish the premium for
health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially demonstrated differences in
utilization or cost attributable to geographic region, age, family size, and
use of wellness activities.

(2) "Basic health
plan" means the plan described under chapter 70.47 RCW, as revised from
time to time.

(3) "Basic health
plan services" means that schedule of covered health services, including
the description of how those benefits are to be administered, that are required
to be delivered to an enrollee under the basic health plan, as revised from
time to time.

(4) "Catastrophic
health plan" means:

(a) In the case of a
contract, agreement, or policy covering a single enrollee, a health benefit
plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five
hundred dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three
thousand dollars; and

(b) In the case of a
contract, agreement, or policy covering more than one enrollee, a health
benefit plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, three
thousand dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least five
thousand five hundred dollars; or

(c) Any health benefit
plan that provides benefits for hospital inpatient and outpatient services,
professional and prescription drugs provided in conjunction with such hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, and excludes or substantially limits
outpatient physician services and those services usually provided in an office
setting.

(5)
"Certification" means a determination by a review organization that
an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or procedure has
been reviewed and, based on the information provided, meets the clinical
requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, level of care, or
effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable health benefit plan.

(6) "Charitable
trust" means a nonprofit health care entity that has dedicated all or any
portion of its assets to benefit the general public or a segment of the
public. Such dedication may be evidenced by its articles of incorporation,
bylaws, other organic documents, business transactions, or any other means
sufficient to establish a charitable trust at common law. A nonprofit health
care entity operating at any time as a 501(c)(3) organization for federal tax
purposes, or a 501(c)(4) organization for federal tax purposes is a charitable
trust. A nonprofit health care entity that is a public benefit corporation
under chapter 24.03 RCW is a charitable trust. A nonprofit health care entity
does not have to meet the filing and other requirements of chapter 11.110 RCW
in order to be considered a charitable trust for this act.

(7) "Charitable
trust assets" means a charitable trust that is less than the entire health
care service contractor's or health maintenance organization's business.

(8)
"Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during a
patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.

(((7))) (9)
"Conversion transaction" means the transfer of control or governance
of a charitable trust or material charitable trust assets.

(10)
"Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder, beneficiary of a
group plan, or individual covered by any other health plan.

(((8))) (11)
"Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse and
unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the enrollee's
health benefit plan.

(((9))) (12)
"Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a full-time basis
with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term includes a
self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a partner of a
partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if the self-employed
individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent contractor is included as
an employee under a health benefit plan of a small employer, but does not work
less than thirty hours per week and derives at least seventy-five percent of
his or her income from a trade or business through which he or she has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form. Persons covered under a health
benefit plan pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of
1986 shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.

(((10))) (13)
"Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute onset of a
symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead a prudent layperson
acting reasonably to believe that a health condition exists that requires
immediate medical attention, if failure to provide medical attention would
result in serious impairment to bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a
bodily organ or part, or would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.

(((11))) (14)
"Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care services
medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical condition,
provided in a hospital emergency department.

(((12))) (15)
"Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to health
carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or health care
facilities by enrollees and may include copayments, coinsurance, or
deductibles.

(((13))) (16)
"Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on behalf of a
covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for medical services or
nonprovision of medical services included in the covered person's health
benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues other than denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services, including dissatisfaction
with medical care, waiting time for medical services, provider or staff
attitude or demeanor, or dissatisfaction with service provided by the health
carrier.

(((14))) (17)
"Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.05
or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed under chapter 70.41
RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A
RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes
such facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision or
instrumentality of the state and such other facilities as required by federal
law and implementing regulations.

(((15))) (18)
"Health care provider" or "provider" means:

(a) A person regulated
under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or health-related
services or otherwise practicing health care services in this state consistent
with state law; or

(b) An employee or
agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in the course and
scope of his or her employment.

(((16))) (19)
"Health care service" means that service offered or provided by
health care facilities and health care providers relating to the prevention,
cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.

(((17))) (20)
"Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance organization as defined in
RCW 48.46.020.

(((18))) (21)
"Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:

(a) Long-term care
insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;

(b) Medicare
supplemental health insurance governed by chapter 48.66 RCW;

(c) Limited health care
services offered by limited health care service contractors in accordance with
RCW 48.44.035;

(d) Disability income;

(e) Coverage incidental
to a property/casualty liability insurance policy such as automobile personal
injury protection coverage and homeowner guest medical;

(f) Workers'
compensation coverage;

(g) Accident only
coverage;

(h) Specified disease
and hospital confinement indemnity when marketed solely as a supplement to a
health plan;

(i) Employer-sponsored
self-funded health plans;

(j) Dental only and
vision only coverage; and

(k) Plans deemed by the
insurance commissioner to have a short-term limited purpose or duration, or to
be a student-only plan that is guaranteed renewable while the covered person is
enrolled as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an
accredited higher education institution, after a written request for such
classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.

(((19))) (22)
"Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value of the
health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than fifteen
percent.

(((20))) (23)
"Nonprofit health care entity" means a nonprofit corporation formed
under Title 24 RCW doing business as a health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010 or a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW
48.46.020.

(24)
"Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness, or
injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of coverage.

(((21))) (25)
"Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a health
carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of a health
plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing.

(((22))) (26)
"Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated under
chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as defined in RCW
48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and
entities affiliated with, under contract with, or acting on behalf of a health
carrier to perform a utilization review.

(((23))) (27)
"Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision except school
districts, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in business
that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the preceding
calendar quarter, employed no more than fifty eligible employees, with a normal
work week of thirty or more hours, the majority of whom were employed within this
state, and is not formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and
in which a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the
number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or that
are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this
state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health
plan to a small employer and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the
size of a small employer shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise
specifically provided, a small employer shall continue to be considered a small
employer until the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no
longer meets the requirements of this definition. The term "small
employer" includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor. The
term "small employer" also includes a self-employed individual or
sole proprietor who derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income
from a trade or business through which the individual or sole proprietor has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for the
previous taxable year.

(((24))) (28)
"Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the allocation
of health care resources and services of a provider or facility, given or
proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of enrollees.

(((25))) (29)
"Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking cessation,
injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight
reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol
reduction, and nutrition education for the purpose of improving enrollee health
status and reducing health service costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A nonprofit health
care entity must not enter any conversion transaction without notifying in
writing the attorney general prior to entering any conversion transaction and
obtaining approval from the office of the insurance commissioner for any
conversion transaction referred to the office of the insurance commissioner by
the attorney general.

(a) Notice shall
include the health care entity's articles of incorporation, including all
historical versions, bylaws, and contracts governing the proposal necessary for
the attorney general to make its determination. The health care entity has a
duty to respond to attorney general requests for information.

(b) Notice is not
effective until the attorney general acknowledges receipt of a complete notice
in accordance with the rules adopted by the attorney general under section 6 of
this act.

(c) The nonprofit
health care entity shall provide the attorney general with written
certification that a copy of sections 1 and 3 through 9 of this act and RCW
48.43.005 have been given in their entirety to each member of the board of
trustees of the nonprofit health care entity at the time the notice is
submitted.

(2) The attorney
general shall determine whether the proposed transaction is a conversion
transaction that requires review by the office of the insurance commissioner.

(3) If the nonprofit
health care entity is a charitable trust and the proposed transaction is a
conversion transaction, the attorney general must require administrative
regulation of the conversion transaction by the office of the insurance
commissioner. If the nonprofit health care entity is not a charitable trust in
its entirety, but has material charitable assets that are included within the
conversion transaction, the attorney general must require administrative
regulation of the conversion transaction by the office of the insurance commissioner.

(4) A decision by the
attorney general for administrative regulation of the conversion transaction by
the office of the insurance commissioner is not subject to the review
provisions under chapter 34.05 RCW until the office of the insurance commissioner
has taken final action.

(5) Nonprofit health
care entities shall disclose all documents to the attorney general that are
relevant to determine whether the nonprofit health care entity is a charitable
trust or has charitable trust assets and that are relevant to determine whether
the proposal is a conversion transaction. Trade secrets or other commercially
competitive information disclosed to the attorney general to determine the
extent to which the nonprofit health care entity is a charitable trust, has
charitable trust assets, or the proposal is a conversion transaction are
confidential and are not subject to public disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In making a
decision whether to approve or disapprove a proposed nonprofit health care
entity conversion transaction the office of the insurance commissioner shall
consider:

(a) Whether the
nonprofit health care entity will receive full and fair market value for its
charitable trust assets;

(b) Whether the fair
market value of the nonprofit health care entity's charitable trust assets to
be transferred has been manipulated by the actions of the parties in a manner
that causes the fair market value of the charitable trust to decrease;

(c) Whether the
proceeds of the proposed nonprofit health care conversion transaction will be
used consistent with the trust under which the assets are held by the nonprofit
health care entity and whether the proceeds will be controlled as funds
independently of the acquiring or related entities;

(d) Whether the
proposed nonprofit health care conversion transaction will result in a breach
of fiduciary duty, as determined by the office of the insurance commissioner,
including conflicts of interest related to payments or benefits to officers,
directors, board members, executives, and experts employed or retained by the
parties;

(e) Whether the
governing body of the nonprofit health care entity exercised due diligence in
deciding to dispose of the nonprofit health care entity's charitable trust
assets, selecting the acquiring entity, and negotiating the terms and
conditions of the disposition;

(f) Whether the
nonprofit health care conversion transaction will result in private inurement
to any person;

(g) Whether health care
providers will be offered the opportunity to invest or own an interest in the
acquiring entity or a related party, and whether procedures or safeguards are
in place to avoid conflict of interest in patient referrals;

(h) Whether the terms
of any management or services contract negotiated in conjunction with the
proposed nonprofit health care conversion transaction are reasonable;

(i) Whether the office
of the insurance commissioner has been provided with sufficient information and
data by the nonprofit health care entity to evaluate adequately the proposed
nonprofit health care conversion transaction or the effects thereof on the
public, provided the office of the insurance commissioner has notified the nonprofit
health care entity or the acquiring entity of any inadequacy of the information
or data and has provided a reasonable opportunity to remedy such inadequacy;
and

(j) Any other criteria
the office of the insurance commissioner considers necessary to determine
whether the nonprofit health care entity will receive full and fair market
value for its charitable trust assets to be transferred as required in rules
adopted by the office of the insurance commissioner under section 6 of this
act.

(2) The office of the
insurance commissioner has ninety days to approve or disapprove, in writing,
the proposed nonprofit health care conversion transaction. The time may be
extended for an additional sixty-day period, if the extension is necessary to
obtain information requested under this act.

(3) All documents
submitted to the office of the insurance commissioner under this section and
sections 3 and 8 of this act are subject to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Any proceeds from
regulation of conversion transactions shall be deposited into the health
services account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

The insurance
commissioner and the attorney general are each authorized to establish rules to
implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added to
chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Before issuing any
written decision under section 4 of this act, the office of the insurance
commissioner shall conduct one or more public meetings hearing public testimony
regarding the proposed nonprofit health care conversion transaction. Notice
shall be provided in a manner reasonably calculated to notify interested
persons. The meeting shall be held in a location accessible to persons
interested in participating.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

The attorney general
and the office of the insurance commissioner may demand that the nonprofit
health care entity provide such information as the attorney general or the
office of the insurance commissioner deems necessary to complete its review of
any proposed nonprofit health care conversion transaction. A failure to
provide timely information as required shall be sufficient ground for the
attorney general or the office of the insurance commissioner to disapprove the
proposed conversion transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in sections 3
through 8 of this act shall be construed to limit the authority of the attorney
general under the common law or other statutory authority to protect charitable
interests in this state. These penalties and remedies are in addition to, and
not a replacement for, any other civil or criminal actions that the attorney
general may take under either the common law or statutory law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The attorney
general may commence an action against a nonprofit health care entity that
enters into a conversion transaction without notice to the attorney general or
approval by the insurance commissioner pursuant to this chapter, and any other
party to the conversion transaction, to recover all charitable trust assets or
to void the transaction and return the parties to the situation existing before
the conversion transaction, or, if the conversion transaction has not yet
occurred, to enjoin such conversion transaction from occurring. Such action
may be brought in the superior court for the county where the nonprofit health
care entity has its principal place of business or in Thurston county.

(2) Upon request by the
attorney general, any nonprofit health care entity that has entered into, or is
proposing to enter into, a transaction without making a filing with the
attorney general pursuant to section 3 of this act shall provide to the
attorney general all documents relevant to determine whether such transaction
is or was a conversion transaction and whether the nonprofit health care entity
is or was a charitable trust or has or had charitable trust assets.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of the
insurance commissioner may:

(a) Contract with,
consult, and receive advice from any agency of the state or the United States
on such terms and conditions the office of the insurance commissioner deems
appropriate; or

(b) In the office of
the insurance commissioner's sole discretion, contract with such experts or
consultants the insurance commissioner deems appropriate to assist the
insurance commissioner in reviewing the proposed nonprofit health care
conversion transaction.

(2) Any contract costs
incurred by the insurance commissioner under this section shall not exceed an
amount that is reasonable and necessary to conduct the review of the proposed
nonprofit health care conversion transaction. The insurance commissioner shall
be exempt from chapter 43.19 RCW for the purposes of entering into contracts
under this section. The nonprofit health care entity giving notice under
section 3 of this act, upon request, shall pay the office of the insurance
commissioner promptly for all costs of contracts entered into by the office of
the insurance commissioner under this section.

(3) The office of the
insurance commissioner shall be entitled to reimbursement from the nonprofit
health care entity giving notice under section 3 of this act for all reasonable
and actual costs incurred by the office of the insurance commissioner in
reviewing any proposed nonprofit health care conversion transaction under this
act, including attorneys' fees at the billing rate used by the office of the
insurance commissioner to bill state agencies for legal services. The
nonprofit health care entity giving notice under section 3 of this act, upon
request, shall pay the office of the insurance commissioner promptly for all
such costs.

(4) The
failure by the nonprofit health care entity giving notice under section 3 of
this act to promptly reimburse the office of the insurance commissioner for all
costs under subsection (2) or (3) of this section is sufficient ground for the
office of the insurance commissioner to disapprove the proposed nonprofit
health care conversion transaction.

---
END ---