BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.687 and 2000 c
190 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Enforcement of
subsection (2) of this section is subject to a visual inspection by law
enforcement to determine if the child restraint system in use is appropriate
for the child's individual height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for
usage of a child car seat must ensure that the seat in use is equipped with a
harness system. The visual inspection for usage of a booster seat must ensure
that the seat belt properly fits across the child's lap and the shoulder strap
crosses the center of the child's chest. The visual inspection for usage of a
seat belt by a child must ensure that the lap belt properly fits across the
child's lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the child's chest. In
determining violations, consideration to the criteria in this subsection must
be given in conjunction with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Whenever a
child who is less than sixteen years of age is being transported in a motor
vehicle that is in operation and that is required by RCW 46.37.510 to be
equipped with a safety belt system in a passenger seating position, the driver
of the vehicle shall keep the child properly restrained as follows:

(a) If the child is
less than ((six)) eight years old ((and/or sixty pounds)) and
less than four feet nine inches in height and the passenger seating
position equipped with a safety belt system allows sufficient space for
installation, then the child will be restrained in a child restraint system
that complies with standards of the United States department of transportation
and that is secured in the vehicle in accordance with instructions of the
manufacturer of the child restraint system;

(b) If the child is
less than one year of age or weighs less than twenty pounds, the child shall be
properly restrained in a rear-facing ((infant)) child car seat;

(c) If the child is
more than one but less than four years of age or weighs less than forty pounds
but at least twenty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained in a forward-facing
child ((safety)) car seat ((restraint system));

(d) If the child is
less than ((six)) eight but at least four years of age ((or
weighs)) and less than ((sixty pounds)) four feet nine
inches in height but at least forty pounds, the child shall be properly
restrained in a child booster seat; and

(e) If the child is ((six))
eight years of age or older or ((weighs)) more than ((sixty
pounds)) four feet nine inches in height, the child shall be
properly restrained with the motor vehicle's safety belt properly adjusted and
fastened around the child's body or an appropriately fitting booster seat((;
and

(f) Enforcement of
(a) through (e) of this subsection is subject to a visual inspection by law
enforcement to determine if the child restraint system in use is appropriate
for the child's individual height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for
usage of a forward facing child safety seat must ensure that the seat in use is
equipped with a four-point shoulder harness system. The visual inspection for
usage of a booster seat must ensure that the seat belt properly fits across the
child's lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the child's chest.
The visual inspection for the usage of a seat belt by a child must ensure that
the lap belt properly fits across the child's lap and the shoulder strap
crosses the center of the child's chest. In determining violations,
consideration to the above criteria must be given in conjunction with the
provisions of (a) through (e) of this subsection)).

(3) The driver
of a vehicle transporting a child who is under the age of ((six)) eight
years old ((or weighs)) and less than ((sixty pounds)) four
feet nine inches in height, when the vehicle is equipped with a passenger
side air bag supplemental restraint system, and the air bag system is
activated, shall transport the child in the back seat positions in the vehicle
where it is practical to do so.

(((2))) (4)
A person violating subsection (((1)(a) through (e))) (2) of this
section may be issued a notice of traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW.
If the person to whom the notice was issued presents proof of acquisition of an
approved child passenger restraint system or a child booster seat, as
appropriate, within seven days to the jurisdiction issuing the notice and the
person has not previously had a violation of this section dismissed, the
jurisdiction shall dismiss the notice of traffic infraction.

(((3))) (5)
Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall not constitute
negligence by a parent or legal guardian; nor shall failure to use a child
restraint system be admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil action.

(((4))) (6)
This section does not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles, (b) vehicles designed
to transport sixteen or less passengers, including the driver, operated by auto
transportation companies, as defined in RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing
customer shuttle service between parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and
airport terminals, and (d) school buses.

(((5))) (7)
As used in this section "child booster seat" means a child passenger
restraint system that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards set
forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213 that is designed to elevate a child to properly sit
in a federally approved lap/shoulder belt system.

(((6))) (8)
The requirements of subsection (((1)(a) through (e))) (2) of this
section do not apply in any seating position where there is only a lap belt
available and the child weighs more than forty pounds.

(9) A person,
including but not limited to a volunteer provider of services, who without
compensation, renders inspection, adjustment, or educational services regarding
child passenger restraint systems is not liable for civil damages from any act
or omission in rendering the services, other than acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---