BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
46.68.065 and 1982 c 77 s 8 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 There is hereby created the motorcycle safety
education account

_8 in the highway safety fund of the state treasury, to the
credit of

_9 which shall be deposited all moneys directed by law to
be credited

10 thereto. All expenses incurred by the director of the
department of

11 licensing in administering RCW 46.20.505 through
46.20.520 shall

12 be borne by appropriations from this account, and
moneys deposited

13 into this account shall be used only for the purposes
authorized

14 in RCW 46.20.505 through 46.20.520.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.08

16 RCW to read as follows:

p. 1 SSB
5114

_1 The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to
sales of

_2 motorcycles purchased for use in a motorcycle operator
training

_3 and education program created under RCW 46.20.520.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 82.12

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 The provisions of this chapter do not apply with
respect to the

_7 use of motorcycles loaned or purchased for use in a
motorcycle

_8 operator training and education program created under
RCW

_9 46.20.520.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5114 p. 2