BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.44.115 and 1998 c
221 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section:

(a)
"Photographs" or "films" means the making of a photograph,
motion picture film, videotape, or any other recording or transmission of the
image of a person;

(b) "Place where
he or she would have a reasonable expectation of privacy" means:

(i) A place where a
reasonable person would believe that he or she could disrobe in privacy,
without being concerned that his or her undressing was being photographed or
filmed by another; or

(ii) A place where one
may reasonably expect to be safe from casual or hostile intrusion or
surveillance;

(c)
"Surveillance" means secret observation of the activities of another
person for the purpose of spying upon and invading the privacy of the person;

(d) "Views"
means the intentional looking upon of another person for more than a brief
period of time, in other than a casual or cursory manner, with the unaided eye
or with a device designed or intended to improve visual acuity.

(2)(a) A person
commits the crime of voyeurism in the first degree if, for the purpose
of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any person, he or she knowingly
views, photographs, or films another person, without that person's knowledge
and consent, while the person being viewed, photographed, or filmed is in a
place where he or she would have a reasonable expectation of privacy.

(b) A person commits
the crime of voyeurism in the second degree if, under circumstances not
constituting voyeurism in the first degree, for the purpose of arousing or
gratifying the sexual desire of any person, he or she knowingly views,
photographs, or films another person under or through the clothing being worn
by that other person, for the purpose of viewing, photographing, or filming the
body of, or the undergarments worn by, the other person, without that person's
knowledge and consent.

(3)(a) Voyeurism
in the first degree is a class C felony.

(b) Voyeurism in the
second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(4) This section does
not apply to viewing, photographing, or filming by personnel of the department
of corrections or of a local jail or correctional facility for security
purposes or during investigation of alleged misconduct by a person in the
custody of the department of corrections or the local jail or correctional
facility.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c
221 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prosecutions for
criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods prescribed in this
section.

(a) The following
offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:

(i) Murder;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Arson if a death
results;

(iv) Vehicular
homicide;

(v) Vehicular assault
if a death results;

(vi) Hit-and-run
injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4)).

(b) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten years after their commission:

(i) Any felony
committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection with the
duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her public duty
or a violation of the oath of office;

(ii) Arson if no death
results; or

(iii) Violations of RCW
9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency within
one year of its commission; except that if the victim is under fourteen years
of age when the rape is committed and the rape is reported to a law enforcement
agency within one year of its commission, the violation may be prosecuted up to
three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to ten years after the
rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape may not be prosecuted: (A)
More than three years after its commission if the violation was committed
against a victim fourteen years of age or older; or (B) more than three years
after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after the
rape's commission, whichever is later, if the violation was committed against a
victim under fourteen years of age.

(c) Violations of the
following statutes shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after their commission,
whichever is later: RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070,
9A.44.080, 9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.

(d) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six years after their commission:
Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(e) The following offenses
shall not be prosecuted more than five years after their commission: Any class
C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.

(f) Bigamy shall not be
prosecuted more than three years after the time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.

(g) A violation of RCW
9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than three years after the discovery of
the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3).

(h) No other felony may
be prosecuted more than three years after its commission; except that in a
prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115(2)(a), if the person who was viewed,
photographed, or filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being
viewed, photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two
years of the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first
learns that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.

(i) No gross
misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years after its commission;
except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115(2)(b), if the person who was
viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was
being viewed, photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within
one year of the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film
first learns that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.

(j) No misdemeanor may
be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.

(2) The periods of
limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not run during any
time when the person charged is not usually and publicly resident within this
state.

(3) If,
before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this
section, an indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has been
filed, and the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then the
period of limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from
the finding or filing to the setting aside.

---
END ---