BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.97.030 and 1999 c
49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter, the definitions of terms in this section shall apply.

(1) "Criminal
history record information" means information contained in records
collected by criminal justice agencies, other than courts, on individuals,
consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, detentions,
indictments, informations, or other formal criminal charges, and any
disposition arising therefrom, including acquittals by reason of insanity,
dismissals based on lack of competency, sentences, correctional supervision,
and release.

The term includes
information contained in records maintained by or obtained from criminal
justice agencies, other than courts, which records provide individual
identification of a person together with any portion of the individual's record
of involvement in the criminal justice system as an alleged or convicted
offender, except:

(a) Posters,
announcements, or lists for identifying or apprehending fugitives or wanted
persons;

(b) Original records of
entry maintained by criminal justice agencies to the extent that such records
are compiled and maintained chronologically and are accessible only on a
chronological basis;

(c) Court indices and
records of public judicial proceedings, court decisions, and opinions, and
information disclosed during public judicial proceedings;

(d) Records of traffic
violations which are not punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of more
than ninety days;

(e) Records of any traffic
offenses as maintained by the department of licensing for the purpose of
regulating the issuance, suspension, revocation, or renewal of drivers' or
other operators' licenses and pursuant to RCW 46.52.130;

(f) Records of any
aviation violations or offenses as maintained by the department of
transportation for the purpose of regulating pilots or other aviation
operators, and pursuant to RCW 47.68.330;

(g) Announcements of
executive clemency.

(2) "Nonconviction
data" consists of all criminal history record information relating to an
incident which has not led to a conviction or other disposition adverse to the
subject, and for which proceedings are no longer actively pending. There shall
be a rebuttable presumption that proceedings are no longer actively pending if
more than one year has elapsed since arrest, citation, charge, or service of
warrant and no disposition has been entered.

(3) "Conviction
record" means criminal history record information relating to an incident
which has led to a conviction or other disposition adverse to the subject.

(4) "Conviction or
other disposition adverse to the subject" means any disposition of charges
other than: (a) A decision not to prosecute; (b) a dismissal; or (c)
acquittal; with the following exceptions, which shall be considered
dispositions adverse to the subject: An acquittal due to a finding of not
guilty by reason of insanity and a dismissal by reason of incompetency,
pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW; and a dismissal entered after a period of
probation, suspension, or deferral of sentence.

(5) "Criminal
justice agency" means: (a) A court; or (b) a government agency which
performs the administration of criminal justice pursuant to a statute or
executive order and which allocates a substantial part of its annual budget to
the administration of criminal justice.

(6) "The
administration of criminal justice" means performance of any of the
following activities: Detection, apprehension, detention, pretrial release,
post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision, or
rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders. The term also
includes criminal identification activities and the collection, storage,
dissemination of criminal history record information, and the compensation of
victims of crime.

(7)
"Disposition" means the formal conclusion of a criminal proceeding at
whatever stage it occurs in the criminal justice system.

(8)
"Dissemination" means disclosing criminal history record information
or disclosing the absence of criminal history record information to any person
or agency outside the agency possessing the information, subject to the
following exceptions:

(a) When criminal
justice agencies jointly participate in the maintenance of a single record
keeping department as an alternative to maintaining separate records, the
furnishing of information by that department to personnel of any participating
agency is not a dissemination;

(b) The furnishing of
information by any criminal justice agency to another for the purpose of
processing a matter through the criminal justice system, such as a police
department providing information to a prosecutor for use in preparing a charge,
is not a dissemination;

(c) The reporting of an
event to a record keeping agency for the purpose of maintaining the record is
not a dissemination.

(9) "Investigative
records" means all incident reports, witness statements, descriptions of
seized evidence, seized evidence, and reports of forensic testing collected or
assembled regarding a specific criminal offense.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.97.050 and 1990 c
3 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Conviction records
may be disseminated without restriction.

(2) Any criminal
history record information which pertains to an incident for which a person is
currently being processed by the criminal justice system, including the entire
period of correctional supervision extending through final discharge from
parole, when applicable, may be disseminated without restriction.

(3) Criminal history
record information which includes nonconviction data may be disseminated by a
criminal justice agency to another criminal justice agency for any purpose
associated with the administration of criminal justice, or in connection with
the employment of the subject of the record by a criminal justice or juvenile
justice agency. A criminal justice agency may respond to any inquiry from
another criminal justice agency without any obligation to ascertain the purpose
for which the information is to be used by the agency making the inquiry.

(4) Criminal history
record information which includes nonconviction data may be disseminated by a
criminal justice agency to implement a statute, ordinance, executive order, or
a court rule, decision, or order which expressly refers to records of arrest,
charges, or allegations of criminal conduct or other nonconviction data and
authorizes or directs that it be available or accessible for a specific
purpose.

(5) Criminal history
record information which includes nonconviction data may be disseminated to
individuals and agencies pursuant to a contract with a criminal justice agency
to provide services related to the administration of criminal justice. Such
contract must specifically authorize access to criminal history record
information, but need not specifically state that access to nonconviction data
is included. The agreement must limit the use of the criminal history record
information to stated purposes and insure the confidentiality and security of
the information consistent with state law and any applicable federal statutes
and regulations.

(6) Criminal history
record information which includes nonconviction data may be disseminated to
individuals and agencies for the express purpose of research, evaluative, or
statistical activities pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice
agency. Such agreement must authorize the access to nonconviction data, limit
the use of that information which identifies specific individuals to research,
evaluative, or statistical purposes, and contain provisions giving notice to
the person or organization to which the records are disseminated that the use
of information obtained therefrom and further dissemination of such information
are subject to the provisions of this chapter and applicable federal statutes
and regulations, which shall be cited with express reference to the penalties
provided for a violation thereof.

(7) Except for
disclosure to a criminal justice agency, investigative records may only be
disseminated or disclosed under the following circumstances:

(a) All suspects
identified in the investigative records have been arraigned on any charges
filed based upon the investigation, and the judge presiding over the criminal
proceedings determines, after hearing from the defendant or the defendant's
attorney, the prosecuting attorney, the lead investigator, and the individual
requesting copies of the investigative records, that the individual requesting
copies of the investigative records has established by clear evidence that
release of the investigative records will not interfere with the suspect's
right to a fair trial or with any continuing investigation;

(b) The convictions
of all suspects identified in the investigative records are final as defined in
RCW 10.73.090, and neither the prosecuting attorney nor investigative agency
has established by clear evidence that release of the investigative records
will interfere with any pending civil actions or related investigations; or

(c) CrR 4.7 or CrRLJ
4.7 permit dissemination of investigative records to individuals who have been
charged with crimes or to the attorney or agents of individuals who have been
charged with crimes.

(8) Every
criminal justice agency that maintains and disseminates criminal history record
information or investigative records must maintain information
pertaining to every dissemination of criminal history record information or
investigative record except a dissemination to the effect that the agency
has no record concerning an individual. Information pertaining to
disseminations shall include:

(a) An indication of to
whom (agency or person) criminal history record information or investigative
record was disseminated;

(b) The date on which
the information was disseminated;

(c) The individual to
whom the information relates; and

(d) A brief description
of the information disseminated.

The information
pertaining to dissemination required to be maintained shall be retained for a
period of not less than one year.

(((8))) (9)
In addition to the other provisions in this section allowing dissemination of
criminal history record information, RCW 4.24.550 governs dissemination of
information concerning offenders who commit sex offenses as defined by RCW
9.94A.030. Criminal justice agencies, their employees, and officials shall be
immune from civil liability for dissemination on criminal history record
information concerning sex offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Investigative
records, as defined in RCW 10.97.030, are exempt from the disclosure
requirements of this chapter.

---
END ---