BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act shall be known
and may be cited as the "interstate compact for adult offender
supervision."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

The interstate compact
for adult offender supervision is hereby entered into and enacted into law with
all jurisdictions legally joining therein, in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE
I

PURPOSE

(a) The compacting
states to this interstate compact recognize that each state is responsible for
the supervision of adult offenders in the community who are authorized pursuant
to the bylaws and rules of this compact to travel across state lines both to
and from each compacting state in such a manner as to track the location of
offenders, transfer supervision authority in an orderly and efficient manner,
and, when necessary, return offenders to the originating jurisdictions. The compacting
states also recognize that congress, by enacting the crime control act, 4
U.S.C. Sec. 112 (1965), has authorized and encouraged compacts for cooperative
efforts and mutual assistance in the prevention of crime.

(b) It is the purpose
of this compact and the interstate commission created hereunder, through means
of joint and cooperative action among the compacting states: To provide the
framework for the promotion of public safety and protect the rights of victims
through the control and regulation of the interstate movement of offenders in
the community; to provide for the effective tracking, supervision, and
rehabilitation of these offenders by the sending and receiving states; and to
equitably distribute the costs, benefits and obligations of the compact among
the compacting states.

(c) In addition, this
compact will: Create an interstate commission which will establish uniform
procedures to manage the movement between states of adults placed under
community supervision and released to the community under the jurisdiction of
courts, paroling authorities, corrections, or other criminal justice agencies
which will promulgate rules to achieve the purpose of this compact; ensure an
opportunity for input and timely notice to victims and to jurisdictions where
defined offenders are authorized to travel or to relocate across state lines;
establish a system of uniform data collection, access to information on active
cases by authorized criminal justice officials, and regular reporting of
compact activities to heads of state councils, state executive, judicial, and
legislative branches and criminal justice administrators; monitor compliance
with rules governing interstate movement of offenders and initiate
interventions to address and correct noncompliance; and coordinate training and
education regarding regulations of interstate movement of offenders for
officials involved in such activity.

(d) The compacting
states recognize that there is no "right" of any offender to live in
another state and that duly accredited officers of a sending state may at all
times enter a receiving state and there apprehend and retake any offender under
supervision subject to the provisions of this compact and bylaws and rules
promulgated hereunder. It is the policy of the compacting states that the
activities conducted by the interstate commission created herein are the
formation of public policies and are therefore public business.

ARTICLE
II

DEFINITIONS

As used in this
compact, unless the context clearly requires a different construction:

(a) "Adult"
means both individuals legally classified as adults and juveniles treated as
adults by court order, statute, or operation of law.

(b) "Bylaws"
means those bylaws established by the interstate commission for its governance,
or for directing or controlling the interstate commission's actions or conduct.

(c) "Compact
administrator" means the individual in each compacting state appointed
pursuant to the terms of this compact responsible for the administration and
management of the state's supervision and transfer of offenders subject to the
terms of this compact, the rules adopted by the interstate commission and
policies adopted by the state council under this compact.

(d) "Compacting
state" means any state which has enacted the enabling legislation for this
compact.

(e)
"Commissioner" means the voting representative of each compacting
state appointed pursuant to article III of this compact.

(f) "Interstate commission"
means the interstate commission for adult offender supervision established by
this compact.

(g) "Member"
means the commissioner of a compacting state or designee, who shall be a person
officially connected with the commissioner.

(h) "Noncompacting
state" means any state which has not enacted the enabling legislation for
this compact.

(i)
"Offender" means an adult placed under, or subject, to supervision as
the result of the commission of a criminal offense and released to the
community under the jurisdiction of courts, paroling authorities, corrections,
or other criminal justice agencies.

(j) "Person"
means any individual, corporation, business enterprise, or other legal entity,
either public or private.

(k) "Rules"
means acts of the interstate commission, duly promulgated pursuant to article
VIII of this compact, substantially affecting interested parties in addition to
the interstate commission, which shall have the force and effect of law in the
compacting states.

(l) "State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia and any other
territorial possessions of the United States.

(m) "State
council" means the resident members of the state council for interstate
adult offender supervision created by each state under article IV of this
compact.

(n) "Victim"
means a person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a result of criminal conduct against
the person or a member of the person's family.

ARTICLE
III

THE
COMPACT COMMISSION

(a) The compacting
states hereby create the "interstate commission for adult offender
supervision." The interstate commission shall be a body corporate and
joint agency of the compacting states. The interstate commission shall have
all the responsibilities, powers and duties set forth herein; including the
power to sue and be sued, and such additional powers as may be conferred upon
it by subsequent action of the respective legislatures of the compacting states
in accordance with the terms of this compact.

(b) The interstate
commission shall consist of commissioners selected and appointed by resident
members of a state council for interstate adult offender supervision for each
state. In addition to the commissioners who are the voting representatives of
each state, the interstate commission shall include individuals who are not
commissioners but who are members of interested organizations. Such
noncommissioner members must include a member of the national organizations of
governors, legislators, state chief justices, attorneys general and crime
victims. All noncommissioner members of the interstate commission shall be ex
officio, nonvoting members. The interstate commission may provide in its
bylaws for such additional, ex officio, nonvoting members as it deems
necessary.

(c) Each compacting
state represented at any meeting of the interstate commission is entitled to
one vote. A majority of the compacting states shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business, unless a larger quorum is required by the bylaws
of the interstate commission.

(d) The interstate
commission shall meet at least once each calendar year. The chairperson may
call additional meetings and, upon the request of twenty‑seven or more
compacting states, shall call additional meetings. Public notice shall be
given of all meetings and meetings shall be open to the public.

(e) The interstate
commission shall establish an executive committee which shall include
commission officers, members and others as shall be determined by the bylaws.
The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the interstate
commission during periods when the interstate commission is not in session,
with the exception of rule making and/or amendment to the compact. The
executive committee oversees the day‑to‑day activities managed by
the executive director and interstate commission staff; administers enforcement
and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its bylaws and as directed
by the interstate commission and performs other duties as directed by the
commission or set forth in the bylaws.

ARTICLE
IV

THE
STATE COUNCIL

(a) Each member state
shall create a state council for interstate adult offender supervision which
shall be responsible for the appointment of the commissioner who shall serve on
the interstate commission from that state. Each state council shall appoint as
its commissioner the compact administrator from that state to serve on the
interstate commission in such capacity under or pursuant to applicable law of
the member state. While each member state may determine the membership of its
own state council, its membership must include at least one representative from
the legislative, judicial, and executive branches of government, victims' groups,
and compact administrators.

(b) Each compacting
state retains the right to determine the qualifications of the compact
administrator who shall be appointed by the state council or by the governor in
consultation with the legislature and the judiciary.

(c) In addition to
appointment of its commissioner to the national interstate commission, each
state council shall exercise oversight and advocacy concerning its
participation in interstate commission activities and other duties as may be
determined by each member state including, but not limited to, development of
policy concerning operations and procedures of the compact within that state.

ARTICLE
V

POWERS AND DUTIES
OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

The interstate
commission shall have the following powers:

(a) To adopt a seal and
suitable bylaws governing the management and operation of the interstate
commission;

(b) To promulgate rules
which shall have the force and effect of statutory law and shall be binding in
the compacting states to the extent and in the manner provided in this compact;

(c) To oversee,
supervise and coordinate the interstate movement of offenders subject to the
terms of this compact and any bylaws adopted and rules promulgated by the
compact commission;

(d) To enforce
compliance with compact provisions, interstate commission rules, and bylaws,
using all necessary and proper means, including, but not limited to, the use of
judicial process;

(e) To establish and
maintain offices;

(f) To purchase and
maintain insurance and bonds;

(g) To borrow, accept,
or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, members
and their staffs;

(h) To establish and
appoint committees and hire staff which it deems necessary for the carrying out
of its functions including, but not limited to, an executive committee as
required by article III of this compact which shall have the power to act on
behalf of the interstate commission in carrying out its powers and duties
hereunder;

(i) To elect or appoint
such officers, attorneys, employees, agents, or consultants, and to fix their
compensation, define their duties and determine their qualifications; and to
establish the interstate commission's personnel policies and programs relating
to, among other things, conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and
qualifications of personnel;

(j) To accept any and
all donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of same;

(k) To lease, purchase,
accept contributions or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use
any property, real, personal, or mixed;

(l) To sell, convey,
mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any
property, real, personal, or mixed;

(m) To establish a
budget and make expenditures and levy dues as provided in article X of this
compact;

(n) To sue and be sued;

(o) To provide for
dispute resolution among compacting states;

(p) To perform such
functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this
compact;

(q) To report annually
to the legislatures, governors, judiciary, and state councils of the compacting
states concerning the activities of the interstate commission during the
preceding year. Such reports shall also include any recommendations that may
have been adopted by the interstate commission;

(r) To coordinate
education, training and public awareness regarding the interstate movement of
offenders for officials involved in such activity;

(s) To establish
uniform standards for the reporting, collecting, and exchanging of data.

ARTICLE
VI

ORGANIZATION AND
OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

(a) Bylaws. The
interstate commission shall, by a majority of the members, within twelve months
of the first interstate commission meeting, adopt bylaws to govern its conduct
as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the compact,
including, but not limited to:

(1) Establishing the
fiscal year of the interstate commission;

(2) Establishing an
executive committee and such other committees as may be necessary, providing
reasonable standards and procedures:

(i) For the
establishment of committees, and

(ii) Governing any general
or specific delegation of any authority or function of the interstate
commission;

(3) Providing
reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the interstate
commission, and ensuring reasonable notice of each such meeting;

(4) Establishing the
titles and responsibilities of the officers of the interstate commission;

(5) Providing
reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel
policies and programs of the interstate commission. Notwithstanding any civil
service or other similar laws of any compacting state, the bylaws shall
exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the interstate
commission;

(6) Providing a
mechanism for winding up the operations of the interstate commission and the
equitable return of any surplus funds that may exist upon the termination of
the compact after the payment and/or reserving of all of its debts and
obligations;

(7) Providing
transition rules for "start up" administration of the compact;

(8) Establishing standards
and procedures for compliance and technical assistance in carrying out the
compact.

(b) Officers and
staff. (1) The interstate commission shall, by a majority of the members,
elect from among its members a chairperson and a vice-chairperson, each of whom
shall have such authorities and duties as may be specified in the bylaws. The
chairperson or, in his or her absence or disability, the vice‑chairperson
shall preside at all meetings of the interstate commission. The officers so
elected shall serve without compensation or remuneration from the interstate
commission: PROVIDED, That subject to the availability of budgeted funds, the
officers shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary costs and expenses
incurred by them in the performance of their duties and responsibilities as
officers of the interstate commission.

(2) The interstate
commission shall, through its executive committee, appoint or retain an
executive director for such period, upon such terms and conditions and for such
compensation as the interstate commission may deem appropriate. The executive
director shall serve as secretary to the interstate commission, and hire and
supervise such other staff as may be authorized by the interstate commission,
but shall not be a member.

(c) Corporate
records of the interstate commission. The interstate commission shall
maintain its corporate books and records in accordance with the bylaws.

(d) Qualified
immunity, defense and indemnification. (1) The members, officers,
executive director and employees of the interstate commission shall be immune
from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for
any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil
liability caused or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission
that occurred within the scope of interstate commission employment, duties or
responsibilities: PROVIDED, That nothing in this subsection (d)(1) shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for any damage,
loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton
misconduct of any such person.

(2) The interstate
commission shall defend the commissioner of a compacting state, or his or her
representatives or employees, or the interstate commission's representatives or
employees in any civil action seeking to impose liability, arising out of any
actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of
interstate commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the
defendant had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
interstate commission employment, duties or responsibilities: PROVIDED, That
the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from intentional
wrongdoing on the part of such person.

(3) The interstate
commission shall indemnify and hold the commissioner of a compacting state, the
appointed designee or employees, or the interstate commission's representatives
or employees harmless in the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against such persons arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of interstate commission employment,
duties or responsibilities, or that such persons had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred within the scope of interstate commission employment, duties or
responsibilities, provided, that the actual or alleged act, error or omission
did not result from gross negligence or intentional wrongdoing on the part of
such person.

ARTICLE
VII

ACTIVITIES OF
THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

(a) The interstate
commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this compact.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in this compact and unless a greater percentage is required by the
bylaws, in order to constitute an act of the interstate commission, such act
shall have been taken at a meeting of the interstate commission and shall have
received an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present.

(c) Each member of the
interstate commission shall have the right and power to cast a vote to which
that compacting state is entitled and to participate in the business and
affairs of the interstate commission. A member shall vote in person on behalf
of the state and shall not delegate a vote to another member state. However, a
state council shall appoint another authorized representative, in the absence
of the commissioner from that state, to cast a vote on behalf of the member
state at a specified meeting. The bylaws may provide for members'
participation in meetings by telephone or other means of telecommunication or
electronic communication. Any voting conducted by telephone or other means of
telecommunication or electronic communication shall be subject to the same quorum
requirements of meetings where members are present in person.

(d) The interstate
commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. The chairperson
of the interstate commission may call additional meetings at any time and, upon
the request of a majority of the members, shall call additional meetings.

(e) The interstate
commission's bylaws shall establish conditions and procedures under which the
interstate commission shall make its information and official records available
to the public for inspection or copying. The interstate commission may exempt
from disclosure any information or official records to the extent they would
adversely affect personal privacy rights or proprietary interests. In
promulgating such rules, the interstate commission may make available to law
enforcement agencies records and information otherwise exempt from disclosure,
and may enter into agreements with law enforcement agencies to receive or
exchange information or records subject to nondisclosure and confidentiality
provisions.

(f) Public notice shall
be given of all meetings and all meetings shall be open to the public, except
as set forth in the rules or as otherwise provided in the compact. The
interstate commission shall promulgate rules consistent with the principles
contained in the "government in sunshine act," 5 U.S.C. Sec. 552(b),
as may be amended. The interstate commission and any of its committees may
close a meeting to the public where it determines by two‑thirds vote that
an open meeting would be likely to:

(1) Relate solely to
the interstate commission's internal personnel practices and procedures;

(2) Disclose matters
specifically exempted from disclosure by statute;

(3) Disclose trade
secrets or commercial or financial information which is privileged or
confidential;

(4) Involve accusing
any person of a crime, or formally censuring any person;

(5) Disclose
information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

(6) Disclose
investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;

(7) Disclose
information contained in or related to examination, operating or condition
reports prepared by, or on behalf of or for the use of, the interstate
commission with respect to a regulated entity for the purpose of regulation or
supervision of such entity;

(8) Disclose
information, the premature disclosure of which would significantly endanger the
life of a person or the stability of a regulated entity;

(9) Specifically relate
to the interstate commission's issuance of a subpoena, or its participation in
a civil action or proceeding.

(g) For every meeting
closed pursuant to this provision, the interstate commission's chief legal
officer shall publicly certify that, in his or her opinion, the meeting may be
closed to the public, and shall reference each relevant provision authorizing
closure of the meeting. The interstate commission shall keep minutes which
shall fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in any meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of any actions taken, and the reasons
therefor, including a description of each of the views expressed on any item
and the record of any roll call vote (reflected in the vote of each member on
the question). All documents considered in connection with any action shall be
identified in such minutes.

(h) The interstate
commission shall collect standardized data concerning the interstate movement
of offenders as directed through its bylaws and rules which shall specify the
data to be collected, the means of collection and data exchange and reporting
requirements.

ARTICLE
VIII

RULE MAKING
FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

(a) The interstate
commission shall promulgate rules in order to effectively and efficiently
achieve the purposes of the compact including transition rules governing
administration of the compact during the period in which it is being considered
and enacted by the states.

(b) Rule making shall
occur pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and the bylaws and
rules adopted pursuant thereto. Such rule making shall substantially conform
to the principles of the federal administrative procedure act, 5 U.S.C. Sec.
551 et seq., and the federal advisory committee act, 5 U.S.C.S. app. 2, section
1 et seq., as may be amended (hereinafter "APA"). All rules and
amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or
amendment.

(c) If a majority of
the legislatures of the compacting states rejects a rule, by enactment of a
statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact, then such
rule shall have no further force and effect in any compacting state.

(d) When promulgating a
rule, the interstate commission shall:

(1) Publish the
proposed rule stating with particularity the text of the rule which is proposed
and the reason for the proposed rule;

(2) Allow persons to
submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which information shall be
publicly available;

(3) Provide an
opportunity for an informal hearing; and

(4) Promulgate a final
rule and its effective date, if appropriate, based on the rule making record.
Not later than sixty days after a rule is promulgated, any interested person
may file a petition in the United States district court for the District of
Columbia or in the federal district court where the interstate commission's
principal office is located for judicial review of such rule. If the court
finds that the interstate commission's action is not supported by substantial
evidence, (as defined in the APA), in the rule-making record, the court shall
hold the rule unlawful and set it aside.

(e) Subjects to be
addressed within twelve months after the first meeting must at a minimum
include:

(1) Notice to victims
and opportunity to be heard;

(2) Offender
registration and compliance;

(3) Violations/returns;

(4) Transfer procedures
and forms;

(5) Eligibility for
transfer;

(6) Collection of
restitution and fees from offenders;

(7) Data collection and
reporting;

(8) The level of
supervision to be provided by the receiving state;

(9) Transition rules
governing the operation of the compact and the interstate commission during all
or part of the period between the effective date of the compact and the date on
which the last eligible state adopts the compact;

(10) Mediation,
arbitration and dispute resolution.

(f) The existing rules
governing the operation of the previous compact superseded by this act shall be
null and void twelve months after the first meeting of the interstate
commission created hereunder.

(g) Upon determination
by the interstate commission that an emergency exists, it may promulgate an
emergency rule which shall become effective immediately upon adoption, provided
that the usual rule-making procedures provided hereunder shall be retroactively
applied to said rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than
ninety days after the effective date of the rule.

ARTICLE
IX

OVERSIGHT,
ENFORCEMENT, AND DISPUTE RESOLUTION BY THE

INTERSTATE
COMMISSION

(a) Oversight.
(1) The interstate commission shall oversee the interstate movement of adult
offenders in the compacting states and shall monitor such activities being
administered in noncompacting states which may significantly affect compacting
states.

(2) The courts and
executive agencies in each compacting state shall enforce this compact and
shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact's
purposes and intent. In any judicial or administrative proceeding in a
compacting state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact which may
affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the interstate commission,
the interstate commission shall be entitled to receive all service of process in
any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for
all purposes.

(b) Dispute
resolution. (1) The compacting states shall report to the interstate
commission on issues or activities of concern to them, and cooperate with and
support the interstate commission in the discharge of its duties and
responsibilities.

(2) The interstate
commission shall attempt to resolve any disputes or other issues which are
subject to the compact and which may arise among compacting states and
noncompacting states.

The interstate
commission shall enact a bylaw or promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes among the compacting
states.

(c) Enforcement.
The interstate commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall
enforce the provisions of this compact using any or all means set forth in
article XII (b) of this compact.

ARTICLE
X

FINANCE

(a) The interstate
commission shall pay or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.

(b) The interstate
commission shall levy on and collect an annual assessment from each compacting
state to cover the cost of the internal operations and activities of the
interstate commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient
to cover the interstate commission's annual budget as approved each year. The
aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to
be determined by the interstate commission, taking into consideration the
population of the state and the volume of interstate movement of offenders in
each compacting state and shall promulgate a rule binding upon all compacting
states which governs said assessment.

(c) The interstate
commission shall not incur any obligations of any kind prior to securing the
funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the interstate commission pledge the
credit of any of the compacting states, except by and with the authority of the
compacting state.

(d) The interstate
commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the interstate commission shall be subject to the
audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all
receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the interstate commission shall
be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report
of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the
interstate commission.

ARTICLE
XI

COMPACTING
STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE AND AMENDMENT

(a) Any state, as
defined in article II of this compact, is eligible to become a compacting
state.

(b) The compact shall
become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law
by no less than thirty‑five of the states. The initial effective date
shall be the later of July 1, 2001, or upon enactment into law by the thirty‑fifth
jurisdiction. Thereafter it shall become effective and binding, as to any
other compacting state, upon enactment of the compact into law by that state.
The governors of nonmember states or their designees will be invited to
participate in interstate commission activities on a nonvoting basis prior to
adoption of the compact by all states and territories of the United States.

(c) Amendments to the
compact may be proposed by the interstate commission for enactment by the compacting
states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the interstate
commission and the compacting states unless and until it is enacted into law by
unanimous consent of the compacting states.

ARTICLE
XII

WITHDRAWAL, DEFAULT,
TERMINATION, AND JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT

(a) Withdrawal.
(1) Once effective, the compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon
each and every compacting state: PROVIDED, That a compacting state may
withdraw from the compact ("withdrawing state") by enacting a statute
specifically repealing the statute which enacted the compact into law.

(2) The effective date
of withdrawal is the effective date of the repeal.

(3) The withdrawing
state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the interstate commission in
writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the
withdrawing state. The interstate commission shall notify the other compacting
states of the withdrawing state's intent to withdraw within sixty days of its
receipt thereof.

(4) The withdrawing
state is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred
through the effective date of withdrawal, including any obligations, the
performance of which extend beyond the effective date of withdrawal.

(5) Reinstatement
following withdrawal of any compacting state shall occur upon the withdrawing
state reenacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the
interstate commission.

(b) Default.
(1) If the interstate commission determines that any compacting state has at
any time defaulted ("defaulting state") in the performance of any of
its obligations or responsibilities under this compact, the bylaws or any duly
promulgated rules, the interstate commission may impose any or all of the
following penalties:

(i) Fines, fees and
costs in such amounts as are deemed to be reasonable as fixed by the interstate
commission;

(ii) Remedial training
and technical assistance as directed by the interstate commission;

(iii) Suspension and
termination of membership in the compact. Suspension shall be imposed only
after all other reasonable means of securing compliance under the bylaws and
rules have been exhausted. Immediate notice of suspension shall be given by
the interstate commission to the governor, the chief justice or chief judicial
officer of the state, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting
state's legislature, and the state council.

(2) The grounds for
default include, but are not limited to, failure of a compacting state to
perform such obligations or responsibilities imposed upon it by this compact,
interstate commission bylaws, or duly promulgated rules. The interstate
commission shall immediately notify the defaulting state in writing of the
penalty imposed by the interstate commission on the defaulting state pending a
cure of the default. The interstate commission shall stipulate the conditions
and the time period within which the defaulting state must cure its default.
If the defaulting state fails to cure the default within the time period
specified by the interstate commission, in addition to any other penalties
imposed herein, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an
affirmative vote of a majority of the compacting states and all rights, privileges
and benefits conferred by this compact shall be terminated from the effective
date of suspension. Within sixty days of the effective date of termination of
a defaulting state, the interstate commission shall notify the governor, the
chief justice or chief judicial officer and the majority and minority leaders
of the defaulting state's legislature and the state council of such
termination.

(3) The defaulting
state is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred
through the effective date of termination including any obligations, the
performance of which extends beyond the effective date of termination.

(4) The interstate
commission shall not bear any costs relating to the defaulting state unless
otherwise mutually agreed upon between the interstate commission and the
defaulting state. Reinstatement following termination of any compacting state
requires both a reenactment of the compact by the defaulting state and the
approval of the interstate commission pursuant to the rules.

(c) Judicial
enforcement. The interstate commission may, by majority vote of the
members, initiate legal action in the United States district court for the
District of Columbia or, at the discretion of the interstate commission, in the
federal district where the interstate commission has its offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the compact, its duly promulgated rules and
bylaws, against any compacting state in default. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation including reasonable attorneys' fees.

(d) Dissolution of
compact. (1) The compact dissolves effective upon the date of the
withdrawal or default of the compacting state which reduces membership in the
compact to one compacting state.

(2) Upon the
dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of
no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the interstate
commission shall be wound up and any surplus funds shall be distributed in
accordance with the bylaws.

ARTICLE
XIII

SEVERABILITY
AND CONSTRUCTION

(a) The provisions of
this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or
provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact
shall be enforceable.

(b) The provisions of
this compact shall be liberally constructed to effectuate its purposes.

ARTICLE
XIV

BINDING EFFECT
OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

(a) Other laws.
(1) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a compacting
state that is not inconsistent with this compact.

(2) All compacting states'
laws conflicting with this compact are superseded to the extent of the
conflict.

(b) Binding effect
of the compact. (1) All lawful actions of the interstate commission,
including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the interstate commission, are
binding upon the compacting states.

(2) All agreements
between the interstate commission and the compacting states are binding in
accordance with their terms.

(3) Upon the request of
a party to a conflict over meaning or interpretation of interstate commission
actions, and upon a majority vote of the compacting states, the interstate
commission may issue advisory opinions regarding such meaning or
interpretation.

(4) In the event any
provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature
of any compacting state, the obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction sought
to be conferred by such provision upon the interstate commission shall be
ineffective and such obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction shall remain
in the compacting state and shall be exercised by the agency thereof to which
such obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction are delegated by law in effect
at the time this compact becomes effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The sentencing
guidelines commission shall serve as the state council for interstate adult
offender supervision as required under article IV of section 2 of this act, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision. To assist the commission in
performing its functions as the state council, the department of corrections
shall provide staffing and support services. The commission may form a
subcommittee, including members representing the legislative, judicial, and
executive branches of state government, victims' groups, and the secretary of
corrections, to perform the functions of the state council. Any such
subcommittee shall include representation of both houses and at least two of the
four largest political caucuses in the legislature.

(2) The commission, or
a subcommittee if formed for that purpose, shall:

(a) Review department
operations and procedures under section 2 of this act, and recommend policies
to the compact administrator, including policies to be pursued in the
administrator's capacity as the state's representative on the interstate
commission created under article III of section 2 of this act;

(b) Report annually to
the legislature on interstate supervision operations and procedures under
section 2 of this act, including recommendations for policy changes; and

(c) Not later than
December 1, 2004, report to the legislature on the effectiveness of its
functioning as the state council under article IV of section 2 of this act, and
recommend any legislation it deems appropriate.

(3) The commission, or
a subcommittee if formed for that purpose, shall appoint one of its members, or
an employee of the department designated by the secretary, to represent the
state at meetings of the interstate commission created under article III of
section 2 of this act when the compact administrator cannot attend.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of
corrections, or an employee of the department designated by the secretary,
shall serve as the compact administrator under article IV of section 2 of this
act, the interstate compact for adult offender supervision. The legislature
intends that the compact administrator, representing the state on the
interstate commission created under article III of section 2 of this act, will
take an active role to assure that the interstate compact operates to protect
the safety of the people and communities of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state shall
continue to meet its obligations under RCW 9.95.270, the interstate compact for
the supervision of parolees and probationers, to those states which continue to
meet their obligations to the state of Washington under the interstate compact
for the supervision of parolees and probationers, and have not approved the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision after the effective date of
this act.

(2) If a state
withdraws from the interstate compact for adult offender supervision under
article XII(a) of section 2 of this act, the state council for interstate adult
offender supervision created by section 3 of this act shall seek to negotiate
an agreement with the withdrawing state fulfilling the purposes of section 2 of
this act, subject to the approval of the legislature.

(3) Nothing in this act
limits the secretary's authority to enter into agreements with other jurisdictions
for supervision of offenders.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) This act is necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect July 1, 2001.

(2) The
interstate compact for adult offender supervision becomes effective and binding
July 1, 2001, or on the date of enactment of the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision by thirty‑five jurisdictions, whichever is later.
In determining that the compact has become effective and binding, the code
reviser may rely on the written representation of the national institute of
corrections of the United States department of justice.

---
END ---