BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that presentation of evidence related to conditions of a less restrictive
alternative that are beyond the authority of the court to order, and that would
not exist in the absence of a court order, reduces the public respect for the
rule of law and for the authority of the courts. Consequently, the legislature
finds that the decision in In re the Detention of Casper Ross, 102 Wn.
App 108 (2000), is contrary to the legislature's intent. The legislature
hereby clarifies that it intends, and has always intended, in any proceeding
under this chapter that the court and jury be presented only with conditions
that would exist or that the court would have the authority to order in the
absence of a finding that the person is a sexually violent predator.

Sec. 2. RCW 5.60.060 and 1998 c
72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A husband shall not
be examined for or against his wife, without the consent of the wife, nor a
wife for or against her husband without the consent of the husband; nor can
either during marriage or afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined
as to any communication made by one to the other during marriage. But this
exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one against the
other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by one
against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding against a spouse if
the marriage occurred subsequent to the filing of formal charges against the
defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by said
husband or wife against any child of whom said husband or wife is the parent or
guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A ((or)), 71.05,
or 71.09 RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse of a person sought to be detained
under chapter 70.96A ((or)), 71.05, or 71.09 RCW may not
be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by the court prior to being
called as a witness.

(2)(a) An attorney or
counselor shall not, without the consent of his or her client, be examined as
to any communication made by the client to him or her, or his or her advice
given thereon in the course of professional employment.

(b) A parent or
guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal charge may not be examined as
to a communication between the child and his or her attorney if the
communication was made in the presence of the parent or guardian. This
privilege does not extend to communications made prior to the arrest.

(3) A member of the
clergy or a priest shall not, without the consent of a person making the
confession, be examined as to any confession made to him or her in his or her
professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to
which he or she belongs.

(4) Subject to the
limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or 71.05.250, a physician or surgeon or
osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not,
without the consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil action as to
any information acquired in attending such patient, which was necessary to
enable him or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:

(a) In any judicial
proceedings regarding a child's injury, neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause
thereof; and

(b) Ninety days after
filing an action for personal injuries or wrongful death, the claimant shall be
deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the
physician-patient privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes a
waiver of the privilege as to all physicians or conditions, subject to such
limitations as a court may impose pursuant to court rules.

(5) A public officer
shall not be examined as a witness as to communications made to him or her in
official confidence, when the public interest would suffer by the disclosure.

(6)(a) A peer support
group counselor shall not, without consent of the law enforcement officer
making the communication, be compelled to testify about any communication made
to the counselor by the officer while receiving counseling. The counselor must
be designated as such by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the Washington
state patrol, prior to the incident that results in counseling. The privilege
only applies when the communication was made to the counselor while acting in
his or her capacity as a peer support group counselor. The privilege does not
apply if the counselor was an initial responding officer, a witness, or a party
to the incident which prompted the delivery of peer support group counseling
services to the law enforcement officer.

(b) For purposes of
this section, "peer support group counselor" means a:

(i) Law enforcement
officer, or civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, who has received
training to provide emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer
who needs those services as a result of an incident in which the officer was
involved while acting in his or her official capacity; or

(ii) Nonemployee
counselor who has been designated by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the
Washington state patrol to provide emotional and moral support and counseling
to an officer who needs those services as a result of an incident in which the
officer was involved while acting in his or her official capacity.

(7) A sexual assault
advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any
communication made by the victim to the sexual assault advocate.

(a) For purposes of
this section, "sexual assault advocate" means the employee or
volunteer from a rape crisis center, victim assistance unit, program, or
association, that provides information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling,
or support to victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the victim to
accompany the victim to the hospital or other health care facility and to
proceedings concerning the alleged assault, including police and prosecution
interviews and court proceedings.

(b) A sexual
assault advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the consent
of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent
risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another person. Any
sexual assault advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of
records and communications under this section shall have immunity from any
liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action.
In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this
section, the good faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed the
confidential communication shall be presumed.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.09.010 and 1990 c
3 s 1001 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that a small but extremely dangerous group of sexually violent predators exist
who do not have a mental disease or defect that renders them appropriate for
the existing involuntary treatment act, chapter 71.05 RCW, which is intended to
be a short-term civil commitment system that is primarily designed to provide
short-term treatment to individuals with serious mental disorders and then
return them to the community. In contrast to persons appropriate for civil
commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW, sexually violent predators generally have
((antisocial)) personality ((features)) disorders and/or
mental abnormalities which are unamenable to existing mental illness
treatment modalities and those ((features)) conditions render
them likely to engage in sexually violent behavior. The legislature further
finds that sex offenders' likelihood of engaging in repeat acts of predatory
sexual violence is high. The existing involuntary commitment act, chapter
71.05 RCW, is inadequate to address the risk to reoffend because during
confinement these offenders do not have access to potential victims and
therefore they will not engage in an overt act during confinement as required
by the involuntary treatment act for continued confinement. The legislature further
finds that the prognosis for curing sexually violent offenders is poor, the
treatment needs of this population are very long term, and the treatment
modalities for this population are very different than the traditional
treatment modalities for people appropriate for commitment under the
involuntary treatment act.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.09.020 and 1995 c
216 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged
with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or
personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(2) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.

(3) "Likely to
engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure
facility" means that the person more probably than not will engage in
such acts if released unconditionally from detention on the sexually violent
predator petition. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent overt act
if the person is not totally confined at the time the petition is filed under
RCW 71.09.030.

(4)
"Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers ((or));
(b) individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted
for the primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual
acquaintance with whom no substantial personal relationship exists.

(5) "Recent overt
act" means any act or threat that has either caused harm of a
sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm in
the mind of an objective person who knows of the history and mental condition
of the person engaging in the act.

(6) "Sexually
violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or after July 1, 1990,
that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape
in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or
second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties
by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen,
incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the first or
second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of
this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for a felony offense
that under the laws of this state would be a sexually violent offense as
defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in the first or second degree,
assault in the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first or
second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the first
degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at
the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in
RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of the
felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(7) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less
restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set forth
in RCW 71.09.092.

(8)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or his
or her designee.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.09.025 and 1995 c
216 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When it appears
that a person may meet the criteria of a sexually violent predator as defined
in RCW 71.09.020(1), the agency with jurisdiction shall refer the person in
writing to the prosecuting attorney of the county where that person was
charged, three months prior to:

(i) The anticipated
release from total confinement of a person who has been convicted of a sexually
violent offense;

(ii) The anticipated
release from total confinement of a person found to have committed a sexually
violent offense as a juvenile;

(iii) Release of a
person who has been charged with a sexually violent offense and who has been determined
to be incompetent to stand trial pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(((3))) (4);
or

(iv) Release of a
person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity of a sexually
violent offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.020(3).

(b) The agency shall
provide the prosecutor with all relevant information including but not limited
to the following information:

(i) A complete copy of
the institutional records compiled by the department of corrections relating to
the person, and any such out-of-state department of corrections' records, if
available;

(ii) A complete copy,
if applicable, of any file compiled by the indeterminate sentence review board
relating to the person;

(iii) All records
relating to the psychological or psychiatric evaluation and/or treatment of the
person;

(iv) A current record
of all prior arrests and convictions, and full police case reports relating to
those arrests and convictions; and

(v) A current mental
health evaluation or mental health records review.

(2) This section
applies to acts committed before, on, or after March 26, 1992.

(3) The agency, its
employees, and officials shall be immune from liability for any good-faith
conduct under this section.

(4) As used in this section,
"agency with jurisdiction" means that agency with the authority to
direct the release of a person serving a sentence or term of confinement and
includes the department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review
board, and the department of social and health services.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.09.040 and 1995 c
216 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the filing of
a petition under RCW 71.09.030, the judge shall determine whether probable
cause exists to believe that the person named in the petition is a sexually
violent predator. If such determination is made the judge shall direct that
the person be taken into custody.

(2) Within seventy-two
hours after a person is taken into custody pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the court shall provide the person with notice of, and an opportunity
to appear in person at, a hearing to contest probable cause as to whether the
person is a sexually violent predator. At this hearing, the court shall (a)
verify the person's identity, and (b) determine whether probable cause exists
to believe that the person is a sexually violent predator. At the probable
cause hearing, the state may rely upon the petition and certification for
determination of probable cause filed pursuant to RCW 71.09.030. The state may
supplement this with additional documentary evidence or live testimony.

(3) At the probable
cause hearing, the person shall have the following rights in addition to the
rights previously specified: (a) To be represented by counsel; (b) to present
evidence on his or her behalf; (c) to cross-examine witnesses who testify
against him or her; (d) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court
file.

(4) If the probable
cause determination is made, the judge shall direct that the person be
transferred to an appropriate facility for an evaluation as to whether the
person is a sexually violent predator. The evaluation shall be conducted by a
person deemed to be professionally qualified to conduct such an examination
pursuant to rules developed by the department of social and health services.
In adopting such rules, the department of social and health services shall
consult with the department of health and the department of corrections. In no
event shall the person be released from confinement prior to trial. A
witness called by either party shall be permitted to testify by telephone.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.09.060 and 1998 c
146 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court or jury
shall determine whether, beyond a reasonable doubt, the person is a sexually
violent predator. In determining whether or not the person would be likely
to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure
facility, the fact finder may consider only placement conditions and voluntary
treatment options that would exist for the person if unconditionally released
from detention on the sexually violent predator petition. When the
determination is made by a jury, the verdict must be unanimous.

If, on the date that
the petition is filed, the person was living in the community after release
from custody, the state must also prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
person had committed a recent overt act. If the state alleges that the prior
sexually violent offense that forms the basis for the petition for commitment
was an act that was sexually motivated as provided in RCW 71.09.020(6)(c), the
state must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the alleged sexually violent
act was sexually motivated as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

If the court or jury
determines that the person is a sexually violent predator, the person shall be
committed to the custody of the department of social and health services for
placement in a secure facility operated by the department of social and health
services for control, care, and treatment until such time as: (a) The
person's ((mental abnormality or personality disorder)) condition
has so changed that the person ((is safe either (a) to be at large,)) no
longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (b) ((to
be released)) conditional release to a less restrictive alternative
as set forth in RCW 71.09.092 is in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.

If the court or unanimous
jury ((is not satisfied beyond a reasonable doubt)) decides that the
state has not met its burden of proving that the person is a sexually
violent predator, the court shall direct the person's release.

If the jury is
unable to reach a unanimous verdict, the court shall declare a mistrial and set
a retrial within forty-five days of the date of the mistrial unless the
prosecuting agency earlier moves to dismiss the petition. The retrial may be
continued upon the request of either party accompanied by a showing of good
cause, or by the court on its own motion in the due administration of justice
provided that the respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. In no event
may the person be released from confinement prior to retrial or dismissal of
the case.

(2) If the person
charged with a sexually violent offense has been found incompetent to stand
trial, and is about to or has been released pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(((3)))
(4), and his or her commitment is sought pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section, the court shall first hear evidence and determine whether the
person did commit the act or acts charged if the court did not enter a finding
prior to dismissal under RCW 10.77.090(((3))) (4) that the person
committed the act or acts charged. The hearing on this issue must comply with
all the procedures specified in this section. In addition, the rules of
evidence applicable in criminal cases shall apply, and all constitutional
rights available to defendants at criminal trials, other than the right not to
be tried while incompetent, shall apply. After hearing evidence on this issue,
the court shall make specific findings on whether the person did commit the act
or acts charged, the extent to which the person's incompetence or developmental
disability affected the outcome of the hearing, including its effect on the
person's ability to consult with and assist counsel and to testify on his or
her own behalf, the extent to which the evidence could be reconstructed without
the assistance of the person, and the strength of the prosecution's case. If,
after the conclusion of the hearing on this issue, the court finds, beyond a
reasonable doubt, that the person did commit the act or acts charged, it shall
enter a final order, appealable by the person, on that issue, and may proceed
to consider whether the person should be committed pursuant to this section.

(3) The state shall
comply with RCW 10.77.220 while confining the person pursuant to this chapter,
except that during all court proceedings the person shall be detained in a
secure facility. The department shall not place the person, even temporarily,
in a facility on the grounds of any state mental facility or regional
habilitation center because these institutions are insufficiently secure for
this population.

(4) A court has
jurisdiction to order a less restrictive alternative placement only after a
hearing ordered pursuant to RCW 71.09.090 following initial commitment under
this section and in accord with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.09.070 and 1995 c
216 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Each person committed
under this chapter shall have a current examination of his or her mental
condition made by the department of social and health services at least
once every year. The annual report shall include consideration of whether the
committed person currently meets the definition of a sexually violent predator
and whether conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the
best interest of the person and ((will)) conditions can be imposed
that would adequately protect the community. The department of social
and health services shall file this periodic report with the court that
committed the person under this chapter. The report shall be in the form of a
declaration or certification in compliance with the requirements of RCW
9A.72.085 and shall be prepared by a professionally qualified person as defined
by rules adopted by the secretary. A copy of the report shall be served on the
prosecuting agency involved in the initial commitment and upon the committed
person and his or her counsel. The committed person may retain, or
if he or she is indigent and so requests, the court may appoint a qualified
expert or a professional person to examine him or her, and such expert or
professional person shall have access to all records concerning the person. ((The
periodic report shall be provided to the court that committed the person under
this chapter.))

Sec. 9. RCW 71.09.090 and 1995 c
216 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the secretary
determines that either: (a) The person's ((mental abnormality or
personality disorder)) condition has so changed that the person ((is
not likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if conditionally
released to a less restrictive alternative or unconditionally discharged)) no
longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person
and conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the
secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge. The
petition shall be ((served upon)) filed with the court and served
upon the prosecuting ((attorney)) agency responsible for the initial
commitment. The court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge, shall
within forty-five days order a hearing. ((The prosecuting attorney or the
attorney general, if requested by the county, shall represent the state, and
shall have the right to have the petitioner examined by an expert or
professional person of his or her choice. The hearing shall be before a jury
if demanded by either the petitioner or the prosecuting attorney or attorney
general. The burden of proof shall be upon the prosecuting attorney or
attorney general to show beyond a reasonable doubt that the petitioner's mental
abnormality or personality disorder remains such that the petitioner is not
safe to be at large and that if conditionally released to a less restrictive
alternative or unconditionally discharged is likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence.))

(2)(a) Nothing
contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person from otherwise petitioning
the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge without the secretary's approval. The secretary shall
provide the committed person with an annual written notice of the person's
right to petition the court for conditional release to a less restrictive
alternative or unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The
notice shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall ((forward))
file the notice and waiver form ((to the court with)) and the
annual report with the court. If the person does not affirmatively
waive the right to petition, the court shall set a show cause hearing to
determine whether ((facts)) probable cause exists ((that))
to warrant a hearing on whether: (i) The person's condition has
so changed that he or she ((is safe to be conditionally released to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditionally discharged)) no longer meets
the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a
less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.

(b) The
committed person shall have a right to have an attorney represent him or her at
the show cause hearing, which may be conducted solely on the basis of
affidavits or declarations, but the person is not entitled to be present at
the show cause hearing. At the show cause hearing, the prosecuting attorney
or attorney general shall present prima facie evidence establishing that the
committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator and that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of
the person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the
community. In making this showing, the state may rely exclusively upon the
annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed person may
present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the state may reply.

(c) If the court
at the show cause hearing determines that either: (i) The state has failed
to present prima facie evidence that the committed person continues to meet the
definition of a sexually violent predator and that no proposed less restrictive
alternative is in the best interest of the person and conditions cannot be
imposed that would adequately protect the community; or (ii) probable cause
exists to believe that the person's ((mental abnormality or personality
disorder)) condition has so changed that: (A) The person ((is
not likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if conditionally
released to a less restrictive alternative or unconditionally discharged)) no
longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (B) release to a
less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, then
the court shall set a hearing on ((the)) either or both issues.

(d) If the court has
not previously considered the issue of release to a less restrictive
alternative, either through a trial on the merits or through the procedures set
forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the court shall consider whether release to a less
restrictive alternative would be in the best interests of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, without
considering whether the person's condition has changed.

(3)(a) At the
hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the
committed person shall be entitled to be present and to the benefit of all
constitutional protections that were afforded to the person at the initial
commitment proceeding. The prosecuting ((attorney)) agency or
the attorney general if requested by the county shall represent the state and
shall have a right to a jury trial and to have the committed person evaluated
by experts chosen by the state. The committed person shall also have the right
to have experts evaluate him or her on his or her behalf and the court shall
appoint an expert if the person is indigent and requests an appointment.

(b) If the issue at
the hearing is whether the person should be unconditionally discharged, the
burden of proof ((at the hearing)) shall be upon the state to prove
beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's ((mental abnormality
or personality disorder)) condition remains such that the person ((is
likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if conditionally released
to a less restrictive alternative or unconditionally discharged)) continues
to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior
commitment trial and disposition is admissible.

(c) If the issue at
the hearing is whether the person should be conditionally released to a less
restrictive alternative, the burden of proof at the hearing shall be upon the
state to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that conditional release to any
proposed less restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest
of the committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would
adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment trial and
disposition is admissible.

(((3))) (4)
The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed pursuant to this
chapter continues until such time as the person is unconditionally discharged.

Sec. 10. RCW 71.09.092 and 1995 c
216 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Before the court may
enter an order directing conditional release to a less restrictive alternative,
it must find the following: (1) The person will be treated by a treatment
provider who is qualified to provide such treatment in the state of Washington
under chapter 18.155 RCW; (2) the treatment provider has presented a specific
course of treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment
and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will report
violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community
corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center;
(3) housing exists that is sufficiently secure to protect the community, and
the person or agency providing housing to the conditionally released person has
agreed in writing to accept the person, to provide the level of security
required by the court, and immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor,
the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the
special commitment center if the person leaves the housing to which he or she
has been assigned without authorization; (4) the person is willing to comply
with the treatment provider and all requirements imposed by the treatment
provider and by the court; ((and)) (5) the person is willing to comply
with supervision requirements imposed by the department of corrections; and
(6) that the department of social and health services has verified with the
victim witness programs operated by the department of social and health
services, the department of corrections, the secretary of state, and any other
appropriate programs, that the last known address of any of the person's
registered victims is not within twenty-five miles of the committed person's
proposed housing.

Sec. 11. RCW 71.09.094 and 1995 c
216 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the conclusion
of the evidence in a hearing held pursuant to RCW 71.09.090 or through
summary judgment proceedings prior to such a hearing, if the court finds
that there is no legally sufficient evidentiary basis for a reasonable jury to
find that the conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092 have been met, the court
shall grant a motion by the state for a judgment as a matter of law on the
issue of conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.

(2) Whenever the issue
of conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is submitted to the
jury, the court shall instruct the jury to return a verdict in substantially
the following form: Has the state proved beyond a reasonable doubt that either:
(a) The proposed less restrictive alternative is not in the best interests
of respondent; or ((will not)) (b) does not include conditions
that would adequately protect the community? Answer: Yes or No.

Sec. 12. RCW 71.09.096 and 1995 c
216 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the court or
jury determines that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is
in the best interest of the person and ((will)) includes conditions
that would adequately protect the community, and the court determines that
the minimum conditions set forth in ((section 9 of this act)) RCW
71.09.092 and in this section are met, the court shall enter judgment and
direct a conditional release.

(2) The court shall
impose any additional conditions necessary to ensure compliance with treatment
and to protect the community. If the court finds that conditions do not exist
that will both ensure the person's compliance with treatment and protect the
community, then the person shall be remanded to the custody of the department
of social and health services for control, care, and treatment in a secure
facility as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1).

(3) If the service
provider designated by the court to provide inpatient or outpatient
treatment or to monitor or supervise any other terms and conditions of a
person's placement in a less restrictive alternative is other than the
department of social and health services or the department of corrections, then
the service provider so designated must agree in writing to provide such
treatment, monitoring, or supervision in accord with this section. Any
person providing or agreeing to provide treatment, monitoring, or supervision
services pursuant to this chapter may be compelled to testify and any privilege
with regard to such person's testimony is deemed waived.

(4) Prior to
authorizing any release to a less restrictive alternative, the court shall
impose such conditions upon the person as are necessary to ensure the safety of
the community. The court shall order the department of corrections to
investigate the less restrictive alternative and recommend any additional
conditions to the court. These conditions shall include, but are not limited
to the following: Specification of residence, prohibition of contact with
potential or past victims, prohibition of alcohol and other drug use,
participation in a specific course of inpatient or outpatient treatment that
may include monitoring by the use of polygraph and plethysmograph, supervision
by a department of corrections community corrections officer, a requirement
that the person remain within the state unless the person receives prior
authorization by the court, and any other conditions that the court determines
are in the best interest of the person or others. A copy of the conditions of
release shall be given to the person and to any designated service providers.

(5) Any service
provider designated to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment shall monthly,
or as otherwise directed by the court, submit to the court, to the department
of social and health services facility from which the person was released, to
the prosecutor of the county in which the person was found to be a sexually
violent predator, and to the supervising community corrections officer, a
report stating whether the person is complying with the terms and conditions of
the conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.

(6) Each person
released to a less restrictive alternative shall have his or her case reviewed
by the court that released him or her no later than one year after such release
and annually thereafter until the person is unconditionally discharged. Review
may occur in a shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion
on its own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary, or the
prosecuting attorney so determines. The sole question to be determined by the
court is whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released to a
less restrictive alternative. The court in making its determination shall be
aided by the periodic reports filed pursuant to subsection (5) of this section
and the opinions of the secretary and other experts or professional persons.

Sec. 13. RCW 71.09.098 and 1995 c
216 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any service
provider submitting reports pursuant to RCW 71.09.096(((5))) (6),
the supervising community corrections officer, the prosecuting attorney, or the
attorney general may petition the court, or the court on its own motion may
schedule an immediate hearing, for the purpose of revoking or modifying the
terms of the person's conditional release to a less restrictive alternative if
the petitioner or the court believes the released person is not complying with
the terms and conditions of his or her release or is in need of additional care
((and)), monitoring, supervision, or treatment.

(2) If the prosecuting
attorney, the supervising community corrections officer, or the court, based
upon information received by them, reasonably believes that a conditionally
released person is not complying with the terms and conditions of his or her
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, the court or community
corrections officer may order that the conditionally released person be
apprehended and taken into custody until such time as a hearing can be
scheduled to determine the facts and whether or not the person's conditional
release should be revoked or modified. The court shall be notified before the
close of the next judicial day of the person's apprehension. Both the
prosecuting attorney and the conditionally released person shall have the right
to request an immediate mental examination of the conditionally released
person. If the conditionally released person is indigent, the court shall,
upon request, assist him or her in obtaining a qualified expert or professional
person to conduct the examination.

(3) The court, upon
receiving notification of the person's apprehension, shall promptly schedule a
hearing. The issue to be determined is whether the state has proven by a
preponderance of the evidence that the conditionally released person did not
comply with the terms and conditions of his or her release. Hearsay evidence
is admissible if the court finds it otherwise reliable. At the hearing, the
court shall determine whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released
on the same or modified conditions or whether his or her conditional release
shall be revoked and he or she shall be committed to total confinement, subject
to release only in accordance with provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. This act applies to all
individuals currently committed or awaiting commitment under chapter 71.09 RCW
either on, before, or after the effective date of this act, whether confined in
a secure facility or on conditional release.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---