BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
9A.76.120 and 1995 c 216 s 15 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) A person is guilty of escape in the second
degree if:

_8 (a) He or she escapes from a detention facility;

_9 (b) Having been charged with a felony or an
equivalent juvenile

10 offense, he or she escapes from custody; ((or))

11 (c) Having been found to be a sexually violent
predator and

12 being under an order of conditional release, he or she
leaves, or

13 remains absent from, the state of Washington
without prior court

14 authorization; or

15 (d) Having been committed under chapter 10.77 RCW
for a sex,

16 violent, or felony harassment offense and being under
an order of

17 conditional release, he or she leaves or remains
absent from the

18 state of Washington without prior court authorization.

p. 1 SSB
5123

_1 (2) Escape in the second degree is a class C felony.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5123 p. 2