BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) The wildlife conservationist award program is
created in

_7 the department. The purpose of the program is to recognize

_8 individuals who have made outstanding contributions toward

_9 conserving Washington=s diverse plant and animal
populations.

10 (2) The program consists of two annual awards as
follows:

11 (a) The Art Kruckeberg award shall be presented to an

12 individual making outstanding contributions toward
conserving the

13 state=s plants and plant communities; and

14 (b) The Hazel Wolf award shall be presented to an
individual

15 making outstanding contributions toward conserving the
state=s

16 animals and animal communities.

17 (3) The recipient of each award is entitled to select a

18 nonprofit wildlife conservation organization to receive a
sum of

p. 1 SB
5125

_1 up to twenty-five thousand dollars from the state. The
organization

_2 must be qualified as a tax-exempt organization under
section

_3 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code (26
U.S.C. Sec.

_4 501(c)(3)), and must agree to commit the sum to the
organization=s

_5 wildlife conservation activities in Washington.

_6 (4) The department must develop guidelines for
selecting award

_7 recipients and incorporate into the program elements
that provide

_8 for public recognition of the contributions made by the

_9 recipients. The department may create an advisory
committee to

10 assist the department in developing the guidelines and
in

11 selecting recipients.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5125 p. 2