BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.14.070 and 1997 c
62 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The classified
civil service and provisions of this chapter shall include all deputy sheriffs
and other employees of the office of sheriff in each county except the county
sheriff in every county and an additional number of positions, designated the
unclassified service, determined as follows:

Unclassified

Staff
Personnel Position Appointments

1 through
10 2

11 through
20 3

21 through
50 4

51 through
100 5

101 ((and
over)) through 250 6

251 through
500 8

501 and
over 10

(2) The unclassified
position appointments authorized by this section must include selections from
the following positions up to the limit of the number of positions authorized:
Undersheriff, inspector, chief criminal deputy, chief civil deputy, jail
superintendent, and administrative assistant or administrative secretary. The
initial selection of specific positions to be exempt shall be made by the
sheriff, who shall notify the civil service commission of his or her
selection. Subsequent changes in the designation of which positions are to be
exempt may be made only with the concurrence of the sheriff and the civil
service commission, and then only after the civil service commission has heard
the issue in open meeting. Should the position or positions initially selected
by the sheriff to be exempt (unclassified) pursuant to this section be under
the classified civil service at the time of such selection, and should it (or
they) be occupied, the employee(s) occupying said position(s) shall have the
right to return to the next highest position or a like position under
classified civil service.

(3) In counties with a
sheriff's department that operates the 911 emergency communications system, in
addition to the unclassified positions authorized in subsections (1), (2), and
(4) of this section, the sheriff may designate one unclassified position for
the 911 emergency communications system.

(4) In
addition to the unclassified positions authorized in this section, the
county legislative authority of any county with a population of five hundred
thousand or more operating under a home rule charter may designate unclassified
positions of administrative responsibility not to exceed ((twelve)) twenty
positions.

--- END ---