BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.36.010 and 1986 c
58 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the occurrence of
any injury to a worker entitled to compensation under the provisions of this
title, he or she shall receive proper and necessary medical and surgical
services at the hands of a physician of his or her own choice, if conveniently
located, and proper and necessary hospital care and services during the period
of his or her disability from such injury, but the same shall be limited in
point of duration as follows:

In the case of permanent
partial disability, not to extend beyond the date when compensation shall be
awarded him or her, except when the worker returned to work before permanent
partial disability award is made, in such case not to extend beyond the time
when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of temporary
disability not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her
shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to his or
her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be continued if, and so
long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial
insurance to be necessary to his or her more complete recovery; in case of a
permanent total disability not to extend beyond the date on which a lump sum
settlement is made with him or her or he or she is placed upon the permanent
pension roll: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance,
solely in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical
treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when such
medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the supervisor of
industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or provide for the
administration of medical and therapeutic measures including payment of
prescription medications((, but not including those controlled substances
currently scheduled by the state board of pharmacy as Schedule I, II, III, or
IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW,)) which are necessary to alleviate
continuing pain which results from the industrial injury including opiate
medications currently scheduled by the state board of pharmacy as Schedule II,
III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, but not including any other
controlled substances from Schedule I, II, III, or IV. In order to
authorize such continued treatment the written order of the supervisor of
industrial insurance issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.

The
supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee, or a self-insurer,
in his or her sole discretion, may authorize inoculation or other immunological
treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable
exposure of the worker to a potential infectious occupational disease.
Authorization of such treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in
any adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary for
an occupational disease.

--- END ---