BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that the creation of a natural landmark designation is an essential step
in preserving unique and scarce parcels of land for future generations. This
status should offer the property owner a tax benefit equivalent to the timber
open space tax rate for the portion of property protected. Natural landmarks
would be protected from destruction by future property owners and government
projects such as road widening.

(2) Each county or city
required to or choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish a
voluntary natural landmark registry. The registry must be open to
participation to any landowner who wants to preserve a natural feature
including, but not limited to, a mature grove of trees, interesting
combinations of natural vegetation, or unusual geologic features. This status
may also be extended to notable cultivated gardens at the discretion of the
local governmental authority.

(3) Any parcel within a
property of twenty thousand square feet or greater may be submitted for
designation as a natural landmark. In order to be approved, the natural
landmark status must be supported by a federal, state, or local natural
resource management agency, or a private environmental organization.

(4) Natural landmark
status may only be granted to a parcel after a satisfactory conservation
easement has been developed for the parcel. The easement must be for
perpetuity. The county or city of jurisdiction is to assist the landowner in
preparing the conservation easement to protect the natural landmark.

(5) The
landowner may not be required to provide public access to or use of the
property so designated.

--- END ---