BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares:

It is in the interest
of the state and the traveling public to improve the safety and efficiency of
state highways and bridges as expeditiously as possible. The existing Tacoma
Narrows bridge section of the SR 16 corridor located in Pierce and Kitsap counties,
among others, is a threat to public health and safety because of congestion and
a high number of accidents, injuries, and fatalities. Millions of dollars are
lost annually because of travel delays and accidents that cause personal and
property damage. These conditions are the result of insufficient capacity,
substandard effective lane widths, lack of emergency shoulders, and no
separation of oncoming traffic due to the physical limitation of the existing
bridge.

The SR 16 corridor
provides the only fixed roadway link crossing Puget Sound. SR 16 is classified
as an urban principal arterial and a highway of statewide significance because
it serves substantial statewide and interstate travel. Further, its national
highway system designation as a major strategic highway connector identifies SR
16 as part of the network of highways that is important to the United States
strategic defense policy providing defense access, continuity, and emergency
capabilities for the movement of personnel, materials, and equipment.

The SR 16 corridor is
vital to the economic well-being of Pierce and Kitsap counties and the Olympic
peninsula. SR 16 is a designated state freight corridor, allowing for the
efficient movement of freight, goods, and services to support local, regional,
and state economies.

The public-private
transportation initiatives act, chapter 47.46 RCW, is an important component of
the state's approach to financing and carrying out additions and improvements
to the state transportation system, including improvements to facilities
originally financed under chapter 47.56 RCW. Under chapter 47.46 RCW,
public-private initiative projects are developed according to state and federal
law and other statutorily required processes. The SR 16 corridor project includes
the financing, right-of-way acquisition, design-build construction, operations,
and maintenance of a new suspension bridge at Tacoma Narrows parallel to the
existing bridge and the reconfiguration and seismic rehabilitation of the
current bridge. Roadway improvements will also be made on SR 16 from and to
the approaches to the bridge. Voters in the affected project area under state
law approved the imposition of tolls to pay for these improvements.

The state highway
systems plan does not provide any other funding solution for this critical
transportation project, other than public-private financing under chapter 47.46
RCW. Under RCW 47.46.040, the project has received regulatory approvals,
rights-of-way have been acquired, necessary preparations for financing have
been made, and a design-build construction price has been determined. There
have been significant state appropriations and private funding advanced to
develop the project. Delays in commencing this project will cause increases in
construction and financing costs and present a clear danger that the state will
not be able to proceed to make these vital transportation improvements. This
will result in a detrimental effect on the safety of its citizens and the
economic welfare of the region.

In order to avoid these
profound risks, including the profound risk of the project not proceeding,
which would adversely affect tens of thousands of citizens, it is necessary
that this act be effective immediately. Immediate legislative action is a pressing
necessity to support the immediate commencement of work on this project and the
SR 16 corridor.

These facts and
findings are a declaration of facts constituting an emergency, and the projects
that will be able to proceed under this act are necessary for immediate
preservation of the public health, safety, and welfare.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.56.010 and 1984 c
7 s 246 are each amended to read as follows:

"Toll bridge"
means a bridge constructed or acquired under this chapter, upon which tolls are
charged, together with all appurtenances, additions, alterations, improvements,
and replacements thereof, and the approaches thereto, and all lands and
interests used therefor, and buildings and improvements thereon.

"Toll road"
means any express highway, superhighway, or motorway at such locations and
between such termini as may be established by law, and constructed or to be
constructed as a limited access highway under the provisions of this chapter by
the department, and shall include, but not be limited to, all bridges, tunnels,
overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, toll
houses, service areas, service facilities, communications facilities, and
administration, storage, and other buildings that the department may deem
necessary for the operation of the project, together with all property, rights,
easements, and interests that may be acquired by the department for the
construction or the operation of the project, all of which shall be conducted
in the same manner and under the same procedure as provided for the
establishing, constructing, operating, and maintaining of toll bridges by the
department, insofar as those procedures are reasonably consistent and
applicable.

"Toll
bridge" and "toll road" as used in this chapter does not include
a facility that is developed, financed, constructed, reconstructed, upgraded,
maintained, or operated under chapter 47.46 RCW and for which funds have been
appropriated under RCW 47.46.030, notwithstanding the fact that the facility
was originally constructed under this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.56.030 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
transportation shall have full charge of the construction of all toll bridges
and other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries, and the
operation and maintenance thereof. The transportation commission shall
determine and establish the tolls and charges thereon, and shall perform all
duties and exercise all powers relating to the financing, refinancing, and
fiscal management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the
Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the manner provided by
law. However, once bonds issued by the commission for construction of a
toll bridge or other toll facility have been paid, redeemed, or defeased in
full, the toll bridge or other toll facility may be thereafter included in
projects that have been authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW and for which funds
have been appropriated under RCW 47.46.030, and tolls on the facilities must be
established as provided by chapter 47.46 RCW. The department shall have
full charge of design of all toll facilities. The department shall proceed
with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities and the
approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway construction
immediately upon there being made available funds for such work and shall
prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as practicable. The department is
authorized to negotiate contracts for any amount without bid in order to make
repairs to ferries or ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities
whenever continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent use of
such ferries or facilities.

The department shall
proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services, and equipment
needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or
other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter
43.19 RCW except as follows:

(1) When the secretary
of the department of transportation determines in writing that the use of
invitation for bid is either not practicable or not advantageous to the state
and it may be necessary to make competitive evaluations, including technical or
performance evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract
award, a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals
method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal request
for proposals solicitation shall include a functional description of the needs
and requirements of the state and the significant factors.

(2) When purchases are
made through a formal request for proposals solicitation the contract shall be
awarded to the responsible proposer whose competitive sealed proposal is
determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into
consideration price and other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposals. No significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that
are not specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price maintainability;
reliability; commonality; performance levels; life cycle cost if applicable
under this section; cost of transportation or delivery; delivery schedule
offered; installation cost; cost of spare parts; availability of parts and
service offered; and the following:

(a) The ability,
capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the contract or provide the
service required;

(b) The character,
integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of the proposer;

(c) Whether the
proposer can perform the contract within the time specified;

(d) The quality of
performance of previous contracts or services;

(e) The previous and
existing compliance by the proposer with laws relating to the contract or
services;

(f) Objective,
measurable criteria defined in the request for proposal. These criteria may
include but are not limited to items such as discounts, delivery costs,
maintenance services costs, installation costs, and transportation costs; and

(g) Such other
information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award the
contract.

When purchases are made
through a request for proposal process, proposals received shall be evaluated
based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposal. When a
life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle cost of a proposal shall be
given at least the same relative importance as the initial price element
specified in the request of proposal documents. The department may reject any
and all proposals received. If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall
be made to the proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposal.

(3) The legislative
transportation committee shall review the secretary's use of the request for
proposals solicitation for Washington state ferries projects to determine if
the process established under chapter 4, Laws of 1995 1st sp. sess. is
appropriate. The results of the review, including recommendations for
modification of the request for proposal process, shall be reported to the
house of representatives and senate transportation committees by January 1,
1997.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.56.240 and 1984 c
7 s 265 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission is
hereby empowered to fix the rates of toll and other charges for all toll
bridges built under the terms of this chapter. Toll charges so fixed may be
changed from time to time as conditions warrant. The commission, in
establishing toll charges, shall give due consideration to the cost of
operating and maintaining such toll bridge or toll bridges including the cost
of insurance, and to the amount required annually to meet the redemption of
bonds and interest payments on them. The tolls and charges shall be at all
times fixed at rates to yield annual revenue equal to annual operating and
maintenance expenses including insurance costs and all redemption payments and
interest charges of the bonds issued for any particular toll bridge or toll
bridges as the bonds become due. The bond redemption and interest payments
constitute a first direct and exclusive charge and lien on all such tolls and
other revenues and interest thereon. Sinking funds created therefrom received
from the use and operation of the toll bridge or toll bridges, and such tolls
and revenues together with the interest earned thereon shall constitute a trust
fund for the security and payment of such bonds and shall not be used or
pledged for any other purpose as long as any of these bonds are outstanding and
unpaid.

However,
once bonds issued by the commission for construction of a toll bridge or other
toll facility have been paid, redeemed, or defeased in full, the toll bridge or
other toll facility may be thereafter included in projects that have been
authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW and for which funds have been appropriated
under RCW 47.46.030, and tolls on the facilities must be established as
provided by chapter 47.46 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.56.270 and 1983 c
3 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:

The Lake Washington
bridge ((and the Tacoma Narrows bridge)) in chapter 47.17 RCW made a
part of the primary state highways of the state of Washington, shall, upon
completion, be operated, maintained, kept up, and repaired by the department in
the manner provided in this chapter, and the cost of such operation,
maintenance, upkeep, and repair shall be paid from funds appropriated for the
use of the department for the construction and maintenance of the primary state
highways of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. RCW 47.56.271 (Tacoma Narrows
bridge--Toll free facility) and 1983 c 3 s 130 & 1965 c 50 s 1 are each
repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. For all reasons,
declarations, and facts stated in section 1 of this act, the legislature
declares that an emergency exists and that this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of
the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---