BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
19.158.110 and 1989 c 20 s 11 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) Within the first minute of the telephone call, a
commercial

_8 telephone solicitor or salesperson shall:

_9 (a) Identify himself or herself, the company on
whose behalf

10 the solicitation is being made, the property, goods, or
services

11 being sold; and

12 (b) Terminate the telephone call within ten seconds
if the

13 purchaser indicates he or she does not wish to continue
the

14 conversation.

15 (2) If at any time during the telephone contact, the
purchaser

16 states or indicates that he or she does not wish to be
called

17 again by the commercial telephone solicitor or wants to
have his

p. 1 SSB
5132

_1 or her name and individual telephone number removed from
the

_2 telephone lists used by the commercial telephone
solicitor:

_3 (a) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not
make any

_4 additional commercial telephone solicitation of the
called party

_5 at that telephone number within a period of at least one
year; and

_6 (b) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not
sell or give

_7 the called party's name and telephone number to another
commercial

_8 telephone solicitor: PROVIDED, That the commercial
telephone

_9 solicitor may return the list, including the called
party's name

10 and telephone number, to the company or organization
from which it

11 received the list.

12 (3) The utilities and transportation commission
shall by rule

13 ensure that telecommunications companies inform their
residential

14 customers of the provisions of this section and
section 2 of this

15 act. The notification may be made by:

16 (a) Annual inserts in the billing statements mailed
to

17 residential customers; or

18 (b) Conspicuous publication of the notice in the
consumer

19 information pages of local telephone directories.

20 (4) If a sale or an agreement to purchase is
completed, the

21 commercial telephone solicitor must inform the purchaser
of his or

22 her cancellation rights as enunciated in this chapter,
state the

23 registration number issued by the department of
licensing, and

24 give the street address of the seller.

25 (5) If, at any time prior to sale or agreement to
purchase, the

26 commercial telephone solicitor's registration number is
requested

27 by the purchaser, it must be provided.

28 (6) All oral disclosures required by this section
shall be made

29 in a clear and intelligible manner.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 19.158

31 RCW to read as follows:

32 (1)(a) The department of licensing shall provide for
the

33 establishment and operation of a list of telephone
numbers of

34 persons who object to receiving commercial telephone

35 solicitations. The list shall be called the do not call
list. The

36 department shall update the list quarterly, and shall
provide the

SSB 5132 p. 2

_1 list, in written or electronic form, to commercial
telephone

_2 solicitors.

_3 (b) No fee may be charged to a person for placing a
telephone

_4 number on the list. No fee may be charged to a person
to inspect or

_5 obtain the list.

_6 (c) The department of licensing shall establish an
annual fee,

_7 charged under this section, to maintain the do not call
list in

_8 this subsection (1). The fee shall be sufficient to
support the

_9 costs of administering and enforcing this section.
Commercial

10 telephone solicitors subject to regulation under this
chapter

11 shall pay the annual maintenance fee before doing
business in this

12 state.

13 (d) Persons wishing to have their phone numbers
placed on the

14 list must notify the department of licensing. A listing
shall be

15 effective for two years, after which the person may
renew the

16 listing for successive two-year periods by notifying the

17 department of licensing. The department of licensing
shall

18 determine the notification requirements.

19 (e) All fees collected by the department of
licensing under

20 this section, and civil penalties and attorneys' fees
collected by

21 the attorney general in enforcing this section, shall be
deposited

22 in the commercial telephone solicitation account created
in

23 section 3 of this act, and used solely for the
administration of

24 this section.

25 (2) No commercial telephone solicitor may make a
commercial

26 telephone solicitation to any telephone number more than
sixty

27 days after the number appears on the current do not call
list.

28 (3) The legislature finds that the practices covered
by this

29 section are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the

30 purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86

31 RCW. A violation of this section is not reasonable in
relation to

32 the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or

33 deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method
of

34 competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection

35 act, chapter 19.86 RCW. In addition to any other
penalties or

36 remedies available under this chapter or chapter 19.86
RCW, a

37 person injured by a violation of subsection (2) of this
section

p. 3 SSB
5132

_1 may bring an action for recovery of liquidated damages
in the

_2 amount of one thousand dollars per violation, plus court
costs and

_3 attorneys' fees.

_4 (4) The director of the department of licensing may
make rules,

_5 create forms, and issue orders as necessary to carry out
the

_6 provisions of this section.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 19.158

_8 RCW to read as follows:

_9 The commercial telephone solicitation account is
created in the

10 custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received by
the

11 department under section 2 of this act and civil
penalties and

12 attorneys' fees collected by the attorney general in
enforcing

13 section 2 of this act shall be deposited in the
commercial

14 telephone solicitation account and used solely for the

15 administration of section 2 of this act. Only the
director of the

16 department of licensing or the director's designee may
authorize

17 expenditures from the account. The account is subject
to allotment

18 procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is

19 required for expenditures.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5132 p. 4