BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.06.020 and 1996 c
301 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a transaction
for the sale of residential real property, the seller shall, unless the buyer
has expressly waived the right to receive the disclosure statement, or unless
the transfer is exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer a completed real
property transfer disclosure statement in the following format and that
contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER

Please complete the
following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If the question clearly does
not apply to the property write "NA". If the answer is
"yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets. Please
refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide your
explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each page of this
disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the disclosure statement
must occur not later than five business days, unless otherwise agreed, after
mutual acceptance of a written contract to purchase between a buyer and a
seller.

NOTICE
TO THE BUYER

THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES
ARE MADE BY THE SELLER(S), CONCERNING THE CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED AT.............................

("THE PROPERTY"),
OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN
THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE BASIS OF SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE
OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME THIS DISCLOSURE FORM IS COMPLETED BY THE SELLER.
YOU HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S
DELIVERY OF THIS SELLER'S DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO RESCIND YOUR AGREEMENT BY
DELIVERING YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO THE SELLER,
UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS RIGHT AT OR PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO A SALE AGREEMENT. THE
FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY THE SELLER AND ARE NOT THE REPRESENTATIONS OF
ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE
ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE
BUYER AND THE SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE
EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO
OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF A QUALIFIED SPECIALIST TO INSPECT THE
PROPERTY ON YOUR BEHALF, FOR EXAMPLE, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS,
PLUMBERS, ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, OR PEST AND DRY ROT
INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER AND THE OWNER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN
PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS OF THE PROPERTY AND TO PROVIDE FOR
APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE,
INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR WARRANTIES.

Seller
. . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the
property.

I. SELLER'S
DISCLOSURES:

*If "Yes" attach
a copy or explain. If necessary use an attached sheet.

1.
TITLE

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowA. Do you have legal authority to sell the
property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*B. Is title to the property subject to any of the
following?

(1)
First right of refusal

(2)
Option

(3)
Lease or rental agreement

(4)
Life estate?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*C. Are there any encroachments, boundary
agreements, or boundary disputes?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*D. Are there any rights of way, easements, or
access limitations that may affect the owner's use of the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*E. Are there any written agreements for joint
maintenance of an easement or right of way?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*F. Is there any study, survey project, or notice
that would adversely affect the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*G. Are there any pending or existing assessments
against the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*H. Are there any zoning violations, nonconforming
uses, or any unusual restrictions on the subject property that would affect
future construction or remodeling?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*I. Is there a boundary survey for the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*J. Are there any covenants, conditions, or
restrictions which affect the property?

2.
WATER

A.
Household Water

(1)
The source of the water is [ ]Public [ ]Community [ ]Private
[ ]Shared

(2)
Water source information:

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *a. Are there any written agreements
for shared water source?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *b. Is there an easement (recorded or
unrecorded) for access to and/or maintenance of the water source?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *c. Are any known problems or repairs
needed?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *d. Does the source provide an
adequate year round supply of potable water?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3) Are there any water treatment systems for
the property? [ ]Leased [ ]Owned

B.
Irrigation

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know (1) Are there any water rights for the
property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(2) If they exist, to your knowledge, have
the water rights been used during the last five-year period?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3) If so, is the certificate available?

C.
Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler system for
the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(2) Are there any defects in the outdoor
sprinkler system?

3.
SEWER/SEPTIC SYSTEM

A.
The property is served by: [ ]Public sewer main, [ ]Septic tank
system [ ]Other disposal system (describe)

...................................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't knowB. If the property is served by a public or
community sewer main, is the house connected to the main?

C.
Is the property currently subject to a sewer capacity charge?

D.
If the property is connected to a septic system:

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know (1) Was a permit issued for its construction,
and was it approved by the city or county following its construction?

(2)
When was it last pumped:

...................... ,
19. . .

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3) Are there any defects in the operation of
the septic system?

[ ]Don't know (4) When was it last inspected?

...................... ,
19. . .

By
Whom: ......................

[ ]Don't know (5) How many bedrooms was the system approved for?

....................... bedrooms

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *E. Do all plumbing fixtures, including
laundry drain, go to the septic/sewer system? If no, explain: ......

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. Are you aware of any changes or repairs to
the septic system?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know G. Is the septic tank system, including the
drainfield, located entirely within the boundaries of the property?

4.
STRUCTURAL

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *A. Has the roof leaked?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know If yes, has it been repaired?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *B. Have there been any conversions,
additions, or remodeling?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *1. If yes, were all building permits
obtained?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *2. If yes, were all final inspections
obtained?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know C. Do you know the age of the house? If yes,
year of original construction:

...............................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *D. Do you know of any settling, slippage, or
sliding of either the house or other structures/improvements located on the
property? If yes, explain:

...............................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *E. Do you know of any defects with the
following: (Please check applicable items)

G Foundations G Decks G Exterior Walls

G Chimneys G Interior Walls G Fire Alarm

G Doors G Windows G Patio

G Ceilings G Slab Floors G Driveways

G Pools G Hot Tub G Sauna

G Sidewalks G Outbuildings G Fireplaces

G Garage Floors G Walkways

G Other G Wood Stoves

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. Was a pest or dry rot, structural or
"whole house" inspection done? When and by whom was the inspection
completed?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *G. Since assuming ownership, has your
property had a problem with wood destroying organisms and/or have there been
any problems with pest control, infestations, or vermin?

5.
SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

If
the following systems or fixtures are included with the transfer, do they have
any existing defects:

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *A. Electrical system, including wiring,
switches, outlets, and service

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *B. Plumbing system, including pipes, faucets,
fixtures, and toilets

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *C. Hot water tank

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *D. Garbage disposal

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *E. Appliances

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. Sump pump

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *G. Heating and cooling systems

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *H. Security system [ ] Owned [ ]
Leased

*I.
Other......................

6.
COMMON INTEREST

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know A. Is there a Home Owners' Association? Name
of Association ................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know B. Are there regular periodic assessments:

$. . .
per [ ] Month [ ] Year

[ ]
Other......................

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *C. Are there any pending special assessments?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *D. Are there any shared "common
areas" or any joint maintenance agreements (facilities such as walls,
fences, landscaping, pools, tennis courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned in
undivided interest with others)?

7.
GENERAL

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *A. Is there any settling, soil, standing
water, or drainage problems on the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *B. Does the property contain fill material?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *C. Is there any material damage to the
property or any of the structure from fire, wind, floods, beach movements,
earthquake, expansive soils, or landslides?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know D. Is the property in a designated flood
plain?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *E. Are there any substances, materials, or
products that may be an environmental hazard such as, but not limited to,
asbestos, formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based paint, fuel or chemical storage
tanks, and contaminated soil or water on the subject property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. Are there any tanks or underground storage
tanks (e.g., chemical, fuel, etc.) on the property?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *G. Has the property ever been used as an
illegal drug manufacturing site?

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know *H.
If the residence has a basement, has there ever been water infiltration through
the walls or floor?

If
yes, has it been repaired?

8.
FULL DISCLOSURE BY SELLERS

A.
Other conditions or defects:

[ ]Yes
[ ]No [ ]Don't know*Are there any other material defects affecting
this property or its value that a prospective buyer should know about?

B.
Verification:

The
foregoing answers and attached explanations (if any) are complete and correct
to the best of my/our knowledge and I/we have received a copy hereof. I/we
authorize all of my/our real estate licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . SELLER...............

II. BUYER'S
ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A.As
buyer(s), I/we acknowledge the duty to pay diligent attention to any material
defects which are known to me/us or can be known to me/us by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B.Each
buyer acknowledges and understands that the disclosures set forth in this
statement and in any amendments to this statement are made only by the seller.

C.Buyer
(which term includes all persons signing the "buyer's acceptance"
portion of this disclosure statement below) hereby acknowledges receipt of a
copy of this disclosure statement (including attachments, if any) bearing
seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN
THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE BASIS OF SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE
OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME OF DISCLOSURE. YOU, THE BUYER, HAVE THREE BUSINESS
DAYS, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS SELLER'S
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO RESCIND YOUR AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING YOUR SEPARATE
SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO THE SELLER UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS
RIGHT OF RESCISSION.

BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS REAL PROPERTY TRANSFER DISCLOSURE STATEMENT AND
ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND
NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.

DATE
. . . . . . . BUYER
. . . . . . . . . BUYER.................

(2) The
real property transfer disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only, and
shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the buyer and
seller of residential real property. The real property transfer disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any real
estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be construed as a
warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate licensee involved in the
transaction.

--- END ---