BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.20.030 and 1999 c
359 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter:

(1)
"Abandoned" as it relates to a mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model owned by a tenant in a mobile home park, mobile home park
cooperative, or mobile home park subdivision or tenancy in a mobile home lot
means the tenant has defaulted in rent and by absence and by words or actions
reasonably indicates the intention not to continue tenancy;

(2) "Landlord"
means the owner of a mobile home park and includes the agents of a landlord;

(3) "Manufactured
home" means a single-family dwelling built according to the United States
department of housing and urban development manufactured home construction and
safety standards act, which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured
home also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical
systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be transported in one
or more sections with each section at least eight feet wide and forty feet long
when transported, or when installed on the site is three hundred twenty square
feet or greater;

(4) "Mobile
home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to June 15, 1976, to
standards other than the United States department of housing and urban
development code, and acceptable under applicable state codes in effect at the
time of construction or introduction of the home into the state. Mobile homes
have not been built since the introduction of the United States department of
housing and urban development manufactured home construction and safety act;

(5) "Mobile home
lot" means a portion of a mobile home park or manufactured housing
community designated as the location of one mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model and its accessory buildings, and intended for the exclusive use as a
primary residence by the occupants of that mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model;

(6) "Mobile home
park" or "manufactured housing community" means any real
property which is rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of
two or more mobile homes(([,])), manufactured homes, or park
models for the primary purpose of production of income, except where such real
property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only
and is not intended for year-round occupancy;

(7) "Mobile home
park cooperative" or "manufactured housing cooperative" means
real property consisting of common areas and two or more lots held out for
placement of mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models in which both the
individual lots and the common areas are owned by an association of
shareholders which leases or otherwise extends the right to occupy individual
lots to its own members;

(8) "Mobile home
park subdivision" or "manufactured housing subdivision" means
real property, whether it is called a subdivision, condominium, or planned unit
development, consisting of common areas and two or more lots held for placement
of mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models in which there is private
ownership of the individual lots and common, undivided ownership of the common
areas by owners of the individual lots;

(9) "Park
model" means a recreational vehicle ((intended for permanent or
semi-permanent installation and habitation)) that is permanently or
semipermanently installed and used as a residence;

(10) "Recreational
vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home, truck camper, or camping
trailer that is primarily designed and used as temporary living quarters, is
either self-propelled or mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, is transient,
is not occupied as a primary residence, and is not immobilized or permanently
affixed to a mobile home lot;

(11) "Tenant"
means any person, except a transient, who rents a mobile home lot;

(12)
"Transient" means a person who rents a mobile home lot for a period
of less than one month for purposes other than as a primary residence;

(13)
"Occupant" means any person, including a live-in care provider, other
than a tenant, who occupies a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and
mobile home lot.

Sec. 2. RCW 59.20.070 and 1999 c
359 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A landlord shall not:

(1) Deny any tenant the
right to sell such tenant's mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
within a park or require the removal of the mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model from the park because of the sale thereof. Requirements for the
transfer of the rental agreement are in RCW 59.20.073;

(2) Restrict the
tenant's freedom of choice in purchasing goods or services but may reserve the
right to approve or disapprove any exterior structural improvements on a mobile
home space: PROVIDED, That door-to-door solicitation in the mobile home park
may be restricted in the rental agreement. Door-to-door solicitation does not
include public officials or candidates for public office meeting or
distributing information to tenants in accordance with subsection (4) of this
section;

(3) Prohibit meetings
by tenants of the mobile home park to discuss mobile home living and affairs,
including political caucuses or forums for or speeches of public officials or
candidates for public office, or meetings of organizations that represent the
interest of tenants in the park, held in any of the park community or recreation
halls if these halls are open for the use of the tenants, conducted at
reasonable times and in an orderly manner on the premises, nor penalize any
tenant for participation in such activities;

(4) Prohibit a public
official or candidate for public office from meeting with or distributing
information to tenants in their individual mobile homes, manufactured homes, or
park models, nor penalize any tenant for participating in these meetings or
receiving this information;

(5) Evict a tenant,
terminate a rental agreement, decline to renew a rental agreement, increase
rental or other tenant obligations, decrease services, or modify park rules in
retaliation for any of the following actions on the part of a tenant taken in
good faith:

(a) Filing a complaint
with any state, county, or municipal governmental authority relating to any
alleged violation by the landlord of an applicable statute, regulation, or
ordinance;

(b) Requesting the
landlord to comply with the provision of this chapter or other applicable statute,
regulation, or ordinance of the state, county, or municipality;

(c) Filing suit against
the landlord for any reason;

(d) Participation or
membership in any homeowners association or group;

(6) Charge to any
tenant a utility fee in excess of actual utility costs or intentionally cause
termination or interruption of any tenant's utility services, including water,
heat, electricity, or gas, except when an interruption of a reasonable duration
is required to make necessary repairs;

(7) Remove or exclude a
tenant from the premises unless this chapter is complied with or the exclusion
or removal is under an appropriate court order; or

(8)
Prevent the entry or require the removal of a mobile home, manufactured home,
or park model for the sole reason that the mobile home has reached a certain
age. Nothing in this subsection shall limit a landlords' right to exclude or
expel a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model for any other reason,
including but not limited to, ((fire and safety concerns provided such))
failure to comply with fire, safety, and other provisions of local
ordinances and state laws relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes, and
park models, as long as the action conforms to this chapter ((59.20
RCW)) or any other relevant statutory provision.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.20.073 and 1999 c
359 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any rental
agreement shall be assignable by the tenant to any person to whom he or she
sells or transfers title to the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model.

(2) A tenant who sells
a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model within a park shall notify the
landlord in writing of the date of the intended sale and transfer of the rental
agreement at least fifteen days in advance of such intended transfer and shall
notify the buyer in writing of the provisions of this section. The tenant
shall verify in writing to the landlord payment of all taxes, rent, and
reasonable expenses due on the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
and mobile home lot.

(3) The landlord shall
notify the selling tenant, in writing, of a refusal to permit transfer of the
rental agreement at least seven days in advance of such intended transfer.

(4) The landlord may
require the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model to meet applicable
fire and safety standards, if prior to the tenant's written notification of
intent to transfer the rental agreement pursuant to RCW 59.20.073(2), a state
or local agency responsible for the enforcement of fire and safety standards
has issued a notice of violation of those standards to the tenant and those
violations remain uncorrected. Upon correction of the violation to the
satisfaction of the state or local agency responsible for the enforcement of
that notice of violation, the landlord's refusal to permit the transfer is
deemed withdrawn.

(5) The landlord shall
approve or disapprove of the assignment of a rental agreement on the same basis
that the landlord approves or disapproves of any new tenant, and any
disapproval shall be in writing. Consent to an assignment shall not be
unreasonably withheld.

(6)
Failure to notify the landlord in writing, as required under subsection (2) of
this section; or failure of the new tenant to make a good faith attempt to
arrange an interview with the landlord to discuss assignment of the rental
agreement; or failure of the current or new tenant to obtain written approval
of the landlord for assignment of the rental agreement, shall be grounds for
disapproval of such transfer.

Sec. 4. RCW 59.20.080 and 1999 c
359 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A landlord shall
not terminate or fail to renew a tenancy of a tenant or the occupancy of an
occupant, of whatever duration except for one or more of the following reasons:

(a) Substantial
violation, or repeated or periodic violations of the rules of the mobile home
park as established by the landlord at the inception of the tenancy or as
assumed subsequently with the consent of the tenant or for violation of the
tenant's duties as provided in RCW 59.20.140. The tenant shall be given
written notice to cease the rule violation immediately. The notice shall state
that failure to cease the violation of the rule or any subsequent violation of
that or any other rule shall result in termination of the tenancy, and that the
tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen days: PROVIDED, That for a
periodic violation the notice shall also specify that repetition of the same
violation shall result in termination: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the case of a
violation of a "material change" in park rules with respect to pets,
tenants with minor children living with them, or recreational facilities, the
tenant shall be given written notice under this chapter of a six month period
in which to comply or vacate;

(b) Nonpayment of rent
or other charges specified in the rental agreement, upon five days written
notice to pay rent and/or other charges or to vacate;

(c) Conviction of the
tenant of a crime, commission of which threatens the health, safety, or welfare
of the other mobile home park tenants. The tenant shall be given written notice
of a fifteen day period in which to vacate;

(d) Failure of the
tenant to comply with local ordinances and state laws and regulations relating
to mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models or mobile home,
manufactured homes, or park model living within a reasonable time after the
tenant's receipt of notice of such noncompliance from the appropriate
governmental agency;

(e) Change of land use
of the mobile home park including, but not limited to, conversion to a use
other than for mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models or conversion
of the mobile home park to a mobile home park cooperative or mobile home park subdivision:
PROVIDED, That the landlord shall give the tenants twelve months' notice in
advance of the effective date of such change, except that for the period of six
months following April 28, 1989, the landlord shall give the tenants eighteen
months' notice in advance of the proposed effective date of such change;

(f) Engaging in
"criminal activity." "Criminal activity" means a criminal
act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health, safety, or
welfare of the tenants. A park owner seeking to evict a tenant or occupant
under this subsection need not produce evidence of a criminal conviction, even
if the alleged misconduct constitutes a criminal offense. Notice from a law
enforcement agency of criminal activity constitutes sufficient grounds, but not
the only grounds, for an eviction under this subsection. Notification of the
seizure of illegal drugs under RCW 59.20.155 is evidence of criminal activity
and is grounds for an eviction under this subsection. The requirement that any
tenant or occupant register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 is grounds
for eviction under this subsection. If criminal activity is alleged to be a
basis of termination, the park owner may proceed directly to an unlawful
detainer action;

(g) The tenant's application
for tenancy contained a material misstatement that induced the park owner to
approve the tenant as a resident of the park, and the park owner discovers and
acts upon the misstatement within one year of the time the resident began
paying rent;

(h) If the landlord
serves a tenant three fifteen-day notices within a twelve-month period to
comply or vacate for failure to comply with the material terms of the rental
agreement or park rules. The applicable twelve-month period shall commence on
the date of the first violation;

(i) Failure of the
tenant to comply with obligations imposed upon tenants by applicable provisions
of municipal, county, and state codes, statutes, ordinances, and regulations,
including this chapter ((59.20 RCW)). The landlord shall give
the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice must state that
failure to comply will result in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant
shall vacate the premises within fifteen days;

(j) The tenant engages
in disorderly or substantially annoying conduct upon the park premises that
results in the destruction of the rights of others to the peaceful enjoyment
and use of the premises. The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to
comply immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply will result
in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises
within fifteen days;

(k) The tenant creates
a nuisance that materially affects the health, safety, and welfare of other
park residents. The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to cease the
conduct that constitutes a nuisance immediately. The notice must state that
failure to cease the conduct will result in termination of the tenancy and that
the tenant shall vacate the premises in five days;

(l) Any other
substantial just cause that materially affects the health, safety, and welfare
of other park residents. The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to
comply immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply will result
in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises
within fifteen days; or

(m) Failure to pay rent
by the due date provided for in the rental agreement three or more times in a
twelve-month period, commencing with the date of the first violation, after
service of a five-day notice to comply or vacate.

(2) Within five days of
a notice of eviction as required by subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
landlord and tenant shall submit any dispute to mediation. The parties may agree
in writing to mediation by an independent third party or through industry
mediation procedures. If the parties cannot agree, then mediation shall be
through industry mediation procedures. A duty is imposed upon both parties to
participate in the mediation process in good faith for a period of ten days for
an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this section. It is a defense to an
eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this section that a landlord did not
participate in the mediation process in good faith.

(3)
Chapters 59.12 and 59.18 RCW govern the eviction of recreational vehicles,
as defined in RCW 59.20.030, from mobile home parks. This chapter
governs the eviction of mobile homes, manufactured homes, park models, and
recreational vehicles used as a residence from a mobile home park.

---
END ---