BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The initiative review
commission is

_5 established, consisting of three members appointed by the
governor

_6 and confirmed by the senate. Two members must be retired
judges of

_7 a court of record. No person may serve on the commission
if, within

_8 the year before appointment, he or she has been an elected
state

_9 or local official or a registered lobbyist. Appointments
must be

10 made before March 1st of each odd-numbered year and will
be for

11 terms of two years. The governor shall fill vacancies by

12 appointment. The commission shall select a chair from
among its

13 members.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Within forty-five days
after the date of

15 certification of sufficiency under RCW 29.79.230 or the

16 certification of a rejected initiative to the legislature
under

17 RCW 29.79.270, the commission shall conduct an analysis to

p. 1 SB
5136

_1 determine if, as a matter of settled law, there is a
significant

_2 likelihood the measure may be contrary to the state
Constitution

_3 or the Constitution or laws of the United States. The
commission

_4 may adopt procedures it deems appropriate to obtain
submissions

_5 from interested parties on the issues raised by the
measures.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If a majority of the
commission finds

_7 that, as a matter of settled law, there is a significant

_8 likelihood the measure may be contrary to the state
Constitution

_9 or the Constitution or laws of the United States it shall
prepare

10 a statement for inclusion in the voters' pamphlet that
lists the

11 potential challenges. The statement will appear adjacent
to the

12 ballot measure summary prepared by the attorney general
and must

13 be clearly identified as the statement of the initiative
review

14 commission. The statement must include a statement that
the

15 commission's findings are preliminary and not binding on
any party

16 or court.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The legislature shall
appropriate funds to

18 enable the commission to carry out its duties. Members
will receive

19 one hundred dollars of compensation for each day spent in
the

20 performance of their duties. RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060
apply to

21 the members of the commission and counsel or staff
retained by the

22 commission.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The commission may
retain such legal

24 counsel and administrative staff as necessary to perform
its

25 duties. The commission shall determine the compensation
for counsel

26 and administrative staff.

27 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act are added

28 to chapter 29.79 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5136 p. 2