BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 43.185A

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) To the extent that funds are available, the
department

_7 shall establish a low-income home ownership loan program
for

_8 families: (a) For which one or more members have received
services

_9 authorized under chapter 74.12 RCW, temporary assistance
for needy

10 families; (b) whose adjusted income is less than two
hundred

11 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and (c) that
include

12 one or more children under eighteen years of age. The
department

13 will capitalize revolving loan funds through grants to
eligible

14 public and nonprofit organizations which demonstrate
capacity to

15 administer a low-income home ownership loan program.
The

16 organizations will be responsible for lending funds to
families,

17 collecting repayments, and depositing repayments into
the

18 revolving fund. These repayments will be used to assist
additional

p. 1 SSB
5137

_1 families. The organizations shall make loans without
interest or at

_2 a rate that is below the market interest rate. The
loans shall be

_3 awarded on the basis of the family's need, the family's
ability to

_4 repay the loan, and the willingness of the family to
meet minimum

_5 requirements to participate in the construction of their
home or

_6 the homes of other participating families. The
department shall

_7 seek to achieve a geographic distribution of loans that
is

_8 proportional to the state's distribution of eligible families.

_9 (2) The department may contract with public and
nonprofit

10 organizations for the administration of the low-income
home

11 ownership loan program and supervision of the minimum

12 participation requirements.

13 (3) The department shall adopt rules providing for
the

14 administration of the low-income home ownership loan
program,

15 including eligibility, application, and repayment
provisions and

16 establishing minimum requirements for participation in
the home

17 construction.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 43.185A

19 RCW to read as follows:

20 The low-income home ownership loan account is
created in the

21 custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the
account may

22 be used only for the purposes of the low-income home
ownership

23 loan program established under section 1 of this act.
Only the

24 director of community, trade, and economic development
or the

25 director's designee may authorize expenditures from the

26 account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under

27 chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required
for

28 expenditures.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5137 p. 2