BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.105 and 1999 c
23 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Violation of any of
the provisions of this chapter is a traffic infraction, and upon the first
finding thereof shall be assessed a basic penalty of not less than fifty
dollars; and upon a second finding thereof shall be assessed a basic penalty of
not less than seventy-five dollars; and upon a third or subsequent finding
shall be assessed a basic penalty of not less than one hundred dollars.

(2) In addition to the
penalties imposed in subsection (1) of this section, any person violating RCW
46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 shall be
assessed a penalty for each pound overweight, as follows:

(a) One pound through
four thousand pounds overweight is three cents for each pound;

(b) Four thousand one
pounds through ten thousand pounds overweight is one hundred twenty dollars
plus twelve cents per pound for each additional pound over four thousand pounds
overweight;

(c) Ten thousand one
pounds through fifteen thousand pounds overweight is eight hundred forty
dollars plus sixteen cents per pound for each additional pound over ten
thousand pounds overweight;

(d) Fifteen thousand
one pounds through twenty thousand pounds overweight is one thousand six
hundred forty dollars plus twenty cents per pound for each additional pound
over fifteen thousand pounds overweight;

(e) Twenty thousand one
pounds and more is two thousand six hundred forty dollars plus thirty cents per
pound for each additional pound over twenty thousand pounds overweight.

Upon a first violation
in any calendar year, the court may suspend the penalty for five hundred pounds
of excess weight for each axle on any vehicle or combination of vehicles, not
to exceed a two thousand pound suspension. In no case may the basic penalty
assessed in subsection (1) of this section or the additional penalty assessed
in subsection (2) of this section, except as provided for the first violation,
be suspended.

(3) Whenever any vehicle
or combination of vehicles is involved in two violations of RCW 46.44.041,
46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 during any
twelve-month period, the court may suspend the certificate of license
registration of the vehicle or combination of vehicles for not less than thirty
days. Upon a third or succeeding violation in any twelve-month period, the
court shall suspend the certificate of license registration for not less than
thirty days. Whenever the certificate of license registration is suspended,
the court shall secure such certificate and immediately forward the same to the
director with information concerning the suspension.

(4) Any person found to
have violated any posted limitations of a highway or section of highway shall
be assessed a monetary penalty of not less than one hundred and fifty dollars,
and the court shall in addition thereto upon second violation within a
twelve-month period involving the same power unit, suspend the certificate of
license registration for not less than thirty days.

(5) It is unlawful for
the driver of a vehicle to fail or refuse to stop and submit the vehicle and
load to a weighing, or to fail or refuse, when directed by an officer upon a
weighing of the vehicle to stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the
provisions of this section. It is unlawful for a driver of a commercial motor
vehicle as defined in RCW 46.32.005, other than the driver of a bus as defined
in RCW 46.32.005(2) or a vehicle with a gross vehicle or combination weight not
over ((sixteen)) twenty-six thousand pounds and not transporting
hazardous materials in accordance with RCW 46.32.005(3), to fail or refuse to
stop at a weighing station when proper traffic control signs indicate scales
are open.

Any police officer is
authorized to require the driver of any vehicle or combination of vehicles to
stop and submit to a weighing either by means of a portable or stationary scale
and may require that the vehicle be driven to the nearest public scale.
Whenever a police officer, upon weighing a vehicle and load, determines that
the weight is unlawful, the officer may require the driver to stop the vehicle
in a suitable location and remain standing until such portion of the load is
removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross weight of the vehicle to the
limit permitted by law. If the vehicle is loaded with grain or other
perishable commodities, the driver shall be permitted to proceed without
removing any of the load, unless the gross weight of the vehicle and load
exceeds by more than ten percent the limit permitted by this chapter. The
owner or operator of the vehicle shall care for all materials unloaded at the
risk of the owner or operator.

Any vehicle whose
driver or owner represents that the vehicle is disabled or otherwise unable to
proceed to a weighing location shall have its load sealed or otherwise marked
by any police officer. The owner or driver shall be directed that upon
completion of repairs, the vehicle shall submit to weighing with the load and
markings and/or seal intact and undisturbed. Failure to report for weighing,
appearing for weighing with the seal broken or the markings disturbed, or
removal of any cargo prior to weighing is unlawful. Any person so convicted
shall be fined one thousand dollars, and in addition the certificate of license
registration shall be suspended for not less than thirty days.

(6) Any other provision
of law to the contrary notwithstanding, district courts having venue have
concurrent jurisdiction with the superior courts for the imposition of any
penalties authorized under this section.

(7) For the purpose of
determining additional penalties as provided by subsection (2) of this section,
"overweight" means the poundage in excess of the maximum allowable
gross weight or axle/axle grouping weight prescribed by RCW 46.44.041,
46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.091, and 46.44.095.

(8) The penalties
provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be remitted as
provided in chapter 3.62 RCW or RCW 10.82.070. For the purpose of computing
the basic penalties and additional penalties to be imposed under subsections
(1) and (2) of this section, the convictions shall be on the same vehicle or
combination of vehicles within a twelve-month period under the same ownership.

(9) Any state patrol
officer or any weight control officer who finds any person operating a vehicle
or a combination of vehicles in violation of the conditions of a permit issued
under RCW 46.44.047, 46.44.090, and 46.44.095 may confiscate the permit and
forward it to the state department of transportation which may return it to the
permittee or revoke, cancel, or suspend it without refund. The department of
transportation shall keep a record of all action taken upon permits so
confiscated, and if a permit is returned to the permittee the action taken by
the department of transportation shall be endorsed thereon. Any permittee
whose permit is suspended or revoked may upon request receive a hearing before
the department of transportation or person designated by that department.
After the hearing the department of transportation may reinstate any permit or
revise its previous action.

Every permit issued as
provided for in this chapter shall be carried in the vehicle or combination of
vehicles to which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any law
enforcement officer or authorized agent of any authority granting such a
permit.

Upon the third finding
within a calendar year of a violation of the requirements and conditions of a
permit issued under RCW 46.44.095, the permit shall be canceled, and the
canceled permit shall be immediately transmitted by the court or the arresting
officer to the department of transportation. The vehicle covered by the
canceled permit is not eligible for a new permit for a period of thirty days.

(10) For the purposes
of determining gross weights the actual scale weight taken by the arresting
officer is prima facie evidence of the total gross weight.

(11) It is a traffic
infraction to direct the loading of a vehicle with knowledge that it violates
the requirements in RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091,
or 46.44.095 and that it is to be operated on the public highways of this
state.

(12) The
chief of the state patrol, with the advice of the department, may adopt
reasonable rules to aid in the enforcement of this section.

--- END ---