BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.0941 and 1995
c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following fees, in
addition to the regular license and tonnage fees, shall be paid for all
movements under special permit made upon state highways. All funds collected,
except the amount retained by authorized agents of the department as provided
in RCW 46.44.096, shall be forwarded to the state treasury and shall be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund:

All overlegal
loads, except overweight, single

trip................................................. $
10.00

Continuous operation of
overlegal loads

having either overwidth
or overheight

features only, for a
period not to exceed

thirty days.......................................... $
20.00

Continuous operations of
overlegal loads

having overlength
features only, for a

period not to exceed
thirty days..................... $ 10.00

Continuous operation of a
combination of

vehicles having one
trailing unit that

exceeds fifty-three
feet and is not

more than fifty-six
feet in length, for

a period of one year................................. $
100.00

Continuous operation of a
combination of

vehicles having two
trailing units

which together exceed
sixty-one feet and

are not more than
sixty-eight feet in

length, for a period of
one year..................... $ 100.00

Continuous operation of a
three-axle fixed

load vehicle having
less than 65,000

pounds gross weight,
for a period not

to exceed thirty days................................ $
70.00

Continuous operation of a
four-axle fixed load

vehicle meeting the
requirements of

RCW 46.44.091(1) and
weighing less than

86,000 pounds gross
weight, not to exceed

thirty days.......................................... $
90.00

Continuous movement of a
mobile home or manufactured

home having
nonreducible features not to

exceed eighty-five feet
in total length and

fourteen feet in width,
for a period of

one year............................................. $
150.00

Continuous operation of a
two or three-axle

collection truck,
actually engaged in the

collection of solid waste
or recyclables,

or both, under chapter
81.77 or 35.21 RCW

or by contract under
RCW 36.58.090, for

one year with an
additional six thousand

pounds more than the
weight authorized in

RCW 46.16.070 on the
rear axle of a two-axle

truck or eight thousand
pounds for the tandem

axles of a three-axle
truck. RCW 46.44.041

and 46.44.091
notwithstanding, the tire limits

specified in RCW
46.44.042 apply, but none of

the excess weight is
valid or may be permitted

on any part of the
federal interstate highway

system............................................... $
42.00

per
thousand pounds

Continuous operation for
thirty days of a two or

three-axle truck
hauling cereal grains, dry

peas, lentils, or
canola from the point of

loading in the field
where harvested, no more

than thirty-five
miles to the point of storage

or point of sale,
with an additional six thousand

pounds more than the
weight authorized

in RCW 46.16.070 on
the rear axle of

a two-axle truck or
eight thousand pounds for

the tandem axles of
a three-axle truck.

RCW 46.44.041 and
46.44.091 notwithstanding,

the tire limits
specified in RCW 46.44.042 apply,

but none of the
excess weight is valid or may

be permitted on any
part of the federal interstate

highway system....................................... $ 3.50

per
thousand pounds

The department may
issue any of the above-listed permits that involve height, length, or width for
an expanded period of consecutive months, not to exceed one year.

Continuous operation of
farm implements under a permit issued as authorized by RCW 46.44.140 by:

(1) Farmers in the course
of farming activities,

for any three-month
period........................... $ 10.00

(2) Farmers in the course
of farming activities,

for a period not to
exceed one year.................. $ 25.00

(3) Persons engaged in the
business of the

sale, repair, or maintenance
of such

farm implements, for
any three-month period.......... $ 25.00

(4) Persons engaged in the
business of the

sale, repair, or
maintenance of such

farm implements, for a
period not to

exceed one year...................................... $
100.00

Overweight
Fee Schedule

Excess weight over legal
capacity, Cost per mile.

as provided in RCW
46.44.041.

0........................................ -
9,999 pounds $ .07

10,000................................... -14,999
pounds $ .14

15,000................................... -19,999
pounds $ .21

20,000................................... -24,999
pounds $ .28

25,000................................... -29,999
pounds $ .35

30,000................................... -34,999
pounds $ .49

35,000................................... -39,999
pounds $ .63

40,000................................... -44,999
pounds $ .79

45,000................................... -49,999
pounds $ .93

50,000................................... -54,999
pounds $ 1.14

55,000................................... -59,999
pounds $ 1.35

60,000................................... -64,999
pounds $ 1.56

65,000................................... -69,999
pounds $ 1.77

70,000................................... -74,999
pounds $ 2.12

75,000................................... -79,999
pounds $ 2.47

80,000................................... -84,999
pounds $ 2.82

85,000................................... -89,999
pounds $ 3.17

90,000................................... -94,999
pounds $ 3.52

95,000................................... -99,999
pounds $ 3.87

100,000 pounds................................... $
4.25

The fee for weights in
excess of 100,000 pounds is $4.25 plus fifty cents for each 5,000 pound
increment or portion thereof exceeding 100,000 pounds.

PROVIDED: (a) The minimum
fee for any overweight permit shall be $14.00, (b) the fee for issuance of a duplicate
permit shall be $14.00, (c) when computing overweight fees prescribed in this
section or in RCW 46.44.095 that result in an amount less than even dollars the
fee shall be carried to the next full dollar if fifty cents or over and shall
be reduced to the next full dollar if forty-nine cents or under.

The fees
levied in this section and RCW 46.44.095 do not apply to vehicles owned and
operated by the state of Washington, a county within the state, a city or town
or metropolitan municipal corporation within the state, or the federal
government.

--- END ---