BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
28A.400.010 and 1990 c 33 s 376 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 In all districts the board of directors shall elect a

_7 superintendent who shall have such qualification as the
local

_8 school board alone shall determine. The superintendent
shall have

_9 supervision over the several departments of the schools
thereof

10 and carry out such other powers and duties as prescribed by
law.

11 Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.400.300(1), the
board

12 may contract with such superintendent for a term not to
exceed

13 three years when deemed in the best interest of the
district. The

14 right to renew a contract of employment with any school

15 superintendent shall rest solely with the discretion of the
school

16 board employing such school superintendent. If the
school board

17 offers a buyout to terminate a contract of employment
before the

18 term of the contract has run, the amount of the buyout
may not

p. 1 SB
5140

_1 exceed the value of one year of the contract.
Regarding such

_2 renewal of contracts of school superintendents the
provisions of

_3 RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.240, and 28A.645.010 shall be

_4 inapplicable.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5140 p. 2