BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.040 and 1998 c
194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The chief of the
Washington state patrol shall relieve from active duty Washington state patrol
officers who, while in the performance of their official duties, or while on
standby or available for duty, have been or hereafter may be injured or
incapacitated to such an extent as to be mentally or physically incapable of
active service: PROVIDED, That:

(a) Any officer
disabled while performing line duty who is found by the chief to be physically
incapacitated shall be placed on disability leave for a period not to exceed
six months from the date of injury or the date incapacitated. During this
period, the officer shall be entitled to all pay, benefits, insurance, leave,
and retirement contributions awarded to an officer on active status, less any
compensation received through the department of labor and industries. No such
disability leave shall be approved until an officer has been unavailable for
duty for more than forty consecutive work hours. Prior to the end of the
six-month period, the chief shall either place the officer on disability status
or return the officer to active status.

For the purposes of
this section, "line duty" is active service which encompasses the
traffic law enforcement duties and/or other law enforcement responsibilities of
the state patrol. These activities encompass all enforcement practices of the
laws, accident and criminal investigations, or actions requiring physical
exertion or exposure to hazardous elements.

The chief shall define
by rule the situations where a disability has occurred during line duty;

(b) Benefits under this
section for a disability that is incurred while in other employment will be
reduced by any amount the officer receives or is entitled to receive from
workers' compensation, social security, group insurance, other pension plan, or
any other similar source provided by another employer on account of the same
disability;

(c) An officer injured
while engaged in willfully tortious or criminal conduct shall not be entitled
to disability benefits under this section; and

(d) For members commissioned
prior to January 1, 2003, should a disability beneficiary whose disability
was not incurred in line of duty, prior to attaining age fifty, engage in a
gainful occupation, the chief shall reduce the amount of his retirement
allowance to an amount which when added to the compensation earned by him in
such occupation shall not exceed the basic salary currently being paid for the
rank the retired officer held at the time he was disabled. All such disability
beneficiaries under age fifty shall file with the chief every six months a
signed and sworn statement of earnings and any person who shall knowingly swear
falsely on such statement shall be subject to prosecution for perjury. Should
the earning capacity of such beneficiary be further altered, the chief may
further alter his disability retirement allowance as indicated above. The
failure of any officer to file the required statement of earnings shall be
cause for cancellation of retirement benefits.

(2) ((Officers))
(a) Members commissioned prior to January 1, 2003, on disability status
shall receive one-half of their compensation at the existing wage, during the
time the disability continues in effect, less any compensation received through
the department of labor and industries. They shall be subject to mental or
physical examination at any state institution or otherwise under the direction
of the chief of the patrol at any time during such relief from duty to
ascertain whether or not they are able to resume active duty.

(b) Members
commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, on disability status as a result of a
line duty disability shall receive a line duty disability allowance of one-half
of their compensation at the existing wage, during the time the disability
continues in effect, less any compensation received through the department of
labor and industries, and any retirement allowance under section 2 of this
act. They shall be subject to such comprehensive medical examinations as
required by the chief of the patrol at any time during such relief from duty.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by the chief
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for this
line duty disability allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A member of the
retirement system commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, who becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the
department upon recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive
an allowance under RCW 43.43.260. The member shall receive a monthly
disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 43.43.260 and shall have
this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of
years between age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-five or from
when the member could have attained twenty-five years of service, whichever is
less.

Any member who receives
an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to
comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If these
medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating
disability and the member is offered reemployment by the chief at a comparable
compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(2) If the recipient of
a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies before the total of the
retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the amount of the accumulated
contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the
member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization as the
recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
director, or if there is no designated person or persons still living at the
time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving spouse, or if there is no
designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a
surviving spouse, then to his or her legal representative.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.43.120 and 1999 c
74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in the
following sections, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the Washington state patrol retirement system.

(2) "Retirement
fund" means the Washington state patrol retirement fund.

(3) "State
treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4) "Member"
means any person included in the membership of the retirement fund.

(5)
"Employee" means any commissioned employee of the Washington state
patrol.

(6)(a)
"Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement system
after June 12, 1980, is a person who has passed the Washington state patrol's
entry-level oral, written, physical performance, and background examinations
and is, thereby, appointed by the chief as a candidate to be a commissioned
officer of the Washington state patrol.

(b) "Cadet,"
for a person who became a member of the retirement system before June 12, 1980,
is a trooper cadet, patrol cadet, or employee of like classification, employed
for the express purpose of receiving the on-the-job training required for
attendance at the state patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned
trooper. "Like classification" includes: Radio operators or
dispatchers; persons providing security for the governor or legislature;
patrolmen; drivers' license examiners; weighmasters; vehicle safety inspectors;
central wireless operators; and warehousemen.

(7)
"Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of retirement allowance or
any other benefit allowed by this chapter.

(8) "Regular
interest" means interest compounded annually at such rates as may be
determined by the director.

(9) "Retirement
board" means the board provided for in this chapter.

(10) "Insurance
commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of the state of Washington.

(11) "Lieutenant
governor" means the lieutenant governor of the state of Washington.

(12)
"Service" shall mean services rendered to the state of Washington or
any political subdivisions thereof for which compensation has been paid. Full
time employment for seventy or more hours in any given calendar month shall
constitute one month of service. An employee who is reinstated in accordance
with RCW 43.43.110 shall suffer no loss of service for the period reinstated
subject to the contribution requirements of this chapter. Only months of
service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or
other benefit provided for herein. Years of service shall be determined by
dividing the total number of months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a
year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation
of such retirement allowance or benefit.

(13) "Prior
service" shall mean all services rendered by a member to the state of
Washington, or any of its political subdivisions prior to August 1, 1947,
unless such service has been credited in another public retirement or pension
system operating in the state of Washington.

(14) "Current
service" shall mean all service as a member rendered on or after August 1,
1947.

(15)(a)
"Average final salary," for members commissioned prior to
January 1, 2003, shall mean the average monthly salary received by a member
during the member's last two years of service or any consecutive two-year
period of service, whichever is the greater, as an employee of the Washington
state patrol; or if the member has less than two years of service, then the
average monthly salary received by the member during the member's total years
of service.

(b) "Average
final salary," for members commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, shall
mean the average monthly salary received by a member for the highest
consecutive sixty service credit months; or if the member has less than sixty
months of service, then the average monthly salary received by the member
during the member's total months of service.

(16) "Actuarial
equivalent" shall mean a benefit of equal value when computed upon the
basis of such mortality table as may be adopted and such interest rate as may
be determined by the director.

(17) Unless the context
expressly indicates otherwise, words importing the masculine gender shall be
extended to include the feminine gender and words importing the feminine gender
shall be extended to include the masculine gender.

(18)
"Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.

(19)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(20) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(21)
"Contributions" means the deduction from the compensation of each
member in accordance with the contribution rates established under ((RCW
43.43.300)) chapter 41.45 RCW.

(22) "Annual
increase" means as of July 1, 1999, seventy-seven cents per month per year
of service which amount shall be increased each subsequent July 1st by three
percent, rounded to the nearest cent.

(23)(a)
"Salary," for members commissioned prior to July 1, 2001, shall
exclude any overtime earnings related to RCW 47.46.040, or any voluntary
overtime, earned on or after July 1, 2001.

(b)
"Salary," for members commissioned on or after July 1, 2001, shall
exclude any overtime earnings related to RCW 47.46.040 or any voluntary
overtime, lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated
vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, holiday pay, or any form of
severance pay.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.43.260 and 1994 c
197 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon retirement from
service as provided in RCW 43.43.250, a member shall be granted a retirement
allowance which shall consist of:

(1) A prior service
allowance which shall be equal to two percent of the member's average final
salary multiplied by the number of years of prior service rendered by the
member.

(2) A current service
allowance which shall be equal to two percent of the member's average final
salary multiplied by the number of years of service rendered while a member of
the retirement system.

(3)(a) Any
member commissioned prior to January 1, 2003, with twenty-five years
service in the Washington state patrol may have the member's service in the
armed forces credited as a member whether or not the individual left the employ
of the Washington state patrol to enter such armed forces: PROVIDED, That in
no instance shall military service in excess of five years be credited: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance, a member must restore all withdrawn
accumulated contributions, which restoration must be completed on the date of
the member's retirement, or as provided under RCW 43.43.130, whichever occurs
first: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not apply to any
individual, not a veteran within the meaning of RCW 41.06.150, as now or
hereafter amended: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in no instance shall military
service be credited to any member who is receiving full military retirement
benefits pursuant to Title 10 United States Code, as now or hereafter amended.

(b) A member who
leaves the Washington state patrol to enter the armed forces of the United
States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five
years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner
consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment
and reemployment rights act.

(i) The member
qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(A) Within ninety
days of the member's honorable discharge from the United States armed forces,
the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the United States armed forces; and

(B) The member makes
the employee contributions required under section 11 of this act and RCW
41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement,
whichever comes sooner; or

(C) Prior to
retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or
five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under
RCW 41.50.165(2).

(ii) Upon receipt of
member contributions under (b)(i)(B) of this subsection, the department shall
establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.45.060 for the period of military service,
plus interest as determined by the department.

(iii) The
contributions required under (b)(i)(B) of this subsection shall be based on the
compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be
estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member
in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(4) In no event shall
the total retirement benefits from subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this
section, of any member exceed seventy-five percent of the member's average
final salary.

(5) ((A yearly
increase in retirement allowance which shall amount to two percent of the
retirement allowance computed at the time of retirement. This yearly increase
shall be added to the retirement allowance on July 1st of each calendar year.))
Beginning July 1, 2001, and every year thereafter, the department shall
determine the following information for each retired member or beneficiary
whose retirement allowance has been in effect for at least one year:

(a) The original
dollar amount of the retirement allowance;

(b) The index for
the calendar year prior to the effective date of the retirement allowance, to
be known as "index A";

(c) The index for
the calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known as
"index B"; and

(d) The ratio
obtained when index B is divided by index A.

The value of the
ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original retirement
allowance and shall be applied beginning with the July payment. In no event,
however, shall the annual adjustment:

(i) Produce a
retirement allowance which is lower than the original retirement allowance;

(ii) Exceed three
percent in the initial annual adjustment; or

(iii) Differ from
the previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.

For the purposes of
this section, "index" means, for any calendar year, that year's
average consumer price index for the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton Washington area
for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau
of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

The provisions of this
section shall apply to all members presently retired and to all members who
shall retire in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A member commissioned
on or after January 1, 2003, upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW
43.43.250 or disability retirement under RCW 43.43.040, shall elect to have the
retirement allowance paid pursuant to the following options, calculated so as
to be actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout the member's life. However, if the retiree dies before the
total of the retirement allowance paid to the retiree equals the amount of the
retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the balance
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such designated
person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the
surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's
legal representative.

(b) The department
shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option that pays
the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such portion of the
member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule designates
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a designated person.
Such person shall be nominated by the member by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The options
adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and
one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty percent survivor
option.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and member's spouse do not give written
consent to an option under this section, the department will pay the member a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit and record the member's spouse as the
beneficiary. This benefit shall be calculated to be actuarially equivalent to
the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless
spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department shall
honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of this
section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3) No later than
January 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member
additional actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include,
but are not limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.43.270 and 1989 c
108 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For members
commissioned prior to January 1, 2003:

(1) The normal form of
retirement allowance shall be an allowance which shall continue as long as the
member lives.

(2) If a member should
die while in service the member's lawful spouse shall be paid an allowance
which shall be equal to fifty percent of the average final salary of the
member. If the member should die after retirement the member's lawful spouse
shall be paid an allowance which shall be equal to the retirement allowance
then payable to the member or fifty percent of the final average salary used in
computing the member's retirement allowance, whichever is less. The allowance
paid to the lawful spouse shall continue as long as the spouse lives:
PROVIDED, That if a surviving spouse who is receiving benefits under this
subsection marries another member of this retirement system who subsequently
predeceases such spouse, the spouse shall then be entitled to receive the
higher of the two survivors' allowances for which eligibility requirements were
met, but a surviving spouse shall not receive more than one survivor's
allowance from this system at the same time under this subsection. To be
eligible for an allowance the lawful surviving spouse of a retired member shall
have been married to the member prior to the member's retirement and
continuously thereafter until the date of the member's death or shall have been
married to the retired member at least two years prior to the member's death.

(3) If a member should
die, either while in service or after retirement, the member's surviving
unmarried children under the age of eighteen years shall be provided for in the
following manner:

(a) If there is a
surviving spouse, each child shall be entitled to a benefit equal to five
percent of the final average salary of the member or retired member. The
combined benefits to the surviving spouse and all children shall not exceed
sixty percent of the final average salary of the member or retired member; and

(b) If there is no
surviving spouse or the spouse should die, the child or children shall be
entitled to a benefit equal to thirty percent of the final average salary of
the member or retired member for one child and an additional ten percent for
each additional child. The combined benefits to the children under this
subsection shall not exceed sixty percent of the final average salary of the
member or retired member. Payments under this subsection shall be prorated
equally among the children, if more than one.

(4) If a member should
die in the line of duty while employed by the Washington state patrol, the
member's surviving children under the age of twenty years and eleven months if
attending any high school, college, university, or vocational or other
educational institution accredited or approved by the state of Washington shall
be provided for in the following manner:

(a) If there is a
surviving spouse, each child shall be entitled to a benefit equal to five
percent of the final average salary of the member. The combined benefits to
the surviving spouse and all children shall not exceed sixty percent of the
final average salary of the member;

(b) If there is no
surviving spouse or the spouse should die, the unmarried child or children
shall be entitled to receive a benefit equal to thirty percent of the final
average salary of the member or retired member for one child and an additional
ten percent for each additional child. The combined benefits to the children
under this subsection shall not exceed sixty percent of the final average
salary. Payments under this subsection shall be prorated equally among the
children, if more than one; and

(c) If a beneficiary
under this subsection reaches the age of twenty-one years during the middle of
a term of enrollment the benefit shall continue until the end of that term.

(5) The provisions of
this section shall apply to members who have been retired on disability as
provided in RCW 43.43.040 if the officer was a member of the Washington state
patrol retirement system at the time of such disability retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) For members
commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, except as provided in RCW 11.07.010,
if a member or a vested member who has not completed at least ten years of
service dies, the amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such
member's credit in the retirement system at the time of such member's death,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's
accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement
system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's
accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement
system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had
been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse,
then to such member's legal representatives.

(2) If a member who is
eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten years of
service dies, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children shall elect to
receive either:

(a) A retirement
allowance computed as provided for in RCW 43.43.260, actuarially reduced by the
amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under
RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred
percent survivor option under RCW 43.43.278 and if the member was not eligible
for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction from age
fifty-five or when the member could have attained twenty-five years of service,
whichever is less; if a surviving spouse who is receiving a retirement
allowance dies leaving a child or children of the member under the age of
majority, then such child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in
an amount equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share
and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of majority; if
there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at the time of
the member's death, such member's child or children under the age of majority
shall receive an allowance share and share alike calculated under this section
making the assumption that the ages of the spouse and member were equal at the
time of the member's death; or

(b)(i) The member's
accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670; or

(ii) If the member
dies, one hundred fifty percent of the member's accumulated contributions, less
any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any
accumulated contributions attributable to restorations made under RCW
41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred percent.

(3) If a member who is
eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten years of
service dies, and is not survived by a spouse or an eligible child, then the
accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified
as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to
a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:

(a) To an estate, a
person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or

(b) If there is no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death,
then to the member's legal representatives.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.43.274 and 1999 c
74 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Effective ((July 1,
1997)) January 1, 2003, the minimum retirement allowance
under RCW 43.43.260 and 43.43.270(2) in effect on January 1, 2002, shall
((not be less than twenty dollars per month for each year of service.
Effective July 1, 1999, and annually thereafter, the retirement allowance
provided under this section shall be adjusted by the annual increase amount.
If the member has elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under RCW
43.43.280(2), the minimum retirement allowance under this section shall be
reduced accordingly)) be increased by three percent. Each January 1st
thereafter, the minimum retirement allowance of the preceding year shall be
increased by three percent.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.43.278 and 2000 c
186 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

By July 1, 2000, the
department of retirement systems shall adopt rules that allow a member to
select an actuarially equivalent retirement option that pays the member a
reduced retirement allowance and upon death shall be continued throughout the
life of a lawful surviving spouse. The continuing allowance to the lawful
surviving spouse shall be subject to the yearly increase provided by RCW
43.43.260(5) ((in lieu of the annual increase provided in RCW 43.43.272)).
The allowance to the lawful surviving spouse under this section, and the
allowance for an eligible child or children under RCW 43.43.270, shall not be
subject to the limit for combined benefits under RCW 43.43.270.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.45.060 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 905 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state actuary
shall provide actuarial valuation results based on the assumptions adopted
under RCW 41.45.030.

(2) Not later than
September 30, 1998, and every two years thereafter, consistent with the
assumptions adopted under RCW 41.45.030, the council shall adopt and may make
changes to:

(a) A basic state
contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system;

(b) Basic employer
contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers'
retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system to be used
in the ensuing biennial period; and

(c) A basic employer
contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system for funding the
public employees' retirement system plan 1.

For the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, the rates adopted by the council shall be effective for the
period designated in section 902, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess. and RCW
41.45.0602.

(3) The employer and
state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the level percentages
of pay that are needed:

(a) To fully amortize the
total costs of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, and the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1((, and the unfunded liability of the
Washington state patrol retirement system)) not later than June 30, 2024,
except as provided in subsection (5) of this section;

(b) To also continue to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers'
retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and

(c) For the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 the rate charged to
employers, except as provided in RCW 41.26.450, shall be thirty percent of the
cost of the retirement system and the rate charged to the state shall be twenty
percent of the cost of the retirement system.

(4) The aggregate
actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3
employer contribution rate and a Washington state patrol retirement system
contribution rate.

(5) An amount equal to
the amount of extraordinary investment gains as defined in RCW 41.31.020 shall
be used to shorten the amortization period for the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(6) The council shall
immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management and
department of retirement systems of the state and employer contribution rates
adopted.

(7) The director of the
department of retirement systems shall collect those rates adopted by the
council.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Beginning July 1, 2001,
the required contribution rate for members of the Washington state patrol
retirement system shall be two percent or equal to the employer rate adopted
under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 for the Washington state patrol retirement
system, whichever is greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.43.272 (Surviving spouse
allowance--Annual adjustment) and 1999 c 74 s 2;

(2) RCW 43.43.276 (Retirement and
beneficiary allowances--Post-retirement adjustment--Minimum adjustment) and
1983 1st ex.s. c 56 s 5; and

(3) RCW 43.43.300 (Contributions by
members--State contributions remain in fund if member leaves patrol) and 2000 c
17 s 1 & 1965 c 8 s 43.43.300.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) Sections 2, 5, and 7
of this act are each added to chapter 43.43 RCW.

(2) Section 11 of this
act is added to chapter 41.45 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---