BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 Sec. 1. RCW
41.45.061 and 2000 c 247 s 506 and 2000 c 230 s 2 are

_8 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

_9 (1) The required contribution rate for members of
the plan 2

10 teachers' retirement system shall be fixed at the rates
in effect

11 on July 1, 1996, subject to the following:

12 (a) Beginning September 1, 1997, except as provided
in (b) of

13 this subsection, the employee contribution rate shall
not exceed

14 the employer plan 2 and 3 rates adopted under RCW
41.45.060 and

15 41.45.070 for the teachers' retirement system;

16 (b) In addition, the employee contribution rate for
plan 2

17 shall be increased by fifty percent of the contribution
rate

18 increase caused by any plan 2 benefit increase passed
after July

19 1, 1996;

p. 1 SB
5147

_1 (c) In addition, the employee contribution rate for
plan 2

_2 shall not be increased as a result of any distributions
pursuant

_3 to section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998 and RCW
41.31A.020.

_4 (2) The required contribution rate for members of
the school

_5 employees' retirement system plan 2 shall ((be fixed
at the rates

_6 in effect on September 1, 2000, for members of the
public

_7 employees' retirement system plan 2, subject to the
following:

_8 (a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,
the member

_9 contribution rate shall not exceed)) equal
the school employees'

10 retirement system employer plan 2 and 3 contribution
rate adopted

11 under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070((;)), except
as provided in

12 subsection (3) of this section.

13 (((b))) (3) The member contribution
rate for the school

14 employees' retirement system plan 2 shall be increased
by fifty

15 percent of the contribution rate increase caused by any
plan 2

16 benefit increase passed after September 1, 2000.

17 (((3))) (4) The required contribution
rate for members of the

18 public employees' retirement system plan 2 shall be set
at the

19 same rate as the employer combined plan 2 and plan 3
rate.

20 (((4))) (5) The required contribution
rate for members of the

21 law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system

22 plan 2 shall be set at fifty percent of the cost of the
retirement

23 system.

24 (((5))) (6) The employee contribution
rates for plan 2 under

25 subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall not
include any

26 increase as a result of any distributions pursuant to
RCW

27 41.31A.020 and 41.31A.030.

28 (((6))) (7) The required plan 2 and 3
contribution rates for

29 employers shall be adopted in the manner described in
RCW

30 41.45.060.

31 Sec. 2. RCW
41.34.060 and 2000 c 247 s 404 are each amended to

32 read as follows:

33 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the

34 member's account shall be invested by the state
investment board.

35 In order to reduce transaction costs and address
liquidity issues,

36 based upon recommendations of the state investment
board, the

37 department may require members to provide up to ninety
days'

SB 5147 p. 2

_1 notice prior to moving funds from the state investment
board

_2 portfolio to self-directed investment options provided
under

_3 subsection (3) of this section.

_4 (a) For members of the retirement system as provided
for in

_5 chapter 41.32 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the
same

_6 portfolio as that of the teachers' retirement system
combined plan

_7 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(2).

_8 (b) For members of the retirement system as provided
for in

_9 chapter 41.35 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the
same

10 portfolio as that of the school employees' retirement
system

11 combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(4).

12 (c) For members of the retirement system as provided
for in

13 chapter 41.40 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the
same

14 portfolio as that of the public employees' retirement
system

15 combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(3).

16 (2) The state investment board shall declare monthly
unit

17 values for the portfolios or funds, or portions thereof,
utilized

18 under subsection (1)(a) ((and)), (b),
and (c) of this section. The

19 declared values shall be an approximation of portfolio
or fund

20 values, based on internal procedures of the state
investment

21 board. Such declared unit values and internal
procedures shall be

22 in the sole discretion of the state investment board.
The state

23 investment board may delegate any of the powers and
duties under

24 this subsection, including discretion, pursuant to RCW
43.33A.030.

25 Member accounts shall be credited by the department with
a rate of

26 return based on changes to such unit values.

27 (3) Members may elect to self-direct their
investments as set

28 forth in RCW 41.34.130 and 43.33A.190.

29 Sec. 3. RCW
41.35.010 and 1998 c 341 s 2 are each amended to read

30 as follows:

31 The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter,

32 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

33 (1) "Retirement system" means the
Washington school employees'

34 retirement system provided for in this chapter.

35 (2) "Department" means the department of
retirement systems

36 created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

p. 3 SB
5147

_1 (3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer
of the state of

_2 Washington.

_3 (4) "Employer," for plan 2 and plan 3
members, means a school

_4 district or an educational service district.

_5 (5) "Member" means any employee included
in the membership of

_6 the retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.35.030.

_7 (6)(a) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2
and plan 3 members,

_8 means salaries or wages earned by a member during a
payroll period

_9 for personal services, including overtime payments, and
shall

10 include wages and salaries deferred under provisions
established

11 pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United
States

12 internal revenue code, but shall exclude nonmoney
maintenance

13 compensation and lump sum or other payments for deferred
annual

14 sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused
accumulated annual

15 leave, or any form of severance pay.

16 (b) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and
plan 3 members also

17 includes the following actual or imputed payments, which
are not

18 paid for personal services:

19 (i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an
employer on

20 reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments
by an

21 employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement,
which are

22 awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or
wage which

23 the individual would have earned during a payroll period
shall be

24 considered compensation earnable to the extent provided
in this

25 subsection, and the individual shall receive the
equivalent

26 service credit;

27 (ii) In any year in which a member serves in the
legislature,

28 the member shall have the option of having such member's

29 compensation earnable be the greater of:

30 (A) The compensation earnable the member would have
received

31 had such member not served in the legislature; or

32 (B) Such member's actual compensation earnable
received for

33 nonlegislative public employment and legislative service

34 combined. Any additional contributions to the
retirement system

35 required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A)
of this

36 subsection is greater than compensation earnable under
this

37 (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by the
member for both

38 member and employer contributions;

SB 5147 p. 4

_1 (iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW
27.04.100,

_2 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

_3 (iv) Compensation that a member would have received
but for a

_4 disability occurring in the line of duty only as
authorized by RCW

_5 41.40.038;

_6 (v) Compensation that a member receives due to
participation in

_7 the leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW
41.04.650

_8 through 41.04.670; and

_9 (vi) Compensation that a member receives for being
in standby

10 status. For the purposes of this section, a member is
in standby

11 status when not being paid for time actually worked and
the

12 employer requires the member to be prepared to report
immediately

13 for work, if the need arises, although the need may not
arise.

14 (7) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3
members means periods of

15 employment by a member in an eligible position or
positions for

16 one or more employers for which compensation earnable is
paid.

17 Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in
any

18 calendar month shall constitute one service credit month
except as

19 provided in RCW 41.35.180. Compensation earnable earned
for at

20 least seventy hours but less than ninety hours in any
calendar

21 month shall constitute one-half service credit month of
service.

22 Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours
in any

23 calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service
credit month

24 of service. Time spent in standby status, whether
compensated or

25 not, is not service.

26 Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken
into account

27 in the computation of such retirement allowance or
benefits.

28 (a) Service in any state elective position shall be
deemed to

29 be full-time service.

30 (b) A member shall receive a total of not more than
twelve

31 service credit months of service for such calendar
year. If an

32 individual is employed in an eligible position by one or
more

33 employers the individual shall receive no more than one
service

34 credit month during any calendar month in which multiple
service

35 for ninety or more hours is rendered.

36 (c) For purposes of plan 2 and 3 "forty-five
days" as used in

37 RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months.
Use of

p. 5 SB
5147

_1 less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as
allowed

_2 under this subsection as follows:

_3 (i) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service
credit

_4 month;

_5 (ii) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two
days equals

_6 one-half service credit month;

_7 (iii) Twenty-two days equals one service credit
month;

_8 (iv) More than twenty-two days but less than
thirty-three days

_9 equals one and one-quarter service credit month; and

10 (v) Thirty-three or more days but less than
forty-five days

11 equals one and one-half service credit month.

12 (8) "Service credit year" means an
accumulation of months of

13 service credit which is equal to one when divided by
twelve.

14 (9) "Service credit month" means a month
or an accumulation of

15 months of service credit which is equal to one.

16 (10) "Membership service" means all
service rendered as a

17 member.

18 (11) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3
members means any

19 person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other
benefit

20 provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered
to an

21 employer by another person.

22 (12) "Regular interest" means such rate as
the director may

23 determine.

24 (13) "Accumulated contributions" means the
sum of all

25 contributions standing to the credit of a member in the
member's

26 individual account, including any amount paid under RCW

27 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest
thereon.

28 (14) "Average final compensation" for plan
2 and plan 3 members

29 means the member's average compensation earnable of the
highest

30 consecutive sixty months of service credit months prior
to such

31 member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods
constituting

32 authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the
calculation of

33 average final compensation except under RCW
41.40.710(2).

34 (15) "Final compensation" means the annual
rate of compensation

35 earnable by a member at the time of termination of
employment.

36 (16) "Annuity" means payments for life
derived from accumulated

37 contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid
in monthly

38 installments.

SB 5147 p. 6

_1 (17) "Pension" means payments for life
derived from

_2 contributions made by the employer. All pensions shall
be paid in

_3 monthly installments.

_4 (18) "Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and
plan 3 members means

_5 monthly payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided
in this

_6 chapter.

_7 (19) "Employee" or "employed"
means a person who is providing

_8 services for compensation to an employer, unless the
person is

_9 free from the employer's direction and control over the

10 performance of work. The department shall adopt rules
and

11 interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

12 (20) "Actuarial equivalent" means a
benefit of equal value when

13 computed upon the basis of such mortality and other
tables as may

14 be adopted by the director.

15 (21) "Retirement" means withdrawal from
active service with a

16 retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.

17 (22) "Eligible position" means any
position that, as defined by

18 the employer, normally requires five or more months of
service a

19 year for which regular compensation for at least seventy
hours is

20 earned by the occupant thereof. For purposes of this
chapter an

21 employer shall not define "position" in such a
manner that an

22 employee's monthly work for that employer is divided
into more

23 than one position.

24 (23) "Ineligible position" means any
position which does not

25 conform with the requirements set forth in subsection
(22) of this

26 section.

27 (24) "Leave of absence" means the period
of time a member is

28 authorized by the employer to be absent from service
without being

29 separated from membership.

30 (25) (("Totally incapacitated for duty"
means total inability

31 to perform the duties of a member's employment or
office or any

32 other work for which the member is qualified by
training or

33 experience.

34 (26))) "Retiree" means any person
who has begun accruing a

35 retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter

36 resulting from service rendered to an employer while a
member.

37 (((27))) (26) "Director"
means the director of the department.

p. 7 SB
5147

_1 (((28))) (27) "State elective
position" means any position held

_2 by any person elected or appointed to statewide office
or elected

_3 or appointed as a member of the legislature.

_4 (((29))) (28) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person

_5 appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

_6 (((30))) (29) "Plan 2" means
the Washington school employees'

_7 retirement system plan 2 providing the benefits and
funding

_8 provisions covering persons who first became members of
the public

_9 employees' retirement system on and after October 1,
1977, and

10 transferred to the Washington school employees'
retirement system

11 under RCW 41.40.750.

12 (((31))) (30) "Plan 3" means
the Washington school employees'

13 retirement system plan 3 providing the benefits and
funding

14 provisions covering persons who first became members of
the system

15 on and after September 1, 2000, or who transfer from
plan 2 under

16 RCW 41.35.510.

17 (((32))) (31) "Index" means,
for any calendar year, that year's

18 annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington
area, for

19 urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by

20 the bureau of labor statistics, United States department
of labor.

21 (((33))) (32) "Index A"
means the index for the year prior to

22 the determination of a postretirement adjustment.

23 (((34))) (33) "Index B"
means the index for the year prior to

24 index A.

25 (((35))) (34) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A

26 divided by index B.

27 (((36))) (35) "Separation from
service" occurs when a person

28 has terminated all employment with an employer.

29 (((37))) (36) "Member
account" or "member's account" for

30 purposes of plan 3 means the sum of the contributions
and earnings

31 on behalf of the member in the defined contribution
portion of

32 plan 3.

33 (((38))) (37) "Classified
employee" means an employee of a

34 school district or an educational service district who
is not

35 eligible for membership in the teachers' retirement
system

36 established under chapter 41.32 RCW.

37

SB 5147 p. 8

_1 Sec. 4. RCW
41.04.270 and 1988 c 195 s 5 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 (1) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 2.10,
2.12, 41.26,

_4 41.28, 41.32, 41.35, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW to the
contrary, on and

_5 after March 19, 1976, any member or former member who
(a) receives

_6 a retirement allowance earned by said former member as
deferred

_7 compensation from any public retirement system
authorized by the

_8 general laws of this state, or (b) is eligible to
receive a

_9 retirement allowance from any public retirement system
listed in

10 RCW 41.50.030, but chooses not to apply, or (c) is the
beneficiary

11 of a disability allowance from any public retirement
system listed

12 in RCW 41.50.030 shall be estopped from becoming a
member of or

13 accruing any contractual rights whatsoever in any other
public

14 retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030: PROVIDED,
That (a) and

15 (b) of this subsection shall not apply to persons who
have

16 accumulated less than fifteen years service credit in
any such

17 system.

18 (2) Nothing in this section is intended to apply to
any

19 retirement system except those listed in RCW 41.50.030
and the

20 city employee retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma,
and

21 Spokane. Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not
apply to a

22 dual member as defined in RCW 41.54.010.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW
41.54.050 (Election to establish

24 membership in public employees' retirement system) is
decodified.

25 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 and 2 of
this act take effect

26 March 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 9 SB
5147