BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as
follows:

Members employed by
school districts or educational service districts who reach thirty years of
service before or during the period from July 1, 2001, to June 30, 2005, may
earn additional service credit towards their retirement benefit during the
period from July 1, 2001, to June 30, 2005, of two percent per year to a
maximum of eight percent in excess of that provided by RCW 41.32.498.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Members who made the
irrevocable election as provided by RCW 41.32.4986 before the effective date of
this act have a one-time opportunity to rescind that election by notifying the
department in writing by December 31, 2001.

---
END ---