BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.197 and 1995 c
345 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
1995, and annually thereafter, the retirement allowance of a person meeting the
requirements of this section shall be increased by the annual increase amount.

(2) The following
persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this
section:

(a) A beneficiary who
has received a retirement allowance for at least one year by July 1st in the
calendar year in which the annual increase is given and has attained at
least age sixty-six by ((July 1st)) December 31st in the calendar
year in which the annual increase is given; or

(b) A beneficiary whose
retirement allowance is lower than the minimum benefit provided under RCW
41.40.1984.

(3) The following
persons shall also be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of
this section:

(a) A beneficiary
receiving the minimum benefit on June 30, 1995, under RCW 41.40.198; or

(b) A recipient of a
survivor benefit on June 30, 1995, which has been increased by RCW 41.40.325.

(4) If otherwise
eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment under RCW 41.40.188(1)(c) shall
be eligible for the annual increase adjustment in addition to the benefit that
would have been received absent this section.

(5) Those receiving a
benefit under RCW 41.40.220(1), or a survivor of a disabled member under RCW
41.44.170(5) shall be eligible for the benefit provided by this section.

(6) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this postretirement
adjustment not granted prior to that time.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.32.489 and 1995 c
345 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
1995, and annually thereafter, the retirement allowance of a person meeting the
requirements of this section shall be increased by the annual increase amount.

(2) The following
persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this
section:

(a) A beneficiary who
has received a retirement allowance for at least one year by July 1st in the
calendar year in which the annual increase is given and has attained at
least age sixty-six by ((July 1st)) December 31st in the calendar
year in which the annual increase is given; or

(b) A beneficiary whose
retirement allowance is lower than the minimum benefit provided under RCW
41.32.4851.

(3) The following
persons shall also be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of
this section:

(a) A beneficiary
receiving the minimum benefit on June 30, 1995, under RCW 41.32.485; or

(b) A recipient of a
survivor benefit on June 30, 1995, which has been increased by RCW 41.32.575.

(4) If otherwise
eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment under RCW 41.32.530(1)(d) shall
be eligible for the annual increase adjustment in addition to the benefit that
would have been received absent this section.

(5) Those receiving a
temporary disability benefit under RCW 41.32.540 shall not be eligible for the
benefit provided by this section.

(6) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this postretirement
adjustment not granted prior to that time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---