BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
41.50.086 and 1998 c 341 s 506 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 (1) The employee retirement benefits board is
created within

_8 the department of retirement systems.

_9 (2) The board shall be composed of ((eleven))
twelve members

10 appointed by the governor and one ex officio member as
follows:

11 (a) Three members representing the public employees'
retirement

12 system: One retired, two active. The members shall be
appointed from

13 a list of nominations submitted by organizations representing
each

14 category. The initial term of appointment shall be two
years for

15 the retired member, one year for one active member, and
three

16 years for the remaining active member.

17 (b) Three members representing the teachers'
retirement system:

18 One retired, two active. The members shall be
appointed from a

p. 1 SSB
5152

_1 list of nominations submitted by organizations
representing each

_2 category. The initial term of appointment shall be one
year for the

_3 retired member, two years for one active member, and
three years

_4 for the remaining active member.

_5 (c) Three members representing the school employees'
retirement

_6 system: One retired, two active. The members shall be
appointed from

_7 a list of nominations submitted by organizations
representing each

_8 category. The initial term of appointment shall be one
year for the

_9 retired member, two years for one active member, and
three years

10 for the remaining active member.

11 (d) Two members with experience in defined
contribution plan

12 administration. The initial term for these members
shall be two

13 years for one member and three years for the remaining
member.

14 (e) One member representing the deferred
compensation program.

15 The member shall be a deferred compensation program
participant

16 chosen from a list of nominations submitted by
organizations

17 representing employees eligible to participate in the
deferred

18 compensation program. The initial term of
appointment for this

19 member shall be three years.

20 (f) The director of the department shall
serve ex officio and

21 shall be the chair of the board.

22 (3) After the initial appointments, members shall be
appointed

23 to three-year terms.

24 (4) The board shall meet at least quarterly during
the calendar

25 year, at the call of the chair.

26 (5) Members of the board shall serve without
compensation but

27 shall receive travel expenses as provided for in RCW
43.03.050 and

28 43.03.060. Such travel expenses shall be reimbursed by
the

29 department from the retirement system expense fund.

30 (6) The board shall adopt rules governing its
procedures and

31 conduct of business.

32 (7) The actuary shall perform all actuarial services
for the

33 board and provide advice and support.

34 Sec. 2. RCW
41.50.780 and 1998 c 245 s 42 and 1998 c 116 s 12 are

35 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

36 (1) The deferred compensation principal account is
hereby

37 created in the state treasury. ((Any deficiency in
the deferred

SSB 5152 p. 2

_1 compensation administrative account caused by an
excess of

_2 administrative expenses disbursed from that account
over balances

_3 credited to that account shall be eliminated by
transferring

_4 moneys to that account from the deferred compensation
principal

_5 account.))

_6 (2) The amount of compensation deferred by employees
under

_7 agreements entered into under the authority contained in
RCW

_8 41.50.770 shall be paid into the deferred compensation
principal

_9 account and shall be sufficient to cover costs of
administration

10 and staffing in addition to such other amounts as
determined by

11 the department. The deferred compensation principal
account shall

12 be used to carry out the purposes of RCW 41.50.770. All
eligible

13 state employees shall be given the opportunity to
participate in

14 agreements entered into by the department under RCW
41.50.770.

15 State agencies shall cooperate with the department in
providing

16 employees with the opportunity to participate.

17 (3) Any county, municipality, or other subdivision
of the state

18 may elect to participate in any agreements entered into
by the

19 department under RCW 41.50.770, including the making of
payments

20 therefrom to the employees participating in a deferred

21 compensation plan upon their separation from state or
other

22 qualifying service. Accordingly, the deferred
compensation

23 principal account shall be considered to be a public
pension or

24 retirement fund within the meaning of Article XXIX,
section 1 of

25 the state Constitution, for the purpose of determining
eligible

26 investments and deposits of the moneys therein.

27 (4) All moneys in the state deferred compensation
principal

28 account and the state deferred compensation
administrative

29 account, all property and rights purchased therewith,
and all

30 income attributable thereto, shall be held in trust by
the state

31 investment board, as set forth under RCW 43.33A.030, for
the

32 exclusive benefit of the state deferred compensation
plan's

33 participants and their beneficiaries. Neither the
participant, nor

34 the participant's beneficiary or beneficiaries, nor any
other

35 designee, has any right to commute, sell, assign,
transfer, or

36 otherwise convey the right to receive any payments under
the

37 plan. These payments and right thereto are
nonassignable and

38 nontransferable. Unpaid accumulated deferrals are not
subject to

p. 3 SSB
5152

_1 attachment, garnishment, or execution and are not
transferable by

_2 operation of law in event of bankruptcy or insolvency,
except to

_3 the extent otherwise required by law.

_4 (5) The state investment board has the full power to
invest

_5 moneys in the state deferred compensation principal
account and

_6 the state deferred compensation administrative account
in

_7 accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and
41.50.770, and

_8 cumulative investment directions received pursuant to
RCW

_9 41.50.770. All investment and operating costs of the
state

10 investment board associated with the investment of the
deferred

11 compensation plan assets shall be paid pursuant to RCW
43.33A.160

12 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses,
one hundred

13 percent of all earnings from these investments shall
accrue

14 directly to the deferred compensation principal account.

15 (6)(a) No state board or commission, agency, or any
officer,

16 employee, or member thereof is liable for any loss or
deficiency

17 resulting from participant investments selected pursuant
to RCW

18 41.50.770(3).

19 (b) Neither the employee retirement benefits board
nor the

20 state investment board, nor any officer, employee, or
member

21 thereof is liable for any loss or deficiency resulting
from

22 reasonable efforts to implement investment directions
pursuant to

23 RCW 41.50.770(3).

24 (7) The deferred compensation administrative account
is hereby

25 created in the state treasury. All expenses of the
department

26 pertaining to the deferred compensation plan including
staffing

27 and administrative expenses shall be paid out of the
deferred

28 compensation administrative account. Any excess
balances credited

29 to this account over administrative expenses disbursed
from this

30 account shall be transferred to the deferred
compensation

31 principal account at such time and in such amounts as
may be

32 determined by the department with the approval of the
office of

33 financial management. Any deficiency in the deferred
compensation

34 administrative account caused by an excess of
administrative

35 expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to this

36 account from the deferred compensation principal
account.

37 (8) In addition to the duties specified in this
section and RCW

SSB 5152 p. 4

_1 41.50.770, the department shall administer the salary
reduction

_2 plan established in RCW 41.04.600 through 41.04.645.

_3 (9)(a)(i) The department shall keep or cause
to be kept full

_4 and adequate accounts and records of the assets of each
individual

_5 participant, obligations, transactions, and affairs of
any

_6 deferred compensation plans created under RCW 41.50.770
and this

_7 section. The department shall account for and report on
the

_8 investment of state deferred compensation plan assets or
may enter

_9 into an agreement with the state investment board for
such

10 accounting and reporting.

11 (ii) The department's duties related to
individual participant

12 accounts include conducting the activities of trade
instruction,

13 settlement activities, and direction of cash movement
and related

14 wire transfers with the custodian bank and outside
investment

15 firms.

16 (iii) The department has sole responsibility for
contracting

17 with any recordkeepers for individual participant
accounts and

18 shall manage the performance of recordkeepers under
those

19 contracts.

20 (b)(i) The department's duties under (a)(ii) of
this subsection

21 do not limit the authority of the state investment
board to

22 conduct its responsibilities for asset management and
balancing of

23 the deferred compensation funds.

24 (ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility
for

25 contracting with outside investment firms to provide
investment

26 management for the deferred compensation funds and
shall manage

27 the performance of investment managers under those
contracts.

28 (c) The state treasurer shall designate and
define the terms of

29 engagement for the custodial banks.

30 (10) The department may adopt rules necessary to
carry out

31 ((the purposes of)) its responsibilities under
RCW 41.50.770 and

32 this section.

33 Sec. 3. RCW
41.34.130 and 1998 c 341 s 307 are each amended to

34 read as follows:

35 (1) The state investment board has the full
authority to invest

36 all self-directed investment moneys in accordance with
RCW

37 43.84.150 and 43.33A.140, and cumulative investment
directions

p. 5 SSB
5152

_1 received pursuant to RCW 41.34.060 and this section. In
carrying

_2 out this authority the state investment board, after
consultation

_3 with the employee retirement benefits board regarding
any

_4 recommendations made pursuant to RCW 41.50.088(((2)))
(1)(b),

_5 shall provide a set of options for members to choose
from for self-

_6 directed investment.

_7 (2) All investment and operating costs of the state investment

_8 board associated with making self-directed investments
shall be

_9 paid by members and recovered under procedures agreed to
by the

10 board and the state investment board pursuant to the
principles

11 set forth in RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. All other
expenses

12 caused by self-directed investment shall be paid by the
member in

13 accordance with rules established by the board under RCW

14 41.50.088. With the exception of these expenses, all
earnings from

15 self-directed investments shall accrue to the member's
account.

16 (3)(a)(i) The department shall keep or cause
to be kept full

17 and adequate accounts and records of each individual
member's

18 account. The department shall account for and report on
the

19 investment of defined contribution assets or may enter
into an

20 agreement with the state investment board for such
accounting and

21 reporting under this chapter.

22 (ii) The department's duties related to
individual participant

23 accounts include conducting the activities of trade
instruction,

24 settlement activities, and direction of cash movement
and related

25 wire transfers with the custodian bank and outside
investment

26 firms.

27 (iii) The department has sole responsibility for
contracting

28 with any recordkeepers for individual participant
accounts and

29 shall manage the performance of recordkeepers under
those

30 contracts.

31 (b)(i) The department's duties under (a)(ii) of
this subsection

32 do not limit the authority of the state investment
board to

33 conduct its responsibilities for asset management and
balancing of

34 the deferred compensation funds.

35 (ii) The state investment board has sole
responsibility for

36 contracting with outside investment firms to provide
investment

37 management for the deferred compensation funds and
shall manage

38 the performance of investment managers under those
contracts.

SSB 5152 p. 6

_1 (c) The state treasurer shall designate and
define the terms of

_2 engagement for the custodial banks.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 7 SSB
5152