BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.802 and 1997 c
254 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section, may work up to ((five months)) eight hundred sixty-seven
hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement
officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her
benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her
retirement status and immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall
not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.32.860 and 1997 c
254 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except under RCW
41.32.862, no retiree shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly
retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as
defined in RCW 41.40.010 ((or)), 41.32.010, or 41.35.010, or
as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030.

(2) If a retiree's
benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be
reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused the
suspension of benefits. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.32.862 and 1997 c
254 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section, may work up to ((five months)) eight hundred sixty-seven
hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement
officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her
benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her
retirement status and immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall
not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.35.060 and 1998 c
341 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section
may work up to ((five months)) eight hundred sixty-seven hours
per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as
defined in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.35.030, he or she terminates his or her
retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue
during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire
if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.35.420 or 41.35.680. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered
two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor options
the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be
reinstated.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.40.037 and 1997 c
254 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section, may work up to ((five months)) eight hundred sixty-seven
hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement
officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her
benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or
her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not
accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions
and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the right to
retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered two
uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor options the
member had at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.40.750 and 1998 c
341 s 113 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective September
1, 2000, the membership of all plan 2 members currently employed in eligible
positions in a school district or educational service district and all plan 2
service credit for such members, is transferred to the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2. Plan 2 members who have withdrawn their
member contributions for prior plan 2 service may restore contributions and
service credit to the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 as
provided under RCW 41.40.740.

(2)(a) The
membership and previous service credit of a plan 2 member not employed in an
eligible position on September 1, 2000, will be transferred to the Washington
school employees' retirement system plan 2 when he or she becomes employed in
an eligible position. Plan 2 members not employed in an eligible position on
September 1, 2000, who have withdrawn their member contributions for prior plan
2 service may restore contributions and service credit to the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2 as provided under RCW 41.40.740.

(b) The membership
and previous service credit of a plan 2 member last employed by a school
district or educational service district and retired prior to September 1,
2000, will be transferred to the Washington school employees' retirement system
plan 2 if the member opts to reestablish membership.

(3) Members who restore
contributions and service credit under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall have their contributions and service credit transferred to the Washington
school employees' retirement system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

---
END ---