BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This chapter may be known
and cited as the Washington state civil rights act of 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The legislature
recognizes that all political power is inherent in the people, and governments
derive their just powers from the consent of the governed, and are established
to protect and maintain individual rights; and that a frequent recurrence to
fundamental principles is essential to the security of individual right and the
perpetuity of free government.

(2) The legislature
declares that it is a fundamental principle that the state Constitution
embodies public policy of the highest order and priority; that it is a
compelling interest of the state of Washington to ensure that the provisions of
the state Constitution are guaranteed and enforced in order to protect and
maintain the liberties and individual rights of the people of the state of
Washington; that the people of the state of Washington should be able to rely
primarily upon the state Constitution for the protection of their liberties and
individual rights; and that it is a legitimate exercise of the police power of
the state of Washington to preserve the public peace, health, morals, and
safety of the people of the state of Washington by establishing an enforcement
mechanism for redress for violations of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Every governmental
entity that, under color of a statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage,
subjects or causes to be subjected, a citizen, inhabitant, or domiciliary of
the state of Washington to the deprivation of any rights, privileges, or
immunities secured by the Constitution of the state of Washington, is liable to
the person injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper
proceeding for the redress.

(2) A person deeming
himself or herself injured by any act in violation of this chapter may recover
all damages sustained including, but not limited to, damages or remedies made
available under the civil rights act of 1871 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1983). Punitive
damages, however, may not be recovered unless there is a separate statutory
basis.

(3) The common law
doctrine of qualified immunity may not be applied to shield any governmental
entity from an action under this act.

(4) If a person has
recovered damages, under the civil rights act of 1871 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1983),
for the conduct or actions of a governmental entity, he or she may not also
recover under this act. In actions brought under this act, the court shall
clearly state in the conclusions of law whether the damages have been awarded
under the provisions of this act or the civil rights act of 1871.

(5) It is the intent of
the legislature that persons who are injured by a violation of the state
Constitution are eligible for redress, that future violations of the state
Constitution be deterred thereby, and that this statute be construed liberally
for the accomplishment of its declared purpose in this chapter. Nothing
contained in this chapter shall be construed to deny the right of a person to
institute an action or pursue any civil or criminal remedy based upon an
alleged violation of his or her civil rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) For purposes of this
chapter, "governmental entity" means the state or any local
government.

(2) For the purposes of
this chapter, a governmental entity is liable for the act of an agency,
instrumentality, officer, or employee done under color of a statute, ordinance,
regulation, custom, or usage.

(3) For the purposes of
this chapter, an officer, employee, or agent of a governmental entity is liable
only to the extent that he or she acts under color of a statute, ordinance,
regulation, custom, or usage.

(4) For the purposes of
this chapter, "person" means a natural person, and does not include a
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint
venture, or other legal or commercial entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In an action or
proceeding to enforce a provision of this chapter, a court may impose actual
damages but may not impose or levy as a remedy or otherwise any new or
additional general or special tax, assessment, fee, or toll.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. In an action or
proceeding to enforce a provision of this chapter, the prevailing party may
recover any and all attorneys' fees and costs for any act in violation of this
chapter, including but not limited to expert witness fees, to the same extent
recoverable under RCW 49.60.030(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This act applies
prospectively only and not retroactively. It applies only to causes of action
that arise on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

---
END ---