BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purposes of the live
horse racing compact are to:

(1) Establish uniform
requirements among the party states for the licensing of participants in live
horse racing with pari-mutuel wagering, and ensure that all such participants
who are licensed pursuant to the compact meet a uniform minimum standard of
honesty and integrity;

(2) Facilitate the
growth of the horse racing industry in each party state and nation-wide by
simplifying the process for licensing participants in live racing, and reduce
the duplicative and costly process of separate licensing by the regulatory
agency in each state that conducts live horse racing with pari-mutuel wagering;

(3) Authorize the
Washington horse racing commission to participate in the live horse racing
compact;

(4) Provide for
participation in the live horse racing compact by officials of the party
states, and permit those officials, through the compact committee established
by this chapter, to enter into contracts with governmental agencies and
nongovernmental persons to carry out the purposes of the live horse racing
compact; and

(5) Establish the
compact committee created by this chapter as an interstate governmental entity
duly authorized to request and receive criminal history record information from
the federal bureau of investigation and other state and local law enforcement
agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Compact
committee" means the organization of officials from the party states that
is authorized and empowered by the live horse racing compact to carry out the
purposes of the compact.

(2)
"Official" means the appointed, elected, designated, or otherwise
duly selected member of a racing commission or the equivalent thereof in a
party state who represents that party state as a member of the compact
committee.

(3) "Participants
in live racing" means participants in live horse racing with pari-mutuel
wagering in the party states.

(4) "Party
state" means each state that has enacted the live horse racing compact.

(5) "State"
means each of the several states of the United States, the District of
Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and each territory or possession of
the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The live horse racing
compact shall come into force when enacted by any four states. Thereafter, the
compact shall become effective as to any other state upon: (1) That state's
enactment of the compact; and (2) the affirmative vote of a majority of the
officials on the compact committee as provided in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Any state that has
adopted or authorized horse racing with pari-mutuel wagering is eligible to
become party to the live horse racing compact.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Any party state may
withdraw from the live horse racing compact by enacting a statute repealing the
compact, but no such withdrawal is effective until the head of the executive
branch of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of such withdrawal
to the head of the executive branch of all other party states. If, as a result
of withdrawals, participation in the compact decreases to less than three party
states, the compact no longer shall be in force and effect unless and until
there are at least three or more party states again participating in the
compact.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) There is created an
interstate governmental entity to be known as the "compact committee"
which shall be comprised of one official from the racing commission or its
equivalent in each party state who shall be appointed, serve, and be subject to
removal in accordance with the laws of the party state he or she represents.
Under the laws of his or her party state, each official shall have the
assistance of his or her state's racing commission or the equivalent thereof in
considering issues related to licensing of participants in live racing and in
fulfilling his or her responsibilities as the representative from his or her
state to the compact committee. If an official is unable to perform any duty
in connection with the powers and duties of the compact committee, the racing
commission or equivalent thereof from his or her state shall designate another
of its members as an alternate who shall serve in his or her place and
represent the party state as its official on the compact committee until that
racing commission or equivalent thereof determines that the original
representative official is able once again to perform his or her duties as that
party state's representative official on the compact committee. The
designation of an alternate shall be communicated by the affected state's
racing commission or equivalent thereof to the compact committee as the
committee's bylaws may provide.

(2) The governor shall
appoint the official to represent the state of Washington on the compact committee
for a term of four years. No official may serve more than three consecutive
terms. A vacancy shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. In order to carry out the
live horse racing compact, the compact committee is granted the power and duty
to:

(1) Determine which
categories of participants in live racing, including but not limited to owners,
trainers, jockeys, grooms, mutuel clerks, racing officials, veterinarians, and
farriers, should be licensed by the compact committee, and establish the
requirements for the initial licensure of applicants in each such category, the
term of the license for each category, and the requirements for renewal of
licenses in each category. However, with regard to requests for criminal
history record information on each applicant for a license, and with regard to
the effect of a criminal record on the issuance or renewal of a license, the
compact committee shall determine for each category of participants in live
racing which licensure requirements for that category are, in its judgment, the
most restrictive licensure requirements of any party state for that category
and shall adopt licensure requirements for that category that are, in its
judgment, comparable to those most restrictive requirements;

(2) Investigate
applicants for a license from the compact committee and, as permitted by
federal and state law, gather information on such applicants, including criminal
history record information from the federal bureau of investigation and
relevant state and local law enforcement agencies, and, where appropriate, from
the royal Canadian mounted police and law enforcement agencies of other
countries, necessary to determine whether a license should be issued under the
licensure requirements established by the compact committee under subsection
(1) of this section. Only officials on, and employees of, the compact
committee may receive and review such criminal history record information, and
those officials and employees may use that information only for the purposes of
the compact. No such official or employee may disclose or disseminate such
information to any person or entity other than another official on or employee
of the compact committee. The fingerprints of each applicant for a license
from the compact committee shall be taken by the compact committee, its
employees, or its designee and shall be forwarded to a state identification
bureau, or to an association of state officials regulating pari-mutuel wagering
designated by the attorney general of the United States, for submission to the
federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history record check. Such
fingerprints may be submitted on a fingerprint card or by electronic or other
means authorized by the federal bureau of investigation or other receiving law
enforcement agency;

(3) Issue licenses to,
and renew the licenses of, participants in live racing listed in subsection (1)
of this section who are found by the compact committee to have met the
licensure and renewal requirements established by the compact committee. The
compact committee shall not have the power or authority to deny a license. If
it determines that an applicant will not be eligible for the issuance or
renewal of a compact committee license, the compact committee shall notify the
applicant that it will not be able to process his or her application further.
Such notification does not constitute and shall not be considered to be the denial
of a license. Any such applicant has the right to present additional evidence
to, and to be heard by, the compact committee, but the final decision on
issuance or renewal of the license shall be made by the compact committee using
the requirements established under subsection (1) of this section;

(4) Enter into
contracts or agreements with governmental agencies and with nongovernmental
persons to provide personal services for its activities and such other services
as may be necessary to carry out the compact;

(5) Create, appoint,
and abolish those offices, employments, and positions, including an executive
director, as it deems necessary for the purposes of the compact, prescribe
their powers, duties, and qualifications, hire persons to fill those offices,
employments, and positions, and provide for the removal, term, tenure,
compensation, fringe benefits, retirement benefits, and other conditions of
employment of its officers, employees and other positions;

(6) Borrow, accept, or
contract for the services of personnel from any state, the United States, or
any other governmental agency, or from any person, firm, association,
corporation, or other entity;

(7) Acquire, hold, and
dispose of real and personal property by gift, purchase, lease, license, or in
other similar manner, in furtherance of the compact;

(8) Charge a fee to
each applicant for an initial license or renewal of a license; and

(9) Receive other funds
through gifts, grants, and appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Each official is
entitled to one vote on the compact committee.

(2) All action taken by
the compact committee with regard to the addition of party states as provided
in section 3 of this act, the licensure of participants in live racing, and the
receipt and disbursement of funds require a majority vote of the total number
of officials, or their alternates, on the compact committee. All other action
by the compact committee requires a majority vote of those officials, or their
alternates, present and voting.

(3) No action of the
compact committee may be taken unless a quorum is present. A majority of the
officials, or their alternates, on the compact committee constitutes a quorum.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The compact committee
shall elect annually from among its members a chair, a vice-chair, and a
secretary/treasurer.

(2) The compact
committee shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business by a two-thirds
vote of the total number of officials, or their alternates, on the compact
committee at that time and shall have the power by the same vote to amend and
rescind such bylaws. The compact committee shall publish its bylaws in
convenient form and shall file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendments thereto
with the secretary of state or equivalent agency of each of the party states.

(3) The compact
committee may delegate the day-to-day management and administration of its
duties and responsibilities to an executive director and the executive
director's support staff.

(4) Employees of the
compact committee are considered governmental employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. No official of a party
state or employee of the compact committee shall be held personally liable for
any good faith act or omission that occurs during the performance and within
the scope of his or her responsibilities and duties under the live horse racing
compact.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) By enacting the
compact, each party state:

(a) Agrees: (i) To
accept the decisions of the compact committee regarding the issuance of compact
committee licenses to participants in live racing under the compact committee's
licensure requirements; and (ii) to reimburse or otherwise pay the expenses of
its official representative on the compact committee or his or her alternate;

(b) Agrees not to treat
a notification to an applicant by the compact committee under section 7(3) of
this act that the compact committee will not be able to process the application
further as the denial of a license, or to penalize such an applicant in any
other way based solely on such a decision by the compact committee; and

(c) Reserves the
right: (i) To charge a fee for the use of a compact committee license in that
state; (ii) to apply its own standards in determining whether, on the facts of
a particular case, a compact committee license should be suspended or revoked;
(iii) to apply its own standards in determining licensure eligibility, under
the laws of that party state, for categories of participants in live racing
that the compact committee determines not to license and for individual
participants in live racing who do not meet the licensure requirements of the
compact committee; and (iv) to establish its own licensure standards for the
licensure of nonracing employees at horse racetracks and employees at separate
satellite wagering facilities. Any party state that suspends or revokes a
compact committee license shall, through its racing commission or the
equivalent thereof or otherwise, promptly notify the compact committee of that
suspension or revocation.

(2) No party state
shall be held liable for the debts or other financial obligations incurred by
the compact committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. All departments,
agencies, and officers of the state of Washington and its political
subdivisions are authorized to cooperate with the compact committee in
furtherance of any of its activities of the live horse racing compact.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to diminish or limit the powers and responsibilities of the
Washington horse racing commission established in chapter 67.16 RCW or to
invalidate any action of the Washington horse racing commission previously taken,
including without limitation any regulation issued by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. This chapter shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes. The provisions of this
chapter are severable, and, if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of
the compact is declared to be contrary to the Constitution of the United States
or of any party state, or the applicability of the live horse racing compact to
any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity
of the remainder of the compact and the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If
all or some portion of the live horse racing compact is held to be contrary to
the constitution of any party state, the compact shall remain in full force and
effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the
state affected as to all severable matters.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. This act may be known and
cited as the live horse racing compact.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. Sections 1 through 15 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 67 RCW.

---
END ---