BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.32

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 It is unlawful to hunt wildlife with a crossbow.
However, a

_7 hunter who has a valid disabled hunter permit, and is
issued a

_8 special crossbow authorization by the director to use a
crossbow,

_9 may hunt wildlife. To qualify for a special crossbow
authorization

10 for the archery season, a person must have a permanent loss
of use

11 of one or both arms. A companion of a hunter with
disabilities may

12 not use a crossbow when assisting a hunter with
disabilities. The

13 commission shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of
this

14 section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5158