BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
43.250.010 and 1996 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The purpose of this chapter is to enable political

_8 subdivisions, community and technical college districts,
((and))

_9 the state board for community and technical colleges as

10 established in chapter 28B.50 RCW, and public
four-year

11 institutions of higher education to participate
with the state in

12 providing maximum opportunities for the investment of
surplus

13 public funds consistent with the safety and protection
of such

14 funds. The legislature finds and declares that the
public

15 interest is found in providing maximum prudent
investment of

16 surplus funds, thereby reducing the need for additional
taxation.

17 The legislature also recognizes that not all political

18 subdivisions are able to maximize the return on their
temporary

19 surplus funds. The legislature therefore provides in
this chapter

p. 1 SB
5159

_1 a mechanism whereby political subdivisions, community
and

_2 technical colleges, ((and)) the state board for
community and

_3 technical colleges, and public four-year institutions
of higher

_4 education may, at their option, utilize the
resources of the state

_5 treasurer's office to maximize the potential of surplus
funds

_6 while ensuring the safety of public funds.

_7 Sec. 2. RCW
43.250.020 and 1996 c 268 s 2 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

10 in this section shall apply throughout this chapter.

11 (1) "Public funds investment account" or
"investment pool"

12 means the aggregate of all funds as defined in
subsection (5) of

13 this section that are placed in the custody of the state
treasurer

14 for investment and reinvestment.

15 (2) "Political subdivision" means any
county, city, town,

16 municipal corporation, political subdivision, or special
purpose

17 taxing district in the state.

18 (3) "Local government official" means any
officer or employee

19 of a political subdivision who has been designated by
statute or

20 by local charter, ordinance, or resolution as the
officer having

21 the authority to invest the funds of the political
subdivision.

22 However, the county treasurer shall be deemed the only
local

23 government official for all political subdivisions for
which the

24 county treasurer has exclusive statutory authority to
invest the

25 funds thereof.

26 (4) "Financial officer" means the
board-appointed treasurer of

27 a community or technical college district ((or)),
the state board

28 for community and technical colleges, or a public
four-year

29 institution of higher education.

30 (5) "Funds" means:

31 (a) Public funds under the control of or in the
custody of any

32 local government official or local funds, as defined by
the office

33 of financial management publication "Policies,
Regulations and

34 Procedures," under the control of or in the custody
of a financial

35 officer by virtue of the official's authority that are
not

36 immediately required to meet current demands;

37 (b) State funds deposited in the investment pool by
the state

SB 5159 p. 2

_1 treasurer that are the proceeds of bonds, notes, or
other

_2 evidences of indebtedness authorized by the state
finance

_3 committee under chapter 39.42 RCW or payments pursuant
to

_4 financing contracts under chapter 39.94 RCW, when the
investments

_5 are made in order to comply with the Internal Revenue
Code of

_6 1986, as amended.

_7 Sec. 3. RCW
43.250.040 and 1996 c 268 s 3 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 If authorized by statute, local ordinance, or
resolution, a

10 local government official or financial officer or his
or her

11 designee may place funds into the public funds
investment account

12 for investment and reinvestment by the state treasurer
in those

13 securities and investments set forth in RCW 43.84.080
and chapter

14 39.58 RCW. The state treasurer shall invest the funds
in such

15 manner as to effectively maximize the yield to the
investment

16 pool. In investing and reinvesting moneys in the public
funds

17 investment account and in acquiring, retaining,
managing, and

18 disposing of investments of the investment pool, there
shall be

19 exercised the judgment and care under the circumstances
then

20 prevailing which persons of prudence, discretion, and
intelligence

21 exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in
regard to

22 speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition
of the

23 funds considering the probable income as well as the
probable

24 safety of the capital.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5159