BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless otherwise
exempt from property taxes, any increase in value of property for taxation
purposes over its 1999 valuation level, plus the lesser of two percent per year
or inflation, is exempt from property taxes.

(2) Unless otherwise
exempt from property taxes, any increase in value of property attributable to
construction or manufacture after 1999 over the true and fair value of the new
construction or manufacture as of December 31st of the year of construction or
manufacture, plus the lesser of two percent per year or inflation, is exempt
from property taxes.

(3) For purposes of
this section:

(a)
"Property" means real and personal property;

(b) "1999
valuation level" means the correct valuation shown on the property tax
statement in effect on January 1, 1999;

(c)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic
analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of the year before
the taxes are payable;

(d) "Constructed
or manufactured" does not include reconstruction after fire or other
natural disaster and does not include maintenance or replacement of existing
components, such as roofs, siding, windows, doors, and parts of equipment.

(4) Under this section,
all current and future property owners will have the same benefit of knowing
that the increase in their property's valuation for tax purposes, except for a
maximum of two percent per year, will be exempt from property taxes. This
guarantees that property taxes will be predictable and uniform for every
present and future property owner in this state. This predictability also
promotes neighborhood preservation, continuity, and stability in a manner which
treats all property taxpayers uniformly.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Increases in
property valuation attributable to maintenance improvements made after January
1, 1999, shall be exempt from property taxes. This exemption promotes
neighborhood preservation, continuity, and stability.

(2) For purposes of
this section, "maintenance improvements" includes:

(a) Reconstruction
after fire and natural disaster; and

(b)
Replacement of existing components such as roofs, siding, windows, doors, and
painting.

---
END ---