BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.17.020 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a chief
executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The secretary of
social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the director of
labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish
and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the director of
licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the director of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans
affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of health,
and (15) the director of financial institutions.

Such officers, except
((the secretary of transportation and)) the director of fish and
wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. ((The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041.)) The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.01.041 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The
executive head of the department of transportation shall be the secretary of
transportation, who shall be appointed by the ((transportation commission))
governor, with the consent of the senate, and may not take office or assume
duties until confirmed by the senate, and shall be paid a salary to be
fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. The
secretary shall be an ex officio member of the commission without a vote. The
secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the commission ((and be
responsible to it, and shall be guided by policies established by it)).
The secretary shall serve ((until removed by the commission, but only for
incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to
carry out the commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal shall be
acted on by the commission, the secretary shall be granted a hearing on formal
written charges before the full commission. An action by the commission to
remove the secretary shall be final)) at the pleasure of the governor.

---
END ---