BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The intent of this act is
to provide property tax relief by setting base years for property tax valuation
computation, and limiting the tax assessed on real property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this section and section 3 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Base
value" means the following, as appropriate:

(a) The assessed value
for 1998 determined under RCW 84.40.030 of property acquired in or before 1998;

(b) The assessed value
determined under RCW 84.40.030 of the property for the year in which the
property is acquired;

(c) The assessed true
and fair value as determined under RCW 84.40.030 for all property that has
significantly improved since the last assessment; or

(d) The assessed true
and fair value as determined under RCW 84.40.030 for all property that has
changed or transferred ownership since the last assessment.

(2)(a) "Change of
ownership" and "transfer of ownership" are equivalent, and mean
a transfer of a present interest in real property, including a transfer of the
beneficial use of real property.

(b) "Change of
ownership" and "transfer of ownership" include, except as
provided in (c) of this subsection:

(i) Contracting to
convey the title to or ownership of real property upon the fulfillment of one
or more stated conditions if the right to possession of the property is
transferred currently;

(ii) The creation,
transfer, or termination of a joint tenancy interest;

(iii) The creation,
transfer, or termination of a tenancy-in-common interest;

(iv) The vesting of a
right of possession or enjoyment of a remainder or reversionary interest that
occurs upon the termination of a life estate or other similar precedent
property interest;

(v) An interest that
vests in persons other than the trustor if a revocable trust becomes
irrevocable; and

(vi) The transfer of
stock of a cooperative housing corporation, vested with legal title to real
property, that conveys to the transferee the exclusive right to occupancy and
possession of the property or a portion of the property.

(c) "Change of
ownership" does not include:

(i) A transfer between
co‑owners that results in a change in the method of holding title to the
real property transferred without changing the proportional interests of the co‑owners
in the real property, such as a partition of a tenancy in common;

(ii) A transfer for the
purpose of merely perfecting title to the real property;

(iii) The creation,
assignment, termination, or reconveyance of a security interest in real
property, or the substitution of a trustee under a security instrument;

(iv) A transfer of real
property by the trustor, or by the trustor's spouse, or by both, into a trust
for so long as the transferor is the sole present beneficiary of the trust, or
the trust is revocable, or any transfer of real property by a trustee of such
trust back to the trustor;

(v) A transfer of real
property by an instrument whose terms reserve to the transferor an estate for
years or an estate for life. However, the termination of such an estate for
years or life estate shall constitute a change of ownership;

(vi) A transfer of real
property between or among the same parties for the purpose of correcting or
reforming a deed to express the true intention of the parties, if the original
relationship between the grantor and grantee is not changed; or

(vii) An interspousal
transfer of real property, including, but not limited to:

(A) Transfers to a
trustee for the beneficial use of a spouse, or the surviving spouse of a
deceased transferor, or by a trustee of the trust to the spouse of the trustor;

(B) Transfers that take
effect upon the death of a spouse;

(C) Transfers to a
spouse or former spouse in connection with a property settlement agreement or
decree of dissolution of marriage or legal separation; and

(D) The creation,
transfer, or termination, solely between spouses, of any co‑owner's
interest.

(3) "Significant
improvement" means reconstruction, remodeling, rehabilitation, extension,
or enlargement of all property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 84.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All property tax
assessments shall be computed using the base value of a property.

(2) The definitions in
section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION.
Sec. 4. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---