BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.10.802 and 1989
c 254 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824:

(1) "Institutions
of higher education" shall mean (1) any public university, college,
community college, or vocational-technical institute operated by the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof or (2) any other university,
college, school, or institute in the state of Washington offering instruction
beyond the high school level which is a member institution of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the board for the purposes of this section:
PROVIDED, That any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within
the state of Washington which is affiliated with an institution operating in
another state must be a separately accredited member institution of any such
accrediting association, or a branch of a member institution of an
accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for purposes of this
section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid assistance and has
operated as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site classroom
instruction for a minimum of ten consecutive years within the state of
Washington: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no institution of higher education
shall be eligible to participate in a student financial aid program unless it
agrees to and complies with program rules and regulations adopted pursuant to
RCW 28B.10.822.

(2) The term
"financial aid" shall mean loans and/or grants to needy students
enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of higher
education.

(3) The term
"needy student" shall mean a post high school student of an
institution of higher learning as defined in subsection (1) of this section who
demonstrates to the board the financial inability, either through the student's
parents, family and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room,
books, and tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter.

(4) The term
"disadvantaged student" shall mean a post high school student who by
reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental, experiential, familial
or other circumstances is unable to qualify for enrollment as a full time
student in an institution of higher learning, who would otherwise qualify as a
needy student, and who is attending an institution of higher learning under an
established program designed to qualify the student for enrollment as a full
time student.

(5)
"Commission" or "board" shall mean the higher education coordinating
board.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.12.030 and 1994
c 130 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings,
unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different meaning or
intent:

(1) The term
"needy student" shall mean a student enrolled or accepted for
enrollment at a post-secondary institution who, according to a system of need
analysis approved by the higher education coordinating board, demonstrates a
financial inability, either parental, familial, or personal, to bear the total
cost of education for any semester or quarter.

(2) The
term "eligible institution" shall mean any post-secondary institution
in this state accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges,
or a branch of a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by
rule of the board for purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal
student financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or
university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of ten
consecutive years within the state of Washington, or any public technical
college in the state.

---
END ---