BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the state

_7 energy strategy was developed in 1993 to assist the state
in

_8 meeting its goals of fostering the wise and efficient use
of

_9 energy and to promote energy self-sufficiency. The
legislature

10 further finds that, due to the recent energy shortages,

11 fluctuations in the price of natural gas, oil, and
electricity,

12 changing energy technologies, and the increased need for

13 conservation and development of renewable sources of
energy, the

14 state energy strategy is in need of review and revision.

15 Sec. 2. RCW 43.21F.090
and 1996 c 186 s 106 are each amended to

16 read as follows:

17 The department shall review and revise the state
energy

p. 1 SB
5167

_1 strategy ((as developed under section 1, chapter 201,
Laws of

_2 1991, periodically)), with the guidance of
an advisory committee

_3 comprised of the membership identified in section 3
of this act,

_4 at least every five years after July 1, 2001. ((For
each review, an

_5 advisory committee shall be established with a
membership

_6 resembling as closely as possible the original energy
strategy

_7 advisory committee specified under section 1, chapter
201, Laws of

_8 1991.)) Each review and revision shall be
finalized within two

_9 years. Upon completion of a public hearing
regarding the advisory

10 committee's advice and recommendations for revisions to
the energy

11 strategy, a written report shall be conveyed by the
department to

12 the governor and the appropriate legislative
committees. Any

13 advisory committee established under this section shall
be

14 dissolved within three months after their written report
is

15 conveyed.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21F

17 RCW to read as follows:

18 (1) The department shall create an advisory committee
for the

19 purpose of reviewing and revising the state energy
strategy. The

20 advisory committee shall include twenty-four members and
represent

21 different regions of the state, including seventeen
citizens

22 appointed by the director from the following groups: One
person

23 recommended by the investor-owned electric utilities, one
person

24 recommended by the investor-owned natural gas utilities,
one

25 person employed by or recommended by a natural gas pipeline

26 serving the state, one person recommended by the suppliers
of

27 petroleum products, one person recommended by municipally
owned

28 electric utilities, one person recommended by the public
utility

29 districts, one person recommended by industrial energy
users, one

30 person recommended by commercial energy users, one person

31 recommended by agricultural energy users, one person
recommended

32 by the association of Washington cities, one person
recommended by

33 the Washington state association of counties, three persons

34 recommended by organizations with expertise in consumer
affairs,

35 low-income issues, and energy conservation, two persons

36 recommended by environmental organizations, and one person

37 employed by an educational or nonprofit research
organization with

SB 5167 p. 2

_1 expertise in emerging energy technologies. In addition,
the

_2 advisory committee shall include one of the
representatives of the

_3 state of Washington to the Northwest power planning
council

_4 selected by the director; the chair of the energy
facility site

_5 evaluation council; one member of the utilities and
transportation

_6 commission selected by the chair of the commission; two
members of

_7 the house of representatives, one each selected by the
leader of

_8 each major party; and two members of the senate, one
each selected

_9 by the majority and minority leaders of the senate. The
chair of

10 the advisory committee shall be appointed by the
director from

11 citizen members. The director may establish technical
advisory

12 groups as necessary to assist in the development of the

13 strategy. The director shall provide for extensive public

14 involvement throughout the revision of the strategy.

15 (2) The committee's review and revision of the state
energy

16 strategy shall include consideration of state energy
goals and all

17 forms of energy, each major sector of energy
consumption, and

18 energy conservation, and shall:

19 (a) Assess future needs of the state and future
resources

20 available for use in the state for each form of energy;

21 (b) Identify strategies to increase the use of
renewable forms

22 of energy, increase conservation, and achieve a
reliable, long-

23 term sustainable supply of energy;

24 (c) Identify strategies to increase rate
predictability,

25 stability, and affordability;

26 (d) Identify and, to the extent possible, quantify
the costs

27 and benefits of: (i) Energy alternatives including
direct

28 economic costs and benefits, environmental costs and
benefits, and

29 the costs of inadequate or unreliable energy supplies;
and (ii) a

30 long-term sustainable supply of energy;

31 (e) Consider revision to the framework in which
public

32 decisions and actions affecting energy supply and use
can be

33 evaluated including the impact of decisions in other
areas of

34 public policy on energy supply and cost and on the use
of energy

35 and the establishment of goals to guide energy-related
decisions;

36 (f) Evaluate the effects of regulatory actions taken
by other

37 western states or Canada that may impact the supply or
cost of

38 energy in Washington state;

p. 3 SB
5167

_1 (g) Evaluate the future role of the department and
means of

_2 financing those activities determined essential to that
role; and

_3 (h) Recommend energy goals and policies to the
governor and the

_4 legislature.

_5 (3) In reviewing and revising the state energy
strategy, the

_6 department shall:

_7 (a) Ensure that the information developed is
objective and

_8 impartial and facilitates the effective and efficient
operation of

_9 such energy markets as may exist and recognizes and
conforms to

10 the pattern of regulation governing public service
companies but

11 shall not mandate the use of one energy source over
another;

12 (b) Draw upon existing public and private sector
information

13 and expertise in energy matters to the fullest extent
possible

14 through consultation and cooperation;

15 (c) Recognize the planning horizons required for
each segment

16 of the energy industry and the need for state actions
and

17 decisions to take those planning horizons into consideration;
and

18 (d) Ensure that the strategy is coordinated with the
energy

19 planning activities of federal, state, and private
entities and

20 does not duplicate what is already available.

21 Sec. 4. RCW 43.21F.025
and 1996 c 186 s 102 are each amended to

22 read as follows:

23 (1) "Energy" means petroleum or other liquid
fuels; natural or

24 synthetic fuel gas; solid carbonaceous fuels; fissionable
nuclear

25 material; electricity; solar radiation; geothermal
resources;

26 hydropower; organic waste products; wind; tidal activity;
any

27 other substance or process used to produce heat, light, or
motion;

28 or the savings from nongeneration technologies, including

29 conservation or improved efficiency in the usage of any of
the

30 sources described in this subsection;

31 (2) "Person" means an individual,
partnership, joint venture,

32 private or public corporation, association, firm, public
service

33 company, political subdivision, municipal corporation,
government

34 agency, public utility district, joint operating agency, or
any

35 other entity, public or private, however organized;

36 (3) "Director" means the director of the
department of

37 community, trade, and economic development;

SB 5167 p. 4

_1 (4) "Assistant director" means the
assistant director of the

_2 department of community, trade, and economic development

_3 responsible for energy policy activities;

_4 (5) "Department" means the department of
community, trade, and

_5 economic development;

_6 (6) "Distributor" means any person,
private corporation,

_7 partnership, individual proprietorship, utility,
including

_8 investor-owned utilities, municipal utility, public
utility

_9 district, joint operating agency, or cooperative, which
engages in

10 or is authorized to engage in the activity of
generating,

11 transmitting, or distributing energy in this state; and

12 (7) "State energy strategy" means the
document and energy

13 policy direction originally developed under
section 1, chapter

14 201, Laws of 1991 including any related appendices,
as revised

15 pursuant to RCW 43.21F.090.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary
for the immediate

17 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

18 the state government and its existing public institutions,
and

19 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5167