BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.051 and 1996
c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing board
of each of the state universities, the regional universities, ((and))
The Evergreen State College, and each of the community or technical
colleges, upon the written agreement of its respective student government
association or its equivalent, may establish and charge each enrolled student a
technology fee, separate from tuition fees. During the 1996-97 academic year,
any technology fee shall not exceed one hundred twenty dollars for a full-time
student. Any technology fee charged to a part-time student shall be calculated
as a pro rata share of the fee charged to a full-time student.

(2) Revenue from this
fee and the state general fund match shall be used exclusively for
technology resources for general student use.

(3) Only changes in the
amount of the student technology fee agreed upon by both the governing board
and its respective student government association or its equivalent shall be
used to adjust the amount charged to students. Changes in the amount charged
to students, once implemented, become the basis for future changes.

(4) Annually, the
student government association or its equivalent may abolish the fee by a
majority vote. In the event of such a vote, the student government association
or its equivalent shall notify the governing board of the institution. The fee
shall cease being collected the term after the student government association
or its equivalent voted to eliminate the fee.

(5) The student
government association or its equivalent shall approve the annual expenditure
plan for the fee revenue.

(6) After one year
of collection and expenditures, the technology fees collected by each of the
colleges or universities shall be matched by the state on a dollar-for-dollar
basis. The maximum annual state general fund match per campus shall be four
hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(7) The
universities ((and)), The Evergreen State College, and the
community and technical colleges shall deposit three and one-half percent
of revenues from the technology fee, including the state general fund match,
into the institutional financial aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(((7))) (8)
As used in this section, "technology fee" is a fee charged to
students to recover, in whole or in part, the costs of providing and
maintaining services to students that include, but need not be limited to:
Access to the internet and world wide web, e-mail, computer and multimedia work
stations and laboratories, computer software, and dial-up telephone services.

(((8)))
(9) Prior to the establishment of a technology fee, a governing board
shall provide to the student governing body a list of existing fees of a
similar nature or for a similar purpose. The board and the student governing
body shall ensure that student fees for technology are not duplicative.

--- END ---