BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
recognizes that commuting

_7 accounts for more trips and miles traveled than any other
single

_8 purpose. The legislature also recognizes that telework
has been

_9 found to reduce commute trips and provide flexibility for
work-

10 related travel. Additionally, telework enables employers
to allow

11 employees to work outside of urban areas, which reduces
urban

12 commute trips while strengthening rural economies. The
legislature

13 further recognizes that telework is a key component in a

14 comprehensive transportation demand management package.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04

16 RCW to read as follows:

17 (1) An employer is allowed a credit against tax due
under this

p. 1 SB
5169

_1 chapter for telework expenditures, including telework
equipment,

_2 installation costs, and telework training. A credit
claimed under

_3 this section may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise

_4 be due under this chapter. The credit must be claimed
in the year

_5 in which the expenditure is made. The employer must
make the

_6 expenditure the year in which the credit is approved by
the

_7 department. Approved credit may not be carried over to
subsequent

_8 calendar years. The credit must be claimed by the due
date of the

_9 last tax return for the calendar year in which the
expenditure is

10 made. Any unused credit expires. A refund may not be
given in place

11 of a credit. Total credits claimed by a person under
this section

12 and section 3 of this act may not exceed twenty thousand
dollars

13 for any tax year. Expenditures made before the
effective date of

14 this act are not eligible for credit. If a person has
used a credit

15 approved under section 3 of this act against tax under
chapter

16 82.16 RCW, that same credit cannot be used against tax
under this

17 chapter.

18 (2) Application for credits under this section must
be made

19 before making a telework expenditure. Applications must
be made to

20 the department in a form and manner as required by the

21 department. The department shall approve or deny
applications for

22 credits using the criteria under this subsection. The
department

23 shall keep a running total of all credits approved under
this

24 subsection during each calendar year, and shall deny any
credit

25 application that would cause the tabulation for any
calendar year

26 to exceed three million dollars. A person claiming a
credit must

27 keep records as necessary for the department to verify
eligibility

28 under this section, including records showing that an
employee was

29 regularly scheduled to telework from his or her home two
or more

30 days per week.

31 (3) The definitions in this subsection apply for the
purposes

32 of this section.

33 (a) "Telework" means a work arrangement
whereby employees are

34 regularly scheduled two or more days per week to perform
the

35 normal duties and responsibilities of their positions at
locations

36 other than the traditional workplace, through use of
computers or

37 telecommunications. The term includes only work
arrangements made

SB 5169 p. 2

_1 by employers for employees and excludes persons who are
self-

_2 employed.

_3 (b) "Telework equipment" means:

_4 (i) Desktop and laptop computers, computer-related
hardware,

_5 facsimile machines, modems, and similar data processing
or

_6 telecommunication equipment used only at an alternate
worksite,

_7 including an employee's home for telework purposes; and

_8 (ii) Equipment installed at an employer's place of
business

_9 that is used exclusively to provide remote data and
voice access

10 to telework employees.

11 (c) "Telework expenditures" means amounts
spent, including

12 sales or use taxes paid, to purchase telework equipment
or for

13 telework installation costs. The term includes only
expenditures

14 for equipment and services reasonably necessary to
facilitate

15 telework.

16 (d) "Telework installation costs" means
one-time expenditures

17 for installation of telecommunication access lines at an

18 employee's home for the purpose of telework.

19 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16

20 RCW to read as follows:

21 An employer is allowed a credit against tax due under
this

22 chapter for telework expenditures, as defined in section 2
of this

23 act. A credit may be claimed under this section in the
same manner

24 as provided for credits under section 2 of this act.
Credits under

25 this section are subject to the same conditions and
limitations as

26 credits under section 2 of this act.

27 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5169