BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.94.521 and 1997 c
250 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that automotive traffic in Washington's metropolitan areas is the major source
of emissions of air contaminants. This air pollution causes significant harm
to public health, causes damage to trees, plants, structures, and materials and
degrades the quality of the environment.

Increasing automotive
traffic is also aggravating traffic congestion in Washington's metropolitan
areas. This traffic congestion imposes significant costs on Washington's
businesses, governmental agencies, and individuals in terms of lost working
hours and delays in the delivery of goods and services. Traffic congestion
worsens automobile-related air pollution, increases the consumption of fuel,
and degrades the habitability of many of Washington's cities and suburban
areas. The capital and environmental costs of fully accommodating the existing
and projected automobile traffic on roads and highways are prohibitive.
Decreasing the demand for vehicle trips is significantly less costly and at
least as effective in reducing traffic congestion and its impacts as
constructing new transportation facilities such as roads and bridges, to
accommodate increased traffic volumes.

The legislature also
finds that increasing automotive transportation is a major factor in increasing
consumption of gasoline and, thereby, increasing reliance on imported sources
of petroleum. Moderating the growth in automotive travel is essential to
stabilizing and reducing dependence on imported petroleum and improving the
nation's energy security.

The legislature further
finds that reducing the number of commute trips to work made via
single-occupant cars and light trucks is an effective way of reducing
automobile-related air pollution, traffic congestion, and energy use. Major
employers have significant opportunities to encourage and facilitate reducing
single-occupant vehicle commuting by employees. In addition, the legislature
also recognizes the importance of increasing individual citizens' awareness of
air quality, energy consumption, and traffic congestion, and the contribution
individual actions can make towards addressing these issues.

The legislature
further finds that telework has been found to reduce commute trips and provide
flexibility for work-related travel. Additionally, telework enables employers
to allow employees to work outside urban areas, which reduces commute trips
while strengthening rural economies. Telework is a key component in a
comprehensive transportation demand management package.

The intent of this
chapter is to require local governments in those counties experiencing the
greatest automobile-related air pollution and traffic congestion to develop and
implement plans to reduce single-occupant vehicle commute trips. Such plans
shall require major employers and employers at major worksites to implement
programs to reduce single-occupant vehicle commuting by employees at major
worksites. Local governments in counties experiencing significant but less
severe automobile-related air pollution and traffic congestion may implement
such plans. State agencies shall implement programs to reduce single-occupant
vehicle commuting at all major worksites throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commute trip
reduction task force must include a telework enhancement committee. The task
force shall select the members of the telework enhancement committee. The
committee membership may consist of nonmembers and members of the commute trip
reduction task force. The committee shall select grants and loans for telework
enhancement projects and telework activities, to be approved by the commute
trip reduction task force. Funding for the grants and loans must be from the
amounts appropriated by the legislature to the commute trip reduction task
force for this purpose. The task force shall award grants and loans to
telework enhancement projects on a statewide basis. The committee shall not
limit grants and loans to projects in cities and counties meeting the
requirements of RCW 70.94.527.

(2) The task force
shall develop procedures and criteria for allocation of funds for the telework
enhancement projects and telework activities on a statewide basis to address
the highest priorities for enhancing telework.

(3) In evaluating,
ranking, and awarding funds for projects and activities the task force shall
give preference to projects that:

(a) Encourage and
assist employers to provide telework opportunities for employees;

(b) Provide assistance
to employers to locate jobs outside the congested Puget Sound urban areas; or

(c) Assist in
developing telecommunications infrastructure in rural and underserved
communities.

(4) In evaluating,
ranking, and awarding funds for projects and activities the task force shall
also give consideration to projects that:

(a) Are the most
cost-effective;

(b) Have the greatest
matched or in-kind funding; and

(c) Will be implemented
by a sponsor with a successful record of project implementation.

(5) The commute trip
reduction task force shall determine the effectiveness of this subcommittee as
part of its ongoing evaluation of the commute trip reduction law and report to
the legislature. The report must be incorporated into the recommendations
required in RCW 70.94.537(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

The telework
enhancement account is created in the state treasury. Such funds as the
legislature directs or appropriates to the account will be deposited to the
account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for telework enhancement
projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001.

---
END ---