BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
recognizes that commuting

_5 accounts for more trips and miles traveled than any other
single

_6 purpose. The legislature also recognizes that telework
has been

_7 found to reduce commute trips and provide flexibility for
work-

_8 related travel. Additionally, telework enables employers
to allow

_9 employees to work outside of urban areas, which reduces
urban

10 commute trips while strengthening rural economies. The
legislature

11 further recognizes that telework is a key component in a

12 comprehensive transportation demand management package.
Therefore,

13 it is the legislature's intent to decrease traffic
congestion with

14 the creation of the telework enhancement funding board.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. As used in this
chapter, "telework" means

16 a work arrangement whereby employees are regularly
scheduled to

17 perform the normal duties and responsibilities of their
positions

p. 1 SB
5171

_1 at locations other than the traditional workplace,
through the use

_2 of computers or telecommunications. The term includes
only work

_3 arrangements made by employers for employees and
excludes persons

_4 who are self-employed.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The telework
enhancement funding board

_6 is created consisting of seven members.

_7 (2) Five members of the board are voting members
appointed by

_8 the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate. One
of these

_9 voting members must be a cabinet-level appointment as the

10 governor's representative to the board. The governor
shall appoint

11 one of the general public members of the board as the
chair. The

12 voting members of the board will be appointed for terms of
four

13 years, except that two members initially will be appointed
for

14 terms of two years, and three members will initially be
appointed

15 for terms of three years. In making the appointments, the
governor

16 shall seek a board membership that collectively provide
the

17 expertise necessary to provide strong fiscal oversight of
telework

18 enhancement projects. The governor shall appoint at least
three of

19 the voting members of the board no later than ninety days
after

20 the effective date of this act. Vacant positions on the
board will

21 be filled in the same manner as original appointments.
The governor

22 may remove members of the board for good cause.

23 In addition to the five voting members of the board,
the

24 following three state officials shall serve as ex officio

25 nonvoting members of the board: The secretary of the
department of

26 transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation

27 commission, and the director of the department of
community,

28 trade, and economic development. The state officials
serving in an

29 ex officio capacity may designate a representative of
their

30 respective agencies to serve on the board in their
behalf. The

31 designations must be made in writing and in a manner as
specified

32 by the board.

33 (3) The department of transportation shall provide
staff

34 support to the board. For administrative purposes, the
board is

35 located with the department of transportation.

36 (4) Members of the board who do not represent state
agencies

SB 5171 p. 2

_1 will be compensated as provided by RCW 43.03.250.
Members of the

_2 board will be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
by RCW

_3 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The board is
responsible for making

_5 grants and loans for telework enhancement projects and
telework

_6 activities from the amounts appropriated to the board for
this

_7 purpose. To accomplish this purpose the board may:

_8 (a) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding
the

_9 procedures and criteria for grant and loan awards;

10 (b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and
agreements

11 with public and private parties as the board deems
necessary,

12 consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

13 (c) Accept gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property,
or

14 financial or other aid in any form from any other source
on any

15 terms that are not in conflict with this chapter;

16 (d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary
to carry

17 out the purposes of this chapter; and

18 (e) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to
carry out

19 the powers expressly granted or implied under this
chapter.

20 (2) The department of transportation shall provide all

21 necessary grants and loans administration assistance to
the board,

22 and shall distribute funds as provided by the board in
section 5

23 of this act.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The board shall
develop procedures and

25 criteria for allocation of funds for telework enhancement
projects

26 and telework activities on a statewide basis to address
the

27 highest priorities for enhancing telework. To the extent

28 practicable the board shall adopt an annual allocation of

29 funding. The allocation should address the acceleration
of telework

30 in Washington. The board may annually establish a maximum
amount of

31 funding available for any individual project, subject to available

32 funding.

33 (2)(a) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for
projects

34 and activities the board shall give preference to projects
that:

35 (i) Provide incentives to employers to provide
telework

36 opportunities for employees;

p. 3 SB
5171

_1 (ii) Provide incentives and assistance to employers
to locate

_2 jobs outside the congested Puget Sound urban areas; or

_3 (iii) Assist in developing telecommunications
infrastructure in

_4 rural and underserved communities.

_5 (b) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for
projects and

_6 activities the board shall also give consideration to
projects

_7 that:

_8 (i) Are the most cost-effective;

_9 (ii) Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding;
and

10 (iii) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a
successful record

11 of project implementation.

12 (3) The board may waive or modify portions of the
allocation

13 procedures and standards adopted under this section in
the award

14 of grants or loans to conform to legislative
appropriations

15 directing an alternative award procedure or when the
funds to be

16 awarded are from federal or other sources requiring
other

17 allocation procedures or standards as a condition of the
board's

18 receipt of the funds. The board shall develop an
integrated process

19 to manage the allocation of funding from federal and
state sources

20 to minimize delays in the award of funding while
recognizing the

21 difference in state and legislative appropriation
timing.

22 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) Telework project
lists must be

23 submitted to the telework enhancement funding board for
funding by

24 January 1st and July 1st of each year beginning in 2001.
Beginning

25 in 2002, the board shall provide the legislature with a
list of

26 the proposed projects and a list of the projects funded by
October

27 1st of each year for informational purposes.

28 (2) The department of transportation shall track all
funds

29 allocated for telework enhancement projects and telework

30 activities on behalf of the board, including both funds
allocated

31 by the board and funds allocated by other state or federal

32 agencies for telework enhancement.

33 (3) Beginning in December 2002, the board shall
provide a

34 biennial report to the governor and the legislature on
telework

35 enhancement expenditures.

36 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The telework
enhancement account is

SB 5171 p. 4

_1 created in the state treasury. Such funds as the
legislature

_2 directs or appropriates to the account will be deposited
to the

_3 account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after

_4 appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used for

_5 telework enhancement.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The department of
transportation shall

_7 provide necessary grants and loan administration support
to the

_8 telework enhancement funding board. The department shall
also track

_9 telework enhancement expenditures. The department shall
provide all

10 necessary administrative support to the board, and the
board will

11 be located with the department.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act

13 constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5171