BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons receiving
public assistance, particularly families, frequently have great difficulty
obtaining adequate housing. The department of social and health services is
directed to conduct a program designed to increase the supply of housing for
persons on public assistance by making rental payments directly to the
landlords.

(2) The department
shall explore the use of public and private housing providers in the
implementation of the program.

(3) The department
shall solicit not less than three and up to seven local governing bodies for
participation in the program. In implementing this program the department
shall:

(a) Stress that
participation in the program by recipients on public assistance is voluntary;

(b) Utilize the
services of either local public or private housing providers, or both, to the
maximum extent feasible; and

(c) Give consideration
to obtaining a geographic distribution and balance throughout the state when
selecting participating local governing bodies.

(4) Prior
to the convening of the 2002 regular session of the legislature, the department
shall report the results of the program, together with its recommendations, to
the co-chairs of the house of representatives committee on economic
development, housing and trade and the chair of the senate committee on labor
and workforce development.

--- END ---