BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.20.050 and 1993 c
492 s 489 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board of
health shall provide a forum for the development of public health policy in
Washington state. It is authorized to recommend to the secretary means for
obtaining appropriate citizen and professional involvement in all public health
policy formulation and other matters related to the powers and duties of the
department. It is further empowered to hold hearings and explore ways to
improve the health status of the citizenry.

(a) At least every five
years, the state board shall convene regional forums to gather citizen input on
public health issues.

(b) Every two years, in
coordination with the development of the state biennial budget, the state board
shall prepare the state public health report that outlines the health
priorities of the ensuing biennium. The report shall:

(i) Consider the
citizen input gathered at the forums;

(ii) Be developed with
the assistance of local health departments;

(iii) Be based on the
best available information collected and reviewed according to RCW 43.70.050 ((and
recommendations from the council));

(iv) Be developed with
the input of state health care agencies. At least the following directors of
state agencies shall provide timely recommendations to the state board on
suggested health priorities for the ensuing biennium: The secretary of social
and health services, the health care authority administrator, the insurance
commissioner, the superintendent of public instruction, the director of labor
and industries, the director of ecology, and the director of agriculture;

(v) Be used by state
health care agency administrators in preparing proposed agency budgets and
executive request legislation;

(vi) Be submitted by
the state board to the governor by January 1st of each even-numbered
year for adoption by the governor. The governor, no later than March 1st
of that year, shall approve, modify, or disapprove the state public health
report.

(c) In fulfilling its
responsibilities under this subsection, the state board may create ad hoc
committees or other such committees of limited duration as necessary.

(2) In order to protect
public health, the state board of health shall:

(a) Adopt rules necessary
to assure safe and reliable public drinking water and to protect the public
health. Such rules shall establish requirements regarding:

(i) The design and
construction of public water system facilities, including proper sizing of
pipes and storage for the number and type of customers;

(ii) Drinking water
quality standards, monitoring requirements, and laboratory certification
requirements;

(iii) Public water
system management and reporting requirements;

(iv) Public water
system planning and emergency response requirements;

(v) Public water system
operation and maintenance requirements;

(vi) Water quality,
reliability, and management of existing but inadequate public water systems;
and

(vii) Quality standards
for the source or supply, or both source and supply, of water for bottled water
plants((.));

(b) Adopt rules and
standards for prevention, control, and abatement of health hazards and
nuisances related to the disposal of wastes, solid and liquid, including but
not limited to sewage, garbage, refuse, and other environmental contaminants;
adopt standards and procedures governing the design, construction, and
operation of sewage, garbage, refuse and other solid waste collection,
treatment, and disposal facilities;

(c) Adopt rules
controlling public health related to environmental conditions including but not
limited to heating, lighting, ventilation, sanitary facilities, cleanliness,
and space in all types of public facilities including but not limited to food
service establishments, schools, institutions, recreational facilities and
transient accommodations and in places of work;

(d) Adopt rules
establishing a letter grade based on an inspection scoring system for all food
service establishments and requiring the posting of a letter grade card upon
issuance at the food service establishment so as to be clearly visible to the
general public and to customers entering the food service establishment;

(e) Adopt rules
for the imposition and use of isolation and quarantine;

(((e))) (f)
Adopt rules for the prevention and control of infectious and noninfectious
diseases, including food and vector borne illness, and rules governing the
receipt and conveyance of remains of deceased persons, and such other sanitary
matters as admit of and may best be controlled by universal rule; and

(((f))) (g)
Adopt rules for accessing existing data bases for the purposes of performing
health related research.

(3) The state board may
delegate any of its rule-adopting authority to the secretary and rescind such
delegated authority.

(4) All local boards of
health, health authorities and officials, officers of state institutions,
police officers, sheriffs, constables, and all other officers and employees of
the state, or any county, city, or township thereof, shall enforce all rules
adopted by the state board of health. In the event of failure or refusal on
the part of any member of such boards or any other official or person mentioned
in this section to so act, he or she shall be subject to a fine of not
less than fifty dollars, upon first conviction, and not less than one hundred
dollars upon second conviction.

(5) The
state board may advise the secretary on health policy issues pertaining to the
department of health and the state.

--- END ---