BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that: (1) Protecting the well-being, tranquility, and privacy of the home is
of significant concern to many citizens; and (2) for many people, unwanted
commercial telephone solicitations constitute an invasion of the well-being, tranquility,
and privacy of the home. The legislature intends, therefore, to assist
citizens in protecting the well-being, tranquility, and privacy of their homes
by creating a process through which residential telephone subscribers can
choose to be free from unwanted commercial telephone solicitations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The attorney
general shall provide for the establishment and operation of a public listing
of residential telephone numbers whose subscribers have affirmatively requested
not to receive commercial telephone solicitations. The attorney general may
contract with a private vendor to establish, operate, and maintain such
registry in accordance with the requirements of this section. The attorney
general and the utilities and transportation commission shall make reasonable
efforts, within existing resources, to publicize the availability of the public
listing and the method or methods by which residential telephone subscribers
may have their telephone numbers placed on the list. The listing shall be
available for inspection by the public in written and electronic form. The
listing shall be periodically transmitted to a national telephone preference
service for the purpose of removing individuals from national telemarketing
lists.

(2) No fee may be
charged to residential telephone subscribers for placing their numbers on the
list. A reasonable fee, as determined by the attorney general, may be charged
to inspect the list in written or electronic form.

(3) It is unlawful and
a violation of this section for any person to make a commercial telephone
solicitation call to any residential telephone number that: (a) Is contained
on the public listing under subsection (1) of this section; and (b) has been on
the list for at least ten business days prior to the making of the commercial
telephone solicitation.

(4) In addition to any
other penalties or remedies available under this chapter or chapter 19.86 RCW,
a person injured by a violation of subsection (3) of this section may bring an
action for recovery of liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars
per violation, plus court costs and attorneys' fees.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.158.110 and 1989
c 20 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within the first
minute of the telephone call, a commercial telephone solicitor or salesperson
shall:

(a) Identify himself or
herself, the company on whose behalf the solicitation is being made, the
property, goods, or services being sold; and

(b) Terminate the
telephone call within ten seconds if the purchaser indicates he or she does not
wish to continue the conversation.

(2) If at any time
during the telephone contact, the purchaser states or indicates that he or she
does not wish to be called again by the commercial telephone solicitor or wants
to have his or her name and individual telephone number removed from the
telephone lists used by the commercial telephone solicitor:

(a) The commercial
telephone solicitor shall not make any additional commercial telephone
solicitation of the called party at that telephone number within a period of at
least one year; and

(b) The commercial
telephone solicitor shall not sell or give the called party's name and
telephone number to another commercial telephone solicitor: PROVIDED, That the
commercial telephone solicitor may return the list, including the called
party's name and telephone number, to the company or organization from which it
received the list.

(3) The utilities and
transportation commission shall by rule ensure that telecommunications
companies inform their residential customers of the provisions of this section and
section 2 of this act. The notification may be made by:

(a) Annual inserts in
the billing statements mailed to residential customers; or

(b) Conspicuous
publication of the notice in the consumer information pages of local telephone
directories.

(4) If a sale or an
agreement to purchase is completed, the commercial telephone solicitor must
inform the purchaser of his or her cancellation rights as enunciated in this
chapter, state the registration number issued by the department of licensing,
and give the street address of the seller.

(5) If, at any time prior
to sale or agreement to purchase, the commercial telephone solicitor's
registration number is requested by the purchaser, it must be provided.

(6) All
oral disclosures required by this section shall be made in a clear and
intelligible manner.

---
END ---