BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 3.66 RCW to read as follows:

All court-ordered
restitution obligations that are ordered as a result of a conviction for a
criminal offense in a court of limited jurisdiction may be enforced in the same
manner as a judgment in a civil action by the party or entity to whom the legal
financial obligation is owed. The judgment and sentence must identify the
party or entity to whom restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity
may enforce the judgment.

All court-ordered
restitution obligations may be enforced at any time during the ten-year period
following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten years of
entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. Prior to the
expiration of the initial ten-year period, the court may extend the criminal
judgment an additional ten years for payment of court-ordered financial obligations.

The party or entity to
whom the court-ordered restitution obligation is owed may utilize any other
remedies available to the party or entity to collect the court-ordered
financial obligation.

Nothing in this section
may be construed to deprive the court of the authority to determine whether the
offender's failure to pay the legal financial obligation constitutes a
violation of a condition of probation or to impose a sanction upon the offender
if such a violation is found.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 3.66 RCW to read as follows:

If the party or entity
for whom a court-ordered restitution obligation has been entered pursuant to
this title seeks to enforce the judgment as a lien on real estate, he or she
shall commence a lien of judgment upon the real estate of the judgment
debtor/obligor as provided in RCW 4.56.200.

When any
court-ordered restitution obligation entered pursuant to this title is paid or
satisfied, the clerk of the court of limited jurisdiction in which the
restitution obligation was ordered shall note upon the record of the court of
limited jurisdiction satisfaction thereof including the date of the
satisfaction.

---
END ---