BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.51A.040 and 1999
c 2 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If charged with a
violation of state law relating to marijuana, any qualifying patient who is
engaged in the medical use of marijuana, or any designated primary caregiver
who assists a qualifying patient in the medical use of marijuana, will be deemed
to have established an affirmative defense to such charges by proof of his or
her compliance with the requirements provided in this chapter. Any person
meeting the requirements appropriate to his or her status under this chapter
shall be considered to have engaged in activities permitted by this chapter and
shall not be penalized in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, for
such actions.

(2) The qualifying
patient, if eighteen years of age or older, shall:

(a) Meet all criteria
for status as a qualifying patient;

(b) Possess no more
marijuana than is necessary for the patient's personal, medical use, not
exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply, as determined in rule
by the department of health; and

(c) Present his or her
valid documentation to any law enforcement official who questions the patient
regarding his or her medical use of marijuana.

(3) The qualifying
patient, if under eighteen years of age, shall comply with subsection (2)(a)
and (c) of this section. However, any possession under subsection (2)(b) of
this section, as well as any production, acquisition, and decision as to dosage
and frequency of use, shall be the responsibility of the parent or legal
guardian of the qualifying patient.

(4) The designated
primary caregiver shall:

(a) Meet all criteria
for status as a primary caregiver to a qualifying patient;

(b) Possess, in
combination with and as an agent for the qualifying patient, no more marijuana
than is necessary for the patient's personal, medical use, not exceeding the
amount necessary for a sixty-day supply;

(c) Present a copy of
the qualifying patient's valid documentation required by this chapter, as well
as evidence of designation to act as primary caregiver by the patient, to any
law enforcement official requesting such information;

(d) Be prohibited from
consuming marijuana obtained for the personal, medical use of the patient for
whom the individual is acting as primary caregiver; and

(e) Be the primary
caregiver to only one patient at any one time.

(5) In
adopting rules under subsection (2)(b) of this section, the department of
health shall consider any guidelines established by the United States
department of health and human services in its administration of the federal
investigational new drug program for medical marijuana.

--- END ---