BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.65.410 and 1993 c
340 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every diver
engaged in the commercial harvest of geoduck clams shall obtain a ((nontransferable))
transferable geoduck diver license.

(2) After July 1,
2001, the director shall not issue new geoduck diver licenses unless fewer than
fifty persons are eligible for renewal. A person may renew an existing license
only if the person: (a) Held a geoduck diver license for seven of the ten
years from 1991 through 2000; (b) held a license for the previous three years
from 1998 through 2000 and can document active diving participation for each of
the three years by way of dive sheet records, canceled checks, and confirmation
by the department; or (c) acquired the license by transfer from another person
who held it during the previous year, and the person did not subsequently
transfer the license to a third party.

(3) If fewer than
fifty persons are eligible to renew a geoduck diver license, the director may
accept applications for new licenses. The department shall adopt rules and
procedures to determine whether additional diver licenses will be issued and
the application procedure. The director shall determine by random selection,
from all otherwise qualified applicants, the successful applicants for any
additional licenses.

(4) When a person
fails to obtain a license during the previous year because of a license
suspension, a person may qualify for a license by establishing that he or she
held such a license during the last year in which the license was not
suspended.

(5) Geoduck diver
licenses are transferable only to a natural person. The license holder must
perform the actual harvesting.

(6) Licensed
geoduck harvesters bear the responsibility for providing the labor and
equipment to plant geoduck seed provided by a state hatchery onto state
commercial beds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---