BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 36.28A

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs

_8 shall integrate a victim notification system into its
electronic

_9 statewide city and county jail booking and reporting system

10 described in RCW 36.28A.040.

11 (2) At a minimum, the victim notification system shall
provide

12 to victims of crime who have made a notification request,

13 notification of information received by the statewide city
and

14 county jail booking and reporting system about the release
or

15 transfer of an incarcerated person from a local jail.

16 (3) The Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs is

17 not required to activate the victim notification component

p. 1 ESSB
5179

_1 described in this section unless the victim notification
component

_2 is funded by the federal, state, or local government.

_3 Sec. 2. RCW 36.28A.040
and 2000 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 (1) No later than ((December 31, 2001)) July
1, 2002, the

_6 Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall

_7 implement and operate an electronic state-wide city and
county

_8 jail booking and reporting system. The system shall serve
as a

_9 central repository and instant information source for
offender

10 information and jail statistical data. The system shall be
placed

11 on the Washington state justice information network and be
capable

12 of communicating electronically with every Washington state
city

13 and county jail and with all other Washington state
criminal

14 justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030.

15 (2) After the Washington association of sheriffs and
police

16 chiefs has implemented an electronic jail booking system as

17 described in subsection (1) of this section, if a city or
county

18 jail or law enforcement agency receives state or federal
funding

19 to cover the entire cost of implementing or reconfiguring
an

20 electronic jail booking system, the city or county jail or
law

21 enforcement agency shall implement or reconfigure an
electronic

22 jail booking system that is in compliance with the jail booking

23 system standards developed pursuant to subsection (4) of
this

24 section.

25 (3) After the Washington association of sheriffs and
police

26 chiefs has implemented an electronic jail booking system as

27 described in subsection (1) of this section, city or county
jails,

28 or law enforcement agencies that operate electronic jail
booking

29 systems, but choose not to accept state or federal money to

30 implement or reconfigure electronic jail booking systems,
shall

31 electronically forward jail booking information to the
Washington

32 association of sheriffs and police chiefs. At a minimum
the

33 information forwarded shall include the name of the
offender,

34 vital statistics, the date the offender was arrested, the
offenses

35 arrested for, the date and time an offender is released
or

36 transferred from a city or county jail, and if
available, the mug

37 shot. The electronic format in which the information is
sent shall

ESSB 5179 p. 2

_1 be at the discretion of the city or county jail, or law

_2 enforcement agency forwarding the information. City and
county

_3 jails or law enforcement agencies that forward jail
booking

_4 information under this subsection are not required to
comply with

_5 the standards developed under subsection (4)(b) of this
section.

_6 (4) The Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs

_7 shall appoint, convene, and manage a state-wide jail
booking and

_8 reporting system standards committee. The committee
shall include

_9 representatives from the Washington association of
sheriffs and

10 police chiefs correction committee, the information
service

11 board's justice information committee, the judicial
information

12 system, at least two individuals who serve as jailers in
a city or

13 county jail, and other individuals that the Washington
association

14 of sheriffs and police chiefs places on the committee.
The

15 committee shall have the authority to:

16 (a) Develop and amend as needed standards for the
state-wide

17 jail booking and reporting system and for the
information that

18 must be contained within the system. At a minimum, the
system shall

19 contain:

20 (i) The offenses the individual has been charged
with;

21 (ii) Descriptive and personal information about each
offender

22 booked into a city or county jail. At a minimum, this
information

23 shall contain the offender's name, vital statistics,
address, and

24 mugshot;

25 (iii) Information about the offender while in jail,
which could

26 be used to protect criminal justice officials that have
future

27 contact with the offender, such as medical conditions,
acts of

28 violence, and other behavior problems;

29 (iv) Statistical data indicating the current
capacity of each

30 jail and the quantity and category of offenses charged;
((and))

31 (v) The ability to communicate directly and
immediately with

32 the city and county jails and other criminal justice
entities; and

33 (vi) The date and time that an offender was
released or

34 transferred from a local jail;

35 (b) Develop and amend as needed operational
standards for city

36 and county jail booking systems, which at a minimum
shall include

37 the type of information collected and transmitted, and
the

p. 3 ESSB
5179

_1 technical requirements needed for the city and county
jail booking

_2 system to communicate with the state-wide jail booking
and

_3 reporting system;

_4 (c) Develop and amend as needed standards for
allocating grants

_5 to city and county jails or law enforcement agencies
that will be

_6 implementing or reconfiguring electronic jail booking
systems.

_7 (5) By January 1, 2001, the standards committee
shall complete

_8 the initial standards described in subsection (4) of
this section,

_9 and the standards shall be placed into a report and
provided to

10 all Washington state city and county jails, all other
criminal

11 justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030, the chair
of the

12 Washington state senate human services and corrections
committee,

13 and the chair of the Washington state house of
representatives

14 criminal justice and corrections committee.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

ESSB 5179 p. 4