BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The intent of this act is
to ensure a sustainable, comprehensive, pipeline safety program, to protect the
health and safety of the citizens of the state of Washington, and maintain the
quality of the state's environment. The legislature finds that public safety
and the environment are best protected by securing permanent funding for this
program through establishment of a regulatory fee imposed on hazardous liquids
and gas pipelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 80.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every gas company
and every interstate gas pipeline company subject to inspection or enforcement
by the commission shall pay an annual pipeline safety fee to the commission.
The commission shall by rule establish the methodology it will use to set the
appropriate fee for each entity subject to this section and may require
reasonable and pertinent reports from those entities in the form and at such
time as necessary to set the fees. After considering the reports supplied by
the entities, the commission shall set the amount of the fee payable by each
entity by general order entered before July 1st of each year. The aggregate
amount of fees set must be sufficient to recover the reasonable, directly
related costs of administering the pipeline safety program, taking into account
federal funds used to offset the costs. The commission shall collect the
pipeline safety fee as part of and not in addition to the fee under RCW
80.24.010. The commission shall allocate the moneys collected under RCW
80.24.010 between the pipeline safety program and the other regulatory programs
for public service companies. The commission shall adopt rules that assure
that fee moneys related to the pipeline safety program are maintained
separately from other moneys collected by the commission under this chapter.
Any payment of the fee imposed by this section made after its due date must
include a late fee of two percent of the amount due. Delinquent fees accrue
interest at the rate of one percent per month.

(2) The commission
shall keep accurate records of the costs incurred in administering its gas
pipeline safety program and the records are open to inspection by interested
parties. The records and data upon which the commission's determination is
made shall be prima facie correct in any proceeding to challenge the
reasonableness or correctness of any order of the commission fixing fees and
distributing regulatory expenses.

(3) If any entity seeks
to contest the imposition of a fee imposed under this section, that entity
shall pay the fee and request a refund within six months of the due date for
the payment by filing a petition for a refund with the commission. The
commission shall establish by rule procedures for handling refund petitions and
may delegate the decisions on refund petitions to the secretary of the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 81.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every hazardous
liquid pipeline company as defined in RCW 81.88.010 shall pay an annual
pipeline safety fee to the commission. The commission shall by rule establish
the methodology it will use to set the appropriate fee for each entity subject
to this section and may require reasonable and pertinent reports from those
entities in the form and at such time as necessary to set the fees. After
considering the reports supplied by the entities, the commission shall set the
amount of the fee payable by each entity by general order entered before July
1st of each year. The aggregate amount of fees set must be sufficient to
recover the reasonable, directly related costs of administering the pipeline
safety program, taking into account federal funds used to offset the costs.
The commission shall collect the pipeline safety fee as part of and not in
addition to the fee under RCW 81.24.010. The commission shall allocate the
moneys collected under RCW 81.24.010 between the pipeline safety program and
the other regulatory programs for public service companies. The commission
shall adopt rules that assure that fee moneys related to the pipeline safety
program are maintained separately from other moneys collected by the commission
under this chapter. Any payment of the fee imposed by this section made after
its due date must include a late fee of two percent of the amount due.
Delinquent fees accrue interest at the rate of one percent per month.

(2) The commission
shall keep accurate records of the costs incurred in administering its
hazardous liquid pipeline safety program and the records are open to inspection
by interested parties. The records and data upon which the commission's
determination is made shall be prima facie correct in any proceeding to
challenge the reasonableness or correctness of any order of the commission
fixing fees and distributing regulatory expenses.

(3) If any entity seeks
to contest the imposition of a fee imposed under this section, that entity
shall pay the fee and request a refund within six months of the due date for
the payment by filing a petition for a refund with the commission. The
commission shall establish by rule procedures for handling refund petitions and
may delegate the decisions on refund petitions to the secretary of the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 81.88 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
review staff use, inspection activity, fee methodology, and costs of the
hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs and report to the appropriate
legislative committees by November 15, 2002.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.122.055 and 2000
c 191 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who
fails to notify the one-number locator service and causes damage to a hazardous
liquid or gas pipeline is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten
thousand dollars for each violation.

(2) All civil penalties
recovered under this section ((relating to hazardous liquid pipelines))
shall be deposited into the ((hazardous liquid pipeline safety account))
public service revolving fund created in RCW ((81.88.050)) 80.01.080.
((All civil penalties recovered under this section relating to gas pipelines
shall be deposited in the general fund and expended for the purpose of
enforcement of gas pipeline safety laws.))

Sec. 6. RCW 81.88.010 and 2000 c
191 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(2) (("Department"
means the department of ecology.

(3))) "Failsafe" means a design feature
that will maintain or result in a safe condition in the event of malfunction or
failure of a power supply, component, or control device.

(((4))) (3)
"Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or toxic or corrosive gas.

(((5))) (4)
"Gas pipeline" means all parts of a pipeline facility through which
gas moves in transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe, valves,
and other appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units, fabricated
assemblies associated with pumping units, metering and delivery stations and
fabricated assemblies therein, and breakout tanks. "Gas pipeline"
does not include process or transfer pipelines.

(((6))) (5)
"Gas pipeline company" means a person or entity constructing, owning,
or operating a gas pipeline for transporting gas. A "gas pipeline
company" does not include: (a) Distribution systems owned and operated
under franchise for the sale, delivery, or distribution of natural gas at
retail; or (b) excavation contractors or other contractors that contract with a
gas pipeline company.

(((7))) (6)
"Hazardous liquid" means: (a) Petroleum, petroleum products, or
anhydrous ammonia as those terms are defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 195 in effect
March 1, 1998; and (b) carbon dioxide.

(((8))) (7)
"Local government" means a political subdivision of the state or a
city or town.

(((9))) (8)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any political
subdivision or instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.

(((10))) (9)
"Pipeline," "pipeline system," or "hazardous liquid
pipeline" means all parts of a pipeline facility through which a hazardous
liquid moves in transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe,
valves, and other appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units,
fabricated assemblies associated with pumping units, metering and delivery
stations and fabricated assemblies therein, and breakout tanks.
"Pipeline" or "pipeline system" does not include process or
transfer pipelines.

(((11))) (10)
"Pipeline company" or "hazardous liquid pipeline company"
means a person or entity constructing, owning, or operating a pipeline for
transporting hazardous liquid. A "pipeline company" does not
include: (a) Distribution systems owned and operated under franchise for the
sale, delivery, or distribution of natural gas at retail; or (b) excavation
contractors or other contractors that contract with a pipeline company.

(((12))) (11)
"Reportable release" means a spilling, leaking, pouring, emitting,
discharging, or any other uncontrolled escape of a hazardous liquid in excess
of one barrel, or forty-two gallons.

(((13))) (12)
"Safety management systems" means management systems that include coordinated
and interdisciplinary evaluations of the effect of significant changes to a
pipeline system before such changes are implemented.

(((14))) (13)
"Transfer pipeline" means a buried or aboveground pipeline used to
carry oil between a tank vessel or transmission pipeline and the first valve
inside secondary containment at the facility provided that any discharge on the
facility side of that first valve will not directly impact waters of the
state. A transfer pipeline includes valves, and other appurtenances connected
to the pipeline, pumping units, and fabricated assemblies associated with
pumping units. A transfer pipeline does not include process pipelines,
pipelines carrying ballast or bilge water, transmission pipelines, or tank
vessel or storage tanks.

(((15))) (14)
"Transmission pipeline" means a gas pipeline that transports gas
within a storage field, or transports gas from an interstate pipeline or
storage facility to a distribution main or a large volume gas user, or operates
at a hoop stress of twenty percent or more of the specified minimum yield
strength.

Sec. 7. RCW 81.88.060 and 2000 c
191 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A comprehensive
program of hazardous liquid pipeline safety is authorized by RCW 81.88.010,
81.88.040, ((81.88.050,)) 81.88.090, 81.88.100, ((81.88.130,))
48.48.160, and this section to be developed and implemented consistent with
federal law. ((Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,)) The
commission shall administer and enforce all laws related to hazardous liquid
pipeline safety.

(2) The commission
shall adopt rules for pipeline safety standards for hazardous liquid pipeline
transportation that:

(a) Require pipeline
companies to design, construct, operate, and maintain their pipeline facilities
so they are safe and efficient;

(b) Require pipeline
companies to rapidly locate and isolate all reportable releases from pipelines,
that may include:

(i) Installation of
remote control shut-off valves; and

(ii) Installation of
remotely monitored pressure gauges and meters;

(c) Require the
training and certification of personnel who operate pipelines and the
associated systems;

(d) Require reporting
of emergency situations, including emergency shutdowns and material defects or
physical damage that impair the serviceability of a pipeline; and

(e) Require pipeline
companies to submit operations safety plans to the commission once every five
years, as well as any amendments to the plan made necessary by changes to the
pipeline system or its operation. The safety plan shall include emergency
response procedures.

(3) The commission
shall approve operations safety plans if they have been deemed fit for
service. A plan shall be deemed fit for service when it provides for pipelines
that are designed, developed, constructed, operated, and periodically modified
to provide for protection of public safety and the environment. Pipeline
operations safety plans shall, at a minimum, include:

(a) A schedule of
inspection and testing within the pipeline distribution system of:

(i) All mechanical
components;

(ii) All electronic
components; and

(iii) The structural
integrity of all pipelines as determined through pressure testing, internal
inspection tool surveys, or another appropriate technique;

(b) Failsafe systems;

(c) Safety management
systems; and

(d) Emergency
management training for pipeline operators.

(4) The commission
shall coordinate information related to pipeline safety by providing technical
assistance to local planning and siting authorities.

(5) The commission
shall evaluate, and consider adopting, proposals developed by the federal
office of pipeline safety, the national transportation safety board, and other
agencies and organizations related to methods and technologies for testing the
integrity of pipeline structure, leak detection, and other elements of pipeline
operation.

(((6) The
authorities of RCW 81.88.010, 81.88.040, 81.88.050, 81.88.090, 81.88.100,
81.88.130, 48.48.160, and this section relating to hazardous liquid pipeline
safety shall be transferred from the commission to the department pursuant to
RCW 81.88.130 upon the occurrence of either:

(a) Amendments to
federal pipeline safety laws to eliminate preemption of state authority to
regulate safety requirements for such pipelines; or

(b) The granting of
federal authority to the state to enforce or adopt any safety requirements for
interstate hazardous liquid pipelines.))

Sec. 8. RCW 81.88.090 and 2000 c
191 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission ((and
the department)) shall apply for federal delegation for the state's program
for the purposes of enforcement of federal hazardous liquid pipeline safety
requirements. If the secretary of transportation delegates inspection
authority to the state as provided in this subsection, the ((department))
commission, at a minimum, shall do the following:

(a) Inspect hazardous
liquid pipelines periodically as specified in the inspection program;

(b) Collect fees;

(c) Order and oversee
the testing of hazardous liquid pipelines as authorized by federal law and
regulation; and

(d) File reports with
the United States secretary of transportation as required to maintain the
delegated authority.

(2) The commission ((and
the department)) shall also seek federal authority to adopt safety
standards related to the monitoring and testing of interstate hazardous liquid
pipelines.

(3) Upon delegation
under subsection (1) of this section or under a grant of authority under
subsection (2) of this section, to the extent authorized by federal law, the ((department))
commission shall adopt rules for interstate pipelines that are no less
stringent than the state's laws and rules for intrastate hazardous liquid
pipelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 81.88.050 (Hazardous liquid pipeline
safety account) and 2000 c 191 s 4; and

(2) RCW 81.88.130 (Transfer of powers,
duties, and functions of commission to department--Delegation of federal authority--Determination
by office of financial management) and 2000 c 191 s 13.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---