BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.128.005 and 2000
c 121 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that adult family homes are an important part of the state's long-term care
system. Adult family homes provide an alternative to institutional care and
promote a high degree of independent living for residents. Persons with
functional limitations have broadly varying service needs. Adult family homes
that can meet those needs are an essential component of a long-term system.
The legislature further finds that different populations living in adult family
homes, such as the developmentally disabled and the elderly, often have
significantly different needs and capacities from one another.

It is the legislature's
intent that department rules and policies relating to the licensing and
operation of adult family homes recognize and accommodate the different needs
and capacities of the various populations served by the homes. Furthermore,
the development and operation of adult family homes that can provide quality
personal care and special care services should be encouraged.

The legislature finds
that many residents of community-based long-term care facilities are vulnerable
and their health and well-being are dependent on their caregivers. The
quality, skills, and knowledge of their caregivers are ((often)) the key
to good care. The legislature finds that the need for well-trained caregivers
is growing as the state's population ages and residents' needs increase. The
legislature intends that current training standards be enhanced.

The legislature
finds that the state of Washington has a compelling interest in protecting and
promoting the health, welfare, and safety of vulnerable adults residing in
adult family homes. The health, safety, and well-being of vulnerable adults
must be the paramount concern in determining whether to issue a license to an
applicant, whether to suspend or revoke a license, or whether to take other
licensing actions.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.128.010 and 1995
c 260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adult family
home" means a regular family abode in which a person or persons provide
personal care, special care, room, and board to more than one but not more than
six adults who are not related by blood or marriage to the person or persons
providing the services.

(2)
"Provider" means any person who is licensed under this chapter to
operate an adult family home. For the purposes of this section,
"person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association,
or limited liability company.

(3)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(4)
"Resident" means an adult in need of personal or special care in an
adult family home who is not related to the provider.

(5) "Adults"
means persons who have attained the age of eighteen years.

(6) "Home"
means an adult family home.

(7) "Imminent
danger" means serious physical harm to or death of a resident has
occurred, or there is a serious threat to resident life, health, or safety.

(8) "Special
care" means care beyond personal care as defined by the department, in
rule.

(9)
"Capacity" means the maximum number of persons in need of personal or
special care permitted in an adult family home at a given time. This number
shall include related children or adults in the home and who received special
care.

(10) "Resident
manager" means a person employed or designated by the provider to manage
the adult family home.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.128.060 and 1995
c 260 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application for
license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall
contain such information as the department reasonably requires.

(2) The department
shall issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that the
applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the rules
adopted under this chapter, unless (a) the applicant has prior violations of
this chapter relating to the adult family home subject to the application or
any other adult family home, or of any other law regulating ((residential))
care facilities ((within the past five years)) for adults or children
that resulted in revocation or nonrenewal of a license; or (b) the applicant
has a history of significant noncompliance with federal, state, or local laws,
rules, or regulations relating to the provision of care or services to
vulnerable adults or to children.

(3) The license fee
shall be submitted with the application.

(4) In order to
prevent disruption to current residents, at the request of the current licensed
provider, the department shall give processing priority to the application of a
person seeking to be licensed as the new provider for the adult family home.
The department may issue a provisional license when a currently licensed adult
family home provider has applied to be licensed as the new provider for a
currently licensed adult family home, the application has been initially
processed, and all that remains to complete the application process is an
on-site inspection.

(5) The
department shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the decision granting or
denying an application for a license. An applicant shall have the right to
contest denial of his or her application for a license as provided in chapter
34.05 RCW by requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after
receipt of the notice of denial.

(((5))) (6)
The department shall not issue a license to a provider if the department finds
that the provider or any partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or
owner of five percent or more if the provider has a history of significant
noncompliance with federal or state regulations, rules, or laws in providing
care or services to vulnerable adults or to children.

(((6))) (7)
The department shall license an adult family home for the maximum level of care
that the adult family home may provide. The department shall define, in rule,
license levels based upon the education, training, and caregiving experience of
the licensed provider or staff.

(((7))) (8)
The department shall establish, by rule, standards used to license nonresident
providers and multiple facility operators.

(((8))) (9)
The department shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility operators
educational standards substantially equivalent to recognized national
certification standards for residential care administrators.

(((9))) (10)
The license fee shall be set at fifty dollars per year for each home. A fifty
dollar processing fee shall also be charged each home when the home is
initially licensed.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.128.120 and 2000
c 121 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Each adult family home
provider and each resident manager shall have the following minimum
qualifications:

(1) Twenty-one years of
age or older;

(2) For those
applying after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as a provider, and for
resident managers whose employment begins after September 1, 2001, a high
school diploma or general educational development certificate;

(3) Good moral
and responsible character and reputation;

(((3))) (4)
Literacy in the English language. However, a person not literate in the
English language may meet the requirements of this subsection by assuring that
there is a person on staff and available who is able to communicate or make
provisions for communicating with the resident in his or her primary language
and capable of understanding and speaking English well enough to be able to
respond appropriately to emergency situations and be able to read and
understand resident care plans;

(((4))) (5)
Management and administrative ability to carry out the requirements of this
chapter;

(((5))) (6)
Satisfactory completion of department-approved basic training and continuing
education training as specified by the department in rule, based on
recommendations of the community long-term care training and education steering
committee and working in collaboration with providers, consumers, caregivers,
advocates, family members, educators, and other interested parties in the
rule-making process;

(((6))) (7)
Satisfactory completion of department-approved, or equivalent, special care
training before a provider may provide special care services to a resident;

(((7))) (8)
Not been convicted of any crime listed in RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842; ((and

(8) Effective July
1, 1996,)) (9) Registered
with the department of health; and

(10)
For those applying after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as a provider, and
for resident managers whose employment begins after September 1, 2001, at least
three hundred twenty hours of successful direct caregiving experience obtained
after age eighteen to vulnerable adults or children in a licensed or contracted
setting before operating or managing an adult family home.

---
END ---