BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that vulnerable adults, while living in their own homes, may be
abused, neglected, financially exploited, or abandoned by individuals entrusted
to provide care for them. The individuals who abuse, neglect, financially
exploit, or abandon vulnerable adults may be employed by, under contract with,
or volunteering for an agency or program providing care for vulnerable adults.
The legislature has given the department of social and health services the
responsibility to investigate complaints of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, or neglect of vulnerable adults and to provide protective
services and other legal remedies to protect these vulnerable adults. The
legislature finds that in order to continue to protect vulnerable adults, the
department of social and health services be given the authority to release
report information and to release the results of an investigation to the agency
or program with which the individual investigated is employed, contracted, or
engaged as a volunteer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After the
investigation is complete, the department may provide a written report of the
outcome of the investigation to an agency or program described in this
subsection when the department determines from its investigation that an
incident of abuse, abandonment, financial exploitation, or neglect occurred.
Agencies or programs that may be provided this report are home health, hospice,
or home care agencies, or after January 1, 2002, any in-home services agency
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, a program authorized under chapter 71A.12
RCW, an adult day care or day health program, or other agencies. The report
may contain the name of the vulnerable adult and the alleged perpetrator. The
report shall not disclose the identity of the person who made the report or any
witness without the written permission of the reporter or witness. The
department shall notify the alleged perpetrator regarding the outcome of the
investigation. The name of the vulnerable adult must not be disclosed during
this notification.

(2) The department may
also refer a report or outcome of an investigation to appropriate state or
local governmental authorities responsible for licensing or certification of
the agencies or programs listed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The
department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

---
END ---