BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.700 and 1993 c
57 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent of
available funds and subject to any conditions placed on appropriations made for
this purpose, medical care may be provided under the limited casualty program
to persons not otherwise eligible for medical assistance or medical care services
who are medically needy as defined in the social security Title XIX state plan
and medical indigents in accordance with eligibility requirements established
by the department. The eligibility requirements may include minimum levels of
incurred medical expenses. This includes residents of nursing facilities ((and)),
residents of intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded, and
individuals who are otherwise eligible for section 1915(c) of the federal
social security act home and community-based waiver services, administered by
the aging and adult services administration, who are aged, blind, or
disabled as defined in Title XVI of the federal social security act and whose
income exceeds three hundred percent of the federal supplement security income
benefit level.

(2) Determination of
the amount, scope, and duration of medical coverage under the limited casualty
program shall be the responsibility of the department, subject to the
following:

(a) Only the following
services may be covered:

(i) For persons who are
medically needy as defined in the social security Title XIX state plan:
Inpatient and outpatient hospital services, and home and community-based
waiver services;

(ii) For persons who
are medically needy as defined in the social security Title XIX state plan, and
for persons who are medical indigents under the eligibility requirements
established by the department: Rural health clinic services; physicians' and
clinic services; prescribed drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices, and eyeglasses;
nursing facility services; and intermediate care facility services for the
mentally retarded; home health services; hospice services; other laboratory and
x-ray services; rehabilitative services, including occupational therapy;
medically necessary transportation; and other services for which funds are
specifically provided in the omnibus appropriations act;

(b) Medical care
services provided to the medically indigent and received no more than seven
days prior to the date of application shall be retroactively certified and
approved for payment on behalf of a person who was otherwise eligible at the
time the medical services were furnished: PROVIDED, That eligible persons who
fail to apply within the seven-day time period for medical reasons or other good
cause may be retroactively certified and approved for payment.

(3) The department
shall establish standards of assistance and resource and income exemptions.
All nonexempt income and resources of limited casualty program recipients shall
be applied against the cost of their medical care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39 RCW to read as follows:

To the
extent of available funds and subject to any conditions placed on
appropriations for this purpose, the department may provide one or more home
and community-based waiver programs in accordance with section 1915(c) of the
federal social security act for Washington residents who have a gross income in
excess of three hundred percent of the federal supplemental security income
benefit level. The waiver services provided in accordance with this section
may differ from, and shall operate with a separate limit or limits on total
enrollment than, those provided for persons who are categorically needy as
defined in Title XIX of the federal social security act. The department shall
establish eligibility criteria, applicable income standards, and the specific
waiver services to be provided in rule. Total annual enrollment levels and the
services to be provided shall be as specified in the waiver agreement or
agreements with the federal government, subject to any conditions specified in
appropriations for this purpose.

---
END ---