BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 6.15.010 and 1991 c
112 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in
RCW 6.15.050, the following personal property shall be exempt from execution,
attachment, and garnishment:

(1) All wearing apparel
of every individual and family, but not to exceed one thousand dollars in value
in furs, jewelry, and personal ornaments for any individual.

(2) All private
libraries of every individual, but not to exceed fifteen hundred dollars in
value, and all family pictures and keepsakes.

(3) To each individual
or, as to community property of spouses maintaining a single household as
against a creditor of the community, to the community:

(a) The individual's or
community's household goods, appliances, furniture, and home and yard
equipment, not to exceed two thousand seven hundred dollars in value for the
individual or five thousand four hundred dollars for the community, said
amount to include provisions and fuel for the comfortable maintenance of the
individual or community;

(b) Other personal
property, except personal earnings as provided under RCW 6.15.050(1), not to
exceed ((one)) two thousand dollars in value, of which not more
than ((one)) two hundred dollars in value may consist of cash,
and of which not more than ((one)) two hundred dollars in value
may consist of bank accounts, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or
other securities; ((and))

(c) ((Two)) For
an individual, a motor ((vehicles)) vehicle used for personal
transportation, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ((in
aggregate value)) or for a community two motor vehicles used for
personal transportation, not to exceed five thousand dollars in aggregate
value;

(d) Any past due,
current, or future child support paid or owed to the debtor, which can be
traced;

(e) All
professionally prescribed health aids for the debtor or a dependant of the
debtor; and

(f) To any
individual, the right to or proceeds of a payment not to exceed sixteen
thousand one hundred fifty dollars on account of personal bodily injury, not including
pain and suffering or compensation for actual pecuniary loss, of the debtor or
an individual of whom the debtor is a dependent; or the right to or proceeds of
a payment in compensation of loss of future earnings of the debtor or an
individual of whom the debtor is or was a dependent, to the extent reasonably
necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor. The
exemption under this subsection (3)(f) does not apply to the right of the state
of Washington, or any agent or assignee of the state, as a lienholder or
subrogee under RCW 43.20B.060.

(4) To each qualified
individual, one of the following exemptions:

(a) To a farmer, farm
trucks, farm stock, farm tools, farm equipment, supplies and seed, not to
exceed five thousand dollars in value;

(b) To a physician,
surgeon, attorney, clergyman, or other professional person, the individual's
library, office furniture, office equipment and supplies, not to exceed five
thousand dollars in value;

(c) To any other
individual, the tools and instruments and materials used to carry on his or her
trade for the support of himself or herself or family, not to exceed five
thousand dollars in value.

For purposes of this
section, "value" means the reasonable market value of the debtor's
interest in an article or item at the time it is selected for exemption,
exclusive of all liens and encumbrances thereon.

Sec. 2. RCW 6.15.050 and 1987 c
442 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Wages, salary, or
other compensation regularly paid for personal services rendered by the debtor
claiming the exemption shall not be claimed as exempt under RCW 6.15.010, but
the same may be claimed as exempt in any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding to
the same extent as allowed under the statutes relating to garnishments.

(2) No property may be
exempt under RCW 6.15.010 from execution, attachment, or garnishment issued
upon a judgment for all or any part of the purchase price of the property.

(3) No property may
be exempt under RCW 6.15.010 from legal process issued upon a judgment for
restitution ordered by a court to be paid for the benefit of a victim of a
criminal act.

(4) No property
may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010 from legal process issued upon a judgment for
any tax levied upon such property.

(((4))) (5)
Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to prevent a debtor from
creating a security interest in personal property which might be claimed as
exempt, or the enforcement of such security interest against the property.

(((5))) (6)
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt personal property of a
nonresident of this state or of an individual who has left or is about to leave
this state with the intention to defraud his or her creditors.

(((6))) (7)
Personal property exemptions are waived by failure to claim them prior to sale
of exemptible property under execution or, in a garnishment proceeding, within
the time specified in RCW 6.27.160.

(((7))) (8)
Personal property exemptions may not be claimed by one spouse in a bankruptcy
case that is not a joint case or a joint administration of the estate with the
bankruptcy estate of the other spouse where (a) bankruptcy is filed by both
spouses within a six-month period, and (b) one spouse exempts property from
property of the estate under the bankruptcy exemption provisions of 11 U.S.C.
Sec. 522(d).

(9) No property may
be exempt under RCW 6.15.010 from execution, levy, attachment, or garnishment
issued by or on behalf of a child support agency operating under Title IV-D of
the federal social security act or by or on behalf of any agent or assignee of
the child support agency.

Sec. 3. RCW 6.27.160 and 1988 c
231 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A defendant may
claim exemptions from garnishment in the manner specified by the statute that
creates the exemption or by delivering to or mailing by first class mail to the
clerk of the court out of which the writ was issued a declaration in substantially
the following form or in the form set forth in RCW 6.27.140 and mailing a copy
of the form by first class mail to the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney at the
address shown on the writ of garnishment, all not later than twenty-eight days
after the date stated on the writ except that the time shall be extended to
allow a declaration mailed or delivered to the clerk within twenty-one days
after service of the writ on the garnishee if service on the garnishee is
delayed more than seven days after the date of the writ.

[NAME
OF COURT]

............................. No.
. . . . .

Plaintiff

.............................

Defendant

CLAIM
OF EXEMPTION

.............................

Garnishee

I/We claim the
following described property or money as exempt from execution:

.................................................................

.................................................................

.................................................................

I/We believe
the property is exempt because:

.................................................................

.................................................................

.................................................................

............................. ...............................

Print name

Print
name of spouse,

if
married

............................. ...............................

Signature

Signature

............................. ...............................

Address

Address

............................. ...............................

........................ .... ...............................

Telephone number

Telephone
number

............................. ...............................

(2) A plaintiff who
wishes to object to an exemption claim must, not later than seven days after
receipt of the claim, cause to be delivered or mailed to the defendant by first
class mail, to the address shown on the exemption claim, a declaration by self,
attorney, or agent, alleging the facts on which the objection is based,
together with notice of date, time, and place of a hearing on the objection,
which hearing the plaintiff must cause to be noted for a hearing date not later
than fourteen days after the receipt of the claim. After a hearing on an
objection to an exemption claim, the court shall award costs to the prevailing
party and may also award an attorney's fee to the prevailing party if the court
concludes that the exemption claim or the objection to the claim was not made
in good faith. The defendant bears the burden of proving any claimed
exemption, including the obligation to provide sufficient documentation to
identify the source and amount of any claimed exempt funds.

(3) If the
plaintiff elects not to object to the claim of exemption, the plaintiff shall,
not later than ten days after receipt of the claim, obtain from the court and
deliver to the garnishee an order directing the garnishee to release such part
of the debt, property, or effects as is covered by the exemption claim. If the
plaintiff fails to obtain and deliver the order as required or otherwise to
effect release of the exempt funds or property, the defendant shall be entitled
to recover fifty dollars from the plaintiff, in addition to actual damages
suffered by the defendant from the failure to release the exempt property.

---
END ---