BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
42.17.095 and 1995 c 397 s 31 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The surplus funds of a candidate, or of a political
committee

_7 supporting or opposing a candidate, may only be disposed
of in any

_8 one or more of the following ways:

_9 (1) Return the surplus to a contributor in an amount
not to

10 exceed that contributor's original contribution;

11 (2) Transfer the surplus to the candidate's personal
account as

12 reimbursement for lost earnings incurred as a result of
that

13 candidate's election campaign. Such lost earnings shall
be

14 verifiable as unpaid salary or, when the candidate is
not

15 salaried, as an amount not to exceed income received by
the

16 candidate for services rendered during an appropriate,

17 corresponding time period. All lost earnings incurred
shall be

18 documented and a record thereof shall be maintained by
the

p. 1 SB
5188

_1 candidate or the candidate's political committee. The
committee

_2 shall include a copy of such record when its expenditure
for such

_3 reimbursement is reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.090;

_4 (3) Transfer the surplus without limit to a
political party or

_5 to a caucus political committee;

_6 (4) Donate the surplus to a public school, school
district, or

_7 educational service district, or to a charitable
organization

_8 registered in accordance with chapter 19.09 RCW;

_9 (5) Transmit the surplus to the state treasurer for
deposit in

10 the general fund; ((or))

11 (6) Hold the surplus in the campaign depository or
depositories

12 designated in accordance with RCW 42.17.050 for possible
use in a

13 future election campaign for the same office last sought
by the

14 candidate and report any such disposition in accordance
with RCW

15 42.17.090: PROVIDED, That if the candidate subsequently
announces

16 or publicly files for office, information as appropriate
is

17 reported to the commission in accordance with RCW
42.17.040

18 through 42.17.090. If a subsequent office is not sought
the surplus

19 held shall be disposed of in accordance with the
requirements of

20 this section((.)); or

21 (7) Hold the surplus campaign funds in a separate
account for

22 nonreimbursed public office-related expenses or as
provided in

23 this section, and report any such disposition in
accordance with

24 RCW 42.17.090. The separate account required under this
subsection

25 shall not be used for deposits of campaign funds that
are not

26 surplus.

27 (((8))) No candidate or authorized committee
may transfer funds

28 to any other candidate or other political committee.

29 The disposal of surplus funds under this section
shall not be

30 considered a contribution for purposes of this chapter.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5188 p. 2