BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 50.20.050
and 2000 c 2 s 12 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits
beginning

_8 with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she
has

_9 left work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for
seven

10 calendar weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide
work in

11 employment covered by this title and earned wages in that

12 employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit
amount.

13 The disqualification shall continue if the work
obtained is a

14 mere sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide
work. In

15 determining whether work is of a bona fide nature, the

16 commissioner shall consider factors including but not
limited to

17 the following:

18 (a) The duration of the work;

p. 1 SB
5189

_1 (b) The extent of direction and control by the
employer over

_2 the work; and

_3 (c) The level of skill required for the work in
light of the

_4 individual's training and experience.

_5 (2) An individual shall not be considered to have
left work

_6 voluntarily without good cause when:

_7 (a) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide
offer of bona

_8 fide work as described in subsection (1) of this
section;

_9 (b) The separation was because of the illness or
disability of

10 the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of

11 the claimant's immediate family if the claimant took all

12 reasonable precautions, in accordance with any
regulations that

13 the commissioner may prescribe, to protect his or her
employment

14 status by having promptly notified the employer of the
reason for

15 the absence and by having promptly requested
reemployment when

16 again able to assume employment: PROVIDED, That these
precautions

17 need not have been taken when they would have been a
futile act,

18 including those instances when the futility of the act
was a

19 result of a recognized labor/management dispatch system;
((or))

20 (c) He or she has left work to relocate for the
spouse's

21 employment that is due to an employer-initiated
mandatory transfer

22 that is outside the existing labor market area if the
claimant

23 remained employed as long as was reasonable prior to the
move; or

24 (d) The separation was necessary to protect the
claimant or the

25 claimant's immediate family members from domestic
violence, as

26 defined in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in
RCW

27 9A.46.110.

28 (3) In determining under this section whether an
individual has

29 left work voluntarily without good cause, the
commissioner shall

30 only consider work-connected factors such as the degree
of risk

31 involved to the individual's health, safety, and morals,
the

32 individual's physical fitness for the work, the
individual's

33 ability to perform the work, and such other work
connected factors

34 as the commissioner may deem pertinent, including state
and

35 national emergencies. Good cause shall not be
established for

36 voluntarily leaving work because of its distance from an

37 individual's residence where the distance was known to
the

38 individual at the time he or she accepted the employment
and

SB 5189 p. 2

_1 where, in the judgment of the department, the distance
is

_2 customarily traveled by workers in the individual's job

_3 classification and labor market, nor because of any
other

_4 significant work factor which was generally known and
present at

_5 the time he or she accepted employment, unless the
related

_6 circumstances have so changed as to amount to a
substantial

_7 involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless
the

_8 commissioner determines that other related circumstances
would

_9 work an unreasonable hardship on the individual were he
or she

10 required to continue in the employment.

11 (4) Subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall
not apply to

12 an individual whose marital status or domestic
responsibilities

13 cause him or her to leave employment. Such an individual
shall not

14 be eligible for unemployment insurance benefits
beginning with the

15 first day of the calendar week in which he or she left
work and

16 thereafter for seven calendar weeks and until he or she
has

17 requalified, either by obtaining bona fide work in
employment

18 covered by this title and earning wages in that
employment equal

19 to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount or by
reporting in

20 person to the department during ten different calendar
weeks and

21 certifying on each occasion that he or she is ready,
able, and

22 willing to immediately accept any suitable work which
may be

23 offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary
trade

24 practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling
and

25 placement services as are available through the
department. This

26 subsection does not apply to individuals covered by
subsection

27 (2)(b) or (c) of this section.

28 Sec. 2. RCW 50.20.100
and 1989 c 380 s 80 are each amended to read

29 as follows:

30 (1) Suitable work for an individual is
employment in an

31 occupation in keeping with the individual's prior work
experience,

32 education, or training and if the individual has no prior
work

33 experience, special education, or training for employment

34 available in the general area, then employment which the

35 individual would have the physical and mental ability to

36 perform((, and for individuals with base year work
experience in

37 agricultural labor, any agricultural labor available
from any

p. 3 SB
5189

_1 employer shall be deemed suitable unless it meets the
conditions

_2 in RCW 50.20.110 or the commissioner finds elements
of specific

_3 work opportunity unsuitable for a particular
individual)). In

_4 determining whether work is suitable for an individual,
the

_5 commissioner shall also consider the degree of risk
involved to

_6 the individual's health, safety, and morals, the
individual's

_7 physical fitness, the individual's length of
unemployment and

_8 prospects for securing local work in the individual's
customary

_9 occupation, the distance of the available work from the

10 individual's residence, and such other factors as the
commissioner

11 may deem pertinent, including state and national
emergencies.

12 (2) For individuals with base year work
experience in

13 agricultural labor, any agricultural labor available
from any

14 employer shall be deemed suitable unless it meets
conditions in

15 RCW 50.20.110 or the commissioner finds elements of
specific work

16 opportunity unsuitable for a particular individual.

17 (3) For individuals who have qualified for
unemployment

18 compensation benefits under RCW 50.20.050(2)(d), an
evaluation of

19 the suitability of the work must consider the
individual's need to

20 address the physical, psychological, legal, and other
effects of

21 domestic violence or stalking.

22 Sec. 3. RCW 50.20.240
and 1998 c 161 s 4 are each amended to read

23 as follows:

24 To ensure that following the initial application for
benefits,

25 an individual is actively engaged in searching for work,
effective

26 July 1, 1999, the employment security department shall
implement a

27 job search monitoring program. Except for those
individuals with

28 employer attachment or union referral, individuals who
qualify for

29 unemployment compensation under RCW 50.20.050(2)(d),
and

30 individuals in commissioner-approved training, an
individual who

31 has received five or more weeks of benefits under this
title must

32 provide evidence of seeking work, as directed by the
commissioner

33 or (([the])) the commissioner's agents, for
each week beyond five

34 in which a claim is filed. The evidence must demonstrate
contacts

35 with at least three employers per week or documented
in-person job

36 search activity at the local reemployment center. In
developing the

37 requirements for the job search monitoring program, the

SB 5189 p. 4

_1 commissioner or the commissioner's agents shall utilize
an

_2 existing advisory committee having equal representation
of

_3 employers and workers.

_4 Sec. 4. RCW 50.29.020
and 2000 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as

_5 follows:

_6 (1) An experience rating account shall be established
and

_7 maintained for each employer, except employers as described
in RCW

_8 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make
payments

_9 in lieu of contributions, taxable local government
employers as

10 described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are
required

11 to make payments in lieu of contributions, based on
existing

12 records of the employment security department. Benefits
paid to any

13 eligible individuals shall be charged to the experience
rating

14 accounts of each of such individual's employers during the

15 individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages
paid by

16 each employer to the individual during the base year bear
to the

17 wages paid by all employers to that individual during that
base

18 year, except as otherwise provided in this section.

19 (2) The legislature finds that certain benefit
payments, in

20 whole or in part, should not be charged to the experience
rating

21 accounts of employers except those employers described in
RCW

22 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make
payments

23 in lieu of contributions, taxable local government
employers

24 described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are
required

25 to make payments in lieu of contributions, as follows:

26 (a) Benefits paid to any individuals later determined
to be

27 ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating
account

28 of any contribution paying employer.

29 (b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the
provisions

30 of chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience
rating

31 account of any contribution paying employer only if:

32 (i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after
receiving

33 crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from
a

34 nonwork-related occurrence; or

35 (ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).

36 (c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of
benefits

p. 5 SB
5189

_1 payable as extended benefits defined under RCW
50.22.010(6) shall

_2 not be charged to the experience rating account of any

_3 contribution paying employer.

_4 (d) In the case of individuals who requalify for
benefits under

_5 RCW 50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage
credits earned

_6 prior to the disqualifying separation shall not be
charged to the

_7 experience rating account of the contribution paying
employer from

_8 whom that separation took place.

_9 (e) Individuals who qualify for benefits under
RCW

10 50.20.050(2)(d) shall not have their benefits charged
to the

11 experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.

12 (f) In the case of individuals identified
under RCW 50.20.015,

13 benefits paid with respect to a calendar quarter, which
exceed the

14 total amount of wages earned in the state of Washington
in the

15 higher of two corresponding calendar quarters included
within the

16 individual's determination period, as defined in RCW
50.20.015,

17 shall not be charged to the experience rating account of
any

18 contribution paying employer.

19 (((f))) (g) Benefits paid under RCW
50.22.150 shall not be

20 charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution

21 paying employer.

22 (3)(a) A contribution-paying base year employer, not
otherwise

23 eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this
section,

24 may receive such relief if the benefit charges result
from payment

25 to an individual who:

26 (i) Last left the employ of such employer
voluntarily for

27 reasons not attributable to the employer;

28 (ii) Was discharged for misconduct connected with
his or her

29 work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job

30 requirements;

31 (iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe

32 curtailment of operation at the employer's plant,
building, work

33 site, or other facility. This closure must be for
reasons directly

34 attributable to a catastrophic occurrence such as fire,
flood, or

35 other natural disaster; or

36 (iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly
scheduled

37 permanent part-time basis by a base year employer and
who at some

38 time during the base year was concurrently employed and

SB 5189 p. 6

_1 subsequently separated from at least one other base year

_2 employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when the
employment

_3 relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the

_4 claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply
to shared

_5 work employers under chapter 50.60 RCW.

_6 (b) The employer requesting relief of charges under
this

_7 subsection must request relief in writing within thirty
days

_8 following mailing to the last known address of the
notification of

_9 the valid initial determination of such claim, stating
the date

10 and reason for the separation or the circumstances of
continued

11 employment. The commissioner, upon investigation of the
request,

12 shall determine whether relief should be granted.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 7 SB
5189