BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
18.165.080 and 1995 c 277 s 26 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) The director shall issue a private investigator
license

_7 card to each licensed private investigator and an armed
private

_8 investigator license card to each armed private

_9 investigator. License cards must include picture
identification.

10 (a) The license card may not be used as security
clearance.

11 (b) A private investigator shall carry the license
card

12 whenever he or she is performing the duties of a private

13 investigator and shall exhibit the card upon request.

14 (c) An armed private investigator shall carry the
license card

15 whenever he or she is performing the duties of an armed
private

16 investigator and shall exhibit the card upon request.

17 (2) The director shall issue a license certificate
to each

18 licensed private investigator agency.

p. 1 SSB
5190

_1 (a) Within seventy-two hours after receipt of the
license

_2 certificate, the licensee shall post and display the
certificate

_3 in a conspicuous place in the principal office of the
licensee

_4 within the state.

_5 (b) It is unlawful for any person holding a license
certificate

_6 to knowingly and willfully post the license certificate
upon

_7 premises other than those described in the license
certificate or

_8 to materially alter a license certificate.

_9 (c) Every advertisement by a licensee that solicits
or

10 advertises business shall contain the name of the
licensee, the

11 address of record, and the license number as they appear
in the

12 records of the director.

13 (d) The licensee shall notify the director within
thirty days

14 of any change in the licensee's officers or directors or
any

15 material change in the information furnished or required
to be

16 furnished to the director.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5190 p. 2