BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

10 LEOFF 1 EMPLOYER RISK POOL PROGRAM

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The purpose of sections
2 through 12 of

12 this act is to establish a risk assumption program whereby

13 employers of plan 1 active and retired members of the law

14 enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system

15 voluntarily enter into membership in a risk pool for the
purpose

16 of sharing the noninsured medical costs of long-term care
and

p. 1 SB
5191

_1 major medical services for retired members of plan 1.
Such long-

_2 term care and major medical services are those required
under plan

_3 1 and approved by city and county disability boards.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this
section apply to

_5 sections 2 through 12 and 14 of this act unless the
context

_6 clearly requires otherwise.

_7 (1) "Actuary" means the state actuary,
office of the state

_8 actuary.

_9 (2) "Beneficiary" means any person in
receipt of a retirement

10 allowance or disability allowance who is eligible for
medical

11 services under the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters'

12 retirement system plan 1.

13 (3) "Director" means the director, office of
community

14 development, department of community, trade, and economic

15 development.

16 (4) "Employer" means the legislative
authority of any city,

17 town, county, or district or the elected officials of any

18 municipal corporation that employs any person who first
became a

19 member of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'

20 retirement system prior to October 1, 1977, or any
authorized

21 association of such municipalities.

22 (5) "Executive board" means the law
enforcement officers' and

23 fire fighters' plan 1 risk pool executive board.

24 (6) "Long-term care" means those medically
necessary services

25 required under RCW 41.26.030(22), authorized under RCW
41.26.150,

26 and received in a facility for skilled nursing care,
intermediate

27 care, custodial care, hospice care, day care, in-home
nursing

28 care, or other in-home care or services. For purposes of

29 expenditures from the medical account, long-term care only

30 includes qualified long-term care services as defined in
internal

31 revenue code section 7702B(2), and qualified long-term
care

32 insurance contract as defined in internal revenue code
section

33 7702B(b).

34 (7) "Medical account" means the law
enforcement officers' and

35 fire fighters' plan 1 medical account.

36 (8) "Medical costs" means those costs
incurred in the provision

37 of the medically necessary medical services required under
RCW

SB 5191 p. 2

_1 41.26.030(22) and authorized under RCW 41.26.150. For
purposes of

_2 expenditures from the medical account, medical costs
only include

_3 cost of medical care as defined in internal revenue code
section

_4 213(d).

_5 (9) "Risk assumption" means a decision to
absorb the entity's

_6 financial exposure to a risk of loss without the
creation of a

_7 formal program of advance funding of anticipated losses.

_8 (10) "Risk pool" means the long-term care
and medical costs

_9 risk pool created for the law enforcement officers' and
fire

10 fighters' medical benefits risk pool.

11 (11) "State risk manager" means the risk
manager, risk

12 management division, department of general
administration.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) There is hereby
established the law

14 enforcement officers' and fire fighters' medical benefits
risk

15 pool.

16 (2) The risk pool is a risk assumption insurance
program for

17 the sole purpose of employers sharing the noninsured
medical costs

18 of long-term care and medical costs for beneficiaries.

19 (3) An employer's participation and withdrawal from
the risk

20 pool is subject to rules established by the executive
board.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The law enforcement
officers' and fire

22 fighters' plan 1 risk pool executive board is hereby
established.

23 (2)(a) The membership of the executive board shall
consist of

24 nine persons as follows:

25 (i) The chair is appointed by the governor for a
four-year term

26 of office. The chair shall be familiar with risk pool
operation,

27 medical, and long-term care matters but shall not have
been

28 employed as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter or
served on

29 a law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 1
disability

30 board; and

31 (ii) Eight others selected by the governor from lists
of

32 recommended persons made by their respective organizations
as

33 follows:

34 (A) Two persons representing counties, one of which is
an

35 elected official;

p. 3 SB
5191

_1 (B) Two persons representing cities and towns, one
of which is

_2 an elected official;

_3 (C) Two persons representing fire protection
districts, one of

_4 which is an elected commissioner;

_5 (D) One person representing law enforcement
officers; and

_6 (E) One person representing fire fighters.

_7 (b) If a member vacates his or her position, the
governor shall

_8 select a person from a list recommended by his or her
respective

_9 organization to replace the vacating member for the
remainder of

10 the term of office for the vacated position.

11 (3) One position of the county, city, and town, and
fire

12 protection district groups and the law enforcement
officer

13 position have an initial term of two years and four
years

14 thereafter. The remaining positions have terms of four
years.

15 (4) A vice-chair shall be elected at the first
meeting of the

16 executive board and every two years thereafter. Upon
the absence of

17 the chair, the vice-chair shall act in his or her place.

18 (5) The executive board shall meet at least
quarterly and shall

19 maintain minutes of each meeting and any records as may
be

20 necessary, which are public records.

21 (6) The chair and four other members constitute a
quorum.

22 (7) The members of the executive board shall not
receive

23 compensation for their service upon the executive board
but shall

24 be reimbursed for all expenses incidental to such
service as to

25 the amount authorized by either RCW 42.24.090 or
43.03.050 and

26 43.03.060, whichever is applicable.

27 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The duties of the
executive board are as

28 follows:

29 (1) Establish the basis of membership in the risk
pool;

30 (2) Define and establish the benefits to be reimbursed
by the

31 risk pool;

32 (3) Authorize distribution of moneys from the risk
pool account

33 consistent with the provisions of rules and regulations

34 established by the internal revenue service;

35 (4) Determine, with the assistance of the actuary,
employer

36 premiums to the risk pool, which shall include
administrative

37 expenses of the office of community development;

SB 5191 p. 4

_1 (5) Authorize reimbursement for medical and
long-term care

_2 costs, required under RCW 41.26.030 and authorized under
RCW

_3 41.26.150 that are not covered by standard medical insurance

_4 policies. Reimbursement for medical costs shall be
treated as paid

_5 first out of the amounts transferred under section 8 of
this

_6 act. The board shall adopt rules governing these
reimbursements

_7 consistent with the provisions of the internal revenue
code and

_8 rules and regulations established by the internal
revenue service;

_9 (6) Purchase reinsurance as necessary; and

10 (7) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) In accordance with
the requirements of

12 section 9 of this act, the director shall allot such funds
as are

13 transferred from the medical account to the risk pool
account and

14 to employers for (a) those reimbursements authorized under
section

15 5(5) of this act, and (b) reimbursement of employers'
medical

16 expenses up to the limit set by appropriation.

17 (2) The director shall:

18 (a) Appoint other staff as necessary for the operation
of the

19 risk pool; fix their compensation within the limits
provided by

20 law; and prescribe their duties;

21 (b) Enter into contracts necessary for the operation
of the

22 risk pool, including risk management, claims, and
administrative

23 services;

24 (c) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to the
risk

25 pool operation;

26 (d) Provide staff support to the executive board; and

27 (e) Perform those other duties and responsibilities
required to

28 implement the medical benefits risk pool established in
section 3

29 of this act.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Funding for the risk
pool account,

31 established in section 16 of this act, shall come from
three

32 sources: (1) Employer premiums; (2) funds which may be

33 transferred from the medical account; and (3) investment
earnings.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) Until December 31,
2005, or such later

35 date as permitted by the internal revenue code, one time
each

p. 5 SB
5191

_1 fiscal year the legislature may transfer to the medical
account

_2 all or a part of any excess funds of the law enforcement
officers'

_3 and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, as
determined by the

_4 state actuary consistent with the internal revenue code
and rules

_5 and regulations of the internal revenue service.

_6 (2) Such transfer shall be done on a fiscal year
basis, and may

_7 only be done once each fiscal year.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) The use of the
medical account shall

_9 be solely for the purposes of:

10 (a) Reimbursement of medical costs and long-term care
reduced

11 by any amount received or eligible to be received by a
member

12 under workers' compensation, social security including the
changes

13 incorporated under Public Law 89-97, insurance provided by
the

14 employer, insurance provided by another employer, other
pension

15 plan, or any other similar source;

16 (b) Insurance premiums, including medicare part B
premiums;

17 (c) Costs incurred under this act by the executive
board, the

18 state risk manager, and the office of the state actuary;
and

19 (d) Accounting and management of the funds by an
employer.

20 (2) Uses stated in subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this
section

21 are subject to chapter 43.88 RCW.

22 (3) All undistributed transferred funds in the medical
account

23 at the end of a calendar year shall be returned to the law

24 enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 1

25 by January 10th of the next ensuing year.

26 NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. The state risk manager
shall adopt rules

27 governing the implementation, management, and operation of
the

28 risk pool in consultation with the health and welfare
advisory

29 board under RCW 48.62.051. All rules shall be appropriate
for the

30 type of program and class of risk covered. The state risk
manager's

31 rules shall include:

32 (1) Standards for the implementation, management,
operation,

33 and solvency of the risk pool, including the necessity and

34 frequency of actuarial analyses and claims audits;

35 (2) Standards for claims management procedures;

36 (3) Standards for contracts between the risk pool and
private

SB 5191 p. 6

_1 businesses including standards for contracts between
third-party

_2 administrators and the risk pool; and

_3 (4) Standards for an annual report with the state
risk manager

_4 and state auditor including, but not limited to:

_5 (a) Copies of all the insurance coverage documents;

_6 (b) A description of the program structure;

_7 (c) An actuarial analysis, if required;

_8 (d) A list of contractors and service providers;

_9 (e) The financial and loss experience of the
program; and

10 (f) Such other information as required by rule of
the state

11 risk manager.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. The risk pool may not
engage in an act or

13 practice that in any respect significantly differs from
the

14 management and operation plan that formed the basis for
the state

15 risk manager's approval unless the risk pool first
notifies the

16 state risk manager in writing and obtains the state risk
manager's

17 approval. The state risk manager shall approve or disapprove
the

18 proposed change within sixty days of receipt of the
notice. If the

19 state risk manager denies a requested change, the risk
manager

20 shall specify in detail the reasons for denial and the
manner in

21 which the risk pool would fail to meet the requirements of
this

22 chapter or any rules adopted in accordance with this
chapter.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. (1) The state risk
manager shall establish

24 and charge an investigation fee in an amount necessary to
cover

25 the costs for the initial review and approval of the risk
pool. The

26 fee must accompany the initial submission of the plan of
operation

27 and management.

28 (2) The costs of subsequent reviews and investigations
shall be

29 charged to the risk pool being reviewed or investigated in

30 accordance with the actual time and expenses incurred in
the

31 review or investigation.

32 (3) The risk pool shall pay any required fee or
assessment

33 required by the health and welfare advisory board under
RCW

34 48.62.051.

35

p. 7 SB
5191

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through 12
of this act are each

_2 added to chapter 43.63A RCW.

_3 PERTAINING TO FUNDING STATE RETIREMENT SYSTEMS:
ADDING SECTIONS

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added
to chapter 41.45

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) By September 30, 2001, and every two years
thereafter, the

_7 state actuary shall identify, consistent with the rules and

_8 regulations of the internal revenue service:

_9 (a) Those assets which are (i) in excess of the assets
required

10 for actuarial full funding of the law enforcement officers'
and

11 fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 system; and (ii)
not

12 exceeding the anticipated cost of health care benefits for

13 beneficiaries of the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters'

14 retirement system plan 1, for the ensuing biennium;

15 (b) The maximum allowable transfer from the law
enforcement

16 officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund
to the

17 medical account;

18 (c) The maximum allowable transfer from the medical
account to

19 the risk pool account; and

20 (d) The maximum allowable per person reimbursement to
employers

21 for law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 1
medical

22 costs.

23 (2) The state actuary shall immediately transmit the
value of

24 these identified amounts to the office of financial management,

25 the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the law
enforcement

26 officers' and fire fighters' plan 1 risk pool executive
board.

27 PERTAINING TO STATE FUNDS: ADDING
SECTIONS

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. A new section is added
to chapter 43.79

29 RCW to read as follows:

30 (1) The law enforcement officers= and
fire fighters=
plan 1

31 medical account is hereby established as a subaccount
within the

32 law enforcement officers= and fire fighters=
system plan 1

33 retirement account in the custody of the state treasurer,

34 established pursuant to internal revenue code section
401(h). The

SB 5191 p. 8

_1 assets held in the medical account shall be accounted
for

_2 separately from the pension funds. Medical account
assets, however,

_3 may be commingled for investment purposes with the
pension

_4 funds. Investment earnings will be allocated on a
reasonable

_5 basis. The medical account and the pension funds
together comprise

_6 the law enforcement officers=
and fire fighters=
system plan 1

_7 retirement account.

_8 (2) Only beneficiaries qualified for medical
services under RCW

_9 41.26.030(22) and approved under RCW 41.26.150, are
eligible for

10 medical costs or long-term care from the medical
account.

11 (3) The account shall consist of such money as is
transferred

12 to the account. Any money transferred in the account,
the use of

13 which has been restricted by law, may only be expended
in

14 accordance with those restrictions. No employer or
employee

15 contributions shall be made to the medical account.

16 (4) The corpus and the income of the medical account
may not be

17 diverted for any use other than providing long-term care
and

18 medical costs for the calendar year in which the
transfer from the

19 retirement account to the medical account is made.
Section 9(3) of

20 this act shall govern the year and reversion to the law

21 enforcement officers= and fire fighters=
system plan 1 retirement

22 account as required by internal revenue code section
420(c)(1).

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A new section is added
to chapter 43.79

24 RCW to read as follows:

25 (1) The law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
medical

26 benefits risk pool account is hereby established in the
custody of

27 the state treasurer.

28 (2) The account shall consist of such money as is
directed by

29 law for deposit in the account, and such other money not
subject

30 to appropriation that the law enforcement officers' and
fire

31 fighters' plan 1 risk pool executive board authorizes to be

32 deposited in the account. Any money deposited in the
account, the

33 use of which has been restricted by law, may only be
expended in

34 accordance with those restrictions.

35 (3) The director, office of community development,
department

36 of community, trade, and economic development, or the
director's

37 designee, may make disbursements from the account.

p. 9 SB
5191

_1 (4) Only those funds within this account necessary
for the

_2 administration of the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters'

_3 plan 1 risk pool by the office of community development
are

_4 subject to legislative appropriation.

_5 PERTAINING TO LEOFF 1: AMENDATORY
SECTIONS

_6 Sec. 17. RCW 41.26.110
and 2000 c 234 s 1 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 (1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and
either

_9 approved or disapproved by either type of disability board

10 hereafter authorized to be created.

11 (a) By January 1, 2002, each city having a
population of twenty

12 thousand or more shall establish a disability board having

13 jurisdiction over all members employed by said cities and
composed

14 of the following five members: Two members of the city

15 legislative body to be appointed by the mayor, one active
or

16 retired fire fighter to be elected by the fire fighters
employed

17 by or retired from the city, one active or retired law
enforcement

18 officer to be elected by the law enforcement officers
employed by

19 or retired from the city and one member from the public at
large

20 who resides within the city to be appointed by the other
four

21 members heretofore designated in this subsection. Retired
members

22 who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both
the

23 right to elect and the right to be elected under this
section.

24 Each of the elected members shall serve a two year term.
The

25 members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve
for two

26 year terms: PROVIDED, That cities of the first class only,
shall

27 retain existing firemen's pension boards established
pursuant to

28 RCW 41.16.020 and existing boards of trustees of the relief
and

29 pension fund of the police department as established
pursuant to

30 RCW 41.20.010 which such boards shall have authority to act
upon

31 and approve or disapprove claims for disability by fire
fighters

32 or law enforcement officers as provided under the
Washington law

33 enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
act.

34 (b) Each county shall establish a disability board
having

35 jurisdiction over all members residing in the county and
not

36 employed by a city in which a disability board is
established. The

SB 5191 p. 10

_1 county disability board so created shall be composed of
five

_2 members to be chosen as follows: One member of the
legislative

_3 body of the county to be appointed by the county
legislative body,

_4 one member of a city or town legislative body located
within the

_5 county which does not contain a city disability board
established

_6 pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section to be
chosen by a

_7 majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within
the county

_8 which does not contain a city disability board, one fire
fighter

_9 or retired fire fighter to be elected by the fire
fighters

10 employed or retired in the county who are not employed
by or

11 retired from a city in which a disability board is
established,

12 one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement
officer to

13 be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in
or retired

14 from the county who are not employed by or retired from
a city in

15 which a disability board is established, and one member
from the

16 public at large who resides within the county but does
not reside

17 within a city in which a city disability board is
established, to

18 be appointed by the other four members heretofore
designated in

19 this subsection. However, in counties with a population
less than

20 sixty thousand, the member of the disability board
appointed by a

21 majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within
the county

22 that do not contain a city disability board must be a
resident of

23 one of the cities and towns but need not be a member of
a city or

24 town legislative body. Retired members who are subject
to the

25 jurisdiction of the board have both the right to elect
and the

26 right to be elected under this section. All members
appointed or

27 elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two
year

28 terms.

29 (2) The members of both the county and city
disability boards

30 shall not receive compensation for their service upon
the boards

31 but said members shall be reimbursed by their respective
county or

32 city for all expenses incidental to such service as to
the amount

33 authorized by law.

34 (3) The disability boards authorized for
establishment by this

35 section shall perform all functions, exercise all
powers, and make

36 all such determinations as specified in this chapter.

37

p. 11 SB
5191

_1 Sec. 18. RCW 41.26.150
and 1992 c 22 s 3 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 (1) Whenever any active member, or any member hereafter

_4 retired, on account of service, sickness, or disability,
not

_5 caused or brought on by dissipation or abuse, of which the

_6 disability board shall be judge, is confined in any
hospital or in

_7 home, and whether or not so confined, requires medical
services,

_8 the employer shall pay for the active or retired member the

_9 necessary medical services not payable from some other
source as

10 provided for in subsection (2) of this section. In the
case of

11 active or retired fire fighters the employer may make the
payments

12 provided for in this section from the firemen's pension
fund

13 established pursuant to RCW 41.16.050 where the fund had
been

14 established prior to March 1, 1970. If this pension fund
is

15 depleted, the employer shall have the obligation to pay all

16 benefits payable under chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW.

17 (a) The disability board in all cases may have the
active or

18 retired member suffering from such sickness or disability
examined

19 at any time by a licensed physician or physicians, to be
appointed

20 by the disability board, for the purpose of ascertaining
the

21 nature and extent of the sickness or disability, the
physician or

22 physicians to report to the disability board the result of
the

23 examination within three days thereafter. Any active or
retired

24 member who refuses to submit to such examination or
examinations

25 shall forfeit all rights to benefits under this section for
the

26 period of the refusal.

27 (b) The disability board shall designate the medical
services

28 available to any sick or disabled member.

29 (2) The medical services payable under this section
will be

30 reduced by any amount received or eligible to be received
by the

31 member under workers' compensation, social security
including the

32 changes incorporated under Public Law 89‑97,
insurance provided by

33 another employer, other pension plan, or any other similar

34 source. Failure to apply for coverage if otherwise
eligible under

35 the provisions of Public Law 89‑97 shall not be
deemed a refusal

36 of payment of benefits thereby enabling collection of
charges

37 under the provisions of this chapter.

38 (3) Upon making the payments provided for in subsection
(1) of

SB 5191 p. 12

_1 this section, the employer shall be subrogated to all
rights of

_2 the member against any third party who may be held
liable for the

_3 member's injuries or for payment of the cost of medical
services

_4 in connection with a member's sickness or disability to
the extent

_5 necessary to recover the amount of payments made by the
employer.

_6 (4) Any employer under this chapter, either singly,
or jointly

_7 with any other such employer or employers through an
association

_8 thereof as provided for in chapter 48.21 RCW, may
provide for all

_9 or part of one or more plans of group hospitalization
and medical

10 aid insurance to cover any of its employees who are
members of the

11 Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement

12 system, and/or retired former employees who were, before

13 retirement, members of the retirement system, through
contracts

14 with regularly constituted insurance carriers, with
health

15 maintenance organizations as defined in chapter 48.46
RCW, or with

16 health care service contractors as defined in chapter
48.44 RCW.

17 Benefits payable under any ((the [under the]))
plan or plans shall

18 be deemed to be amounts received or eligible to be
received by the

19 active or retired member under subsection (2) of this
section.

20 (5) Any employer, jointly with any other employer
or employers

21 of the state, may participate in the medical benefits
risk pool

22 established under section 3 of this act.

23 (6) Any employer under this chapter may, at
its discretion,

24 elect to reimburse a retired former employee under this
chapter

25 for premiums the retired former employee has paid for
medical

26 insurance that supplements medicare, including premiums
the

27 retired former employee has paid for medicare part B
coverage.

28 INVESTMENTS AND INTERFUND LOANS

29 Sec. 19. RCW 43.84.092
and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended

30 to read as follows:

31 (1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in
the

32 state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income
account,

33 which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

34 (2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to
pay or

35 receive funds associated with federal programs as required
by the

36 federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The
treasury

p. 13 SB
5191

_1 income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW,

_2 but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of

_3 interest earnings required by the cash management
improvement

_4 act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury
required under the

_5 cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180
and shall

_6 not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall

_7 determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government

_8 pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of

_9 financial management may direct transfers of funds
between

10 accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions
of the

11 cash management improvement act, and this subsection.
Refunds or

12 allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set

13 forth in subsection (4) of this section.

14 (3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the
treasury

15 income account may be utilized for the payment of
purchased

16 banking services on behalf of treasury funds including,
but not

17 limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions

18 for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The
treasury

19 income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW,

20 but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial

21 institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of

22 earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

23 (4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute
the earnings

24 credited to the treasury income account. The state
treasurer shall

25 credit the general fund with all the earnings credited
to the

26 treasury income account except:

27 (a) The following accounts and funds shall receive
their

28 proportionate share of earnings based upon each
account's and

29 fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building

30 construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and

31 operation account, the Central Washington University
capital

32 projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and

33 reformatory institutions account, the common school
construction

34 fund, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the county

35 sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing

36 building construction account, the deferred compensation

37 administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal

38 account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the

SB 5191 p. 14

_1 drinking water assistance account, the Eastern
Washington

_2 University capital projects account, the education
construction

_3 fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving

_4 account, the health services account, the public health
services

_5 account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health

_6 services account, the state higher education
construction account,

_7 the higher education construction account, the highway

_8 infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund

_9 account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement

10 administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account,

11 the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan
1 medical

12 account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real

13 estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account,

14 the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation
fund, the

15 multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice

16 assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization

17 account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual

18 surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees'

19 retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement

20 system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the

21 resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the

22 special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account,

23 the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state

24 investment board expense account, the state investment
board

25 commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account,

26 the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers'

27 retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the tobacco

28 prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account,

29 the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery

30 trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement
fund, the

31 University of Washington building account, the volunteer
fire

32 fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund,

33 the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative

34 fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the

35 Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system

36 plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement

37 officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the

38 Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and

p. 15 SB
5191

_1 3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the

_2 Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State

_3 University building account, the Washington State
University bond

_4 retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
fund, and

_5 the Western Washington University capital projects
account.

_6 Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural

_7 permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent

_8 common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and
the state

_9 university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective

10 beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed
under this

11 subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the

12 state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

13 (b) The following accounts and funds shall receive
eighty

14 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each

15 account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The

16 aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue
account, the

17 county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing

18 services account, the essential rail assistance account,
the ferry

19 bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective
fund, the high

20 capacity transportation account, the highway bond
retirement fund,

21 the highway safety account, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle

22 safety education account, the pilotage account, the
public

23 transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital

24 construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account,

25 the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust

26 account, the safety and education account, the special
category C

27 account, the state patrol highway account, the
transportation

28 equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation

29 improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond

30 retirement account, and the urban arterial trust
account.

31 (5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of
the state

32 Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be
allocated

33 earnings without the specific affirmative directive of
this

34 section.

35 Sec. 20. RCW 43.84.092
and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended

36 to read as follows:

SB 5191 p. 16

_1 (1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances
in the

_2 state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income
account,

_3 which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

_4 (2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to
pay or

_5 receive funds associated with federal programs as
required by the

_6 federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The
treasury

_7 income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW,

_8 but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations
of

_9 interest earnings required by the cash management
improvement

10 act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury
required under the

11 cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180
and shall

12 not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall

13 determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government

14 pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of

15 financial management may direct transfers of funds
between

16 accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions
of the

17 cash management improvement act, and this subsection.
Refunds or

18 allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set

19 forth in subsection (4) of this section.

20 (3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the
treasury

21 income account may be utilized for the payment of
purchased

22 banking services on behalf of treasury funds including,
but not

23 limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions

24 for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The
treasury

25 income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW,

26 but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial

27 institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of

28 earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

29 (4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute
the earnings

30 credited to the treasury income account. The state
treasurer shall

31 credit the general fund with all the earnings credited
to the

32 treasury income account except:

33 (a) The following accounts and funds shall receive
their

34 proportionate share of earnings based upon each
account's and

35 fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building

36 construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and

37 operation account, the Central Washington University
capital

38 projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and

p. 17 SB
5191

_1 reformatory institutions account, the common school construction

_2 fund, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the county

_3 sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing

_4 building construction account, the deferred compensation

_5 administrative account, the deferred compensation principal

_6 account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the

_7 drinking water assistance account, the Eastern
Washington

_8 University capital projects account, the education
construction

_9 fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving

10 account, the health services account, the public health
services

11 account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health

12 services account, the state higher education
construction account,

13 the higher education construction account, the highway

14 infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund

15 account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement

16 administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account,

17 the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan
1 medical

18 account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real

19 estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account,

20 the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation
fund, the

21 multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice

22 assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization

23 account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual

24 surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees'

25 retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement

26 system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the Puyallup
tribal

27 settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site

28 closure account, the special wildlife account, the state

29 employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance

30 reserve account, the state investment board expense
account, the

31 state investment board commingled trust fund accounts,
the

32 supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan

33 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and

34 plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the

35 tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure

36 account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of

37 Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington

38 building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve

SB 5191 p. 18

_1 officers' relief and pension principal fund, the
volunteer fire

_2 fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the

_3 Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law

_4 enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement

_5 account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
fire

_6 fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school

_7 employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the

_8 Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington

_9 state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University

10 building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement

11 fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and
the Western

12 Washington University capital projects account.
Earnings derived

13 from investing balances of the agricultural permanent
fund, the

14 normal school permanent fund, the permanent common
school fund,

15 the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent

16 fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary
accounts.

17 All earnings to be distributed under this subsection
(4)(a) shall

18 first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's

19 service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

20 (b) The following accounts and funds shall receive
eighty

21 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each

22 account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The

23 aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue
account, the

24 county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing

25 services account, the essential rail assistance account,
the ferry

26 bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective
fund, the high

27 capacity transportation account, the highway bond
retirement fund,

28 the highway safety account, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle

29 safety education account, the pilotage account, the
public

30 transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital

31 construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account,

32 the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust

33 account, the safety and education account, the special
category C

34 account, the state patrol highway account, the
transportation

35 equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation

36 improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond

37 retirement account, and the urban arterial trust
account.

38 (5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of
the state

p. 19 SB
5191

_1 Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be
allocated

_2 earnings without the specific affirmative directive of
this

_3 section.

_4 Sec. 21. RCW
43.79A.040 and 2000 c 79 s 45 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be
deposited,

_7 invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in
accordance with

_8 RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as
if the

_9 money were in the state treasury.

10 (2) All income received from investment of the
treasurer's

11 trust fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury
trust

12 fund to be known as the investment income account.

13 (3) The investment income account may be utilized for
the

14 payment of purchased banking services on behalf of
treasurer's

15 trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,

16 safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or

17 affected state agencies. The investment income account is
subject

18 in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is

19 required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall

20 occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in
subsection

21 (4) of this section.

22 (4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute
the

23 earnings credited to the investment income account to the
state

24 general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

25 (b) The following accounts and funds shall receive
their

26 proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's
or

27 fund's average daily balance for the period: The
Washington

28 advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural

29 local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund,
the

30 basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
Washington

31 international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the

32 developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy

33 account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account,
the

34 grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability

35 incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire

36 fighters' plan 1 risk pool account, the rural
rehabilitation

37 account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth

SB 5191 p. 20

_1 athletic facility ((grant)) account, the
self-insurance revolving

_2 fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's

_3 trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed
shall first be

_4 reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund

_5 pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

_6 (c) The following accounts and funds shall receive
eighty

_7 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each

_8 account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The

_9 advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced
environmental

10 mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset

11 forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account,
the local

12 rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous

13 transportation programs account.

14 (5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of
the state

15 Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be
allocated

16 earnings without the specific affirmative directive of
this

17 section.

18 PERTAINING TO OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY

19 Sec. 22. RCW 44.44.040
and 1987 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read

20 as follows:

21 The office of the state actuary shall have the
following powers

22 and duties:

23 (1) Perform all actuarial services for the department
of

24 retirement systems, including all studies required by law,
the

25 state board for volunteer fire fighters and reserve
officers, and

26 the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' risk
pool

27 executive board. Reimbursement for such services
shall be made to

28 the state actuary pursuant to the provisions of RCW
39.34.130 as

29 now or hereafter amended.

30 (2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding
pension

31 benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment
policies

32 of the state investment board.

33 (3) Consult with the legislature and the governor
concerning

34 determination of actuarial assumptions used by the
department of

35 retirement systems.

36 (4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial
fiscal note,

p. 21 SB
5191

_1 on each pension bill introduced in the legislature which
briefly

_2 explains the financial impact of the bill. The
actuarial fiscal

_3 note shall include: (a) The statutorily required
contribution for

_4 the biennium and the following twenty-five years; (b)
the biennial

_5 cost of the increased benefits if these exceed the
required

_6 contribution; and (c) any change in the present value of
the

_7 unfunded accrued benefits. An actuarial fiscal note
shall also be

_8 prepared for all amendments which are offered in
committee or on

_9 the floor of the house of representatives or the senate
to any

10 pension bill. However, a majority of the members
present may

11 suspend the requirement for an actuarial fiscal note for

12 amendments offered on the floor of the house of
representatives or

13 the senate.

14 (5) Provide such actuarial services to the
legislature as may

15 be requested from time to time.

16 (6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee
established

17 under ((RCW 46.44.050)) RCW 44.44.050.

18 (7) Provide assistance as required under sections
5 and 8 of

19 this act.

20 PERTAINING TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT INSURANCE
TRANSACTIONS

21 Sec. 23. RCW 48.62.031
and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 3 are each amended to

22 read as follows:

23 (1) The governing body of a local government entity may

24 individually self-insure, may join or form a self-insurance

25 program together with other entities, and may jointly
purchase

26 insurance or reinsurance with other entities for property
and

27 liability risks, and health and welfare benefits only as
permitted

28 under this chapter. In addition, the entity or entities
may

29 contract for or hire personnel to provide risk management,
claims,

30 and administrative services in accordance with this
chapter.

31 (2) The governing body of a local government entity

32 individually may join or form a risk assumption program
together

33 with other entities, and may jointly purchase insurance
or

34 reinsurance with other entities for health and welfare
benefits

35 only as permitted under this chapter. In addition, the
entity or

SB 5191 p. 22

_1 entities may contract for or hire personnel to
provide risk

_2 management, claims, and administrative services in
accordance with

_3 this chapter.

_4 (3) The agreement to form a joint
self-insurance or risk

_5 assumption program shall be made under chapter
39.34 RCW.

_6 (((3))) (4) Every individual and joint
self-insurance program

_7 and a health and welfare risk assumption program
is subject to

_8 audit by the state auditor.

_9 (((4))) (5) If provided for in the
agreement or contract

10 established under chapter 39.34 RCW, a joint
self-insurance or

11 risk assumption program may, in conformance with
this chapter:

12 (a) Contract or otherwise provide for risk
management and loss

13 control services;

14 (b) Contract or otherwise provide legal counsel for
the defense

15 of claims and other legal services;

16 (c) Consult with the state insurance commissioner
and the state

17 risk manager;

18 (d) Jointly purchase insurance and reinsurance
coverage in such

19 form and amount as the program's participants agree by
contract;

20 and

21 (e) Possess any other powers and perform all other
functions

22 reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

23 (((5))) (6) A local government entity or
a health and welfare

24 risk assumption program that has decided to
assume a risk of loss

25 must have available for inspection by the state auditor
a written

26 report indicating the class of risk or risks the
governing body of

27 the entity has decided to assume.

28 (((6))) (7) Every joint self-insurance
or risk assumption

29 program governed by this chapter shall appoint the risk
manager as

30 its attorney to receive service of, and upon whom shall
be served,

31 all legal process issued against it in this state upon
causes of

32 action arising in this state.

33 (a) Service upon the risk manager as attorney shall
constitute

34 service upon the program. Service upon joint insurance
programs

35 subject to chapter 30, Laws of 1991 1st sp. sess. can be
had only

36 by service upon the risk manager. At the time of
service, the

37 plaintiff shall pay to the risk manager a fee to be set
by the

38 risk manager, taxable as costs in the action.

p. 23 SB
5191

_1 (b) With the initial filing for approval with the
risk manager,

_2 each joint self-insurance program shall designate by
name and

_3 address the person to whom the risk manager shall
forward legal

_4 process so served upon him or her. The joint
self-insurance program

_5 may change such person by filing a new designation.

_6 (c) The appointment of the risk manager as attorney
shall be

_7 irrevocable, shall bind any successor in interest or to
the assets

_8 or liabilities of the joint self-insurance program, and
shall

_9 remain in effect as long as there is in force in this
state any

10 contract made by the joint self-insurance program or
liabilities

11 or duties arising therefrom.

12 (d) The risk manager shall keep a record of the day
and hour of

13 service upon him or her of all legal process. A copy of
the

14 process, by registered mail with return receipt
requested, shall

15 be sent by the risk manager, to the person designated
for the

16 purpose by the joint self-insurance or risk
assumption program in

17 its most recent such designation filed with the risk
manager. No

18 proceedings shall be had against the joint
self-insurance or risk

19 assumption program, and the program shall not be
required to

20 appear, plead, or answer, until the expiration of forty
days after

21 the date of service upon the risk manager.

22 Sec. 24. RCW 48.62.051
and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 5 are each amended

23 to read as follows:

24 (1) The health and welfare advisory board is created
consisting

25 of the insurance commissioner and the state risk manager,
or their

26 designees, as ex officio members and six members appointed
by the

27 governor on the basis of their experience and knowledge
pertaining

28 to local government self-insured health and welfare
benefits

29 programs. The board shall include one city management

30 representative; one county management representative; two

31 management representatives from local government
self-insured

32 health and welfare programs; and two representatives of
statewide

33 employee organizations representing local government
employees.

34 (2) The board shall assist the state risk manager in:

35 (a) Adopting rules governing the operation and
management of

36 both individual and joint self-insured health and welfare
benefits

SB 5191 p. 24

_1 programs and the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters'

_2 medical benefits risk pool;

_3 (b) Reviewing and approving the creation of both
individual and

_4 joint self-insured health and welfare benefits programs;

_5 (c) Reviewing annual reports filed by health and
welfare

_6 benefits programs and in recommending that corrective
action be

_7 taken by the programs when necessary; and

_8 (d) Responding to concerns of the state auditor
related to the

_9 management and operation of health and welfare benefits
programs.

10 (3) The board shall annually elect a chair and a
vice-chair

11 from its members. The board shall meet at least
quarterly at such

12 times as the state risk manager may fix. The board
members who are

13 appointed shall serve without compensation from the
state but

14 shall suffer no loss because of absence from their
regular

15 employment. Members of the board who are not public
employees shall

16 be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240.

17 (4) A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for
the

18 transaction of business.

19 (5) The board shall keep public records of its
proceedings.

20 NECESSARY FOR IMPLEMENTATION

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. Part headings used in
this act are not

22 any part of the law.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. (1) Sections 1 through
19 and 21 through

24 24 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the

25 public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state

26 government and its existing public institutions, and take
effect

27 July 1, 2001.

28 (2) Section 20 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002.

29 (3) Section 19 of this act expires March 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 25 SB
5191