BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 5.60.060
and 1998 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as

_6 follows:

_7 (1) A husband shall not be examined for or against his
wife,

_8 without the consent of the wife, nor a wife for or against
her

_9 husband without the consent of the husband; nor can either
during

10 marriage or afterward, be without the consent of the other,

11 examined as to any communication made by one to the other
during

12 marriage. But this exception shall not apply to a civil
action or

13 proceeding by one against the other, nor to a criminal
action or

14 proceeding for a crime committed by one against the other,
nor to

15 a criminal action or proceeding against a spouse if the
marriage

16 occurred subsequent to the filing of formal charges against
the

17 defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a
crime

18 committed by said husband or wife against any child of whom
said

19 husband or wife is the parent or guardian, nor to a
proceeding

p. 1 SB
5192

_1 under chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW: PROVIDED, That the
spouse of a

_2 person sought to be detained under chapter 70.96A or
71.05 RCW may

_3 not be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by
the court

_4 prior to being called as a witness.

_5 (2)(a) An attorney or counselor shall not, without
the consent

_6 of his or her client, be examined as to any
communication made by

_7 the client to him or her, or his or her advice given
thereon in

_8 the course of professional employment.

_9 (b) A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested
on a

10 criminal charge may not be examined as to a
communication between

11 the child and his or her attorney if the communication
was made in

12 the presence of the parent or guardian. This privilege
does not

13 extend to communications made prior to the arrest.

14 (3) A member of the clergy or a priest shall not,
without the

15 consent of a person making the confession, be examined
as to any

16 confession made to him or her in his or her professional

17 character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the
church to

18 which he or she belongs.

19 (4) Subject to the limitations under RCW 70.96A.140
or

20 71.05.250, a physician or surgeon or osteopathic
physician or

21 surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not,
without the

22 consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil
action as to

23 any information acquired in attending such patient,
which was

24 necessary to enable him or her to prescribe or act for
the

25 patient, except as follows:

26 (a) In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's
injury,

27 neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and

28 (b) Ninety days after filing an action for personal
injuries or

29 wrongful death, the claimant shall be deemed to waive
the

30 physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the
physician-patient

31 privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes
a waiver

32 of the privilege as to all physicians or conditions,
subject to

33 such limitations as a court may impose pursuant to court
rules.

34 (5) A public officer shall not be examined as a
witness as to

35 communications made to him or her in official
confidence, when the

36 public interest would suffer by the disclosure.

37 (6)(a) A peer support group counselor shall not,
without

38 consent of the law enforcement officer making the
communication,

SB 5192 p. 2

_1 be compelled to testify about any communication made to
the

_2 counselor by the officer while receiving counseling.
The

_3 counselor must be designated as such by the sheriff,
police chief,

_4 or chief of the Washington state patrol, prior to the
incident

_5 that results in counseling. The privilege only applies
when the

_6 communication was made to the counselor while acting in
his or her

_7 capacity as a peer support group counselor. The
privilege does

_8 not apply if the counselor was an initial responding
officer, a

_9 witness, or a party to the incident which prompted the
delivery of

10 peer support group counseling services to the law
enforcement

11 officer.

12 (b) For purposes of this section, "peer support
group

13 counselor" means a:

14 (i) Law enforcement officer, or civilian employee of
a law

15 enforcement agency, who has received training to provide
emotional

16 and moral support and counseling to an officer who needs
those

17 services as a result of an incident in which the officer
was

18 involved while acting in his or her official capacity;
or

19 (ii) Nonemployee counselor who has been designated
by the

20 sheriff, police chief, or chief of the Washington state
patrol to

21 provide emotional and moral support and counseling to an
officer

22 who needs those services as a result of an incident in
which the

23 officer was involved while acting in his or her official
capacity.

24 (7) A sexual assault advocate may not, without the
consent of

25 the victim, be examined as to any communication made by
the victim

26 to the sexual assault advocate.

27 (a) For purposes of this section, "sexual
assault advocate"

28 means the employee or volunteer from a rape crisis
center, victim

29 assistance unit, program, or association, that provides

30 information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling, or
support to

31 victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the
victim to

32 accompany the victim to the hospital or other health
care facility

33 and to proceedings concerning the alleged assault,
including

34 police and prosecution interviews and court proceedings.

35 (b) A sexual assault advocate may disclose a
confidential

36 communication without the consent of the victim if
failure to

37 disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk
of serious

38 physical injury or death of the victim or another
person. Any

p. 3 SB
5192

_1 sexual assault advocate participating in good faith in
the

_2 disclosing of records and communications under this
section shall

_3 have immunity from any liability, civil, criminal, or
otherwise,

_4 that might result from the action. In any proceeding,
civil or

_5 criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this
section, the good

_6 faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed the

_7 confidential communication shall be presumed.

_8 (8) A state legislator may not be examined as to
any

_9 constituent communication made to him or her in his
or her

10 official capacity without the consent of the
constituent.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Nothing in this act is
intended to

12 diminish any constitutional, common law, or other
statutory

13 privilege that may attach to communications between state

14 legislators and constituents.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5192 p. 4