BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.020
and 1995 c 397 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and
all local

_7 agencies. "State agency" includes every state
office, department,

_8 division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency.
"Local

_9 agency" includes every county, city, town, municipal
corporation,

10 quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district,
or any

11 office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or
agency

12 thereof, or other local public agency.

13 (2) "Authorized committee" means the
political committee

14 authorized by a candidate, or by the public official
against whom

15 recall charges have been filed, to accept contributions or
make

16 expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public official.

17 (3) "Ballot proposition" means any
"measure" as defined by RCW

18 29.01.110, or any initiative, recall, or referendum
proposition

19 proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any

p. 1 SB
5193

_1 municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other
voting

_2 constituency from and after the time when the
proposition has been

_3 initially filed with the appropriate election officer of
that

_4 constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.

_5 (4) "Benefit" means a commercial,
proprietary, financial,

_6 economic, or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a
commercial,

_7 proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary
disadvantage.

_8 (5) "Bona fide political party" means:

_9 (a) An organization that has filed a valid
certificate of

10 nomination with the secretary of state under chapter
29.24 RCW;

11 (b) The governing body of the state organization of
a major

12 political party, as defined in RCW 29.01.090, that is
the body

13 authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to
exercise

14 authority on behalf of the state party; or

15 (c) The county central committee or legislative
district

16 committee of a major political party. There may be only
one

17 legislative district committee for each party in each
legislative

18 district.

19 (6) "Depository" means a bank designated
by a candidate or

20 political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.

21 (7) "Treasurer" and "deputy
treasurer" mean the individuals

22 appointed by a candidate or political committee,
pursuant to RCW

23 42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that
section.

24 (8) "Candidate" means any individual who
seeks nomination for

25 election or election to public office. An individual
seeks

26 nomination or election when he or she first:

27 (a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or
reserves

28 space or facilities with intent to promote his or her
candidacy

29 for office;

30 (b) Announces publicly or files for office;

31 (c) Purchases commercial advertising space or
broadcast time to

32 promote his or her candidacy; or

33 (d) Gives his or her consent to another person to
take on

34 behalf of the individual any of the actions in (a) or
(c) of this

35 subsection.

36 (9) "Caucus political committee" means a
political committee

37 organized and maintained by the members of a major
political party

38 in the state senate or state house of representatives.

SB 5193 p. 2

_1 (10) "Commercial advertiser" means any
person who sells the

_2 service of communicating messages or producing printed
material

_3 for broadcast or distribution to the general public or
segments of

_4 the general public whether through the use of
newspapers,

_5 magazines, television and radio stations, billboard
companies,

_6 direct mail advertising companies, printing companies,
or

_7 otherwise.

_8 (11) "Commission" means the agency
established under RCW

_9 42.17.350.

10 (12) "Compensation" unless the context
requires a narrower

11 meaning, includes payment in any form for real or
personal

12 property or services of any kind: PROVIDED, That for
the purpose

13 of compliance with RCW 42.17.241, the term
"compensation" shall

14 not include per diem allowances or other payments made
by a

15 governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses

16 incurred while the official is engaged in the official
business of

17 the governmental entity.

18 (13) "Continuing political committee"
means a political

19 committee that is an organization of continuing
existence not

20 established in anticipation of any particular election
campaign.

21 (14)(a) "Contribution" includes:

22 (i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness
of

23 indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment,
transfer of

24 funds between political committees, or anything of
value,

25 including personal and professional services for less
than full

26 consideration;

27 (ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation,

28 consultation, or concert with, or at the request or
suggestion of,

29 a candidate, a political committee, or their agents;

30 (iii) The financing by a person of the
dissemination,

31 distribution, or republication, in whole or in part, of
broadcast,

32 written, graphic, or other form of political advertising
prepared

33 by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;

34 (iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events
such as

35 dinners and parties, except for the actual cost of the
consumables

36 furnished at the event.

37 (b) "Contribution" does not include:

p. 3 SB
5193

_1 (i) Standard interest on money deposited in a
political

_2 committee's account;

_3 (ii) Ordinary home hospitality;

_4 (iii) A contribution received by a candidate or
political

_5 committee that is returned to the contributor within
five business

_6 days of the date on which it is received by the
candidate or

_7 political committee;

_8 (iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial
in a

_9 regularly scheduled news medium that is of primary
interest to the

10 general public, that is in a news medium controlled by a
person

11 whose business is that news medium, and that is not
controlled by

12 a candidate or a political committee;

13 (v) An internal political communication primarily
limited to

14 the members of or contributors to a political party
organization

15 or political committee, or to the officers, management
staff, or

16 stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or
to the

17 members of a labor organization or other membership
organization;

18 (vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort
commonly

19 performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental
expenses

20 personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in
excess of

21 fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker.
"Volunteer

22 services," for the purposes of this section, means
services or

23 labor for which the individual is not compensated by any
person;

24 (vii) Messages in the form of reader boards,
banners, or yard

25 or window signs displayed on a person's own property or
property

26 occupied by a person. However, a facility used for such
political

27 advertising for which a rental charge is normally made
must be

28 reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards
any

29 applicable contribution limit of the person providing
the

30 facility;

31 (viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or
on behalf

32 of:

33 (A) A political party or caucus political committee
if the

34 person paying for the services is the regular employer
of the

35 person rendering such services; or

36 (B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the
person paying

37 for the services is the regular employer of the
individual

SB 5193 p. 4

_1 rendering the services and if the services are solely
for the

_2 purpose of ensuring compliance with state election or
public

_3 disclosure laws.

_4 (c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent
are deemed

_5 to have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market
value of

_6 the contribution. Services or property or rights
furnished at

_7 less than their fair market value for the purpose of
assisting any

_8 candidate or political committee are deemed a
contribution. Such

_9 a contribution must be reported as an in-kind
contribution at its

10 fair market value and counts towards any applicable
contribution

11 limit of the provider.

12 (15) "Elected official" means any person
elected at a general

13 or special election to any public office, and any person
appointed

14 to fill a vacancy in any such office.

15 (16) "Election" includes any primary,
general, or special

16 election for public office and any election in which a
ballot

17 proposition is submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That
an

18 election in which the qualifications for voting include
other than

19 those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1
(Amendment

20 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall
not be

21 considered an election for purposes of this chapter.

22 (17) "Election campaign" means any
campaign in support of or in

23 opposition to a candidate for election to public office
and any

24 campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot
proposition.

25 (18) "Election cycle" means the period
beginning on the first

26 day of December after the date of the last previous
general

27 election for the office that the candidate seeks and
ending on

28 November 30th after the next election for the office.
In the case

29 of a special election to fill a vacancy in an office,
"election

30 cycle" means the period beginning on the day the
vacancy occurs

31 and ending on November 30th after the special election.

32 (19) "Expenditure" includes a payment,
contribution,

33 subscription, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or
gift of

34 money or anything of value, and includes a contract,
promise, or

35 agreement, whether or not legally enforceable, to make
an

36 expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to

37 pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for

38 goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of
value for

p. 5 SB
5193

_1 the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any
public

_2 official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any

_3 election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements

_4 to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may
be

_5 reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is
made.

_6 The term "expenditure" shall not include the
partial or complete

_7 repayment by a candidate or political committee of the
principal

_8 of a loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly
reported.

_9 (20) "Final report" means the report described
as a final

10 report in RCW 42.17.080(2).

11 (21) "General election" means the election
that results in the

12 election of a person to a state office. It does not
include a

13 primary.

14 (22) "Gift," is as defined in RCW
42.52.010.

15 (23) "Immediate family" includes the
spouse, dependent

16 children, and other dependent relatives, if living in
the

17 household. For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through
42.17.790,

18 "immediate family" means an individual's
spouse, and child,

19 stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother,

20 half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual
and the

21 spouse of any such person and a child, stepchild,
grandchild,

22 parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother,
sister, or

23 half sister of the individual's spouse and the spouse of
any such

24 person.

25 (24) "Independent expenditure" means an
expenditure that has

26 each of the following elements:

27 (a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a
candidate

28 for office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for
that office,

29 (ii) an authorized committee of that candidate for that
office,

30 (iii) a person who has received the candidate's
encouragement or

31 approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure
pays in whole

32 or in part for political advertising supporting that
candidate or

33 promoting the defeat of any other candidate or
candidates for that

34 office, or (iv) a person with whom the candidate has
collaborated

35 for the purpose of making the expenditure, if the
expenditure pays

36 in whole or in part for political advertising supporting
that

37 candidate or promoting the defeat of any other candidate
or

38 candidates for that office;

SB 5193 p. 6

_1 (b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for
political

_2 advertising that either specifically names the candidate
supported

_3 or opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies
the

_4 candidate without using the candidate's name; and

_5 (c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with
another

_6 expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in
support of

_7 or opposition to that candidate, has a value of five
hundred

_8 dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of
which is under

_9 five hundred dollars, constitutes one independent
expenditure if

10 their cumulative value is five hundred dollars or more.

11 (25)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual
who transmits a

12 contribution to a candidate or committee from another
person

13 unless the contribution is from the individual's
employer,

14 immediate family as defined for purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through

15 42.17.790, or an association to which the individual
belongs.

16 (b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an
intermediary for

17 purposes of the committee that the treasurer or
candidate serves.

18 (c) A professional fund-raiser is not an
intermediary if the

19 fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at
the usual

20 and customary rate.

21 (d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the

22 individual's home is not an intermediary for purposes of
that

23 event.

24 (26) "Legislation" means bills,
resolutions, motions,

25 amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or
proposed in

26 either house of the state legislature, and includes any
other

27 matter that may be the subject of action by either house
or any

28 committee of the legislature and all bills and
resolutions that,

29 having passed both houses, are pending approval by the
governor.

30 (27) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each
mean attempting to influence

31 the passage or defeat of any legislation by the
legislature of the

32 state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule,

33 standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any
state agency

34 under the state Administrative Procedure Act, chapter
34.05 RCW.

35 Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying"
includes an association's or other

36 organization's act of communicating with the members of
that

37 association or organization.

p. 7 SB
5193

_1 (28) "Lobbyist" includes any person who
lobbies either in his

_2 or her own or another's behalf.

_3 (29) "Lobbyist's employer" means the
person or persons by whom

_4 a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she
is

_5 compensated for acting as a lobbyist.

_6 (30) "Person" includes an individual,
partnership, joint

_7 venture, public or private corporation, association,
federal,

_8 state, or local governmental entity or agency however
constituted,

_9 candidate, committee, political committee, political
party,

10 executive committee thereof, or any other organization
or group of

11 persons, however organized.

12 (31) "Person in interest" means the person
who is the subject

13 of a record or any representative designated by that
person,

14 except that if that person is under a legal disability,
the term

15 "person in interest" means and includes the
parent or duly

16 appointed legal representative.

17 (32) "Political advertising" includes any
advertising displays,

18 newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids,

19 flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or
other means

20 of mass communication, used for the purpose of
appealing, directly

21 or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other
support in any

22 election campaign.

23 (33) "Political committee" means any
person (except a candidate

24 or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property)

25 having the expectation of receiving contributions or
making

26 expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any
candidate or any

27 ballot proposition.

28 (34) "Primary" means the procedure for
nominating a candidate

29 to state office under chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any
other

30 primary for an election that uses, in large measure, the

31 procedures established in chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW.

32 (35) "Public office" means any federal,
state, county, city,

33 town, school district, port district, special district,
or other

34 state political subdivision elective office.

35 (36) "Public record" includes any writing
containing

36 information relating to the conduct of government or the

37 performance of any governmental or proprietary function
prepared,

38 owned, used, or retained by any state or local agency
regardless

SB 5193 p. 8

_1 of physical form or characteristics. For state
legislative

_2 offices, the office of the secretary of the
senate, and the office

_3 of the chief clerk of the house of representatives,
public records

_4 means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100
and also

_5 means the following: All budget and financial records;
personnel

_6 leave, travel, and payroll records; records of
legislative

_7 sessions; reports submitted to the legislature; and any
other

_8 record designated a public record by any official action
of the

_9 senate or the house of representatives.

10 (37) "Recall campaign" means the period of
time beginning on

11 the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW
29.82.015 and

12 ending thirty days after the recall election.

13 (38) "State legislative office" means the
office of a member of

14 the state house of representatives or the office of a
member of

15 the state senate.

16 (39) "State office" means state
legislative office or the

17 office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of
state,

18 attorney general, commissioner of public lands,
insurance

19 commissioner, superintendent of public instruction,
state auditor,

20 or state treasurer.

21 (40) "State official" means a person who
holds a state office.

22 (41) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of
a political committee

23 or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain
in the

24 possession or control of that committee or candidate
subsequent to

25 the election for which the contributions were received,
and that

26 are in excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining
debts

27 incurred by the committee or candidate prior to that
election. In

28 the case of a continuing political committee,
"surplus funds" mean

29 those contributions remaining in the possession or
control of the

30 committee that are in excess of the amount necessary to
pay all

31 remaining debts when it makes its final report under RCW

32 42.17.065.

33 (42) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting,
printing,

34 photostating, photographing, and every other means of
recording

35 any form of communication or representation, including,
but not

36 limited to, letters, words, pictures, sounds, or
symbols, or

37 combination thereof, and all papers, maps, magnetic or
paper

38 tapes, photographic films and prints, motion picture,
film and

p. 9 SB
5193

_1 video recordings, magnetic or punched cards, discs,
drums,

_2 diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including

_3 existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained

_4 or translated.

_5 As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the
plural and

_6 any gender, the other, as the context requires.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5193 p. 10