BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.38.065 and 1998 c
176 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

A person
may not operate or maintain a motor vehicle on a public highway of this state
with dyed special fuel in the fuel supply tank unless: (1) The use is
authorized by the internal revenue code and the person is the holder of an
uncanceled dyed special fuel user license issued to him or her by the
department; or (2) the use is by a farmer for limited on-road use for
operations which are integral to farming and within fifty miles of the site of
principal operations. The special fuel tax set forth in RCW 82.38.030 is
imposed on users of dyed special fuel authorized by the internal revenue code
to operate on-highway motor vehicles using dyed special fuel, unless the use is
exempt from the special fuel tax.

--- END ---