BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
51.32.112 and 1993 c 515 s 4 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 (1) The department shall ((develop standards for))
adopt rules

_9 governing the conduct of ((special))
medical examinations ((to

10 determine permanent disabilities)) pursuant to
RCW 51.36.070,

11 including, but not limited to:

12 (a) The qualifications of persons conducting the
examinations.

13 To conduct an examination, a medical provider must,
at a minimum,

14 be licensed to practice at the time of the
examination:

15 (i) Medicine or surgery under chapter 18.71 RCW,
osteopathic

16 medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW,
podiatric medicine

17 and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW, dentistry under
chapter 18.30

18 RCW, or chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW; and

p. 1 SSB
5195

_1 (ii) To the extent possible, the qualifications
of the examiner

_2 should match the clinical condition for which the
worker is being

_3 examined;

_4 (b) The criteria for removing examiners from the
list of

_5 approved examiners, including but not limited to the
department

_6 determining that the provider:

_7 (i) Committed any violation of this title, or
department rules

_8 or policies under this title;

_9 (ii) Committed professional or other misconduct,
or

10 demonstrated incompetency in connection with
providing medical

11 examinations under this title;

12 (iii) Exceeded the limits of his or her
professional competence

13 in conducting medical examinations or made materially
false

14 statements regarding his or her qualifications in his
or her

15 application as an examiner;

16 (iv) Failed to transmit copies of medical
reports, or failed to

17 submit full and truthful medical reports of his or
her findings,

18 as required by this title;

19 (v) Knowingly made a false statement or
representation as to a

20 material fact in any medical report made under this
title or in

21 testifying or otherwise providing information for the
purposes of

22 this title; or

23 (vi) Refused to appear before, testify, submit to
deposition,

24 or answer a material question of the department, or
board of

25 industrial insurance appeals, or produce a material
document

26 concerning his or her provision of services under
this title;

27 (((b))) (c) The criteria for
conducting the examinations,

28 including guidelines for the appropriate treatment of
injured

29 workers during the examination; and

30 (((c))) (d) The content of examination
reports.

31 (2) Within the appropriate scope of practice,
chiropractors

32 licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW may conduct special
medical

33 examinations to determine permanent disabilities under
RCW

34 51.32.055 in consultation with physicians
licensed under chapter

35 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. The depart­ment, in its discretion,
may request

36 that a special medical examination be conducted by a
single

37 chiroprac­tor if the department determines that the sole
issues

38 involved in the examination are within the scope of practice
under

SSB 5195 p. 2

_1 chapter 18.25 RCW. However, nothing in this section
authorizes the

_2 use as evidence before the board of a chiropractor's
determination

_3 of the extent of a worker's permanent disability if the

_4 determination is not requested by the department.

_5 (3) The department must examine the credentials
of providers

_6 conducting medical examinations pursuant to RCW
51.36.070 and must

_7 monitor the quality and objectivity of the
examinations and

_8 examination reports obtained by the department and
self-insured

_9 employers. The department's rules must ensure that
examinations

10 pursuant to RCW 51.36.070 are performed only by
qualified

11 providers meeting department standards.

12 (4) The department shall keep and maintain a
record of all

13 complaints regarding the conduct of an examiner in
the performance

14 and reporting of medical examinations, and all
department

15 responses to these complaints, for ten years. The
department shall

16 make complaints regarding the conduct of an examiner
in the

17 performance and reporting of a worker's medical
examination, and

18 all department responses to these complaints,
available to the

19 worker or worker's representative upon request. The
department

20 shall make complaints regarding the conduct of an
examiner in the

21 performance and reporting of another worker's medical
examination,

22 and all department responses to these complaints,
available to a

23 worker or worker's representative upon request,
provided that

24 other workers' names and claim numbers are deleted
and that no

25 medical records are released. This section shall not
be interpreted

26 to allow a worker or worker's representative to view
the claim

27 file or medical records of another worker, or to
allow the

28 department to withhold information pursuant to an
appropriate

29 legal order or action.

30 (5) The department shall investigate the
amount of examination

31 fees received by persons conducting ((special))
medical

32 examinations ((to determine permanent disabili­ties))pursuant
to

33 RCW 51.36.070, including total compensation
received for

34 examina­tions of department and self-insured claimants,
and

35 establish compensation guidelines and compensation
reporting

36 criteria.

37 (((4))) (6) The department shall
investigate the level of

38 compliance of self-insurers with the require­ment of
full reporting

p. 3 SSB
5195

_1 of claims information to the department, particularly
with respect

_2 to medical examinations, and develop effective
enforcement

_3 proce­dures or recommendations for legislation if
needed.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 51.32.112 is
recodified as a new

_5 section in chapter 51.36 RCW.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW
51.32.114 (Medical examination‑-

_7 Department to monitor quality and objectivity) and 1988
c 114 s 3

_8 are each repealed.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies to
all medical

10 examinations pursuant to RCW 51.36.070 on or after the
effective

11 date of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5195 p. 4