BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
19.182.005 and 1993 c 476 s 1 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 The legislature finds and declares that consumers
have a vital

_9 interest in establishing and maintaining
creditworthiness. The

10 legislature further finds that an elaborate mechanism
using credit

11 reports and credit scores has developed for
investigating and

12 evaluating a consumer's creditworthiness, credit
capacity, and

13 general reputation and character. As such, credit
reports and

14 credit scores are used for evaluating credit
card, loan, mortgage,

15 and small business financing applications, as well as
for

16 decisions regarding employment and the rental or leasing
of

17 dwellings. Moreover, financial institutions and other
creditors

18 depend upon fair and accurate credit reports and
credit scores to

p. 1 SSB 5196

_1 efficiently and accurately evaluate creditworthiness.
Unfair or

_2 inaccurate reports and scores undermine both
public and creditor

_3 confidences in the reliability of credit granting
systems.

_4 Therefore, this chapter is necessary to assure accurate
credit

_5 data collection, maintenance, and reporting on the
citizens of the

_6 state. It is the policy of the state that credit
reporting agencies

_7 maintain accurate credit reports and credit scores,
resolve

_8 disputed reports promptly and fairly, and adopt
reasonable

_9 procedures to promote consumer confidentiality and the
proper use

10 of credit data in accordance with this chapter.

11 Sec. 2. RCW
19.182.010 and 1993 c 476 s 3 are each amended to read

12 as follows:

13 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

14 in this section apply throughout this chapter.

15 (1)(a) "Adverse action" includes:

16 (i) Denial of, increase in any charge for, or
reduction in the

17 amount of insurance for personal, family, or household
purposes;

18 (ii) Denial of employment or any other decision for
employment

19 purposes that adversely affects a current or prospective
employee;

20 (iii) Action or determination with respect to a
consumer's

21 application for credit that is adverse to the interests
of the

22 consumer; and

23 (iv) Action or determination with respect to a
consumer's

24 application for the rental or leasing of residential
real estate

25 that is adverse to the interests of the consumer.

26 (b) "Adverse action" does not include:

27 (i) A refusal to extend additional credit under an
existing

28 credit arrangement if:

29 (A) The applicant is delinquent or otherwise in
default with

30 respect to the arrangement; or

31 (B) The additional credit would exceed a previously
established

32 credit limit; or

33 (ii) A refusal or failure to authorize an account
transaction

34 at a point of sale.

35 (2) "Attorney general" means the office of
the attorney

36 general.

37 (3) "Consumer" means an individual.

SSB 5196 p. 2

_1 (4)(a) "Consumer report" means a written,
oral, or other

_2 communication of information by a consumer reporting
agency

_3 bearing on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit
standing, credit

_4 capacity, character, general reputation, personal
characteristics,

_5 or mode of living that is used or expected to be used or
collected

_6 in whole or in part for:

_7 (i) The purpose of serving as a factor in
establishing the

_8 consumer's eligibility for credit or insurance to be
used

_9 primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

10 (ii) Employment purposes; or

11 (iii) Other purposes authorized under RCW
19.182.020.

12 (b) "Consumer report" does not include:

13 (i) A report containing information solely as to
transactions

14 or experiences between the consumer and the person
making the

15 report;

16 (ii) An authorization or approval of a specific
extension of

17 credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit
card or

18 similar device;

19 (iii) A report in which a person who has been
requested by a

20 third party to make a specific extension of credit
directly or

21 indirectly to a consumer conveys his or her decision
with respect

22 to the request, if the third party advises the consumer
of the

23 name and address of the person to whom the request was
made and

24 the person makes the disclosures to the consumer
required under

25 RCW 19.182.070;

26 (iv) A list compiled by a consumer reporting agency
to be used

27 by its client for direct marketing of goods or services
not

28 involving an offer of credit;

29 (v) A report solely conveying a decision whether to
guarantee a

30 check in response to a request by a third party; or

31 (vi) A report furnished for use in connection with a

32 transaction that consists of an extension of credit to
be used for

33 a commercial purpose.

34 (5) "Consumer reporting agency" means a
person who, for

35 monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit
basis,

36 regularly engages in whole or in part in the business of

37 assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or
other

38 information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing
consumer

p. 3 SSB
5196

_1 reports to third parties, and who uses any means or
facility of

_2 commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing
consumer

_3 reports. "Consumer reporting agency" does not
include a person

_4 solely by reason of conveying a decision whether to
guarantee a

_5 check in response to a request by a third party or a
person who

_6 obtains a consumer report and provides the report or
information

_7 contained in it to a subsidiary or affiliate of the
person.

_8 (6) "Credit score" means a numerical
value or a categorization

_9 derived from a statistical tool or modeling system
used by a

10 person who makes or arranges a loan to predict the
likelihood of

11 certain credit behaviors, including default. The
numerical value or

12 the categorization derived from this analysis may
also be referred

13 to as a risk predictor or risk score.

14 "Credit score" does not include any
score or rating of an

15 automated underwriting system that considers one or
more factors

16 in addition to credit information, including, but not
limited to,

17 the loan to value ratio, the amount of down payment,
consumer

18 income, period of employment, or a consumer's
financial

19 assets. "Credit score" does not include
other elements of the

20 underwriting process or underwriting decision.

21 (7) "Credit transaction that is not
initiated by the consumer"

22 does not include the use of a consumer report by an
assignee for

23 collection or by a person with which the consumer has an
account,

24 for purposes of (a) reviewing the account, or (b)
collecting the

25 account. For purposes of this subsection
"reviewing the account"

26 includes activities related to account maintenance and
monitoring,

27 credit line increases, and account upgrades and
enhancements.

28 (((7))) (8) "Direct
solicitation" means the process in which

29 the consumer reporting agency compiles or edits for a
client a

30 list of consumers who meet specific criteria and
provides this

31 list to the client or a third party on behalf of the
client for

32 use in soliciting those consumers for an offer of a
product or

33 service.

34 (((8))) (9) "Employment
purposes," when used in connection with

35 a consumer report, means a report used for the purpose
of

36 evaluating a consumer for employment, promotion, reassignment,
or

37 retention as an employee.

38 (((9))) (10) "File," when
used in connection with information

SSB 5196 p. 4

_1 on any consumer, means all of the information on that
consumer

_2 recorded and retained by a consumer reporting agency
regardless of

_3 how the information is stored.

_4 (((10))) (11) "Investigative
consumer report" means a consumer

_5 report or portion of it in which information on a
consumer's

_6 character, general reputation, personal characteristics,
or mode

_7 of living is obtained through personal interviews with
neighbors,

_8 friends, or associates of the consumer reported on or
with others

_9 with whom the consumer is acquainted or who may have
knowledge

10 concerning any items of information. However, the
information does

11 not include specific factual information on a consumer's
credit

12 record obtained directly from a creditor of the consumer
or from a

13 consumer reporting agency when the information was
obtained

14 directly from a creditor of the consumer or from the
consumer.

15 (((11))) (12) "Key factors"
means all relevant elements or

16 reasons adversely affecting the credit score for the
particular

17 individual listed in the order of their importance
based on their

18 effect on the credit score.

19 (13) "Medical information" means
information or records

20 obtained, with the consent of the individual to whom it
relates,

21 from a licensed physician or medical practitioner,
hospital,

22 clinic, or other medical or medically related facility.

23 (((12))) (14) "Person"
includes an individual, corporation,

24 government or governmental subdivision or agency,
business trust,

25 estate, trust, partnership, association, and any other
legal or

26 commercial entity.

27 (((13))) (15) "Prescreening"
means the process in which the

28 consumer reporting agency compiles or edits for a client
a list of

29 consumers who meet specific credit criteria and provides
this list

30 to the client or a third party on behalf of the client
for use in

31 soliciting those consumers for an offer of credit.

32 Sec. 3. RCW
19.182.020 and 1993 c 476 s 4 are each amended to

33 read as follows:

34 (1) A consumer reporting agency may furnish a consumer
report

35 or credit score only under the following
circumstances:

36 (a) In response to the order of a court having
jurisdiction to

37 issue the order;

p. 5 SSB
5196

_1 (b) In accordance with the written instructions of
the consumer

_2 to whom it relates; or

_3 (c) To a person that the agency has reason to
believe:

_4 (i) Intends to use the information in connection
with a credit

_5 transaction involving the consumer on whom the
information is to

_6 be furnished and involving the extension of credit to,
or review

_7 or collection of an account of, the consumer;

_8 (ii) Intends to use the information for employment
purposes;

_9 (iii) Intends to use the information in connection
with the

10 underwriting of insurance involving the consumer;

11 (iv) Intends to use the information in connection
with a

12 determination of the consumer's eligibility for a
license or other

13 benefit granted by a governmental instrumentality required
by law

14 to consider an applicant's financial responsibility or
status; or

15 (v) Otherwise has a legitimate business need for the

16 information in connection with a business transaction
involving

17 the consumer.

18 (2)(a) A person may not procure a consumer report,
or cause a

19 consumer report to be procured, for employment purposes
with

20 respect to any consumer who is not an employee at the
time the

21 report is procured or caused to be procured unless:

22 (i) A clear and conspicuous disclosure has been made
in writing

23 to the consumer before the report is procured or caused
to be

24 procured that a consumer report may be obtained for
purposes of

25 considering the consumer for employment. The disclosure
may be

26 contained in a written statement contained in employment

27 application materials; or

28 (ii) The consumer authorizes the procurement of the
report.

29 (b) A person may not procure a consumer report, or
cause a

30 consumer report to be procured, for employment purposes
with

31 respect to any employee unless the employee has
received, at any

32 time after the person became an employee, written notice
that

33 consumer reports may be used for employment purposes. A
written

34 statement that consumer reports may be used for
employment

35 purposes that is contained in employee guidelines or
manuals

36 available to employees or included in written materials
provided

37 to employees constitutes written notice for purposes of
this

38 subsection. This subsection does not apply with respect
to a

SSB 5196 p. 6

_1 consumer report of an employee who the employer has
reasonable

_2 cause to believe has engaged in specific activity that
constitutes

_3 a violation of law.

_4 (c) In using a consumer report for employment
purposes, before

_5 taking any adverse action based in whole or part on the
report, a

_6 person shall provide to the consumer to whom the report
relates:

_7 (i) The name, address, and telephone number of the
consumer

_8 reporting agency providing the report; (ii) a
description of the

_9 consumer's rights under this chapter pertaining to
consumer

10 reports obtained for employment purposes; and (iii) a
reasonable

11 opportunity to respond to any information in the report
that is

12 disputed by the consumer.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 19.182

14 RCW to read as follows:

15 (1) Upon the consumer's request for a credit score,
a consumer

16 reporting agency must supply to the consumer a notice
that

17 includes the following information:

18 (a) The consumer's current credit score or the
consumer's most

19 recent credit score that was previously calculated by
the consumer

20 reporting agency for the purpose related to the
extension of

21 credit;

22 (b) The range of possible credit scores under the
model used;

23 (c) All the key factors that adversely affected the
consumer's

24 credit score in the model used, the total number of
which must not

25 exceed four;

26 (d) The date the credit score was created;

27 (e) A statement that the credit score and credit
score model

28 used by the consumer reporting agency may be different
from the

29 credit underwriting system used by a lender; and

30 (f) The name of the person or entity that provided
the credit

31 score or credit file upon which the credit score was
created.

32 (2) This section must not be construed to require a
consumer

33 reporting agency that distributes credit scores
developed by

34 another person or entity to provide further explanation
of them or

35 to process a dispute regarding such scores under RCW
19.182.090,

36 except that the consumer reporting agency must provide
the

37 consumer with the name and address and web site for contacting
the

p. 7 SSB
5196

_1 person or entity who developed the score or developed
the

_2 methodology of the score. This subsection does not
apply to a

_3 consumer reporting agency that develops or modifies
scores that

_4 are developed by another person or entity.

_5 (3) If a consumer reporting agency does not develop
or maintain

_6 credit scores in its files, nothing in this section may
be

_7 construed to require the agency to develop or disclose
such

_8 scores.

_9 Sec. 5. RCW
19.182.080 and 1993 c 476 s 10 are each amended to

10 read as follows:

11 (1) A consumer reporting agency shall make the
disclosures

12 required under RCW 19.182.070 during normal business
hours and on

13 reasonable notice.

14 (2) The consumer reporting agency shall make the
disclosures

15 required under RCW 19.182.070 to the consumer:

16 (a) In person if the consumer appears in person and
furnishes

17 proper identification;

18 (b) By telephone if the consumer has made a written
request,

19 with proper identification, for telephone disclosure and
the toll

20 charge, if any, for the telephone call is prepaid by or
charged

21 directly to the consumer; or

22 (c) By any other reasonable means that are available
to the

23 consumer reporting agency if that means is authorized by
the

24 consumer.

25 (3) A consumer reporting agency shall provide
trained personnel

26 to explain to the consumer, information furnished to the
consumer

27 under RCW 19.182.070.

28 (4) The consumer reporting agency shall permit the
consumer to

29 be accompanied by one other person of the consumer's
choosing, who

30 shall furnish reasonable identification. A consumer
reporting

31 agency may require the consumer to furnish a written
statement

32 granting permission to the consumer reporting agency to
discuss

33 the consumer's file in the other person's presence.

34 (5) If a credit score is provided by a consumer
reporting

35 agency to a consumer, the agency shall provide an
explanation of

36 the meaning of the credit score under section 4 of
this act.

37 (6) Except as provided in RCW 19.182.150, no
consumer may bring

SSB 5196 p. 8

_1 an action or proceeding in the nature of defamation,
invasion of

_2 privacy, or negligence with respect to the reporting of

_3 information against a consumer reporting agency or a
user of

_4 information, based on information disclosed under this
section or

_5 RCW 19.182.070, except as to false information furnished
with

_6 malice or willful intent to injure the consumer. Except
as provided

_7 in RCW 19.182.150, no consumer may bring an action or
proceeding

_8 against a person who provides information to a consumer
reporting

_9 agency in the nature of defamation, invasion of privacy,
or

10 negligence for unintentional error.

11 (7)(a) A consumer reporting agency must provide to a
consumer,

12 with each written disclosure by the agency to the
consumer under

13 RCW 19.182.070, a written summary of all rights and
remedies the

14 consumer has under this chapter.

15 (b) The summary of the rights and remedies of
consumers under

16 this chapter must include:

17 (i) A brief description of this chapter and all rights
and

18 remedies of consumers under this chapter;

19 (ii) An explanation of how the consumer may exercise
the rights

20 and remedies of the consumer under this chapter; and

21 (iii) A list of all state agencies, including the
attorney

22 general's office, responsible for enforcing any
provision of this

23 chapter and the address, web site, and
appropriate phone number of

24 each such agency.

25 Sec. 6. RCW
19.182.090 and 1993 c 476 s 11 are each amended to

26 read as follows:

27 (1) If the completeness or accuracy of an item of
information

28 contained in a consumer's file at a consumer reporting
agency is

29 disputed by the consumer and the consumer notifies the
agency

30 directly of the dispute, the agency shall reinvestigate
without

31 charge and record the current status of the disputed
information

32 before the end of thirty business days, beginning on the
date the

33 agency receives the notice from the consumer.

34 (2) Before the end of the five business-day period
beginning on

35 the date a consumer reporting agency receives notice of
a dispute

36 from a consumer in accordance with subsection (1) of
this section,

p. 9 SSB
5196

_1 the agency shall notify any person who provided an item
of

_2 information in dispute.

_3 (3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this
section, a

_4 consumer reporting agency may terminate a
reinvestigation of

_5 information disputed by a consumer under subsection (1)
of this

_6 section if the agency determines that the dispute by the
consumer

_7 is frivolous or irrelevant, including by reason of a
failure of

_8 the consumer to provide sufficient information.

_9 (b) Upon making a determination in accordance with
(a) of this

10 subsection that a dispute is frivolous or irrelevant, a
consumer

11 reporting agency shall notify the consumer within five
business

12 days of the determination. The notice shall be made in
writing or

13 any other means authorized by the consumer that are
available to

14 the agency, but the notice shall include the reasons for
the

15 determination and a notice of the consumer's rights
under

16 subsection (6) of this section.

17 (4) In conducting a reinvestigation under subsection
(1) of

18 this section with respect to disputed information in the
file of

19 any consumer, the consumer reporting agency shall review
and

20 consider all relevant information submitted by the
consumer in the

21 period described in subsection (1) of this section with
respect to

22 the disputed information.

23 (5)(a) If, after a reinvestigation under subsection
(1) of this

24 section of information disputed by a consumer, the
information is

25 found to be inaccurate or cannot be verified, the
consumer

26 reporting agency shall promptly delete the information
from the

27 consumer's file.

28 (b)(i) If information is deleted from a consumer's
file under

29 (a) of this subsection, the information may not be
reinserted in

30 the file after the deletion unless the person who
furnishes the

31 information verifies that the information is complete
and

32 accurate.

33 (ii) If information that has been deleted from a
consumer's

34 file under (a) of this subsection is reinserted in the
file in

35 accordance with (b)(i) of this subsection, the consumer
reporting

36 agency shall notify the consumer of the reinsertion
within thirty

37 business days. The notice shall be in writing or any
other means

38 authorized by the consumer that are available to the
agency.

SSB 5196 p. 10

_1 (6) If the reinvestigation does not resolve the
dispute or if

_2 the consumer reporting agency determines the dispute is
frivolous

_3 or irrelevant, the consumer may file a brief statement
setting

_4 forth the nature of the dispute. The consumer reporting
agency may

_5 limit these statements to not more than one hundred
words if it

_6 provides the consumer with assistance in writing a clear
summary

_7 of the dispute.

_8 (7) After the deletion of information from a
consumer's file

_9 under this section or after the filing of a statement of
dispute

10 under subsection (6) of this section, the consumer
reporting

11 agency shall, at the request of the consumer, furnish
notification

12 that the item of information has been deleted or that
item of

13 information is disputed. In the case of disputed
information, the

14 notification shall include the statement filed under
subsection

15 (6) of this section. The notification shall be
furnished to any

16 person specifically designated by the consumer, who has,
within

17 two years before the deletion or filing of a dispute,
received a

18 consumer report concerning the consumer for employment
purposes,

19 or who has, within six months of the deletion or the
filing of the

20 dispute, received a consumer report concerning the
consumer for

21 any other purpose, if these consumer reports contained
the deleted

22 or disputed information.

23 (8)(a) Upon completion of the reinvestigation under
this

24 section, a consumer reporting agency shall provide
notice, in

25 writing or by any other means authorized by the
consumer, of the

26 results of a reinvestigation within five business days.

27 (b) The notice required under (a) of this subsection
must

28 include:

29 (i) A statement that the reinvestigation is
completed;

30 (ii) A consumer report that is based upon the
consumer's file

31 as that file is revised as a result of the
reinvestigation;

32 (iii) A description or indication of any changes
made in the

33 consumer report as a result of those revisions to the
consumer's

34 file;

35 (iv) If requested by the consumer, a description of
the

36 procedure used to determine the accuracy and
completeness of the

37 information shall be provided to the consumer by the
agency,

p. 11 SSB
5196

_1 including the name, business address, and telephone
number of any

_2 person contacted in connection with the information;

_3 (v) If the reinvestigation does not resolve the
dispute, a

_4 summary of the consumer's right to file a brief
statement as

_5 provided in subsection (6) of this section; and

_6 (vi) If information is deleted or disputed after

_7 reinvestigation, a summary of the consumer's right to
request

_8 notification to persons who have received a consumer
report as

_9 provided in subsection (7) of this section.

10 (9) In the case of a consumer reporting agency that
compiles

11 and maintains consumer reports and credit scores
on a nationwide

12 basis, the consumer reporting agency must provide to a
consumer

13 who has undertaken to dispute the information contained
in his or

14 her file a toll-free telephone number and a web site
address that

15 the consumer can use to communicate with the agency. A
consumer

16 reporting agency that provides a toll-free number and
a web site

17 address required by this subsection shall also
provide adequately

18 trained personnel to answer basic inquiries from
consumers using

19 the toll-free number and web site.

20 Sec. 7. RCW
19.182.100 and 1993 c 476 s 12 are each amended to

21 read as follows:

22 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of
this

23 section, a consumer reporting agency may charge the
following fees

24 to the consumer:

25 (a) For making a disclosure under RCW 19.182.070 and

26 19.182.080, the consumer reporting agency may charge a
fee not

27 exceeding eight dollars. Beginning January 1, 1995, the
eight-

28 dollar charge may be adjusted on January 1st of each
year based on

29 corresponding changes in the consumer price index with
fractional

30 changes rounded to the nearest half dollar. For
making a disclosure

31 of a credit score under section 4 of this act, the
consumer

32 reporting agency may charge a reasonable amount.

33 (b) For furnishing a notification, statement, or
summary to a

34 person under RCW 19.182.090(7), the consumer reporting
agency may

35 charge a fee not exceeding the charge that the agency
would impose

36 on each designated recipient for a consumer report. The
amount of

SSB 5196 p. 12

_1 any charge must be disclosed to the consumer before
furnishing the

_2 information.

_3 (2) A consumer reporting agency shall make all
disclosures

_4 under RCW 19.182.070 and 19.182.080 and furnish all consumer

_5 reports under RCW 19.182.090 without charge, if
requested by the

_6 consumer within sixty days after receipt by the consumer
of a

_7 notification of adverse action under RCW 19.182.110 or
of a

_8 notification from a debt collection agency affiliated
with that

_9 consumer reporting agency stating that the consumer's
credit

10 rating may be or has been adversely affected.

11 (3) A consumer reporting agency shall not impose any
charge for

12 (a) providing notice to a consumer required under RCW
19.182.090,

13 or (b) notifying a person under RCW 19.182.090(7) of the
deletion

14 of information that is found to be inaccurate or that
can no

15 longer be verified, if the consumer designates that
person to the

16 agency before the end of the thirty-day period beginning
on the

17 date of notice under RCW 19.182.090(8).

18 Sec. 8. RCW
19.182.110 and 1993 c 476 s 13 are each amended to

19 read as follows:

20 If a person takes an adverse action with respect to
a consumer

21 that is based, in whole or in part, on information
contained in a

22 consumer report or credit score, the person
shall:

23 (1) Provide written notice of the adverse action to
the

24 consumer, except verbal notice may be given by a person
in an

25 adverse action involving a business regulated by the
Washington

26 utilities and transportation commission or involving an

27 application for the rental or leasing of residential
real estate

28 if such verbal notice does not impair a consumer's
ability to

29 obtain a credit report without charge under RCW
19.182.100(2); and

30 (2) Provide the consumer with the name, address, and
telephone

31 number of the consumer reporting agency that furnished
the report

32 or credit score to the person.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 13 SSB
5196