BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.86.100 and 1987 c
297 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The federal tax reform
act of 1986 imposes an annual ceiling on the aggregate amount of federally
tax-exempt private activity bonds, including bonds for housing, student loans,
exempt facilities, small issue industrial, redevelopment, and certain public utility
projects, that may be issued during any calendar year by or on behalf of states
and their political subdivisions. ((The tax reform act of 1986 establishes
a private activity bond ceiling for each state of seventy-five dollars per
capita for 1987 and of fifty dollars per capita for 1988 and each year
thereafter.)) In 2001, the ceiling will be increased to sixty-two
dollars and fifty cents per capita and in 2003 the ceiling will be increased to
seventy-five dollars per capita, to be indexed annually, for 2003 and every
year thereafter. However, a study by the department of community
development indicates that the dollar amount of the state ceiling is
considerably less than the anticipated dollar amount for which issuers would
need an allocation from the state ceiling. The tax reform act of 1986 provides
a formula for allocating the annual ceiling among various issuers of private
activity bonds within a state, but permits each state to enact a different
allocation method that is appropriate to that state's needs. The purpose of
this chapter is to provide a flexible and efficient method of allocating the
annual state ceiling in Washington in a manner that recognizes the need of the
state and its political subdivisions to finance activities or projects that
satisfy a substantial public purpose.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.86.120 and 1990 c
50 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (2) and (4) of this section, the initial allocation of the state
ceiling shall be for each year as follows:

((1989
and 1990 and

THEREAFTER THEREAFTER

(If
the small (If the small

issue
category issue category

is
permitted is not permitted

BOND
USE under
federal under federal

CATEGORY
1987 1988 law)
law)

Housing 5% 25% 25%
35%

Student Loans 10% 15% 15%
15%

Exempt Facility 40% 20% 20%
35%

Public Utility 10% 10% 10%
10%

Small
Issue 30% 25% 25% 0%

Remainder
and

redevelopment
5% 5% 5% 5%))

BOND
USE 2002
and ALTERNATIVE

CATEGORY 2001 THEREAFTER ALLOCATION

Housing 27.5% 30.0% 32.0%

Small Issue 24.5% 24.0% 25.0%

Exempt Facility 19.5% 19.0% 20.0%

Student Loans 14.5% 14.0% 15.0%

Public Utility 10.0% 10.0% 0.0%

Remainder and

redevelopment 4.0% 3.0% 8.0%

(2) Initial allocations
may be modified by the agency only to reflect an issuer's carryforward amount.
Any reduction of the initial allocation shall be added to the remainder and be
available for allocation or reallocation.

(3) The remainder shall
be allocated by the agency among one or more issuers from any bond use category
with regard to the criteria specified in RCW 39.86.130.

(4) Should any bond use
category no longer be subject to the state ceiling due to federal or state
provisions of law, the agency shall divide the amount of that initial
allocation among the remaining categories as necessary or appropriate with
regard to the criteria specified in RCW 39.86.130. Upon the earlier of:
(a) Exhaustion of the seven hundred fifty million dollar authority under I.R.C.
1317(25), or any new federal legislation increasing the amount of authority, or
creating additional authority; or (b) waiver of the authority described under
(a) of this subsection due to alternative federal authority that does not use a
state volume cap, then the alternative allocation schedule in subsection (1) of
this section will be used.

(5)(a) Prior to
September 1 of each calendar year, any available portion of an initial
allocation may be allocated or reallocated only to an issuer within the same
bond use category, except that the remainder category, or portions thereof, may
be allocated at any time to any bond use category.

(b)
Beginning September 1 of each calendar year, the agency may allocate or
reallocate any available portion of the state ceiling to any bond use category
with regard to the criteria specified in RCW 39.86.130.

---
END ---