BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.04.293 and 1993 c
483 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Misconduct"
means an employee's act or failure to act in willful disregard of his or her
employer's interest where the effect of the employee's act or failure to act is
to harm the employer's business. Any criminal act conducted by the employee
at or involving the employer's business is an act in willful disregard of the
employer's interest.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.20.060 and 2000 c
2 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

An
individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning with the first day of
the calendar week in which he or she has been discharged or suspended for
misconduct connected with his or her work and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment covered by
this title and earned wages in that employment equal to seven times his or her
weekly benefit amount. However, when the employer has a reasonable, good
faith belief that the individual's misconduct constituted a criminal act at or
involving the employer's business, the individual may not requalify for
benefits under this section for one calendar year from the first day of the
calendar week in which he or she has been discharged or suspended for
misconduct connected with his or her work. Alcoholism shall not constitute
a defense to disqualification from benefits due to misconduct.

---
END ---