BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
28A.400.200 and 1997 c 141 s 2 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) Every school district board of directors shall
fix, alter,

_7 allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all
district

_8 employees in conformance with this section.

_9 (2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff
shall not

10 be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the

11 statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee
with a

12 baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

13 (b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff
with a

14 masters degree shall not be less than the salary
provided in the

15 appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation
schedule for

16 an employee with a masters degree and zero years of
service;

17 (3)(a) The actual average salary paid to basic education
and

18 special education certificated instructional staff shall
not

p. 1 SSB
5200

_1 exceed the district's average basic education and
special

_2 education program certificated instructional staff
salary used for

_3 the state basic education allocations for that school
year as

_4 determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410.

_5 (b) Fringe benefit contributions for basic education
and

_6 special education certificated instructional staff shall
be

_7 included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent

_8 that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds

_9 the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided
per

10 certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating

11 appropriations act in effect at the time the
compensation is

12 payable. For purposes of this section, fringe benefits
shall not

13 include payment for unused leave for illness or injury
under RCW

14 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age
survivors

15 insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment
compensation, and

16 retirement benefits under the Washington state
retirement system;

17 or employer contributions for health benefits in excess
of the

18 insurance benefits allocation provided per certificated

19 instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act

20 in effect at the time the compensation is payable. A
school

21 district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions

22 for such excess health benefits.

23 (c) Salary and benefits for certificated
instructional staff in

24 programs other than basic education and special
education shall be

25 consistent with the salary and benefits paid to
certificated

26 instructional staff in the basic education and special
education

27 programs.

28 (4) Salaries and benefits for certificated
instructional staff

29 may exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this
section only

30 by separate contract for additional time, additional

31 responsibilities, or incentives that include but are
not limited

32 to recruiting certificated instructional staff or for
meeting or

33 exceeding mutually agreed to goals. Supplemental
contracts shall

34 not cause the state to incur any present or future
funding

35 obligation. Supplemental contracts shall be subject to
the

36 collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW
and the

37 provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one
year, and if

SSB 5200 p. 2

_1 not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in
accordance with

_2 RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may
enter into a

_3 supplemental contract under this subsection for the
provision of

_4 services which are a part of the basic education program
required

_5 by Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.

_6 (5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district
shall comply

_7 with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5200