BE IT
ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that recent studies show a powerful relationship between
postsecondary education and an increase in lifetime earned income. Even just
two years of college can equate to a quarter of a million dollar increase in
lifetime income. A bachelor's degree can boost annual income seventy-three
percent, compared to a high school degree. In addition, studies indicate that
for individuals attending college, there is a correlation with improved health
status, increased civic participation, improved savings rates, less reliance on
government assistance, and improved quality of life for their children.
Additionally, this correlates to increased tax revenues and reduced crime rates
for society. The legislature finds that some welfare recipients could qualify
for college admission and benefit from completion of their higher education at
a community, trade, or technical college, or other institute of higher
education.

The federal government has specifically encouraged creative
approaches to higher education for welfare recipients, and several other states
have enacted legislation to this end. In Washington state, there is currently
a shortage of skilled workers, with sixty‑four percent of Washington
employers reporting difficulty in finding qualified applicants in 2000. The
scarcity of workers with postsecondary training affects many businesses, and
has severe implications for the state's economy. Skill requirements are
expected to continue to increase. In order to close the postsecondary skills
gap, Washington will need significantly more advanced workers in the coming
months and years, and enabling welfare clients to achieve their educational
goals will help solve this problem.

In 1999, the federal government adopted final regulations for
temporary assistance for needy families, allowing expanded use of block grant
and maintenance of effort funds. These funds can be used creatively for a
variety of special approaches, to help poor families achieve true financial
independence.

The legislature intends to provide access to postsecondary
education for qualified adult recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families, while maintaining the emphasis on employment that is the hallmark of
the WorkFirst program. The legislature intends to provide temporary assistance
for needy families grants, including working connections child care and tuition
assistance, to college-qualified individuals, with the goal of providing a
means for highly motivated welfare recipients to successfully complete college,
exit assistance, and secure careers to benefit themselves, their families, and
society.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department shall establish the HELP program. The goal of the program is to
help college-qualified parents who have dependent children in need and are
eligible for temporary assistance for needy families receive up to two years of
undergraduate education or training. To the extent that funds are specifically
appropriated for this purpose, the department shall provide parents accepted
into or enrolled at an institution of higher education in Washington state with
assistance that includes their temporary assistance for needy families cash
grants, as well as the other support services provided to recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families, including but not limited to medical
assistance, working connections child care, food stamps, tuition assistance based
upon actual tuition or public higher education tuition rates, whichever is
less, and other support services. The department may facilitate access to Pell
grants and state need grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 2 through 10 of this act.

(1) "HELP program" means the higher education for
lifelong progress program.

(2) "Institution of higher education" means the state
research universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
the community colleges, the technical colleges, and private career schools,
colleges, and universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Families that qualify for temporary assistance for needy families under this
chapter may participate in the HELP program as a countable work activity of the
temporary assistance for needy families program. Eligibility for assistance,
and the amount of assistance, shall be determined under criteria used in the
temporary assistance for needy families program. Because participation in the
HELP program satisfies the countable work activity requirement, the department
shall not impose an additional work requirement upon HELP participants.

(2) The department shall assess the educational program to
determine whether the completion of the program is likely to result in
employment that provides the wages and benefits necessary for the applicant to
support the applicant's family without public assistance.

(3) To the extent that funds and participant slots are available,
enrollment in the program shall be granted if the department determines that:

(a) The applicant intends to pursue higher education in a field
with a high probability of wage progression and likely to enable the applicant
to exit assistance; and

(b) Considering potential employment opportunities and local labor
market conditions, the undergraduate education sought by the individual is
likely to improve the ability of the family to be self-supporting.

The applicant shall meet the requirements for the state need grant
under RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.820 and qualify for acceptance at and be
admitted to an institution of higher education in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department shall recommend that applicants obtain career planning and
counseling services from their educational institutions to assist them in
choosing an educational plan that is likely to lead to self-sufficiency, and
provide to students who have begun an educational program assistance to
overcome barriers to completing the program and becoming employed. The
department may work with other state, local, and private entities to provide
the planning and counseling services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Students
receiving assistance under sections 2 through 10 of this act shall meet the
following requirements:

(1) They must be accepted into a postsecondary program; and

(2) They must be enrolled full time, with the expectation that they
make satisfactory progress toward a degree, certificate, or license in a
high-demand field with a significant probability of employment in a job with
wage progression. Satisfactory progress may be defined by the standards of the
postsecondary institution where the student is enrolled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The
department shall inform all persons applying for or participating in the
temporary assistance for needy families program of the option to apply for the
HELP program and the criteria for acceptance. Recipients of temporary
assistance for needy families who have already partially completed their
postsecondary education will be encouraged to apply and be given priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. To the
extent permitted by federal law, assistance received under sections 2 through
10 of this act must be disregarded as income and excluded as a resource or
asset to the same extent as assistance under the temporary assistance for needy
families program, under this chapter, for the purposes of any state, federal,
tribal, or municipal assistance program. Assistance received under sections 2
through 10 of this act must be treated in the same manner as assistance
received under the temporary assistance for needy families program under this
chapter for all tax purposes. Furthermore, the department shall implement the
program so participants qualify for food stamps until completion of their
degree or certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) The
department shall contract with the Washington state institute for public policy
for the performance of an outcome study of program participants. The study
shall, at a minimum:

(a) Track degree or certificate completion by participants;

(b) Report on wage progression of participants;

(c) Report on the program's dropout rate, including temporary
assistance for needy families' recidivism;

(d) Quantify the projected increase in lifetime earnings of program
graduates; and

(e) Report on self-identified enhancers and barriers to success in
postsecondary education experience by the study population.

(2) The results of the outcome study shall be reported annually, no
later than January 15th, beginning in 2004, to the governor and to appropriate
committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Participation
in the HELP program shall be incorporated in the recipient's individual
personal responsibility plan, in a manner that clearly indicates that
satisfactory progress in college is the recipient's temporary assistance for
needy families work activity and responsibility.

Sec. 11. RCW
74.08A.250 and 2000 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "work activity" means:

(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector,
including employment through the state or federal work-study program for a
period not to exceed twenty-four months;

(3) Work experience, including:

(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a license or
certificate in a high demand field, as determined by the employment security
department. No internship or practicum shall exceed twelve months; or

(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted
housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;

(4) On-the-job training;

(5) Job search and job readiness assistance;

(6) Community service programs;

(7) Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months
with respect to any individual;

(8) Job skills training directly related to employment;

(9) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a
recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a GED;

(10) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of
study leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not completed
secondary school or received such a certificate;

(11) The provision of child care services to an individual who is
participating in a community service program;

(12) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience
performed by an intern in a business, industry, or government or
nongovernmental agency setting;

(13) Practicums, which include any educational program in which a
student is working under the close supervision of a professional in an agency,
clinic, or other professional practice setting for purposes of advancing their
skills and knowledge; ((and))

(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(3) to become employable; and

(15) Participation in the higher education for lifelong progress
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. The
department shall adopt rules to implement sections 2 through 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 2
through 10 and 12 of this act are each added to chapter 74.08A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. If any
part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are
a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

--- END ---