BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature, through the provisions of this act, to clarify existing law.
Namely, the legislature intends to clarify the existing law and the authority
of the department of ecology and water conservancy boards.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.80.010 and 1997 c
441 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following
definitions apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means a water conservancy board created under this chapter.

(2)
"Commissioner" means a member of a water conservancy board.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(4) "Director"
means the director of the department of ecology.

(5)
"Transfer" means a transfer, change, or amendment to a water right
referred to in RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.80.070 and 1997 c
441 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applications to the
board for transfers shall be made on a form provided by the department, and
shall contain such additional information as may be required by the board in
order to review and act upon the application. At a minimum, the application
shall include information sufficient to establish to the board's satisfaction
of the transferor's right to the quantity of water being transferred, and a
description of any applicable limitations on the right to use water, including
the point of diversion or withdrawal, place of use, source of supply, purpose
of use, quantity of use permitted, time of use, period of use, and the place of
storage.

(2) The transferor and
the transferee of any proposed water transfer may apply to a board for approval
of the transfer if the water proposed to be transferred is currently diverted,
withdrawn, or used within the geographic boundaries of the county, or would
be diverted, withdrawn, or used within the geographic boundaries of the
county if the transfer is approved. In the case of a proposed water transfer
in which the water is currently diverted or withdrawn or would be
diverted or withdrawn outside the geographic boundaries of the county,
the board shall hold a public hearing in the county of the diversion or
withdrawal or proposed diversion or withdrawal. The board shall
provide for prominent publication of notice of such hearing in a newspaper of
general circulation published in the county in which the hearing is to be held
for the purpose of affording an opportunity for interested persons to comment upon
the application.

(3) After an
application for a transfer is filed with the board, the board shall publish
notice of the application in accordance with the publication requirements and
send notice to state agencies as provided in RCW 90.03.280. Any person may
submit comments to the board regarding the application. Any water right holder
claiming detriment or injury to an existing water right may intervene in the
application before the board pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. If a
majority of the board determines that the application is complete, in
accordance with the law and the transfer can be made without injury or
detriment to existing water rights in accordance with RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390,
or 90.44.100, the board shall issue the applicant a certificate conditionally
approving the transfer, subject to review by the director.

(4) If a water right
holder claims a proposed transfer will cause an impairment to that right, the
water right holder is entitled to a hearing before the board. The board shall
receive such evidence as it deems material and necessary to determine the
validity of the claim of impairment. If the party claiming the impairment
establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that his or her water right will
be impaired by the proposed transfer, the board may not approve the transfer
unless the applicant and the impaired party agree upon compensation for the
impairment.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.80.120 and 1997 c
441 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A commissioner of a
water conservancy board who has an ownership interest in a water right subject
to an application for approval of a transfer ((or change)) by the board,
shall not participate in the board's review or decision upon the application.

(2) A commissioner of a
water conservancy board who also serves as an employee or upon the governing
body of a municipally owned water system, shall not participate in the board's
review or decision upon an application for the transfer ((or change)) of
a water right in which that water system has or is proposed to have an
ownership interest.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.80.140 and 1997 c
441 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in
this chapter affects transfers that may be otherwise approved under chapter
90.03 or 90.44 RCW.

---
END ---