BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.35.610 and 1998 c
341 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

All classified
employees who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on
or after September 1, ((2000)) 2002, shall ((be members of
plan III)) have a period of one hundred eighty days to make an
irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end of one
hundred eighty days, if the member makes no choice, he or she remains a member
of plan 2.

(2) Until an
employee elects to become a member of plan 3, the member shall be reported to
the department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. If the
member exercises the option to enter plan 3, all service credit and employer
contributions shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit. All
employee contributions plus any interest earned shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.35.010 and 1998 c
341 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the Washington school employees' retirement system provided
for in this chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3) "State
treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)
"Employer," for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means a school district or
an educational service district.

(5) "Member"
means any employee included in the membership of the retirement system, as
provided for in RCW 41.35.030.

(6)(a)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries
or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred
under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of
the United States internal revenue code, but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance
compensation and lump sum or other payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay.

(b) "Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following actual
or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive
payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a
position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement,
which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered
compensation earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii) In any year in
which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have the option of
having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A) The compensation earnable
the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature;
or

(B) Such member's
actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public employment and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection is greater than compensation earnable under this (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions;

(iii) Assault pay only
as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv) Compensation that
a member would have received but for a disability occurring in the line of duty
only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v) Compensation that a
member receives due to participation in the leave sharing program only as
authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi) Compensation that
a member receives for being in standby status. For the purposes of this
section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for time actually
worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to report
immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(7) "Service"
for plan 2 and plan 3 members means periods of employment by a member in an eligible
position or positions for one or more employers for which compensation earnable
is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any calendar
month shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW
41.35.180. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less
than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service
credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy
hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month
of service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not
service.

Any fraction of a year
of service shall be taken into account in the computation of such retirement
allowance or benefits.

(a) Service in any
state elective position shall be deemed to be full-time service.

(b) A member shall
receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of service for
such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible position by
one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service
credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or
more hours is rendered.

(c) For purposes of
plan 2 and 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to
two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is
creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:

(i) Less than eleven
days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(ii) Eleven or more
days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(iii) Twenty-two days
equals one service credit month;

(iv) More than
twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter
service credit month; and

(v) Thirty-three or
more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit
month.

(8) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(9) "Service
credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of service credit
which is equal to one.

(10) "Membership
service" means all service rendered as a member.

(11)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(12) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(13) "Accumulated
contributions" means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit
of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under
RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(14) "Average
final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means the member's
average compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or
death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in
the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).

(15) "Final
compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable by a member
at the time of termination of employment.

(16)
"Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.

(17)
"Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by
the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(18) "Retirement
allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means monthly payments to a retiree
or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(19)
"Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(20) "Actuarial
equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of
such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the director.

(21) "Retirement"
means withdrawal from active service with a retirement allowance as provided by
this chapter.

(22) "Eligible
position" means any position that, as defined by the employer, normally
requires five or more months of service a year for which regular compensation
for at least seventy hours is earned by the occupant thereof. For purposes of
this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner
that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position.

(23) "Ineligible
position" means any position which does not conform with the requirements
set forth in subsection (22) of this section.

(24) "Leave of
absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by the employer
to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(25) "Totally
incapacitated for duty" means total inability to perform the duties of a
member's employment or office or any other work for which the member is
qualified by training or experience.

(26)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(27)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(28) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(29) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(30) "Plan 2"
means the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of
the public employees' retirement system on and after October 1, 1977, and
transferred to the Washington school employees' retirement system under RCW
41.40.750, and are not included in plan 3.

(31) "Plan 3"
means the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of
the system on and after September 1, 2000, and who chose to enter plan 3
or who transfer from plan 2 under RCW 41.35.510.

(32) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all
items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

(33) "Index
A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a
postretirement adjustment.

(34) "Index
B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(35) "Adjustment
ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(36) "Separation
from service" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an
employer.

(37) "Member
account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the
sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined
contribution portion of plan 3.

(38) "Classified employee"
means an employee of a school district or an educational service district who
is not eligible for membership in the teachers' retirement system established
under chapter 41.32 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
September 1, 2002.

---
END ---