BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
51.14.120 and 1993 c 122 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) The self-insurer shall provide, when authorized
under RCW

_7 51.28.070, a copy of the employee's claim file at no
cost within

_8 fifteen days of receipt of a request by the employee or
the

_9 employee's representative, and shall provide the
physician

10 performing an examination with all relevant medical
records from

11 the worker's claim file, but only to the extent
required of the

12 department under RCW 51.36.070. If the
self-insured employer

13 determines that release of the claim file to an unrepresented

14 worker in whole or in part, may not be in the worker's
best

15 interests, the employer must submit a request for denial
with an

16 explanation along with a copy of that portion of the
claim file

17 not previously provided within twenty days after the
request from

18 the worker. In the case of second or subsequent
requests, a

p. 1 SSB
5205

_1 reasonable charge for copying may be made. The
self-insurer shall

_2 provide the entire contents of the claim file unless the
request

_3 is for only a particular portion of the file. Any new
material

_4 added to the claim file after the initial request shall
be

_5 provided under the same terms and conditions as the
initial

_6 request.

_7 (2) The self-insurer shall transmit notice to the
department of

_8 any protest or appeal by an employee relating to the

_9 administration of an industrial injury or occupational
disease

10 claim under this chapter within five working days of
receipt. The

11 date that the protest or appeal is received by the
self-insurer

12 shall be deemed to be the date the protest is received
by the

13 department for the purpose of RCW 51.52.050.

14 (3) The self-insurer shall submit a medical report
with the

15 request for closure of a claim under this chapter.

16 Sec. 2. RCW
51.36.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 60 are each amended

17 to read as follows:

18 Whenever the director or the self-insurer deems it
necessary in

19 order to resolve any medical issue, a worker shall
submit to

20 examination by a physician or physicians selected by the
director,

21 with the rendition of a report to the person ordering
the

22 examination. The department or self-insurer shall
provide the

23 physician performing an examination with all relevant
medical

24 records from the worker's claim file. The
director, in his or her

25 discretion, may charge the cost of such examination or

26 examinations to the self-insurer or to the medical aid
fund as the

27 case may be. The cost of said examination shall include
payment to

28 the worker of reasonable expenses connected therewith.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5205 p. 2