BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.220.901 and 2000
c 253 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Sections 1
((through 21)), 3, 7, 9, 10, 11, 12, 14, 15, 16, 17, 20, and 21
of this act take effect July 1, 2001.

(2) Sections 2, 18,
and 19 of this act take effect July 1, 2002.

(3) Sections 4, 5,
6, 8, and 13 of this act take effect April 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---