BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.02.010 and 1993 c
448 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Audit"
means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or investigation of a health
care provider by a person not employed by or affiliated with the provider to
determine compliance with:

(a) Statutory,
regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific standards;

(b) A private or public
program of payments to a health care provider; or

(c) Requirements for
licensing, accreditation, or certification.

(2) "Directory
information" means information disclosing the presence, and for the
purpose of identification, the name, residence, sex, and the general health
condition of a particular patient who is a patient in a health care facility or
who is currently receiving emergency health care in a health care facility.

(3) "General
health condition" means the patient's health status described in terms of
"critical," "poor," "fair," "good,"
"excellent," or terms denoting similar conditions.

(4) "Health
care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by a health care
provider:

(a) To diagnose, treat,
or maintain a patient's physical or mental condition; or

(b) That affects the
structure or any function of the human body.

(5) "Health care
facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home, laboratory, office, or
similar place where a health care provider provides health care to patients.

(6) "Health care
information" means any information, whether oral or recorded in any form
or medium, that identifies or can readily be associated with the identity of a
patient and directly relates to the patient's health care. The term includes
any record of disclosures of health care information. The term includes
genetic test information from a person's isolated DNA and a person's DNA when
obtained at the request of a health care provider or health care facility.

(7) "Health care
provider" means a person who is licensed, certified, registered, or
otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health care in the
ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(8) "Institutional
review board" means any board, committee, or other group formally
designated by an institution, or authorized under federal or state law, to
review, approve the initiation of, or conduct periodic review of research
programs to assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human research
subjects.

(9)
"Maintain," as related to health care information, means to hold,
possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that information.

(10)
"Patient" means an individual who receives or has received health
care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received health care.

(11) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or
any other legal or commercial entity.

(12) "Reasonable
fee" means the charges for duplicating or searching the record, but shall
not exceed sixty-five cents per page for the first thirty pages and fifty cents
per page for all other pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching and
handling may be charged not to exceed fifteen dollars. These amounts shall be
adjusted biennially in accordance with changes in the consumer price index, all
consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan statistical area as determined by
the secretary of health. However, where editing of records by a health care
provider is required by statute and is done by the provider personally, the fee
may be the usual and customary charge for a basic office visit.

(13) "Third-party
payor" means an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW authorized to
transact business in this state or other jurisdiction, including a health care
service contractor, and health maintenance organization; or an employee welfare
benefit plan; or a state or federal health benefit program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The technology of
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) identification is of great potential benefit to the
citizens of this state in many fields, including human services and health
care, scientific research, criminal justice, and corrections;

(2) Technology is
changing and improving at an ever-increasing rate;

(3) DNA technology is
particularly important in assisting law enforcement in identifying and
apprehending repeat criminal offenders as well as exonerating those people
convicted and incarcerated for a crime they did not commit;

(4) There are
legitimate concerns for privacy rights in the creation, collection,
maintenance, disclosure, identification, and use of DNA;

(5) Protections of
citizens' civil rights and individual privileges necessitate policy development
of protections preventing the unauthorized use of DNA and the use of DNA for
discriminatory purposes; and

(6) There is a need to
address the potential future uses of DNA that may benefit citizens of this
state, for purposes of the health, safety, and welfare of its citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A DNA commission is
established to consist of twenty-eight members selected as follows:

(1)(a) Two members of
the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, one from each of the two
largest caucuses; and

(b) Two members of the
house of representatives, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of
representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses;

(2) The following
members shall be appointed by the governor:

(a) Two members
representing local public health;

(b) One member
representing genetic counselors;

(c) One member
representing clinical research;

(d) One member representing
epidemiological research;

(e) One member
representing the Human Genome project;

(f) One member
representing genetic ethics;

(g) One member
representing institutional review boards;

(h) Two members
representing geneticists, one clinical and one research;

(i) One member
representing research institutions;

(j) One member
representing civil rights advocates;

(k) Two members
representing criminal justice and corrections;

(l) Two members
representing privacy advocates;

(m) One member
representing citizens who have undergone genetic testing;

(n) One member
representing hospitals;

(o) One member
representing pathologists or laboratory medicine;

(p) One member
representing the biotechnology industry;

(q) One member
representing the judiciary;

(r) One member
representing the state crime laboratory;

(s) One member
representing a rural health care provider; and

(t) One member
representing a primary care physician.

The commission shall be
appointed within forty-five days from the effective date of this act. Staffing
shall be provided by the legislature. Members shall serve without
remuneration, except costs may be provided according to the provisions of RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The DNA commission shall:

(1) Develop a statewide
strategy for evaluating and recommending public policies relating to the use of
DNA;

(2) Conduct a survey
and produce a resource guide for citizens relating to the use of DNA;

(3) Evaluate methods
for protecting an individual's privacy interests in his or her DNA;

(4) Analyze the
incidence of discriminatory actions statewide based upon genetic information;

(5) Develop
recommendations relative to civil rights' protections as they relate to genetic
information;

(6) Analyze available
remedies to compensate individuals for the inappropriate use of their genetic
information;

(7) Identify
appropriate disincentives to improper use of DNA;

(8) Identify incentives
for further research and development in the area of DNA that promotes public
health, safety, and welfare; and

(9) An initial report
of its findings and recommendations shall be provided to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective June 30, 2008:

(1) Section 2 of this
act;

(2) Section 3 of this
act; and

(3) Section 4 of this
act.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.83.050 and 1967 c
82 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The state board of
health shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the intent of
this chapter. Rules adopted by the state board of health must protect an
individual's confidentiality of his or her genetic information obtained under
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 2 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---