BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 7.21.030
and 1998 c 296 s 36 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) The court may initiate a proceeding to impose a
remedial

_8 sanction on its own motion or on the motion of a person
aggrieved

_9 by a contempt of court in the proceeding to which the
contempt is

10 related. Except as provided in RCW 7.21.050, the court,
after

11 notice and hearing, may impose a remedial sanction
authorized by

12 this chapter.

13 (2) If the court finds that the person has failed or
refused to

14 perform an act that is yet within the person's power to
perform,

15 the court may find the person in contempt of court and
impose one

16 or more of the following remedial sanctions:

17 (a) Imprisonment if the contempt of court is of a type
defined

p. 1 SB
5208

_1 in RCW 7.21.010(1) (b) through (d). The imprisonment
may extend

_2 only so long as it serves a coercive purpose.

_3 (b) A forfeiture not to exceed two thousand dollars
for each

_4 day the contempt of court continues.

_5 (c) An order designed to ensure compliance with a
prior order

_6 of the court.

_7 (d) Any other remedial sanction other than the
sanctions

_8 specified in (a) through (c) of this subsection if the
court

_9 expressly finds that those sanctions would be
ineffectual to

10 terminate a continuing contempt of court.

11 (e) In cases under chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and
28A.225 RCW,

12 commitment to juvenile detention for a period of time
not to

13 exceed seven days. This sanction may be imposed in
addition to,

14 or as an alternative to, any other ((remedial))
sanction

15 authorized by this chapter. ((This remedy is
specifically

16 determined to be a remedial sanction.))

17 (3) The court may, in addition to the remedial
sanctions set

18 forth in subsection (2) of this section, order a person
found in

19 contempt of court to pay a party for any losses suffered
by the

20 party as a result of the contempt and any costs incurred
in

21 connection with the contempt proceeding, including
reasonable

22 attorney's fees.

23 Sec. 2. RCW 13.32A.250
and 2000 c 162 s 4 are each amended to read

24 as follows:

25 (1) In all child in need of services proceedings and
at-risk

26 youth proceedings, the court shall verbally notify the
parents and

27 the child of the possibility of a finding of contempt for
failure

28 to comply with the terms of a court order entered pursuant
to this

29 chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
court

30 shall treat the parents and the child equally for the
purposes of

31 applying contempt of court processes and penalties under
this

32 section.

33 (2) Failure by a party to comply with an order entered
under

34 this chapter is a ((civil)) contempt of court ((as
provided in RCW

35 7.21.030(2)(e), subject to the limitations of subsection
(3) of

36 this section)) subject to the provisions of
chapter 7.21 RCW. The

37 seven-day limitation on confinement may be extended in
limited

SB 5208 p. 2

_1 types of cases where the court finds the party has
repeatedly been

_2 held in contempt, the party does not agree to comply
with the

_3 court's order, and the court determines that
detention is

_4 necessary to enforce the order of the court.

_5 (3) ((The court may impose remedial sanctions
including a fine

_6 of up to one hundred dollars and confinement for up
to seven days,

_7 or both for contempt of court under this section.

_8 (4))) A child placed in confinement for
contempt under this

_9 section shall be placed in confinement either in a
secure juvenile

10 detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract
with a

11 county or a secure facility that is a separate, secure
section of

12 a juvenile detention facility. In no case may a child
in contempt

13 be confined in a secure facility that is freestanding
outside a

14 juvenile detention facility.

15 (((5))) (4) A motion for contempt may
be made by a parent, a

16 child, juvenile court personnel, or by any public
agency,

17 organization, or person having custody of the child
under a court

18 order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

19 (((6))) (5) Whenever the court finds
probable cause to believe,

20 based upon consideration of a motion for contempt and
the

21 information set forth in a supporting declaration, that
a child

22 has violated a placement order entered under this
chapter, the

23 court may issue an order directing law enforcement to
pick up and

24 take the child to detention or to a secure facility.
The order

25 may be entered ex parte without prior notice to the
child or other

26 parties. Following the child's admission to detention or
to the

27 secure facility, a review hearing must be held in
accordance with

28 RCW 13.32A.065.

29 Sec. 3. RCW 13.32A.250
and 2000 c 162 s 14 are each amended to

30 read as follows:

31 (1) In all child in need of services proceedings and
at-risk

32 youth proceedings, the court shall verbally notify the
parents and

33 the child of the possibility of a finding of contempt for
failure

34 to comply with the terms of a court order entered pursuant
to this

35 chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
court

36 shall treat the parents and the child equally for the
purposes of

p. 3 SB
5208

_1 applying contempt of court processes and penalties under
this

_2 section.

_3 (2) Failure by a party to comply with an order
entered under

_4 this chapter is a ((civil)) contempt of court ((as
provided in RCW

_5 7.21.030(2)(e), subject to the limitations of
subsection (3) of

_6 this section)) subject to the provisions of
chapter 7.21 RCW. The

_7 seven-day limitation on confinement may be extended
in limited

_8 types of cases where the court finds the party has
repeatedly been

_9 held in contempt, the party does not agree to comply
with the

10 court's order, and the court determines that
detention is

11 necessary to enforce the order of the court.

12 (3) ((The court may impose remedial sanctions
including a fine

13 of up to one hundred dollars and confinement for up
to seven days,

14 or both for contempt of court under this section.

15 (4))) A child placed in confinement for
contempt under this

16 section shall be placed in confinement only in a secure
juvenile

17 detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract
with a

18 county.

19 (((5))) (4) A motion for contempt may
be made by a parent, a

20 child, juvenile court personnel, or by any public
agency,

21 organization, or person having custody of the child
under a court

22 order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

23 (((6))) (5) Whenever the court finds
probable cause to believe,

24 based upon consideration of a motion for contempt and
the

25 information set forth in a supporting declaration, that
a child

26 has violated a placement order entered under this
chapter, the

27 court may issue an order directing law enforcement to
pick up and

28 take the child to detention. The order may be entered
ex parte

29 without prior notice to the child or other parties.
Following the

30 child's admission to detention, a detention review
hearing must be

31 held in accordance with RCW 13.32A.065.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act
expires July 1,

33 2002.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 3 of this act
takes effect July 1,

35 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5208 p. 4