BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.12.063 and 1999 c
210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature to continue the department's policy giving priority
consideration to abutting property owners in agricultural areas when disposing
of property through its surplus property program under this section.

(2) Whenever the
department determines that any real property owned by the state of Washington
and under the jurisdiction of the department is no longer required for
transportation purposes and that it is in the public interest to do so, the
department may sell the property or exchange it in full or part consideration
for land or improvements or for construction of improvements at fair market
value to any of the following governmental entities or persons:

(a) Any other state
agency;

(b) The city or county
in which the property is situated;

(c) Any other municipal
corporation;

(d) Regional transit
authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;

(e) The former owner of
the property from whom the state acquired title;

(f) In the case of
residentially improved property, a tenant of the department who has resided
thereon for not less than six months and who is not delinquent in paying rent
to the state;

(g) Any abutting
private owner but only after each other abutting private owner (if any), as
shown in the records of the county assessor, is notified in writing of the
proposed sale. If more than one abutting private owner requests in writing the
right to purchase the property within fifteen days after receiving notice of
the proposed sale, the property shall be sold at public auction in the manner
provided in RCW 47.12.283;

(h) To any person
through the solicitation of written bids through public advertising in the
manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;

(i) To any other owner
of real property required for transportation purposes; ((or))

(j) In the case of
property suitable for residential use, any nonprofit organization dedicated to
providing affordable housing to very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to
receive assistance through the Washington housing trust fund created in chapter
43.185 RCW; or

(k) A federally
recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation boundary the property is
located.

(3) Sales to purchasers
may at the department's option be for cash, by real estate contract, or
exchange of land or improvements. Transactions involving the construction of
improvements must be conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW or Title 39 RCW,
as applicable, and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.

(4) Conveyances made
pursuant to this section shall be by deed executed by the secretary of
transportation and shall be duly acknowledged.

(5) All moneys received
pursuant to the provisions of this section less any real estate broker
commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.12 RCW to read as follows:

For the
purposes of this chapter "reservation boundary" means the boundary of
the reservation as established by federal law or under the authority of the
United States Secretary of the Interior.

---
END ---