BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.29A RCW to read as follows:

All leasehold interests
consisting of three thousand or more residential and recreational lots that are
or may be subleased for residential and recreational purposes are exempt from
tax under this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.451 and 1979
ex.s. c 196 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
following property shall be exempt from taxation: Any and all rights to occupy
or use any real or personal property owned in fee or held in trust by:

(((1))) (a)
The United States, the state of Washington, or any political subdivision or
municipal corporation of the state of Washington; or

(((2))) (b)
A public corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW 35.21.730 or
35.21.660 if the property is listed on or is within a district listed on any
federal or state register of historical sites; and

(((3))) (c)
Including any leasehold interest arising from the property identified in (a)
and (b) of this subsection((s (1) and (2) of this section)) as
defined in RCW 82.29A.020((: PROVIDED, That)).

(2) The
exemption under this section shall not apply to:

(a) Any ((such))
leasehold interests which are a part of operating properties of public
utilities subject to assessment under chapter 84.12 RCW ((nor)); or

(b) Any leasehold
interest consisting of three thousand or more residential and recreational lots
that are or may be subleased for residential and recreational purposes.

(3) The exemption
under this section shall not be construed to modify the provisions of RCW
84.40.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 84.40 RCW to read as follows:

A leasehold interest
consisting of three thousand or more residential and recreational lots that are
or may be subleased for residential and recreational purposes, together with
any improvements thereon, shall be assessed and taxed in the same manner as
privately owned real property. The sublessee of each lot, or the lessee if not
subleased, is liable for the property tax on the lot and improvements thereon.
If property tax for a lot or improvements thereon remains unpaid for more than
three years from the date of delinquency, including any property taxes that are
delinquent as of the effective date of this section, the county treasurer may
proceed to collect the tax in the same manner as for other property, except
that the lessor's interest in the property shall not be extinguished as a
result of any action for the collection of tax. Collection of property taxes
assessed on any such lot shall be enforceable by foreclosure proceedings
against any improvement located on such lot, in accordance with real property
foreclosure proceedings authorized in chapter 84.64 RCW. Collection of
property taxes assessed against any mobile home located on any such lot shall
proceed in the same manner as with mobile homes located on private property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

For taxes levied for
collection in 2002, the limitation set forth in RCW 84.55.010 for a taxing
district shall be increased by an amount equal to the aggregate assessed
valuation of leasehold interests subject to tax by the district under section 3
of this act, multiplied by the regular property tax levy rate of that district
for the preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act apply to taxes levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 1 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2002.

---
END ---