BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Children are our future.
We spend millions of dollars educating Washington state children to ensure
their success. In order for our children to learn, they must be healthy. They
need strong minds as well as strong bodies. Yet according to Washington state
data, one or two children in every Washington classroom is suffering from
serious emotional and behavioral problems.

But without adequate mental
health insurance coverage for children, families are often unable to pay for
needed treatment. As a result, many children do not receive the services they
need. The costs of this are enormous, often including increased disability
costs, deteriorating school performance, increased use of other health care
services, treatment delays leading to more costly treatments, suicide, family
breakdown and impoverishment, violence, and institutionalization, whether in
hospitals, juvenile detention, jails, or prisons.

The current disparity
between insurance coverage for mental health services and coverage for medical
and surgical services threatens the financial stability of many families and
places Washington state children at risk. The legislature therefore intends to
address this disparity and require a minimum level of mental health coverage
for children.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means outpatient therapy and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule, consistent
with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (this act), except V
codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders, 291.0 through 292.9
and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this section.

(2) Each health benefit
plan offered under this chapter that is not subject to Title 48 RCW that
provides coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide, for any
covered dependent other than a spouse or domestic partner, coverage of:

(a) Mental health
services for a minimum of fifteen inpatient days and thirty outpatient therapy
visits per plan year. The copay or coinsurance for each of these days or
visits may be no more than the copay or coinsurance for an outpatient visit or
inpatient day for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the
plan. If a plan imposes a deductible, it shall be a single deductible for
medical, surgical, and mental health services; and

(b) Prescription drugs
intended to treat any of the disorders covered in subsection (1) of this
section to the same extent, and under the same terms and conditions, as other
prescription drugs covered by the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means outpatient therapy and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance commissioner by
rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001
(this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders,
291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this
section.

(2) All group
disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance contracts
providing health benefit plans to groups of twenty-five or more that provide
coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide, for any covered
dependent other than a spouse or domestic partner, coverage of:

(a) Mental health
services for a minimum of thirty outpatient therapy visits and fifteen
inpatient days per plan year. The copay or coinsurance for each of these
visits or days may be no more than the copay or coinsurance for an outpatient
visit or inpatient day for medical and surgical services otherwise provided
under the plan. If a plan imposes a deductible, it shall be a single
deductible for medical, surgical, and mental health services; and

(b) Prescription drugs
intended to treat any of the disorders covered in subsection (1) of this
section to the same extent, and under the same terms and conditions, as other
prescription drugs covered by the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means outpatient therapy and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance commissioner by
rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001
(this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders,
291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this
section.

(2) All health service
contracts providing health benefit plan coverage to groups of twenty-five or
more that provide coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide, for
any covered dependent other than a spouse or domestic partner, coverage of:

(a) Mental health
services for a minimum of thirty outpatient therapy visits and fifteen
inpatient days per plan year. The copay or coinsurance for each of these
visits or days may be no more than the copay or coinsurance for an outpatient
visit or inpatient day for medical and surgical services otherwise provided
under the plan. If a plan imposes a deductible, it shall be a single
deductible for medical, surgical, and mental health services; and

(b) Prescription drugs
intended to treat any of the disorders covered in subsection (1) of this
section to the same extent, and under the same terms and conditions, as other
prescription drugs covered by the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
this section, "mental health services" means outpatient therapy and
inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance commissioner by
rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001
(this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders,
291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this
section.

(2) All health benefit
plans of health maintenance organizations for groups of twenty-five or more
that provide coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide, for any
covered dependent other than a spouse or domestic partner, coverage of:

(a) Mental health
services for a minimum of thirty outpatient therapy visits and fifteen
inpatient days per plan year. The copay or coinsurance for each of these
visits or days may be no more than the copay or coinsurance for an outpatient
visit or inpatient day for medical and surgical services otherwise provided
under the plan. If a plan imposes a deductible, it shall be a single
deductible for medical, surgical, and mental health services; and

(b) Prescription drugs
intended to treat any of the disorders covered in subsection (1) of this
section to the same extent, and under the same terms and conditions, as other
prescription drugs covered by the plan.

Sec. 6. RCW 48.21.240 and 1987 c
283 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to
the coverage it is required to provide under section 3 of this act, each
group insurer providing disability insurance coverage in this state for
hospital or medical care under contracts which are issued, delivered, or
renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1986, shall offer optional
supplemental coverage for mental health treatment for the insured and the
insured's covered dependents.

(2) Benefits shall be
provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment
whether treatment is rendered by: (a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71
or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; (c) a
community mental health agency licensed by the department of social and health
services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW; or (d) a state hospital as defined in
RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be covered at the usual and customary rates
for such treatment. The insurer, health care service contractor, or health
maintenance organization providing optional coverage under the provisions of
this section for mental health services may establish separate usual and
customary rates for services rendered by physicians licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, and
community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW and state
hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010. However, the treatment may be subject to
contract provisions with respect to reasonable deductible amounts or
copayments. In order to qualify for coverage under this section, a licensed
community mental health agency shall have in effect a plan for quality
assurance and peer review, and the treatment shall be supervised by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist licensed under
chapter 18.83 RCW.

(3) The group
disability insurance contract may provide that all the coverage for mental
health treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract holder so
states in advance in writing to the insurer.

(4) This section shall
not apply to a group disability insurance contract that has been entered into
in accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between management and
labor representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

Sec. 7. RCW 48.44.340 and 1987 c
283 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to
the coverage it is required to provide under section 4 of this act, each
health care service contractor providing hospital or medical services or
benefits in this state under group contracts for health care services under
this chapter which are issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after
July 1, 1986, shall offer optional supplemental coverage for mental health
treatment for the insured and the insured's covered dependents.

(2) Benefits shall be
provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment
whether treatment is rendered by: (a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71
or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; (c) a
community mental health agency licensed by the department of social and health
services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW; or (d) a state hospital as defined in
RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be covered at the usual and customary rates
for such treatment. The insurer, health care service contractor, or health
maintenance organization providing optional coverage under the provisions of this
section for mental health services may establish separate usual and customary
rates for services rendered by physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57
RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, and community mental
health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW and state hospitals as defined
in RCW 72.23.010. However, the treatment may be subject to contract provisions
with respect to reasonable deductible amounts or copayments. In order to
qualify for coverage under this section, a licensed community mental health
agency shall have in effect a plan for quality assurance and peer review, and
the treatment shall be supervised by a physician licensed under chapter 18.71
or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(3) The group contract
for health care services may provide that all the coverage for mental health
treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract holder so states in
advance in writing to the health care service contractor.

(4) This section shall
not apply to a group health care service contract that has been entered into in
accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between management and labor
representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

Sec. 8. RCW 48.46.290 and 1987 c
283 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to
the coverage it is required to provide under section 5 of this act, each
health maintenance organization providing services or benefits for hospital or
medical care coverage in this state under group health maintenance agreements
which are issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1986,
shall offer optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment to the
enrolled participant and the enrolled participant's covered dependents.

(2) Benefits shall be
provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental health treatment
whether treatment is rendered by the health maintenance organization or the
health maintenance organization refers the enrolled participant or the enrolled
participant's covered dependents for treatment to: (a) A physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW; (c) a community mental health agency licensed by the department of
social and health services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW; or (d) a state
hospital as defined in RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be covered at the
usual and customary rates for such treatment. The insurer, health care service
contractor, or health maintenance organization providing optional coverage
under the provisions of this section for mental health services may establish
separate usual and customary rates for services rendered by physicians licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83
RCW, and community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW and
state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010. However, the treatment may be
subject to contract provisions with respect to reasonable deductible amounts or
copayments. In order to qualify for coverage under this section, a licensed
community mental health agency shall have in effect a plan for quality
assurance and peer review, and the treatment shall be supervised by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist licensed under
chapter 18.83 RCW.

(3) The group health
maintenance agreement may provide that all the coverage for mental health
treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract holder so states in
advance in writing to the health maintenance organization.

(4) This section shall
not apply to a group health maintenance agreement that has been entered into in
accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between management and labor
representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Any increase in the cost
of plans offered by the public employees' benefits board due to the
implementation of this act shall not be paid for by the state or any political
subdivision of the state, but shall be accommodated through changes in the
benefit design or amount of enrollee cost-sharing for such plans as determined
by the public employees' benefits board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Any increase in the cost
of a health plan offered by a private employer due to implementation of this
act need not be paid for by the employer, but may be accommodated through
changes in the benefit design or amount of enrollee cost-sharing for the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The insurance
commissioner may adopt rules to implement sections 3 through 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---