BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.07 RCW to read as follows:

Voter registration may
be done only in person.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.07.430 and 1994 c
57 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may
register to vote or transfer a voter registration when he or she applies for
service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change of
address at agencies designated under RCW 29.07.420.

(2) A prospective
applicant shall initially be offered a form adopted by the secretary of state
that is designed to determine whether the person wishes to register to vote.
The form must comply with all applicable state and federal statutes regarding
content.

The form shall also
contain a box that may be checked by the applicant to indicate that he or she
declines to register.

If the person indicates
an interest in registering or has made no indication as to a desire to register
or not register to vote, the person shall be given ((a mail-in voter
registration application or)) a prescribed agency application as provided
by RCW 29.07.440.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.10.020 and 1994 c
57 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

To maintain a valid
voter registration, a registered voter who changes his or her residence from
one address to another within the same county shall transfer his or her
registration to the new address in one of the following ways: (1) ((Sending
to the county auditor a signed request stating the voter's present address and
the address from which the voter was last registered; (2))) Appearing
in person before the auditor and signing such a request; (((3))) or
(2) transferring the registration in the manner provided by RCW 29.10.170((;
or (4) telephoning the county auditor to transfer the registration. The
telephone call transferring a registration by telephone must be received by the
auditor before the precinct registration files are closed to new registrations
for the next primary or special or general election in which the voter
participates.

The secretary of
state may adopt rules facilitating the transfer of a registration by telephone
authorized by this section)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 29.08.010 (Definitions--Rules) and
1994 c 57 s 30 & 1993 c 434 s 1;

(2) RCW 29.08.020 (Duties of county
auditor--Application of remainder of title) and 1993 c 434 s 2;

(3) RCW 29.08.030 (Authorization) and 1993 c
434 s 3;

(4) RCW 29.08.040 (Forms) and 1993 c 434 s
4;

(5) RCW 29.08.050 (Declaration and warning)
and 1994 c 57 s 31 & 1993 c 434 s 5;

(6) RCW 29.08.060 (Auditor's procedure) and
1994 c 57 s 32 & 1993 c 434 s 6;

(7) RCW 29.08.070 (Form--Adoption, contents)
and 1993 c 434 s 7;

(8) RCW 29.08.080 (Forms--Supplied without
cost) and 1999 c 298 s 7 & 1993 c 434 s 8;

(9) RCW 29.08.090 (Violations of chapter)
and 1993 c 434 s 9; and

(10) RCW 29.08.900 (Effective date--1993 c
434) and 1993 c 434 s 13.

---
END ---