BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.10 RCW to read as follows:

The
registration of a person who registered to vote before July 1, 2001, is
canceled on July 1, 2003, and that person must reregister in order to vote at
an election held after that date. The registration of a person who first
registers to vote or reregisters after June 30, 2001, continues to be valid
after July 1, 2003, unless canceled or inactivated as otherwise provided by
law.

--- END ---