BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.52.043 and 1995 c
99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within and subject to
the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax
levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named
shall be as follows:

(1) Levies of the
senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the state shall
not exceed three dollars ((and sixty cents)) per thousand dollars of
assessed value adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively
for the support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not
exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c)
the levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to
increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two
dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and
any road district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its
levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.

(2) The aggregate
levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the
state, shall not exceed ((five)) six dollars and ((ninety))
fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than
the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public
utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection shall not apply
to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or
public utility district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation
futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical
care or emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to
finance affordable housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW
84.52.105; and (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that
are protected under RCW 84.52.120.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.52.065 and 1991
sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the
limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state shall levy for collection
in the following year for the support of common schools of the state a tax of
three dollars ((and sixty cents)) per thousand dollars of assessed value
upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted
to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by
the state department of revenue.

As used in this
section, "the support of common schools" includes the payment of the
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction projects for
the common schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---