BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 76.04.610
and 1993 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) If any owner of forest land within a forest
protection zone

_7 neglects or fails to provide adequate fire protection as
required

_8 by RCW 76.04.600, the department shall provide such
protection and

_9 shall annually impose the following assessments on each
parcel of

10 such land: (a) A flat fee assessment of fourteen dollars
and

11 fifty cents; and (b) twenty-two cents on each acre
exceeding fifty

12 acres. Assessors may, at their option, collect the
assessment on

13 tax exempt lands. If the assessor elects not to collect
the

14 assessment, the department may bill the landowner directly.

15 (2) An owner who has paid assessments on two or more
parcels,

16 each containing fewer than fifty acres and each within the
same

17 county, may obtain the following refund:

18 (a) If all the parcels together contain less than fifty
acres,

p. 1 SB
5217

_1 then the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments
paid, reduced

_2 by the total of (i) fourteen dollars and (ii) the total
of the

_3 amounts retained by the county from such assessments
under

_4 subsection (5) of this section.

_5 (b) If all the parcels together contain fifty or
more acres,

_6 then the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments
paid, reduced

_7 by the total of (i) fourteen dollars, (ii) twenty-two
cents for

_8 each acre exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the total of
the

_9 amounts retained by the county from such assessments
under

10 subsection (5) of this section.

11 Applications for refunds shall be submitted to the
department

12 on a form prescribed by the department ((and in the
same year in

13 which the assessments were paid)). Applications
for refunds must

14 be submitted within three years after paying the
assessment sought

15 to be refunded. The department may not provide
refunds to

16 applicants who do not provide verification that all
assessments

17 and property taxes on the property have been paid.
Applications

18 may be made by mail.

19 (3) Beginning January 1, 1991, under the
administration and at

20 the discretion of the department up to two hundred
thousand

21 dollars per year of this assessment shall be used in
support of

22 those rural fire districts assisting the department in
fire

23 protection services on forest lands.

24 (4) For the purpose of this chapter, the department
may divide

25 the forest lands of the state, or any part thereof, into

26 districts, for fire protection and assessment purposes,
may

27 classify lands according to the character of timber
prevailing,

28 and the fire hazard existing, and place unprotected
lands under

29 the administration of the proper district. Amounts paid
or

30 contracted to be paid by the department for protection
of forest

31 lands from funds at its disposal shall be a lien upon
the property

32 protected, unless reimbursed by the owner within ten
days after

33 October 1st of the year in which they were incurred.
The

34 department shall be prepared to make statement thereof,
upon

35 request, to a forest owner whose own protection has not
been

36 previously approved as to its adequacy, the department
shall

37 report the same to the assessor of the county in which
the

38 property is situated. The assessor shall extend the
amounts upon

SB 5217 p. 2

_1 the tax rolls covering the property, and upon
authorization from

_2 the department shall levy the forest protection
assessment against

_3 the amounts of unimproved land as shown in each
ownership on the

_4 county assessor's records. The assessor may then
segregate on the

_5 records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon

_6 carry the millage levy designed to support the rural
fire

_7 protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.

_8 (5) The amounts assessed shall be collected at the
time, in the

_9 same manner, by the same procedure, and with the same
penalties

10 attached that general state and county taxes on the same
property

11 are collected, except that errors in assessments may be
corrected

12 at any time by the department certifying them to the
treasurer of

13 the county in which the land involved is situated.
Assessments

14 shall be known and designated as assessments of the year
in which

15 the amounts became reimbursable. Upon the collection of

16 assessments the county treasurer shall place fifty cents
of the

17 total assessments paid on a parcel for fire protection
into the

18 county current expense fund to defray the costs of
listing,

19 billing, and collecting these assessments. The
treasurer shall

20 then transmit the balance to the department.
Collections shall be

21 applied against expenses incurred in carrying out the
provisions

22 of this section, including necessary and reasonable
administrative

23 costs incurred by the department in the enforcement of
these

24 provisions. The department may also expend sums
collected from

25 owners of forest lands or received from any other source
for

26 necessary administrative costs in connection with the
enforcement

27 of RCW 76.04.660.

28 (6) When land against which forest protection assessments
are

29 outstanding is acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at
public

30 auction, the state shall have a prior lien on the
proceeds of sale

31 over and above the amount necessary to satisfy the
county's

32 delinquent tax judgment. The county treasurer, in case
the

33 proceeds of sale exceed the amount of the delinquent tax
judgment,

34 shall immediately remit to the department the amount of
the

35 outstanding forest protection assessments.

36 (7) All nonfederal public bodies owning or
administering forest

37 land included in a forest protection zone shall pay the
forest

38 protection assessments provided in this section and the
special

p. 3 SB
5217

_1 forest fire suppression account assessments under RCW
76.04.630.

_2 The forest protection assessments and special forest
fire

_3 suppression account assessments shall be payable by
nonfederal

_4 public bodies from available funds within thirty days
following

_5 receipt of the written notice from the department which
is given

_6 after October 1st of the year in which the protection
was

_7 provided. Unpaid assessments shall not be a lien
against the

_8 nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a
debt by the

_9 nonfederal public body to the department and shall be
subject to

10 interest charges at the legal rate.

11 (8) A public body, having failed to previously pay
the forest

12 protection assessments required of it by this section,
which fails

13 to suppress a fire on or originating from forest lands
owned or

14 administered by it, shall be liable for the costs of
suppression

15 incurred by the department or its agent and shall not be
entitled

16 to reimbursement of costs incurred by the public body in
the

17 suppression activities.

18 (9) The department may adopt rules to implement this
section,

19 including, but not limited to, rules on levying and
collecting

20 forest protection assessments.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5217 p. 4