BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.138.021 and 2000
c 171 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(2)
"Director" means the director of licensing or the director's
designee.

(3) "Sale of
travel-related benefits" means the sale of travel services if the travel
services are not identified at the time of the sale with respect to dates,
price, or location and includes:

(a) Sales of travel
club memberships;

(b) Sales of
vacation certificates or other documents that purport to grant the holder of
the certificate or other document the ability to obtain future travel services,
with or without additional consideration; or

(c) Sales of
travel-industry member benefits including those through either or both the
issuance and sale or the consulting with or advising for consideration of persons
in connection with the obtaining of international airlines travel agent network
identification cards or memberships.

(4) "Travel
club" means a seller of travel that sells memberships to consumers, where
the initial membership or maintenance dues are at least twice the amount of the
annual membership or maintenance dues.

(5) "Seller of
travel-related benefits" means a person, firm, or corporation that
transacts business with Washington consumers for the sale of travel-related
benefits.

(6) "Seller
of travel" means a person, firm, or corporation both inside and outside
the state of Washington, who transacts business with Washington consumers ((for
travel services)).

(a) "Seller of
travel" includes a travel agent and any person who is an independent
contractor or outside agent for a travel agency or other seller of travel whose
principal duties include consulting with and advising persons concerning travel
arrangements or accommodations in the conduct or administration of its
business. If a seller of travel is employed by a seller of travel who is
registered under this chapter, the employee need not also be registered.

(b) "Seller of
travel" does not include:

(i) An air carrier;

(ii) An owner or
operator of a vessel, including an ocean common carrier as defined in 46 U.S.C.
App. 1702(18), an owner or charterer of a vessel that is required to establish
its financial responsibility in accordance with the requirements of the federal
maritime commission, 46 U.S.C. App. 817 (e), and a steamboat company whether or
not operating over and upon the waters of this state;

(iii) A motor carrier;

(iv) A rail carrier;

(v) A charter party
carrier of passengers as defined in RCW 81.70.020;

(vi) An auto
transportation company as defined in RCW 81.68.010;

(vii) A hotel or other
lodging accommodation;

(viii) An affiliate of
any person or entity described in (i) through (vii) of this subsection (((3)))
(6)(b) that is primarily engaged in the sale of travel services provided
by the person or entity. For purposes of this subsection (((3))) (6)(b)(viii),
an "affiliate" means a person or entity owning, owned by, or under
common ownership, with "owning," "owned," and
"ownership" referring to equity holdings of at least eighty percent;

(ix) Direct providers
of transportation by air, sea, or ground, or hotel or other lodging
accommodations who do not book or arrange any other travel services.

(((4))) (7)
"Travel services" includes transportation by air, sea, or ground,
hotel or any lodging accommodations, package tours, or vouchers or coupons to
be redeemed for future travel or accommodations for a fee, commission, or other
valuable consideration.

(((5))) (8)
"Advertisement" includes, but is not limited to, a written or graphic
representation in a card, brochure, newspaper, magazine, directory listing, or
display, and oral, written, or graphic representations made by radio,
television, or cable transmission that relates to travel services.

(((6))) (9)
"Transacts business with Washington consumers" means to directly
offer or sell travel services or travel-related benefits to Washington
consumers, including the placement of advertising in media based in the state
of Washington or that is primarily directed to Washington residents.
Advertising placed in national print or electronic media alone does not
constitute "transacting business with Washington consumers." Those
entities who only wholesale travel services are not "transacting business
with Washington consumers" for the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.138 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A contract for the
sale of travel-related benefits may be canceled at the option of the purchaser
if the purchaser sends notice of the cancellation by certified mail, return
receipt requested, to the seller of travel-related benefits at the address
contained in the contract and if the notice is postmarked not later than
midnight of the seventh calendar day following the day on which the contract is
signed or any membership card and all membership materials are received by the
purchaser, whichever is later. In addition to this cancellation right, a
purchaser who signs a contract for the sale of travel-related benefits of any
description from a seller of travel-related benefits without having received
the written disclosures required in subsection (2) of this section has
cancellation rights until seven calendar days after the receipt of the written
disclosures. A purchaser must request cancellation of a contract by sending
the notice of cancellation by certified mail, return receipt requested,
postmarked not later than midnight of the seventh calendar day following the
day on which the contract is signed, any membership card and all membership
materials are received by the purchaser, or the day on which the disclosures
were actually received, whichever is later, to the seller of travel-related
benefits at the address contained in the contract. The purchaser may use the
cancellation form prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, however, notice
of cancellation is sufficient if it indicates the intention of the purchaser
not to be bound by the contract. The purchaser's right of cancellation of a
contract for the sale of travel-related benefits may not be waived.

(2) A contract for the
sale of travel-related benefits must include the following statement in at
least ten-point bold-face type immediately before the space for the purchaser's
signature:

"Purchaser's right
to cancel: You may cancel this contract without any cancellation fee or other
penalty, or stated reason for doing so, by sending notice of cancellation by
certified mail, return receipt requested, to . . . (insert name of the seller
of travel-related benefits) at the address indicated below. The notice must be
postmarked by midnight of the seventh calendar day following the day on which
this contract is signed by you or the day any membership card and all
membership materials are received by you, whichever is later. The day on which
the contract was signed is not included as a "calendar day," and if
the seventh calendar day falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, then the right to
cancel this contract expires on the day immediately following that Sunday or
legal holiday.

TO CANCEL THIS
CONTRACT, SEND A COPY OF THIS NOTICE OF CANCELLATION OR OTHER WRITTEN NOTICE OF
CANCELLATION TO:

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Name of Seller)

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Address of Seller)

(Date)

I HEREBY CANCEL THIS
CONTRACT

(Date)

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Purchaser's Signature)

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Printed Name)

. . . . . . . . . . .

(Purchaser's
Address)"

(3) Within seven
calendar days following timely receipt of notice of cancellation from the
purchaser, the seller of travel-related benefits shall provide evidence that
the contract has been canceled and return any money or other consideration paid
by the purchaser. However, the seller of travel-related benefits may retain
payments made for specific travel services utilized by the purchaser.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.138.220 and 1994
c 237 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The attorney general, a
county prosecuting attorney, the director, or any person may, in accordance
with the law of this state governing injunctions, maintain an action in the
name of this state to enjoin a ((person or entity selling travel services))
seller of travel for which registration is required by this chapter
without registration from engaging in the practice until the required
registration is secured. However, the injunction shall not relieve the person
or entity selling travel services or selling travel-related benefits
without registration from criminal prosecution therefor, but the remedy by
injunction shall be in addition to any criminal liability.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.138.100 and 1999
c 238 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No person, firm, or
corporation may act or hold itself out as a seller of travel unless, prior to
engaging in the business of selling or advertising to sell travel services or
travel-related benefits, the person, firm, or corporation registers with
the director under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

(1) The registration
number must be conspicuously posted in the place of business and must be
included in all advertisements. Sellers of travel are not required to include
registration numbers on institutional advertising. For the purposes of this
subsection, "institutional advertising" is advertising that does not
include prices or dates for travel services.

(2) The director shall
issue duplicate registrations upon payment of a duplicate registration fee to
valid registration holders operating more than one office. The duplicate
registration fee for each office shall be an amount equal to the original registration
fee.

(3) No registration is
assignable or transferable.

(4) If a registered
seller of travel sells his or her business, when the new owner becomes
responsible for the business, the new owner must comply with all provisions of
this chapter, including registration.

(5) If a seller of
travel is employed by or under contract as an independent contractor or an
outside agent of a seller of travel who is registered under this chapter, the
employee, independent contractor, or outside agent need not also be registered
if:

(a) The employee,
independent contractor, or outside agent is conducting business as a seller of
travel in the name of and under the registration of the registered seller of
travel; and

(b) All
money received for travel services by the employee, independent contractor, or
outside agent is collected in the name of the registered seller of travel and
processed by the registered seller of travel as required under this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.138.160 and 1994
c 237 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A nonresident
seller of travel soliciting business or selling travel in the state of
Washington, by mail, telephone, or otherwise, either directly or indirectly, is
deemed, absent any other appointment, to have appointed the director to be the
seller of travel's true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served any legal
process against that nonresident arising or growing out of a transaction
involving travel services or the sale of travel-related benefits. That
solicitation signifies the nonresident's agreement that process against the
nonresident that is served as provided in this chapter is of the same legal
force and validity as if served personally on the nonresident seller of travel.

(2)
Service of process upon a nonresident seller of travel shall be made by leaving
a copy of the process with the director. The fee for the service of process
shall be determined by the director by rule. That service is sufficient
service upon the nonresident if the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney of record
sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by certified mail before
service or immediately after service to the defendant at the address given by
the nonresident in a solicitation furnished by the nonresident, and the
sender's post office receipt of sending and the plaintiff's or plaintiff's
attorney's affidavit of compliance with this section are returned with the
process in accordance with Washington superior court civil rules.
Notwithstanding the foregoing requirements, however, once service has been made
on the director as provided in this section, in the event of failure to comply
with the requirement of notice to the nonresident, the court may order that
notice be given that will be sufficient to apprise the nonresident.

---
END ---