BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Statistics suggest
Washington state has

_5 one of the highest populations of persons suffering from
multiple

_6 sclerosis. The causes of multiple sclerosis are at
present

_7 nonspecific; however notable research is being conducted
in the

_8 department of rehabilitation medicine at the University
of

_9 Washington under the direction of Dr. George Kraft.
State support

10 of multiple sclerosis research is in the best interest
of the

11 citizens of the state of Washington, furthering public
health,

12 safety, and welfare.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The University of
Washington, under the

14 direction of Dr. George Kraft, shall administer a survey
of

15 Washington state citizens suffering from multiple
sclerosis, that

16 is designed to assess possible causal factors, needs,
and

p. 1 SB
5220

_1 functional characteristics of the disease. Priority
shall be on

_2 statistically significant populations in eastern
Washington.

_3

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of fifty
thousand dollars, or as

_5 much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium

_6 ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the
University of

_7 Washington for purposes of administering the survey
under section

_8 2 of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5220 p. 2