BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that consumers of child care services have a legitimate interest in receiving
timely information about child care service providers in order to make
meaningful choices regarding the facilities and people who provide care for
their children.

The legislature finds
that parents often do not receive timely information about enforcement actions
when complaints are made alleging serious issues affecting the health or safety
of children. The legislature intends to utilize the state's improved ability
to collect and manage information about child care service providers by
requiring that all relevant licensing actions and enforcement actions be
reported to appropriate individuals and organizations in a timely manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every child
day-care center and family day-care provider shall prominently post the
following items, clearly visible to parents and staff:

(a) The license issued
under this chapter; and

(b) A notice that
inspection reports and any notices of enforcement actions for the previous
three years are available from the licensee and the department.

(2) The department
shall disclose, upon request, the receipt, general nature, and resolution or
current status of all complaints on record with the department after the
effective date of this act against a child day-care center or family day-care
provider that result in an enforcement action.

This section shall not
be construed to require the disclosure of any information that is exempt from
public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every child
day-care center and family day-care provider shall have readily available for
review by the department, parents, and the public a copy of each inspection
report and notice of enforcement action received by the center or provider from
the department for the past three years. This subsection only applies to
reports and notices received on or after the effective date of this act.

(2) The department
shall make available to the public during business hours all inspection reports
and notices of enforcement actions involving child day-care centers and family
day-care providers consistent with chapter 42.17 RCW. The department shall
include in the inspection report a statement of the corrective measures taken
by the center or provider.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.15.130 and 1998 c
314 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency may be
denied a license, or any license issued pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031 may be suspended, revoked, modified, or not renewed by the secretary
upon proof (a) that the agency has failed or refused to comply with the provisions
of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 or the requirements promulgated pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031; or (b) that the
conditions required for the issuance of a license under chapter 74.15 RCW and
RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to such licenses. RCW
43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial, revocation, suspension, or
modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

(2) In any adjudicative
proceeding regarding the denial, modification, suspension, or revocation of a
foster family home license, the department's decision shall be upheld if there
is reasonable cause to believe that:

(a) The applicant or
licensee lacks the character, suitability, or competence to care for children placed
in out-of-home care, however, no unfounded report of child abuse or neglect may
be used to deny employment or a license;

(b) The applicant or
licensee has failed or refused to comply with any provision of chapter 74.15
RCW, RCW 74.13.031, or the requirements adopted pursuant to such provisions; or

(c) The conditions
required for issuance of a license under chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031
have ceased to exist with respect to such licenses.

(3) In any adjudicative
proceeding regarding the denial, modification, suspension, or revocation of any
license under this chapter, other than a foster family home license, the
department's decision shall be upheld if it is supported by a preponderance of
the evidence.

(4) The department may
assess civil monetary penalties upon proof that an agency has failed or refused
to comply with the rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter and RCW
74.13.031 or that an agency subject to licensing under this chapter and RCW
74.13.031 is operating without a license except that civil monetary penalties
shall not be levied against a licensed foster home. Monetary penalties levied
against unlicensed agencies that submit an application for licensure within
thirty days of notification and subsequently become licensed will be forgiven.
These penalties may be assessed in addition to or in lieu of other disciplinary
actions. Civil monetary penalties, if imposed, may be assessed and collected,
with interest, for each day an agency is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary
penalties shall not exceed seventy-five dollars per violation for a family
day-care home and two hundred fifty dollars per violation for group homes,
child day-care centers, and child-placing agencies. Each day upon which the
same or substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to
the assessment of a separate penalty. The department shall provide a
notification period before a monetary penalty is effective and may forgive the
penalty levied if the agency comes into compliance during this period. The
department may suspend, revoke, or not renew a license for failure to pay a
civil monetary penalty it has assessed pursuant to this chapter within ten days
after such assessment becomes final. Chapter 43.20A RCW governs notice of a civil
monetary penalty and provides the right of an adjudicative proceeding. The
preponderance of evidence standard shall apply in adjudicative proceedings
related to assessment of civil monetary penalties.

(5)(a) The
department may place a child day-care center or family day-care provider on
nonreferral status or stop placement status if the center or provider has
failed or refused to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter or an enforcement action has been taken. The nonreferral status or
stop placement status may continue until the department determines that: (i)
No enforcement action is appropriate; (ii) a complaint is not founded or valid;
or (iii) a corrective action plan has been successfully concluded. The
department shall then remove the center or provider from nonreferral status and
provide appropriate notice to the public and private child care resource and
referral agencies.

(b) The department
shall notify appropriate public and private child care resource and referral
agencies of the department's decision to take an enforcement action against the
center or provider.

(6) Whenever an
enforcement action is taken, the department shall notify the child care agency
subject to the action in writing by personal service within ten business days.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall compile an annual report summarizing all enforcement actions for the
previous fiscal year relating to children in the care of child day-care centers
and family day-care providers. The report must be provided to the legislature,
the child care coordinating committee, and child care resource and referral
agencies by August 1st of each year beginning in 2002.

(2) The report must
include, at a minimum: (a) An analysis of the volume and general nature of all
reports and disclosures made by the department as required or authorized under
section 2 of this act; (b) an analysis of the volume and general nature of the
enforcement actions, pending complaint investigations, and ongoing corrective
action plans for which the department placed centers and providers on
nonreferral or stop placement status under section 3 of this act; (c) an
analysis of the volume and general nature of complaints determined to be
invalid, inconclusive, or unfounded; and (d) information about the average
length of time required by the department to complete investigations determined
to be (i) founded or valid, (ii) inconclusive, and (iii) invalid or unfounded.

Sec. 6. RCW 74.15.020 and 1999 c
267 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031, and unless otherwise clearly indicated by
the context thereof, the following terms shall mean:

(1) "Adverse
licensing action" means a denial, suspension, revocation, modification, or
nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW 74.15.130, or issuance of a
probationary license pursuant to RCW 74.15.125.

(2)
"Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or persons
with developmental disabilities for control, care, or maintenance outside their
own homes, or which places, arranges the placement of, or assists in the
placement of children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental
disabilities for foster care or placement of children for adoption, and shall
include the following irrespective of whether there is compensation to the
agency or to the children, expectant mothers or persons with developmental
disabilities for services rendered:

(a) "Child
day-care center" means an agency which regularly provides care for a group
of children for periods of less than twenty-four hours;

(b) "Child-placing
agency" means an agency which places a child or children for temporary
care, continued care, or for adoption;

(c) "Community
facility" means a group care facility operated for the care of juveniles
committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility
that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant
to a contract with the department is not a community facility;

(d) "Crisis
residential center" means an agency which is a temporary protective
residential facility operated to perform the duties specified in chapter 13.32A
RCW, in the manner provided in RCW 74.13.032 through 74.13.036;

(e) "Family
day-care provider" means a child day-care provider who regularly provides
child day care for not more than twelve children in the provider's home in the
family living quarters;

(f) "Foster-family
home" means an agency which regularly provides care on a twenty-four hour
basis to one or more children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental
disabilities in the family abode of the person or persons under whose direct
care and supervision the child, expectant mother, or person with a
developmental disability is placed;

(g) "Group-care
facility" means an agency, other than a foster-family home, which is
maintained and operated for the care of a group of children on a twenty-four
hour basis;

(h) "HOPE
center" means an agency licensed by the secretary to provide temporary
residential placement and other services to street youth. A street youth may
remain in a HOPE center for thirty days while services are arranged and
permanent placement is coordinated. No street youth may stay longer than
thirty days unless approved by the department and any additional days approved
by the department must be based on the unavailability of a long-term placement
option. A street youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may
remain in a HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth,
not longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter
13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;

(i) "Maternity
service" means an agency which provides or arranges for care or services
to expectant mothers, before or during confinement, or which provides care as
needed to mothers and their infants after confinement;

(j) "Responsible
living skills program" means an agency licensed by the secretary that
provides residential and transitional living services to persons ages sixteen to
eighteen who are dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to
live in his or her legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor
lived outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the
minor. Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be eligible if no other
placement alternative is available and the department approves the placement;

(k) "Service
provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.

(((2))) (3)
"Agency" shall not include the following:

(a) Persons related to
the child, expectant mother, or person with developmental disability in the
following ways:

(i) Any blood relative,
including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, nephews or nieces,
and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or
great-great;

(ii) Stepfather,
stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(iii) A person who
legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other
legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive
parents in accordance with state law;

(iv) Spouses of any
persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection (2)(a), even after the
marriage is terminated; or

(v) Extended family
members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the
absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of eighteen and
who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister,
brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or
stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four-hour basis to
an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(b) Persons who are
legal guardians of the child, expectant mother, or persons with developmental
disabilities;

(c) Persons who care
for a neighbor's or friend's child or children, with or without compensation,
where: (i) The person providing care for periods of less than twenty-four
hours does not conduct such activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis
for the purpose of engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care; or (ii) the parent and person providing care on a
twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement in writing and the state is
not providing any payment for the care;

(d) Parents on a
mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one another's children;

(e) A person,
partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or similar
services to exchange students or international student exchange visitors or
persons who have the care of an exchange student in their home;

(f) Nursery schools or
kindergartens which are engaged primarily in educational work with preschool
children and in which no child is enrolled on a regular basis for more than
four hours per day;

(g) Schools, including
boarding schools, which are engaged primarily in education, operate on a
definite school year schedule, follow a stated academic curriculum, accept only
school-age children and do not accept custody of children;

(h) Seasonal camps of
three months' or less duration engaged primarily in recreational or educational
activities;

(i) Hospitals licensed
pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when performing functions defined in chapter
70.41 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW and boarding homes
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;

(j) Licensed physicians
or lawyers;

(k) Facilities
providing care to children for periods of less than twenty-four hours whose
parents remain on the premises to participate in activities other than
employment;

(l) Facilities approved
and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;

(m) Any agency having
been in operation in this state ten years prior to June 8, 1967, and not
seeking or accepting moneys or assistance from any state or federal agency, and
is supported in part by an endowment or trust fund;

(n) Persons who have a
child in their home for purposes of adoption, if the child was placed in such
home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency
or court or if a replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and
the placement has been approved by the court;

(o) An agency operated
by any unit of local, state, or federal government or an agency, located within
the boundaries of a federally recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the
Indian tribe;

(p) An agency located
on a federal military reservation, except where the military authorities
request that such agency be subject to the licensing requirements of this
chapter.

(((3))) (4)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(((4))) (5)
"Enforcement action" means any disciplinary action taken by the
department including:

(a) An adverse
licensing action;

(b) Issuance of a
deficiency statement, notification of a violation, or licensing compliance
plan;

(c) A protective
action including removal of a child or initiation of court proceedings; or

(d) Imposition of a
civil penalty.

(6)
"Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out
of compliance with licensing standards.

(7)
"Referent" means a person or agency who brings to the attention of
the department a complaint or information resulting in an investigation or
enforcement action.

(8)
"Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been
sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department
under RCW 13.40.185.

(((5)
"Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out
of compliance with licensing standards.

(6))) (9) "Requirement" means any
rule, regulation, or standard of care to be maintained by an agency.

(((7))) (10)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(((8))) (11)
"Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who lives
outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor
and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his or her legally
authorized residence.

(((9))) (12)
"Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to the extent
funds are available, the following:

(a) Educational
services, including basic literacy and computational skills training, either in
local alternative or public high schools or in a high school equivalency
program that leads to obtaining a high school equivalency degree;

(b) Assistance and
counseling related to obtaining vocational training or higher education, job
readiness, job search assistance, and placement programs;

(c) Counseling and
instruction in life skills such as money management, home management, consumer
skills, parenting, health care, access to community resources, and
transportation and housing options;

(d) Individual and
group counseling; and

(e) Establishing
networks with federal agencies and state and local organizations such as the
United States department of labor, employment and training administration
programs including the job training partnership act which administers private
industry councils and the job corps; vocational rehabilitation; and volunteer
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The department of social
and health services shall adopt rules as necessary to implement sections 2
through 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number, and an electronic
on-line system for communication of information regarding child day-care
centers and family day-care providers. This number shall be available during
standard business hours and during nonbusiness hours callers shall be able to
leave messages. The number shall be published in reasonably available printed
and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a number for
communication of information as set forth in this section.

(2) All licensed child
day-care centers and family day-care providers shall post in a place and manner
clearly visible to patrons and visitors the department's toll-free telephone
number. Parents or guardians must be given the department's toll-free
telephone number by employees or operators of the child day-care centers and
family day-care providers.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "communication of information" means callers may: (a)
Determine whether a day care is licensed; (b) determine whether a day care is
in good standing regarding licensing requirements; (c) determine the general
nature of enforcement against the providers; (d) obtain information on how to
report suspected or observed noncompliance with licensing requirements; (e)
obtain information on how to report alleged abuse or neglect in a day care; (f)
obtain information on how to report health, safety, and welfare concerns in a
day care; (g) receive follow-up assistance, including information on the office
of the family and children's ombudsman; and (h) receive referral information on
other agencies or entities that may be of further assistance to the caller.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

If a
family day-care provider does not have day care insurance as defined in RCW
48.88.020, the provider shall maintain a file of affidavits or declarations signed
by each parent with a child enrolled in family day care. The affidavit or
declaration shall state that the parent has been informed that the family
day-care provider does not carry day-care insurance and that the parent has
been informed that the day-care insurance, if any, of the owner of the property
or the homeowners' association, as appropriate, may not provide coverage for
losses arising out of, or in connection with, the operation of the family
day-care provider, except to the extent that the losses are caused by, or
result from, an action or omission by the owner of the property or the
homeowners' association, for which the owner of the property or the homeowners'
association would otherwise be liable under the law.

---
END ---