BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there is a diminishing supply of school nurses serving the health needs of
students in the state's school districts. The supply of nurses has not
increased in proportion to school enrollment. In addition, the increasingly
complex health needs of students can no longer be adequately met by the
delegation of nursing tasks to unlicensed and untrained school personnel, such
as teachers, teacher's assistants, and secretarial staff, without compromising the
health of students and exposing school districts to legal liability. The
delegation practices in public and private schools, grades K-12, of complex
nursing tasks are of questionable legality, and the opportunity for error has
life-threatening consequences. Removing health barriers to learning is
essential to the successful education of students and should be addressed in
the state's school districts by recognizing established nursing practice
standards and the state's uniform professional accountability processes. The
legislature declares that the training of registered school health aides is in
the interest of public health and safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the nursing care quality assurance commission
created in RCW 18.79.070.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3) "School health
aide" means a person registered under this chapter who performs health
care tasks under training and supervision of a registered nurse licensed under
RCW 18.79.040. Typical health care tasks would include oral medication
administration and clean intermittent catheterization.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(5)
"Superintendent" means the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) No certificated or
noncertificated school district employee may practice or represent himself or
herself as a school health aide by use of any title or description of services
without being registered to practice by the department, unless otherwise
exempted by this chapter.

(2) Nursing tasks
delegated to a school health aide include those nursing procedures applicable
to school districts provided by law, including RCW 28A.210.260 and 28A.210.280,
and those tasks determined by the superintendent by rule in consultation with
the commission.

(3) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to affect the scope of nursing procedures applicable
to school districts as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice by an
individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this state and
performing services within the authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice by an
individual employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the
performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States; or

(3) The practice by a
person who is a regular student in an educational program approved by the
secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of
instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision
of the instructor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In addition to any other
authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish all
registration and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and
procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Register any
applicants, and to deny registration to applicants who do not meet the minimum
qualifications, except that proceedings concerning the denial of registration
based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment shall be governed by the
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5) Hire clerical,
administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this
chapter; and

(6) Maintain the
official department record of all applicants and persons registered under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The secretary shall keep
an official record of all proceedings. A part of the record shall consist of a
register of all applicants for registration under this chapter and the results
of each application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The secretary shall issue
a registration to any applicant who completes an application that identifies
the name and address of the applicant, the registration being requested, and
information required by the secretary necessary to establish whether there are
grounds for denial of a registration or issuance of a conditional registration
under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Applications for
registration shall be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The
secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates
to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for
registration provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each
applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The
fee shall accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The secretary shall
establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a
registration. Failure to renew shall invalidate the registration and all
privileges granted by the registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The uniform disciplinary
act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of registrations,
unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons registered under this
chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.130.040 and 1999
c 335 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter
applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having
jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary
has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing
opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Naturopaths
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) Midwives licensed
under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv) Ocularists
licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v) Massage operators
and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi) Dental hygienists
licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii) Acupuncturists
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii) Radiologic
technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84
RCW;

(ix) Respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x) Persons registered
or certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered
as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing assistants
registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Health care
assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv) Dietitians and
nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv) Chemical
dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi) Sex offender
treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii) Persons licensed
and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii) Persons
registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under RCW
18.48.020;

(xix) Denturists
licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;

(xx) Orthotists and
prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; ((and))

(xxi) Surgical
technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW; and

(xxii) School health
aides registered under chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 1 through 10 of this act).

(b) The boards and
commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric
medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv) The board of
hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of
examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry
board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of osteopathic
medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The board of
pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The medical
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing
licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of
physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of
occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing
licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining
board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter
18.83 RCW; and

(xiv) The veterinary
board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3) In addition to the
authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the
authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria
established in this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of
this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license
conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW
18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4) All disciplining
authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent
application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the
disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---