BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that a balanced,

_5 multimodal transportation system is an essential element
of the

_6 state's infrastructure, and that effective rail
passenger service

_7 is an integral part of a balanced, multimodal
transportation

_8 system. The legislature further finds that the King
Street railroad

_9 station is the key hub for both Puget Sound's intermodal
passenger

10 transportation system and the state's rail passenger
system. The

11 legislature recognizes that the redevelopment of the
King Street

12 railroad station depot, along with necessary and related

13 properties, is critical to its continued functioning as
a

14 transportation hub and finds that innovative funding
arrangements

15 can materially assist in furthering the redevelopment at
reduced

16 public expense.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The department may
acquire, or contract to

p. 1 SSB
5224

_1 acquire, by purchase, lease, option to lease or
purchase,

_2 condemnation, gift, devise, bequest, grant, or exchange
of title,

_3 the King Street railroad station depot located in
Seattle, or any

_4 interests or rights in it, and other real property and

_5 improvements adjacent to, or used in association with,
the King

_6 Street railroad station depot. The property may
include, but not be

_7 limited to, the depot, platforms, parking areas,
pedestrian and

_8 vehicle access areas, and maintenance facilities. These
properties,

_9 in the aggregate, will be known as the King Street
railroad

10 station.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. During all periods
that the department

12 contracts to own or lease some, or all, of the King
Street

13 railroad station properties, the department may exercise
all the

14 powers and perform all the duties necessary, convenient,
or

15 incidental for planning, designing, constructing,
improving,

16 repairing, renovating, restoring, operating, and
maintaining the

17 King Street railroad station properties. These powers
also include

18 authority to lease or sell, assign, sublease, or
otherwise

19 transfer all, or portions of, the King Street railroad
station

20 properties for transportation or other public or private
purposes

21 and to contract with other public or private entities
for the

22 operation, administration, maintenance, or improvement
of the King

23 Street railroad station properties after the department
takes

24 possession of some, or all, of the properties, as the
secretary

25 deems appropriate. If the department transfers any of
its fee

26 ownership interests in the King Street railroad station

27 properties, proceeds from the transaction must be placed
in an

28 account that supports multimodal programs, but not into
an account

29 restricted by Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. To facilitate tax
exempt financing for the

31 acquisition and improvement of the King Street railroad
station,

32 the department may lease from or contract with public or
private

33 entities for the acquisition, lease, operation,
maintenance,

34 financing, renovation, restoration, or management of
some, or all,

35 of the King Street railroad station properties as a
multimodal

36 terminal that supports the state intercity passenger
rail

SSB 5224 p. 2

_1 service. The leases or contracts are not subject to
either chapter

_2 39.94 or 43.82 RCW. The leases and contracts will
expire no later

_3 than fifty years from the time they are executed, and at
that time

_4 the department will either receive title or have the
right to

_5 receive title to the financed property without
additional

_6 obligation to compensate the owner of those properties
for the

_7 acquisition of them. The secretary may take all actions
necessary,

_8 convenient, or incidental to the financing.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The department
may establish the King

10 Street railroad station facility account as an interest‑bearing

11 local account. Receipts from the sources listed in
subsection (2)

12 of this section must be deposited into the account.
Nothing in this

13 section is a pledge of funds deposited to the account
for

14 repayment of tax exempt financing related to the King
Street

15 railroad station. The department may invest funds from
the account

16 as permitted by law and may enter into contracts with
financial

17 advisors as deemed necessary for that purpose. Only the
secretary

18 or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures
from the

19 account.

20 (2) All funds appropriated to the King Street
railroad station

21 facility account by the legislature; all contributions,
payments,

22 grants, gifts, and donations to the account from other
public or

23 private entities; all receipts from departmental
transactions

24 involving capital facility sales, transfers, property
leases and

25 rents, incomes, and parking fees associated with the
King Street

26 railroad station; as well as all investment income associated
with

27 the account must be deposited into the King Street
railroad

28 station facility account for purposes specified in
subsection (3)

29 of this section.

30 (3) All funds deposited into the King Street
railroad station

31 facility account must be expended by the department
solely to pay

32 the following expenses:

33 (a) Costs for management of the account;

34 (b) Purchase and acquisition costs for King Street
railroad

35 station properties;

36 (c) Payments, including incidental expenses,
relating to the

p. 3 SSB
5224

_1 King Street railroad station depot as required by a
lease or

_2 contract under section 4 of this act;

_3 (d) Maintenance and operating costs for the King
Street

_4 railroad station properties; and

_5 (e) Capital improvement projects initiated by the
department

_6 associated with, and for the benefit of, the King Street
railroad

_7 station depot occurring after the date of the
department's

_8 beneficial occupancy of the renovated King Street
railroad station

_9 depot, and for capital improvement projects initiated at
any time

10 by the department for the benefit of King Street
railroad station

11 properties other than the depot including, but not
limited to,

12 improvements to associated platforms, parking areas,
temporary

13 buildings, maintenance facilities, pedestrian access,
and other

14 improvements essential to the operation of the station
as a

15 multimodal terminal.

16 (4) Nothing in this section is intended to restrict
the right

17 of the department from otherwise funding purchase,
acquisition,

18 capital improvement, maintenance, rental, operational,
and other

19 incidental costs relating to the King Street railroad
station from

20 appropriations and resources that are not designated for
deposit

21 in the King Street railroad station facility account.

22 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5
of this act are each

23 added to chapter 47.79 RCW.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Due to the
irrevocable expiration of

25 federal and Amtrak funds critical to the redevelopment
of the King

26 Street railroad station on or before June 30, 2001,
sections 1

27 through 6 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation

28 of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of
the state

29 government and its existing public institutions, and
take effect

30 immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5224 p. 4