BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.94.544 and 1991 c
202 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

A portion
of the funds made available for the purposes of this chapter shall be used to
fund the commute trip reduction task force in carrying out the responsibilities
of RCW 70.94.541, and the interagency technical assistance team, including the
activities authorized under RCW 70.94.541(2), and to assist counties, cities,
and towns implementing commute trip reduction plans. ((Funds shall be
provided to the counties in proportion to the number of major employers and
major worksites in each county. The counties shall provide funds to cities and
towns within the county which are implementing commute trip reduction plans in
proportion to the number of major employers and major worksites within the city
or town.))

--- END ---