BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.090 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
transportation, pursuant to rules adopted by the transportation commission with
respect to state highways, and local authorities, with respect to
public highways under their jurisdiction, may, upon application in
writing and good cause being shown therefor, issue a special permit in writing,
or electronically, authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle
or combination of vehicles of a size, weight of vehicle, or load exceeding the
maximum ((specified in this chapter or otherwise not in conformity with the
provisions of this chapter)) set forth in RCW 46.44.010, 46.44.020,
46.44.030, 46.44.034, and 46.44.041 upon any public highway under the
jurisdiction of the authority granting such permit and for the maintenance of
which such authority is responsible.

The department of
transportation may not require that an applicant for a special permit
authorized under RCW 46.44.130 or 46.44.140 exceed the requirements adopted by
rule for the movement of farm implements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 46.44.038 (Size and combinations
restrictions--Special permits to exceed authorized) and 1983 c 3 s 120 &
1967 ex.s. c 145 s 62 are each repealed.

---
END ---