BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.64.260 and 1983 c
15 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Any notice
required under this chapter shall be in writing, but service thereof is
sufficient if mailed by ((restricted)) certified mail, return receipt
requested, addressed to the last known address of the parties, or sent by
electronic facsimile transmission with transaction report verification and
same-day United States postal service mailing of copies or service as specified
in Title 316 WAC, unless otherwise provided in this chapter. Refusal of ((restricted))
certified mail by any party shall be considered service. Prescribed time
periods commence from the date of the receipt of the notice. Any party may at
any time execute and deliver an acceptance of service in lieu of mailed notice.

--- END ---