BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.33.140 and 1999
sp.s. c 4 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When land has been
designated as forest land pursuant to RCW 84.33.120(4) or 84.33.130, a notation
of such designation shall be made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls,
a copy of the notice of approval together with the legal description or
assessor's tax lot numbers for such land shall, at the expense of the
applicant, be filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded,
and such land shall be graded and valued pursuant to RCW 84.33.110 and
84.33.120 until removal of such designation by the assessor upon occurrence of
any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice from
the owner to remove such designation;

(b) Sale or transfer to
an ownership making such land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Sale or transfer of
all or a portion of such land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a
notice of forest land designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who
is an heir or devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in
removal of classification. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached
to the real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department of
revenue. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating taxes
calculated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall become due and
payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The county auditor shall
not accept an instrument of conveyance of designated forest land for filing or
recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or the
compensating tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax
stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner
may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (3) of this
section to the county board of equalization. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred
on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;

(d) Determination by
the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be
heard, that:

(i) Such land is no
longer primarily devoted to and used for growing and harvesting timber.
However, land shall not be removed from designation if a governmental agency,
organization, or other recipient identified in subsection (5) or (6) of this
section as exempt from the payment of compensating tax has manifested its
intent in writing or by other official action to acquire a property interest in
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an exemption
under subsection (5) or (6) of this section. The governmental agency,
organization, or recipient shall annually provide the assessor of the county in
which the land is located reasonable evidence in writing of the intent to
acquire the designated land as long as the intent continues or within sixty
days of a request by the assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence
more than once in a calendar year;

(ii) The owner has
failed to comply with a final administrative or judicial order with respect to
a violation of the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and
disease control and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable
regulations thereunder; or

(iii) Restocking has
not occurred to the extent or within the time specified in the application for
designation of such land.

Removal of designation upon
occurrence of any of (a) through (c) of this subsection shall apply only to the
land affected, and upon occurrence of (d) of this subsection shall apply only
to the actual area of land no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber, without regard to other land that may have been included
in the same application and approval for designation: PROVIDED, That any
remaining designated forest land meets necessary definitions of forest land
pursuant to RCW 84.33.100.

(2) Within thirty days
after such removal of designation of forest land, the assessor shall notify the
owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for such removal. The seller, transferor,
or owner may appeal such removal to the county board of equalization.

(3) Unless the removal
is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice of removal with notation of the
action, if any, upon appeal, together with the legal description or assessor's
tax lot numbers for the land removed from designation shall, at the expense of
the applicant, be filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are
recorded, and commencing on January 1 of the year following the year in which
the assessor mailed such notice, such land shall be assessed on the same basis
as real property is assessed generally in that county. Except as provided in
subsection (1)(c), (5), or (6) of this section, a compensating tax shall be
imposed which shall be due and payable to the county treasurer thirty days
after the owner is notified of the amount of the compensating tax. As soon as
possible, the assessor shall compute the amount of such compensating tax and
mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment is
due. The amount of such compensating tax shall be equal to the difference
between the amount of tax last levied on such land as forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed valuation of such land multiplied by the dollar rate
of the last levy extended against such land, multiplied by a number, in no
event greater than ten, equal to the number of years for which such land was
designated as forest land.

(4) Compensating tax,
together with applicable interest thereon, shall become a lien on such land
which shall attach at the time such land is removed from designation as forest
land and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and satisfied before
any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or
with which such land may become charged or liable. Such lien may be foreclosed
upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as
provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax unpaid on its due date shall
thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest
shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem
property taxes.

(5) The compensating
tax specified in subsection (3) of this section shall not be imposed if the
removal of designation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted
solely from:

(a) Transfer to a
government entity in exchange for other forest land located within the state of
Washington;

(b) A taking through
the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or transfer to an entity
having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such
power;

(c) A donation of fee
title, development rights, or the right to harvest timber, to a government
agency or organization qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to
a governmental entity or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined
in RCW 64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural heritage
council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70 RCW: PROVIDED,
That at such time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax specified in subsection (3) of this section shall be imposed
upon the current owner;

(d) The sale or
transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation commission for park and
recreation purposes;

(e) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
land is located that disallows the present use of such land;

(f) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; ((or))

(g) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040; or

(h) A removal, sale,
or transfer of designated land occurring within the two years immediately
following the date the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land
dies, if before January 1, 1993, the deceased owner's land was classified or
designated under this chapter or was classified under chapter 84.34 RCW and has
continuously remained so classified or designated until the date of removal,
sale, or transfer. The date of death shown on a death certificate is the date
used for the purposes of this exemption.

(6) In a county with a
population of more than one million inhabitants, the compensating tax specified
in subsection (3) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal of
classification as forest land pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
resulted solely from:

(a) An action described
in subsection (5) of this section; or

(b) A transfer of a
property interest to a government entity, or to a nonprofit historic
preservation corporation or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as
defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or enhance public resources, or to
preserve, maintain, improve, restore, limit the future use of, or otherwise to
conserve for public use or enjoyment, the property interest being transferred.
At such time as the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated,
the compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.33.120 and 1999
sp.s. c 4 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In preparing the
assessment rolls as of January 1, 1982, for taxes payable in 1983 and each
January 1st thereafter, the assessor shall list each parcel of forest land at a
value with respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and
adjusted as provided in subsection (2) of this section and shall compute the
assessed value of the land by using the same assessment ratio he or she applies
generally in computing the assessed value of other property in his or her
county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be as follows.

LAND OPERABILITY VALUES

GRADE CLASS PER ACRE

1 $141

1 2 136

3 131

4 95

1 118

2 2 114

3 110

4 80

1 93

3 2 90

3 87

4 66

1 70

4 2 68

3 66

4 52

1 51

5 2 48

3 46

4 31

1 26

6 2 25

3 25

4 23

1 12

7 2 12

3 11

4 11

8 1

(2) On or before
December 31, 1981, the department shall adjust, by rule under chapter 34.05
RCW, the forest land values contained in subsection (1) of this section in
accordance with this subsection, and shall certify these adjusted values to the
county assessor for his or her use in preparing the assessment rolls as of
January 1, 1982. For the adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 1981,
for use in the 1982 assessment year, the department shall:

(a) Divide the
aggregate value of all timber harvested within the state between July 1, 1976,
and June 30, 1981, by the aggregate harvest volume for the same period, as
determined from the harvester excise tax returns filed with the department
under RCW 82.04.291 and 84.33.071; and

(b) Divide the
aggregate value of all timber harvested within the state between July 1, 1975,
and June 30, 1980, by the aggregate harvest volume for the same period, as
determined from the harvester excise tax returns filed with the department
under RCW 82.04.291 and 84.33.071; and

(c) Adjust the forest
land values contained in subsection (1) of this section by a percentage equal
to one-half of the percentage change in the average values of harvested timber
reflected by comparing the resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of
this subsection.

For the adjustments to
be made on or before December 31, 1982, and each succeeding year thereafter,
the same procedure shall be followed as described in this subsection utilizing
harvester excise tax returns filed under RCW 82.04.291 and this chapter except
that this adjustment shall be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the
five-year periods for calculating average harvested timber values shall be
successively one year more recent.

(3) In preparing the
assessment roll for 1972 and each year thereafter, the assessor shall enter as
the true and fair value of each parcel of forest land the appropriate grade
value certified to him or her by the department of revenue, and he or she shall
compute the assessed value of such land by using the same assessment ratio he
or she applies generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
his or her county. In preparing the assessment roll for 1975 and each year
thereafter, the assessor shall assess and value as classified forest land all
forest land that is not then designated pursuant to RCW 84.33.120(4) or
84.33.130 and shall make a notation of such classification upon the assessment
and tax rolls. On or before January 15 of the first year in which such
notation is made, the assessor shall mail notice by certified mail to the owner
that such land has been classified as forest land and is subject to the
compensating tax imposed by this section. If the owner desires not to have
such land assessed and valued as classified forest land, he or she shall give
the assessor written notice thereof on or before March 31 of such year and the
assessor shall remove from the assessment and tax rolls the classification
notation entered pursuant to this subsection, and shall thereafter assess and
value such land in the manner provided by law other than this chapter 84.33
RCW.

(4) In any year
commencing with 1972, an owner of land which is assessed and valued by the
assessor other than pursuant to the procedures set forth in RCW 84.33.110 and
this section, and which has, in the immediately preceding year, been assessed
and valued by the assessor as forest land, may appeal to the county board of
equalization by filing an application with the board in the manner prescribed
in subsection (2) of RCW 84.33.130. The county board shall afford the
applicant an opportunity to be heard if the application so requests and shall act
upon the application in the manner prescribed in subsection (3) of RCW
84.33.130.

(5) Land that has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land as of any year commencing with
1975 assessment year or earlier shall continue to be so assessed and valued
until removal of classification by the assessor only upon the occurrence of one
of the following events:

(a) Receipt of notice
from the owner to remove such land from classification as forest land;

(b) Sale or transfer to
an ownership making such land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Determination by
the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be
heard, that, because of actions taken by the owner, such land is no longer
primarily devoted to and used for growing and harvesting timber. However, land
shall not be removed from classification if a governmental agency,
organization, or other recipient identified in subsection (9) or (10) of this
section as exempt from the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent
in writing or by other official action to acquire a property interest in
classified forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (9) or (10) of this section. The governmental
agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide the assessor of the
county in which the land is located reasonable evidence in writing of the
intent to acquire the classified land as long as the intent continues or within
sixty days of a request by the assessor. The assessor may not request this
evidence more than once in a calendar year;

(d) Determination that
a higher and better use exists for such land than growing and harvesting timber
after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be heard;

(e) Sale or transfer of
all or a portion of such land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a
notice of forest land classification continuance, except transfer to an owner
who is an heir or devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in
removal of classification. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached
to the real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department of
revenue. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating taxes
calculated pursuant to subsection (7) of this section shall become due and
payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The county auditor shall
not accept an instrument of conveyance of classified forest land for filing or
recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or the
compensating tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax
stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner
may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (7) of this
section to the county board of equalization. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred
on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals.

The assessor shall
remove classification pursuant to (c) or (d) of this subsection prior to
September 30 of the year prior to the assessment year for which termination of
classification is to be effective. Removal of classification as forest land
upon occurrence of (a), (b), (d), or (e) of this subsection shall apply only to
the land affected, and upon occurrence of (c) of this subsection shall apply
only to the actual area of land no longer primarily devoted to and used for
growing and harvesting timber: PROVIDED, That any remaining classified forest
land meets necessary definitions of forest land pursuant to RCW 84.33.100.

(6) Within thirty days
after such removal of classification as forest land, the assessor shall notify
the owner in writing setting forth the reasons for such removal. The owner of
such land shall thereupon have the right to apply for designation of such land
as forest land pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or RCW 84.33.130.
The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal such removal to the county board of
equalization.

(7) Unless the owner
successfully applies for designation of such land or unless the removal is
reversed on appeal, notation of removal from classification shall immediately
be made upon the assessment and tax rolls, and commencing on January 1 of the
year following the year in which the assessor made such notation, such land
shall be assessed on the same basis as real property is assessed generally in
that county. Except as provided in subsection (5)(e), (9), or (10) of this
section and unless the assessor shall not have mailed notice of classification
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, a compensating tax shall be imposed
which shall be due and payable to the county treasurer thirty days after the
owner is notified of the amount of the compensating tax. As soon as possible,
the assessor shall compute the amount of such compensating tax and mail notice
to the owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment is due. The
amount of such compensating tax shall be equal to the difference, if any,
between the amount of tax last levied on such land as forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed valuation of such land multiplied by the dollar rate
of the last levy extended against such land, multiplied by a number, in no
event greater than ten, equal to the number of years, commencing with
assessment year 1975, for which such land was assessed and valued as forest
land.

(8) Compensating tax,
together with applicable interest thereon, shall become a lien on such land
which shall attach at the time such land is removed from classification as
forest land and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and satisfied
before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility
to or with which such land may become charged or liable. Such lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same
manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax unpaid on its due
date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until
paid, interest shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent
ad valorem property taxes.

(9) The compensating
tax specified in subsection (7) of this section shall not be imposed if the
removal of classification as forest land pursuant to subsection (5) of this
section resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a
government entity in exchange for other forest land located within the state of
Washington;

(b) A taking through
the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or transfer to an entity
having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such
power;

(c) A donation of fee
title, development rights, or the right to harvest timber, to a government
agency or organization qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to
a governmental entity or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined
in RCW 64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural heritage
council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70 RCW: PROVIDED,
That at such time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax specified in subsection (7) of this section shall be imposed
upon the current owner;

(d) The sale or
transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation commission for park and
recreation purposes;

(e) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
land is located that disallows the present use of such land;

(f) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; ((or))

(g) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040; or

(h) A removal, sale,
or transfer of designated land occurring within the two years immediately
following the date the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land
dies, if before January 1, 1993, the deceased owner's land was classified or
designated under this chapter or was classified under chapter 84.34 RCW and has
continuously remained so classified or designated until the date of removal,
sale, or transfer. The date of death shown on a death certificate is the date
used for the purposes of this exemption.

(10) In a county with a
population of more than one million inhabitants, the compensating tax specified
in subsection (7) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal of
classification as forest land pursuant to subsection (5) of this section
resulted solely from:

(a) An action described
in subsection (9) of this section; or

(b) A transfer of a
property interest to a government entity, or to a nonprofit historic
preservation corporation or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as
defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or enhance public resources, or to
preserve, maintain, improve, restore, limit the future use of, or otherwise to
conserve for public use or enjoyment, the property interest being transferred.
At such time as the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated,
the compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

(11) With respect to
any land that has been designated prior to May 6, 1974, pursuant to RCW
84.33.120(4) or 84.33.130, the assessor may, prior to January 1, 1975, on his
or her own motion or pursuant to petition by the owner, change, without
imposition of the compensating tax provided under RCW 84.33.140, the status of
such designated land to classified forest land.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.34.108 and 1999
sp.s. c 4 s 706 and 1999 c 233 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) When land has once
been classified under this chapter, a notation of such classification shall be
made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls and such land shall be valued
pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of
such classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice
from the owner to remove all or a portion of such classification;

(b) Sale or transfer to
an ownership, except a transfer that resulted from a default in loan payments
made to or secured by a governmental agency that intends to or is required by
law or regulation to resell the property for the same use as before, making all
or a portion of such land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Sale or transfer of
all or a portion of such land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a
notice of classification continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an
heir or devisee of a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the
department of revenue. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new
owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all additional
taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The county auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance of classified land for filing or
recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or the
additional tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp
affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may
appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this
section to the county board of equalization. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred
on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;

(d) Determination by
the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be
heard, that all or a portion of such land no longer meets the criteria for
classification under this chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to
this chapter continue to apply after classification has been granted.

The granting authority,
upon request of an assessor, shall provide reasonable assistance to the
assessor in making a determination whether such land continues to meet the
qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3). The assistance shall be provided
within thirty days of receipt of the request.

(2) Land may not be
removed from classification because of:

(a) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; or

(b) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040.

(3) Within thirty days
after such removal of all or a portion of such land from current use
classification, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth
the reasons for such removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal such
removal to the county board of equalization.

(4) Unless the removal
is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall revalue the affected land with
reference to full market value on the date of removal from classification.
Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification
shall be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the year
to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in subsection (6)
of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty shall be
imposed which shall be due and payable to the county treasurer thirty days
after the owner is notified of the amount of the additional tax. As soon as
possible, the assessor shall compute the amount of such an additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty and the treasurer shall mail notice to the
owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment is due. The amount
of such additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as
follows:

(a) The amount of
additional tax shall be equal to the difference between the property tax paid
as "open space land", "farm and agricultural land", or
"timber land" and the amount of property tax otherwise due and
payable for the seven years last past had the land not been so classified;

(b) The amount of
applicable interest shall be equal to the interest upon the amounts of such
additional tax paid at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent property
taxes from the dates on which such additional tax could have been paid without
penalty if the land had been assessed at a value without regard to this
chapter;

(c) The amount of the
penalty shall be as provided in RCW 84.34.080. The penalty shall not be
imposed if the removal satisfies the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.

(5) Additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty, shall become a lien on such land which shall
attach at the time such land is removed from classification under this chapter
and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any
recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with
which such land may become charged or liable. Such lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided
by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided
in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter amended. Any additional tax unpaid on its
due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until
paid, interest shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent
ad valorem property taxes.

(6) The additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty specified in subsection (4) of this section
shall not be imposed if the removal of classification pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a
government entity in exchange for other land located within the state of
Washington;

(b)(i) A taking through
the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an
entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of
such power, said entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other
official action;

(c) A natural disaster
such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity rather than by
virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of such property;

(d) Official action by
an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the
land is located which disallows the present use of such land;

(e) Transfer of land to
a church when such land would qualify for exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;

(f) Acquisition of
property interests by state agencies or agencies or organizations qualified
under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections: PROVIDED, That at such time as these property interests are not used
for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 the additional tax
specified in subsection (4) of this section shall be imposed;

(g) Removal of land
classified as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2)(d);

(h) Removal of land
from classification after enactment of a statutory exemption that qualifies the
land for exemption and receipt of notice from the owner to remove the land from
classification;

(i) The creation, sale,
or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; ((or))

(j) The creation, sale,
or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open
space program under RCW 76.09.040; or

(k) A
removal, sale, or transfer of designated land occurring within the two years
immediately following the date the owner of at least a fifty percent interest
in the land dies, if before January 1, 1993, the deceased owner's land was
classified or designated under chapter 84.33 RCW or was classified under this
chapter and has continuously remained so classified or designated until the
date of removal, sale, or transfer. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this exemption.

---
END ---