BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.60.010 and 1961 c
14 s 81.60.010 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((governor))
criminal justice training commission shall have the power to and may in
((his)) its discretion appoint and commission ((special)) railroad
police officers at the request of any railroad corporation and may revoke any
((such)) appointment at ((his)) its pleasure.

Sec. 2. RCW 81.60.020 and 1961 c
14 s 81.60.020 are each amended to read as follows:

Any railroad
corporation desiring the appointment of any of its officers, agents, or
servants not exceeding twenty-five in number for any one division of any
railroad operating in this state (((division as herein intended, shall mean
the part of any railroad or railroads under the jurisdiction of any one
division superintendent),)) as ((special)) railroad police
officers shall file a request with the ((governor)) criminal
justice training commission on an approved application ((stating
the name, age and place of residence of the person whose appointment it
desires, the position he occupies with the railroad corporation, the nature of
his duties and the reasons why his appointment is desired, which)) form.
The application shall be signed by the president or some managing officer
of the railroad corporation and shall be accompanied by an affidavit ((of
such officer to the effect)) stating that ((he)) the
officer is acquainted with the person whose appointment is sought, that ((he))
the officer believes ((him)) the person to be of good
moral character, and that ((he)) the person is of such character
and experience that he or she can be safely entrusted with the powers of
a police officer.

For the purposes of
this section, "division" means the part of any railroad or railroads
under the jurisdiction of any one division superintendent.

Sec. 3. RCW 81.60.030 and 1961 c
14 s 81.60.030 are each amended to read as follows:

Before receiving ((his))
a commission each person appointed under the provisions of RCW 81.60.010
through 81.60.060 shall successfully complete a course of training
prescribed or approved by the criminal justice training commission, and shall
take, subscribe, and file with the ((governor)) commission
an oath to support the Constitution of the United States((,)) and
the Constitution and laws of the state of Washington, and to faithfully
perform the duties of ((his)) the office. The corporation
requesting appointment of a railroad police officer shall bear the full cost of
training.

Railroad police
officers appointed and commissioned under RCW 81.60.010 through 81.60.060 are
subject to rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

Sec. 4. RCW 81.60.040 and 1961 c
14 s 81.60.040 are each amended to read as follows:

Every police officer
appointed and commissioned under the provisions of RCW 81.60.010 through
81.60.060 shall when on duty have the power and authority conferred by law on
peace officers, but shall exercise such power only in the protection of the
property belonging to or under the control of the corporation at whose instance
((he)) the officer is appointed and in preventing, and making
arrest for, violations of law upon or in connection with such property.

Sec. 5. RCW 81.60.050 and 1961 c
14 s 81.60.050 are each amended to read as follows:

Every ((such special))
railroad police officer shall, when on duty, wear in plain view a ((metal
shield)) badge bearing the words "((special)) railroad
police" and the name of the corporation by which ((he)) the
officer is employed, or carry, and present upon request, official
credentials identifying the railroad police officer and corporation.

Sec. 6. RCW 81.60.060 and 1961 c
14 s 81.60.060 are each amended to read as follows:

The
corporation procuring the appointment of any ((special)) railroad
police shall be solely responsible for the compensation for ((his)) the
officer's services and shall be liable civilly for any unlawful act of ((such))
the officer resulting in damage to any person or corporation.

---
END ---