BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.15.--- and 2001 c
1 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 713) are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout RCW 77.15.--- through 77.15.--- (sections 3 through 5,
chapter 1, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 713)).

(1) "Animal"
means any nonhuman vertebrate.

(2) "Body-gripping
trap" means a trap that grips an animal's body or body part.
Body-gripping trap includes, but is not limited to, steel-jawed leghold traps,
padded-jaw leghold traps, Conibear traps, neck snares, and nonstrangling foot
snares. Cage and box traps, suitcase-type live beaver traps, and common rat
and mouse traps are not considered body-gripping traps. Body-gripping trap
does not mean a trap typically used to catch moles.

(3) "Person"
means a human being and, where appropriate, a public or private corporation, an
unincorporated association, a partnership, a government, or a governmental
instrumentality.

(4) "Raw fur"
means a pelt that has not been processed for purposes of retail sale.

(5) "Animal
problem" means any animal that threatens or damages timber or private
property or threatens or injures livestock or any other domestic animal.

--- END ---