BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.95K RCW to read as follows:

Generators of cultures
and stocks shall treat those cultures and stocks before final disposal in
either of the following ways: (1) The generators may treat the cultures and
stocks before transport from the facility; or (2) segregate the cultures and
stocks from other biomedical waste and transport them to a treatment facility.
Cultures and stocks shall not be subject to any process that creates the
potential for the generation or release of airborne pathogens from the waste
before treatment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2002.

---
END ---