BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that the mounting cost of health care, and in turn, health
insurance, has become a burden on public employees, as they must share in the
increased cost of their health insurance premiums. Expanding the
classifications of individuals to whom the public employees' benefits board
insurance benefits are available is likely to increase the cost of these
benefits even further for all state employees. Without the approval of the
legislature, the public employees' benefits board has extended eligibility by
authorizing benefits for same sex domestic partners of state employees. In
order to limit the escalation of health care costs, and to prevent the further
expansion of benefit eligibility, the legislature intends by this act to reverse
the board's action. It is the intent of the legislature that eligibility for
these benefits be limited to lawful spouses and dependent children of state
employees.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.011 and 2000 c
230 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2) "State
purchased health care" or "health care" means medical and health
care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with state and federal
funds by the department of social and health services, the department of
health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority, the department
of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the department of
veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Insuring
entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5) "Flexible
benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to choose the
level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee contributions
from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the
authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the
authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option of each
such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for
the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such
employee organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract
with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7) "Board"
means the public employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.055.

(8) "Retired or
disabled school employee" means:

(a) Persons who
separated from employment with a school district or educational service
district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40
RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation receive a
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

(c) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.

(9) "Benefits
contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan, a medical
flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and public
employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow the
employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10) "Salary"
means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12) "Plan
year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13) "Separated
employees" means persons who separate from employment with an employer as
defined in:

(a) RCW 41.32.010(11)
on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or
after September 1, 2000;

and who are at least age
fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the teachers'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40) or the Washington
school employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(14) "Eligible
dependents" means the following:

(a) Lawful spouse of
the employee in a marriage that conforms with chapter 26.04 RCW; or

(b) Dependent
children as defined by the board.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.05.011 and 2000 c
247 s 604 and 2000 c 230 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2) "State purchased
health care" or "health care" means medical and health care,
pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with state and federal funds
by the department of social and health services, the department of health, the
basic health plan, the state health care authority, the department of labor and
industries, the department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs,
and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Insuring
entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5) "Flexible
benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to choose the
level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee contributions
from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the
authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the
authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option of each
such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for
the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such
employee organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract
with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7) "Board"
means the public employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.055.

(8) "Retired or
disabled school employee" means:

(a) Persons who
separated from employment with a school district or educational service
district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40
RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b) Persons who separate
from employment with a school district or educational service district on or
after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation receive a retirement
allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

(c) Persons who
separate from employment with a school district or educational service district
due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to receive a deferred
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.

(9) "Benefits
contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan, a medical
flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and public
employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow the
employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10) "Salary"
means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12) "Plan
year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13) "Separated
employees" means persons who separate from employment with an employer as
defined in:

(a) RCW 41.32.010(11)
on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or
after September 1, 2000; or

(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or
after March 1, 2002;

and who are at least age
fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the teachers'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40), the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

(14) "Eligible
dependents" means the following:

(a) Lawful spouse of
the employee in a marriage that conforms with chapter 26.04 RCW; or

(b) Dependent
children as defined by the board.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.05.065 and 1996 c
140 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
study all matters connected with the provision of health care coverage, life
insurance, liability insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance,
and disability income insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated
types of insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis
possible with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.

(2) The board shall
develop employee benefit plans that include comprehensive health care benefits
for all employees. In developing these plans, the board shall consider the
following elements:

(a) Methods of
maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to quality health care;

(b) Development of
provider arrangements that encourage cost containment and ensure access to quality
care, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective
payment methods;

(c) Wellness incentives
that focus on proven strategies, such as smoking cessation, injury and accident
prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight reduction,
exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and
nutrition education;

(d) Utilization review
procedures including, but not limited to a cost-efficient method for prior
authorization of services, hospital inpatient length of stay review,
requirements for use of outpatient surgeries and second opinions for surgeries,
review of invoices or claims submitted by service providers, and performance
audit of providers;

(e) Effective
coordination of benefits;

(f) Minimum standards
for insuring entities; and

(g) Minimum scope and
content of public employee benefit plans to be offered to enrollees
participating in the employee health benefit plans. To maintain the
comprehensive nature of employee health care benefits, employee eligibility
criteria related to the number of hours worked and the benefits provided to
employees shall be substantially equivalent to the state employees' health
benefits plan and eligibility criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing
in this subsection (2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee
point-of-service payments or employee premium payments for benefits.

(3) The board shall
design benefits and determine the terms and conditions of employee
participation and coverage, including establishment of eligibility criteria for
employees and their eligible dependents as defined in RCW 41.05.011.

(4) The board may
authorize premium contributions for an employee and the employee's dependents
in a manner that encourages the use of cost-efficient managed health care
systems.

(5) Employees shall
choose participation in one of the health care benefit plans developed by the
board and may be permitted to waive coverage under terms and conditions
established by the board.

(6) The board shall
review plans proposed by insuring entities that desire to offer property
insurance and/or accident and casualty insurance to state employees through
payroll deduction. The board may approve any such plan for payroll deduction
by insuring entities holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of
Washington and which the board determines to be in the best interests of
employees and the state. The board shall promulgate rules setting forth
criteria by which it shall evaluate the plans.

(7) Before January 1,
1998, the public employees' benefits board shall make available one or more
fully insured long-term care insurance plans that comply with the requirements
of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such programs shall be made available to eligible
employees, retired employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible
dependents which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or retiree.
Employees of local governments and employees of political subdivisions not
otherwise enrolled in the public employees' benefits board sponsored medical
programs may enroll under terms and conditions established by the
administrator, if it does not jeopardize the financial viability of the public
employees' benefits board's long-term care offering.

(a) Participation of
eligible employees or retired employees and retired school employees in any
long-term care insurance plan made available by the public employees' benefits
board is voluntary and shall not be subject to binding arbitration under
chapter 41.56 RCW. Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting
guidelines and eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits
board and the health care authority.

(b) The employee,
retired employee, and retired school employee are solely responsible for the
payment of the premium rates developed by the health care authority. The
health care authority is authorized to charge a reasonable administrative fee
in addition to the premium charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall
include the health care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and
consumer education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.

(c) To the extent
administratively possible, the state shall establish an automatic payroll or
pension deduction system for the payment of the long-term care insurance
premiums.

(d) The public
employees' benefits board and the health care authority shall establish a
technical advisory committee to provide advice in the development of the
benefit design and establishment of underwriting guidelines and eligibility
rules. The committee shall also advise the board and authority on effective
and cost-effective ways to market and distribute the long-term care product.
The technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers of
long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in long-term
care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school employees, and
other interested parties determined to be appropriate by the board.

(e) The health care
authority shall offer employees, retired employees, and retired school
employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed
agents or brokers appointed by the long-term care insurer. The authority, in
consultation with the public employees' benefits board, shall establish
marketing procedures and may consider all premium components as a part of the
contract negotiations with the long-term care insurer.

(f) In developing the
long-term care insurance benefit designs, the public employees' benefits board
shall include an alternative plan of care benefit, including adult day
services, as approved by the office of the insurance commissioner.

(g) The health care
authority, with the cooperation of the office of the insurance commissioner,
shall develop a consumer education program for the eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees designed to provide education on the
potential need for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the products
offered by the board.

(h) By December 1998,
the health care authority, in consultation with the public employees' benefits
board, shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
including an analysis of the marketing and distribution of the long-term care
insurance provided under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Section 2 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 3 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

---
END ---