BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the protection

_5 of children and the prevention of sexual exploitation
constitutes

_6 an important state objective. It is the intent of the
legislature

_7 that libraries prevent the sexual exploitation of any
person and

_8 protect children from on-line material that is patently
offensive

_9 with respect to what is suitable for minors and
pornographic.

10 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 27.12

11 RCW to read as follows:

12 (1) Libraries organized under this chapter must:

13 (a) Have in place a policy of internet safety that
includes the

14 operation of a technology protection measure with respect
to any

15 of its publicly available computers with internet access
that

16 protects against access through such computers to visual

17 depictions that are (i) obscene under chapter 9.68 RCW; or
(ii)

p. 1 SB
5233

_1 sexual exploitation of children under chapter 9.68A RCW;
and

_2 (b) Enforce the operation of the technology
protection measure

_3 during any use of the computers.

_4 (2) As used in this section:

_5 (a) "Technology protection measure" means
a specific software

_6 or service, that is installed and operated to eliminate
or reduce

_7 the ability of the computer to access internet sites
displaying

_8 pornographic pictures or any other obscene material as
defined by

_9 law.

10 (b) "Policy of internet safety" means a
condition of use policy

11 or an acceptable use policy that includes restrictions
on images

12 accessed via the internet that are obscene, child
pornography, or

13 harmful to minors.

14 (3) An administrator, supervisor, or person
authorized by the

15 library may disable the technology protection measure
concerned to

16 enable access for bona fide research or other lawful
purposes.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5233 p. 2