BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 51.52

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 In order to provide additional medical evidence to
supplement

_8 the worker's record in preparation for an appeal of an
action of

_9 the department to the board, a worker may seek a
supplementary

10 medical exam and opinion. If a worker intends to seek an
opinion,

11 the worker must file with the department and with the board
within

12 sixty days from the day on which a copy of the order,
decision, or

13 award was communicated to the worker, a notice that the
worker

14 will be seeking a supplementary opinion. The filing of
this notice

15 entitles the worker to an additional sixty days in which to
file a

16 notice of appeal, and must contain a submission of the
names of

17 two licensed physicians. The department must select one of
the two

18 physicians to perform the exam and issue the medical
opinion. If

p. 1 SB
5234

_1 the department has not indicated to the worker the
department's

_2 selection of physician within twenty days of receiving
the

_3 submission, the worker may seek a medical exam and
opinion from

_4 either of the two physicians. The worker must submit a
complete

_5 copy of the medical opinion together with his or her
notice of

_6 appeal to the department and to the board within the
time for

_7 appeals specified in RCW 51.52.060, and the opinion must
be made

_8 part of the worker's record on appeal. The cost of the
supplemental

_9 medical exam will be paid by the department.

10 Sec. 2. RCW 51.52.050
and 1987 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read

11 as follows:

12 Whenever the department has made any order, decision,
or award,

13 it shall promptly serve the worker, beneficiary, employer,
or

14 other person affected thereby, with a copy thereof by mail,
which

15 shall be addressed to such person at his or her last known
address

16 as shown by the records of the department. The copy, in
case the

17 same is a final order, decision, or award, shall bear on
the same

18 side of the same page on which is found the amount of the
award, a

19 statement, set in black faced type of at least ten point
body or

20 size, that such final order, decision, or award shall
become final

21 within sixty days from the date the order is communicated
to the

22 parties unless a written request for reconsideration is
filed with

23 the department of labor and industries, Olympia, or an
appeal is

24 filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals,
Olympia((:

25 PROVIDED, That)). In addition, the order must
include a statement

26 informing the worker of his or her rights under section
1 of this

27 act. A department order or decision making demand,
whether with or

28 without penalty, for repayment of sums paid to a provider
of

29 medical, dental, vocational, or other health services
rendered to

30 an industrially injured worker, shall state that such order
or

31 decision shall become final within twenty days from the
date the

32 order or decision is communicated to the parties unless a
written

33 request for reconsideration is filed with the department of
labor

34 and industries, Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the
board of

35 industrial insurance appeals, Olympia.

36 Whenever the department has taken any action or made
any

37 decision relating to any phase of the administration of
this title

SB 5234 p. 2

_1 the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person
aggrieved

_2 thereby may request reconsideration of the department,
or may

_3 appeal to the board. In an appeal before the board, the
appellant

_4 shall have the burden of proceeding with the evidence to
establish

_5 a prima facie case for the relief sought in such appeal:
PROVIDED,

_6 That in an appeal from an order of the department that
alleges

_7 fraud, the department or self-insured employer shall
initially

_8 introduce all evidence in its case in chief. Any such
person

_9 aggrieved by the decision and order of the board may
thereafter

10 appeal to the superior court, as prescribed in this
chapter.

11 Sec. 3. RCW 51.52.060
and 1995 c 253 s 1 and 1995 c 199 s 7 are

12 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

13 (1)(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in
this

14 section, a worker, beneficiary, employer, health services

15 provider, or other person aggrieved by an order, decision,
or

16 award of the department must, before he or she appeals to
the

17 courts, file with the board and the director, by mail or

18 personally, within sixty days from the day on which a copy
of the

19 order, decision, or award was communicated to such person,
a

20 notice of appeal to the board. However, a worker who
files a notice

21 with the department and the board indicating that he or
she

22 intends to seek a supplementary medical opinion has one
hundred

23 twenty days from the day on which a copy of the order,
decision,

24 or award was communicated to the worker to file a notice
of appeal

25 to the board. Upon filing the notice of appeal, the
worker must

26 submit a complete copy of the supplemental medical
opinion. If the

27 worker does not include the supplemental medical opinion
with the

28 appeal, and more than one hundred twenty days have
passed since

29 the order, decision, or award was communicated to the
worker, the

30 appeal will be dismissed. A health services
provider or other

31 person aggrieved by a department order or decision making
demand,

32 whether with or without penalty, solely for repayment of
sums paid

33 to a provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other
health

34 services rendered to an industrially injured worker must,
before

35 he or she appeals to the courts, file with the board and
the

36 director, by mail or personally, within twenty days from
the day

p. 3 SB
5234

_1 on which a copy of the order or decision was
communicated to the

_2 health services provider upon whom the department order
or

_3 decision was served, a notice of appeal to the board.

_4 (b) Failure to file a notice of appeal with both the
board and

_5 the department shall not be grounds for denying the
appeal if the

_6 notice of appeal is filed with either the board or the
department.

_7 (2) Within ten days of the date on which an appeal
has been

_8 granted by the board, the board shall notify the other
interested

_9 parties to the appeal of the receipt of the appeal and
shall

10 forward a copy of the notice of appeal to the other
interested

11 parties. Within twenty days of the receipt of such
notice of the

12 board, the worker or the employer may file with the
board a cross-

13 appeal from the order of the department from which the
original

14 appeal was taken.

15 (3) If within the time limited for filing a notice
of appeal to

16 the board from an order, decision, or award of the
department, the

17 department directs the submission of further evidence or
the

18 investigation of any further fact, the time for filing
the notice

19 of appeal shall not commence to run until the person has
been

20 advised in writing of the final decision of the
department in the

21 matter. In the event the department directs the
submission of

22 further evidence or the investigation of any further
fact, as

23 provided in this section, the department shall render a
final

24 order, decision, or award within ninety days from the
date further

25 submission of evidence or investigation of further fact
is ordered

26 which time period may be extended by the department for
good cause

27 stated in writing to all interested parties for an
additional

28 ninety days.

29 (4) The department, either within the time limited
for appeal,

30 or within thirty days after receiving a notice of
appeal, may:

31 (a) Modify, reverse, or change any order, decision,
or award;

32 or

33 (b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this
subsection, hold

34 an order, decision, or award in abeyance for a period of
ninety

35 days which time period may be extended by the department
for good

36 cause stated in writing to all interested parties for an

37 additional ninety days pending further investigation in
light of

38 the allegations of the notice of appeal; or

SB 5234 p. 4

_1 (ii) Hold an order, decision, or award issued under
RCW

_2 51.32.160 in abeyance for a period not to exceed ninety
days from

_3 the date of receipt of an application under RCW
51.32.160. The

_4 department may extend the ninety-day time period for an
additional

_5 sixty days for good cause.

_6 For purposes of this subsection, good cause includes
delay that

_7 results from conduct of the claimant that is subject to
sanction

_8 under RCW 51.32.110.

_9 The board shall deny the appeal upon the issuance of
an order

10 under (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection holding an
earlier order,

11 decision, or award in abeyance, without prejudice to the

12 appellant's right to appeal from any subsequent
determinative

13 order issued by the department.

14 This subsection (4)(b) does not apply to
applications deemed

15 granted under RCW 51.32.160.

16 (5) An employer shall have the right to appeal an
application

17 deemed granted under RCW 51.32.160 on the same basis as
any other

18 application adjudicated pursuant to that section.

19 (6) A provision of this section shall not be deemed
to change,

20 alter, or modify the practice or procedure of the
department for

21 the payment of awards pending appeal.

22 Sec. 4. RCW 51.52.070
and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 77 are each amended

23 to read as follows:

24 The notice of appeal to the board shall set forth in
full

25 detail the grounds upon which the person appealing
considers such

26 order, decision, or award is unjust or unlawful, and shall
include

27 every issue to be considered by the board, and it must
contain a

28 detailed statement of facts upon which such worker,
beneficiary,

29 employer, or other person relies in support thereof. If
a worker

30 has filed a notice indicating his or her intent to seek
a

31 supplementary medical opinion, the complete opinion must
be

32 included with the notice of appeal filed with the
department and

33 with the board. The worker, beneficiary, employer,
or other

34 person shall be deemed to have waived all objections or

35 irregularities concerning the matter on which such appeal
is taken

36 other than those specifically set forth in such notice of
appeal

37 or appearing in the records of the department. The department
shall

p. 5 SB
5234

_1 promptly transmit its original record, or a legible copy
thereof

_2 produced by mechanical, photographic, or electronic
means, in such

_3 matter to the board.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5234 p. 6