BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to increase the likelihood that pregnant women will obtain adequate prenatal
care and will provide their newborns with adequate health care during the first
few days of their lives. The legislature recognizes that prenatal and postdelivery
health care for newborns and their mothers is especially critical to their
survival and well-being. The legislature intends that reasonable steps should
be taken to remove any barriers to such care, particularly for those parents
who may otherwise encounter emotional and/or psychological barriers to
obtaining such care by reducing impediments to obtaining prenatal and
postdelivery care to newborns while encouraging pregnant women to act
responsibly regarding the health of their newborns. The legislature does not
intend to encourage the abandonment of newborn children nor to change existing
law relating to notification to parents under chapter 13.34 RCW, but rather to
assure that abandonment does not occur and that all newborns have an opportunity
for adequate health care and a stable home life.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
this section:

(a) "Appropriate
location" means the emergency department of a hospital licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW during the hours the hospital is in operation.

(b) "Newborn"
means a live human being who is less than seventy-two hours old.

(c) "Qualified
person" means any person that the parent transferring the newborn
reasonably believes is a bona fide employee, volunteer, or medical staff member
of the hospital and who represents to the parent transferring the newborn that
he or she can and will summon appropriate resources to meet the newborn's
immediate needs.

(2) A parent of a
newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location is not subject to criminal liability under RCW 9A.42.060, 9A.42.070,
9A.42.080, 26.20.030, or 26.20.035.

(3)(a) The qualified
person and the hospital shall not require the parent transferring the newborn
to provide any identifying information in order to transfer the newborn.

(b) The qualified
person and the hospital shall attempt to protect the anonymity of the parent
who transfers the newborn, while providing an opportunity for the parent to
anonymously give the hospital such information as the parent knows about the
family medical history of the parents and the newborn. The qualified person
and the hospital shall provide referral information about adoption options,
counseling, appropriate medical and emotional aftercare services, domestic
violence, and legal rights to the parent seeking to transfer the newborn.

(c) If a parent of a
newborn transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate location
pursuant to this section, the hospital shall cause child protective services to
be notified within twenty-four hours after receipt of such a newborn. Child
protective services shall assume custody of the newborn within twenty-four
hours after receipt of notification and shall arrange for discharge of the
newborn from the hospital.

(d) A hospital, its
employees, volunteers, and medical staff are immune from any criminal or civil
liability for accepting or receiving a newborn under this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.42.060 and 1996 c
302 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person is guilty of the crime
of abandonment of a dependent person in the first degree if:

(a) The person is the
parent of a child, a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child or
other dependent person, or a person employed to provide to the child or other
dependent person any of the basic necessities of life;

(b) The person recklessly
abandons the child or other dependent person; and

(c) As a result of
being abandoned, the child or other dependent person suffers great bodily harm.

(2) A parent of a
newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location pursuant to section 2 of this act is not subject to criminal liability
under this section.

(3)
Abandonment of a dependent person in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 4. RCW 9A.42.070 and 1996 c
302 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person is guilty of the crime
of abandonment of a dependent person in the second degree if:

(a) The person is the
parent of a child, a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child or
other dependent person, or a person employed to provide to the child or other
dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and

(b) The person
recklessly abandons the child or other dependent person; and:

(i) As a result of
being abandoned, the child or other dependent person suffers substantial bodily
harm; or

(ii) Abandoning the
child or other dependent person creates an imminent and substantial risk that
the child or other dependent person will die or suffer great bodily harm.

(2) A parent of a
newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location pursuant to section 2 of this act is not subject to criminal liability
under this section.

(3)
Abandonment of a dependent person in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 5. RCW 9A.42.080 and 1996 c
302 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person is guilty of the crime
of abandonment of a dependent person in the third degree if:

(a) The person is the
parent of a child, a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child or
other dependent person, or a person employed to provide to the child or dependent
person any of the basic necessities of life; and

(b) The person
recklessly abandons the child or other dependent person; and:

(i) As a result of
being abandoned, the child or other dependent person suffers bodily harm; or

(ii) Abandoning the
child or other dependent person creates an imminent and substantial risk that
the child or other person will suffer substantial bodily harm.

(2) A parent of a
newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location pursuant to section 2 of this act is not subject to criminal liability
under this section.

(3)
Abandonment of a dependent person in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 6. RCW 26.20.030 and 1984 c
260 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who has a child
dependent upon him or her for care, education or support and deserts such child
in any manner whatever with intent to abandon it is guilty of the crime of
family abandonment.

(2) A parent of a
newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location pursuant to section 2 of this act is not subject to criminal liability
under this section.

(3) The crime of
family abandonment is a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 7. RCW 26.20.035 and 1984 c
260 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who is able to
provide support, or has the ability to earn the means to provide support, and
who:

(a) Willfully
omits to provide necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance to a
child dependent upon him or her; or

(b) Willfully
omits to provide necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance to
his or her spouse,

is guilty of the crime of
family nonsupport.

(2) A parent of a
newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate
location pursuant to section 2 of this act is not subject to criminal liability
under this section.

(3) The crime of
family nonsupport is a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) The secretary of the
department of social and health services shall convene a task force to
recommend methods of implementing this act, including how private or public
funding may be obtained to support a program of public education regarding the
provisions of this act. The task force shall consider all reasonable methods
of educating Washington residents about the need for prenatal and postdelivery
health care for a newborn whose parents may otherwise not seek such care and
place their newborn at risk as a result. The task force shall also consider,
and make recommendations regarding: (a) Ways to meet the medical and emotional
needs of the mother and to improve the promotion of adoption as an alternative
to placing a newborn in situations that create a serious risk to his or her
health; and (b) methods of providing access to (i) the medical history of the
parents of a newborn who is transferred to a hospital pursuant to section 2 of
this act; and (ii) the medical history of the newborn, consistent with the
protection of the anonymity of the parents of the newborn. The task force
shall develop model forms of policies and procedures for hospitals to use in
receiving newborns under section 2 of this act.

(2) In addition to the
secretary, or the secretary's designee, the task force shall include but not be
limited to representation from the following: (a) Licensed physicians; (b)
public and private agencies which provide adoption services; (c) private
attorneys handling adoptions; (d) the licensed nursing community; (e)
hospitals; (f) prosecuting attorneys; (g) foster parents; (h) the department of
health; (i) the attorney general; (j) advocacy groups concerned with the
availability of adoption records; (k) risk managers; and (l) the public. At
least three members of the task force shall be public members. The task force
may seek input from other experts as needed.

(3) Members of the task
force shall serve without compensation.

(4) The task force
shall submit its report and recommendations to the governor and legislature not
later than December 1, 2002.

(5) This section
expires January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---