BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 15.76.115
and 1998 c 345 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The fair fund is created in the custody of the state
treasury.

_7 All moneys received by the department of agriculture for
the

_8 purposes of this fund and from RCW 67.16.105(4) shall be
deposited

_9 into the fund. At the beginning of fiscal year 2002
and each fiscal

10 year thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer
into the fair

11 fund from the general fund the sum of two million
dollars.

12 Expenditures from the fund may be used only for
assisting fairs in

13 the manner provided in this chapter. Only the director
of

14 agriculture or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures

15 from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under

16 chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for

17 expenditures.18

p. 1 ESSB
5237

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of one
hundred thousand dollars is

_2 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002,
from the

_3 general fund to the fair fund to be used for special
assistance as

_4 provided for in RCW 15.76.150.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

ESSB 5237 p. 2