BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 57.12.010 and 1998 c
121 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of a
district shall be a board of commissioners consisting of three members, or five
or seven members as provided in RCW 57.12.015((, or more, as provided
in the event of merger or consolidation)). The board shall annually elect
one of its members as president and another as secretary.

The board shall by
resolution adopt rules governing the transaction of its business and shall
adopt an official seal. All proceedings shall be by resolution recorded in a
book kept for that purpose which shall be a public record.

A district shall
provide by resolution for the payment of compensation to each of its
commissioners at a rate of seventy dollars for each day or portion thereof
devoted to the business of the district. However the compensation for each
commissioner shall not exceed six thousand seven hundred twenty dollars per
year. In addition, the secretary may be paid a reasonable sum for clerical
services.

Any commissioner may
waive all or any portion of his or her compensation payable under this section
as to any month or months during the commissioner's term of office, by a
written waiver filed with the district at any time after the commissioner's
election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be
paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is
made.

No commissioner shall
be employed full time by the district. A commissioner shall be reimbursed for
reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection with district business,
including subsistence and lodging while away from the commissioner's place of
residence and mileage for use of a privately-owned vehicle at the mileage rate
authorized in RCW 43.03.060.

Sec. 2. RCW 57.12.015 and 1996 c
230 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the event a
three-member board of commissioners of any district with any number of
customers determines by resolution that it would be in the best interest of the
district to increase the number of commissioners from three to five, or if the
board of a district with any number of customers is presented with a petition
signed by ten percent of the registered voters resident within the district who
voted in the last general municipal election calling for an increase in the
number of commissioners of the district, the board shall submit a resolution to
the county auditor requesting that an election be held. Upon receipt of the
resolution, the county auditor shall call a special election to be held within
the district, at which election a proposition in substantially the following
language shall be submitted to the voters:

Shall
the Board of Commissioners of (name and/or number of
district) be increased from three to five members?

Yes . . . . .

No . . . . .

If the proposition receives
a majority approval at the election the board of commissioners of the district
shall be increased to five members.

(2) In any district
with more than ten thousand customers, if a three-member board of commissioners
determines by resolution that it would be in the best interest of the district
to increase the number of commissioners from three to five, the number of commissioners
shall be so increased without an election, unless within ninety days of
adoption of that resolution a petition requesting an election and signed by at
least ten percent of the registered voters who voted in the last municipal
general election is filed with the board. If such a petition is received, the
board shall submit the resolution and the petition to the county auditor, who
shall call a special election in the manner described in this section.

(3)(a) In any
district with more than twenty-five thousand customers, if a five-member board
of commissioners determines by resolution that it would be in the best interest
of the district to increase the number of commissioners from five to seven, the
number of commissioners may be so increased without an election, unless within
ninety days of adoption of that resolution a petition requesting an election
and signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters who voted in the
last municipal general election is filed with the board. If such a petition is
received, the board shall submit the resolution and the petition to the county
auditor, who shall call a special election in the manner described in this
section.

(b) In the event a
five-member board of commissioners of any district with more than twenty-five
thousand customers determines by resolution that it would be in the best
interest of the district to increase the number of commissioners from five to
seven, the board may submit a resolution to the county auditor requesting that
an election be held. Upon receipt of the resolution, the county auditor shall
call a special election to be held within the district, at which election a
proposition in substantially the following language shall be submitted to the
voters:

Shall
the Board of Commissioners of (name and/or number of
district) be increased from five to seven members?

Yes . . . . .

No . . . . .

If the proposition
receives a majority approval at the election the board of commissioners of the
district shall be increased to seven members.

(4) The two
additional positions created on boards of commissioners by this section shall
be filled initially as for a vacancy, except that the appointees shall draw
lots, one appointee to serve until the next district general election after the
appointment, at which two commissioners shall be elected for six-year terms,
and the other appointee to serve until the second district general election
after the appointment, at which two commissioners shall be elected for six-year
terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 57.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 52.14.020, in the event a five-member or seven-member board of
commissioners of any district determines by resolution that it would be in the
best interest of the district to decrease the number of commissioners from five
to three, or from seven to five, or in the event the board is presented with a
petition signed by ten percent of the registered voters resident within the district
who voted in the last general municipal election calling for such a decrease in
the number of commissioners of the district, the board shall submit a
resolution to the county auditor. Upon receipt of the resolution, the county
auditor shall call a special election to be held within the district at which
election the following proposition shall be submitted to the voters
substantially as follows:

Shall the board of
commissioners of (name
and/or number of district) be decreased from (five/seven) members to (three/five) members?

Yes
. . .

No
. . .

If the district has
commissioner districts, the commissioners of the district must pass a
resolution, before the submission of the proposition to the voters, to either
redistrict from five commissioner districts to three commissioner districts, or
from seven commissioner districts to five commissioner districts, or eliminate
the commissioner districts. The resolution takes effect upon approval of the
proposition by the voters.

If the proposition receives
a majority approval at the election, the board of commissioners of the district
shall be decreased to three or five members.

(2) The number of
members on the board of the district shall be reduced by one whenever a
commissioner resigns from office or a vacancy otherwise occurs on the board,
until the number of remaining members is reduced to the number of members that
is chosen for the board eventually to have. The reduction of membership on the
board shall not be considered to be a vacancy that is to be filled until the
number of remaining members is less than the number of members on the board
that is chosen for the board eventually to have.

(3) At the next three
district general elections after the reduction is approved, the number of
commissioners for the district that are elected shall be as follows,
notwithstanding the number of commissioners whose terms expire:

(a) In the first
election after the reduction, only one position shall be filled.

(b) In the second
election, one position shall be filled.

Thereafter, the
commissioners shall be elected in the same manner as prescribed for such
districts of the state.

Sec. 4. RCW 57.12.039 and 1996 c
230 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding RCW
57.12.020 and 57.12.030, the board of commissioners may provide by majority
vote that subsequent commissioners be elected from commissioner districts
within the district. If the board exercises this option, it shall divide the
district into three, ((or)) five, or seven if the number of
commissioners has been increased under RCW 57.12.015, commissioner districts of
approximately equal population following current precinct and district
boundaries.

(2) Commissioner
districts shall be used as follows: (a) Only a registered voter who resides in
a commissioner district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a commissioner of
the commissioner district; and (b) only voters of a commissioner district may
vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a commissioner of the commissioner
district. Voters of the entire district may vote at a general election to
elect a person as a commissioner of the commissioner district. Commissioner
districts shall be redrawn as provided in chapter 29.70 RCW.

(3) In districts in
which commissioners are nominated from commissioner districts, at the inception
of a five-member or a seven-member board of commissioners, the new
commissioner districts shall be numbered one through five or one through
seven and the ((three)) incumbent commissioners shall represent up
to five commissioner districts ((one through three)) depending on
the amount of commissioners. If, as a result of redrawing the district
boundaries two or three of the incumbent commissioners reside in one of the new
commissioner districts, the commissioners who reside in the same commissioner
district shall determine by lot which of the first three or five
numbered commissioner districts they shall represent for the remainder of their
respective terms. A primary shall be held to nominate candidates from the
remaining districts ((four and five)) where necessary and
commissioners shall be elected at large at the general election. The persons
elected as commissioners from the remaining commissioner districts ((four
and five)) shall take office immediately after qualification as defined
under RCW 29.01.135.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW 57.08.110 (Association of
commissioners‑-Purposes--Powers--Expenses) and 1999 c 153 s 13, 1996 c
230 s 318, 1995 c 301 s 76, 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 68, 1970 ex.s. c 47 s 5,
& 1961 c 242 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---