BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.28

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity

_7 required to be licensed under this chapter must display a

_8 permanent marking identifying the registered name and
license

_9 number of the licensee on each side of any motor vehicle
used by

10 the licensee or the licensee's employees in the course of
the

11 licensee's electrical contracting business. The identification
must

12 be in clearly legible style with letters no less than three
inches

13 high and in a color contrasting with the surrounding body
panel.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5239