BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.120.170 and 1998
c 342 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall administer a system for emission inspections of all motor vehicles,
except those described in RCW 46.16.015(2), that are registered within the
boundaries of each emission contributing area. Under such system a motor
vehicle shall be inspected biennially except where an annual program would be
required to meet federal law and prevent federal sanctions. In addition, motor
vehicles shall be inspected at each change of registered owner of a licensed
vehicle as provided under RCW 46.16.015.

(2) The director shall:

(a) Adopt procedures
for conducting emission inspections of motor vehicles. The inspections may
include idle and high revolution per minute emission tests. The emission test
for diesel vehicles shall consist solely of a smoke opacity test.

(b) Adopt criteria for
calibrating emission testing equipment. Electronic equipment used to test for
emissions standards provided for in this chapter shall be properly calibrated.
The department shall examine frequently the calibration of the emission testing
equipment used at the stations.

(c) Authorize, through
contracts, the establishment and operation of inspection stations for
conducting vehicle emission inspections authorized in this chapter. No person
contracted to inspect motor vehicles may perform for compensation repairs on
any vehicles. No public body may establish or operate contracted inspection
stations. Any contracts must be let in accordance with the procedures
established for competitive bids in chapter 43.19 RCW.

(3) Subsection (2)(c)
of this section does not apply to volunteer motor vehicle inspections under RCW
70.120.020(1) if the inspections are conducted for the following purposes:

(a) Auditing;

(b) Contractor
evaluation;

(c) Collection of data
for establishing calibration and performance standards; or

(d) Public information
and education.

(4)(a) The director
shall establish by rule the fee to be charged for emission inspections. The
inspection fee shall be a standard fee applicable statewide or throughout an
emission contributing area and shall be no greater than ((fifteen)) twenty-six
dollars. Surplus moneys collected from fees over the amount due the contractor
shall be paid to the state and deposited in the general fund. Fees shall be
set at the minimum whole dollar amount required to (i) compensate the
contractor or inspection facility owner, and (ii) offset the general fund
appropriation to the department to cover the administrative costs of the motor
vehicle emission inspection program. The portion of the fee dedicated to
covering the department's administrative costs may not exceed three dollars and
eighty cents per inspection.

(b) Before each
inspection, a person whose motor vehicle is to be inspected shall pay to the
inspection station the fee established under this section. The person whose
motor vehicle is inspected shall receive the results of the inspection. If the
inspected vehicle complies with the standards established by the director, the
person shall receive a dated certificate of compliance. If the inspected
vehicle does not comply with those standards, one reinspection of the vehicle
shall be afforded without charge.

(5) All
units of local government and agencies of the state with motor vehicles garaged
or regularly operated in an emissions contributing area shall test the
emissions of those vehicles annually to ensure that the vehicle's emissions
comply with the emission standards established by the director. All state
agencies outside of emission contributing areas with more than twenty motor
vehicles housed at a single facility or contiguous facilities shall test the
emissions of those vehicles annually to ensure that the vehicles' emissions
comply with standards established by the director. A report of the results of
the tests shall be submitted to the department.

--- END ---