BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act may be known and
cited as the "Valiree Jackson Act."

Sec. 2. RCW 10.95.020 and 1998 c
305 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is guilty of
aggravated first degree murder if he or she commits first degree murder as
defined by RCW 9A.32.030(1)(a), as now or hereafter amended, and one or more of
the following aggravating circumstances exist:

(1) The victim was a
law enforcement officer, corrections officer, or fire fighter who was
performing his or her official duties at the time of the act resulting in death
and the victim was known or reasonably should have been known by the person to
be such at the time of the killing;

(2) At the time of the
act resulting in the death, the person was serving a term of imprisonment, had
escaped, or was on authorized or unauthorized leave in or from a state facility
or program for the incarceration or treatment of persons adjudicated guilty of
crimes;

(3) At the time of the
act resulting in death, the person was in custody in a county or county-city
jail as a consequence of having been adjudicated guilty of a felony;

(4) The person
committed the murder pursuant to an agreement that he or she would receive
money or any other thing of value for committing the murder;

(5) The person
solicited another person to commit the murder and had paid or had agreed to pay
money or any other thing of value for committing the murder;

(6) The person
committed the murder to obtain or maintain his or her membership or to advance
his or her position in the hierarchy of an organization, association, or
identifiable group;

(7) The murder was
committed during the course of or as a result of a shooting where the discharge
of the firearm, as defined in RCW 9.41.010, is either from a motor vehicle or
from the immediate area of a motor vehicle that was used to transport the
shooter or the firearm, or both, to the scene of the discharge;

(8) The victim was:

(a) A judge; juror or
former juror; prospective, current, or former witness in an adjudicative
proceeding; prosecuting attorney; deputy prosecuting attorney; defense
attorney; a member of the indeterminate sentence review board; or a probation
or parole officer; and

(b) The murder was
related to the exercise of official duties performed or to be performed by the
victim;

(9) The person
committed the murder to conceal the commission of a crime or to protect or
conceal the identity of any person committing a crime, including, but
specifically not limited to, any attempt to avoid prosecution as a persistent
offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(10) There was more
than one victim and the murders were part of a common scheme or plan or the
result of a single act of the person;

(11) The murder was
committed in the course of, in furtherance of, or in immediate flight from one
of the following crimes:

(a) Robbery in the
first or second degree;

(b) Rape in the first
or second degree;

(c) Burglary in the
first or second degree or residential burglary;

(d) Kidnapping in the
first degree; or

(e) Arson in the first
degree;

(12) The victim was
regularly employed or self-employed as a newsreporter and the murder was
committed to obstruct or hinder the investigative, research, or reporting
activities of the victim;

(13) At the time the
person committed the murder, there existed a court order, issued in this or any
other state, which prohibited the person from either contacting the victim, molesting
the victim, or disturbing the peace of the victim, and the person had knowledge
of the existence of that order;

(14) At the time the
person committed the murder, the person and the victim were "family or
household members" as that term is defined in RCW 10.99.020(1), and the
person had previously engaged in a pattern or practice of three or more of the
following crimes committed upon the victim within a five-year period,
regardless of whether a conviction resulted:

(a) Harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.020; or

(b) Any criminal
assault;

(15) The victim was
under the age of thirteen.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.590 and 2000 c
28 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following
minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and shall not be varied or
modified under RCW 9.94A.390:

(a) An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years; except that if the
victim is under the age of sixteen years, the offender shall be sentenced to a
term of life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole.

(b) An offender
convicted of the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in
the first degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in
death or intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total
confinement not less than five years.

(c) An offender
convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree shall be sentenced to a term
of total confinement not less than five years.

(2) During
such minimum terms of total confinement, no offender subject to the provisions
of this section is eligible for community custody, earned release time,
furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any
other form of early release authorized under RCW 9.94A.150, or any other form
of authorized leave of absence from the correctional facility while not in the
direct custody of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply: (a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical
treatment; (b) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient treatment facility
in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree;
or (c) for an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW
9.94A.150(4).

---
END ---