BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 6.17.020 and 1997 c
121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the party in whose favor a
judgment of a court of record of this state or a district court of this state
has been or may be rendered, or the assignee, may have an execution issued for
the collection or enforcement of the judgment at any time within ten years from
entry of the judgment.

(2) After July 23,
1989, a party who obtains a judgment or order of a court of record of any
state, or an administrative order entered as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(6) for
accrued child support, may have an execution issued upon that judgment or order
at any time within ten years of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child
named in the order for whom support is ordered or as provided in subsection
(4)(b) of this section.

(3) After June 9, 1994,
a party in whose favor a judgment has been rendered pursuant to subsection (1)
or (4) of this section may, within ninety days before the expiration of the
original ten-year period, apply to the court that rendered the judgment for an
order granting an additional ten years during which an execution may be
issued. The petitioner shall pay to the court a filing fee equal to the filing
fee for filing the first or initial paper in a civil action in the court. When
application is made to the court to grant an additional ten years, the
application shall be accompanied by a current and updated judgment summary as
outlined in RCW 4.64.030. The filing fee required under this subsection shall
be included in the judgment summary and shall be a recoverable cost.

(4)(a) A party
who obtains a judgment or order for restitution, crime victims' assessment, or
other court-ordered legal financial obligations pursuant to a criminal judgment
and sentence may execute the judgment or order any time within ten years
subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence or ten years following the
offender's release from total confinement as provided in chapter 9.94A RCW.

(b) A party who
obtains a judgment or order for restitution for child support of a child born
as the result of a rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree may
execute the judgment or order any time during the period provided in RCW 4.16.020,
9.94A.140, or 9.94A.142, whichever is longer.

(c)
The clerk of superior court may seek extension under subsection (3) of this
section for purposes of collection as allowed under RCW 36.18.190.

--- END ---