BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.13.130 and 1990 c
33 s 566 are each amended to read as follows:

A petition for
annexation of an area contiguous to a city or town may be made in writing
addressed to and filed with the legislative body of the municipality to which
annexation is desired. Except where all the property sought to be annexed is
property of a school district, and the school directors thereof file the
petition for annexation as in RCW 28A.335.110 authorized, the petition must be
signed by the owners of not less than ((seventy-five)) sixty
percent in value according to the assessed valuation for general taxation of
the property for which annexation is petitioned: PROVIDED, That in cities and
towns with populations greater than one hundred sixty thousand located east of
the Cascade mountains, the owner of tax exempt property may sign an annexation
petition and have the tax exempt property annexed into the city or town, but
the value of the tax exempt property shall not be used in calculating the
sufficiency of the required property owner signatures unless only tax exempt
property is proposed to be annexed into the city or town. The petition shall
set forth a description of the property according to government legal
subdivisions or legal plats which is in compliance with RCW 35.02.170, and
shall be accompanied by a plat which outlines the boundaries of the property
sought to be annexed. If the legislative body has required the assumption of
all or of any portion of city or town indebtedness by the area annexed, and/or
the adoption of a comprehensive plan for the area to be annexed, these facts, together
with a quotation of the minute entry of such requirement or requirements shall
be set forth in the petition.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.21.005 and 1996 c
286 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Wherever in this title
petitions are required to be signed and filed, the following rules shall govern
the sufficiency thereof:

(1) A petition may
include any page or group of pages containing an identical text or prayer
intended by the circulators, signers or sponsors to be presented and considered
as one petition and containing the following essential elements when
applicable, except that the elements referred to in (d) and (e) of this
subsection are essential for petitions referring or initiating legislative
matters to the voters, but are directory as to other petitions:

(a) The text or prayer
of the petition which shall be a concise statement of the action or relief
sought by petitioners and shall include a reference to the applicable state
statute or city ordinance, if any;

(b) If the petition
initiates or refers an ordinance, a true copy thereof;

(c) If the petition
seeks the annexation, incorporation, withdrawal, or reduction of an area for
any purpose, an accurate legal description of the area proposed for such action
and if practical, a map of the area;

(d) Numbered lines for
signatures with space provided beside each signature for the name and address
of the signer and the date of signing;

(e) The warning
statement prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Petitions shall be
printed or typed on single sheets of white paper of good quality and each sheet
of petition paper having a space thereon for signatures shall contain the text
or prayer of the petition and the following warning:

WARNING

Every
person who signs this petition with any other than his or her true name, or who
knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, or signs a petition seeking
an election when he or she is not a legal voter, or signs a petition when he or
she is otherwise not qualified to sign, or who makes herein any false
statement, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Each signature shall be
executed in ink or indelible pencil and shall be followed by the name and
address of the signer and the date of signing.

(3) The term
"signer" means any person who signs his or her own name to the
petition.

(4) To be sufficient a
petition must contain valid signatures of qualified registered voters or
property owners, as the case may be, in the number required by the applicable statute
or ordinance. Within three working days after the filing of a petition, the
officer with whom the petition is filed shall transmit the petition to the
county auditor for petitions signed by registered voters, or to the county
assessor for petitions signed by property owners for determination of
sufficiency. The officer whose duty it is to determine the sufficiency of the
petition shall proceed to make such a determination with reasonable promptness
and shall file with the officer receiving the petition for filing a certificate
stating the date upon which such determination was begun, which date shall be
referred to as the terminal date. Additional pages of one or more signatures
may be added to the petition by filing the same with the appropriate filing
officer prior to such terminal date. Any signer of a filed petition may
withdraw his or her signature by a written request for withdrawal filed with
the receiving officer prior to such terminal date. Such written request shall
so sufficiently describe the petition as to make identification of the person
and the petition certain. The name of any person seeking to withdraw shall be
signed exactly the same as contained on the petition and, after the filing of
such request for withdrawal, prior to the terminal date, the signature of any
person seeking such withdrawal shall be deemed withdrawn.

(5) Petitions
containing the required number of signatures shall be accepted as prima facie
valid until their invalidity has been proved.

(6) A variation on petitions
between the signatures on the petition and that on the voter's permanent
registration caused by the substitution of initials instead of the first or
middle names, or both, shall not invalidate the signature on the petition if
the surname and handwriting are the same.

(7) Signatures,
including the original, of any person who has signed a petition two or more
times shall be stricken.

(8) Signatures followed
by a date of signing which is more than six months prior to the date of filing
of the petition shall be stricken. However, in the case of annexation
petitions, only signatures followed by a date of signing which is more than
twenty-four months prior to the date of filing of the petition with the
legislative body of the municipality to which annexation is desired shall be
stricken.

(9) When petitions are
required to be signed by the owners of property, the determination shall be
made by the county assessor. Where validation of signatures to the petition is
required, the following shall apply:

(a) The signature of a
record owner, as determined by the records of the county auditor, shall be
sufficient without the signature of his or her spouse;

(b) In the case of
mortgaged property, the signature of the mortgagor shall be sufficient, without
the signature of his or her spouse;

(c) In the case of
property purchased on contract, the signature of the contract purchaser, as
shown by the records of the county auditor, shall be deemed sufficient, without
the signature of his or her spouse;

(d) Any officer of a
corporation owning land within the area involved who is duly authorized to
execute deeds or encumbrances on behalf of the corporation, may sign on behalf of
such corporation, and shall attach to the petition a certified excerpt from the
bylaws of such corporation showing such authority;

(e) When property
stands in the name of a deceased person or any person for whom a guardian has
been appointed, the signature of the executor, administrator, or guardian, as
the case may be, shall be equivalent to the signature of the owner of the
property.

(10) The officer who is
responsible for determining the sufficiency of the petition shall do so in
writing and transmit the written certificate to the officer with whom the
petition was originally filed.

Sec. 3. RCW 35A.01.040 and 1996
c 286 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Wherever in this title
petitions are required to be signed and filed, the following rules shall govern
the sufficiency thereof:

(1) A petition may
include any page or group of pages containing an identical text or prayer
intended by the circulators, signers or sponsors to be presented and considered
as one petition and containing the following essential elements when
applicable, except that the elements referred to in (d) and (e) of this
subsection are essential for petitions referring or initiating legislative
matters to the voters, but are directory as to other petitions:

(a) The text or prayer
of the petition which shall be a concise statement of the action or relief
sought by petitioners and shall include a reference to the applicable state
statute or city ordinance, if any;

(b) If the petition
initiates or refers an ordinance, a true copy thereof;

(c) If the petition
seeks the annexation, incorporation, withdrawal, or reduction of an area for
any purpose, an accurate legal description of the area proposed for such action
and if practical, a map of the area;

(d) Numbered lines for
signatures with space provided beside each signature for the name and address
of the signer and the date of signing;

(e) The warning
statement prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Petitions shall be
printed or typed on single sheets of white paper of good quality and each sheet
of petition paper having a space thereon for signatures shall contain the text
or prayer of the petition and the following warning:

WARNING

Every
person who signs this petition with any other than his or her true name, or who
knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, or signs a petition seeking
an election when he or she is not a legal voter, or signs a petition when he or
she is otherwise not qualified to sign, or who makes herein any false
statement, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Each signature shall be
executed in ink or indelible pencil and shall be followed by the name and
address of the signer and the date of signing.

(3) The term
"signer" means any person who signs his or her own name to the
petition.

(4) To be sufficient a
petition must contain valid signatures of qualified registered voters or
property owners, as the case may be, in the number required by the applicable statute
or ordinance. Within three working days after the filing of a petition, the
officer with whom the petition is filed shall transmit the petition to the
county auditor for petitions signed by registered voters, or to the county
assessor for petitions signed by property owners for determination of
sufficiency. The officer whose duty it is to determine the sufficiency of the
petition shall proceed to make such a determination with reasonable promptness
and shall file with the officer receiving the petition for filing a certificate
stating the date upon which such determination was begun, which date shall be
referred to as the terminal date. Additional pages of one or more signatures
may be added to the petition by filing the same with the appropriate filing
officer prior to such terminal date. Any signer of a filed petition may
withdraw his or her signature by a written request for withdrawal filed with
the receiving officer prior to such terminal date. Such written request shall
so sufficiently describe the petition as to make identification of the person
and the petition certain. The name of any person seeking to withdraw shall be
signed exactly the same as contained on the petition and, after the filing of
such request for withdrawal, prior to the terminal date, the signature of any
person seeking such withdrawal shall be deemed withdrawn.

(5) Petitions
containing the required number of signatures shall be accepted as prima facie
valid until their invalidity has been proved.

(6) A variation on petitions
between the signatures on the petition and that on the voter's permanent
registration caused by the substitution of initials instead of the first or
middle names, or both, shall not invalidate the signature on the petition if
the surname and handwriting are the same.

(7) Signatures,
including the original, of any person who has signed a petition two or more
times shall be stricken.

(8) Signatures followed
by a date of signing which is more than six months prior to the date of filing
of the petition shall be stricken. However, in the case of annexation
petitions, only signatures followed by a date of signing which is more than
twenty-four months prior to the date of filing of the petition with the
legislative body of the municipality to which annexation is desired shall be
stricken.

(9) When petitions are
required to be signed by the owners of property, the determination shall be
made by the county assessor. Where validation of signatures to the petition is
required, the following shall apply:

(a) The signature of a
record owner, as determined by the records of the county auditor, shall be
sufficient without the signature of his or her spouse;

(b) In the case of
mortgaged property, the signature of the mortgagor shall be sufficient, without
the signature of his or her spouse;

(c) In the case of
property purchased on contract, the signature of the contract purchaser, as
shown by the records of the county auditor, shall be deemed sufficient, without
the signature of his or her spouse;

(d) Any officer of a
corporation owning land within the area involved who is duly authorized to
execute deeds or encumbrances on behalf of the corporation, may sign on behalf
of such corporation, and shall attach to the petition a certified excerpt from
the bylaws of such corporation showing such authority;

(e) When property
stands in the name of a deceased person or any person for whom a guardian has
been appointed, the signature of the executor, administrator, or guardian, as
the case may be, shall be equivalent to the signature of the owner of the
property.

(10) The officer who is
responsible for determining the sufficiency of the petition shall do so in
writing and transmit the written certificate to the officer with whom the petition
was originally filed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances
is not affected.

---
END ---