BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.85.010 and 2000 c
107 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Adaptive
management" means reliance on scientific methods to test the results of
actions taken so that the management and related policy can be changed promptly
and appropriately.

(2) "Critical
pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and management process
for examining interactions between habitat projects and salmonid species,
prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring positive benefits from habitat
projects.

(3) "Habitat
project list" is the list of projects resulting from the critical pathways
methodology under RCW 77.85.060(2). Each project on the list must have a
written agreement from the landowner on whose land the project will be
implemented. Projects include habitat restoration projects, habitat protection
projects, habitat projects that improve water quality, habitat projects that
protect water quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, and habitat project
maintenance and monitoring activities.

(4) "Habitat work
schedule" means those projects from the habitat project list that will be
implemented during the current funding cycle. The schedule shall also include
a list of the entities and individuals implementing projects, the start date,
duration, estimated date of completion, estimated cost, and funding sources for
the projects.

(5) "Limiting factors"
means conditions that limit the ability of habitat to fully sustain populations
of salmon. These factors are primarily fish passage barriers and degraded
estuarine areas, riparian corridors, stream channels, and wetlands.

(6) "Project
sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal government, state
agency, a combination of such governments through interlocal or
interagency agreements ((provided under chapter 39.34 RCW)), a
nonprofit organization, or one or more private citizens.

(7) "Salmon"
includes all species of the family Salmonidae which are capable of
self-sustaining, natural production.

(8) "Salmon
recovery plan" means a state plan developed in response to a proposed or
actual listing under the federal endangered species act that addresses limiting
factors including, but not limited to harvest, hatchery, hydropower, habitat,
and other factors of decline.

(9) "Tribe"
or "tribes" means federally recognized Indian tribes.

(10) "WRIA"
means a water resource inventory area established in chapter 173-500 WAC as it
existed on January 1, 1997.

(11)
"Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the person
under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal owner's property.

--- END ---