BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.20.085 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 181 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any member of
the police department of any such city shall die, or shall have heretofore
died, or whenever any such member who has been heretofore retired or who is
hereafter retired for length of service or a disability, shall have died, or shall
die, leaving a surviving spouse or child or children under the age of eighteen
years, upon satisfactory proof of such facts made to it, the board shall order
and direct that a pension equal to ((one-third)) one-half of the
amount of salary at any time hereafter attached to the position held by such
member in the police department at the time of his or her death or
retirement, not to exceed ((one-third)) one-half of the salary of
captain, shall be paid to the surviving spouse during the surviving spouse's
life, ((and in addition, to the child or children, until they are eighteen
years of age, as follows: For one child, one-eighth of the salary on which
such pension is based; for two children, a total of one-seventh of said salary;
and for three or more children, a total of one-sixth of said salary)) or
if there is no surviving spouse, or if the surviving spouse shall die, then to
the child or children until they are eighteen years of age: PROVIDED, If
such spouse or child or children marry, the person so marrying shall receive no
further pension from the fund. ((In case there is no surviving spouse, or
if the surviving spouse shall die, the child or children shall be entitled to
the spouse's share in addition to the share specified herein until they reach
eighteen years of age.)) No spouse shall be entitled to any payments on
the death of a retired officer unless such surviving spouse has been married to
such officer for a period of at least five years prior to the date of his or
her retirement.

As of April 25, 1973, a
surviving spouse not otherwise covered by the provisions of section 2, chapter
78, Laws of 1959, shall be entitled to a pension of three hundred dollars per
month.

"Surviving
spouse" as used in this section means surviving female or male spouse.

--- END ---