BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
19.28.311 and 2000 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 There is hereby created an electrical board,
consisting of

_8 ((fourteen)) fifteen members to be
appointed by the governor with

_9 the advice of the director of labor and industries as
herein

10 provided. It shall be the purpose and function of the
board to

11 advise the director on all matters pertaining to the
enforcement

12 of this chapter including, but not limited to standards
of

13 electrical and telecommunications installation, minimum
inspection

14 procedures, and the adoption of rules pertaining to the
electrical

15 inspection division: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no rules
shall be

16 amended or repealed until the electrical board has first
had an

17 opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or
repeals and had

18 an opportunity to make recommendations to the director
relative

p. 1 SSB
5248

_1 thereto. The members of the electrical board shall be
selected and

_2 appointed as follows: One member shall be an employee
or officer of

_3 a corporation or public agency generating or
distributing electric

_4 power; one member must be an employee or officer of a
facilities-

_5 based telecommunications service provider regulated by
the

_6 Washington state utilities and transportation
commission; three

_7 members shall be licensed electrical contractors:
PROVIDED, That

_8 one of these members may be a representative of a trade

_9 association in the electrical industry; one member shall
be a

10 licensed telecommunications contractor; one member shall
be an

11 employee, or officer, or representative of a corporation
or firm

12 engaged in the business of manufacturing or distributing

13 electrical and telecommunications materials, equipment,
or

14 devices; one member shall be a person with knowledge of
the

15 electrical industry, not related to the electrical
industry, to

16 represent the public; three members shall be certified

17 electricians; one member shall be a telecommunications
worker; one

18 member shall be a licensed professional electrical
engineer

19 qualified to do business in the state of Washington and
designated

20 as a registered communications distribution designer; one
member

21 shall be either a cable worker or an outside line
worker; and one

22 nonvoting member must be a building official from an
incorporated

23 city or town with an electrical inspection program
established

24 under RCW 19.28.141. The regular term of each member
shall be four

25 years: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, The original board shall be
appointed on

26 June 9, 1988, for the following terms: The first term
of the member

27 representing a corporation or public agency generating
or

28 distributing electric power shall serve four years; two
members

29 representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve
three

30 years; the member representing a manufacturer or
distributor of

31 electrical equipment or devices shall serve three years;
the

32 member representing the public and one member
representing

33 licensed electrical contractors shall serve two years;
the three

34 members selected as certified electricians shall serve
for terms

35 of one, two, and three years, respectively; the member
selected as

36 the licensed professional electrical engineer shall
serve for one

37 year. The first term for the member representing
outside line or

38 cable workers is for four years. In appointing
the original

SSB 5248 p. 2

_1 board, the governor shall give due consideration to the
value of

_2 continuity in membership from predecessor boards.
Thereafter, the

_3 governor shall appoint or reappoint board members for
terms of

_4 four years and to fill vacancies created by the
completion of the

_5 terms of the original members. When new positions are
created, the

_6 governor may appoint the initial members to the new
positions to

_7 staggered terms of one to three years. The governor
shall also fill

_8 vacancies caused by death, resignation, or otherwise for
the

_9 unexpired term of such members by appointing their
successors from

10 the same business classification. The same procedure
shall be

11 followed in making such subsequent appointments as is
provided for

12 the original appointments. The board, at this first
meeting shall

13 elect one of its members to serve as chairman. Any
person acting as

14 the chief electrical inspector shall serve as secretary
of the

15 board during his or her tenure as chief state
inspector. Meetings

16 of the board shall be held at least quarterly in
accordance with a

17 schedule established by the board. Each member of the
board shall

18 receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240
and shall be

19 reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050

20 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the electrical
license

21 fund, upon vouchers approved by the director of labor
and

22 industries.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The governor shall
appoint the member

24 representing outside line or cable workers within ninety
days

25 after the effective date of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5248