BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Compensation" means remuneration that equals the reduction in the
fair market value of private real property that is attributable to a
restriction on the use of the property or any part thereof.

(2) "Government
entity" means Washington state, state agencies, agencies and commissions
funded, in whole or in part, by the state, counties, cities, towns, special
districts, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations.

(3) "Real
property" means any interest in real property recognized under Washington
law, including but not limited to, water, crops, forest products, minerals, or
other natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. If any action by a
government entity to change the land use or zoning status of real property causes
a reduction in the use or exchange value of that property, the property is
considered to have been taken for the use of the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The owner of the
property that is taken under section 2 of this act has a right to either:

(a) Require
condemnation by and just compensation from the government entity that took the
action; or

(b) Receive
compensation for the reduction in value caused by the government entity's
action.

(2) Property owners are
entitled to a jury trial on the amount of compensation required under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A government entity is
liable to a prevailing property owner for the reasonable and necessary costs of
any actions brought under this chapter, plus any actual and demonstrable
economic losses suffered by the property owner due to the government entity's
regulation during the period in which it was in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. If any action by a
government entity results in a taking of property under this chapter and causes
a reduction in the full cash value of real property, the government entity's
assessor or, if appropriate, the department of revenue, shall reflect the
reduction in valuation by reducing the assessed valuation of the property on
the tax rolls as of the next valuation date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. This chapter shall not be
construed as an exclusive remedy or to diminish other rights of property owners
under existing law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This chapter does not
apply in the case of an exercise of police power to prevent noxious use of
property or tangible harm to the health and safety of the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. This chapter may be known
and cited as the property investment protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 9 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

---
END ---