BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that mountain goats

_6 are a valuable resident of Washington's mountainous
areas and a

_7 species that must be maintained to ensure diversity of
wildlife

_8 species in the remote areas of the state. The
legislature further

_9 finds that there are Indian tribes within the state such
as the

10 Sauk-Suiattle who rely on mountain goats for a variety
of cultural

11 and economic reasons. The legislature further finds
that many

12 people are concerned that the population has declined to

13 critically low levels. The legislature further finds
that the exact

14 health and size of the mountain goat populations found
within the

15 state is not known.

16 The legislature further finds that baseline
ecological and

17 population data are lacking for sound management of
mountain goats

p. 1 SB
5250

_1 in Washington. Therefore, the legislature declares that
information

_2 on population size and status are essential to
adequately manage

_3 mountain goats and perpetuate the species.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of five
hundred thousand dollars,

_5 or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
from the

_6 general fund to the department of fish and wildlife for
the fiscal

_7 year ending June 30, 2002, solely to develop
partnerships with

_8 state, federal, and tribal agencies to conduct a study
of mountain

_9 goat populations in Washington.

10 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary
for the immediate

11 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

12 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

13 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5250 p. 2