BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
46.37.185 and 1987 c 330 s 709 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 ((Firemen)) Fire fighters, when
approved by the chief of their

_7 respective service, shall be authorized to use a green
light,

_8 either steady or flashing, on the front of their
private cars when

_9 on emergency duty only. Such green light shall be
visible for a

10 distance of two hundred feet under normal atmospheric
conditions

11 and shall be of a type and mounting approved by the
Washington

12 state patrol. The use of the green light shall only be
for the

13 purpose of identification, and the operator of a
vehicle so

14 equipped shall not be entitled to any of the privileges
provided

15 in RCW 46.61.035 for the operators of authorized
emergency

16 vehicles.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5251