BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that public health and safety is promoted when the public has knowledge that
enables them to make informed choices about their health and safety.
Therefore, the legislature declares, as a matter of public policy, that the
public has a right to information necessary to protect members of the public
from harm caused by alleged hazards or threats to the public.

The legislature also
recognizes that the public disclosure of those portions of records containing
specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and unique response
plans, either of which is intended to prevent or mitigate criminal terrorist
acts as defined in RCW 70.74.285, could have a substantial likelihood of
threatening public safety. Therefore, the legislature declares, as a matter of
public policy, that such specific and unique information should be protected
from unnecessary disclosure.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17.310 and 2000 c
134 s 3, 2000 c 56 s 1, and 2000 c 6 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) The following are
exempt from public inspection and copying:

(a) Personal
information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or
clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare
recipients.

(b) Personal
information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials
of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to
privacy.

(c) Information required
of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any tax if
the disclosure of the information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to
such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (ii)
violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.

(d) Specific
intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled by
investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, and state agencies
vested with the responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the
nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the
protection of any person's right to privacy.

(e) Information
revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims of crime or
who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, or penology agencies,
other than the public disclosure commission, if disclosure would endanger any
person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed
the complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with
the public disclosure commission about any elected official or candidate for
public office must be made in writing and signed by the complainant under oath.

(f) Test questions,
scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a license,
employment, or academic examination.

(g) Except as provided
by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real estate appraisals, made for or by any
agency relative to the acquisition or sale of property, until the project or
prospective sale is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has
been acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold, but
in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years after the
appraisal.

(h) Valuable formulae,
designs, drawings, computer source code or object code, and research data
obtained by any agency within five years of the request for disclosure when
disclosure would produce private gain and public loss.

(i) Preliminary drafts,
notes, recommendations, and intra-agency memorandums in which opinions are
expressed or policies formulated or recommended except that a specific record
shall not be exempt when publicly cited by an agency in connection with any
agency action.

(j) Records which are
relevant to a controversy to which an agency is a party but which records would
not be available to another party under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes
pending in the superior courts.

(k) Records, maps, or
other information identifying the location of archaeological sites in order to
avoid the looting or depredation of such sites.

(l) Any library record,
the primary purpose of which is to maintain control of library materials, or to
gain access to information, which discloses or could be used to disclose the
identity of a library user.

(m) Financial
information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, or corporation for the
purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or proposal for (i) a ferry system
construction or repair contract as required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750
or (ii) highway construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.

(n) Railroad company
contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with the utilities and transportation
commission under RCW 81.34.070, except that the summaries of the contracts are
open to public inspection and copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.

(o) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by private persons pertaining to
export services provided pursuant to chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW,
and by persons pertaining to export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.

(p) Financial
disclosures filed by private vocational schools under chapters 28B.85 and
28C.10 RCW.

(q) Records filed with
the utilities and transportation commission or attorney general under RCW
80.04.095 that a court has determined are confidential under RCW 80.04.095.

(r) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by businesses or individuals during
application for loans or program services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160,
43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency.

(s) Membership lists or
lists of members or owners of interests of units in timeshare projects,
subdivisions, camping resorts, condominiums, land developments, or
common-interest communities affiliated with such projects, regulated by the
department of licensing, in the files or possession of the department.

(t) All applications
for public employment, including the names of applicants, resumes, and other
related materials submitted with respect to an applicant.

(u) The residential
addresses and residential telephone numbers of employees or volunteers of a
public agency which are held by the agency in personnel records, employment or
volunteer rosters, or mailing lists of employees or volunteers.

(v) The residential
addresses and residential telephone numbers of the customers of a public
utility contained in the records or lists held by the public utility of which
they are customers, except that this information may be released to the
division of child support or the agency or firm providing child support
enforcement for another state under Title IV-D of the federal social security
act, for the establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.

(w)(i) The federal
social security number of individuals governed under chapter 18.130 RCW
maintained in the files of the department of health, except this exemption does
not apply to requests made directly to the department from federal, state, and
local agencies of government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the current
residential address and current residential telephone number of a health care
provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department,
if the provider requests that this information be withheld from public
inspection and copying, and provides to the department an accurate alternate or
business address and business telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995,
the current residential address and residential telephone number of a health
care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the files of the
department shall automatically be withheld from public inspection and copying
unless the provider specifically requests the information be released, and
except as provided for under RCW 42.17.260(9).

(x) Information
obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in RCW 69.45.090.

(y) Information
obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department of health and its
representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044, 69.41.280, and 18.64.420.

(z) Financial
information, business plans, examination reports, and any information produced
or obtained in evaluating or examining a business and industrial development
corporation organized or seeking certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.

(aa) Financial and
commercial information supplied to the state investment board by any person
when the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement
funds and when disclosure would result in loss to such funds or in private loss
to the providers of this information.

(bb) Financial and
valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.

(cc) Client records
maintained by an agency that is a domestic violence program as defined in RCW
70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.

(dd) Information that
identifies a person who, while an agency employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an
informal process established by the employing agency, in order to ascertain his
or her rights in connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60
RCW against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.

(ee) Investigative
records compiled by an employing agency conducting a current investigation of a
possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of
other federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.

(ff) Business related
information protected from public inspection and copying under RCW 15.86.110.

(gg) Financial,
commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data
submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington center in applications for, or
delivery of, program services under chapter 70.95H RCW.

(hh) Information and
documents created specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality
improvement committee pursuant to RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer
review committee under RCW 4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession
of the information and documents.

(ii) Personal
information in files maintained in a data base created under RCW 43.07.360.

(jj) Financial and
commercial information requested by the public stadium authority from any
person or organization that leases or uses the stadium and exhibition center as
defined in RCW 36.102.010.

(kk) Names of
individuals residing in emergency or transitional housing that are furnished to
the department of revenue or a county assessor in order to substantiate a claim
for property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.043.

(ll) The names,
residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, and other individually
identifiable records held by an agency in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or
other ride-sharing program or service. However, these records may be disclosed
to other persons who apply for ride-matching services and who need that
information in order to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share
rides.

(mm) The personally
identifying information of current or former participants or applicants in a
paratransit or other transit service operated for the benefit of persons with
disabilities or elderly persons.

(nn) The personally
identifying information of persons who acquire and use transit passes and other
fare payment media including, but not limited to, stored value smart cards and
magnetic strip cards, except that an agency may disclose this information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is responsible,
in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety. This information may also be disclosed at the
agency's discretion to governmental agencies or groups concerned with public
transportation or public safety.

(oo) Proprietary
financial and commercial information that the submitting entity, with review by
the department of health, specifically identifies at the time it is submitted
and that is provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection
with an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption sought
by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for such
information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of the
request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the submitting
entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing need for
confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester. Upon receipt of
such notice, the department of health shall continue to treat information
designated under this section as exempt from disclosure. If the requester
initiates an action to compel disclosure under this chapter, the submitting
entity must be joined as a party to demonstrate the continuing need for
confidentiality.

(pp) Records maintained
by the board of industrial insurance appeals that are related to appeals of
crime victims' compensation claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.

(qq) Financial and
commercial information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation,
or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW relating to the purchase or sale of tuition
units and contracts for the purchase of multiple tuition units.

(rr) Any records of
investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or other law
enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or
sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been
transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for
permanent electronic retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).

(ss) Credit card
numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates,
or bank or other financial account numbers supplied to an agency for the
purpose of electronic transfer of funds, except when disclosure is expressly
required by law.

(tt) Financial
information, including but not limited to account numbers and values, and other
identification numbers supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation,
limited liability company, partnership, or other entity related to an
application for a liquor license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.

(uu) Records maintained
by the employment security department and subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if
provided to another individual or organization for operational, research, or
evaluation purposes.

(vv) Individually
identifiable information received by the work force training and education
coordinating board for research or evaluation purposes.

(ww) Those portions
of records containing specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific
and unique response plans, either of which is intended to prevent or mitigate
criminal terrorist acts as defined in RCW 70.74.285, the public disclosure of
which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public safety.

(2) Except for
information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of this section and confidential
income data exempted from public inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the
exemptions of this section are inapplicable to the extent that information, the
disclosure of which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental
interests, can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may
be construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.

(3) Inspection or
copying of any specific records exempt under the provisions of this section may
be permitted if the superior court in the county in which the record is
maintained finds, after a hearing with notice thereof to every person in
interest and the agency, that the exemption of such records is clearly
unnecessary to protect any individual's right of privacy or any vital
governmental function.

(4) Agency
responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of any public record shall
include a statement of the specific exemption authorizing the withholding of
the record (or part) and a brief explanation of how the exemption applies to
the record withheld.

---
END ---