BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the state of Washington is nationally recognized in the areas of financial
management, capital management, human resources, and managing for results and
information technology; that the executive branch of state government has
undertaken regulatory reform efforts, performance-based budgeting efforts, and
programs to improve quality, efficiency, and effectiveness; and that the roles
performed by the legislative auditor and the state auditor are valued.

It is the intent of the
legislature that public confidence in government at all levels is essential and
must be promoted by all possible means, that the state's stewardship over
public funds is a fundamental responsibility, and that this chapter is designed
to help strengthen state management of public resources and the systems that
provide citizens the information they need to assess accountability and to make
informed decisions.

The purposes of this
chapter are to:

(1) Establish a
permanent means of bringing citizens, public employees, policymakers,
executives, businesses, labor organizations, and management experts together
for the continuous enhancement of state government and agency performance and
accountability and to make our Washington state government and its agencies the
most effective and efficient in the nation;

(2) Assess the quality
and integration of state agency strategic and quality plans, performance measurement,
and performance assessment in planning, budgeting, and managing the state's
resources;

(3) Evaluate whether
state government and its agencies make strategic and consistent efforts to
engage citizens in dialogue, planning, and determining accountability for
programs and services;

(4) Determine whether
citizens have the information they need to assess accountability and adequate
opportunities to participate in their government;

(5) Assess the success
of state agencies implementing and using new technologies to improve services,
facilitate citizen access, and measure and enhance the satisfaction of state
agency customers;

(6) Evaluate the
effectiveness of state agencies publicizing performance results and successes;

(7) Use independent and
comprehensive reviews to affirm the effectiveness and efficiency of state
government agency management and use of public resources; and

(8) Establish
benchmarks of the best practices of government at all levels in organizing,
managing, and conducting the annual, independent reviews of the effectiveness
and efficiency of state government agency management and use of public
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The citizens' alliance
for government accountability is established as a panel composed of six members
as follows: (1) The governor or the governor's designee; (2) the state auditor
or the state auditor's designee; and (3) four citizen members, one of which is
appointed by the leader of each of the two major party caucuses of the house of
representatives and the senate. The members of the alliance shall select a
chair from one of the four citizen members. The alliance shall appoint task
forces as needed that reflect the state's economic, social, ethnic, and
political diversity, including private sector, for-profit, corporate chief
executive officers, private sector, nonprofit organization chief executives,
state employees, representatives of a labor organization, management experts,
managers or administrators from county or city government, and the general
citizenry.

Volunteers shall be
sought to participate. The alliance may create subcommittees and advisory
panels to assist in its deliberations and may contract for specialized
expertise.

The alliance may
solicit charitable gifts, grants, and donations that are placed into the
citizens' alliance for government accountability account and used to offset
general fund moneys appropriated for such purposes.

All members of the
alliance shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of
duties of the alliance in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The alliance shall make
reports and recommendations to increase and improve state government
efficiency, effectiveness, organization, operations, and accountability and to
achieve costs savings. By December 31, 2001, the alliance shall present the
legislature and governor with a strategic work plan to accomplish its purposes
and shall make annual reports to the legislature and governor thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The citizens' alliance
for government accountability account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Expenditures from the account may only be expended to finance the
activities of the alliance and all expenditures must be authorized by the
director of the office of financial management or the director's designee.
Moneys in the account are not subject to appropriation and are not subject to
the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The alliance shall
convene summit conferences as needed throughout the state and shall actively
solicit participation by state employees, management experts, and the general citizenry.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The citizens' alliance
for government accountability and its powers and duties shall terminate on June
30, 2008, as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective June 30, 2009:

(1) Section 1 of this
act;

(2) Section 2 of this
act;

(3) Section 3 of this
act;

(4) Section 4 of this
act;

(5) Section 5 of this
act; and

(6) Section 10 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Sections 1 through 5 and
10 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The sum of two hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the state general fund to the
citizens' alliance for government accountability account for the purposes of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---