BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.24.084 and 1999 c
391 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person
aggrieved by a violation of this chapter shall have a right of action in
superior court and may recover for each violation:

(a) Against any person
who negligently violates a provision of this chapter, one thousand dollars, or
actual damages, whichever is greater, for each violation.

(b) Against any person
who intentionally or recklessly violates a provision of this chapter, ten
thousand dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater, for each violation.

(c) Reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs.

(d) Such other relief,
including an injunction, as the court may deem appropriate.

(2) Any action under
this chapter is barred unless the action is commenced within three years after
the cause of action accrues.

(3) Nothing in this
chapter limits the rights of the subject of a test for a sexually transmitted
disease to recover damages or other relief under any other applicable law.

(4) Nothing in this
chapter may be construed to impose civil liability or criminal sanction for
disclosure of a test result for a sexually transmitted disease in accordance
with any reporting requirement for a diagnosed case of sexually transmitted
disease by the department or the centers for disease control of the United
States public health service.

(5) It
is a negligent violation of this chapter to cause an unauthorized communication
of confidential sexually transmitted disease information by facsimile
transmission or otherwise communicating the information to an unauthorized
recipient when the sender knew or had reason to know the facsimile transmission
telephone number or other transmittal information was incorrect or outdated.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.02.150 and 1991 c
335 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

A health care provider
shall effect reasonable safeguards for the security of all health care
information it maintains.

Reasonable
safeguards shall include taking reasonable steps to delete outdated and
incorrect facsimile transmission or other telephone transmittal numbers from
computer, facsimile, or other data bases. When health care information is
transmitted electronically to a recipient who is not regularly transmitted
health care information from the health care provider, the health care provider
shall verify that the number is accurate prior to transmission.

---
END ---