BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
49.12.005 and 1998 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 ((For the purposes of)) The definitions in
this section apply

_8 throughout this chapter((:)) unless the
context clearly requires

_9 otherwise.

10 (1) ((The term)) "Department"
means the department of labor and

11 industries.

12 (2) ((The term)) "Director"
means the director of the

13 department of labor and industries, or the director's
designated

14 representative.

15 (3) ((The term)) "Employer"
means any person, firm,

16 corporation, partnership, business trust, legal
representative, or

17 other business entity which engages in any business,
industry,

18 profession, or activity in this state and employs one or
more

p. 1 SB
5259

_1 employees and for the purposes of RCW 49.12.270 through
49.12.295

_2 and 49.12.450 also includes the state, any state
institution, any

_3 state agency, political subdivisions of the state, and
any

_4 municipal corporation or quasi-municipal corporation.

_5 (4) ((The term)) "Employee"
means an employee who is employed

_6 in the business of the employee's employer whether by
way of

_7 manual labor or otherwise.

_8 (5) ((The term)) "Conditions of
labor" shall mean and include

_9 the conditions of rest and meal periods for employees
including

10 provisions for personal privacy, practices, methods and
means by

11 or through which labor or services are performed by
employees and

12 includes bona fide physical qualifications in
employment, but

13 shall not include conditions of labor otherwise governed
by

14 statutes and rules and regulations relating to
industrial safety

15 and health administered by the department.

16 (6) "Temporary services agency" means
any individual or entity

17 that is engaged in the business of furnishing
individuals to

18 perform services on a part-time or temporary basis
for a third

19 party.

20 (7) For the purpose of chapter 16, Laws of
1973 2nd ex. sess. a

21 minor is defined to be a person of either sex under the
age of

22 eighteen years.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 49.12

24 RCW to read as follows:

25 The legislature declares that it is the public
policy of this

26 state to foster the employment of all individuals in the
state,

27 including those working for temporary services agencies,
and to

28 safeguard their right to obtain and hold employment
without

29 discrimination.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 49.12

31 RCW to read as follows:

32 Temporary services agencies shall:

33 (1) For each new job assignment offered to an
employee, give

34 that employee:

35 (a) The exact address of, directions to, and public

36 transportation available to the worksite;

SB 5259 p. 2

_1 (b) A written notice of the job characteristics
including a job

_2 description, the rate of pay, available benefits,
estimated

_3 longevity of the assignment, work schedules, complete
and accurate

_4 information concerning any health or safety hazards they
may face,

_5 and whether the employee will need or be charged for
using special

_6 attire, accessories, or tools; and

_7 (c) A telephone number at the worksite at which an
employee can

_8 be reached for emergency purposes.

_9 The information required by this subsection (1)
shall be kept

10 on file for a period of one year by the temporary
services agency;

11 (2) Include a written notification with each payment
of wages

12 to its employees specifying the rate paid, or payable,
to the

13 temporary services agency by or on behalf of the
recipient of the

14 employee's services for the work performed by the
employee, or for

15 any services rendered by the temporary services agency
with

16 respect to the employee;

17 (3) Provide workers information about state and
federal

18 employment laws and what to do if they experience
discrimination

19 or a health and safety violation while working;

20 (4) Provide, or require that the third party client
provide,

21 without charge, safety training appropriate to the job
assignment

22 and whatever safety equipment is required at or on the
job

23 assignment;

24 (5) Not prohibit employees from accepting a job
directly with a

25 third party client, nor shall they otherwise restrict,
penalize,

26 or discriminate against employees in any manner for
doing so; nor

27 shall temporary services agencies restrict the right of
such

28 clients to offer permanent employment to temporary
services agency

29 employees. Temporary services agencies shall allow time
off for

30 interviews, provide references promptly on request, and
shall not

31 discriminate in job assignments against those employees
looking

32 for permanent work;

33 (6) Provide to employees upon request information on
the

34 percentage of long-term placements at each of the agency=s
clients

35 and the rate at which agency employees have become
permanent

36 employees at each of the agency=s
clients; and

37 (7) Not charge any employee for payment in cash or
for cashing

p. 3 SB
5259

_1 a check or voucher issued by the agency for wages earned
by that

_2 employee.

_3 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is
added to chapter 49.12

_4 RCW to read as follows:

_5 Employees of temporary services agencies have a
right to refuse

_6 a job assignment, without reprisal, or discrimination,
including

_7 opposing a request for unemployment benefits, for any of
the

_8 following reasons:

_9 (1) The job will expose them to dangerous conditions
or

10 hazardous materials;

11 (2) The job would require them to travel an
unreasonable

12 distance or spend an unreasonable amount of uncompensated
time in

13 travel;

14 (3) They are inadequately trained or prepared for
the job;

15 (4) They would receive pay lower than they
customarily earn;

16 (5) The hours of work expected are incompatible with
available

17 child care arrangements;

18 (6) They have been given insufficient notice prior
to the

19 expected start date of the job;

20 (7) The job assignment would extend beyond the
anticipated

21 duration; and

22 (8) The job assignment would cause them to cross
picket lines

23 or to work as replacement workers during a strike.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is
added to chapter 49.12

25 RCW to read as follows:

26 (1) Any worker may complain to the director
regarding a

27 violation of this act and the director shall investigate
the same.

28 (2) The director shall, upon determining that a
person has

29 violated the provisions of, or rules or orders adopted
or issued

30 pursuant to, section 3 or 4 of this act, send a written
notice of

31 the violation to the person at his or her last known
address

32 containing a description of the fines contained in this

33 subsection. Any person determined by the director to
have: (a)

34 Committed a second violation of, or rules or orders
adopted or

35 issued pursuant to, section 3 or 4 of this act, within
five years

36 of the first violation, or (b) discharged, reduced the

SB 5259 p. 4

_1 compensation of, or otherwise discriminated against any
employee

_2 for making a complaint regarding a violation of this act
or

_3 otherwise asserting any rights under this title, shall
be assessed

_4 a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars a
day for

_5 each such violation. Each and every such violation
shall be a

_6 separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing

_7 violation, every day=s continuance shall be a
separate and distinct

_8 violation. Any penalty amount set in excess of one
thousand dollars

_9 shall be set by the director in consideration of any
previous

10 history of violations by the violator. A violation
occurring more

11 than five years from the date of a previous violation
shall be

12 considered a first violation.

13 (3) In addition to any other penalty provided by
law, an

14 employee who has suffered from a violation of, or rules
or orders

15 adopted or issued pursuant to, section 3 or 4 of this
act, may

16 bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction
to recover

17 damages for the violation in the amount of five thousand

18 dollars. In any such action, the court shall award
reasonable

19 attorneys' fees to a prevailing plaintiff.

20 (4) A criminal action need not be brought against an
employer

21 for that employer to be civilly liable under this
section.

22 (5) A notice of sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act
must be posted

23 and maintained at all temporary services agencies where
workers

24 can view it.

25 Sec. 6. RCW
49.12.130 and 1913 c 174 s 16 are each amended to read

26 as follows:

27 Any employer who discharges, or in any other manner

28 discriminates against any employee because such employee
has

29 testified or is about to testify, or because such
employer

30 believes that said employee may testify in any
investigation or

31 proceedings relative to the enforcement of RCW 49.12.010
through

32 49.12.180 or sections 3 through 5 of this act,
shall be deemed

33 guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof,
shall be

34 punished by a fine of from ((twenty- five)) five
hundred dollars

35 to ((one hundred)) two thousand dollars
for each such misdemeanor.

36

p. 5 SB
5259

_1 Sec. 7. RCW
49.12.170 and 1994 c 164 s 21 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 Except as otherwise provided in RCW 49.12.390 or
49.12.410, any

_4 employer employing any person for whom a minimum wage or

_5 standards, conditions, and hours of labor have been
specified, at

_6 less than said minimum wage, or under standards, or
conditions of

_7 labor or at hours of labor prohibited by the rules and
regulations

_8 of the director; or violating any other of the
provisions of

_9 chapter 16, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess., or sections 3
through 5 of

10 this act, shall be deemed guilty of a
misdemeanor, and shall, upon

11 conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less
than

12 ((twenty-five)) five hundred dollars nor
more than ((one)) two

13 thousand dollars.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is
added to chapter 49.12

15 RCW to read as follows:

16 The director shall prescribe rules as necessary to
enforce this

17 act.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If any provision of
this act or its

19 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

20 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

21 persons or circumstances is not affected.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5259 p. 6