BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 3.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every offender who
has completed all terms of a suspended or deferred sentence imposed by a court
of limited jurisdiction as defined under chapter 3.02 RCW may apply to the
sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record of conviction. If the
court finds that the offender meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section, the court may clear the record of conviction by: (a)(i) Permitting
the offender to withdraw the offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of
not guilty; or (ii) if the offender has been convicted after a plea of not
guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender. Court costs may
be waived upon a finding that the offender is indigent.

(2) An offender may
have the record of conviction vacated if: (a) The offender has not previously
had a record of conviction vacated; (b) the offender has not been convicted of
a new crime in this state, another state, or federal court since the date of
the offense for which the offender is seeking vacation; (c) at least seven
years have passed since the date the applicant completed all terms of the
court's suspended or deferred sentence, including proof of payment of all court
costs, fines, and restitution; and (d) the record of conviction is not for an
alcohol-related motor vehicle offense, a domestic violence offense, or a sex
offense.

(3) Once the court
vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this section, the fact
that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in
the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any
subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from all penalties
and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes, including
responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 3.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every offender who
has completed all terms of a suspended or deferred sentence imposed by a court
of limited jurisdiction as defined under chapter 3.02 RCW may apply to the
sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record of conviction. If the
court finds that the offender meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of
this section, the court may clear the record of conviction by: (a)(i)
Permitting the offender to withdraw the offender's plea of guilty and to enter
a plea of not guilty; or (ii) if the offender has been convicted after a plea
of not guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender. Court costs may
be waived upon a finding that the offender is indigent.

(2) An offender may
have the record of conviction vacated if: (a) The offender has not previously
had a record of conviction vacated; (b) the offender has not been convicted of
a new crime in this state, another state, or federal court since the date of
the offense for which the offender is seeking vacation; (c) at least seven
years have passed since the date the applicant completed all terms of the
court's suspended or deferred sentence, including proof of payment of all court
costs, fines, and restitution; and (d) the record of conviction is not for an
alcohol-related motor vehicle offense, a domestic violence offense, or a sex
offense.

(3) Once the court
vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this section, the fact
that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in
the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any
subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from all penalties
and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes, including
responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 35.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every offender who
has completed all terms of a suspended or deferred sentence imposed by a court
of limited jurisdiction as defined under chapter 3.02 RCW may apply to the
sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record of conviction. If the
court finds that the offender meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of
this section, the court may clear the record of conviction by: (a)(i)
Permitting the offender to withdraw the offender's plea of guilty and to enter
a plea of not guilty; or (ii) if the offender has been convicted after a plea
of not guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender. Court costs may
be waived upon a finding that the offender is indigent.

(2) An offender may
have the record of conviction vacated if: (a) The offender has not previously
had a record of conviction vacated; (b) the offender has not been convicted of
a new crime in this state, another state, or federal court since the date of
the offense for which the offender is seeking vacation; (c) at least seven
years have passed since the date the applicant completed all terms of the
court's suspended or deferred sentence, including proof of payment of all court
costs, fines, and restitution; and (d) the record of conviction is not for an
alcohol-related motor vehicle offense, a domestic violence offense, or a sex
offense.

(3) Once
the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this section,
the fact that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not be
included in the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a
sentence in any subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from
all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes,
including responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

---
END ---