BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 73.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature to guarantee employment rights of members of the reserve and
national guard forces who are called to active duty. The federal uniformed
services employment and reemployment rights act of 1994 protects all such federal
personnel. The legislature intends that similar provisions should apply to all
such state personnel. Therefore, the legislature intends for this act to
ensure protections for state-activated personnel similar to those provided by
federal law for federal-activated personnel.

(2) The purposes of
this chapter are to:

(a) Encourage noncareer
service in the uniformed services by eliminating or minimizing the
disadvantages to civilian careers and employment that can result from such
service;

(b) Minimize the
disruption to the lives of persons performing service in the uniformed services
as well as to their employers, their fellow employees, and their communities,
by providing for the prompt reemployment of such persons upon their completion
of such service; and

(c) Prohibit
discrimination against persons because of their service in the uniformed
services.

(3) Therefore, the
legislature intends that the governmental agencies of the state of Washington,
and all the political subdivisions thereof, should be model employers in
carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 73.16.015 and 1951 c
29 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any veteran entitled to
the benefits of RCW 73.16.010 may enforce his or her rights hereunder by
civil action in ((the)) superior court((s)).

Sec. 3. RCW 73.16.031 and 1953 c
212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in RCW
73.16.031 through 73.16.061, the term:

"Resident"
means any person residing in the state.)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Attorney
general" means the attorney general of the state of Washington or any
person designated by the attorney general to carry out a responsibility of the
attorney general under this chapter.

(2)
"Benefit," "benefit of employment," or "rights and
benefits" means any advantage, profit, privilege, gain, status, account,
or interest (other than wages or salary for work performed) that accrues by
reason of an employment contract or agreement or an employer policy, plan, or
practice and includes rights and benefits under a pension plan, a health plan,
an employee stock ownership plan, insurance coverage and awards, bonuses, severance
pay, supplemental unemployment benefits, vacations, and the opportunity to
select work hours or location of employment.

(3)
"Employer" means the person, firm, or corporation, the state and any
political subdivision thereof, or any elected or appointed public official
currently having control over the position that has been vacated.

(4) "Health
plan" means an insurance policy or contract, medical or hospital service
agreement, membership or subscription contract, or other arrangement under
which health services for individuals are provided or the expenses of such
services are paid.

(5)
"Notice" means any written or verbal notification of an obligation or
intention to perform service in the uniformed services provided to an employer
by the employee who will perform such service or by the uniformed service in
which such service is to be performed.

(6)
"Position of employment" means any position (other than temporary)
wherein a person is engaged for a private employer, company, corporation,
state, municipality, or political subdivision thereof.

(7)
"Qualified," with respect to an employment position, means having the
ability to perform the essential tasks of the position.

(8)
"Rejectee" means a person rejected because he or she is not,
physically or otherwise, qualified to enter the uniformed service.

(9)
"Resident" means any person residing in the state with the intent to
remain other than on a temporary or transient basis.

(10)
"Seniority" means longevity in employment together with any benefits
of employment which accrue with, or are determined by, longevity in employment.

(11) "Service
in the uniformed services" means the performance of duty on a voluntary or
involuntary basis in a uniformed service under competent authority and includes
active duty, active duty for training, initial active duty for training,
inactive duty training, full‑time national guard duty (including
state-ordered active duty), and a period for which a person is absent from a
position of employment for the purpose of an examination to determine the
fitness of the person to perform any such duty.

(12)
"State" means the state of Washington, including the agencies and
political subdivisions thereof.

(13) "Temporary
position" means a position of short duration which, after being vacated,
ceases to exist and wherein the employee has been advised as to its temporary
nature prior to his or her engagement.

(("Employer"
means the person, firm, corporation, state and any political subdivision
thereof, or public official currently having control over the position which
has been vacated.

"Rejectee"
means a person rejected because he is not, physically or otherwise, qualified
to enter the service.))

(14) "Undue hardship,"
in the case of actions taken by an employer, means actions requiring
significant difficulty or expense when considered in light of:

(a) The nature and
cost of the action needed under this chapter;

(b) The overall
financial resources of the facility or facilities involved in the provision of
the action; the number of persons employed at such facility; the effect on
expenses and resources; or the impact otherwise of such action upon the
operation of the facility;

(c) The overall
financial resources of the employer; the overall size of the business of the
employer with respect to the number of its employees; and the number, type, and
location of its facilities; and

(d) The type of
operation or operations of the employer, including the composition, structure,
and functions of the work force of such employer, the geographic separateness,
administrative, or fiscal relationship of the facility or facilities in
question to the employer.

(15) "Uniformed
services" means the armed forces, the army national guard and the air
national guard when engaged in active duty for training, inactive duty
training, full‑time national guard duty, or state active duty, the
commissioned corps of the public health service, the coast guard, and any other
category of persons designated by the president of the United States in time of
war or national emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 73.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who is a
member of, applies to be a member of, performs, has performed, applies to
perform, or has an obligation to perform service in a uniformed service shall
not be denied initial employment, reemployment, retention in employment,
promotion, or any benefit of employment by an employer on the basis of that
membership, application for membership, performance of service, application for
service, or obligation.

(2) An employer may not
discriminate in employment against or take any adverse employment action
against any person because such person (a) has taken an action to enforce a
protection afforded any person under this chapter, (b) has testified or
otherwise made a statement in or in connection with any proceeding under this
chapter, (c) has assisted or otherwise participated in an investigation under
this chapter, or (d) has exercised a right provided for in this chapter. The
prohibition in this subsection (2) applies with respect to a person regardless
of whether that person has performed service in the uniformed services.

(3) An employer shall
be considered to have engaged in actions prohibited:

(a) Under subsection
(1) of this section, if the person's membership, application for membership,
service, application for service, or obligation for service in the uniformed
services is a motivating factor in the employer's action, unless the employer
can prove that the action would have been taken in the absence of such
membership, application for membership, service, application for service, or
obligation for service; or

(b) Under subsection
(2) of this section if the person's (i) action to enforce a protection afforded
any person under this chapter, (ii) testimony or making of a statement in or in
connection with any proceeding under this chapter, (iii) assistance or other
participation in an investigation under this chapter, or (iv) exercise of a
right provided for in this chapter, is a motivating factor in the employer's
action, unless the employer can prove that the action would have been taken in
the absence of such person's enforcement action, testimony, statement,
assistance, participation, or exercise of a right.

(4) An employer is not
required to reemploy a person under this chapter if the employment from which
the person leaves to serve in the uniformed services is for a brief,
nonrecurrent period and there is no reasonable expectation that such employment
will continue indefinitely or for a significant period.

Sec. 5. RCW 73.16.033 and 1953 c
212 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who is a
resident of this state or is employed within this state, or is employed by
an employer doing business within the state, and who voluntarily or upon ((demand))
order from competent authority, vacates a position of employment to
determine his or her physical fitness to enter, or, who actually does
enter upon active duty or training in the Washington national guard
or the national guard of any state, territory, commonwealth, possession, or
district, the armed forces of the United States, or the United States
public health service, shall, provided he or she meets the requirements
of RCW 73.16.035, be reemployed forthwith: PROVIDED, That the employer need
not reemploy such person if circumstances have so changed ((as to make it
impossible, unreasonable, or against the public interest for him to do so))
such that reemployment would be impossible or unreasonable due to a change
in the employer's circumstances, or would impose an undue hardship on the
employer: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not apply to a
temporary position.

If such person is still
qualified to perform the duties of his or her former position, he or
she shall be restored to that position or to a position of like seniority,
status and pay. If he or she is not so qualified as a result of
disability sustained during his or her service, or during the
determination of his or her fitness for service, but is nevertheless
qualified to perform the duties of another position, under the control of the
same employer, he or she shall be reemployed in such other position:
PROVIDED, That such position shall provide him or her with like
seniority, status, and pay, or the nearest approximation thereto consistent
with the circumstances of the case.

Sec. 6. RCW 73.16.035 and 1969 c
16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to
be eligible for the benefits of ((RCW 73.16.031 through 73.16.061)) this
chapter, an applicant must comply with the following requirements:

(((1) He)) (a)
The applicant must furnish a receipt of an honorable, or under honorable
conditions discharge, report of separation, certificate of satisfactory
service, or other proof of having satisfactorily completed his or her
service. Rejectees must furnish proof of orders for examination and rejection.

(((2) He)) (b)
The applicant must make written or verbal application to the
employer or his or her representative ((within ninety days of the
date of his separation or release from training and service. Rejectees must
apply within thirty days from date of rejection)) as follows:

(i) In the case of
an applicant whose period of service in the uniformed services was less than
thirty-one days, by reporting to the employer:

(A) Not later than
the beginning of the first full regularly scheduled work period on the first
full calendar day following the completion of the period of service and the
expiration of eight hours after a period allowing for the safe transportation
of the applicant from the place of that service to the applicant's residence;
or

(B) As soon as
possible after the expiration of the eight‑hour period in (b)(i)(A) of
this subsection, if reporting within that period is impossible or unreasonable
through no fault of the applicant;

(ii) In the case of
an applicant who is absent from a position of employment for a period of any
length for the purposes of an examination to determine the applicant's fitness
to perform service in the uniformed services, by reporting in the manner and
time referred to in (b)(i) of this subsection;

(iii) In the case of
an applicant whose period of service in the uniformed services was for more
than thirty days but less than one hundred eighty-one days, by submitting an
application for reemployment with the employer not later than fourteen days
after the completion of the period of service or if submitting such application
within such period is impossible or unreasonable through no fault of the
applicant, the next first full calendar day when submission of such application
becomes possible;

(iv) In the case of
an applicant whose period of service in the uniformed services was for more
than one hundred eighty days, by submitting an application for reemployment
with the employer not later than ninety days after the completion of the period
of service;

(v) In the case of
an applicant who is hospitalized for, or convalescing from, an illness or
injury incurred in, or aggravated during, the performance of service in the
uniformed services, at the end of the period that is necessary for the
applicant to recover from such illness or injury, the applicant shall submit an
application for reemployment with such employer. The period of recovery may
not exceed two years. This two‑year period shall be extended by the
minimum time required to accommodate the circumstances beyond the applicant's
control that make reporting within the two‑year period impossible or
unreasonable;

(vi) In the case of
an applicant who fails to report or apply for employment or reemployment within
the appropriate period specified in (b) of this subsection, the applicant does
not automatically forfeit his or her entitlement to the rights and benefits
conferred by this chapter, but is subject to the conduct rules, established
policy, and general practices of the employer pertaining to explanations and
discipline with respect to absence from scheduled work.

(c) An applicant who
submits an application for reemployment shall provide to the applicant's
employer, upon the request of that employer, documentation to establish that:

(i) The application
is timely;

(ii) The applicant
has not exceeded the service limitations set forth in this section, except as
permitted under (b)(v) of this subsection; and

(iii) The
applicant's entitlement to the benefits under this chapter has not been
terminated pursuant to (d) of this subsection.

(((3))) (d)
If, due to the necessity of hospitalization, while on active duty, ((he))
the applicant is released or placed on inactive duty and remains
hospitalized, ((he)) the applicant is eligible for the benefits
of ((RCW 73.16.031 through 73.16.061)) this chapter: PROVIDED,
That such hospitalization does not continue for more than one year from date of
such release or inactive status: PROVIDED FURTHER, That ((he)) the
applicant applies for his or her former position within ninety days
after discharge from such hospitalization.

(((4) He)) (e)
The applicant must return and reenter the office or position within three
months after serving four years or less: PROVIDED, That any period of
additional service imposed by law, from which one is unable to obtain orders
relieving him or her from active duty, will not affect ((his))
reemployment rights.

(2) The failure of
an applicant to provide documentation that satisfies rules adopted pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not be a basis for denying reemployment
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter if the failure occurs because
such documentation does not exist or is not readily available at the time of
the request of the employer. If, after such reemployment, documentation
becomes available that establishes that the applicant does not meet one or more
of the requirements referred to in subsection (1)(c)(i), (ii), and (iii) of
this section, that applicant's employer may terminate the employment of the
person and the provision of any rights or benefits afforded the person under
this chapter.

(3) An employer may
not delay or attempt to defeat a reemployment obligation by demanding
documentation that does not then exist or is not then readily available.

(4) The application
in subsection (1) of this section is not required if the giving of such
application is precluded by military necessity or, under all of the relevant
circumstances, the giving of such notice is otherwise impossible or
unreasonable. A determination of military necessity for the purposes of this
subsection shall be made by the adjutant general of the state of Washington
military department and is not subject to judicial review.

(5) In any
proceeding involving an issue of whether (a) reemployment is impossible or
unreasonable because of a change in an employer's circumstances, (b)
reemployment would impose an undue hardship on the employer, or (c) the
employment is for a brief, nonrecurrent period and there is no reasonable
expectation that such employment would have continued indefinitely or for a
significant period as provided in section 4(4) of this act, the employer has
the burden of proving the impossibility or unreasonableness, undue hardship, or
the brief or nonrecurrent nature of the employment without a reasonable
expectation of continuing indefinitely or for a significant period.

Sec. 7. RCW 73.16.051 and 1953 c
212 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who is
entitled to be restored to a position in accordance with the provisions of RCW
73.16.031, 73.16.033, 73.16.035, and 73.16.041 shall be considered as having
been on furlough or leave of absence, from his or her position of
employment, during his or her period of active military duty or service,
and he or she shall be so restored without loss of seniority. He or
she shall further be entitled to participate in insurance, vacations,
retirement pay, and other benefits offered by the employer pursuant to
established rules and practices relating to employees on furlough or leave of
absence in effect with the employer at the time such person was ordered into
the service; and he or she shall not be discharged from such position
without cause within one year after restoration((: PROVIDED, That no
employer shall be required to make any payment to keep insurance or retirement
rights current during such period of military service)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 73.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In any case in
which a person, or the person's dependents, has coverage under a health plan in
connection with the person's position of employment, including a group health
plan as defined in section 607(1) of the federal employee retirement income
security act of 1974, and such person is absent from such position of
employment by reason of service in the uniformed services, the plan shall
provide that the person may elect to continue such coverage as provided in this
section. The maximum period of coverage of a person and person's dependents
under such an election shall be the lesser of:

(a) The eighteen-month
period beginning on the date on which the person's absence begins; or

(b) The day after the
date on which the person fails to apply for or return to a position of
employment, as determined under RCW 73.16.035.

(2) A person who elects
to continue health plan coverage under this section may be required to pay not
more than one hundred two percent of the full premium under the plan,
determined in the same manner as the applicable premium under section
4980B(f)(4) of the internal revenue code of 1986, associated with such coverage
for the employer's other employees, except that in the case of a person who
performs service in the uniformed services for less than thirty-one days, the
person may not be required to pay more than the employee share, if any, for
such coverage.

(3) In the case of a
health plan that is a multiemployer plan as defined in section 3(37) of the
federal employee retirement income security act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec.
1002(37)(A)), any liability under the plan for employer contributions and
benefits arising under this subsection shall be allocated:

(a) By the plan in the
manner as the plan sponsor provides; or

(b) If the sponsor does
not provide:

(i) To the last
employer employing the person before the period served by the person in the
uniformed services; or

(ii) If the last
employer is no longer functional, to the plan.

(4) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, in the case of a person whose coverage under
a health plan was terminated by reason of service in the uniformed services, an
exclusion or waiting period may not be imposed in connection with the reinstatement
of such coverage upon reemployment under this chapter if an exclusion or
waiting period would not have been imposed under a health plan had coverage of
such person by such plan not been terminated as a result of such service. This
subsection applies to the person who is reemployed and to any individual who is
covered by such plan by reason of the reinstatement of the coverage of such
person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 73.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as
otherwise provided, in the case of a right provided pursuant to an employee
pension benefit plan (including those described in sections 3(2) and 3(33) of
the federal employee retirement income security act of 1974) or a right
provided under any federal or state law governing pension benefits for
governmental employees, the right to pension benefits or a person reemployed
under this chapter shall be determined under this section.

(b) A person reemployed
under this chapter shall be treated as not having incurred a break in service
with the employer or employers maintaining the plan by reason of such person's
period of service in the uniformed services.

(c) Each period served
by a person in the uniformed services shall, upon reemployment under this
chapter, be deemed to constitute service with the employer or employers
maintaining the plan for the purpose of determining the nonforfeitability of
the person's accrued benefits and for the purpose of determining the accrual of
benefits under the plan.

(2) An employer
reemploying a person under this chapter is liable to an employee pension
benefit plan for funding any obligation of the plan to provide the pension
benefits described in this section and shall allocate the amounts of any
employer contribution for the person in the same manner and to the same extent
the allocation occurs for other employees during the period of service. For
purposes of determining the amount of such liability and any obligation of the
plan, earnings and forfeitures shall not be included. For purposes of
determining the amount of such liability and purposes of section 515 of the
employee retirement income security act of 1974 or a similar federal or state
law governing pension benefits for governmental employees, service in the
uniformed services that is deemed under subsection (1) of this section to be
service with the employer shall be deemed to be service with the employer under
the terms of the plan or any applicable collective bargaining agreement. In
the case of a multiemployer plan as defined in section 3(37) of the employee
retirement income security act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002(37)(A)), any
liability of the plan described in this paragraph shall be allocated:

(a) By the plan in such
manner as the sponsor maintaining the plan shall provide; or

(b) If the sponsor does
not provide:

(i) To the last
employer employing the person before the period served by the person in the
uniformed services; or

(ii) If such last
employer is no longer functional, to the plan.

(3) A person reemployed
under this chapter is entitled to accrued benefits pursuant to subsection
(1)(a) of this section that are contingent on the making of, or derived from,
employee contributions or elective deferrals (as defined in section 402(g)(3)
of the internal revenue code of 1986) only to the extent the person makes
payment to the plan with respect to such contributions or deferrals. No such
payment may exceed the amount the person would have been permitted or required
to contribute had the person remained continuously employed by the employer
throughout the period of uniformed service. Any payment to the plan described
in this subsection shall be made during the period beginning with the date of
reemployment and whose duration is three times the period of the person's
services, such payment period in the uniformed services, not to exceed five
years.

(4) For purposes of
computing an employer's liability of the employee's contributions under
subsection (2) of this section, the employee's compensation during the period
of service shall be computed:

(a) At the rate the
employee would have received but for the period of service in subsection (1)(b)
of this section; or

(b) In the case that
the determination of such rate is not reasonably certain, on the basis of the
employee's average rate of compensation during the twelve-month period
immediately preceding such period or if shorter, the period of employment
immediately preceding such period.

(5) Any employer who
reemploys a person under this chapter and who is an employer contributing to a
multiemployer plan as defined in section 3(37) of the employee retirement
income security act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002(37)(A)) under which benefits
are or may be payable to such person by reason of the obligations in this
chapter, shall, within thirty days after the date of such reemployment, provide
information, in writing, of such reemployment to the administrator of such plan.

Sec. 10. RCW 73.16.061 and 1953 c
212 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In case any employer,
his or her successor or successors fails or refuses to comply with the
provisions of ((RCW 73.16.031 through 73.16.061)) this chapter, and
service was state duty not covered by the uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act of 1994, P.L. 103-353 (38 U.S.C. Sec. 43), and the
employer support for guard and reserve ombudsman has inquired in the matter and
has been unable to resolve it, the ((prosecuting attorney of the county
in which the employer is located)) attorney general shall bring
action in the superior court in the county in which the employer is located
or does business to obtain an order to specifically require such employer
to comply with the provisions ((hereof)) of this chapter, and, as
an incident thereto, to compensate such person for any loss of wages or
benefits suffered by reason of such employer's unlawful act. Any such person
who does not desire the services of the ((prosecuting)) attorney general
may, by private counsel, bring such action.

Sec. 11. RCW 73.16.070 and 1941 c
201 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The federal
soldiers' and sailors' civil relief act of 1940, Public Act No. 861((, 76th
congress)), is hereby specifically declared to apply in proper cases in all
the courts of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added to
chapter 73.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall
not supersede, nullify, or diminish any federal, state, or political
subdivision of this state, law, ordinance, rule, regulation, contract,
agreement, policy, plan, practice, or other matter that establishes a right or
benefit that is more beneficial to, or is in addition to, a right or benefit
provided for such person in this chapter.

(2) This chapter
supersedes any state law, or that of any political subdivision of this state as
set out in subsection (1) of this section, and any contract, agreement, policy,
plan, practice, or other matter that reduces, limits, or eliminates in any
manner a right or benefit provided by this chapter, including the establishment
of additional prerequisites to the exercise of any such right or the receipt of
any such benefit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---