BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds
that part-time, temporary, leased, and other contingent workers are increasing
in numbers. Under state laws and employer policies, these contingent workers
are less likely than other workers to receive employment-based benefits. Consequently,
employers may terminate employees, misclassify employees, limit contract terms,
or take other action to avoid providing or continuing to provide
employment-based benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The
legislature intends that the purpose of this act is to prohibit employers from
terminating employees, misclassifying employees, limiting their contracts, or
taking other action to avoid providing or continuing to provide
employment-based benefits to which employees are entitled under state law or
employer policies. It is not the intent of the legislature that this act
relate to or affect employment-based benefits subject to the federal employee
retirement income security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 49.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair
practice for any employer to:

(a) Terminate any
employee to avoid providing or continuing to provide employment-based benefits
to which the employee would become or is entitled under any state law or any
employer policy;

(b) Misclassify any
employee to avoid providing or continuing to provide employment-based benefits
to which the employee would become or is entitled under any state law or any employer
policy;

(c) Limit the term of a
contract with an employee to avoid providing employment-based benefits to which
the employee would become entitled under any state law or any employer policy;

(d) Include any other
language in a contract with an employee that requires the employee to forego
employment-based benefits to which the employee would become or is entitled
under any state law or any employer policy; or

(e) Terminate or in any
manner discriminate against an employee because the employee has filed or
communicated to the employer an intent to file an action alleging a violation
of this subsection.

(2) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a)
"Employee" means a person who is providing services for compensation
to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's direction and
control over the performance of work. This definition shall be interpreted
consistent with common law.

(b)
"Employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, business
trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in any
business, industry, profession, or activity.

(c)
"Employment-based benefits" means any benefits to which an employee
may become or is entitled under any state law or any employer policy.

(3) Any employee
deeming himself or herself terminated or otherwise harmed in violation of
subsection (1) of this section may bring a civil action in a court of competent
jurisdiction. If the employee prevails, he or she shall be awarded:

(a) Either six months'
wages or treble the actual damages sustained by the employee as a result of
being terminated or otherwise harmed in violation of subsection (1) of this
section, whichever is greater;

(b) Costs of suit or
arbitration; and

(c) Reasonable
attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This act shall be
construed liberally for the accomplishment of the purposes thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. This act may be known and
cited as the employee benefits fairness act of 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

---
END ---