BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the present

_5 backlog of water right permits is unacceptable and that
it is

_6 essential to find a means for facilitating more
expeditious water

_7 permit processing and eliminating the permit application
backlog

_8 as soon as possible.

_9 The legislature therefore establishes a pilot water
permit

10 process for the eastern regional office of the
department of

11 ecology.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) An application
for a change or

13 transfer of an existing water right is to be processed
without

14 regard for the potential impairment such a change or
transfer

15 might have on any pending applications for new water
rights for

16 the same source of supply.

17 (2) Applications for existing water rights may be
processed and

p. 1 SB
5267

_1 decisions on them rendered independently of processing
and

_2 rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights

_3 within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of

_4 filing of pending applications for new water rights.

_5 (3) This section applies only to water permit
applications and

_6 water rights processed in the eastern regional office of
the

_7 department.

_8 (4) This section expires July 31, 2003.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The sum of one
hundred sixty

10 thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is

11 appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002,
from the

12 general fund to the department of ecology. The
department must use

13 one-half of this sum for the processing of new water
right

14 applications, and one-half of this sum for the
processing of

15 existing water right applications for change or
transfer.

16 (2) The sum of one hundred sixty thousand dollars,
or as much

17 thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
fiscal year

18 ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the
department of

19 ecology. The department must use one-half of this sum
for the

20 processing of new water right applications, and one-half
of this

21 sum for the processing of existing water right
applications for

22 change or transfer.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5267 p. 2