BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The director shall
produce a department publication in magazine format on a quarterly frequency
known as Washington wildlife. The purpose of the magazine is to showcase the
wildlife, fish, and shellfish resources of the state in order to increase
public understanding of the resources and the issues surrounding their
preservation and management. The department shall include information on
opportunities to volunteer in wildlife and fish conservation projects, public
education events, threatened and endangered species issues, recreational
fishing and hunting, wildlife viewing sites, commercial fishing activities,
aquaculture industry issues, habitat enhancement and protection, fish
hatcheries, wildlife relocation, injured wildlife rehabilitation, wildlife
damage to agricultural crops, the dynamics of properly functioning ecosystems,
current fish and wildlife-related legislative developments, opportunities for
the public to donate to causes that benefit wildlife, employment opportunities
within the department, relationships between the department and treaty Indian
tribes, and any other topics that the director determines would be helpful to
improving conditions for fish or wildlife or the understanding of fish or
wildlife management programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The director may provide
promotional copies of the magazine established in section 1 of this act to the
public at no cost, but must establish a fee structure designed to recoup a
portion of the magazine's production cost by selling subscriptions to the
public. In addition, the director may provide for private advertisements
within the magazine and set the monetary rates for advertisements. The
director may accept donations to assist in the production of the magazine. All
funds received from subscriptions, advertising, and donations must be placed in
the wildlife fund, created in RCW 77.12.170, for the exclusive purpose of
producing the magazine.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The director shall
utilize the employees of the department to produce articles, photographs,
editorials, and all other aspects of the Washington wildlife magazine,
established in section 1 of this act. It is not the intent of the legislature
to encourage the hiring of additional department employees to staff the
magazine. The intent of involving department employees is to provide an
opportunity for the department to focus its public information function into
Washington wildlife and to utilize the magazine as the premier contact with the
public. Other public information activities should be replaced by the
Washington wildlife magazine whenever possible. The first publication date of
Washington wildlife magazine is January 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each added to chapter 77.12 RCW.

---
END ---