BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 26.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In any proceeding
for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or a declaration of invalidity,
where there are no children of the marriage dependent on either spouse, the
court shall not enter any order pertaining to temporary or permanent
maintenance or division of property until the court has received the report
under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Within ten days of
filing a motion for payment of spousal maintenance or division of property and
liabilities under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall appoint a
family court arbitrator who shall meet with the parties or their
representatives, either jointly or separately, to review pertinent documents
relating to the financial resources and liabilities of the parties, including
community and separate property. Within thirty days from the date of filing
the petition, the family court arbitrator shall submit a report to the court
recommending temporary division of property or liabilities and temporary
maintenance, if appropriate. In developing the report regarding division of
property and liabilities, the family court arbitrator shall adhere to the
criteria in this chapter. The family court arbitrator shall have all powers of
the court relating to subpoena and injunctive relief.

(3) The time periods in
subsection (2) of this section may be extended by the family court arbitrator
for good cause.

(4) The parties to the
proceedings, or the family court arbitrator, may at any time apply to the court
for an order requiring the good faith cooperation and participation of the
parties.

(5) The court shall
give due consideration to the report submitted by the arbitrator under
subsection (2) of this section before entering any decree for the division of
property and for maintenance, if appropriate.

(6) The administrator
for the courts shall offer appropriate educational and training courses for
persons employed or appointed as family court arbitrators.

(7) The supreme court
is encouraged to adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.09.004 and 1987 c
460 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Temporary
parenting plan" means a plan for parenting of the child pending final
resolution of any action for dissolution of marriage, declaration of
invalidity, or legal separation which is incorporated in a temporary order.

(2) "Permanent
parenting plan" means a plan for parenting the child, including allocation
of parenting functions, which plan is incorporated in any final decree or
decree of modification in an action for dissolution of marriage, declaration of
invalidity, or legal separation.

(3) "Parenting
functions" means those aspects of the parent-child relationship in which
the parent makes decisions and performs functions necessary for the care and
growth of the child. Parenting functions include:

(a) Maintaining a
loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing relationship with the child;

(b) Attending to the
daily needs of the child, such as feeding, clothing, physical care and
grooming, supervision, health care, and day care, and engaging in other
activities which are appropriate to the developmental level of the child and
that are within the social and economic circumstances of the particular family;

(c) Attending to
adequate education for the child, including remedial or other education
essential to the best interests of the child;

(d) Assisting the child
in developing and maintaining appropriate interpersonal relationships;

(e) Exercising
appropriate judgment regarding the child's welfare, consistent with the child's
developmental level and the family's social and economic circumstances; and

(f) Providing for the
financial support of the child.

(4) "Family
court arbitrator" means a person with expertise and experience in family
law matters and conflict resolution who is employed or appointed by the court
to carry out the duties in section 1 of this act. Unless the parties stipulate
to a nonlawyer arbitrator, the person must be a member of the Washington state
bar association who has been admitted to the bar for a minimum of five years,
or a current or retired superior court judge or superior court commissioner.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.09.015 and 1991 c
367 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in section 1 of this act, in any proceeding under this chapter,
the matter may be set for mediation of the contested issues before or
concurrent with the setting of the matter for hearing. The purpose of the
mediation proceeding shall be to reduce acrimony which may exist between the
parties and to develop an agreement assuring the child's close and continuing
contact with both parents after the marriage is dissolved. The mediator shall
use his or her best efforts to effect a settlement of the dispute.

(2) Each superior court
may make available a mediator. The mediator may be a member of the
professional staff of a family court or mental health services agency, or may
be any other person or agency designated by the court. In order to provide
mediation services, the court is not required to institute a family court.

(3) Mediation
proceedings shall be held in private and shall be confidential. The mediator
shall not testify as to any aspect of the mediation proceedings. This
subsection shall not apply to postdecree mediation required pursuant to a
parenting plan.

(4) The mediator shall
assess the needs and interests of the child or children involved in the
controversy and may interview the child or children if the mediator deems such
interview appropriate or necessary.

(5) Any agreement
reached by the parties as a result of mediation shall be reported to the court
and to counsel for the parties by the mediator on the day set for mediation or
any time thereafter designated by the court.

Sec. 4. RCW 26.09.030 and 1996 c
23 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided
in section 1 of this act, when a party who (((1))) is a resident of
this state, or (((2))) is a member of the armed forces and is stationed
in this state, or (((3))) is married to a party who is a resident of
this state or who is a member of the armed forces and is stationed in this
state, petitions for a dissolution of marriage, and alleges that the marriage
is irretrievably broken and when ninety days have elapsed since the petition
was filed and from the date when service of summons was made upon the
respondent or the first publication of summons was made, the court shall
proceed as follows:

(1) If the other party
joins in the petition or does not deny that the marriage is irretrievably
broken, the court shall enter a decree of dissolution.

(2) If the other party
alleges that the petitioner was induced to file the petition by fraud, or
coercion, the court shall make a finding as to that allegation and, if it so
finds shall dismiss the petition.

(3) If the other party
denies that the marriage is irretrievably broken the court shall consider all
relevant factors, including the circumstances that gave rise to the filing of
the petition and the prospects for reconciliation and shall:

(a) Make a finding that
the marriage is irretrievably broken and enter a decree of dissolution of the
marriage; or

(b) At the request of
either party or on its own motion, transfer the cause to the family court,
refer them to another counseling service of their choice, and request a report
back from the counseling service within sixty days, or continue the matter for
not more than sixty days for hearing. If the cause is returned from the family
court or at the adjourned hearing, the court shall:

(i) Find that the
parties have agreed to reconciliation and dismiss the petition; or

(ii) Find that the
parties have not been reconciled, and that either party continues to allege
that the marriage is irretrievably broken. When such facts are found, the
court shall enter a decree of dissolution of the marriage.

(4) If the petitioner
requests the court to decree legal separation in lieu of dissolution, the court
shall enter the decree in that form unless the other party objects and
petitions for a decree of dissolution or declaration of invalidity.

Sec. 5. RCW 26.09.040 and 1987 c
460 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) While both parties
to an alleged marriage are living, and at least one party is resident in this
state or a member of the armed service and stationed in the state, a petition
to have the marriage declared invalid may be sought by:

(a) Either or both
parties, or the guardian of an incompetent spouse, for any cause specified in
subsection (4) of this section; or

(b) Either or both
parties, the legal spouse, or a child of either party when it is alleged that
the marriage is bigamous.

(2) If the validity of
a marriage is denied or questioned at any time, either or both parties to the
marriage may petition the court for a judicial determination of the validity of
such marriage.

(3) In a proceeding to
declare the invalidity of a marriage, the court shall proceed in the manner and
shall have the jurisdiction, including the authority to provide for maintenance,
a parenting plan for minor children, and division of the property of the
parties, provided by this chapter.

(4) After hearing the
evidence concerning the validity of a marriage, if both parties to the alleged
marriage are still living, the court:

(a) If it finds the
marriage to be valid, shall enter a decree of validity;

(b) If it finds that:

(i) The marriage should
not have been contracted because of age of one or both of the parties, lack of
required parental or court approval, a prior undissolved marriage of one or
both of the parties, reasons of consanguinity, or because a party lacked capacity
to consent to the marriage, either because of mental incapacity or because of
the influence of alcohol or other incapacitating substances, or because a party
was induced to enter into the marriage by force or duress, or by fraud
involving the essentials of marriage, and that the parties have not ratified
their marriage by voluntarily cohabiting after attaining the age of consent, or
after attaining capacity to consent, or after cessation of the force or duress
or discovery of the fraud, shall declare the marriage invalid as of the date it
was purportedly contracted;

(ii) The marriage
should not have been contracted because of any reason other than those above,
shall upon motion of a party, order any action which may be appropriate to
complete or to correct the record and enter a decree declaring such marriage to
be valid for all purposes from the date upon which it was purportedly
contracted;

(c) If it finds that a
marriage contracted in a jurisdiction other than this state, was void or
voidable under the law of the place where the marriage was contracted, and in
the absence of proof that such marriage was subsequently validated by the laws
of the place of contract or of a subsequent domicile of the parties, shall
declare the marriage invalid as of the date of the marriage.

(5) The provisions
of section 1 of this act apply to proceedings under this section.

(6) Any child of
the parties born or conceived during the existence of a marriage of record is
legitimate and remains legitimate notwithstanding the entry of a declaration of
invalidity of the marriage.

Sec. 6. RCW 26.09.060 and 2000 c
119 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a proceeding
for:

(a) Dissolution of
marriage, legal separation, or a declaration of invalidity; or

(b) Disposition of
property or liabilities, maintenance, or support following dissolution of the
marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse;
either party may move for temporary maintenance or for temporary support of
children entitled to support. The motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit
setting forth the factual basis for the motion and the amounts requested.

(2) As a part of a
motion for temporary maintenance or support or by independent motion accompanied
by affidavit, either party may request the court to issue a temporary
restraining order or preliminary injunction, providing relief proper in the
circumstances, and restraining or enjoining any person from:

(a) Transferring,
removing, encumbering, concealing, or in any way disposing of any property
except in the usual course of business or for the necessities of life, and, if
so restrained or enjoined, requiring him or her to notify the moving party of
any proposed extraordinary expenditures made after the order is issued;

(b) Molesting or
disturbing the peace of the other party or of any child;

(c) Going onto the
grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other party or the
day care or school of any child upon a showing of the necessity therefor;

(d) Knowingly coming
within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location; and

(e) Removing a child
from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3) Either party may
request a domestic violence protection order under chapter 26.50 RCW or an
antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW on a temporary basis.
The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW 26.50.060 except relief
pertaining to residential provisions for the children which provisions shall be
provided for under this chapter, and any of the relief provided in RCW
10.14.080. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection shall be effective for
a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon court order, not to exceed
twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all temporary motions in the case
can be heard at the same time.

(4) In issuing the
order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(5) The court may issue
a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to the other party only
if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence that
irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until the time for
responding has elapsed.

(6) The court may issue
a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction and an order for
temporary maintenance or support in such amounts and on such terms as are just
and proper in the circumstances. The court may in its discretion waive the
filing of the bond or the posting of security. Any order for temporary
maintenance or support must comply with section 1 of this act if applicable.

(7) Restraining orders
issued under this section restraining the person from molesting or disturbing
another party, or from going onto the grounds of or entering the home,
workplace, or school of the other party or the day care or school of any child,
or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining
within, a specified distance of a location, shall prominently bear on the front
page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF
ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A
VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(8) The court shall
order that any temporary restraining order bearing a criminal offense legend,
any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment protection order
granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the court on or before
the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in
the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter
the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system
available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding
warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information
system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of
the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(9) If a restraining
order issued pursuant to this section is modified or terminated, the clerk of
the court shall notify the law enforcement agency specified in the order on or
before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been
terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any
computer-based criminal intelligence system.

(10) A temporary order,
temporary restraining order, or preliminary injunction:

(a) Does not prejudice
the rights of a party or any child which are to be adjudicated at subsequent
hearings in the proceeding;

(b) May be revoked or
modified;

(c) Terminates when the
final decree is entered, except as provided under subsection (11) of this
section, or when the petition for dissolution, legal separation, or declaration
of invalidity is dismissed;

(d) May be entered in a
proceeding for the modification of an existing decree.

(11) Delinquent support
payments accrued under an order for temporary support remain collectible and
are not extinguished when a final decree is entered unless the decree contains
specific language to the contrary. A support debt under a temporary order owed
to the state for public assistance expenditures shall not be extinguished by
the final decree if:

(a) The obligor was
given notice of the state's interest under chapter 74.20A RCW; or

(b) The temporary order
directs the obligor to make support payments to the office of support
enforcement or the Washington state support registry.

Sec. 7. RCW 26.09.080 and 1989 c
375 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In a proceeding for
dissolution of the marriage, legal separation, declaration of invalidity, or in
a proceeding for disposition of property following dissolution of the marriage
by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse or lacked
jurisdiction to dispose of the property, the court shall, in accordance with
the requirements of section 1 of this act and without regard to marital
misconduct, make such disposition of the property and the liabilities of the
parties, either community or separate, as shall appear just and equitable after
considering all relevant factors including, but not limited to:

(1) The nature and
extent of the community property;

(2) The nature and
extent of the separate property;

(3) The duration of the
marriage; and

(4) The economic
circumstances of each spouse at the time the division of property is to become
effective, including the desirability of awarding the family home or the right
to live therein for reasonable periods to a spouse with whom the children
reside the majority of the time.

Sec. 8. RCW 26.09.090 and 1989 c
375 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) In a
proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, declaration of
invalidity, or in a proceeding for maintenance following dissolution of the
marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse,
the court may grant a maintenance order for either spouse. The maintenance
order shall be in such amounts and for such periods of time as the court deems
just, in accordance with the requirements of section 1 of this act and
without regard to marital misconduct, after considering all relevant factors
including but not limited to:

(((a))) (1)
The financial resources of the party seeking maintenance, including separate or
community property apportioned to ((him)) the party, and ((his))
the party's ability to meet his or her needs independently,
including the extent to which a provision for support of a child living with
the party includes a sum for that party;

(((b))) (2)
The time necessary to acquire sufficient education or training to enable the
party seeking maintenance to find employment appropriate to ((his)) the
party's skill, interests, style of life, and other attendant circumstances;

(((c))) (3)
The standard of living established during the marriage;

(((d))) (4)
The duration of the marriage;

(((e))) (5)
The age, physical and emotional condition, and financial obligations of the
spouse seeking maintenance; and

(((f)))
(6) The ability of the spouse from whom maintenance is sought to meet ((his))
the spouse's needs and financial obligations while meeting those of the
spouse seeking maintenance.

---
END ---