BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Health carriers
must cover, pay for, contract for, or reimburse for diagnosis and treatment of
the following mental disorders defined in the most current edition of the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American
psychiatric association:

(a) Schizophrenia;

(b) Schizoaffective
disorder;

(c) Major depressive
disorder;

(d) Bipolar disorder;

(e) Paranoid, schizoid,
and schizotypal disorders;

(f) Obsessive-compulsive
disorder; and

(g) Panic disorder.

(2) For purposes of
this section, and sections 2 and 3 of this act, "health carrier" or
"carrier" means a disability insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or
48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, a
health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, plans operating
under the state health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW, the state health
insurance pool operating under chapters 48.41 and 70.47 RCW, and insuring
entities regulated in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Health carriers
must cover, pay for, contract for, or reimburse for diagnosis and treatment of
a minor's mental condition not covered under section 1 of this act when:

(a) The minor has
accessed care from a licensed or certified mental health practitioner on more
than one occasion;

(b) The minor has been
recommended for a mental health evaluation by a probation counselor within the
juvenile justice system; or

(c) The minor has been
admitted to an emergency room for care and the mental status of the minor
contributed to the need for care.

(2) For purposes of
this section:

(a) "Mental
condition" means identification of functional characteristics by a
licensed or certified mental health practitioner through a mental status
evaluation, which indicates the minor would likely suffer further deficit in
functional characteristics without treatment from a licensed or certified
mental health practitioner.

(b) "Functional
characteristics" means appearance and self-care, sensorium, relating,
affect and mood, thought and language, executive functions, stress, and social
functioning.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Under the provisions of
this act, a health carrier is prohibited from limiting benefits based on a
criteria that is not applicable to the provision of benefits for chronic
medical conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

The office
of the insurance commissioner may develop rules to implement this act.

---
END ---