BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
29.81A.060 and 1984 c 106 s 8 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 As soon as practicable before the primary, special
election, or

_7 general election, the county auditor, or if applicable,
the city

_8 clerk of a first-class or code city, as appropriate,
shall mail

_9 the local voters' pamphlet to every residence in each
jurisdiction

10 that has included information in the pamphlet. The
county auditor

11 or city clerk, as appropriate, may choose to mail the
pamphlet to

12 each registered voter in each jurisdiction that has
included

13 information in the pamphlet, if in his or her judgment,
a more

14 economical and effective distribution of the pamphlet
would

15 result. If the county or city chooses to mail the pamphlet
to each

16 residence, no notice of election otherwise required by
RCW

17 29.27.030 or 29.27.080 need be published.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5272