BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
29.15.170 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 10 are each

_5 amended to read as follows:

_6 Filings for a nonpartisan office shall be reopened
for a period

_7 of three normal business days, such three day period to
be fixed

_8 by the election officer with whom such declarations of
candidacy

_9 are filed and notice thereof given by notifying press,
radio, and

10 television in the county and by such other means as may
now or

11 hereafter be provided by law whenever before the ((fourth))
sixth

12 Tuesday prior to a primary:

13 (1) A void in candidacy occurs;

14 (2) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office
leaving an

15 unexpired term to be filled by an election for which
filings have

16 not been held; or

17 (3) A nominee for judge of the superior court
entitled to a

18 certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section
29,

19 Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is
disqualified.

p. 1 SB
5273

_1 Candidacies validly filed within said three-day
period shall

_2 appear on the ballot as if made during the earlier
filing period.

_3 Sec. 2. RCW
29.15.180 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 11 are each

_4 amended to read as follows:

_5 Filings for a nonpartisan office (other than judge
of the

_6 supreme court or superintendent of public instruction)
shall be

_7 reopened for a period of three normal business days,
such three

_8 day period to be fixed by the election officer with whom
such

_9 declarations of candidacy are filed and notice thereof
given by

10 notifying press, radio, and television in the county and
by such

11 other means as may now or hereafter be provided by law,
when:

12 (1) A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office
occurs on

13 or after the ((fourth)) sixth Tuesday
prior to a primary but prior

14 to the ((fourth)) sixth Tuesday before an
election; or

15 (2) A nominee for judge of the superior court
eligible after a

16 contested primary for a certificate of election by
Article 4,

17 section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies
or is

18 disqualified within the ten day period ((when a
petition for write-

19 in candidacy may be received)) immediately
following the last day

20 alloted for a candidate to withdraw; or

21 (3) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or
after the

22 ((fourth)) sixth Tuesday prior to a
primary but prior to the

23 ((fourth)) sixth Tuesday before an
election leaving an unexpired

24 term to be filled by an election for which filings have
not been

25 held.

26 The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes
cast for that

27 office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

28 Sec. 3. RCW
29.15.230 and 1981 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read

29 as follows:

30 Filings for a partisan elective office shall be
opened for a

31 period of three normal business days whenever, on or
after the

32 first day of the regular filing period and before the ((fourth))

33 sixth Tuesday prior to a primary, a vacancy
occurs in that office,

34 leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election
for which

35 filings have not been held.

36 Any such special three-day filing period shall be
fixed by the

SB 5273 p. 2

_1 election officer with whom declarations of candidacy for
that

_2 office are filed. The election officer shall give
notice of the

_3 special three-day filing period by notifying the press,
radio, and

_4 television in the county or counties involved, and by
such other

_5 means as may be required by law.

_6 Candidacies validly filed within the special
three-day filing

_7 period shall appear on the primary ballot as if filed
during the

_8 regular filing period.

_9

10 Sec. 4. RCW
29.18.160 and 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 13 are each amended

11 to read as follows:

12 A vacancy caused by the death or disqualification of
any

13 candidate or nominee of a major or minor political party
may be

14 filled at any time up to and including the day prior to
the

15 election for that position. For state partisan offices
in any

16 political subdivision voted on solely by electors of a
single

17 county, an individual shall be appointed to fill such
vacancy by

18 the county central committee in the case of a major
political

19 party or by the state central committee or comparable
governing

20 body in the case of a minor political party. For other
partisan

21 offices, including federal or statewide offices, an individual

22 shall be appointed to fill such vacancy by the state
central

23 committee or comparable governing body of the
appropriate

24 political party.

25 Should such vacancy occur no later than the ((third))
sixth

26 Tuesday prior to the state primary or general election
concerned

27 and the ballots ((and voting machine labels))
have been printed,

28 it shall be mandatory that they be corrected by the
appropriate

29 election officers. In making such correction, it shall
not be

30 necessary to reprint complete ballots if any other less
expensive

31 technique can be used and the resulting correction is
reasonably

32 clear.

33 Should such vacancy occur after the ((third))
sixth Tuesday

34 prior to said state primary or general election and time
does not

35 exist in which to correct ((paper)) ballots
(including absentee

36 ballots) ((or voting machine labels)), either in
total or in part,

37 then the votes cast or recorded for the person who has
died or

p. 3 SB
5273

_1 become disqualified shall be counted for the person who
has been

_2 named to fill such vacancy.

_3 When the secretary of state is the person with whom
the

_4 appointment by the major or minor political party is
filed, he

_5 shall, in certifying candidates or nominations to the
various

_6 county officers insert the name of the person appointed
to fill a

_7 vacancy.

_8 In the event that the secretary of state has already
sent forth

_9 his certificate when the appointment to fill a vacancy
is filed

10 with him, he shall forthwith certify to the county
auditors of the

11 proper counties the name and place of residence of the
person

12 appointed to fill a vacancy, the office for which he is
a

13 candidate or nominee, the party he represents and all
other

14 pertinent facts pertaining to the vacancy.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5273 p. 4