BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

ABSENTEE VOTING

Sec. 1. RCW 29.36.010 and 1991 c
81 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

ABSENTEE BALLOT VOTING.
Any registered voter of the state or any out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or
service voter may vote by absentee ballot in any general election, special
election, or primary in the manner provided in this chapter. Out-of-state
voters, overseas voters, and service voters are authorized to cast the same
ballots, including those for special elections, as a registered voter of the
state would receive under this chapter.

(((1) Except as
provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, in RCW 29.36.013, and in
RCW 29.36.170, a registered voter or elector desiring to cast an absentee
ballot must request the absentee ballot from his or her county auditor no
earlier than forty-five days nor later than the day before any election or
primary. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and in RCW
29.36.170, the request may be made orally in person, by telephone, or in
writing. An application or request for an absentee ballot made under the
authority of any federal statute or regulation shall be considered and given
the same effect as a request for an absentee ballot under this chapter.

(2) For any
registered voter, a request for an absentee ballot for a primary shall be
honored as a request for an absentee ballot for the following general election
if the voter so indicates in his or her request. For any out-of-state voter,
overseas voter, or service voter, a request for an absentee ballot for a
primary election shall also be honored as a request for an absentee ballot for
the following general election.

(3) A voter admitted
to a hospital no earlier than five days before a primary or election and
confined to the hospital on election day may apply by messenger for an absentee
ballot on the day of the primary or election if a signed statement from the hospital
administrator, or designee, verifying the voter's date of admission and status
as a patient in the hospital on the day of the primary or election is attached
to the voter's written application for an absentee ballot.

(4) In a voter's
request for an absentee ballot, the voter shall state the address to which the
absentee ballot should be sent. A request for an absentee ballot from an
out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter shall state the address of
that elector's last residence for voting purposes in the state of Washington
and either a written application or the oath on the return envelope shall
include a declaration of the other qualifications of the applicant as an
elector of this state. A request for an absentee ballot from any other voter
shall state the address at which that voter is currently registered to vote in
the state of Washington or the county auditor shall verify such information
from the voter registration records of the county.

(5) A request for an
absentee ballot from a registered voter who is within this state shall be made
directly to the auditor of the county in which the voter is registered. An
absentee ballot request from a registered voter who is temporarily outside this
state or from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may be
made either to the appropriate county auditor or to the secretary of state, who
shall promptly forward the request to the appropriate county auditor. No
person, organization, or association may distribute absentee ballot
applications within this state that contain any return address other than that
of the appropriate county auditor.

(6) A person may
request an absentee ballot for use by the person as a registered voter and may
request an absentee ballot on behalf of any member of that person's immediate
family who is a registered voter for use by the family member. As a means of
ensuring that a person who requests an absentee ballot is requesting the ballot
for only that person or a member of the person's immediate family, the
secretary of state shall adopt rules prescribing the circumstances under which
an auditor: May require a person who requests an absentee ballot to identify
the date of birth of the voter for whom the ballot is requested; and may deny a
request which is not accompanied by this information.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

REQUEST FOR SINGLE
ABSENTEE BALLOT. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, a registered voter
or out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter desiring to cast an
absentee ballot at a single election or primary must request the absentee
ballot from his or her county auditor no earlier than ninety days nor later
than the day of the election or primary at which the person seeks to vote.
Except as otherwise provided by law, the request may be made orally in person,
by telephone, electronically, or in writing. An application or request for an
absentee ballot made under the authority of a federal statute or regulation
will be considered and given the same effect as a request for an absentee
ballot under this chapter.

(2) A voter requesting
an absentee ballot for a primary may also request an absentee ballot for the
following general election. A request by an out-of-state voter, overseas
voter, or service voter for an absentee ballot for a primary election will be
considered as a request for an absentee ballot for the following general
election.

(3) In requesting an
absentee ballot, the voter shall state the address to which the absentee ballot
should be sent. A request for an absentee ballot from an out-of-state voter,
overseas voter, or service voter must include the address of the last residence
in the state of Washington and either a written application or the oath on the
return envelope must include a declaration of the other qualifications of the
applicant as an elector of this state. A request for an absentee ballot from
any other voter must state the address at which that voter is currently
registered to vote in the state of Washington or the county auditor shall
verify that information from the voter registration records of the county.

(4) A request for an
absentee ballot from a registered voter who is within this state must be made
directly to the auditor of the county in which the voter is registered. An
absentee ballot request from a registered voter who is temporarily outside this
state or from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may be
made either to the appropriate county auditor or to the secretary of state, who
shall promptly forward the request to the appropriate county auditor. No
person, organization, or association may distribute absentee ballot
applications within this state that contain a return address other than that of
the appropriate county auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

REQUESTING ABSENTEE
BALLOT FOR FAMILY MEMBER. A member of a registered voter's family may request
an absentee ballot on behalf of and for use by the voter. As a means of
ensuring that a person who requests an absentee ballot is requesting the ballot
for only that person or a member of the person's immediate family, the
secretary of state shall adopt rules prescribing the circumstances under which
an auditor may require a person who requests an absentee ballot to identify the
date of birth of the voter for whom the ballot is requested and under what
circumstances the auditor may deny a request that is not accompanied by this
information.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.36.013 and 1999 c
298 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

REQUEST FOR ONGOING
ABSENTEE VOTER STATUS. Any registered voter may apply, in writing, for
status as an ongoing absentee voter. Each qualified applicant shall
automatically receive an absentee ballot for each ensuing election or
primary for which ((he or she)) the voter is entitled to vote
and need not submit a separate request for each election. Ballots received
from ongoing absentee voters shall be validated, processed, and tabulated in
the same manner as other absentee ballots.

Status as an ongoing
absentee voter shall be terminated upon any of the following events:

(1) The written request
of the voter;

(2) The death or
disqualification of the voter;

(3) The cancellation of
the voter's registration record;

(4) The return of an
ongoing absentee ballot as undeliverable; or

(5) Upon placing a
voter on inactive status under RCW 29.10.071.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.36.170 and 1991 c
81 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

SPECIAL ABSENTEE
BALLOT. (1) As provided in this section, county auditors shall provide special
absentee ballots to be used for state primary or state general elections. An
auditor shall provide a special absentee ballot ((shall)) only ((be
provided)) to a registered voter who completes an application
stating that((:

(a) The voter
believes that she or he will be residing or stationed or working outside the
continental United States; and

(b) The voter
believes that)) she or he will
be unable to vote and return a regular absentee ballot by normal mail delivery
within the period provided for regular absentee ballots.

The application for a
special absentee ballot may not be filed earlier than ninety days before the
applicable state primary or general election. The special absentee ballot ((shall))
will list the offices and measures, if known, scheduled to appear on the
state primary or general election ballot. The voter may use the special
absentee ballot to write in the name of any eligible candidate for each office
and vote on any measure.

(2) With any special
absentee ballot issued under this section, the county auditor shall include a
listing of any candidates who have filed before the time of the application for
offices that will appear on the ballot at that primary or election and a list
of any issues that have been referred to the ballot before the time of the
application.

(3) Write-in votes on
special absentee ballots ((shall)) must be counted in the same
manner provided by law for the counting of other write-in votes. The county
auditor shall process and canvass the special absentee ballots provided under
this section in the same manner as other absentee ballots under chapters 29.36
and 29.62 RCW.

(4) A voter who
requests a special absentee ballot under this section may also request an
absentee ballot under ((RCW 29.36.010)) section 2(4) of this act.
If the regular absentee ballot is properly voted and returned, the special
absentee ballot ((shall be deemed)) is void, and the
county auditor shall reject it in whole when special absentee ballots are
canvassed.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.36.030 and 1991 c
81 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

ISSUANCE OF ABSENTEE
BALLOT. (1) The county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the
primary or election for which it was requested, or for the next occurring
primary or election when ongoing absentee status has been requested if the
information contained in a request for an absentee ballot or ongoing
absentee status received by the county auditor is complete and correct and
the applicant is qualified to vote under federal or state law((, the county
auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the primary or election for which
the absentee ballot was requested)). Otherwise, the county auditor shall
notify the applicant of the reason or reasons why the request cannot be
accepted. Whenever two or more candidates have filed for the position of
precinct committee officer for the same party in the same precinct at a general
election held in an even-numbered year, the contest for that position must be presented
to absentee voters from that precinct by either including the contest on the
regular absentee ballot or a separate absentee ballot. The ballot must provide
space designated for writing in the name of additional candidates.

((At each general
election in an even-numbered year, each absentee voter shall also be given a
separate ballot containing the names of the candidates that have filed for the
office of precinct committee officer unless fewer than two candidates have
filed for the same political party in the absentee voter's precinct. The
ballot shall provide space for writing in the name of additional candidates.

When mailing an
absentee ballot to a registered voter temporarily outside the state or to an
out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter, the county auditor shall
send a)) (2) A registered
voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled,
lost, or not received by the voter. The voter may obtain the ballot by
telephone request, by mail, electronically, or in person. The county auditor
shall keep a record of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.

(3) A copy of
the state voters' and candidates' pamphlet must be sent to registered voters
temporarily outside the state, out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and
service voters along with the absentee ballot if such a pamphlet has
been prepared for the primary or election and is available to the county
auditor at the time of mailing. The county auditor shall mail all absentee
ballots and related material to voters outside the territorial limits of the
United States and the District of Columbia under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

Sec. 7. RCW 29.36.035 and 1984 c
27 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

DELIVERY OF ABSENTEE
BALLOT. The delivery of an absentee ballot for any primary or election shall
be subject to the following qualifications:

(1) Only the registered
voter((, himself)) personally, or a member of ((his)) the
registered voter's immediate family may pick up an absentee ballot for
the voter at the office of the issuing officer unless the voter is ((hospitalized))
a resident of a health care facility, as defined by RCW 70.37.020(3), on
election day and applies by messenger ((in accordance with RCW 29.36.010))
for an absentee ballot ((on the day of the primary or election)). In
this latter case, the messenger may pick up the ((hospitalized)) voter's
absentee ballot.

(2) Except as noted in
subsection (1) ((above)) of this section, the issuing officer
shall mail or deliver the absentee ballot directly to each applicant.

(((3) No absentee
ballot shall be issued on the day of the primary or election concerned, except
as provided by RCW 29.36.010, for a voter confined to a hospital on the day of
a primary or election.))

Sec. 8. RCW 29.36.045 and 1987 c
346 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

ENVELOPES AND
INSTRUCTIONS. The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope
in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on how to mark the
ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The larger return envelope
((shall)) must contain a declaration by the absentee voter
reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in
any other jurisdiction at this election, together with a summary of the
penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The
return envelope ((shall)) must provide space for the voter to
indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the
oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter ((shall))
must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space
for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the return envelope
((shall)) must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter
registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued.
The voter ((shall)) must be instructed to either return the
ballot to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first
class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate county
auditor no later than the day of the election or primary for which the ballot
was issued.

If the county
auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or she must include with the
ballot a clear explanation of the qualifications necessary to vote in that
election and must also advise a voter with questions about his or her
eligibility to contact the county auditor. This explanation may be provided on
the ballot envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly indicate
that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage is guaranteed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

OBSERVERS. County
auditors must request that observers be appointed by the major political
parties to be present during the processing of absentee ballots. The absence
of the observers will not prevent the processing of absentee ballots if the
county auditor has requested their presence.

Sec. 10. RCW 29.36.060 and 1991 c
81 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

PROCESSING ABSENTEE
BALLOTS. (1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes
for any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day ((prior to
such)) before the primary or election. The ((opening of the
security envelopes and)) tabulation of absentee ballots ((shall)) must
not commence until after 8:00 ((o'clock)) p.m. on the day of the primary
or election.

(2) After
opening the return envelopes, the county canvassing board shall place all of
the ballots ((envelopes in containers that can be secured with
numbered seals. These sealed containers shall be stored)) in ((a))
secure ((location)) storage until after 8:00 ((o'clock))
p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee ballots that are to be
tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be taken from the inner envelopes
and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to prepare these ballots
for tabulation ((before sealing the containers)).

(3) Before opening a
returned absentee ballot, the canvassing board, or its designated
representatives, shall examine the postmark, statement, and signature on ((each))
the return envelope ((containing)) that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify that the voter's
signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature of
that voter in the registration files ((for that voter)) of the
county. For ((absentee)) registered voters ((other than
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, if the postmark is
illegible)) casting absentee ballots, the date on the return
envelope to which the voter ((attests shall)) has attested
determines the validity, as to the time of voting((, of)) for
that absentee ballot ((under this chapter)) if the postmark is
missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and
service voters, the date on the return envelope to which the voter has attested
determines the validity as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot.
For any absentee ((voter)) ballot, a variation between the
signature of the voter on the return envelope and the signature of that voter
in the registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use of
common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are
clearly the same.

(4) Ballots must be
processed in the manner provided by administrative rule adopted by the
secretary of state.

Sec. 11. RCW 29.36.070 and 1990 c
262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

COUNTING ABSENTEE
BALLOTS. The absentee ballots ((shall be grouped and counted by)) must
be reported at a minimum on a congressional and legislative district ((without
regard to)) basis. Absentee ballots may be counted by congressional or
legislative basis or by individual precinct, except as required under RCW
29.62.090(2).

These returns ((shall))
must be added to the total of the votes cast at the polling places.

Sec. 12. RCW 29.36.075 and 1988 c
181 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

CREDIT FOR VOTING. ((In
counties that do not tabulate absentee ballots on electronic vote tallying
systems, canvassing boards may not tabulate or record votes cast by absentee
ballots on any uncontested office except write-in votes for candidates for the
office of precinct committeeperson who have filed valid declarations of
candidacy under RCW 29.04.180. "Uncontested office" means an office
where only one candidate has filed a valid declaration of candidacy either
during the regular filing period or as a write-in candidate under RCW
29.04.180.))

Each registered voter
casting an absentee ballot ((shall)) will be credited with voting
on his or her voter registration record. Absentee ballots ((shall)) must
be retained for the same length of time and in the same manner as ballots cast
at the precinct polling places.

Sec. 13. RCW 29.36.100 and 1987 c
346 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

CHALLENGED ABSENTEE
BALLOTS. The qualifications of any absentee voter may be challenged at the
time the signature on the return envelope is verified and the ballot is
processed by the canvassing board. The board has the authority to determine
the legality of any absentee ballot challenged under this section. Challenged
ballots must be handled in accordance with chapter 29.10 RCW.

Sec. 14. RCW 29.36.150 and 1993 c
417 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

RULES FOR ACCURACY,
SECRECY, AND UNIFORMITY‑-OUT-OF-STATE, OVERSEAS, AND SERVICE VOTERS. The
secretary of state shall adopt rules to:

(1) Establish standards
and procedures ((to prevent fraud and)) to facilitate the accurate
processing and canvassing of absentee ballots and mail ballots;

(2) Establish standards
and procedures to ((guarantee)) provide for the secrecy of absentee
ballots and mail ballots;

(3) Provide for
uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of absentee voting
and mail ballot elections; and

(4) Facilitate the
operation of the provisions of this chapter regarding out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters.

The secretary of state
shall produce and furnish envelopes and instructions for out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters to the county auditors.

Sec. 15. RCW 29.36.160 and 1994 c
269 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

PENALTY. A person who
willfully violates any provision of this chapter regarding the assertion or
declaration of qualifications to receive or cast an absentee ballot((,))
or unlawfully casts a vote by absentee ballot((, or willfully
violates any provision regarding the conduct of mail ballot primaries or
elections under RCW 29.36.120 through 29.36.139)) is guilty of a class C
felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021. Except as provided in chapter 29.85 RCW
a person who willfully violates any other provision of this chapter is guilty
of a misdemeanor.

PART
II

MAIL BALLOTS

Sec. 16. RCW 29.36.120 and 1994 c
269 s 1 and 1994 c 57 s 48 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

MAIL BALLOT PRECINCTS.
(((1) At any primary or election, general or special,)) The
county auditor may((, in)) designate any precinct having fewer
than two hundred active registered voters at the time of closing of voter
registration as provided in RCW 29.07.160((, conduct the voting in that
precinct by)) as a mail ballot precinct. ((For any
precinct having fewer than two hundred active registered voters where voting at
a primary or a general election is conducted by mail ballot, the county auditor
shall, not less than fifteen days prior to the date of that primary or general
election, mail or deliver to each active and inactive registered voter within
that precinct a notice that the voting in that precinct will be by mail ballot,
an application form for a mail ballot, and a postage prepaid envelope,
preaddressed to the issuing officer. A mail ballot shall be issued to each
voter who returns a properly executed application to the county auditor no
later than the day of that primary or general election. For all subsequent
mail ballot elections in that precinct the application is valid so long as the
voter remains active and qualified to vote.)) The county auditor shall
notify each registered voter by mail that for all future primaries and
elections the voting in his or her precinct will be by mail ballot only.
In determining the number of registered voters in a precinct for the purposes
of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee voters under RCW 29.36.013 (as
recodified by this act) shall not be counted. Nothing in this section may
be construed as altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW 29.62.090.

((At any nonpartisan
special election not being held in conjunction with a state primary or general
election, the county, city, town, or district requesting the election pursuant
to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020 may also request that the election be conducted
by mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request or may determine that
the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The decision of the county
auditor in this regard is final.

In no instance shall
any special election be conducted by mail ballot in any precinct with two
hundred or more active registered voters if candidates for partisan office are
to be voted upon.

For all special
elections not being held in conjunction with a state primary or state general
election where voting is conducted by mail ballot, the county auditor shall,
not less than fifteen days prior to the date of such election, mail or deliver
to each active registered voter a mail ballot and an envelope, preaddressed to
the issuing officer.)) As
soon as ballots are available, the county auditor shall mail or deliver a
ballot and an envelope, preaddressed to the issuing officer, to each active
registered voter. The auditor shall send each inactive voter either a
ballot or an application to receive a ballot. The auditor shall determine
which of the two is to be sent. If the inactive voter returns a voted ballot,
the ballot shall be counted and the voter's status restored to active. If the
inactive voter completes and returns an application, a ballot shall be sent and
the voter's status restored to active.

(((2) For a two-year
period beginning on June 9, 1994, and ending two years after June 9, 1994, the
county auditor may conduct the voting in any precinct by mail for any primary
or election, partisan or nonpartisan, using the procedures set forth in RCW
29.36.120 through 29.36.139.))

If the precinct
exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the auditor determines to return to a
polling place election environment, the auditor shall notify each registered
voter, by mail, of this and shall provide the address of the polling place to
be used.

Sec. 17. RCW 29.36.121 and 1994 c
57 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

MAIL BALLOT SPECIAL
ELECTIONS. (((1))) At any nonpartisan special election not being held
in conjunction with a state primary or general election, the county, city,
town, or district requesting the election pursuant to RCW 29.13.010 or
29.13.020 may also request that the special election be conducted by
mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request or may determine that
the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The decision of the county
auditor in this regard is final.

(((2) In an
odd-numbered year, the county auditor may conduct by mail ballot a primary or a
special election concurrently with the primary:

(a) For any office
or ballot measure of a special purpose district which is entirely within the
county;

(b) For any office
or ballot measure of a special purpose district which lies in the county and
one or more other counties if the auditor first secures the concurrence of the
county auditors of those other counties to conduct the primary in this manner
district-wide; and

(c) For any ballot
measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city, or town if the auditor first
secures the concurrence of the legislative authority of the county, city, or
town involved.

A primary in an
odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail ballot in any precinct with two
hundred or more active registered voters if a partisan office or state office
or state ballot measure is to be voted upon at that primary in the precinct.

(3))) For all special elections not being held in
conjunction with a state primary or state general election where voting is conducted
by mail ballot, the county auditor shall, not less than ((fifteen)) twenty
days before the date of such election, ((mail or deliver)) make
available to each registered voter a mail ballot ((and an envelope,
preaddressed to the issuing officer. The county auditor shall notify an
election jurisdiction for which a primary is to be held that the primary will
be conducted by mail ballot)). The auditor shall handle inactive voters
in the same manner as inactive voters in mail ballot precincts.

(((4) To the extent
they are not inconsistent with subsections (1) through (3) of this section, the
laws governing the conduct of mail ballot special elections apply to
nonpartisan primaries conducted by mail ballot.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. ODD-YEAR PRIMARIES BY
MAIL. In an odd-numbered year, the county auditor may conduct a primary or a
special election by mail ballot concurrently with the primary:

(1) For an office or
ballot measure of a special purpose district that is entirely within the
county;

(2) For an office or
ballot measure of a special purpose district that lies in the county and one or
more other counties if the auditor first secures the concurrence of the county
auditors of those other counties to conduct the primary in this manner
district-wide; and

(3) For a ballot
measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city, or town if the auditor first
secures the concurrence of the legislative authority of the county, city, or
town involved.

The county auditor
shall notify an election jurisdiction for which a primary is to be held that
the primary will be conducted by mail ballot.

A primary in an
odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail ballot in a precinct with two
hundred or more active registered voters if a partisan office or state office
or state ballot measure is to be voted upon at that primary in the precinct.

To the extent they are
not inconsistent with other provisions of law, the laws governing the conduct
of mail ballot special elections apply to nonpartisan primaries conducted by
mail ballot.

Sec. 19. RCW 29.36.124 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 71 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

DEPOSITING BALLOTS FOR
MAIL BALLOT ELECTIONS. (1) If a county auditor conducts an election by mail,
the county auditor shall designate ((the county auditor's office or a
central location in the district in which the election is conducted as the
single place to obtain a replacement ballot. The county auditor also shall
designate)) one or more places for the deposit of ballots not returned by
mail. The places designated under this section shall be open on the date of
the election for a period of thirteen hours, beginning at 7:00 a.m. and ending
at 8:00 p.m.

(2) A registered voter
may obtain a replacement ballot as provided in this subsection if the ballot is
destroyed, ((spoiled)) damaged, lost, or not received by the
voter. ((A registered voter seeking a replacement ballot shall sign a sworn
statement that the ballot was destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received and
shall present the statement to the county auditor no later than the day of the
election. Each spoiled ballot must be returned to the county auditor before a
new one is issued.)) A voter may request a replacement mail ballot in
person, by mail, by telephone, or by other electronic transmission for himself
or herself and for any member of his or her immediate family. The request must
be received by the auditor before 8:00 p.m. on election day. The county
auditor shall keep a record of each replacement ballot ((provided under this
subsection)) issued, including the date of the request. Replacement
mail ballots may be counted in the final tabulation of ballots only if the
original ballot is not received by the county auditor and the replacement
ballot meets all requirements for tabulation necessary for the tabulation of
regular mail ballots.

Sec. 20. RCW 29.36.126 and 1993 c
417 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

RETURN OF VOTED BALLOT
BY VOTER. ((Upon receipt of the mail ballot, the voter shall mark it, sign
the return identification envelope supplied with the ballot, and comply with
the instructions provided with the ballot. The voter may return the marked
ballot to the county auditor. The ballot must be returned)) The voter
shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the return identification
envelope. If mailed, a ballot must be postmarked not later than the date of
the primary or election. Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the
office of the county auditor or the designated place of deposit not later than
8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary or election.

Sec. 21. RCW 29.36.130 and 1993 c
417 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

BALLOT CONTENTS‑-COUNTING.
All mail ballots authorized by RCW 29.36.120 or 29.36.121 ((shall)) (as
recodified by this act) or section 18 of this act must contain the same
offices, names of nominees or candidates, and propositions to be voted
upon, including precinct offices, as if the ballot had been voted in person at
the polling place. Except as otherwise provided ((in this chapter)) by
law, mail ballots ((shall)) must be ((issued and canvassed))
treated in the same manner as absentee ballots issued ((pursuant to))
at the request of the voter. ((The county canvassing board, at the
request of the county auditor, may direct that mail ballots be counted on the
day of the election. If such count is made, it must be done in secrecy in the
presence of the canvassing board or their authorized representatives and the
results not revealed to any unauthorized person until 8:00 p.m. or later if the
auditor so directs.)) If electronic vote tallying devices are used,
political party observers ((shall be afforded)) must be given the
opportunity to be present, and a test of the equipment must be performed as
required by RCW 29.33.350 ((prior to the count of)) before tabulating
ballots. Political party observers may select at random ballots to be counted
manually as provided by RCW 29.54.025. Any violation of the secrecy of ((such))
the count ((shall be)) is subject to the same penalties as
provided for in RCW 29.85.225.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. PENALTY. A person who
willfully violates any provision of this chapter regarding the conduct of mail
ballot primaries or elections is guilty of a class C felony punishable under
RCW 9A.20.021.

PART
III

REPORTING

Sec. 23. RCW 29.04.055 and 1986 c 167 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:

COMBINING OR DIVIDING
PRECINCTS, ELECTION BOARDS. At any ((election, general or)) special
election((,)) or ((at any)) primary, the county auditor may
combine, unite, or divide precincts and may combine or unite election boards
for the purpose of holding such election. At any general election, the
county auditor may combine or unite election boards for the purpose of holding
such election, but shall report all election returns by individual precinct.

Sec. 24. RCW 29.62.090 and 1999 c 298 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:

ABSTRACT BY ELECTION
OFFICER--TRANSMITTAL TO SECRETARY OF STATE. (1) Immediately after the official
results of a state primary ((or general election)) in a county are
ascertained, the county auditor or other election officer shall make an
abstract of the number of registered voters in each precinct and of all the
votes cast in the county at such state primary ((or general election))
for and against state measures and for each candidate for federal, state, and
legislative office or for any other office which the secretary of state is
required by law to canvass. The abstract shall be entered on blanks furnished
by the secretary of state or on compatible computer printouts approved by the
secretary of state, and transmitted to the secretary of state no later than the
next business day following the certification by the county canvassing board.

(2) After each general
election, the county auditor or other election officer shall ((provide to
the secretary of state a report)) make an abstract of the number of
((absentee)) registered voters and all ballots cast in each
precinct at such general election for and against state measures and for
each candidate for federal, state, and legislative office or for any other
office which the secretary of state is required by law to canvass. ((The
report may be included in the abstract required by this section or may be
transmitted to the secretary of state separately, but in no event later than
March 31 of the year following the election.)) Absentee ballot results may
be incorporated into votes cast at the polls for each precinct or may be
reported separately on a precinct-by-precinct basis. The abstract shall be
entered on blanks furnished by the secretary of state or on compatible computer
printouts approved by the secretary of state, and transmitted to the secretary
of state no later than the next business day following the certification by the
county canvassing board.

(3) If absentee ballot
results are not incorporated into votes cast at the polls, the county auditor
or other election official may aggregate results from more than one precinct if
the auditor, pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary of state, finds that
reporting a single precinct's absentee ballot results would jeopardize the
secrecy of a person's ballot. To the extent practicable, precincts for which
absentee results are aggregated shall be contiguous.

PART
IV

TECHNICAL

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 29.36.122 (Special election by
mail--Sending ballots to voters) and 1994 c 57 s 50, 1993 c 417 s 3, & 1983
1st ex.s. c 71 s 2; and

(2) RCW 29.36.139 (Mail ballots--Counting
requirements--Challenge) and 1993 c 417 s 6 & 1983 1st ex.s. c 71 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. (1) RCW 29.36.010,
29.36.013, 29.36.170, 29.36.030, 29.30.075, 29.36.035, 29.36.045, 29.36.060,
29.36.070, 29.36.075, 29.36.097, 29.36.100, 29.36.150, and 29.36.160 are each
recodified within chapter 29.36 RCW, in the order listed, along with sections
2, 3, and 9 of this act.

(2) RCW 29.36.120,
29.36.121, 29.36.124, 29.36.126, and 29.36.130 are each recodified, and, along
with sections 18 and 22 of this act, constitute a new chapter in Title 29 RCW.

(3) RCW 29.36.050 is
recodified as a new section in chapter 29.51 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27. Section captions and part
headings used in this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---