BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the public's

_6 tolerance for drunk driving has decreased in recent years.
The

_7 legislature recognizes that the state ferry system is a
part of

_8 the state's highway system and that many ferry
passengers must

_9 operate a motor vehicle upon arrival. Since drinking
and driving is

10 prohibited on the highways, and for the health and
safety of the

11 public on the streets and highways of this state, the
sale of

12 alcohol on Washington state ferries is prohibited.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 66.28

14 RCW to read as follows:

15 (1) The sale of liquor on all Washington state
ferries is

16 prohibited.

17 (2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall
impair any

p. 1 SB
5277

_1 existing contracts relating to the acquisition or sale
of liquor

_2 by the Washington state ferry system. Upon the
expiration or period

_3 for renewal of these existing contracts, subsection (1)
of this

_4 section shall apply.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary
for the immediate

_6 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

_7 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

_8 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5277 p. 2