BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.06.010 and 1995 c
323 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The following terms in
this chapter shall have the meanings set forth in this section unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Acupuncture" means a health care service based on an ((Oriental))
Asian system of medical theory utilizing ((Oriental)) Asian
diagnosis and treatment to promote health and treat organic or functional
disorders by treating specific acupuncture points or meridians. Acupuncture
includes the following techniques:

(a) Use of acupuncture
needles to stimulate acupuncture points and meridians;

(b) Use of electrical,
mechanical, or magnetic devices to stimulate acupuncture points and meridians;

(c) Moxibustion;

(d) Acupressure;

(e) Cupping;

(f) Dermal friction
technique;

(g) Infra-red;

(h) Sonopuncture;

(i) Laserpuncture;

(j) Point injection
therapy (aquapuncture); and

(k) Dietary advice
based on ((Oriental)) Asian medical theory provided in
conjunction with techniques under (a) through (j) of this subsection.

(2)
"Acupuncturist" means a person licensed under this chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of health.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.36A.050 and 1991
c 3 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice of a
profession by individuals who are licensed, certified, or registered under other
laws of this state who are performing services within their authorized scope of
practice;

(2) The practice of
naturopathic medicine by an individual employed by the government of the United
States while the individual is engaged in the performance of duties prescribed
for him or her by the laws and regulations of the United States;

(3) The practice of
naturopathic medicine by students enrolled in a school approved by the
secretary. The performance of services shall be pursuant to a course of
instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the supervision of the
instructor. The instructor shall be a naturopath licensed pursuant to this
chapter; or

(4) The
practice of ((oriental)) Asian medicine or ((oriental)) Asian
herbology, or the rendering of other dietary or nutritional advice.

---
END ---