BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.27.020 and 1995 c
194 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The prosecuting
attorney shall:

(1) Be legal adviser of
the legislative authority, giving ((them [it])) it his or her
written opinion when required by the legislative authority or the chairperson
thereof touching any subject which the legislative authority may be called or
required to act upon relating to the management of county affairs;

(2) Be legal adviser to
all county and precinct officers and school directors in all matters relating
to their official business, and when required draw up all instruments of an
official nature for the use of said officers;

(3) Appear for and
represent the state, county, and all school districts subject to the
supervisory control and direction of the attorney general in all criminal and
civil proceedings in which the state or the county or any school district in
the county may be a party;

(4) Prosecute all
criminal and civil actions in which the state or the county may be a party,
defend all suits brought against the state or the county, and prosecute actions
upon forfeited recognizances and bonds and actions for the recovery of debts,
fines, penalties, and forfeitures accruing to the state or the county;

(5) Attend and appear
before and give advice to the grand jury when cases are presented to it for
consideration and draw all indictments when required by the grand jury;

(6) Institute and
prosecute proceedings before magistrates for the arrest of persons charged with
or reasonably suspected of felonies when the prosecuting attorney has
information that any such offense has been committed and the prosecuting
attorney shall for that purpose attend when required by them if the prosecuting
attorney is not then in attendance upon the superior court;

(7) Carefully tax all
cost bills in criminal cases and take care that no useless witness fees are
taxed as part of the costs and that the officers authorized to execute process
tax no other or greater fees than the fees allowed by law;

(8) Receive all cost
bills in criminal cases before district judges at the trial of which the
prosecuting attorney was not present, before they are lodged with the
legislative authority for payment, whereupon the prosecuting attorney may retax
the same and the prosecuting attorney must do so if the legislative authority
deems any bill exorbitant or improperly taxed;

(9) Aggressively and
without exception present all violations of the election laws ((which
may)) that come to the prosecuting attorney's knowledge to the
special consideration of the proper jury;

(10) Examine once in
each year the official bonds of all county and precinct officers and report to
the legislative authority any defect in the bonds of any such officer;

(11) Make an annual
report to the governor as of the 31st of December of each year setting forth
the amount and nature of business transacted by the prosecuting attorney in
that year with such other statements and suggestions as the prosecuting
attorney may deem useful;

(12) Send to the state
liquor control board at the end of each year a written report of all
prosecutions brought under the state liquor laws in the county during the
preceding year, showing in each case, the date of trial, name of accused,
nature of charges, disposition of case, and the name of the judge presiding;

(13) Seek to reform and
improve the administration of criminal justice and stimulate efforts to remedy
inadequacies or injustice in substantive or procedural law.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.07.005 and 1994 c
57 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

"Information
required for voter registration" means the minimum information provided on
a voter registration application that is required by the county auditor in
order to place a voter registration applicant on the voter registration rolls.
This information includes the applicant's name, complete residence address,
date of birth, citizenship, and a signature attesting to the truth of
the information provided on the application. All other information supplied is
ancillary and not to be used as grounds for not registering an applicant to
vote.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.07.070 and 1994 c
57 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided
under RCW 29.07.260, an applicant for voter registration shall complete an
application providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:

(1) The address of the
last former registration of the applicant as a voter in the state;

(2) The applicant's
full name;

(3) The applicant's
date and place of birth;

(4) The address of the
applicant's residence for voting purposes;

(5) The mailing address
of the applicant if that address is not the same as the address in subsection
(4) of this section;

(6) The sex of the
applicant;

(7) A declaration that
the applicant is a citizen of the United States; and

(8) Any other
information that the secretary of state determines is necessary to establish
the identity of the applicant and prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter
registrations.

This information shall
be recorded on a single registration form to be prescribed by the secretary of
state.

If the county
auditor, registration assistant, city or town clerk, or deputy registrar has
reason to believe the citizenship of an applicant is suspect, the auditor or
other registration official may request further verification of citizenship,
including but not limited to the applicant's birth certificate or documentation
of naturalization.

The secretary of
state shall specify by rule the reasons sufficient to suspect that the
applicant's declaration of citizenship is untrue and the documentation or
procedure necessary to verify citizenship.

If the applicant fails
to provide the information required for voter registration, the auditor shall
send the applicant a verification notice. The auditor shall not register the
applicant until the required information is provided. If a verification notice
is returned as undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice
within forty-five days, the auditor shall not register the applicant to vote.

The following warning
shall appear in a conspicuous place on the voter registration form:

"If you knowingly
provide false information on this voter registration form or knowingly make a
false declaration about your qualifications for voter registration you will
have committed a class C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to
five years, or by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment
and fine."

Sec. 4. RCW 29.08.060 and 1994 c
57 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On receipt of an
application for voter registration under this chapter, the county auditor shall
review the application to determine whether the information supplied is complete.
An application that contains the applicant's name, complete valid residence
address, date and place of birth, citizenship, and signature
attesting to the truth of the information provided on the application is
complete. If it is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a
verification notice of the deficiency to the applicant. This verification
notice shall require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the
verification notice is not returned by the applicant or is returned as undeliverable
the auditor shall not place the name of the applicant on the county voter
list. If the applicant provides the required information, the applicant shall
be registered to vote as of the date of mailing of the original voter
registration application.

(2) If the county
auditor has reason to believe the citizenship of an applicant is suspect, the
auditor may request further verification of citizenship, including but not
limited to the applicant's birth certificate or documentation of
naturalization.

(3) If the
information is complete, the applicant is considered to be registered to vote
as of the date of mailing. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct
identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the
voter's record. Within forty-five days after the receipt of an application but
no later than seven days before the next primary, special election, or general
election, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first class mail, an
acknowledgement notice identifying the registrant's precinct and containing
such other information as may be required by the secretary of state. The
postal service shall be instructed not to forward a voter registration card to
any other address and to return to the auditor any card which is not
deliverable. If the applicant has indicated that he or she is registered to
vote in another county in Washington but has also provided an address within
the auditor's county that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall
send, on behalf of the registrant, a registration cancellation notice to the
auditor of that other county and the auditor receiving the notice shall cancel
the registrant's voter registration in that other county. If the registrant
has indicated on the form that he or she is registered to vote within the
county but has provided a new address within the county that is for voter
registration purposes, the auditor shall transfer the voter's registration.

(((3)))
(4) If an acknowledgement notice card is properly mailed as required by
this section to the address listed by the voter as being the voter's mailing
address and the notice is subsequently returned to the auditor by the postal
service as being undeliverable to the voter at that address, the auditor shall
promptly send the voter a confirmation notice. The auditor shall place the
voter's registration on inactive status pending a response from the voter to
the confirmation notice.

---
END ---