BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Effective January
1, 2003, the department shall offer acupuncture services as part of its care
and services offered under this chapter.

(2) Providers of
acupuncture services under this chapter must be licensed as provided under
chapter 18.06 RCW.

(3) The
department shall limit the number of acupunctural treatments provided under
this section to a maximum of eight per year per patient and may develop
additional appropriate limitations for the utilization of acupuncture services.

--- END ---