BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.188 and 2000 c
186 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon retirement for
service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.180 or retirement for disability under RCW
41.40.210 or 41.40.230, a member shall elect to have the retirement allowance
paid pursuant to one of the following options calculated so as to be
actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a) Standard
allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement allowance
payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies before the
total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the amount of
such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such designated
person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the
surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's
legal representative.

(b)(i) The
department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement option
that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such
portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule
designates shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person
nominated by the member by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department at the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department
shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor
option and a joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(ii) Where a
restraining order has been issued on behalf of a retiree against the designated
beneficiary of the survivor option, as selected by the retiree, and the court
finds that the beneficiary has violated that restraining order, the retiree,
with permission of the court, may rescind the beneficiary's entitlement to the
survivor benefit. The retiree is obligated to forward a certified copy of the
court order to the department of retirement systems and the rescission is
effective upon receipt. The retiree's benefit will not increase by result of
the rescission and the retiree may not select another beneficiary.

(c) A member may elect
to include the benefit provided under RCW 41.40.640 along with the retirement
options available under this section. This retirement allowance option shall
be calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to the options offered under
this subsection.

(2)(a) A member, if
married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to the option
selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. If
a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse do not give
written consent to an option under this section, the department shall pay a
joint and fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be actuarially
equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of this
section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.

(b) If a copy of a
dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has
been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a member's
retirement:

(i) The department
shall honor the designation as if made by the member under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(ii) The spousal
consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a) Any member who
retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive
a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if
they meet the following conditions:

(i) The retiree's
designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the retiree; and

(ii) The retiree
provides to the department proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement
allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the date of the
designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be increased by the
percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c) The percentage
increase shall be derived by the following:

(i) One hundred percent
multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection converted to a percent;

(ii) Subtract one from
the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option factor;

(iii) The joint and
survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of July 1, 1998.

(d) The adjustment
under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of the month
following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998,
whichever comes last.

(4) No later than July
1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules that allow a member additional
actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall include, but are not
limited to:

(a)(i) A retired member
who retired without designating a survivor beneficiary shall have the
opportunity to designate their spouse from a postretirement marriage as a
survivor during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of the
postretirement marriage provided the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property division
obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670.

(ii) A member who
entered into a postretirement marriage prior to the effective date of the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection and satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of
this subsection shall have one year to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary following the adoption of the rules.

(b) A retired member
who elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under this section and
designated a nonspouse as survivor beneficiary shall have the opportunity to
remove the survivor designation and have their future benefit adjusted.

(c) The department may
make an additional charge, if necessary, to ensure that the benefits provided
under this subsection remain actuarially equivalent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act is
applicable to all current and future retirees.

---
END ---