BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 48.01

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 A person engaged in the business of making contracts
of

_7 insurance shall not screen an individual's DNA. For
purposes of

_8 this section, "screen" means obtaining a
person's DNA and

_9 identifying the sequence of chemical base pairs or
interpreting

10 data from DNA analysis. This section must not be
interpreted to

11 deny payment of claims, and limited DNA information, not
the

12 entire DNA code or sequence, may be communicated to an
insurer for

13 purposes of documenting the obligation to pay the claim.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SSB
5282