BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF
THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.60.030 and 1997 c
271 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to be
free from discrimination because of race, creed, color, national origin, sex,
or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person is recognized as and
declared to be a civil right. This right shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The right to obtain
and hold employment without discrimination, including the right to prohibit
an employer from screening a person's DNA. For purposes of this subsection,
"screening" means obtaining a person's DNA and identifying a sequence
of chemical base pairs or interpreting data from DNA analysis;

(b) The right to the
full enjoyment of any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or
privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement;

(c) The right to engage
in real estate transactions without discrimination, including discrimination
against families with children;

(d) The right to engage
in credit transactions without discrimination;

(e) The right to engage
in insurance transactions or transactions with health maintenance organizations
without discrimination: PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under
RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice
for the purposes of this subparagraph; and

(f) The right to engage
in commerce free from any discriminatory boycotts or blacklists.
Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for purposes of this section shall be
defined as the formation or execution of any express or implied agreement,
understanding, policy or contractual arrangement for economic benefit between
any persons which is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United
States and which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly
or covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to restrict,
condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude any person or
persons from any business relationship on the basis of race, color, creed,
religion, sex, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or
the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person, or
national origin or lawful business relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That
nothing herein contained shall prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by
law pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor practices.

(2) Any person deeming
himself or herself injured by any act in violation of this chapter shall have a
civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations,
or to recover the actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together
with the cost of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other
appropriate remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights
Act of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).

(3) Except
for any unfair practice committed by an employer against an employee or a
prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real estate transaction which
is the basis for relief specified in the amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained
in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any unfair practice prohibited by this chapter
which is committed in the course of trade or commerce as defined in the
Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying
that chapter, a matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.

--- END ---