BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) Any entity, including
any person, isolating a person's deoxyribonucleic acid in a form that
identifies an individual person for purposes of genetic testing must have the
person's informed consent.

(2) Informed consent
requires:

(a) An explanation of
the purpose for which the deoxyribonucleic acid is being obtained, and whether
it will be converted into a computerized individual sequence of chemical base
pairs or other form for interpretation;

(b) Identification of
the entity obtaining the deoxyribonucleic acid and individual sequence;

(c) Disclosure of any
entity with whom the deoxyribonucleic acid and individual sequence may be
shared, including disclosure that the deoxyribonucleic acid or individual
sequence may be shared in the future with an unknown entity;

(d) A statement of the
expected duration that the deoxyribonucleic acid and individual sequence may be
kept;

(e) A description of
reasonably foreseeable risks or harm associated with providing the
deoxyribonucleic acid and individual sequence;

(f) An explanation of
how the deoxyribonucleic acid will be maintained, whether the physical sample
will be destroyed or stored, including how and where it will be stored, and how
the individual sequence information will be destroyed or stored, including how
and where it will be stored;

(g) A statement
describing any reasonably expected benefits or advantages associated with
providing the deoxyribonucleic acid and individual sequence;

(h) A statement describing
any confidentiality or privacy protections for the deoxyribonucleic acid and
individual sequence;

(i) Identification of
an individual contact and contact information from whom further information may
be obtained or reported relative to the deoxyribonucleic acid and individual
sequence;

(j) Provisions
explaining whether the deoxyribonucleic acid and the individual sequence can be
expunged or removed from the entity that obtained it and the method to do it;

(k) The exclusion of
any exculpatory provisions from liability against the entity obtaining the
deoxyribonucleic acid and individual sequence; and

(l) A disclosure that
providing deoxyribonucleic acid and an individual sequence is voluntary.

(3) A person's informed
consent is not required:

(a) In criminal matters
if the deoxyribonucleic acid is obtained or used during a criminal
investigation, trial, appeal, or pursuant to specific common law or statutory
authority, or a lawfully issued court order. Once a criminal conviction is
final, a report that was not admitted into evidence, identifying a specific
person by analysis of DNA obtained in the course of an investigation, shall be
destroyed if the person is found to be uninvolved in the commission of the
criminal act or acts;

(b) In situations where
the person requires emergency medical care as long as the person, or his or her
representative in death cases, is informed in a timely manner after the
emergency that the deoxyribonucleic acid was obtained;

(c) In situations where
a person's bodily fluids are obtained without consent pursuant to specific
statutory requirement mandating testing;

(d) In situations where
the individual is deceased and the entity requesting the deoxyribonucleic acid
establishes in a court of law that obtaining individually identifiable
deoxyribonucleic acid for genetic testing purposes benefits public health,
safety, and welfare, and outweighs the harm to individual privacy interests, or
the person requesting the deoxyribonucleic acid is a next of kin requesting the
deoxyribonucleic acid for purposes of health care or other purpose that
outweighs the harm to the individual's privacy interests, or the entity
requesting the deoxyribonucleic acid has been authorized by an institutional
review board to use the deoxyribonucleic acid pursuant to an approved protocol;

(e) Pursuant to the
provisions of this section, if the entity or person is a health care provider
or facility under chapter 70.02 RCW or the federal health insurance portability
and accountability act privacy rules who is acting according to the provisions
of that chapter or federal law, and who is subject to the provisions of chapter
7.70 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and accountability act
privacy rules;

(f) Pursuant to
provisions of this section, if the entity or person obtains an individual's
deoxyribonucleic acid, or computerized information that provides the sequence
of that individual's deoxyribonucleic acid, in a form that does not identify
that individual or there is no reasonable basis to believe the information can
be used to identify an individual;

(g) Pursuant to
provisions of this section, if the entity or person who obtains
deoxyribonucleic acid, or computerized information that provides the sequence
of that deoxyribonucleic acid, is acting according to the provisions of an
institutional review board established under federal law;

(h) In death
investigations for purposes of identifying the decedent;

(i) In matters of
parentage proceedings under chapter 26.26 RCW. A DNA specimen or report of an
individual's specimen shall not be released or disclosed for any purpose other
than is relevant to the parentage proceeding without a court order or informed
consent of the individual who furnished the specimen; and

(j) Where the division
of child support has issued an order for genetic testing pursuant to RCW
74.20.360. A DNA specimen or report of an individual's specimen shall not be
released or disclosed for any purpose not relevant to the division of child
support's order without a court order or the informed consent of the individual
who furnished the specimen.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
constitutes a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

---
END ---