BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 43.56

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 Until August 1, 2001, the code reviser shall
continue to serve

_7 as an associate member of the national conference of
commissioners

_8 on uniform state laws. On and after August 1, 2001, the
code

_9 reviser shall serve as an additional commissioner.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5286