BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that a major

_5 roadblock in understanding kinship caregivers, including

_6 grandparents raising grandchildren as primary
caregivers, is a

_7 lack of data. The legislature further finds that
nationally over

_8 two million children are being raised solely by their
grandparents

_9 or other relatives according to the 1998 United States
current

10 population survey and that split-generation households
are equally

11 common in central cities and in rural areas. The same
survey

12 estimates that thirty-eight thousand nine hundred
twenty-two

13 children in Washington lived in grandparent headed
households. The

14 legislature acknowledges that kinship caregivers may be
reluctant

15 to provide care, but are likely to do so because of
emotional,

16 drug, mental, or alcohol problems by parents, and
because the

17 caregivers do not want the children to go to a foster
home and

p. 1 SB
5287

_1 that the state should encourage, not discourage,
responsible

_2 actions by relatives who come forward to care for the
children of

_3 kin.

_4 The legislature intends to determine the scope of
the needs and

_5 concerns of kinship caregivers in Washington. The
legislature

_6 further intends to determine the availability of
existing

_7 services, the need for improved services, the need for
better

_8 coordination, and accessibility of those services.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The Washington state
institute for public

10 policy will convene a work group to determine: The
number of

11 families with relatives raising kin, the needs of the
relative

12 kinship caregivers and the children being raised by
them, whether

13 additional services and funding are needed, and issues
regarding

14 access to services and funding sources. The work group
must include

15 representatives from: The aging and adult services

16 administration, children's administration, economic
services

17 administration, health and rehabilitative services
administration,

18 family policy counsel, Washington counsel for the
prevention of

19 child abuse and neglect, department of health,
Washington State

20 University cooperative extension, and office of the
family and

21 children's ombudsman.

22 The work group must solicit input from kinship caregivers;

23 county health departments; state agencies dealing with

24 developmental disabilities or mental health; public
health

25 departments; child and family resource centers; private

26 organizations representing the interests of kinship
caregivers;

27 kinship support groups; family support centers; the
association of

28 Washington tribes; the children's home society;
providers of legal

29 services to families; and any other persons or groups
identified

30 by the work group that would provide helpful input.

31 The work group report must include: Identification
of existing

32 funding sources, services, and networks; recommendations
on how

33 existing services, funding sources, and networks can be
better

34 coordinated; whether additional funding or services are
needed,

35 how to best obtain them, and their cost; recommendations
on what

36 training and oversight may be required; and other
conclusions or

SB 5287 p. 2

_1 recommendations regarding what the state can do to aid
kinship

_2 caregivers.

_3 The report and recommendations of the work group
shall be

_4 presented to the legislature not later than December 1,
2001.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act expires
January 30, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5287