BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.370 and 1999 c
311 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a rural county may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.08 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax((, except that for rural counties with population
densities between sixty and one hundred persons per square mile, the rate shall
not exceed 0.04 percent before January 1, 2000)). No tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the
date that a tax is first imposed under this section.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purpose of financing the
acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion, or
improvements and related costs of public facilities in rural counties. The
public facility must be listed as an item in the officially adopted county
overall economic development plan, or the economic development section of the
county's comprehensive plan, or the comprehensive plan of a city or town located
within the county for those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those
counties that do not have an adopted overall economic development plan and do
not plan under the growth management act, the public facility must be listed in
the county's capital facilities plan or the capital facilities plan of a city
or town located within the county. In implementing this section, the county
shall consult with cities, towns, and port districts located within the
county. ((For the purposes of))

(4) The definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section((,)).

(a) "Public
facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water
facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth stabilization, storm sewer
facilities, railroad, electricity, natural gas, buildings, structures,
telecommunications infrastructure, transportation infrastructure, or commercial
infrastructure, and port facilities in the state of Washington. "Public
facilities" do not include electric generation or distribution facilities.

(((4) No tax may be
collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be collected
under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the date that
a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5) For purposes of
this section,))

(b) "Related
costs" may include development of land and improvements for public
facilities, project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility and marketing studies and plans, project design, site
planning and analysis, and project debt and revenue impact analysis.

(c)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of
less than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the period
July 1st to June 30th.

--- END ---