BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 79.24

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 Subject to the approval of the state capitol
committee, the

_7 department of general administration shall designate a
portion of

_8 the east capitol site, in the vicinity of the Korean War
memorial

_9 on the raised portion that forms the wall of the state
parking

10 garage, as the veterans memorial plaza. The department of
general

11 administration shall adopt rules allowing organizations,
at their

12 own cost, to place memorials within the veterans
memorial plaza

13 commemorating combat or peacekeeping action in which,
under United

14 States or Washington state authority, military forces
have been

15 deployed or served as direct support. The rules shall
specify

16 requirements for memorial plaques, including a uniform
size, type,

17 and material.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5290