BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.52.030 and 1995 c
69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set
forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1) "Public
agency" means a public utility district, joint operating agency, city,
county, or any other state governmental agency, entity, or political
subdivision.

(2) "Major public
energy project" means a nuclear power plant ((or installation
capable, or intended to be capable, of generating electricity in an amount
greater than two hundred fifty megawatts, measured using maximum continuous
electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and pressure. Where two or more such plants are located within the
same geographic site, each plant shall be considered a major public energy
project. An addition to an existing facility is not deemed to be a major
energy project unless the addition itself is capable, or intended to be
capable, of generating electricity in an amount greater than two hundred fifty
megawatts)). A project which is under construction on July 1, 1982, shall
not be considered a major public energy project unless the official agency
budget or estimate for total construction costs for the project as of July 1,
1982, is more than two hundred percent of the first official estimate of total
construction costs as specified in the senate energy and utilities committee
WPPSS inquiry report, volume one, January 12, 1981, and unless, as of July 1,
1982, the projected remaining cost of construction for that project exceeds two
hundred million dollars.

(3) "Cost of
construction" means the total cost of planning and building a major public
energy project and placing it into operation, including, but not limited to,
planning cost, direct construction cost, licensing cost, cost of fuel inventory
for the first year's operation, interest, and all other costs incurred prior to
the first day of full operation, whether or not incurred prior to July 1, 1982.

(4) "Cost of
acquisition" means the total cost of acquiring a major public energy
project from another party, including, but not limited to, principal and
interest costs.

(5) "Bond"
means a revenue bond, a general obligation bond, or any other indebtedness
issued by a public agency or its assignee.

(6)
"Applicant" means a public agency, or the assignee of a public
agency, requesting the secretary of state to conduct an election pursuant to
this chapter.

(7)
"Cost-effective" means that a project or resource is forecast:

(a) To be reliable and
available within the time it is needed; and

(b) To meet or reduce
the electric power demand of the intended consumers at an estimated incremental
system cost no greater than that of the least-cost similarly reliable and
available alternative project or resource, or any combination thereof.

(8) "System
cost" means an estimate of all direct costs of a project or resource over
its effective life, including, if applicable, the costs of distribution to the
consumer, and, among other factors, waste disposal costs, end-of-cycle costs,
and fuel costs (including projected increases), and such quantifiable
environmental costs and benefits as are directly attributable to the project or
resource.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 80.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Before approving financing
for any large public energy project that is not subject to the voter approval
requirements of this chapter, a public agency must submit to its governing
board a cost-effectiveness study pertaining to the project under
consideration. The study must be prepared by an independent consultant and
must be available for public review and comment for at least thirty days after
submission to the governing board.

(2) At the end of the
thirty-day period, the public agency must conduct a public hearing on the
project under consideration and the cost-effectiveness study. Notice of the
public hearing must provide at least the following information:

(a) The name, location,
and type of large public energy project, expressed in common terms;

(b) The dollar amount
and type of bonds being requested;

(c) If the bond
issuance is intended to finance the acquisition of all or a portion of the
project, the anticipated total cost of the acquisition of the project;

(d) If the bond
issuance is intended to finance the planning or construction of all or a
portion of the project, the anticipated total cost of construction of the
project;

(e) The projected
average rate increase for consumers of the electricity to be generated by the
project. The rate increase must be that which is necessary to repay the total
indebtedness incurred for the project, including estimated interest;

(f) A summary of the
final cost-effectiveness study conducted under subsection (1) of this section;

(g) The anticipated
functional life of the project; and

(h) The anticipated
decommissioning costs of the project.

(3) For
the purposes of this section, a "large public energy project that is not
subject to the voter approval requirements of this chapter" means a
nonnuclear plant or installation capable, or intended to be capable, of
generating electricity in an amount greater than two hundred fifty megawatts,
measured using maximum continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum
auxiliary load, at average ambient temperature and pressure. Where two or more
such plants are located within the same geographic site, each plant is
considered a large public energy project. An addition to an existing facility
is not a large public energy project unless the addition itself is capable, or
intended to be capable, of generating electricity in an amount greater than two
hundred fifty megawatts.

---
END ---