BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.08.080 and 1999 c
298 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall furnish registration forms necessary to carry out the registration of
voters as provided by this chapter without cost to the respective counties. All
voter registration forms printed after the effective date of this act must include
clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw an applicant's attention,
stating that only citizens of the United States may register to vote. Similar
language must be stamped conspicuously onto existing voter registration forms
in the possession of the office of the secretary of state.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.155 and 1990 c
143 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Before issuing an
original license or identification card or renewing a license or identification
card under this chapter, the licensing agent shall determine if the applicant
wants to register to vote or transfer his or her voter registration by
asking the following two questions:

First: "Do you
want to register to vote or transfer your voter registration?"

Second: "Are
you a United States citizen?".

If the applicant ((chooses
to register or transfer a registration)) responds in the affirmative to
both questions, the agent shall provide the applicant with a voter
registration form and instructions and shall record that the applicant has
requested to register to vote or transfer a voter registration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---