BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the wildlife

_5 resources of the state are highly valued. The programs,
activities,

_6 and policies of the state that preserve, protect, and
manage

_7 wildlife and provide public access for viewing and for
hunting are

_8 critical to the resource. The abundance of wildlife and
conditions

_9 for wildlife could be further improved by the
establishment of a

10 nonprofit wildlife conservation foundation. It is the
intent of the

11 legislature to protect and enhance the wildlife
conservation

12 capabilities of the state, to increase the abundance of
wildlife,

13 and to ensure the stability of wildlife populations
through

14 private benefactors contributing to a nonprofit wildlife

15 conservation foundation.

16 Providing a tax-deductible method for individuals
and groups to

17 contribute in this manner would benefit the wildlife of
the

18 state. Several states have created nonprofit wildlife
conservation

p. 1 SSB
5295

_1 foundations that are successful in raising millions of
dollars

_2 every year for the stewardship of wildlife resources.
Therefore,

_3 the legislature finds that it is in the public interest
to create

_4 a nonprofit foundation for the purpose of increasing
funds

_5 available for the preservation, protection, and
management of the

_6 state's wildlife.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in
this section apply

_8 throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly
requires

_9 otherwise.

10 (1) "Foundation" means the Washington
wildlife conservation

11 foundation created in section 3 of this act.

12 (2) "Board" means the Washington wildlife
conservation

13 foundation board of directors created in section 5 of
this act.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The board shall file
articles of

15 incorporation in accordance with the Washington
nonprofit

16 corporation act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to establish the
Washington

17 wildlife conservation foundation. The foundation shall
not be an

18 agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the
state.

19 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The purpose of the
foundation is to:

20 (1) Improve the abundance and conditions for
wildlife within

21 the state while working in concert with the charitable,

22 educational, scientific, and recreational programs,
projects, and

23 policies of the state;

24 (2) Solicit and accept aid or contributions
consistent with the

25 stated intent of the donor and the goals of the
foundation;

26 (3) Solicit and accept grants for the acquisition,

27 construction, improvement, and development of state
agency

28 projects;

29 (4) Solicit and accept private funding and donations
that

30 assist in enhancing and preserving Washington's wildlife
species

31 and the habitats upon which they depend.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The foundation
shall have a board of

33 directors consisting of nine members. The fish and
wildlife

SSB 5295 p. 2

_1 commission must appoint nine members to the board by
September 1,

_2 2001. No member of the board may be an active state
employee.

_3 (2) No member of the board may receive compensation
or a per

_4 diem.

_5 (3) Members shall serve four-year terms. Of the
initial members,

_6 one must be appointed for a one-year term, one must be
appointed

_7 for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a
three-year term,

_8 and the remainder must be appointed for a four-year
term. Members

_9 of the board may serve up to a maximum of three terms.
At the end

10 of a term, a member may continue to serve until a
successor has

11 been appointed.

12 (4) The board shall meet and organize, and may
designate by a

13 majority vote a treasurer, secretary, or any additional
officers

14 needed to carry out the activities of the foundation. The
board

15 shall adopt bylaws of the foundation.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The foundation may
accept gifts or grants

17 from any governmental agency or from any person, firm,
or

18 corporation. The foundation may expend receipts on
activities

19 consistent with the purposes of the foundation in
section 4 of

20 this act, and in a manner consistent with any
requirement of the

21 grant, gift, or bequest.

22 Funds collected by the foundation shall be
considered private

23 funds and shall be held in an appropriate account
outside of the

24 state treasury. The foundation may contract with the
state auditor

25 or with a private auditor for an audit of funds. The
foundation and

26 its officers are responsible for the approval and
recording of

27 receipts, approval of payments, and the proper filing of
required

28 reports. Funds provided by the foundation may not be
used to

29 supplant any local, state, or federal funding source.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The foundation must
comply with the

31 requirements of the open public meetings act, chapter
42.30 RCW.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. If any provision of
this act or its

33 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

34 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

35 persons or circumstances is not affected.

p. 3 SSB
5295

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8
of this act

_2 constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5295 p. 4