BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
70.155.030 and 1994 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) No person shall sell or permit to be sold
any tobacco

_8 product through any device that mechanically dispenses
tobacco

_9 products unless the device is located fully within
premises from

10 which minors are prohibited or in industrial worksites
where

11 minors are not employed and not less than ten feet from
all

12 entrance or exit ways to and from each premise. The
board shall

13 adopt rules that allow an exception to the requirement
that a

14 device be located not less than ten feet from all
entrance or exit

15 ways to and from a premise if it is architecturally
impractical

16 for the device to be located not less than ten feet from
all

17 entrance and exit ways.

18 (2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this
section,

p. 1 SB
5296

_1 beginning January 1, 2002, self-service displays of
tobacco

_2 products are prohibited. All in-store tobacco
products must be sold

_3 from behind the counter or from within locked display
units. This

_4 section does not apply to retailers who sell tobacco
products

_5 exclusively. Further, this section does not apply to
sales from

_6 within premises where minors are prohibited by
statute.

_7 Sec. 2. RCW
70.155.040 and 1993 c 507 s 5 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 (1) No person shall sell or permit to be sold
cigarettes not in

10 the original unopened package or container to which the
stamps

11 required by RCW 82.24.060 have been affixed.

12 (2) Packages of fewer than twenty cigarettes may
be sold only

13 in premises where minors are prohibited by statute.

14 (3) This section does not apply to the sale
of loose leaf

15 tobacco by a retail business that generates a minimum of
sixty

16 percent of annual gross sales from the sale of tobacco
products.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of
this act or its

18 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

19 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

20 persons or circumstances is not affected.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5296 p. 2