BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.24.210 and 1997 c
26 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (3) of this section, any public or private landowners or
others in lawful possession and control of any lands whether designated
resource, rural, or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to
such areas or channels, who allow members of the public to use them for the
purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is not limited to, the
cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons for their
personal use without purchasing the firewood from the landowner, hunting,
fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling, skateboarding or
other nonmotorized wheel-based activities, hanggliding, paragliding, the riding
of horses or other animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road
vehicles, snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or
water sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or
scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall not be
liable for unintentional injuries to such users.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (3) of this section, any public or private landowner or
others in lawful possession and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or
water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer
or allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife cooperative
project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter or other solid
waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to any volunteer group or
to any other users.

(3) Any public or
private landowner, or others in lawful possession and control of the land, may
charge an administrative fee of up to twenty-five dollars for the cutting,
gathering, and removing of firewood from the land. Nothing in this section
shall prevent the liability of such a landowner or others in lawful possession
and control for injuries sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial
latent condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 limits or expands in any way the doctrine
of attractive nuisance. Usage by members of the public, volunteer groups, or
other users is permissive and does not support any claim of adverse possession.

(4) For purposes of
this section, a license or permit issued for statewide use under authority of
chapter ((43.51)) 79A.05 RCW((, Title 75,)) or Title 77
RCW is not a fee.

(5) The definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a)
"Artificial" means a condition that does not resemble a condition
found in nature even if contrived or established by human effort.

(b)
"Latent" means a dangerous condition that the user did not or could
not observe, and failure to observe was reasonable.

--- END ---