BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The departments of
fish and wildlife and community, trade, and economic development shall host a
working conference on promoting wildlife viewing tourism. The objective of the
conference shall be to adopt a strategic plan and specific implementing actions
to promote wildlife viewing tourism in Washington in a manner that both
provides sustainable economic development in the state's rural areas and
supports maintaining the state's wildlife diversity.

(2) The departments
shall work with interested local governments, state agencies, visitor and
convention bureaus, the hospitality industry, tourism development
organizations, and tour operators and wildlife conservation organizations in
preparing for and conducting the conference. The departments shall guide
preparation for the conference by surveying programs and activities in other
states and compiling information on current programs, infrastructure, and
promotional activities regarding wildlife viewing tourism in Washington. To
enhance the effectiveness of the conference and its products, the departments
shall seek to frame issues and outline options for improvement through white
papers and preliminary meetings with interest groups.

(3) Among the topics
that the departments and interest groups should address at the conference are:

(a) Strategies to
increase revenues and benefits to Washington communities with wildlife viewing
resources that have identified tourism as part of their economic development
strategy;

(b) Strengthening the
wildlife viewing tourism elements of gateway community partnerships among state
and local transportation, economic development, and parks and wildlife
agencies;

(c) Providing
leadership and services by state agencies to assist local communities to assess
their local wildlife viewing resources and to market tourism centered upon such
resources;

(d) Developing
proposals to increase state funding to local communities to implement local
wildlife viewing tourism plans, including assessing resources, providing
infrastructure specific to wildlife viewing tourism, festival development, and
marketing; and

(e) Promoting wildlife
viewing tourism as an element of tourism related to the Lewis and Clark
bicentennial commemoration.

(4) The departments
shall schedule the conference at a time sufficient to prepare a summary of the
conference proceedings and proposals for legislative funding to be submitted to
the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 15, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
manage wildlife programs in a manner that provides for public opportunities to
view wildlife and supports wildlife viewing tourism without impairing the
state's wildlife resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of forty-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department
of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---