BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.01.244 and 1979
ex.s. c 109 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

All state lands
hereafter leased for grazing or agricultural purposes shall be open and
available to the public for purposes of hunting and fishing, and for
nonconsumptive wildlife activities, as defined by the department of fish and
wildlife by rule, unless closed to public entry because of fire hazard or
unless the department of natural resources gives prior written approval and the
area is lawfully posted by lessee to prohibit hunting and fishing, and
nonconsumptive wildlife activities, as defined by the department of fish and
wildlife by rule, thereon in order to prevent damage to crops or other land
cover, to improvements on the land, to livestock, to the lessee, or to the
general public, or closure is necessary to avoid undue interference with
carrying forward a departmental or agency program. In the event any such lands
are so posted it shall be unlawful for any person to hunt or fish, or pursue
nonconsumptive wildlife activities, as defined by the department of fish and
wildlife by rule, on any such posted lands. Such lands shall not be
open and available for wildlife activities when access could endanger crops on
the land or when access could endanger the person accessing the land.

The department of
natural resources shall insert the provisions of this section in all grazing
and agricultural leases hereafter issued.

Sec. 2. RCW 79.68.050 and 1971
ex.s. c 234 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Multiple uses
additional to and compatible with those basic activities necessary to fulfill
the financial obligations of trust management may include but are not limited
to:

(1) Recreational areas;

(2) Recreational trails
for both vehicular and nonvehicular uses;

(3) Special educational
or scientific studies;

(4) Experimental
programs by the various public agencies;

(5) Special events;

(6) Hunting and fishing
and other sports activities;

(7) Nonconsumptive
wildlife activities as defined by the board of natural resources;

(8) Maintenance
of scenic areas;

(((8))) (9)
Maintenance of historical sites;

(((9))) (10)
Municipal or other public watershed protection;

(((10))) (11)
Greenbelt areas;

(((11))) (12)
Public rights of way;

(((12))) (13)
Other uses or activities by public agencies;

If such
additional uses are not compatible with the financial obligations in the
management of trust land they may be permitted only if there is compensation
from such uses satisfying the financial obligations.

---
END ---