BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.305 and 1999 c
351 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department,
having good cause to believe that a licensed driver is incompetent or otherwise
not qualified to be licensed may upon notice require him or her to submit to an
examination.

(a) The director has
good cause to believe that a driver is incompetent or unqualified to retain his
or her license on the basis of a report by:

(i) A law
enforcement officer;

(ii) A physician;

(iii) A physical
therapist;

(iv) An occupational
therapist;

(v) A registered
nurse;

(vi) A psychiatrist;

(vii) A psychologist;

(viii) An officer of
the court; or

(ix) A member of the
driver's immediate family, who has reached the age of eighteen years, except
that no person may report the same family member under this section more than
once during a three-month period.

(b) The report must
state that the person reasonably and in good faith believes the driver cannot
safely operate a motor vehicle, based upon personal observation or physical
evidence that must be described in the report, or the report must be based upon
an investigation by a law enforcement officer. The report must be a written
declaration in the form prescribed by the department and must contain the name,
address, telephone number, and signature of the person making the report. The
department must review the report and the driver's record to determine whether
a driver must submit to an examination.

(c) A report
received by the department under this subsection is exempt from public
inspection and copying under chapter 42.17 RCW. The department shall not
divulge the identity of the person making the report without that person's
permission, except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction. A person
who makes a report in good faith may not be held liable in a civil action based
upon the contents of the report, the fact that it was made, or the consequences
of the report.

(d) A person who
intentionally files a false report under this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and is liable for damages that proximately result.

(2) The department
shall require a driver reported under RCW 46.52.070 (2) and (3) to submit to an
examination. The examination must be completed no later than one hundred
twenty days after the accident report required under RCW 46.52.070(2) is
received by the department unless the department, at the request of the
operator, extends the time for examination.

(3) The department may
in addition to an examination under this section require such person to obtain
a certificate showing his or her condition signed by a licensed physician or other
proper authority designated by the department.

(4) Upon the conclusion
of an examination under this section the department shall take driver
improvement action as may be appropriate and may suspend or revoke the license
of such person or permit him or her to retain such license, or may issue a
license subject to restrictions as permitted under RCW 46.20.041. The
department may suspend or revoke the license of such person who refuses or
neglects to submit to such examination.

(5) A driver whose
condition is temporary in nature may petition the director for total or partial
reinstatement of his or her license at the end of the temporary condition. The
request must be made on a form prescribed by the department and accompanied by
a statement from a health care provider. The director must decide the petition
within thirty days of receipt of the petition. A person whose petition for
license reinstatement is denied may, within thirty days after the notice of
denial has been given, request in writing a formal hearing before the
department. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is
subject to and must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329
and 46.20.332.

(6) The
department may require payment of a fee by a person subject to examination
under this section. The department shall set the fee in an amount that is
sufficient to cover the additional cost of administering examinations required
by this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.63.020 and 1999 c
86 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure to perform any
act required or the performance of any act prohibited by this title or an
equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and
pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic infraction and may not be
classified as a criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the
following provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

(1) RCW 46.09.120(2)
relating to the operation of a nonhighway vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance;

(2) RCW 46.09.130
relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;

(3) RCW 46.10.090(2)
relating to the operation of a snowmobile while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit‑forming drugs or in a manner
endangering the person of another;

(4) RCW 46.10.130
relating to the operation of snowmobiles;

(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW
relating to certificates of ownership and registration and markings indicating
that a vehicle has been destroyed or declared a total loss;

(6) RCW 46.16.010
relating to initial registration of motor vehicles;

(7) RCW 46.16.011
relating to permitting unauthorized persons to drive;

(8) RCW 46.16.160
relating to vehicle trip permits;

(9) RCW 46.16.381(2)
relating to knowingly providing false information in conjunction with an
application for a special placard or license plate for disabled persons'
parking;

(10) RCW 46.20.005
relating to driving without a valid driver's license;

(11) RCW 46.20.091
relating to false statements regarding a driver's license or instruction permit;

(12) RCW ((46.20.336))
46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of a driver's
license;

(13) RCW 46.20.305
relating to false reporting of an incompetent driver;

(14) RCW
46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked license or status;

(((14) RCW 46.20.410
relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational driver's license;))

(15) RCW ((46.20.420))
46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended
or revoked license;

(16) RCW 46.20.410
relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational driver's license;

(17) RCW
46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without an ignition
interlock device in violation of a license notation that the device is
required;

(((17))) (18)
RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device;

(((18))) (19)
RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;

(((19))) (20)
Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;

(((20))) (21)
RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of financial responsibility;

(((21))) (22)
RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of sunscreening material;

(((22))) (23)
RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot vehicles;

(((23))) (24)
RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous articles;

(((24))) (25)
RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(((25))) (26)
RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(((26))) (27)
RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen, and appraisers;

(((27))) (28)
RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving record to be furnished
to an insurance company, an employer, and an alcohol/drug assessment or
treatment agency;

(((28))) (29)
RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a registered tow truck
operator without a registration certificate;

(((29))) (30)
RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck operators;

(((30))) (31)
RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers, ((flagmen)) flaggers,
or fire fighters;

(((31))) (32)
RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or cooperate with an
officer;

(((32))) (33)
RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give identification to an
officer;

(((33))) (34)
RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police vehicles;

(((34))) (35)
RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;

(((35))) (36)
RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(((36))) (37)
RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle
after consuming alcohol;

(((37))) (38)
RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;

(((38))) (39)
RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;

(((39))) (40)
RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;

(((40))) (41)
RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway workers;

(((41))) (42)
RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(((42))) (43)
RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle with the
motor running;

(((43))) (44)
RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt to cancel a
traffic citation;

(((44))) (45)
RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing, and
committing crimes;

(((45))) (46)
Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;

(((46))) (47)
RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a refund;

(((47))) (48)
Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business practices, except
where that chapter provides for the assessment of monetary penalties of a civil
nature;

(((48))) (49)
Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers in for hire
vehicles;

(((49))) (50)
RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;

(((50))) (51)
RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a vehicle
certificate;

(((51))) (52)
RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine carrier;

(((52))) (53)
Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;

(((53))) (54)
Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;

(((54))) (55)
RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card, letter of
authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter 46.87 RCW;

(((55))) (56)
RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or unlicensed vehicle
under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

A report
filed with the department of licensing under RCW 46.20.305 that causes the
director to commence an inquiry into a person's driving ability is exempt from
the disclosure requirements of this chapter.

---
END ---