BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to amounts received from the department of social and health services for
the specific purpose of providing division of developmental disabilities
contracted and certified nonfacility based residential services to a person
with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---