BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to provide injured workers with vocational rehabilitation and retraining
services when such services are likely to allow the workers to resume work at
wages as close as possible to their preinjury wages. The purpose of this act
is to specify that, in exercising its discretion in providing vocational
rehabilitation services, the department of labor and industries will use the
capacity to earn seventy percent of the preinjury wage as the standard for
determining whether an injured worker should be eligible for vocational
rehabilitation services and retraining. The legislature intends this
eligibility standard to apply only to vocational rehabilitation under RCW
51.32.095 and does not intend this standard to apply to any other section of
the state's industrial insurance code. The legislature further intends that
this act apply prospectively rather than retrospectively.

Sec. 2. RCW 51.32.095 and 1999 c
110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) One of the primary
purposes of this title is to enable the injured worker to become employable at
gainful employment. To this end, the department or self-insurers shall utilize
the services of individuals and organizations, public or private, whose experience,
training, and interests in vocational rehabilitation and retraining qualify
them to lend expert assistance to the supervisor of industrial insurance in
such programs of vocational rehabilitation as may be reasonable to make the
worker employable consistent with his or her physical and mental status.
Where, after evaluation and recommendation by such individuals or organizations
and prior to final evaluation of the worker's permanent disability and in the
sole opinion of the supervisor or supervisor's designee, whether or not medical
treatment has been concluded, vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and
likely to enable the injured worker to become employable at gainful employment,
the supervisor or supervisor's designee may, in his or her sole discretion, pay
or, if the employer is a self-insurer, direct the self-insurer to pay the cost
as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) When in the sole
discretion of the supervisor or the supervisor's designee vocational
rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to make the worker employable at
gainful employment, then the following order of priorities shall be used:

(a) Return to the
previous job with the same employer;

(b) Modification of the
previous job with the same employer including transitional return to work;

(c) A new job with the
same employer in keeping with any limitations or restrictions;

(d) Modification of a
new job with the same employer including transitional return to work;

(e) Modification of the
previous job with a new employer;

(f) A new job with a
new employer or self-employment based upon transferable skills;

(g) Modification of a
new job with a new employer;

(h) A new job with a
new employer or self-employment involving on-the-job training;

(i) Short-term retraining
and job placement.

(3)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, costs for vocational rehabilitation
benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's designee under subsection
(1) of this section may include the cost of books, tuition, fees, supplies,
equipment, transportation, child or dependent care, and other necessary
expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars
in any fifty-two week period ((except as authorized by RCW 51.60.060,))
and the cost of continuing the temporary total disability compensation under
RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is actively and successfully undergoing a formal
program of vocational rehabilitation.

(b) Beginning with
vocational rehabilitation plans approved on or after July 1, 1999, costs for
vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's
designee under subsection (1) of this section may include the cost of books,
tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, child or dependent care, and other necessary
expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed four thousand dollars
in any fifty-two week period ((except as authorized by RCW 51.60.060,))
and the cost of transportation and continuing the temporary total disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is actively and successfully
undergoing a formal program of vocational rehabilitation.

(c) The expenses
allowed under (a) or (b) of this subsection may include training fees for
on-the-job training and the cost of furnishing tools and other equipment
necessary for self-employment or reemployment. However, compensation or
payment of retraining with job placement expenses under (a) or (b) of this
subsection may not be authorized for a period of more than fifty-two weeks,
except that such period may, in the sole discretion of the supervisor after his
or her review, be extended for an additional fifty-two weeks or portion thereof
by written order of the supervisor.

(d) In cases where the
worker is required to reside away from his or her customary residence, the
reasonable cost of board and lodging shall also be paid.

(e) Costs paid under
this subsection shall be chargeable to the employer's cost experience or shall
be paid by the self-insurer as the case may be.

(4) In addition to the
vocational rehabilitation expenditures provided for under subsection (3) of
this section, an additional five thousand dollars may, upon authorization of
the supervisor or the supervisor's designee, be expended for: (a)
Accommodations for an injured worker that are medically necessary for the
worker to participate in an approved retraining plan; and (b) accommodations
necessary to perform the essential functions of an occupation in which an
injured worker is seeking employment, consistent with the retraining plan or
the recommendations of a vocational evaluation. The injured worker's attending
physician must verify the necessity of the modifications or accommodations.
The total expenditures authorized in this subsection and the expenditures
authorized under RCW 51.32.250 shall not exceed five thousand dollars.

(5) The department
shall establish criteria to monitor the quality and effectiveness of
rehabilitation services provided by the individuals and organizations used
under subsection (1) of this section. The state fund shall make referrals for
vocational rehabilitation services based on these performance criteria.

(6) The department
shall engage in, where feasible and cost-effective, a cooperative program with
the state employment security department to provide job placement services
under this section.

(7) The benefits in
this section shall be provided for the injured workers of self-insured
employers. Self-insurers shall report both benefits provided and benefits
denied under this section in the manner prescribed by the department by rule
adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The director may, in his or her sole
discretion and upon his or her own initiative or at any time that a dispute
arises under this section, promptly make such inquiries as circumstances
require and take such other action as he or she considers will properly
determine the matter and protect the rights of the parties.

(8) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the benefits provided for in this section are
available to any otherwise eligible worker regardless of the date of industrial
injury. However, claims shall not be reopened solely for vocational
rehabilitation purposes.

(9) For
the purposes of this section, "gainful employment" means employment
or self-employment in which the monthly wages, including benefits provided by
the employer, are equal to or greater than seventy percent of the monthly wages
earned by the worker at the time of injury or the legal minimum wage, whichever
is greater. This subsection applies only to claims filed on or after the
effective date of this act.

---
END ---