BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. RCW 77.16.220 is
recodified as a section in chapter 77.55 RCW, and shall be codified between RCW
77.55.040 and 77.55.050.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter 107, Laws of 2000 recodified Titles 75 and 77 RCW into Title 77
RCW ensuant to the merger of the departments of wildlife and fisheries.
Chapter 107, Laws of 2000 repealed or recodified every section in chapter 77.16
RCW except RCW 77.16.220. This section corrects this apparent oversight by
recodifying RCW 77.16.220 in a more appropriate chapter.

---
END ---