BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.12.025 and 1998 c
56 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An action may be
brought in any county in which the defendant resides, or, if there be more than
one defendant, where some one of the defendants resides at the time of the
commencement of the action. For the purpose of this section, the residence of
a corporation defendant shall be deemed to be in any county where the
corporation: (a) Transacts business; (b) has an office for the transaction of
business; (c) transacted business at the time the cause of action arose; or (d)
where any person resides upon whom process may be served upon the corporation.

(2) ((An action upon
the unlawful issuance of a check or draft may be brought in any county in which
the defendant resides or may be brought in any division of the judicial
district in which the check was issued or presented as payment.

(3))) The venue of any action brought against a
corporation, at the option of the plaintiff, shall be: (a) In the county where
the tort was committed; (b) in the county where the work was performed for said
corporation; (c) in the county where the agreement entered into with the
corporation was made; or (d) in the county where the corporation has its
residence.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.66.040 and 1988 c
71 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An action arising
under RCW 3.66.020 (1), (2) except for the recovery of possession of personal
property, (4), (6), (7), and (9) may be brought in any district in which the
defendant, or, if there be more than one defendant, where some one of the
defendants, resides at the time the complaint is filed or in which the
defendant, or if there be more than one defendant, where some one of the
defendants may be served with the notice and complaint in which latter case,
however, the district where the defendant or defendants is or are served must
be within the county in which the said defendant or defendants reside. If the
residence of the defendant is not ascertained by reasonable efforts, the action
may be brought in the district in which the defendant's place of actual
physical employment is located.

(2) An action arising
under RCW 3.66.020(2) for the recovery of possession of personal property and
RCW 3.66.020(8) shall be brought in the district in which the subject matter of
the action or some part thereof is situated.

(3) An action arising
under RCW 3.66.020 (3) and (5) shall be brought in the district in which the
cause of action, or some part thereof arose.

(4) An action arising
under RCW 3.66.020(2) for the recovery of damages for injuries to the person or
for injury to personal property arising from a motor vehicle accident may be
brought, at the plaintiff's option, either in the district in which the cause of
action, or some part thereof, arose, or in the district in which the defendant,
or, if there be more than one defendant, where some one of the defendants,
resides at the time the complaint is filed.

(5) An action against a
nonresident of this state may be brought in any district where service of
process may be had, or in which the cause of action or some part thereof arose,
or in which the plaintiff or one of them resides.

(6) An action upon
the unlawful issuance of a check or draft may be brought in any county in which
the defendant resides or may be brought in any division of the judicial
district in which the check was issued or presented as payment.

(7) For the
purposes of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW, the residence of a corporation
defendant shall be deemed to be in any district where the corporation transacts
business or has an office for the transaction of business or transacted
business at the time the cause of action arose or where any person resides upon
whom process may be served upon the corporation, unless herein otherwise
provided.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

In
1998, a provision relating to venue for actions for unlawful issuance of a
check or draft was placed in RCW 4.12.025, which relates to actions before the
superior court. However, such actions are heard before the district court, so
the venue provision is more properly placed in RCW 3.66.040, relating to
actions before the district court.

---
END ---