BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 3.62.090
and 1997 c 331 s 4 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) There shall be assessed and collected in
addition to any

_8 fines, forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than
for parking

_9 infractions, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35
RCW a

10 public safety and education assessment equal to sixty
percent of

11 such fines, forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be
remitted as

12 provided in chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW.
The

13 assessment required by this section shall not be
suspended or

14 waived by the court.

15 (2) There shall be assessed and collected in
addition to any

16 fines, forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than
for parking

17 infractions and for fines levied under RCW 46.61.5055,
and in

18 addition to the public safety and education assessment
required

p. 1 SSB
5309

_1 under subsection (1) of this section, by all courts
organized

_2 under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an additional public safety and
education

_3 assessment equal to fifty percent of the public safety
and

_4 education assessment required under subsection (1) of
this

_5 section, which shall be remitted to the state treasurer
and

_6 deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The additional
assessment

_7 required by this subsection shall not be suspended or
waived by

_8 the court.

_9 (3) This section does not apply to the fee imposed
under RCW

10 ((43.63.110(6))) 46.63.110(6) or the penalty
imposed under RCW

11 46.63.110(7).

12 Sec. 2. RCW
46.63.110 and 1997 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read

13 as follows:

14 (1) A person found to have committed a traffic
infraction shall

15 be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed
two hundred

16 and fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by
this

17 chapter or title.

18 (2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a
schedule of

19 monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions.
This rule

20 shall also specify the conditions under which local
courts may

21 exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for
traffic

22 infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the
supreme

23 court to adjust this schedule every two years for
inflation.

24 (3) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars
for failure

25 to respond to a notice of traffic infraction except
where the

26 infraction relates to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance,

27 regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary
penalty

28 imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative
body may set

29 a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for
failure

30 to respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to
parking

31 as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution. The

32 local court, whether a municipal, police, or district
court, shall

33 impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative
body.

34 (4) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70
RCW which

35 are civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed
for

36 violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size,
weight, and load

SSB 5309 p. 2

_1 of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on
the amount

_2 of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to
this

_3 chapter.

_4 (5) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a
court under

_5 this chapter it is immediately payable. If the person
is unable to

_6 pay at that time the court may, in its discretion, grant
an

_7 extension of the period in which the penalty may be
paid. If the

_8 penalty is not paid on or before the time established
for payment

_9 the court shall notify the department of the failure to
pay the

10 penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's
driver's

11 license or driving privilege until the penalty has been
paid and

12 the penalty provided in subsection (3) of this section
has been

13 paid.

14 (6) In addition to any other penalties imposed under
this

15 section and not subject to the limitation of subsection
(1) of

16 this section, a person found to have committed a traffic

17 infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per

18 infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be
reduced or

19 waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the
state

20 treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services
and trauma

21 care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.

22 (7)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed
under this

23 section and not subject to the limitation of
subsection (1) of

24 this section, a person found to have committed a
traffic

25 infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be
assessed an

26 additional penalty of ten dollars. The court may not
reduce, waive,

27 or suspend the additional penalty unless the court
finds the

28 offender to be indigent. If a community service
program for

29 offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court
shall allow

30 offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due
under this

31 subsection (7) by participation in the community
service program.

32 (b) Revenue from the additional penalty must be
remitted under

33 chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20
RCW. Money

34 remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
must be

35 deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance
of the revenue

36 received by the county or city treasurer under this
subsection

37 must be deposited into the county or city current
expense

p. 3 SSB
5309

_1 fund. Moneys retained by the city or county under
this subsection

_2 shall constitute reimbursement for any liabilities
under RCW

_3 43.135.060.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 46.64

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) In addition to any other penalties imposed for
conviction

_7 of a violation of this title that is a misdemeanor,
gross

_8 misdemeanor, or felony, the court shall impose an
additional

_9 penalty of fifty dollars. The court may not reduce,
waive, or

10 suspend the additional penalty unless the court finds
the offender

11 to be indigent. If a community service program for
offenders is

12 available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow
offenders to

13 offset all or a part of the penalty due under this
section by

14 participation in the community service program.

15 (2) Revenue from the additional penalty must be
remitted under

16 chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW.
Money

17 remitted under this section to the state treasurer must
be

18 deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of
the revenue

19 received by the county or city treasurer under this
section must

20 be deposited into the county or city current expense
fund. Moneys

21 retained by the city or county under this subsection
shall

22 constitute reimbursement for any liabilities under RCW
43.135.060.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5309 p. 4