BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.03 RCW to read as follows:

It is the duty of the
legislature to set the salaries for members of the legislature, elected state
officials, and judges. The legislature may only make changes to salaries prior
to November in even-numbered years. No changes to salaries may be made in
odd-numbered years.

Sec. 2. RCW 2.04.092 and 1986 c
155 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The annual salary of
justices of the supreme court shall be established by the ((Washington
citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials)) legislature.
No salary warrant may be issued to a justice of the supreme court until the
justice files with the state treasurer an affidavit that no matter referred to
the justice for opinion or decision has been uncompleted or undecided for more
than six months.

Sec. 3. RCW 2.06.062 and 1986 c
155 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The annual salary of
the judges of the court of appeals shall be established by the ((Washington
citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials)) legislature.
No salary warrant may be issued to any judge until the judge files with the
state treasurer an affidavit that no matter referred to the judge for opinion
or decision has been uncompleted for more than six months.

Sec. 4. RCW 2.08.092 and 1986 c
155 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The annual salary of
the judges of the superior court shall be established by the ((Washington
citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials)) legislature.

Sec. 5. RCW 3.58.010 and 1986 c
155 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The annual salary of
each full time district court judge shall be established by the ((Washington
citizen's commission on salaries for elected officials)) legislature.
A member of the legislature whose term of office is partly coextensive with or
extends beyond the present term of office of any of the officials whose salary
is increased by virtue of the provisions of RCW 43.03.010, 2.04.092, 2.06.062,
2.08.092, and 3.58.010 shall be eligible to be appointed or elected to any of
the offices the salary of which is increased hereby but he or she shall
not be entitled to receive such increased salary until after the expiration of
his or her present term of office and his or her subsequent
election or reelection to the office to which he or she was appointed or
elected respectively during his or her term of office as legislator.

Sec. 6. RCW 3.58.020 and 1991 c
338 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The annual salaries of
part time district judges shall be set by the ((citizens' commission on
salaries)) legislature.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.03.010 and 1989 c
10 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The annual salaries of
the following named state elected officials shall be prescribed by the ((Washington
citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials)) legislature:
Governor; lieutenant governor: PROVIDED, That in arriving at the annual salary
of the lieutenant governor the ((commission)) legislature shall
prescribe a fixed amount plus a sum equal to 1/260th of the difference between
the annual salary of the lieutenant governor and the annual salary of the
governor for each day that the lieutenant governor is called upon to perform
the duties of the governor by reason of the absence from the state, removal,
resignation, death, or disability of the governor; secretary of state; state
treasurer; state auditor; attorney general; superintendent of public instruction;
commissioner of public lands; and state insurance commissioner. Members of the
legislature shall receive for their service per annum the amount prescribed by
the ((Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials))
legislature; and in addition, reimbursement for mileage for travel to
and from legislative sessions as provided in RCW 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002, if the proposed amendment to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the
state Constitution (repealing the independent commission that establishes
judges and elected officials' salaries, SJR . . . . .
(S-0845.1/01)) is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the
voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved
and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.03.305 (Washington citizens'
commission on salaries for elected officials--Generally) and 1999 c 102 s 1,
1995 c 3 s 1, 1993 c 281 s 46, & 1986 c 155 s 2; and

(2) RCW 43.03.310 (Duties of citizens'
commission--Travel expenses‑-Chair--Schedule of
salaries--Publication--Hearings) and 1998 c 164 s 1, 1995 c 3 s 2, & 1986 c
155 s 3.

---
END ---