BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The department of
transportation shall develop criteria to be used for evaluating and
prioritizing noise mitigation projects. The adopted criteria should be
consistent with federal standards for noise abatement, and must at a minimum
consider the current level of noise in the affected area, the number of persons
who would benefit from a reduction in noise, the reduction in decibels
resulting from the mitigation project, and the project cost.

For the purposes of
this section, "noise mitigation" means a structure, combination of
structures, materials, processes, or techniques that have the intended result
of permanently reducing, in a primarily residential area, noise associated with
the use of a state transportation facility. This definition includes, but is
not limited to, "noise wall retrofits" as that term is used in the
department's 1987 directive D22-22.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Each biennium the
department shall apply the criteria developed under section 1 of this act to
develop a ranked priority list of noise mitigation projects. The department
shall identify the highest ranked project located in eastern Washington; the
highest ranked project located in the greater Puget Sound region; and the
highest ranked project in western Washington outside the greater Puget Sound
region. The remainder of the list must be displayed in ranked order, without
regard to geographic location. The department shall submit the list in support
of the biennial budget request under RCW 44.40.070 and 44.40.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. For purposes of funding
noise wall retrofit projects, in each fiscal year the department of transportation
shall expend, as a minimum, a sum equal to five-tenths of one percent of all
funds, both state and federal, expended for the construction of state highways
in that fiscal year, for that specific purpose. In order to more efficiently
program noise wall retrofit projects, the department may defer any part of a
fiscal year's appropriation for a period not to exceed four years after the end
of the fiscal year in which the original appropriation was made. For a fiscal
year in which the department expends for noise wall retrofit purposes more than
the minimum sum required by this section, the amount of the excess expenditure
constitutes a credit that may be carried forward and applied to the minimum
environmental retrofit expenditure requirements for any of the next four fiscal
years. The department may apply a portion of this funding towards the review
and maintenance of a prioritized list of eligible noise wall retrofit projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The legislature intends that
the department of transportation carry out the purposes of this act in a swift
manner. Until the department has adopted the project priority criteria
specified in section 1 of this act and submitted the list of ranked projects to
the legislature, the department shall commence three pilot projects:

(1) A feasibility study
and project design of a means for reducing noise reflected from an overhead
structure, such as a bridge deck. This pilot project should be located in the
Puget Sound region;

(2) Noise mitigation
retrofitting on a highway where lane widening is currently planned, and where
the noise mitigation structure can be constructed at substantial cost savings
by proceeding concurrently with highway improvements. This pilot project
should be located in eastern Washington;

(3) Noise mitigation
retrofitting in an area adjacent to a six-lane, fully controlled, limited
access highway, where the mitigation site is located within one-quarter of a
mile from an interchange. This pilot project should be located in western
Washington, outside the greater Puget Sound region.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act are each added to chapter 47.40 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---