BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.030 and 1994
c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Two or more contiguous
counties each having a population of four hundred thousand persons or more may
establish a regional transit authority to develop and operate a high capacity
transportation system as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.

The authority shall be
formed in the following manner:

(1) The joint regional
policy committee created pursuant to RCW 81.104.040 shall adopt a system and
financing plan, including the definition of the service area. This action
shall be completed by September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory
completion of the planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system
plan shall be adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall provide explicitly
for a minimum portion of new tax revenues to be allocated to local transit
agencies for interim express services. Upon adoption the joint regional policy
committee shall immediately transmit the plan to the county legislative
authorities within the adopted service area.

(2) The legislative
authorities of the counties within the service area shall decide by resolution
whether to participate in the authority. This action shall be completed within
forty-five days following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993,
whichever comes first.

(3) Each county that
chooses to participate in the authority shall appoint its board members as set
forth in RCW 81.112.040 and shall submit its list of members to the secretary
of the Washington state department of transportation. These actions must be
completed within thirty days following each county's decision to participate in
the authority.

(4) The secretary shall
call the first meeting of the authority, to be held within thirty days
following receipt of the appointments. At its first meeting, the authority
shall elect officers and provide for the adoption of rules and other operating
procedures.

(5) The authority is
formally constituted at its first meeting and the board shall begin taking
steps toward implementation of the system and financing plan adopted by the
joint regional policy committee. If the joint regional policy committee fails
to adopt a plan by June 30, 1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on
the work completed by that date by the joint regional policy committee. Upon
formation of the authority, the joint regional policy committee shall cease to
exist. The authority may make minor modifications to the plan as deemed
necessary and shall at a minimum review local transit agencies' plans to ensure
feeder service/high capacity transit service integration, ensure fare
integration, and ensure avoidance of parallel competitive services. The
authority shall also conduct a minimum thirty-day public comment period.

(6) If the authority
determines that major modifications to the plan are necessary before the
initial ballot proposition is submitted to the voters, the authority may make
those modifications with a favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire
membership. Any such modification shall be subject to the review process set
forth in RCW 81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the
legislative authorities of the participating counties. The legislative
authorities shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or
ordinance to confirm or rescind their continued participation in the authority.

(7) If any county opts
to not participate in the authority, but two or more contiguous counties do
choose to continue to participate, the authority's board shall be revised
accordingly. The authority shall, within forty-five days, redefine the system
and financing plan to reflect elimination of one or more counties, and submit
the redefined plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for
their decision as to whether to continue to participate. This action shall be
completed within forty-five days following receipt of the redefined plan.

(8) The authority shall
place on the ballot within two years of the authority's formation, a single
ballot proposition to authorize the imposition of taxes to support the
implementation of an appropriate phase of the plan within its service area. In
addition to the system plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the
system plan approved by the authority's board before the submittal of a
proposition to the voters shall contain an equity element which:

(a) Identifies revenues
anticipated to be generated by corridor and by county within the authority's
boundaries;

(b) Identifies the
phasing of construction and operation of high capacity system facilities,
services, and benefits in each corridor. Phasing decisions should give
priority to jurisdictions which have adopted transit-supportive land use plans;
and

(c) Identifies the
degree to which revenues generated within each county will benefit the
residents of that county, and identifies when such benefits will accrue.

A simple majority of
those voting within the boundaries of the authority is required for approval.
If the vote is affirmative, the authority shall begin implementation of the
projects identified in the proposition. However, the authority may not submit
any authorizing proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor
may the authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.

(9) If the vote on a
proposition fails, the board may redefine the proposition, make changes to the
authority boundaries, and make corresponding changes to the composition of the
board. If the composition of the board is changed, the participating counties
shall revise the membership of the board accordingly. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the voters. No
single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than twice. The
authority may place additional propositions on the ballot to impose taxes to
support additional phases of plan implementation.

If the authority is
unable to achieve a positive vote on a proposition within two years from the
date of the first election on a proposition, the board may, by resolution,
reconstitute the authority as a single-county body. With a two-thirds vote of
the entire membership of the voting members, the board may also dissolve the
authority.

(10) At any time if
a proposition approved by the voters is significantly altered by actions of the
board, the proposition will be resubmitted to the voters within the boundaries
of the originally approved proposition.

A significant
alteration to a proposition is:

(a) An increase in
cost for completion of the proposition approved by the voters equal to or
greater than thirty percent of the cost identified in the proposition approved
by the voters;

(b) A delay of
twenty-four months or more of the entire proposition submitted to and approved
by the voters;

(c) Elimination of
any portion or element of the original proposition submitted to and approved by
the voters.

Once a significant
alteration to the proposition has been approved by an action or an accumulation
of actions by the board of the proposition originally approved by the voters,
the board must submit to the voters within the boundaries of the authority at
the next general election for approval of the significant alteration of the
original proposal.

If the
authority is unable to achieve an affirmative vote on the increase of the cost,
delay, or modification of the proposition originally submitted to the voters,
the board may submit an alternative proposition in each of the next two general
elections.

--- END ---