BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 50.44

_7 RCW to read as follows:

_8 The legislature finds the interests of the state and
its

_9 citizens are best served by a strong community and
technical

10 college system. As described by their establishing
legislation,

11 these two‑year institutions are an independent,
unique, and vital

12 section of our state's higher education system, separate
from both

13 the common school system and other institutions of
higher

14 education. Paramount to that system's success is the
attraction

15 and retention of qualified instructors. In order to
attract and

16 retain instructors, those who are subject to
uncertainties of

17 employment must be provided assurance their economic
needs are

18 addressed. Over time, a change in hiring patterns has
occurred, and

p. 1 SB
5316

_1 for the last decade a substantial portion of community
and

_2 technical college faculty are hired on a contingent, as
needed,

_3 basis. That contingent nature distinguishes them from
the more

_4 stable, majority employment found in the common school
system and

_5 in the other institutions of higher education.
Contingent

_6 assurances of future employment are often speculative
and do not

_7 rise to the level of other forms of assurance. As such,
assurances

_8 conditioned on forecast enrollment, funding, or program
decisions

_9 are typically not reasonable assurances of employment.

10 It is the intent of the legislature that reasonable
assurance

11 continue to apply to all employees of educational
institutions as

12 required by federal provisions and RCW 50.44.080.

13 Sec. 2. RCW
50.44.053 and 1998 c 233 s 3 are each amended to read

14 as follows:

15 (1) The term "reasonable
assurance," as used in RCW 50.44.050,

16 means a written, verbal, or implied agreement that the
employee

17 will perform services in the same capacity during the
ensuing

18 academic year or term as in the first academic year or
term. A

19 person shall not be deemed to be performing services
"in the same

20 capacity" unless those services are rendered under
the same terms

21 or conditions of employment in the ensuing year as in
the first

22 academic year or term.

23 (2) An individual who is tenured or holds tenure
track status

24 is considered to have reasonable assurance, unless
advised

25 otherwise by the college. For the purposes of this
section, tenure

26 track status means a probationary faculty employee
having an

27 opportunity to be reviewed for tenure.

28 (3) In the case of community and technical
colleges assigned

29 the standard industrial classification code 8222 or
the north

30 American industry classification system code 611210
for services

31 performed in a principal administrative, research, or

32 instructional capacity, a person is presumed not to
have

33 reasonable assurance under an offer that is
conditioned on

34 enrollment, funding, or program changes. It is the
college's

35 burden to provide sufficient documentation to
overcome this

36 presumption. Reasonable assurance must be determined
on a case-by-

37 case basis by the total weight of evidence rather
than the

SB 5316 p. 2

_1 existence of any one factor. Primary weight must be
given to the

_2 contingent nature of an offer of employment based on
enrollment,

_3 funding, and program changes.

_4 Sec. 3. RCW
50.44.080 and 1971 c 3 s 25 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 ((RCW 50.44.010 through 50.44.070 have been
enacted to meet the

_7 requirements imposed by the federal unemployment tax
act as

_8 amended by 91-373. Internal references in any
section of chapter 3,

_9 Laws of 1971 to the provisions of that act are
intended only to

10 apply to those provisions as they existed as of
January 28,

11 1971.))

12 In view of the importance of compliance of this
chapter ((3,

13 Laws of 1971)) with the federal unemployment tax
act, any

14 ambiguities contained herein should be resolved in a
manner

15 consistent with the provisions of that act. ((Considerable
weight

16 has been given to the commentary contained in that
document

17 entitled "Draft Legislation to Implement the
Employment Security

18 Amendments of 1970 . . . H.R. 14705",
published by the United States

19 Department of Labor, Manpower Administration, and
that commentary

20 should be referred to when interpreting the
provisions of chapter

21 3, Laws of 1971.)) Department of labor
guidelines implementing

22 this act should be referred to when interpreting the
provisions of

23 this chapter.

24 Language in this chapter ((3, Laws of 1971))
concerning the

25 extension of coverage to employers entitled to make
payments in

26 lieu of contributions should, in a manner consistent
with the

27 foregoing paragraph, be construed so as to have a
minimum

28 financial impact on the employers subject to the
experience rating

29 provisions of this title.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If any part of this
act is found to be in

31 conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition

32 to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the
eligibility

33 of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits,

34 the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely
to the

35 extent of the conflict, and the finding or determination
does not

36 affect the operation of the remainder of this act.
Rules adopted

p. 3 SB
5316

_1 under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary

_2 condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state
or the

_3 granting of federal unemployment tax credits to
employers in this

_4 state.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of
this act or its

_6 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

_7 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

_8 persons or circumstances is not affected.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act applies to
weeks that begin after

10 March 31, 2001.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary
for the immediate

12 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

13 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

14 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5316 p. 4