BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to clarify requirements related to the use of base year hours and
wages for certain employees at educational institutions, for the purpose of
determining eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits.

The legislature finds
that, unless clarified, Washington's unemployment compensation law may be out
of conformity with the federal unemployment tax act, which poses a significant
economic risk to the state's private employers, the state's general fund, and
to the administration of the state's unemployment insurance system. It is the
intent of the legislature to change Washington's unemployment law only to the extent
necessary to ensure it conforms with federal law governing the use of base year
hours and wages earned at educational institutions.

The legislature finds
that the United States department of labor will rely on state law and its
application as interpreted in state court decisions, especially Pechman v.
Employment Security, to determine if Washington state law conforms to
federal guidelines in this area. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to clearly communicate to the courts that the purpose for the
section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 amendment to RCW 50.44.050
(section 2 of this act) is to interpret state law in a manner that conforms to
federal guidelines.

The legislature finds
that federal law requires that school hours and wages in the base year must be
restricted from use to establish eligibility for an unemployment compensation
claim for employees of educational institutions during specified times.
Further, federal law specifies that when required to restrict base year school
hours and wages, it must be any and all hours and wages from any and all
educational institutions, not just the hours and wages from institutions where
there is a reasonable assurance of returning to work following a customary
nonwork period. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to restrict
hours worked and wages earned as required by federal law.

Customary nonwork
periods for educational institutions include:

(1) The period between
two successive academic years;

(2) The period between
two successive academic terms within an academic year;

(3) A similar period
between two regular but not successive terms within an academic year; or

(4) An established and
customary vacation period or holiday recess.

Restricted use of base
year hours and wages from educational institutions shall occur only in the
circumstances described in RCW 50.44.050 (as amended by this act) and in RCW
50.44.053, and as further defined in rules promulgated by the employment security
department.

Sec. 2. RCW 50.44.050 and 1998 c
233 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
provided in subsections (1) through (4) of this section, benefits based on
services in employment covered by or pursuant to this chapter shall be payable
on the same terms and subject to the same conditions as compensation payable on
the basis of other service subject to this title.

(1) Benefits based on any
and all service in an instructional, research, or principal administrative
capacity for ((an)) any and all educational institutions
shall not be paid to an individual for any week of unemployment which commences
during the period between two successive academic years or between two
successive academic terms within an academic year (or, when an agreement
provides instead for a similar period between two regular but not successive
terms within an academic year, during such period) if such individual performs
such services in the first of such academic years or terms and if there is a
contract or reasonable assurance that such individual will perform services in
any such capacity for any educational institution in the second of such
academic years or terms. Any employee of a common school district who is
presumed to be reemployed pursuant to RCW 28A.405.210 shall be deemed to have a
contract for the ensuing term.

(2) Benefits shall not
be paid based on any and all services in any other capacity for ((an))
any and all educational institutions for any week of unemployment
which commences during the period between two successive academic years or
between two successive academic terms within an academic year, if such
individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms
and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such
services in the second of such academic years or terms: PROVIDED, That if
benefits are denied to any individual under this subsection and that individual
was not offered an opportunity to perform such services for the educational
institution for the second of such academic years or terms, the individual is
entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the
individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which benefits were denied
solely by reason of this subsection.

(3) Benefits shall not
be paid based on any services described in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section for any week of unemployment which commences during an established and
customary vacation period or holiday recess if such individual performs such
services for any educational institution in the period immediately
before such vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable
assurance that such individual will perform such services for any
educational institution in the period immediately following such vacation
period or holiday recess.

(4) Benefits shall not
be paid (as specified in subsections (1), (2), or (3) of this section) based on
any services described in subsections (1) or (2) of this section to any
individual who performed such services in ((an)) any educational
institution while in the employ of an educational service district which is
established pursuant to chapter 28A.310 RCW and exists to provide services to
local school districts.

(5) As used in this
section, "academic year" means: Fall, winter, spring, and summer
quarters or comparable semesters unless, based upon objective criteria
including enrollment and staffing, the quarter or comparable semester is not in
fact a part of the academic year for the particular institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---