BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.16.020 and 1991 c
324 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated)) The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise((:)).

(1) "Board"
means the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and manicuring advisory board.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department of licensing or the
director's designee.

(3) "The practice
of cosmetology" means the practice of cutting, trimming, styling,
shampooing, permanent waving, chemical relaxing or straightening, bleaching, or
coloring of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp and manicuring and esthetics.

(4)
"Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage
in the practice of cosmetology and who has completed sixteen hundred hours of
instruction at a school licensed under this chapter.

(5) "The practice
of barbering" means the cutting, trimming, arranging, dressing, curling,
waving and shampooing hair of the face, neck and scalp.

(6) "Barber"
means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of
barbering.

(7) "Practice of
manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping, or polishing of the nails of the
hands or feet, and the application and removal of artificial nails.

(8)
"Manicurist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in
the practice of manicuring.

(9) "Practice of
esthetics" means skin care of the face, neck, and hands involving hot
compresses, massage, or the use of approved electrical appliances or
nonabrasive chemical compounds formulated for professional application only,
and the temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of lotions, creams, or
mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliance on another person.

(10)
"Esthetician" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in
the practice of esthetics.

(11)
"Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently licensed in this
state as a cosmetologist, barber, manicurist, or esthetician, and is enrolled
in an approved instructor-trainee program in a school licensed under this
chapter.

(12) "School"
means any establishment offering instruction in the practice of cosmetology, or
barbering, or esthetics, or manicuring, or instructor-trainee to students and
licensed under this chapter.

(13)
"Student" means a person sixteen years of age or older, except as
provided in subsection (18) of this section, who is enrolled in a school
licensed under this chapter and receives any phase of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, or manicuring instruction with or without tuition, fee, or
cost, and who does not receive any wage or commission.

(14)
"Instructor-operator-cosmetology" means a person who gives
instruction in the practice of cosmetology and instructor-training in a school
and who has the same qualifications as a cosmetologist, has completed at least
five hundred hours of instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in
a school, and has passed an examination prepared or selected by the board and
administered by the director. An applicant who holds a degree in education
from an accredited postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified
shall upon application be licensed as an instructor-operator with a cosmetology
endorsement.

(15)
"Instructor-operator-barber" means a person who gives instruction in
the practice of barbering and instructor training in a school, has the same
qualifications as a barber, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has
passed an examination prepared or selected by the board and administered by the
director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified shall upon application
be licensed as an instructor-operator with a barber endorsement.

(16) "Instructor-operator-manicure"
means a person who gives instruction in the practice of manicuring and
instructor training in a school, has the same qualifications as a manicurist,
has completed at least five hundred hours of instruction in teaching techniques
and lesson planning in a school, and has passed an examination prepared or
selected by the board and administered by the director. An applicant who holds
a degree in education from an accredited postsecondary institution and who is
otherwise qualified shall upon application be licensed as an
instructor-operator with a manicurist endorsement.

(17)
"Instructor-operator-esthetics" means a person who gives instruction
in the practice of esthetics and instructor training in a school, has the same
qualifications as an esthetician, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has
passed an examination prepared or selected by the board and administered by the
director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified shall upon application
be licensed as an instructor-operator with an esthetics endorsement.

(18) "Vocational
student" is a person who in cooperation with any senior high, skills
center, vocational technical institute, community college, or prep school,
attends a cosmetology school and participates in its student course of
instruction and has the same rights and duties as a student as defined in this
chapter. The person must have academically completed the eleventh grade of
high school with the exception of students enrolled in a high school or
skills center cosmetology program, who must have academically completed the
ninth grade of high school. Every such vocational student shall receive
credit for all creditable hours of the approved course of instruction received
in the school of cosmetology upon graduation from high school. Hours shall be
credited to a vocational student if the student graduates from an accredited
high school or receives a certificate of educational competence.

(19) "Booth
renter" means a person who performs cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or
manicuring services where the use of the salon/shop facilities is contingent
upon compensation to the owner of the salon/shop facilities and the person
receives no compensation or other consideration from the owner for the services
performed.

(20) "Person"
means any individual, partnership, professional service corporation, joint
stock association, joint venture, or any other entity authorized to do business
in this state.

(21)
"Salon/shop" means any building, structure, or motor home or any part
thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics, or manicuring is conducted.

(22) "Crossover
training" means training approved by the director as training hours that
may be credited to current licensees for similar training received in another
profession licensed under this chapter.

(23) "Approved
security" means surety bond, savings assignment, or irrevocable letter of
credit.

(24) "Mobile
operator" means any person possessing a valid cosmetology, barbering,
manicuring, or esthetician's license that provides services in a mobile
salon/shop.

(25)
"Personal service operator" means any person possessing a valid
cosmetology, barbering, manicuring, or esthetician's license that provides
services for clients in the client's home, office, or other location that is
convenient for the client.

--- END ---