BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.110.010 and 1997
c 437 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a state
agency which shall be known as the municipal research council. The council
shall be composed of ((twenty-three)) fourteen members. ((Four))
Two members shall be appointed by the president of the senate, with
equal representation from each of the two major political parties; ((four))
two members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, with equal representation from each of the two major political
parties; one member shall be ((appointed by the governor independently))
the director of community, trade, and economic development; ((nine))
six members, who shall be city or town officials, shall be appointed by
the governor from a list of ((nine)) six nominees submitted by
the board of directors of the association of Washington cities; and ((five))
three members, who shall be county officials, shall be appointed by the
governor, ((two)) one of whom shall be ((from a list of two
nominees)) a nominee submitted by the board of directors of the
Washington association of county officials, and ((three)) two of
whom shall be from a list of ((three)) two nominees submitted by
the board of directors of the Washington state association of counties. Of the
city or town officials, at least one shall be an official of a city having a
population of twenty thousand or more; at least one shall be an official of a
city having a population of one thousand five hundred to twenty thousand; and
at least one shall be an official of a town having a population of less than
one thousand five hundred.

The terms of members
shall be for two years. The terms of those members who are appointed as
legislators or city, town, or county officials shall be dependent upon
continuance in legislative, city, town, or county office. The terms of all
members except legislative members shall commence on the first day of August in
every odd-numbered year. The speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate shall make their appointments on or before the third
Monday in January in each odd-numbered year, and the terms of the members thus
appointed shall commence on the third Monday of January in each odd-numbered
year.

Council members shall
receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses at rates in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter
amended, except that members of the council who are also members of the
legislature shall be reimbursed at the rates provided by RCW 44.04.120.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.110.030 and 2000
c 227 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The municipal research
council shall contract for the provision of municipal research and services to
cities, towns, and counties. Contracts for municipal research and services
shall be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private
consulting firms, that in the judgment of council members are qualified to
provide such research and services. Contracts for staff support may be made
with state agencies, educational institutions, or private consulting firms that
in the judgment of the council members are qualified to provide such support.

Municipal research and
services shall consist of: (1) Studying and researching city, town, and county
government and issues relating to city, town, and county government; (2)
acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to city, town, and
county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government; (3)
providing educational conferences relating to city, town, and county government
and issues relating to city, town, and county government; and (4) furnishing
legal, technical, consultative, and field services to cities, towns, and
counties concerning planning, public health, utility services, fire protection,
law enforcement, public works, and other issues relating to city, town, and
county government. ((Requests for legal services by county officials shall
be sent to the office of the county prosecuting attorney. Responses by the
municipal research council to county requests for legal services shall be
provided to the requesting official and the county prosecuting attorney.))

The activities,
programs, and services of the municipal research council shall be carried on in
cooperation with the association of Washington cities and the Washington state
association of counties. Services to cities and towns shall be based upon the
moneys appropriated to the municipal research council from the city and town
research services account under RCW 43.110.060. Services to counties shall be
based upon the moneys appropriated to the municipal research council from the
county research services account under RCW 43.110.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2001.

---
END ---