BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of this
act to enhance public safety and the quality of law enforcement. The
legislature finds these goals may be achieved by establishing a minimum
standard of performance for working police service dog teams and a procedure
for certification of teams. The legislature further finds it necessary to
create an oversight mechanism to promote efficient and responsible
implementation of the certification process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Canine
training standards board" or "board" means the board established
by the commission under section 5 of this act.

(2)
"Certified" means a determination by the commission that a police
service dog team has met the minimum standard.

(3)
"Commission" means the Washington state criminal justice training
commission.

(4) "Handler"
means a person who is responsible for the routine care, control, and
utilization of a police service dog for law enforcement purposes and is:

(a) Any commissioned
law enforcement officer of an agency, including a state, county, city,
municipality, or a combination thereof or an employee of the Washington state
department of corrections;

(b) A person contracted
to provide law enforcement services;

(c) An employee of a
local correctional facility; or

(d) In the case of an
accelerant detection dog, the state fire marshal's designee or an employee of
the fire department, city, or county authorized by the fire chief to be the
dog's handler.

(5) "Law
enforcement purposes" means detection of contraband or evidence and
apprehension of criminal suspects.

(6) "Master
trainer" means a person who meets the criteria established in rule by the
commission following consultation with individuals and groups with experience
and expertise in training and handling police service dogs.

(7) "Police
service detection dog" means a dog assigned or used by a handler solely to
detect contraband or arson by-products for law enforcement purposes.

(8) "Police
service dog" means a dog assigned or used by a handler for law enforcement
purposes.

(9) "Police
service dog team" or "team" means a dog and handler that is
certified as a team.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A police service dog
handler may not use a police service dog for law enforcement purposes unless
the handler and dog are certified as a team, except as otherwise provided in
this section.

(2) Any dog team
provided to assist in law enforcement purposes is exempt from the certification
requirement of this act only if: (a) The dog is owned by, and acts under the
control of, an agency of the federal government which engages in law
enforcement purposes; (b) the team is provided on a temporary basis not
exceeding forty-eight hours; and (c) the dog and its handler meet the internal
minimum performance standards of the agency of the federal government which
owns or controls the dog.

(3) If any law
enforcement agency is, prior to August 1, 2002, utilizing a police service dog
and a handler for law enforcement purposes, the agency may continue the use
until March 1, 2003. After March 1, 2003, the dog and handler must be
certified as a team to be used for law enforcement purposes.

(4) Any law enforcement
agency that has not, prior to August 1, 2002, utilized a police service dog and
a handler for law enforcement purposes must obtain certification before
deploying a team.

(5) Upon determination
by the commission that a law enforcement agency or the department of
corrections has deployed a police service dog and handler not certified
pursuant to this chapter, the commission may issue an order directing the
agency or department to immediately cease the unauthorized deployment.

(6) If the agency or
department does not discontinue the unauthorized deployment, the commission may
seek appropriate injunctive relief in the superior court of the county in which
the agency or department is located.

(7) Police service
detection dogs are exempt from the certification requirement set forth in this
section unless the commission extends the certification requirement to these
dogs by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The commission is
directed to develop and adopt a minimum performance standard for each category
of police service dog and handler, with the categories being derived from the
law enforcement functions that the police service dogs and handlers perform.
Each police service dog and handler must meet the standard for its category in
order to become a team.

(2) The commission is
directed to implement a process through which police service dogs and their
handlers will be tested for certification. The commission is authorized to
charge a fee for the purpose of conducting certification tests.

(3) The commission
shall establish minimum training hours for police service dogs and handlers
that must be completed prior to testing for certification. Prior to testing a
police service dog and a handler for certification, the chief of police,
sheriff, secretary of corrections, or chief of the Washington state patrol must
submit an affidavit verifying that the required hours of training have been
successfully completed by the police service dog and handler.

(4) The initial
certification of police service dog teams is valid for one year.
Recertification shall be valid for a period of time as determined by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The commission is
directed to create the canine training standards board. The commission is
directed to endeavor to ensure the composition of the board will include
persons experienced with patrol, detector, and tracking police service dogs.
The board shall, in consultation with the board on law enforcement training
standards and education, recommend to the commission minimum performance
standards and develop model training and performance standards for police
service dogs and handlers. The model training and model performance standards
may be used by local jurisdictions in developing their own canine programs.

(2) The board shall
examine the option of requiring certification of police service detection dogs
and make recommendations to the commission.

(3) The board shall be
comprised of:

(a) A representative of
the Washington state patrol with police service dog experience;

(b) A representative of
the department of corrections with police service dog experience;

(c) A representative of
a nonprofit organization in Washington with expertise and experience in the
training and evaluating of patrol, detector, and tracking police service dogs
and handlers;

(d) A representative of
a nationwide nonprofit organization with experience and expertise in the humane
treatment of dogs;

(e) A master trainer
from a county with a population of two hundred fifty thousand or more appointed
by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in consultation
with the Washington council of police and sheriffs and the bargaining unit
representing commissioned officers in any county with a population of one
million or more;

(f) A representative of
the county legislative authority appointed by the presiding officer of the
Washington association of counties from a county with a population of two
hundred fifty thousand or more that deploys a police service dog and handler
for law enforcement purposes and, after March 1, 2003, is certified as a team;

(g) A master trainer
from a city with a population of one hundred thousand or more appointed by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in consultation with the
Washington council of police and sheriffs and the bargaining unit representing
commissioned officers in any city with a population of four hundred thousand or
more;

(h) A representative of
the association of Washington cities appointed by the presiding officer of the
association of Washington cities from a city with a population of one hundred
thousand or more that deploys a police service dog and handler for law
enforcement purposes and, after March 1, 2003, is certified as a team;

(i) Two persons, one
with police service dog experience, appointed by the association of Washington
cities from a city with a population of less than one hundred thousand;

(j) Two persons, one
with police service dog experience, appointed by the Washington association of
counties from a county with a population of less than two hundred fifty
thousand;

(k) One representative
to be appointed by the governor.

Prior to making the
appointments requiring police service dog experience in (i) and (j) of this
subsection, the Washington association of counties and the association of
Washington cities shall consult with the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs and the Washington council of police and sheriffs.

(4) The board is a
class 1 group under RCW 43.03.220 except that any member of the public
appointed to the board is eligible for compensation under RCW 43.03.240(2).

(5) The board shall
cease to exist after the minimum performance standards are developed and
adopted by the commission and the model training and model performance
standards are created.

(6) The board shall
hold its initial meeting not later than November 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Any person claiming
to be aggrieved by an act relating to the certification of a police service dog
team may, personally or by his or her attorney, make, sign, and file with the
commission a complaint in writing under oath or by declaration. The commission
does not have jurisdiction to hear a complaint alleging negligent conduct by a
certified team while engaged in law enforcement purposes.

(2) Any complaint filed
pursuant to this section must be filed within thirty days after the alleged act
giving rise to the complaint relating to certification of a police service dog
team.

(3) After the filing of
any complaint, the chairperson of the commission shall refer it to the
appropriate section of the commission's staff for prompt investigation and
ascertainment of the facts alleged in the complaint. The results of the
investigation shall be reduced to written findings of fact and a copy shall be
provided to the complainant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The entire file,
including the complaint and any and all findings made, shall be certified to
the chairperson of the commission. The chairperson of the commission may
thereupon request the appointment of an administrative law judge under Title 34
RCW to hear the complaint if the chairperson believes from the results of the
investigation that there are reasonable grounds to conclude that a violation of
this chapter may have occurred. If the chairperson requests the appointment of
an administrative law judge, he or she shall cause to be issued and served in
the name of the commission a written notice, together with a copy of the
complaint, as the same may have been amended, requiring the parties to appear
and on the complaint at a hearing before the administrative law judge, at a
time and place to be specified in such notice.

(2) The place of any
such hearing may be the office of the commission or another place designated by
it. The case in support of the complaint shall be presented at the hearing by
counsel for the commission: PROVIDED, That the complainant may retain
independent counsel and submit testimony and be fully heard. No member or
employee of the commission who previously participated in the denial of
certification shall participate in the hearing except as a witness, nor shall
the member or employee participate in the deliberations of the administrative
law judge in such case.

(3) The commission
shall file a written answer to the complaint and appear at the hearing in
person or otherwise, with or without counsel, and submit testimony and be fully
heard. The commission has the right to cross-examine the complainant.

(4) The administrative
law judge conducting any hearing may permit reasonable amendment to any
complaint or answer. Testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and
recorded.

(5) If, upon all the
evidence, the administrative law judge finds that the commission has wrongfully
denied certification, the administrative law judge shall state findings of fact
and shall issue and file with the commission and cause to be served on the
commission an order requiring the commission to certify the police service dog
team.

(6) The final order of
the administrative law judge shall include a notice to the parties of the right
to obtain judicial review of the order by appeal in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, and that such appeal must be
served and filed within thirty days after the service of the order on the
parties.

(7) If, upon all the
evidence, the administrative law judge finds that the commission correctly
denied certification, the administrative law judge shall state findings of fact
and shall similarly issue and file an order dismissing the complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Every police service
dog used by law enforcement or any other state or local governmental agency is
required to be identified by a microchip as defined in RCW 16.57.010(13) or
through the use of superior technology as designated by the commission.

(2) The microchip of
any police service dog used by a state or local governmental agency may not be
removed except for medical necessity. If it is necessary to remove the
microchip, the reason for the removal must be documented, entered into the data
base created by section 9 of this act, and a new microchip inserted unless the
dog is permanently retired from service.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The commission is
directed to develop and manage a centralized data base of information pertaining
to all police service dogs used by Washington state and local governmental
agencies. The data base shall be cumulative, updated, and contain the
following information for each police service dog:

(a) Identification as
required in section 8(1) of this act;

(b) Name;

(c) Breed;

(d) Type of training:

(i) G = Generalist;

(ii) N = Narcotic;

(iii) B = Bomb;

(iv) Xn = Cross-trained
narcotic;

(v) Xb = Cross-trained
bomb;

(vi) O = Other;

(e) Date acquired;

(f) Source of
acquisition:

(i) Vendor name,
address, and telephone number;

(ii) Donated by private
person, nonprofit entity, or other;

(g) Handler's name;

(h) Date of
certification and recertifications;

(i) Date and reason
released from service.

(2) Except as provided
in RCW 42.17.310, the commission shall make this data base available through a
web page and accessible by entering a dog's identification number as required
in section 8(1) of this act.

(3) All records
pertaining to training, utilization, and certification from acquisition to
first certification pertaining to police service dogs are required to be kept
by the agency with ownership of the police service dog and made available upon
request.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The commission shall adopt
rules to implement this chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 42.17.310 and 2000 c
134 s 3, 2000 c 56 s 1, and 2000 c 6 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) The following are
exempt from public inspection and copying:

(a) Personal
information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or
clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare
recipients.

(b) Personal
information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials
of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to
privacy.

(c) Information
required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any
tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons would (i) be
prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340
or (ii) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.

(d) Specific
intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled by
investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, and state agencies
vested with the responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the
nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the
protection of any person's right to privacy.

(e) Information
revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims of crime or
who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, or penology agencies,
other than the public disclosure commission, if disclosure would endanger any
person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is
filed the complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with
the public disclosure commission about any elected official or candidate for
public office must be made in writing and signed by the complainant under oath.

(f) Test questions,
scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a license,
employment, or academic examination.

(g) Except as provided
by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real estate appraisals, made for or by any
agency relative to the acquisition or sale of property, until the project or
prospective sale is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has
been acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold, but
in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years after the appraisal.

(h) Valuable formulae,
designs, drawings, computer source code or object code, and research data
obtained by any agency within five years of the request for disclosure when
disclosure would produce private gain and public loss.

(i) Preliminary drafts,
notes, recommendations, and intra-agency memorandums in which opinions are
expressed or policies formulated or recommended except that a specific record
shall not be exempt when publicly cited by an agency in connection with any
agency action.

(j) Records which are
relevant to a controversy to which an agency is a party but which records would
not be available to another party under the rules of pretrial discovery for
causes pending in the superior courts.

(k) Records, maps, or
other information identifying the location of archaeological sites in order to
avoid the looting or depredation of such sites.

(l) Any library record,
the primary purpose of which is to maintain control of library materials, or to
gain access to information, which discloses or could be used to disclose the
identity of a library user.

(m) Financial
information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, or corporation for the
purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or proposal for (i) a ferry system
construction or repair contract as required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750
or (ii) highway construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.

(n) Railroad company
contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with the utilities and transportation
commission under RCW 81.34.070, except that the summaries of the contracts are
open to public inspection and copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.

(o) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by private persons pertaining to
export services provided pursuant to chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW,
and by persons pertaining to export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.

(p) Financial
disclosures filed by private vocational schools under chapters 28B.85 and
28C.10 RCW.

(q) Records filed with
the utilities and transportation commission or attorney general under RCW
80.04.095 that a court has determined are confidential under RCW 80.04.095.

(r) Financial and
commercial information and records supplied by businesses or individuals during
application for loans or program services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160,
43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency.

(s) Membership lists or
lists of members or owners of interests of units in timeshare projects,
subdivisions, camping resorts, condominiums, land developments, or
common-interest communities affiliated with such projects, regulated by the
department of licensing, in the files or possession of the department.

(t) All applications
for public employment, including the names of applicants, resumes, and other
related materials submitted with respect to an applicant.

(u) The residential
addresses and residential telephone numbers of employees or volunteers of a
public agency which are held by the agency in personnel records, employment or
volunteer rosters, or mailing lists of employees or volunteers.

(v) The residential
addresses and residential telephone numbers of the customers of a public
utility contained in the records or lists held by the public utility of which
they are customers, except that this information may be released to the
division of child support or the agency or firm providing child support
enforcement for another state under Title IV-D of the federal social security
act, for the establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.

(w)(i) The federal
social security number of individuals governed under chapter 18.130 RCW
maintained in the files of the department of health, except this exemption does
not apply to requests made directly to the department from federal, state, and
local agencies of government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the current
residential address and current residential telephone number of a health care
provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the
department, if the provider requests that this information be withheld from
public inspection and copying, and provides to the department an accurate
alternate or business address and business telephone number. On or after
January 1, 1995, the current residential address and residential telephone
number of a health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the
files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public inspection
and copying unless the provider specifically requests the information be
released, and except as provided for under RCW 42.17.260(9).

(x) Information
obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in RCW 69.45.090.

(y) Information
obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department of health and its
representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044, 69.41.280, and 18.64.420.

(z) Financial
information, business plans, examination reports, and any information produced
or obtained in evaluating or examining a business and industrial development
corporation organized or seeking certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.

(aa) Financial and
commercial information supplied to the state investment board by any person
when the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement
funds and when disclosure would result in loss to such funds or in private loss
to the providers of this information.

(bb) Financial and
valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.

(cc) Client records
maintained by an agency that is a domestic violence program as defined in RCW
70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.

(dd) Information that
identifies a person who, while an agency employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an
informal process established by the employing agency, in order to ascertain his
or her rights in connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60
RCW against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.

(ee) Investigative
records compiled by an employing agency conducting a current investigation of a
possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of
other federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.

(ff) Business related
information protected from public inspection and copying under RCW 15.86.110.

(gg) Financial,
commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data
submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington center in applications for, or
delivery of, program services under chapter 70.95H RCW.

(hh) Information and
documents created specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality
improvement committee pursuant to RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer
review committee under RCW 4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in
possession of the information and documents.

(ii) Personal
information in files maintained in a data base created under RCW 43.07.360.

(jj) Financial and
commercial information requested by the public stadium authority from any
person or organization that leases or uses the stadium and exhibition center as
defined in RCW 36.102.010.

(kk) Names of
individuals residing in emergency or transitional housing that are furnished to
the department of revenue or a county assessor in order to substantiate a claim
for property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.043.

(ll) The names,
residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, and other individually
identifiable records held by an agency in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or
other ride-sharing program or service. However, these records may be disclosed
to other persons who apply for ride-matching services and who need that
information in order to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share
rides.

(mm) The personally
identifying information of current or former participants or applicants in a
paratransit or other transit service operated for the benefit of persons with
disabilities or elderly persons.

(nn) The personally
identifying information of persons who acquire and use transit passes and other
fare payment media including, but not limited to, stored value smart cards and
magnetic strip cards, except that an agency may disclose this information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is responsible,
in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety. This information may also be disclosed at the
agency's discretion to governmental agencies or groups concerned with public
transportation or public safety.

(oo) Proprietary
financial and commercial information that the submitting entity, with review by
the department of health, specifically identifies at the time it is submitted
and that is provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection
with an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption sought
by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for such
information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of the
request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the submitting
entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing need for
confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester. Upon receipt of
such notice, the department of health shall continue to treat information
designated under this section as exempt from disclosure. If the requester
initiates an action to compel disclosure under this chapter, the submitting
entity must be joined as a party to demonstrate the continuing need for
confidentiality.

(pp) Records maintained
by the board of industrial insurance appeals that are related to appeals of
crime victims' compensation claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.

(qq) Financial and
commercial information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation,
or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW relating to the purchase or sale of tuition
units and contracts for the purchase of multiple tuition units.

(rr) Any records of
investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or other law
enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or
sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been
transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for
permanent electronic retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).

(ss) Credit card
numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates,
or bank or other financial account numbers supplied to an agency for the
purpose of electronic transfer of funds, except when disclosure is expressly
required by law.

(tt) Financial
information, including but not limited to account numbers and values, and other
identification numbers supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation,
limited liability company, partnership, or other entity related to an
application for a liquor license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.

(uu) Records maintained
by the employment security department and subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if
provided to another individual or organization for operational, research, or
evaluation purposes.

(vv) Individually
identifiable information received by the work force training and education
coordinating board for research or evaluation purposes.

(ww) Information
collected pursuant to section 9(1)(d) (iii) and (v) of this act.

(2) Except for
information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of this section and confidential
income data exempted from public inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the
exemptions of this section are inapplicable to the extent that information, the
disclosure of which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental
interests, can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may
be construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.

(3) Inspection or
copying of any specific records exempt under the provisions of this section may
be permitted if the superior court in the county in which the record is
maintained finds, after a hearing with notice thereof to every person in
interest and the agency, that the exemption of such records is clearly
unnecessary to protect any individual's right of privacy or any vital
governmental function.

(4) Agency responses
refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of any public record shall include a
statement of the specific exemption authorizing the withholding of the record
(or part) and a brief explanation of how the exemption applies to the record
withheld.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The sum of
. . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the
general fund to the criminal justice training commission for the purposes of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

---
END ---