BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that consumers of child day-care centers and family day-care providers have a
legitimate interest in receiving timely information about the providers of
day-care services to enable them to make meaningful choices regarding
facilities and the people who provide care for their children.

The legislature further
finds that parents whose children are consumers of day-care services are often
unaware of the quality of the facility or home they have chosen. This lack of
knowledge is due, in part, to the inability of parents to obtain such
information. The legislature intends to use the state's improved ability to
collect and manage information about day-care service providers by requiring
that all relevant licensing and enforcement action information be available to
parents and other appropriate persons as provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number, and an electronic
on-line system for communication of information regarding child day-care
centers and family day-care providers. This number shall be available during
standard business hours and during nonbusiness hours callers shall be able to
leave messages. The number shall be published in reasonably available printed
and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a number for
communication of information as set forth in this section.

(2) All licensed child
day-care centers and family day-care providers shall post in a place and manner
clearly visible to patrons and visitors the department's toll-free telephone
number. Parents or guardians must be given the department's toll-free
telephone number by employees or operators of the child day-care centers and
family day-care providers.

(3) For
the purposes of this section, "communication of information" means
callers may: (a) Determine whether a day care is licensed; (b) determine
whether a day care is in good standing regarding licensing requirements; (c)
determine the general nature of enforcement against the providers; (d) obtain
information on how to report suspected or observed noncompliance with licensing
requirements; (e) obtain information on how to report alleged abuse or neglect
in a day care; (f) obtain information on how to report health, safety, and
welfare concerns in a day care; (g) receive follow-up assistance, including
information on the office of the family and children's ombudsman; and (h)
receive referral information on other agencies or entities that may be of
further assistance to the caller.

---
END ---