BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

2001-03 BIENNIUM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The transportation
budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth,
the several amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to
accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices for
employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and for other
specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments arising out of
such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2003.

(2) Legislation with
fiscal impacts enacted in the 2001 legislative session not assumed in this act
are not funded in the 2001-03 transportation budget.

(3) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this act.

(a) "Fiscal year
2002" or "FY 2002" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002.

(b) "Fiscal year
2003" or "FY 2003" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003.

(c) "FTE"
means full-time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse"
or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated
status.

(e) "Provided
solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified
purpose.

(f)
"Performance-based budgeting" means a budget that bases resource
needs on quantified outcomes and results expected from use of the total
appropriation. "Performance-based budgeting" does not mean
incremental budgeting that focuses on justifying changes from the historic
budget or to line-item input-driven budgets.

(g) "Goals"
means the statements of purpose that identify a desired result or outcome. The
statements shall be realistic, achievable, directive, assignable, evaluative,
and logically linked to the agency's mission and statutory mandate.

(h) "Strategic
plan" means the strategies agencies create for investment choices in the
future. All agency strategic plans shall present alternative investment
strategies for providing services.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-‑OPERATING

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 305,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The entire
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel
quality program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION
AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 488,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. FOR THE UTILITIES AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade Crossing Protective
Account‑-

State Appropriation............................. $ 126,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The utilities and
transportation commission shall develop a rail grade crossing safety grant
program which will fully fund selected safety projects to the extent allowable under
chapter 81.53 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. FOR THE OFFICE OF STATE AUDITOR

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 126,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The appropriation is
a one-time appropriation for the development of the local government finance
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT
AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 50,000

The appropriations in this
section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and specified
amounts are provided solely for that activity:

The entire
appropriation is provided to the joint legislative audit and review committee
for fiscal year 2002 solely for a study of the state patrol's communications
systems planning process. The focus of the study is: A review of the planning
process and analyses employed by the Washington state patrol in developing
budget requests for its communications systems including the Meng Value
Analysis as reported on March 22, 1999; an assessment of the adequacy of the
information supporting the budget requests; and recommendations for any
improvements to such information for present and future budget requests. The
committee may contract for consulting services in conducting the study. The
study final report shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2001.

A joint workgroup of
representatives from the state patrol, office of financial management, and
department of information systems shall review future state patrol technology
plans or budget reports for consistency with the recommendations identified by
this study.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES‑-CAPITAL

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION‑-CAPITAL PROJECTS

Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 763,000

(End
of part)

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC
SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 1,638,000

Highway Safety Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $........................................... 5,671,000

School Zone Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation $ 1,504,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,813,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The Washington
traffic safety commission may oversee no more than four pilot projects
implementing the use of traffic safety cameras at school zones, railroad
crossings, construction zones or stoplights, and no more than one pilot project
regarding the use of traffic safety cameras in residential neighborhoods, at
school zones, railroad crossings, construction zones, or stoplights.

(1) In order to ensure
adequate time in the 2001-03 biennium to evaluate the effectiveness of the
pilot program, any programs authorized by the commission must be authorized by
December 31, 2001.

(2) If the state, a
county, or a city has established an authorized traffic safety camera pilot
program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor
of the equipment used: Must be based upon the value of the equipment and
services provided or rendered in support of the system; and may not be based
upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by
the equipment.

(3) The traffic safety
commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:

(a) Traffic safety
cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only;

(b) The law enforcement
agency of the city or county government shall plainly mark the locations where
the automated traffic enforcement system is used by placing signs on street
locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone
where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic enforcement system;

(c) Cities and counties
using traffic safety cameras must provide periodic notice by mail to its
citizens indicating the zones in which the traffic safety cameras will be used;

(d) Notices of
infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within fourteen
days of the infraction occurring;

(e) The owner of the
vehicle is not responsible for the violation if the owner of the vehicle,
within fifteen days after notification of the violation, furnishes the
officials or agents of the municipality that issued the citation with:

(i) An affidavit made
under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in
the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered owner;
or

(ii) Testimony in open
court under oath that the person was not the operator of the vehicle at the
time of the alleged violation;

(f) Infractions
detected through the use of traffic safety cameras are not part of the
registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120; and

(g) By January 1, 2003,
the traffic safety commission shall provide a report to the legislature
regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, and other relevant issues
regarding traffic safety cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 305,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD
ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 50,182,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,887,000

County Arterial
Preservation Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 28,551,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 80,620,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

It is the intent of the
legislature that the county road administration board receive separate
programmatic appropriations for the operating program and the capital program
for the 2001-03 biennium, and thereafter. Agency administrative costs may not
be charged against projects or funded from the capital program appropriations.

(1) $1,540,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation, $870,000 of the county
arterial preservation account‑‑state appropriation, and $917,000 of
the rural arterial trust account‑‑state appropriation are provided
for the operations program. Of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation, $368,000 is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.724(4).

(2) $347,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation, $27,681,000 of the
county arterial preservation account‑‑state appropriation, and
$49,265,000 of the rural arterial trust account‑‑state
appropriation are provided for the capital program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Urban Arterial Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 94,690,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 118,605,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 213,295,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

It is the intent of the
legislature that the transportation improvement board receive separate
programmatic appropriations for the operating program and the capital program
for the 2001-03 biennium, and thereafter. Agency administrative costs may not
be charged against projects or funded from the capital program appropriations.

(1) $1,551,000 of the
transportation improvement account‑‑state appropriation and
$1,552,000 of the urban arterial trust account‑‑state appropriation
are provided for the operations program.

(2) $117,054,000 of the
transportation improvement account‑‑state appropriation and
$93,138,000 of the urban arterial trust account‑‑state
appropriation are provided for the capital program.

(3) The transportation
improvement account‑-state appropriation includes $47,325,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500. The transportation
improvement board may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
agency in-lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor Vehicle
Account--State Appropriation..... $ 3,746,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $2,467,000 of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for the operation of the
house of representatives transportation committee.

(2) To the extent
possible, this appropriation shall utilize funds allocated under RCW
46.68.110(2).

(3) The house of
representatives transportation committee shall conduct a study of the use of
motorized scooters. The study shall, at a minimum, identify and analyze the
safety issues associated with use of motorized scooters, including use by
children, commuters, and the disabled. House of representatives
transportation committee cochairs shall each appoint one member from their
respective caucus to serve as cochair of the study group. The chair of the
senate transportation committee may also appoint two members from the senate
transportation committee, one from each caucus, to participate in the study.
The study shall be staffed by house of representatives transportation committee
staff. The study group shall report back to the house of representatives
transportation committee by January 1, 2002.

(4) The house of
representatives transportation committee shall conduct a study of the effect of
the weight of fire-fighting apparatus on state roadways. The study shall
determine, at a minimum, the various types of fire-fighting apparatus currently
in use on state roadways; the size, weight and load effect of fire-fighting
apparatus that are currently in use or that potentially could be in use on the
state roadways, as well as on state bridges; and the effect on public safety.
The study may examine state and federal laws that affect fire-fighting
apparatuses. House of representatives transportation committee cochairs shall
each appoint one member from their respective caucus to serve as cochair of the
study group. The study shall be staffed by house of representatives
transportation committee staff. The study group will report back to the house
of representatives transportation committee by January 1, 2002.

(5) The legislative
transportation committee shall conduct a feasibility study of potential for
economic partnerships between the Washington state ferries and local government
entities, including but not limited to port districts. The study is intended
to improve ferry terminals. The study shall, at a minimum, identify the
market, physical, and economic factors that should be examined in determining
whether an economic or commercial development partnership project on or around
Washington state ferry terminals is likely to produce revenue for the
partners. The study shall apply those factors to an analysis of each terminal
used by Washington state ferries and recommend whether further exploration of
state and local partnerships would be of potential economic benefit to the
partners. The entity selected to perform the study through the request for
proposals process will report back to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES
COMMISSION

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 332,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 773,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY
STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 697,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $100,000 of the motor
vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a
comprehensive, long-term, statewide freight needs analysis. These funds
represent 20 percent of the biennial cost and shall lapse if the additional 80
percent funding is not secured from partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 162,081,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 7,084,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 169,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 169,334,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for the activities of the field
operations bureau:

(1) As a result of the
elimination of the vehicle inspection number (VIN) program, no permanent
Washington state patrol employee shall be displaced from employment without the
opportunity to fill a vacant patrol position for which he or she has a
preference and meets the minimum qualifications. For the purpose of the VIN program
elimination, the guidelines under chapter 356-26 WAC (Registers-Certifications)
shall be suspended for those employees holding the classification of VIN 1 or
2.

(2) To the extent
possible, the agency shall transfer displaced VIN personnel into the 20 newly
created school bus inspection and motor carrier safety assistance program
positions. The agency shall emphasize filling existing vacant positions within
the commercial vehicle division with displaced VIN personnel. The agency shall
report by December 31, 2001, to the senate and house of representatives
transportation committees on efforts to relocate displaced VIN personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL‑-SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 69,960,000

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 735,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 70,695,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for the activities of the support
services bureau. The Washington state patrol shall improve response times
during emergency radio outages by allowing electronic services field
technicians to take home their assigned vehicle and equipment even though they
may be off duty.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
LICENSING‑-MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
SERVICES

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,000

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 114,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 89,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 7,740,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 4,230,000

Licensing Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 123,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 12,303,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
LICENSING‑-INFORMATION SYSTEMS

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 50,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 34,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 5,655,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 3,304,000

Licensing Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 292,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 9,337,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of licensing shall report to the legislative transportation
committees on the progress of the expanded internet service no later than
December 15, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE
SERVICES

Marine Fuel Tax Refund
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 26,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 578,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 57,043,000

Licensing Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,123,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 60,770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER
SERVICES

Motorcycle Safety Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 2,223,000

Highway Safety Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 81,366,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 83,589,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of licensing shall prepare a capital project plan adopting a process
for using certificates of participation to purchase licensing services offices
if the combined principle and interest payments are the same or less than
existing or future leases on comparable facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 47,353,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 47,753,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-AVIATION‑-PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 4,852,000

Aircraft Search and Rescue
Safety and

Education Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 160,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 5,012,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 577,085,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 230,232,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 43,504,000

Special Category C Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 65,813,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,880,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 921,514,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for the location, design, right of way acquisition,
or construction of state highway projects designated as improvements under RCW
47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that
activity:

(1) The special
category C account‑-state appropriation of $65,813,000 includes
$56,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.
The transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any
part of the state appropriation.

(2) The department
shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the senate and the house
of representatives transportation committees and the office of financial
management on the timing and the scope of work being performed for the regional
transit authority known as sound transit. This report shall provide a
description of all department activities related to the regional transit
authority including investments in state‑owned infrastructure.

(3) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $378,952,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(4) $305,448,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation, $192,141,000 of the motor
vehicle account‑-federal appropriation, $41,173,000 of the motor vehicle
account‑-private/local appropriation, and $65,813,000 of the special
category C‑-state appropriation, and $4,880,000 of the multimodal
transportation account‑-state appropriation are provided for the
construction phase of the improvement program.

(5) $4,880,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for
the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified by the
freight mobility strategic investment board.

(6) The motor vehicle
account--state appropriation includes $3,898,000 in unexpended proceeds from
the January 2001 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for the Tacoma Narrows
bridge project. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in-lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 2,553,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $1,400,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for all forms of cash contributions,
or the payment of other costs incident to the location, development, design,
right of way, and construction of the Tacoma narrows bridge improvements under
the public-private transportation initiative program authorized under chapter
47.46 RCW; and for support costs of the public-private transportation
initiatives program.

(2) The transportation
commission may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
department of transportation in-lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 273,594,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 512,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,067,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 278,173,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) If portions of the
appropriations in this section are required to fund maintenance work resulting
from major disasters not covered by federal emergency funds such as fire,
flooding, and major slides, supplemental appropriations will be requested to
restore state funding for ongoing maintenance activities.

(2) The department
shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys received for
emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of the motor
vehicle account‑-state into unallotted status. This exchange shall not
affect the amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 155,015,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 414,477,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 8,718,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 578,210,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) If portions of the
appropriations in this section are required to fund preservation work resulting
from major disasters not covered by federal emergency funds such as fire,
flooding, and major slides, supplemental appropriations will be requested to
restore state funding for ongoing maintenance activities.

(2) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $6,524,000 for earthquake repairs
and to match federal emergency relief funds and $3,750,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.

(3) The department of
transportation is authorized to maximize the use of federal and state funds to
implement the provisions of this section.

(4) $85,471,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation, $378,225,000 of the motor
vehicle account‑-federal appropriation, and $8,107,000 of the motor
vehicle account‑-private/local appropriation are provided for the
construction phase of the preservation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM
Q

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 39,569,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 16,678,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 56,747,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and the
specified amount is provided solely for that activity: The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $2,986,000 for state matching funds
for federally selected competitive grant or congressional earmark projects
other than commercial vehicle information system and network (CVISN). These
moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as federal funds are
secured and a state match is required.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 95,350,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 2,654,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 6,774,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,082,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 106,860,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM
T

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 11,496,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 18,800,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 987,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 33,283,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES
FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

Payments in this
section represent charges from other state agencies to the department of
transportation.

(1) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

Motor Vehicle Account‑‑State
Appropriation..... $ 464,000

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 154,000

(2) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 731,000

(3) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND
CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 4,128,000

(4) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 2,240,000

(5) FOR PAYMENT OF
SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 13,892,000

Motor Vehicle Fund‑-Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,204,000

(6) FOR PAYMENT OF
COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 278,000

(7) FOR PAYMENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 1,547,000

(8) FOR ARCHIVES AND
RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 469,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 28,107,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM
V

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 11,160,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,074,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑‑

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 205,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 14,439,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM W

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 144,404,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 37,472,000

Passenger Ferry Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 1,500,000

Passenger Ferry Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 187,376,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided for improving the Washington state ferry system,
including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel construction, major
and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction and improvements. The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The appropriations
in this section, unless otherwise specified, are provided to carry out only the
projects in the Washington state ferries capital program plan - version 4. The
department shall reconcile the 1999-2001 capital expenditures within ninety
days of the end of the biennium and submit a final report to the senate
transportation committee, the house of representatives transportation
committee, and the office of financial management.

(2) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $81,648,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal acquisition,
major and minor improvements, and long lead time materials acquisition for the
Washington state ferries. The transportation commission may authorize the use
of current revenues available to the motor vehicle account in lieu of bond
proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(3) Appropriations in
this section include funding for the purchase or lease-purchase of one
passenger ferry and assume the proceeds of the sale of the MV Kalama and MV
Skagit passenger ferries shall be deposited in the passenger ferry account.

(4) The ferry system
shall contract with an outside consulting firm to conduct a study on the
preservation, replacement, or supplementation of the Eagle Harbor maintenance
facility. The study must analyze: (a) The costs and benefits to preserve and
maintain or relocate the facility; (b) the impact of Eagle Harbor employment on
the local community and Kitsap county; and (c) a recommendation on future
investment in the Eagle Harbor maintenance facility or possible alternatives.
The contractor must report back to the legislature's transportation committees
no later than December 10, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry
Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 321,673,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The appropriation
is based on the budgeted expenditure of $46,440,000 for vessel operating fuel
in the 2001-2003 biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this
budgeted amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental appropriation.

(2) The appropriation
provides for the compensation of ferry employees. The expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees during the 2001-2003 biennium may not
exceed $206,696,000 plus a dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of
financial management, that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted
general government employees in excess of $432.82 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees
for the respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization charges,
and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial management for salary
increases during the 2001-2003 biennium. For the purposes of this section, the
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to
salaries and wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects of
expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The prescribed salary
and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that shall be
allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in addition to the
appropriation contained in this section and may be used to increase or decrease
compensation costs, effective July 1, 2001, and thereafter, as established in
the 2001-2003 general fund operating budget.

(3) The department
shall issue a request for information from entities interested in purchasing
advertising on board Washington state ferry vessels. The department shall
evaluate the proposals and report back to the legislature's transportation
committees in January 2002 regarding the potential for revenue from different
types of advertising.

(4) The department may
enter into contracts with private vendors to sell ferry tickets and medium at
locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or facilities.

(a) The department may
enter into the contracts only (i) with private vendors that are already
established businesses offering goods for sale to the general public; and (ii)
if it determines that the vendor's established location has the potential to
serve a significant percentage of the customers using a particular ferry route.

(b) The department may
adopt necessary rules and procedures to allow the use of credit and debit cards
to purchase ferry tickets or medium from a private vendor who has contracted
with the department to sell ferry tickets or medium. The department may
establish a convenience fee to be paid by all persons purchasing ferry tickets
and medium at locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or
facilities. The convenience fee must be sufficient to offset the charges
imposed on the department by the credit and debit card companies. In no event
may the use of credit or debit cards authorized by this section create a loss
of revenue to the state. The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon
the credit of the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state
Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y

Essential Rail Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 200,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 43,814,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,630,000

Washington Fruit Express
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 54,144,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) $32,704,000 of the
multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided for
the rail operating program.

(2) $3,965,000 of the
multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation and $9,630,000 of
the multimodal transportation account‑-federal appropriation are provided
for the rail capital program.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for the Grays Harbor loop project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 76,943,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-Federal
Appropriation... $ 2,569,000

Highway Infrastructure
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

Highway Infrastructure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 234,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,300,000

Urban Arterial Trust
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,674,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 96,220,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and
specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1) The highways and
local programs division shall not administer or distribute federal
transportation enhancement funds for the project known as East Lake Sammamish
trail interim improvement - Issaquah to Redmond - until interlocal agreements
between King county and the cities of Sammamish, Redmond, and Issaquah have
been finalized for the portions of the trail within each of these affected
jurisdictions. These agreements shall address safety, security, public
parking, design, public facilities, and public access to the trail, maintain
King county as the lead agency on the development of the trail, and preserve
the railbanking status of the railroad right-of-way according to federal law.

(2) $10,000,000 of the
multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
to fund the first phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of
Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The department shall not expend the
appropriation in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal sites has been
reached which protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon appropriates
a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.

(3) The motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation includes $28,420,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843, including $16,420,000 in unexpended
proceeds from the January 2001 sale. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(4) Pursuant to RCW
46.68.110(2), $150,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation
is provided to the Whatcom county council of governments for the sole purpose
of developing and implementing a model of regional transportation governance.
This model shall be developed in accordance with Recommendation 6 of the Blue
Ribbon Commission on Transportation's final report.

The council shall
develop a model that can be used in other parts of the state and shall report
to the transportation committees in the senate and house of representatives on
the positive and negative aspects of the model as well as costs associated with
it no later than June 30, 2002.

(5) $250,000 of the
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a study
of concurrency issues in urban areas marked by multiple contiguous
jurisdictions. The study, lead by the city of Bellevue, will focus on the
jurisdictions of Bellevue, Kirkland, Issaquah, and Redmond and will look at
existing and unused methodologies for including development in neighboring
jurisdictions in concurrency calculations. The study will also investigate
what changes in state and local laws are needed in order to provide a more
effective way of dealing with concurrency issues. By November 1, 2003, a
report of the findings will be made to the transportation committees of the
legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 230. Notwithstanding the
limitations of RCW 36.82.070 and 2001 c 221 s 3, county road funds may be used
during this biennium beyond the county right-of-way for activities clearly
associated with removal of fish passage barriers that are the responsibility of
the county in the amount deemed appropriate by the county.

(End
of part)

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES CAPITAL
FACILITIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway
Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 780,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 2,705,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 3,485,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. The Washington state
patrol is authorized to continue with the exchange of the Olympia, Washington
Martin Way property for a light industrial land complex to be used to
consolidate existing separately located state activities and functions. The
agency will work with the office of financial management, department of general
administration, the senate transportation committee, and the house of
representatives transportation committee in the exchange and approval
processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State Appropriation. ........ $ 13,046,000

(End
of part)

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES
DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE

Highway Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation... $........................................... 222,596,000

Ferry Bond Retirement
Account Appropriation.... $ 48,675,000

Transportation Improvement
Board Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 39,526,000

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 5,261,000

Special Category C Account‑-State
Appropriation $ 595,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 473,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 317,126,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 505,000

Special Category C Account
Appropriation........ $ 57,000

Transportation Improvement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 46,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 608,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Fund
Appropriation for

motor vehicle fuel tax and
overload penalties

distribution................................... $ 458,895,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTIONS TO CITIES AND COUNTIES

Motor Vehicle Fund
Appropriation for

motor vehicle fuel tax and
overload penalties

distribution................................... $ 428,546,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for distribution, state
contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing bond registration
and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants, and
certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts
as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula
or under any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. The department of
transportation is authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects
under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the highway construction
and preservation programs for federal advance construction projects prior to
conversion to federal funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1) RV Account‑-State
Appropriation:

For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State... $........................................... 1,185,000

(2) Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State Appropriation: For
transfer to the

Multimodal Transportation
Account--State........ $...................................... 1,911,000

The department of
transportation shall only transfer funds provided under subsection (1) of this
section on an as‑needed basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
408. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS

(1) Motor Vehicle
Fund--State Appropriation:

For transfer to Puget Sound
Ferry Operations

Account............................................. $ 27,000,000

(2) Advanced Right of
Way Revolving Account

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Motor

Vehicle Fund........................................ $ 15,000,000

(3) Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation: For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account‑-State
Appropriation........................ $ 59,000,000

$350,000
of the multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation is
transferred to the motor vehicle account solely to reimburse the motor vehicle
account for T2 research, complying with state audit findings.

(End
of part)

PERFORMANCE BASED BUDGETING
PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. Transportation agencies
shall continue to refine the following activities in order to establish a
performance-based budgeting process for the 2003-05 biennial budget:

(1) The department of
licensing, the department of transportation, and the Washington state patrol,
in cooperation with the office of financial management and the senate and house
of representatives transportation committees, shall implement a performance
budgeting process that provides a measurable link between agency objectives,
service levels, and budget proposals. The agencies shall also develop
indicators of performance, stated in terms of expected results, to measure the
agencies' progress in achieving the agencies' goals.

(2) The transportation
agencies shall submit a strategic plan with their agency request budgets. The
strategic plan must include a six‑ year outlook and define and clarify
the agency mission and vision, provide the basis for budget development, and
outline the agency's goals and strategies. Furthermore, the strategic plan
shall reflect agency priorities which formed the basis of the agencies' budget
development.

(3) The transportation
agencies shall establish performance indicators that measure activities and
associated goals and strategies in the strategic plan. The agencies shall also
provide a preferred level of performance over the next six years.

(4) The senate and
house of representatives transportation committees, the office of financial
management, and the transportation agencies shall establish the means of
conducting program authorization reviews of all transportation programs. The
reviews shall include:

(a) An agency self‑assessment
to judge the quality and usefulness of: (i) The agency's long‑term
strategic program goals; (ii) current organizational structure; (iii) program
priorities and objectives; (iv) activities necessary to achieve program
priorities and objectives; (v) service level criteria and performance targets
of existing programs and activities; (vi) best practices by other states as a
possible benchmark of the performance of their programs; and (vii) results or
outcome measures as they relate to achievement of benchmarks given different
funding levels;

(b) A review of the
agency self‑assessment and a report to the legislature; and

(c) A report which
recommends whether to retain, eliminate, or modify funding and related
statutory references for the agency. The parties conducting the review shall
consider: (i) Whether the agency performance measures adequately measure the
agency goals; (ii) whether the program performs efficiently and effectively,
including comparisons with other jurisdictions, if applicable; (iii) whether
there are other cost‑effective alternative methods of accomplishing the
program's mission; and (iv) whether there are any funds saved by the agency's
performance.

(5) The transportation
agencies shall each designate a program or programs to test the effectiveness
of performance‑based budgeting for the 2003-05 budget submittal period.

(6) Each agency shall
submit a program list to the transportation committees of the house of
representatives and senate and the office of financial management at the end of
each fiscal year, which describes the functions of the program, the fund
sources for the program, and the number of full‑time equivalents, in
addition to other performance targets of the program and their relationship to
the agency strategic plan.

(7) The transportation
agencies shall develop agency biennial budget requests at the agency budget
program level, rather than the object level, and submit their biennial and
supplemental budget requests to the office of financial management via a common
budget system beginning July 1, 2003.

(8) The agencies shall
input monthly their financial information and quarterly program performance
measurements into the transportation executive information system and other
systems as required by the office of financial management. The agencies shall
report actuals to date against original allotments, in addition to plan to
date. Original allotments may reflect supplemental budget changes as changed
by the legislature and the governor.

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. The highways and local
programs division of the Washington state department of transportation, the
transportation improvement board, the county road administration board, the
freight mobility strategic investment board, the association of Washington
cities, and the Washington state association of counties shall establish and
staff a joint task force that will develop recommendations to establish a
one-stop funding center for state funded local grant programs. The task force
shall report its recommendations to the legislature no later than December 1,
2001. The recommendations of the task force shall address the following:

(1) Develop a
memorandum of understanding that governs a multiagency grant council to
coordinate state and federal grant efforts;

(2) Develop a simplified
grant application form that can be used by all local grant-seeking agencies;

(3) Coordinate calls
for local grant applications;

(4) Increase awareness
of state-funded local grant programs; and

(5) Develop a process
to forward applications to other appropriate state and federal funding
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. The senate
transportation committee shall convene a task force to study the issues
regarding abandoned vehicles, title transfers, license plate transfers, buyer
and seller reports, and electronic availability of current vehicle owner
information. The task force shall include the following members in addition to
the department of licensing: The Washington state tow truck association; the
Washington state auto dealers; the independent towers of Washington; the
Washington state patrol; and representatives of two local law enforcement
agencies.

The task force shall
consider methods by which vehicle ownership changes can occur more
expeditiously, including but not limited to the timing and completeness of the
seller reporting the sale of a vehicle, methods to encourage buyers to retitle
vehicles in a timely manner, and changes in the processing of abandoned vehicle
reports to provide more timely access to registered owner information. The
task force shall also consider who bears liability for abandoned vehicles as
well as the issue of impounding a registered owner's car when someone other
than the owner is driving.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct a performance audit to evaluate the
advantages and disadvantages of removing the aviation division from the department
of transportation and creating a Washington state department of aviation. At a
minimum the evaluation must include: (1) A survey of aviation division
customers to determine whether the current aviation division meets the needs of
those customers; (2) a comparison of procedures, regulations, and requirements
of the Federal Aviation Administration and the Federal Highway Administration
to determine if the federal laws governing the aviation division conflict with
those governing the department of transportation; (3) an analysis of the
department of transportation's processes to determine whether the creation of a
separate aviation department would result in a cost savings to the state; and
(4) a financial analysis to determine if the aviation fuel tax, aircraft
registration fees, and other revenue from aviation services would enable a
separate aviation division to operate without additional state resources. The
joint legislative audit and review committee must report its findings to the
legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. The appropriations
assumed in sections 217 and 220 of this act are based upon the project list
within the transportation executive information system, capital projects and
facilities reporting system known as 2001-03 Senate Highway Construction
Program Current Law Budget - Second Special Session - June 7, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. A new section is added
to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section only, "assault" means an act by a motorist that results
in physical injury to an employee of the department while engaged in highway
construction or maintenance activities along a roadway right-of-way (fence line
to fence line, landscaped areas) or in the loading and unloading of passenger
vehicles in service of the vessel as a maritime employee not covered under
chapter 51.32 RCW or engaged in those work activities as a Washington State
Ferries terminal employee covered under chapter 51.32 RCW.

(2) In recognition of
the nature of employment in departmental highway construction or maintenance
activities and by the Washington State Ferries, this section provides a
supplementary program to reimburse employees of the department for some of
their costs attributable to their being the victims of assault by motorists.
This program is limited to the reimbursement provided in this section.

(3) An employee is entitled
to receive the reimbursement provided in this section only if the secretary
finds that each of the following has occurred:

(a) A motorist has
assaulted the employee who is engaged in highway construction or maintenance
along a roadway right-of-way (fence line to fence line, landscaped areas) or
service of the vessel as a maritime employee or terminal employee engaged in
the loading or unloading of passenger vehicles and as a result the employee has
sustained demonstrated physical injuries that have required the employee to
miss one or more days of work;

(b) The assault is not
attributable to any extent to the employee's negligence, misconduct, or failure
to comply with any rules or conditions of employment; and

(c) The department of
labor and industries has approved the employee's workers' compensation
application under chapter 51.32 RCW, or for maritime employees the department
of transportation risk management office has approved maintenance and cure
benefits under 46 U.S.C. Sec. 688 et seq.

(4) The reimbursement
authorized under this section is as follows:

(a) The employee's
accumulated sick leave days will not be reduced for the workdays missed. The
injured worker who qualifies for and receives assault benefits will also
receive full standard benefits (vacation leave, sick leave, health insurance,
etc.) as if uninjured;

(b) For an employee
covered by chapter 51.32 RCW, for each workday missed for which the employee is
not eligible to receive compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee will
receive the full amount of the injured worker's net pay at the time of injury;
and

(c) In respect to
workdays missed for which the employee will receive or has received
compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, or under federal maritime law benefits,
including the Jones Act, for an employee deemed a maritime employee assigned to
work in service of the vessel or a nonmaritime terminal employee covered under
chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee will be reimbursed in an amount that, when
added to that compensation, will result in the employee receiving no more than
full net pay (gross pay less mandatory and voluntary deductions) for the
workdays missed.

(5) Reimbursement under
this section may not last longer than three hundred sixty-five consecutive days
after the date of the injury. No application for assault benefits is valid nor
may a claim be enforced unless it was made within one year after the day upon
which the injury occurred.

(6) The employee is not
entitled to the reimbursement provided in subsection (4) of this section for a
workday for which the secretary or an applicable designee finds that the
employee has not diligently pursued his or her compensation remedies under
chapter 51.32 RCW or federal maritime law, including the Jones Act.

(7) The reimbursement
may be made only for absences that the secretary or an applicable designee
believes are justified.

(8) While the employee
is receiving reimbursement under this section, he or she will continue to be
classified as a state employee, and the reimbursement amount is considered as
salary or wages.

(9) The department
shall make all reimbursement payments required to be made to employees under
this section. The payments are considered as a salary or wage expense and must
be paid by the department in the same manner and from the same appropriations
as other salary and wage expenses for the department.

(10) Nothing in this
section precludes the department from recovering the supplemental payments
authorized by this section from the assaulting motorist, and that recovery is
considered exclusive of recovery under chapter 51.24 RCW.

(11) If the legislature
revokes the reimbursement authorized under this section or repeals this
section, no affected employee is entitled after that to receive the
reimbursement as a matter of contractual right.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington fruit
express account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the
operations of the Washington fruit express program must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operations of the
Washington fruit express program.

Sec. 607. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account,
the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 608. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account,
the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account,
the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund,
the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
609. Section 607 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
610. Section 608 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
611. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 612. Except for section 608 of
this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX PAGE
#

BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS................................. 6

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD................................ 6

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE....................................... 2

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................ 12

INFORMATION SYSTEMS............................................ 11

MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES................................ 10

VEHICLE SERVICES............................................... 11

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

AVIATION--PROGRAM F............................................ 12

CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 16

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M................................. 14

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES--PROGRAM
D--OPERATING........ 12

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I........................................ 12

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z...................................... 21

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 18

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P........................................ 15

PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY
PROJECTS)......... 23

PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V............................... 17

RAIL--PROGRAM Y................................................ 20

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.................................. 15

TRANSFERS...................................................... 25

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K................ 14

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 16

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH--PROGRAM T......... 16

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 17

FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD..................... 9

JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE.................... 3

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM............... 2

LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE............................ 8

MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION..................................... 9

OFFICE OF STATE AUDITOR......................................... 3

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION........................... 3

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 24

STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION................................ 24

STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTIONS TO CITIES AND
COUNTIES........ 24

TRANSFERS...................................................... 25

STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS....................................... 25

TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION....................................... 9

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD................................ 7

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION......................... 3

WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION

CAPITAL PROJECTS................................................ 4

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL........................................ 23

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU......................................... 9

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU........................................ 10

WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION............................ 5

---
END ---