BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds
that an employee who is a crime victim must often take leave from work in order
to participate in legal proceedings, obtain medical treatment, and obtain other
necessary services arising from the crime. The legislature also finds that the
demands of the workplace, the needs of the criminal justice system, and the
needs of crime victims must be balanced in order to have economic security and
a well-functioning society. The legislature therefore finds that it is in the
public interest to provide reasonable leave from employment for crime victims.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Employer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 51.08.070.

(2) "Reduced leave
schedule" means leave taken for fewer than an employee's usual number of
hours or days per workweek.

(3) "Sexual
abuse" means a violation of chapter 9.68 or 9A.44 RCW.

(4) "Undue
hardship" means significant difficulty or expense when considered in light
of:

(a) The nature and cost
of the requested leave;

(b) The number of
persons employed by the employer;

(c) The impact of the
leave on the operation of the employer's business; and

(d) The type of
operation of the employer, including the composition, structure, and functions
of the work force of the employer.

(5) "Victim"
means a person who suffers bodily injury or death as a proximate result of a
criminal act of another person, the victim's own good faith and reasonable
effort to prevent a criminal act, or his or her good faith effort to apprehend a
person reasonably suspected of engaging in a criminal act. "Victim"
includes a person who has been harassed or followed by a person stalking in
violation of RCW 9A.46.110, a survivor of a homicide victim who was an
immediate family member, and a parent of a child who has been subject to sexual
abuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. REQUIRED LEAVE. (1) An
employer must grant reasonable and necessary leave from work, with or without
pay, for an employee to:

(a) Prepare for and
attend court proceedings;

(b) Receive medical
treatment; or

(c) Obtain necessary
services to remedy a crisis caused by domestic violence, sexual assault, sexual
abuse, stalking, or the homicide of an immediate family member.

(2) The leave must be
needed because the employee is a victim of a criminal act, has been harassed or
followed by a stalker in violation of RCW 9A.46.110, is a survivor of a
homicide victim who was an immediate family member, or is a parent of a child
who has been subject to sexual abuse.

(3) A written request
for leave must be provided to the employer at least seven days in advance of
the leave, but a shorter notice may be sufficient if it is reasonable under the
circumstances.

(4) The leave may be
taken on a reduced leave schedule subject to the approval of the employer.

(5) An employer is not
required to grant leave under this section if:

(a) The employer would
sustain undue hardship from the employee's absence;

(b) The requested leave
is not communicated to the employer within a reasonable time under the
circumstances;

(c) The requested leave
is impractical, unreasonable, or unnecessary based upon the facts then made
known to the employer; or

(d) The criminal act
has not been reported to a local police department or sheriff's office.

(6) Nothing in this
section requires more than six weeks of leave during any twelve-month period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. EMPLOYEE BENEFITS. The
taking of leave under section 3 of this act shall not result in the loss of any
benefits for the employee that accrued before the date on which the leave
commenced. The employer may not sanction an employee for exercising the right
to take leave under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. ADDITIONAL RIGHTS‑‑REMEDIES‑‑COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING OBLIGATIONS AND RIGHTS NOT DIMINISHED. (1) The rights provided in
this act are in addition to any other rights provided by law.

(2) Nothing in this act
shall be construed to discourage employers from adopting policies that provide
greater leave rights to employees who are crime victims than those required by
this act.

(3) Nothing in this act
shall be construed to diminish an employer's obligation to comply with any
collective bargaining agreement or any employment benefit program or plan that
provides greater leave rights to employees than the rights provided by this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. COMPLAINT‑‑CONTENTS‑‑NOTICE‑‑INVESTIGATION.
(1) An employee who believes that an employer has violated any provision of
this act may file a complaint with the department within ninety days of the
alleged violation. The contents of the complaint shall be the same as is
required for a complaint filed under RCW 49.78.140.

(2) Upon receipt of a
complaint, the department shall forward written notice of the complaint to the
employer.

(3) The department may
investigate any complaint filed within the required time frame. If the
department determines that a violation of this chapter has occurred, it may
issue a notice of infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. NOTICES OF INFRACTIONS‑‑APPEALS.
Notices of infractions and appeals to contest notices of infractions issued
under this act are subject to the same requirements as provided in RCW
49.78.150 through 49.78.180.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. PENALTIES. An employer
found to have committed an infraction of this act may be subject to a fine of
up to two hundred dollars for the first infraction. An employer that continues
to violate the provisions of this chapter may be subject to a fine of up to one
thousand dollars for each infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. POSTER REQUIRED. The
department shall include notice of the provisions of this act in the next
reprinting of employment posters printed under RCW 49.78.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. RULES. The director
shall, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt rules necessary to the administration
of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act are each added to chapter 49.12 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act
takes effect September 1, 2002.

---
END ---