BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A local sales and
use tax change adopted after December 1, 2000, must provide an exemption for
those sales of lodging which if the total sales tax rate imposed on sales of
lodging would exceed the greater of:

(a) Twelve percent; or

(b) The total sales tax rate that would have
applied to the sale of lodging if the sale were made on December 1, 2000.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Local sales and use tax
change" is defined as provided in RCW 82.14.055.

(b) "Sale of lodging" means the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other services by
a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property.

(c) "Total sales tax rate" means
the combined rates of all state and local taxes imposed under this chapter and
chapters 36.100, 67.28, 67.40, and 82.08 RCW, and any other tax authorized
after the effective date of this section if the tax is in the nature of a sales
tax collected from the buyer, but excluding taxes imposed under RCW 81.104.170
before December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---