BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Complying with the
laws regarding dairy nutrient management is a burdensome yet laudable task that
the dairy farmers of this state have undertaken;

(2) The dairy nutrient
management standards and specifications of the natural resources conservation
service were the most rigorous in the nation when the dairy nutrient management
act was enacted in 1998;

(3) Those standards, as
they existed in 1998, continue to be appropriate standards for proper
management of dairy nutrients, despite modification by the natural resources
conservation service since 1998;

(4) Dairy farmers
cannot comply with constantly changing requirements. The uncertainty constant
change creates is an unnecessary drain on limited resources; and

(5) If management
standards change substantively, there should be a method for all parties
concerned with proper dairy nutrient management to consider and implement
changes without causing disruption, uncertainty, or an unnecessary drain on
resources.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.64.026 and 1998 c
262 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for those
producers who already have a certified dairy nutrient management plan as
required under the terms and conditions of an individual or general national
pollutant discharge elimination system permit, all dairy producers licensed
under chapter 15.36 RCW, regardless of size, shall prepare a dairy nutrient
management plan. If at any time a dairy nutrient management plan fails to
prevent the discharge of pollutants to waters of the state, it shall be
required to be updated.

(2) By November 1,
1998, the conservation commission, in conjunction with the advisory and
oversight committee established under section 8 of this act shall develop a
document clearly describing the elements that a dairy nutrient management plan
must contain to gain local conservation district approval.

(3) In developing the
elements that an approved dairy nutrient management plan must contain, the
commission may authorize the use of other methods and technologies than those
developed by the natural resources conservation service when such alternatives
have been evaluated by the advisory and oversight committee. Alternative
methods and technologies shall meet the standards and specifications of:

(a) The natural
resources conservation service, as those standards and specifications
existed on July 1, 1998, and as modified by the geographically based
standards developed under RCW 90.64.140; or

(b) A professional
engineer with expertise in the area of dairy nutrient management.

(4) In evaluating
alternative technologies and methods, the principal objectives of the
committee's evaluation shall be determining:

(a) Whether there is a
substantial likelihood that, once implemented, the alternative technologies and
methods would not violate water quality requirements;

(b) Whether more
cost-effective methods can be successfully implemented in some or all
categories of dairy operations; and

(c) Whether the
technologies and methods approved or provided by the natural resources conservation
service for use by confined animal feeding operations, as those standards
and specifications existed on July 1, 1998, are necessarily required for
other categories of dairy operations.

In addition, the
committee shall encourage the conservation commission and the conservation
districts to apply in dairy nutrient management plans technologies and methods
that are appropriate to the needs of the specific type of operation and the
specific farm site and to avoid imposing requirements that are not necessary
for the specific dairy producer to achieve compliance with water quality
requirements.

(5) Such plans shall be
submitted for approval to the local conservation district where the dairy farm
is located, and shall be approved by conservation districts no later than by
July 1, 2002. The conservation commission, in conjunction with conservation
districts, shall develop a statewide schedule of plan development and approval
to ensure adequate resources are available to have all plans approved by July
1, 2002.

(6) If a dairy producer
leases land for dairy production from an owner who has prohibited the
development of capital improvements, such as storage lagoons, on the leased
property, the dairy producer shall indicate in his or her dairy nutrient
management plan that such improvements are prohibited by the landowner and
shall describe other methods, such as land application, that will be employed
by the dairy producer to manage dairy nutrients.

(7) Notwithstanding the
timelines in this section, any dairy farm licensed after September 1, 1998,
shall have six months from the date of licensing to develop a dairy nutrient
management plan and another eighteen months to fully implement that plan.

(8) If a plan contains
the elements identified in subsection (2) of this section, a conservation
district shall approve the plan no later than ninety days after receiving the
plan. If the plan does not contain the elements identified in subsection (2)
of this section, the local conservation district shall notify the dairy
producer in writing of modifications needed in the plan no later than ninety
days after receiving the plan. The dairy producer shall provide a revised plan
that includes the needed modifications within ninety days of the date of the
local conservation district notification. If the dairy producer does not agree
with, or otherwise takes exception to, the modifications requested by the local
conservation district, the dairy producer may initiate the appeals process
described in RCW 90.64.028 within thirty days of receiving the letter of
notification.

(9) An approved plan
shall be certified by a conservation district and a dairy producer when the
elements necessary to implement the plan have been constructed or otherwise put
in place, and are being used as designed and intended. A certification form
shall be developed by the conservation commission for use statewide and shall
provide for a signature by both a conservation district representative and a
dairy producer. Certification forms shall be signed by December 31, 2003, and
a copy provided to the department for recording in the data base established in
RCW 90.64.130.

(10) The ability of
dairy producers to comply with the planning requirements of this chapter
depends, in many cases, on the availability of federal and state funding to
support technical assistance provided by local conservation districts. Dairy
producers shall not be held responsible for noncompliance with the planning requirements
of this chapter if conservation districts are unable to perform their duties
under this chapter because of insufficient funding.

(11)
The conservation commission may, after public hearing and due consideration,
including comment from the department of ecology, in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt standards and
specifications of the natural resources conservation service that were not in
existence on July 1, 1998. Producers affected by new standards and specifications
have five years from the date the commission adopts the new standards and
specifications to comply with the new standards and specifications.

---
END ---