BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.290 and 1994 c
264 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When an
application complying with the provisions of this chapter and with the rules ((and
regulations)) of the department has been filed, the same shall be placed on
record with the department, and it shall be its duty to investigate the
application, and determine what water, if any, is available for appropriation,
and find and determine to what beneficial use or uses it can be applied. If it
is proposed to appropriate water for irrigation purposes, the department shall
investigate, determine and find what lands are capable of irrigation by means
of water found available for appropriation. If it is proposed to appropriate
water for the purpose of power development, the department shall investigate,
determine and find whether the proposed development is likely to prove
detrimental to the public interest, having in mind the highest feasible use of
the waters belonging to the public.

(2)(a) If the
application does not contain, and the applicant does not promptly furnish
sufficient information on which to base such findings, the department may issue
a preliminary permit, for a period of not to exceed three years, requiring the
applicant to make such surveys, investigations, studies, and progress reports,
as in the opinion of the department may be necessary. If the applicant fails
to comply with the conditions of the preliminary permit, it and the application
or applications on which it is based shall be automatically canceled and the
applicant so notified. If the holder of a preliminary permit shall, before its
expiration, file with the department a verified report of expenditures made and
work done under the preliminary permit, which, in the opinion of the
department, establishes the good faith, intent, and ability of the
applicant to carry on the proposed development, the preliminary permit may,
with the approval of the governor, be extended, but not to exceed a maximum
period of five years from the date of the issuance of the preliminary permit.

(b) For a
preliminary permit relating to an application seeking to divert or withdraw
water from a water source closed to further diversions or withdrawals by a
state or federally imposed moratorium in effect during the time the preliminary
permit is in effect, the initial three-year preliminary permit time frame must
be extended for three years from the date the moratorium is lifted.

(c) For any
application for which a preliminary permit was issued and for which the
availability of water was directly affected by a moratorium on further
diversions from the Columbia river during the years from 1990 to 1998, the
preliminary permit is extended through June 30, 2002. If such an application
and preliminary permit were cancelled by operation of this section, the
application and preliminary permit are reinstated and the preliminary permit is
extended until June 30, 2002.

(3) The
department shall make and file as part of the record in the matter, written
findings of fact concerning all things investigated, and if it shall find that
there is water available for appropriation for a beneficial use, and the
appropriation thereof as proposed in the application will not impair existing
rights or be detrimental to the public welfare, it shall issue a permit stating
the amount of water to which the applicant shall be entitled and the beneficial
use or uses to which it may be applied: PROVIDED, That where the water applied
for is to be used for irrigation purposes, it shall become appurtenant only to
such land as may be reclaimed thereby to the full extent of the soil for
agricultural purposes. But where there is no unappropriated water in the
proposed source of supply, or where the proposed use conflicts with existing
rights, or threatens to prove detrimental to the public interest, having due
regard to the highest feasible development of the use of the waters belonging
to the public, it shall be duty of the department to reject such application
and to refuse to issue the permit asked for.

(4)
If the permit is refused because of conflict with existing rights and such
applicant shall acquire same by purchase or condemnation under RCW 90.03.040,
the department may thereupon grant such permit. Any application may be
approved for a less amount of water than that applied for, if there exists
substantial reason therefor, and in any event shall not be approved for more
water than can be applied to beneficial use for the purposes named in the
application. In determining whether or not a permit shall issue upon any
application, it shall be the duty of the department to investigate all facts
relevant and material to the application. After the department approves said
application in whole or in part and before any permit shall be issued thereon
to the applicant, such applicant shall pay the fee provided in RCW 90.03.470:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event a permit is issued by the department upon
any application, it shall be its duty to notify the director of fish and
wildlife of such issuance.

--- END ---