BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
77.85.050 and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 11 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1)(a) Counties, cities, and tribal governments must
jointly

_7 designate, by resolution or by letters of support, the
area for

_8 which a habitat project list is to be developed and the
lead

_9 entity that is to be responsible for submitting the
habitat

10 project list. No project included on a habitat project
list shall

11 be considered mandatory in nature and no private
landowner may be

12 forced or coerced into participation in any respect.
The lead

13 entity may be a county, city, conservation district,
special

14 district, tribal government, or other entity.

15 (b) In lieu of the requirements of (a) of this
subsection, a

16 lead agency under chapter 90.82 RCW may serve as the
lead entity

17 under the provisions of this chapter and be
responsible for

18 submitting the habitat project list for the
geographical planning

p. 1 SB
5334

_1 area within the jurisdiction of the planning unit if
(i) a habitat

_2 component is selected under RCW 90.82.100; (ii) a
watershed

_3 assessment has been completed under RCW
90.82.040(2)(b); and (iii)

_4 a ranked list of projects and activities has been
prepared that

_5 warrant immediate financial assistance consistent
with RCW

_6 90.82.110.

_7 (c) The lead entity shall establish a
committee that consists

_8 of representative interests of counties, cities,
conservation

_9 districts, tribes, environmental groups, business
interests,

10 landowners, citizens, volunteer groups, regional fish
enhancement

11 groups, and other habitat interests. The purpose of the
committee

12 is to provide a citizen-based evaluation of the projects
proposed

13 to promote salmon habitat. The technical review team
may provide

14 the lead entity with organizational models that may be
used in

15 establishing the committees.

16 (((c))) (d) The committee shall
compile a list of habitat

17 projects, establish priorities for individual projects,
define the

18 sequence for project implementation, and submit these
activities

19 as the habitat project list. The committee shall also
identify

20 potential federal, state, local, and private funding
sources.

21 (2) The area covered by the habitat project list
must be based,

22 at a minimum, on a WRIA, combination of WRIAs, or any
other area

23 as agreed to by the counties, cities, and tribes in resolutions
or

24 in letters of support meeting the requirements of this

25 subsection. Preference will be given to projects in an
area that

26 contain a salmon species that is listed or proposed for
listing

27 under the federal endangered species act.

28 (3) The lead entity shall submit the habitat project
list to

29 the technical review team in accordance with procedures
adopted by

30 the board.

31 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

32 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

33 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

34 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5334 p. 2