BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that the statewide

_8 emergency communications network of enhanced 911
telephone

_9 service, which allows an immediate display of a caller's

10 identification and location, has served to further the
safety,

11 health, and welfare of the state's citizens, and has
saved lives.

12 The legislature further finds that statewide
operation and

13 management of the enhanced 911 system will create
efficiencies of

14 operation and permit greater local control of county 911

15 operations, and further that some counties will continue
to need

16 assistance from the state to maintain minimum enhanced
911 service

17 levels.

18

p. 1 SSB
5335

_1 Sec. 2. RCW
38.52.540 and 1998 c 304 s 14 are each amended to read

_2 as follows:

_3 The enhanced 911 account is created in the state
treasury. All

_4 receipts from the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed
by RCW

_5 82.14B.030 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys
in the

_6 account shall be used only to ((help implement and
operate

_7 enhanced 911 statewide. Moneys in the account may be
used to

_8 provide salary assistance on a temporary basis not to
exceed three

_9 years to counties with a population of less than
seventy-five

10 thousand that need additional resources to cover
unfunded costs

11 that can be shown to result from handling 911 calls.
Moneys in the

12 account may be used to assist multicounty regions,
including

13 ongoing salary assistance for multicounty regions
consisting of

14 counties with populations of less than seventy-five

15 thousand. However,)) support the statewide
coordination and

16 management of the enhanced 911 system and to help
supplement,

17 within available funds, the operational costs of the
system. Funds

18 shall not be distributed to any county that has not
imposed the

19 maximum county enhanced 911 taxes allowed under RCW
82.14B.030 (1)

20 and (2). The state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the
advice and

21 assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory committee, is
authorized

22 to enter into statewide agreements to improve the
efficiency of

23 enhanced 911 services for all counties and shall
specify by rule

24 the additional purposes for which moneys, if
available, may be

25 expended from this account.

26 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 38.52

27 RCW to read as follows:

28 In specifying rules defining the purposes for which
available

29 moneys may be expended, the state enhanced 911
coordinator, with

30 the advice and assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory
committee,

31 shall consider base needs of individual counties for
specific

32 assistance. Priorities for available enhanced 911
funding are as

33 follows: (1) To assure that 911 dialing is operational
statewide;

34 (2) to assist counties as necessary to assure that they
can

35 achieve a basic service level for 911 operations; and
(3) to

36 assist counties as practicable to acquire items of a
capital

37 nature appropriate to increasing 911 effectiveness.

SSB 5335 p. 2

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary
for the immediate

_2 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

_3 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

_4 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5335