BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.050 and 1999
c 388 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each school
district board of directors shall:

(a) Select the reading
standard results on either the 1997 or 1998 fourth grade Washington assessment
of student learning as the school district's initial baseline reading
standard. Districts may select the 1997 results only if all of the elementary
schools with fourth grade students administered the assessment;

(b) By December 15,
2001, select the mathematics standard results on the 1998, 1999, or 2000 fourth
grade Washington assessment of student learning as the school district's fourth
grade baseline mathematics standard, using for its baseline a year in which all
of the elementary schools with fourth grade students administered the
assessment;

(c) Establish
three-year, district-wide goals to increase, by the end of the 2000-01 school
year, the percentage of students who meet or exceed the reading standard, and
by the 2003-04 school year, the percentage of students who meet or exceed the
mathematics standard on the fourth grade Washington assessment of student
learning. The three-year percentage increase goal in each subject may not be
less than the district's total percentage of students who did not meet the
baseline standard in each subject multiplied by twenty-five percent;

(d) Specify the annual
district-wide percentage improvement increments to meet the goals; and

(e) Direct each
elementary school to establish three-year goals for its fourth grade students,
subject to approval by the board. The aggregate of the elementary school goals
must meet or exceed the district-wide goals established by the board.

(2) By December 15,
2001, each school district board of directors shall:

(a) Select the
mathematics standard results on the 1998, 1999, 2000, or 2001 seventh grade
Washington assessment of student learning as the school district's seventh
grade baseline mathematics standard;

(b) Establish a
three-year district-wide goal to increase, by the end of the 2003-04 school
year, the percentage of students who meet or exceed the mathematics standard,
on the seventh grade Washington assessment of student learning. The district
shall select for its baseline a year in which all of the schools with seventh
grade students administered the assessment. The percentage increase goal may
not be less than the district's total percentage of students who did not meet
the baseline standard in mathematics multiplied by twenty-five percent;

(c) Specify the annual
district-wide percentage improvement increments necessary to meet the goal; and

(d) Direct each middle
or junior high school, as appropriate, to establish a mathematics goal for its
seventh grade students, subject to approval by the board. The aggregate of the
middle or junior high school goals must meet or exceed the district-wide goals
established by the board in each subject.

(3) Schools and school
districts in which ten or fewer students are eligible to be assessed in a grade
level are not required to establish numerical improvement goals and performance
relative to the goals.

(4)(a) If an
elementary school does not meet or exceed the goals set in this section, upon
the request of the student's parent or guardian the school district must
transfer the student to a successful public school within the district that has
met the goals or the student shall be granted an opportunity scholarship,
whichever the parent requests. Within thirty days of the parent's or
guardian's request, the school shall either transfer the student to another
public school within the district that has met the goals or grant the opportunity
scholarship.

(b) The amount of
the opportunity scholarship shall be four thousand dollars for tuition at a
private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW where the student or the
student's parent or guardian has chosen to redeem the scholarship. The
opportunity scholarship funds shall be used towards the cost of tuition at a
private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW. Upon parents' request,
subsequent scholarships shall be granted for consecutive school years.

(c) The
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
to implement this subsection (4).

--- END ---