BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. The legislature finds
that it is in the public interest to adopt a voting system in which all
successful candidates must win by a majority vote rather than a plurality of
effective votes and that allows voters to vote secondary and other preferences
in case their favorite candidate is not elected. A system known as instant
runoff voting achieves that purpose. The legislature further finds that voter
interest and participation in elections will increase because a voter has more
choices and all votes will be more meaningful than under the present system.
It is in the interest of participatory democracy that voters be given the
opportunity to vote their true beliefs with their first choice votes, while
still making effective secondary choices among the remaining acceptable
candidates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Instant runoff voting" means a system of voting
whereby voters may rank three or more candidates for the same office in order
of preference, so that voters may indicate a first choice, a second choice, and
so on for as many of the candidates for the office as they wish, up to the
maximum number of choices allowed.

(2) "Choice" means an indication on a ballot of a voter's
ranking of candidates for a particular office according to the voter's
preference.

(3) "Vote" means a ballot choice that is counted toward
election of a candidate. All first choices are votes, and lower ranked choices
are potential votes that may be credited to a candidate, and thus become votes
for the candidate, according to the rules stated in this chapter.

(4) "Stage" or "stage in the counting" means a
step in counting votes, where votes for all remaining candidates are counted to
determine whether a candidate has achieved a majority and, if not, which
candidate or candidates are eliminated.

(5) "Next choice" means the highest ranked choice for a
remaining candidate that has not become a vote at the stage referred to.

(6) "Last place candidate" means a candidate who has
received the fewest votes among the candidates who remain at any stage. Two or
more candidates simultaneously become last place candidates where their
combined votes add up to less than all votes for the candidate with the next
highest number of votes.

(7) "Exhausted ballot" means a ballot on which all
available choices have been used; for example, all choices made on the ballot
have become votes for the various candidates so indicated or contain choices
for eliminated candidates or both and no other choices remain.

(8) "Continuing ballot" means a ballot that is not
exhausted.

(9) "Remaining candidate" means a candidate who has not
been eliminated. "Candidates who remain" are all those who have not
been eliminated at the stage referred to.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. INSTANT RUNOFF VOTING.
The instant runoff system of voting is adopted in this state in the manner
specified in this chapter for all applicable elections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. COUNTING OF BALLOTS. (1)
General Explanation. In general, instant runoff counting proceeds in the
following manner: First by counting all votes. If a candidate receives a
majority of votes he or she is elected. If no candidate receives a majority on
the first or any subsequent stage then the last place candidate at each stage
is eliminated. The next choices on ballots for an eliminated candidate become
votes for the candidates indicated in those choices, and this process continues
until all but one candidate has been eliminated.

(2) Specific Rules and Procedures. The following specific rules
and procedures, subject to the conditions of section 5 of this act, govern how
votes must be counted for each office subject to instant runoff voting:

(a) All first choices are counted first and if a candidate has
obtained a majority of those votes that candidate is elected and counting ends.

(b) If no candidate receives a majority of votes at the first stage
then second stage counting begins by eliminating the last place candidate and
the second choices made on ballots for the eliminated candidate become votes
for the second choice candidate indicated on those ballots. A candidate who
receives a majority of votes at that stage is elected.

(c) If no candidate receives a majority at a previous stage then
the last place candidate among the remaining candidates is eliminated and the
next choices made on ballots for an eliminated candidate become votes for the
candidate indicated on those ballots. A candidate who receives a majority of
votes at that stage is elected.

(d) If at any stage in the counting there are two or more last
place candidates, these candidates are eliminated simultaneously and the next
choices made on ballots that had votes for all such eliminated candidates
become votes for any candidates so indicated who remain.

(e) The counting process continues in this manner with successive
last place candidates being eliminated and the next choices made on continuing
ballots on which votes were cast for eliminated candidates are counted for the
remaining candidate or candidates indicated by those choices until all but one
candidate has been eliminated and that candidate is then elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. VOTING CONDITIONS AND
LIMITATIONS. (1) Exhausted Ballots. (a) Once a ballot is exhausted it is
disregarded and no longer counted.

(b) A ballot assigning the same ranking to more than one candidate
for an office is exhausted when the duplicate ranking is reached, and in that
case no vote is recorded for any of the duplicate candidates so chosen.

(c) If in a partisan primary election a voter makes a choice for a
candidate for a particular office who is not a candidate of the party for which
the voter has made a higher ranked choice, then that ballot is exhausted with
respect to all subsequent choices for that office.

(2) Skipped Ranking. If a ballot choice skips a ranking, then the
next ranking below the skipped choice is moved up and counted as though it were
the rank of the skipped choice.

(3) Tie Votes. Ties between candidates occurring at any stage are
resolved according to the general election laws of this state.

(4) Maximum Effective Choices. Only five choices for any one
office are counted.

(5) Write-in Votes. Voters may write in one candidate for each
office and assign a ranking to the write-in candidate along with candidates
whose names are already on the ballot. Write-in candidates with fewer than ten
votes are automatically eliminated in elections in jurisdictions where more
than one thousand total ballots were cast in the previous election.

(6) Insufficient Choice Votes Made. If ballots do not contain
sufficient effective second and lower choices for a particular office so that
at the end of the counting no candidate achieves a majority then the candidate
with the most votes credited to him or her is elected.

(7) Votes for Eliminated Candidates. No votes may be counted for a
candidate who has been eliminated no matter how many second and lower ranked
choices might otherwise have become votes for the candidate in a later stage.
A second or lower ranked choice for an eliminated candidate will be treated as
a skipped ranking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. APPLICABILITY. (1)
Offices Covered. This chapter applies to elections for the following offices:

(a) Members of the Washington state legislature;

(b) Judges of the supreme court, the court of appeals, the superior
courts, and district courts of this state;

(c) President and vice-president of the United States; and

(d) Members of the United States senate and United States house of
representatives.

(2) Elections Covered. This chapter applies to and governs voting
in all primary, regular, and special elections where three or more candidates
are running for the same office.

(3) Nonpartisan Primaries. Primaries for all nonpartisan offices
are abolished, and there will be only a general election under instant runoff
voting rules for these offices.

(4) This section applies only if RCW 29.18.200 does not apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. LOCAL OPTION AUTHORIZED.
A county, city, town, special purpose district, school district, port district,
or other governmental subdivision having elected officers may use instant
runoff voting in its elections if adopted by appropriate action of its
governing body.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. BALLOT SPECIFICATIONS AND
DIRECTIONS TO VOTERS. Ballots should be simple and easy to understand. Sample
ballots illustrating voting procedures must be posted in or near the voting
booth, and included in the instruction packet of absentee ballots. Directions
provided to voters must conform substantially to the following specifications:

"You
may vote for candidates in order of preference. Indicate your first choice by
marking the number "1" beside a candidate's name (or by marking in
the column labeled "First Choice"), your second choice by marking the
number "2" (or by marking in the column labeled "Second
Choice"), your third choice by the number "3" (or marking the "Third
Choice" column), and so on, for as many or as few choices as you wish from
one up to a total of five. You are under no obligation to rank more than one
candidate for each office, but ranking additional candidates will not affect
your first choice candidate. Do not mark the same number beside more than one
candidate (or put more than one mark in each column for the office you are
voting on). Do not skip numbers."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. CHANGES IN VOTING DEVICES
AND COUNTING METHODS. Appropriate election officials of this state may provide
for the use of electronic, computerized, or other devices for marking, sorting,
and counting the ballots and tabulating the results, and may modify the design
and form of the ballots, the directions to voters, and the details with respect
to the method of marking, sorting, invalidating, and retaining of ballots, and
the counting of votes. No change may be made inconsistent with provisions,
purposes, or principles of this chapter. Election officials should provide
voters with a ballot that has a special design, format, or layout for offices
to which instant runoff voting applies, but the parts of ballots for contests
that have only one or two candidates for the same office may differ from the
parts of a ballot to which instant runoff voting applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. The votes at the first
stage will be used for the purposes of calculating the relative popularity of
the various parties so they may receive federal election funds.

Sec. 11. RCW 29.18.200 and 1990 c
59 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in chapter 29.19 RCW, all
properly registered voters may vote for their choice at any primary held under
this title, for any candidate for each office, regardless of political
affiliation and without a declaration of political faith or adherence on the
part of the voter.

(2) This section applies only if all major political parties
agree to a blanket primary as described in subsection (1) of this section by
party rules at least one hundred twenty days before the date prescribed by RCW
29.13.070; otherwise chapter 29.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 of this act) will
apply.

Sec. 12. RCW 29.65.050 and 1965 c
9 s 29.65.050 are each amended to read as follows:

The clerk shall issue subpoenas for witnesses in such contested
election at the request of either party, which shall be served by the sheriff
or constable, as other subpoenas, and the superior court shall have full power
to issue attachments to compel the attendance of witnesses who shall have been
duly subpoenaed to attend if they fail to do so.

The court shall meet at the time and place designated to determine
such contested election by the rules of law and evidence governing the
determination of questions of law and fact, so far as the same may be
applicable, and may dismiss the proceedings if the statement of the cause or
causes of contest is insufficient, or for want of prosecution. After hearing
the proofs and allegations of the parties, the court shall pronounce judgment
in the premises, either confirming or annulling and setting aside such
election, according to the law and right of the case.

If in any such case it shall appear that another person than the
one returned has the highest number of legal votes, said court shall declare
such person duly elected, consistent with the requirements for instant
runoff voting contained in chapter 29.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 of this
act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. RCW 29.30.085 (Nonpartisan candidates
qualified for general election) and 1992 c 181 s 2 & 1990 c 59 s 95 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Section captions used in
this act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---