BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
19.158.110 and 1989 c 20 s 11 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) Within the first minute of the telephone call, a
commercial

_8 telephone solicitor or salesperson shall:

_9 (a) Identify himself or herself, the company on
whose behalf

10 the solicitation is being made, the property, goods, or
services

11 being sold; and

12 (b) Terminate the telephone call within ten seconds
if the

13 purchaser indicates he or she does not wish to continue
the

14 conversation.

15 (2) If at any time during the telephone contact, the
purchaser

16 states or indicates that he or she does not wish to be
called

17 again by the commercial telephone solicitor or wants to
have his

p. 1 SB
5339

_1 or her name and individual telephone number removed from
the

_2 telephone lists used by the commercial telephone
solicitor:

_3 (a) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not
make any

_4 additional commercial telephone solicitation of the
called party

_5 at that telephone number within a period of at least one
year; and

_6 (b) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not
sell or give

_7 the called party's name and telephone number to another
commercial

_8 telephone solicitor: PROVIDED, That the commercial
telephone

_9 solicitor may return the list, including the called
party's name

10 and telephone number, to the company or organization
from which it

11 received the list.

12 (3) The utilities and transportation commission
shall by rule

13 ensure that telecommunications companies inform their
residential

14 customers of the provisions of this section and RCW
80.36.400.

15 The notification may be made by:

16 (a) Annual inserts in the billing statements mailed
to

17 residential customers; or

18 (b) Conspicuous publication of the notice in the
consumer

19 information pages of local telephone directories.

20 (4) If a sale or an agreement to purchase is
completed, the

21 commercial telephone solicitor must inform the purchaser
of his or

22 her cancellation rights as enunciated in this chapter,
state the

23 registration number issued by the department of
licensing, and

24 give the street address of the seller.

25 (5) If, at any time prior to sale or agreement to
purchase, the

26 commercial telephone solicitor's registration number is
requested

27 by the purchaser, it must be provided.

28 (6) All oral disclosures required by this section
shall be made

29 in a clear and intelligible manner.

30 Sec. 2. RCW
80.36.400 and 1986 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read

31 as follows:

32 (1) As used in this section:

33 (a) An automatic dialing and announcing device is a
device

34 which automatically dials telephone numbers and plays a
recorded

35 message once a connection is made.

36 (b) ((Commercial)) Telephone
solicitation means the unsolicited

SB 5339 p. 2

_1 initiation of a telephone conversation for the purpose
of

_2 encouraging a person to purchase property, goods, or
services or

_3 soliciting donations of money, property, goods, or
services.

_4 (2) No person may use an automatic dialing and
announcing

_5 device for purposes of ((commercial)) telephone
solicitation. This

_6 section applies to all ((commercial)) telephone
solicitation

_7 intended to be received by telephone customers within
the state.

_8 (3) The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this

_9 section are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the

10 purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86

11 RCW. A violation of this section is ((a
violation of)) not

12 reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of

13 business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade
or commerce

14 and an unfair method of competition for the purpose
of applying

15 the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
((It shall be

16 presumed that damages to the recipient of commercial
solicitations

17 made using an automatic dialing and announcing device
are five

18 hundred dollars.)) In addition to any other
penalties or remedies

19 available under this chapter or chapter 19.86 RCW, a
person

20 injured by a violation of this section may bring an
action for

21 recovery of liquidated damages in the amount of one
thousand

22 dollars per violation, plus court costs and
attorneys' fees.

23 (4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent the

24 Washington utilities and transportation commission from
adopting

25 additional rules regulating automatic dialing and
announcing

26 devices.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5339