BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 19.158

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter

_7 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

_8 (1) "Person" means:

_9 (a) Any individual;

10 (b) Any business entity, whether commercial or
nonprofit,

11 including but not limited to a firm, an association, a

12 corporation, a partnership, a joint venture, or a sole

13 proprietorship; or

14 (c) Each individual real estate agent or insurance
agent who

15 maintains a separate list from other individual real estate
or

16 insurance agents.

17 (2) "Commercial telephone solicitation"
means the unsolicited

18 initiation of a telephone call by a person to a
residential

p. 1 SB
5340

_1 telephone customer and conversation for the purpose of
encouraging

_2 a person to purchase property, goods, or services or
soliciting

_3 donations of money, property, goods, or services.
"Commercial

_4 telephone solicitation" does not include:

_5 (a) Calls made in response to a request or inquiry
by the

_6 called party. This includes calls regarding an item
that has been

_7 purchased by the called party from the company or
organization

_8 during a period not longer than twelve months prior to
the

_9 telephone contact;

10 (b) Calls made by a not-for-profit organization to
its own list

11 of bona fide or active members of the organization;

12 (c) Calls limited to polling or soliciting the
expression of

13 ideas, opinions, or votes; or

14 (d) Business-to-business contacts.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
19.158.020 (Definitions) and 1989 c 20 s

16 3 are each repealed.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5340 p. 2