BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
19.158.110 and 1989 c 20 s 11 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) Within the first minute of the telephone call, a
commercial

_8 telephone solicitor or salesperson shall:

_9 (a) Identify himself or herself, the company on
whose behalf

10 the solicitation is being made, the property, goods, or
services

11 being sold; and

12 (b) Terminate the telephone call within ten seconds
if the

13 purchaser indicates he or she does not wish to continue
the

14 conversation.

15 (2) If at any time during the telephone contact, the
purchaser

16 states or indicates that he or she does not wish to be
called

17 again by the commercial telephone solicitor or wants to
have his

p. 1 SSB
5341

_1 or her name and individual telephone number removed from
the

_2 telephone lists used by the commercial telephone
solicitor:

_3 (a) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not
make any

_4 additional commercial telephone solicitation of the
called party

_5 at that telephone number within a period of at least one
year; and

_6 (b) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not
sell or give

_7 the called party's name and telephone number to another
commercial

_8 telephone solicitor: PROVIDED, That the commercial
telephone

_9 solicitor may return the list, including the called
party's name

10 and telephone number, to the company or organization
from which it

11 received the list.

12 (3) The utilities and transportation commission
shall by rule

13 ensure that telecommunications companies inform their
residential

14 customers of the provisions of this section and
section 3 of this

15 act. The notification may be made by:

16 (a) Annual inserts in the billing statements mailed
to

17 residential customers; or

18 (b) Conspicuous publication of the notice in the
consumer

19 information pages of local telephone directories.

20 (4) If a sale or an agreement to purchase is
completed, the

21 commercial telephone solicitor must inform the purchaser
of his or

22 her cancellation rights as enunciated in this chapter,
state the

23 registration number issued by the department of
licensing, and

24 give the street address of the seller.

25 (5) If, at any time prior to sale or agreement to
purchase, the

26 commercial telephone solicitor's registration number is
requested

27 by the purchaser, it must be provided.

28 (6) All oral disclosures required by this section
shall be made

29 in a clear and intelligible manner.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158

31 RCW to read as follows:

32 (1) A commercial telephone solicitor, when engaging
in

33 commercial telephone solicitation, shall provide caller

34 identification information that is required by a caller

35 identification service if such service is available.

36 (2) A commercial telephone solicitor, when engaging
in

SSB 5341 p. 2

_1 commercial telephone solicitation, shall not circumvent
or

_2 interfere with the capability of a caller identification
service

_3 to deliver the solicitor's name, number, or location.

_4 (3) In addition to any other penalties or remedies
available

_5 under this chapter or chapter 19.86 RCW, a person
injured by a

_6 violation of this section may bring an action for
recovery of

_7 liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars
per

_8 violation, plus court costs and attorneys' fees.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 19.158

10 RCW to read as follows:

11 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

12 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

13 (a) "Prerecorded telephone message" means
an unsolicited

14 recorded telephone message without an introduction by an

15 unrecorded voice informing the receiver of the: (i)
Identity and

16 telephone number of the caller and (ii) option to
immediately

17 discontinue the call.

18 (b) "Prerecorded telephone message" does
not include the

19 following: (i) A recorded message disseminated with the
prior

20 consent of the receiver; (ii) a recorded message related
to public

21 health, safety, or welfare, including, but not limited
to,

22 noncommercial recorded messages disseminated by
libraries,

23 schools, and entities conducting epidemiological
studies; and

24 (iii) a recorded message, that is not a commercial
telephone

25 solicitation, disseminated to a person with whom the
caller has

26 had a business relationship within the past twelve months.

27 (2) No person initiating a telephone call may use a
prerecorded

28 telephone message. This section applies to all
prerecorded

29 telephone messages intended to be received by persons
within the

30 state.

31 (3) In addition to any other penalties or remedies
available

32 under this chapter or chapter 19.86 RCW, a person
injured by a

33 violation of this section may bring an action for
recovery of

34 liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars
per

35 violation, plus court costs and attorneys' fees.

36 (4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
restrict the

37 application of any laws applying to telephone
solicitations.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5341