BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. For the purpose of
providing funds to finance the projects described and authorized by the
legislature in the capital and operating appropriation acts for the 2001-2003
fiscal biennium, and all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee
is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in
the sum of nine hundred fifty-six million seven hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance these projects and
all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at
such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized
in this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation
of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The proceeds from the
sale of the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the
state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds
shall be transferred as follows:

(1) Eight hundred four
million dollars to remain in the state building construction account created by
RCW 43.83.020;

(2) Twenty-two million
five hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by RCW
79A.25.060;

(3) Twenty-two million
five hundred thousand dollars to the habitat conservation account created by
RCW 79A.15.020;

(4) Fifty million
dollars to the state taxable building construction account which is hereby
established in the state treasury. All receipts from taxable bond issues are
to be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation;

(5) Twenty-nine million
twenty-five thousand dollars to the higher education construction account
created by RCW 28B.140.040.

These proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment
of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the
purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of the
principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 (1), (2), (3),
and (4) of this act.

(2) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2 (1),
(2), (3), and (4) of this act.

(3) On each date on
which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for
the purposes of section 2 (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this act the state
treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state
treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an
amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due
on the payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of the
principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2(5) of this act.

(2) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2(5) of
this act.

(3) On each date on
which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for
the purposes of section 2(5) of this act, the board of regents of the
University of Washington shall cause to be paid out of University of Washington
nonappropriated local funds to the state treasurer for deposit into the
nondebt-limit reimbursement bond retirement account the amount computed in
subsection (2) of this section for bonds issued for the purposes of section
2(5) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Bonds issued under
sections 1 through 4 of this act shall state that they are a general obligation
of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state
to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall
contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as the same
shall become due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The legislature may
provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2
through 4 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for
the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The bonds authorized in
section 1 of this act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds
under state control and for all funds of any other public body.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---