BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. For the purpose of
providing funds for the planning, design, construction, and other necessary
costs for replacing the waterproof membrane over the east plaza garage and
revising related landscaping, the state finance committee is authorized to
issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of sixteen
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance this project
and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold
at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds
authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The proceeds from the
sale of the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the
state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds
shall be transferred as follows: Fifteen million five hundred twenty thousand
dollars to the state vehicle parking account created by RCW 43.01.225.

These proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section and for the payment
of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the
purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of the
principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act.

(2) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2 of
this act.

(3) On each date on
which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued for
the purposes of section 2 of this act, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the state vehicle parking account for deposit into the nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account, the amount computed in subsection (2) of
this section for bonds issued for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) Bonds issued under
section 1 of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the
state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an
unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as the same shall
become due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The legislature may
provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2
and 3 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The bonds authorized in
section 1 of this act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds
under state control and for all funds of any other public body.

Sec. 7. RCW 39.42.060 and 1999 c
273 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money shall be issued by the state
which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by the state to exceed that
amount for which payments of principal and interest in any fiscal year would
require the state to expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of
its general state revenues, as defined in section 1(c) of Article VIII of the
Washington state Constitution for the three immediately preceding fiscal years
as certified by the treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It shall be
the duty of the state finance committee to compute annually the amount required
to pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making such
computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed money
represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness which are
secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are required to be paid,
directly or indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by
the state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other public
agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school
districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred
pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution, but
shall exclude the following:

(1) Obligations for the
payment of current expenses of state government;

(2) Indebtedness
incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;

(3) Principal of and
interest on bond anticipation notes;

(4) Any indebtedness
which has been refunded;

(5) Financing contracts
entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;

(6) Indebtedness
authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute which requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues
or from the special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;

(7) Indebtedness
authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute that requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury,
except higher education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d) fees and
charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by institutions of higher
education;

(8) Any agreement,
promissory note, or other instrument entered into by the state finance
committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection with its acquisition of bond
insurance, letters of credit, or other credit support instruments for the
purpose of guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the marketability, or both, of
any state bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(9) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes identified in RCW 43.99N.020; ((and))

(10) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the school district bond guaranty established by
chapter 39.98 RCW; and

(11) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of replacing the waterproof membrane over the east
plaza garage and revising related landscaping construction pursuant to section
2 of this act.

To the extent necessary
because of the constitutional or statutory debt limitation, priorities with
respect to the issuance or guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness by the state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---