BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that it is necessary to complete the rehabilitation of the state legislative
building, to extend the useful life of the building, and provide for the
permanent relocation of offices displaced by the rehabilitation and create new
space for public uses.

Furthermore, it is the
intent of the legislature to fund the majority of the rehabilitation and
construction using bonds repaid by the capitol building construction account,
as provided for in the enabling act and dedicated by the federal government for
the sole purpose of establishing a state capitol, to fund the cash elements of
the project using capital project surcharge revenues in the Thurston county
capital facilities account, and to support the establishment of a private
foundation to engage the public in the preservation of the state legislative
building and raise private funds for restoration and educational efforts. The
bonds repaid by the capitol building construction account, whose revenues are
from the sale of capitol building lands, timber, or other materials, shall be
exempt from the state debt limit under RCW 39.42.060, and if at any time the
capitol building construction account has insufficient revenues to repay the
bonds, the legislature may provide additional means for the payment of the
bonds, but any such additional means shall be subject to the state debt limit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. For the purpose of
providing funds for the planning, design, construction, and other necessary
costs for the rehabilitation of the state legislative building, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state
of Washington in the sum of eighty-two million five hundred ten thousand
dollars or as much as may be required to finance the rehabilitation and
improvements to the legislative building and all costs incidental thereto. The
approved rehabilitation plan includes costs associated with earthquake repairs
and future earthquake mitigation and requires that occupants vacate the
building for approximately twenty-seven months beginning in fall 2001. The
approved plan allows for associated relocation costs and the acquisition of
appropriate relocation space. Bonds authorized in this section shall not
constitute indebtedness for purposes of the limitations set forth in RCW
39.42.060, to the extent that the bond payments are paid from the capitol
building construction account. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at
a price the state finance committee determines. No bonds authorized in this
section may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds. The proceeds of the sale of the bonds
issued for the purposes of this subsection shall be deposited in the capitol
historic district construction account hereby created in the state treasury.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Eighty-one million six
hundred eighty-one thousand dollars is appropriated in the 2001-2003 biennium
from the capitol historic district construction account to the
department of general administration for expenses related to the planning,
design, construction, relocation costs, acquisition of relocation space, and
other necessary costs for the rehabilitation of the state legislative building
construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The approved
rehabilitation plan conforms with option C/C+, including recommendations
pertaining to placement of mechanical infrastructure, as recommended in the
Space Use Study and Rehabilitation Plan Options, Report to the Legislature,
November 30, 2000.

The following
exceptions are made to the preferred option: (1) The occupants shall vacate
the legislative building for approximately twenty-seven months beginning in
fall 2001 with the anticipation that the legislature will reoccupy the building
for the 2004 legislative session; and (2) the state capitol committee, in
consultation with the legislative building renovation oversight committee,
shall develop alternatives for space use, exiting stairwells, and parking for
approval by the legislature in the 2002 legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the principal
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act.

(2)(a) The state
finance committee must, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the
state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2 of
this act.

(b) On or before the
date on which any interest or principal and interest is due, the state
treasurer shall transfer from the capitol building construction account for
deposit into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account, the amount
computed in (a) of this subsection for bonds issued for the purposes of section
2 of this act.

(3) If the capitol
building construction account has insufficient revenues to pay the principal
and interest computed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, then the debt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the payment of the
principal and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act from
any additional means provided by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Bonds issued under
section 1 of this act must state that they are a general obligation of the
state of Washington, must pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal and interest, and must contain an unconditional
promise to pay the principal and interest as it becomes due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The legislature may
provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2
through 7 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for
their payment.

Sec. 8. RCW 39.42.060 and 1999 c
273 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money shall be issued by the state
which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by the state to exceed that
amount for which payments of principal and interest in any fiscal year would
require the state to expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of
its general state revenues, as defined in section 1(c) of Article VIII of the
Washington state Constitution for the three immediately preceding fiscal years
as certified by the treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It shall be
the duty of the state finance committee to compute annually the amount required
to pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making such
computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed money
represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness which are
secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are required to be paid,
directly or indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by
the state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other public
agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school
districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred
pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution, but
shall exclude the following:

(1) Obligations for the
payment of current expenses of state government;

(2) Indebtedness
incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;

(3) Principal of and
interest on bond anticipation notes;

(4) Any indebtedness
which has been refunded;

(5) Financing contracts
entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;

(6) Indebtedness
authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute which requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues
or from the special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;

(7) Indebtedness
authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute that requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury,
except higher education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d) fees and
charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by institutions of higher
education;

(8) Any agreement,
promissory note, or other instrument entered into by the state finance
committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection with its acquisition of bond
insurance, letters of credit, or other credit support instruments for the
purpose of guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the marketability, or both, of
any state bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(9) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes identified in RCW 43.99N.020; ((and))

(10) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the school district bond guaranty established by
chapter 39.98 RCW; and

(11) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the state legislative building rehabilitation, to
the extent that principal and interest payments of such indebtedness are paid
from the capitol building construction account pursuant to section 5(2)(b) of
this act.

To the extent necessary
because of the constitutional or statutory debt limitation, priorities with
respect to the issuance or guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness by the state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---