BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 101. 1999 c 309 s 111
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL
CONDUCT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 904,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((852,000))

944,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,756,000))

1,848,000

Sec. 102. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 107
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 13,144,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((14,569,000))

14,204,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((25,085,000))

25,135,000

Judicial Information
Systems Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,016,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((71,814,000))

71,499,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in
the judicial information systems account appropriation shall be used for the
operations and maintenance of technology systems that improve services provided
by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the office of public defense, and
the administrator for the courts.

(2) No moneys
appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for the
courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. Consistent with Article
IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's Opinion
No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of these employer
contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or counties
in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall continue to
implement procedures for the collection and disbursement of these employer
contributions.

(3) $223,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
gender and justice commission.

(4) $308,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
minority and justice commission.

(5) $278,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $285,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $263,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation are provided solely for
the workload associated with tax warrants and other state cases filed in
Thurston county.

(6) $200,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for a
unified family court pilot program. Of this amount, $150,000 is provided for
the costs of establishing the program and $50,000 is provided for costs
associated with evaluating the efficacy of the program. The pilot program
grant is limited to the 1999-01 biennium. After this time, it is assumed that
funding for continuation of the unified family court or expansion to other
counties would be provided by local jurisdictions based on the results of the
evaluation of the program.

(7) $130,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $130,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the new judicial positions authorized by Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5036 (superior court judges).

(8) $132,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $136,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
the state's portion of increased costs in the superior court mandatory
arbitration program.

(9) $750,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely to
increase the number of children served by court-appointed special advocates in
dependency matters. The office of the administrator for the courts, after
consulting with the Washington association of juvenile court administrators and
the Washington association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed special
advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of funding shall be
based on the number of children who need volunteer court-appointed special
advocate representation and shall be equally accessible to all volunteer
court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The administrator
for the courts shall not retain more than six percent of total funding to cover
administrative or any other agency costs.

(10) $30,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the office of the administrator for the courts to convene a task
force to review whether there are revisions to existing statutes and court
rules which, if implemented, would decrease the likelihood of an inappropriate
imposition of the death penalty.

Sec. 103. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 108
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 500,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,490,000))

12,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,990,000))

12,580,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $558,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing constitutionally
mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

(2) $51,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1599 (court funding). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) Amounts provided
from the public safety and education account appropriation in this section
include funding for investigative services in death penalty personal restraint
petitions.

(4) The entire general
fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a dependency and
termination legal representation funding pilot program.

(a) The goal of the
pilot program shall be to enhance the quality of legal representation in
dependency and termination hearings, thereby reducing the number of
continuances requested by contract attorneys, including those based on the
unavailability of defense counsel. To meet the goal, the pilot shall include
the following components:

(i) A maximum caseload
requirement of 90 dependency and termination cases per full-time attorney;

(ii) Implementation of
enhanced defense attorney practice standards, including but not limited to
those related to reasonable case preparation and the delivery of adequate
client advice, as developed by Washington state public defense attorneys and
included in the office of public defense December 1999 report Costs of
Defense and Children's Representation in Dependency and Termination Hearings;

(iii) Use of
investigative and expert services in appropriate cases; and

(iv) Effective
implementation of indigency screening of all dependency and termination
parents, guardians, and legal custodians represented by appointed counsel.

(b) The pilot program
shall be established in one eastern and one western Washington juvenile court.

(c) The director shall
contract for an independent evaluation of the pilot program benefits and
costs. An interim evaluation shall be submitted to the governor and fiscal
committees of the legislature no later than January 1, 2001. A final
evaluation shall be submitted to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature
no later than ninety days following the close of the 1999-01 fiscal biennium.

(5) $50,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2491 (DNA testing of
offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 104. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 109
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,762,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 5,720,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 209,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 700,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,315,000))

12,391,600

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,612,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,588,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, $700,000 of the
water quality account appropriation, and $209,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
work plan and agency action items PSAT-01 through PSAT-05.

(2) $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
the salmon recovery office to support the efforts of the independent science
panel.

(3) $62,000 of the
fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and $63,000 of the
fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided solely to
implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5595 or Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2079, establishing the salmon recovery funding board in the office of
the governor. If legislation establishing the board is not enacted by June 30,
1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $3,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5408 (state medal of valor).

Sec. 105. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 111
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,751,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((2,170,000))

2,307,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,921,000))

4,058,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $328,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$760,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5931 (electronic filing and public access). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided shall lapse.

Sec. 106. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 112
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 14,043,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((8,399,000))

9,770,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 120,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,489,000))

5,876,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-Private/

Local Appropriation........................ $ ((4,123,000))

4,132,000

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 681,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((32,855,000))

34,622,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,355,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided solely
to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election
costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures.

(2) $3,780,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 ((is)) and
$1,621,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of
presidential preference primary election costs. For expenses payable in fiscal
year 2001, counties shall be reimbursed only for those actual presidential
preference primary election costs that the secretary of state validates as
eligible for reimbursement.

(3) $2,106,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($2,663,000))
$2,413,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely for the verification of initiative and referendum
petitions, maintenance of related voter registration records, and the
publication and distribution of the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(4) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $125,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW 29.27.072.

(5)(a) $1,870,350 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,907,757
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for continuing the contract with a nonprofit organization to
produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations
and other events of state-wide significance during the 1999-2001 biennium.

(b) The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this
subsection and adjusted to reflect the implicit price deflator for the previous
year. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or
commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to
forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state
may make full or partial payment once all criteria in (a) and (b) of this
subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(c) The nonprofit
organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial
statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success
of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any
amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or
indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the
state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision
of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of
any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making
contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any:
(A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a
public officer or employee.

(6) (($867,000))
$1,252,000 of the archives and records management account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central microfilming
bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).

(7) $120,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation is provided solely for the
Washington quality awards council.

(8) $20,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for the operations of the task force on archaeology and historic preservation.
The task force shall develop a single recommendation for consideration by the
legislature and the governor on the issue of the location of the office of
archaeology and historic preservation within state government. The recommended
location shall maximize the office of archaeology and historic preservation's
stature, visibility, accessibility, and delivery of service state-wide in the
context of its critical role as an important link among downtown and
neighborhood revitalization efforts, the cultural tourism movement, rural
economic development initiatives, and the preservation of the structures and
sites that still remain as the legacy of Washington's rich and diverse
heritage. The task force shall consider and include in its recommendation how
best both to realize the potential of the office of archaeology and historic
preservation to generate revenue from services it could provide in
international, national, state, local, and private venues and also how best to
achieve adequate funding from all funding sources to assure that the office of
archaeology and historic preservation can provide the best possible service to
the citizens of the state. There shall be eleven members of the task force as
follows: One member shall be the state historic preservation officer or his or
her designee; two members shall be representatives of state agencies; two
members shall be representatives of local governments; there shall be one
representative each from the Washington state historical society, the eastern
Washington state historical society, the Washington trust for historic
preservation, and Indian tribes; and two members shall be representatives of
the private sector who have experience in preservation of historic buildings or
archaeological sites or who have particular interest in the issue of
preservation of historic buildings and archaeological sites. The state
historic preservation officer shall be the chair of the task force. The task
force shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature and the
governor by January 1, 2001.

(9) $8,000 of the
fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely to
implement Senate Bill No. 5408 (state medal of valor).

Sec. 107. 1999 c 309 s 119
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON
ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 215,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((215,000))

221,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((430,000))

436,000

Sec. 108. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 114
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON
SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 67,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((128,000))

133,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((195,000))

200,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations and are
sufficient for the commission to: (1) Carry out statutorily required public
hearings; (2) enter into an agreement with the department of personnel to provide
data sharing, research support, and training for commission members and staff;
(3) employ part-time staff in fiscal year 2000 to respond to requests for
information; and (4) begin full-time staffing in September 2000 to allow for
orientation and training for commission members prior to the next salary
setting cycle. $25,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation
for fiscal year 2000 and $10,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for office rent for the
remainder of the biennium, increased AFRS and consolidated mail costs, general
administration consulting services, and unexpected commission meeting costs
related to litigation. Future funding for lease costs beyond the current
biennium shall be contingent upon the agency's colocation with another agency.

Sec. 109. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 115
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 4,079,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((4,557,000))

4,527,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,526,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,338,000

New Motor Vehicle
Arbitration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,109,000

Legal Services Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 118,390,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((131,999,000))

131,969,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney
general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and
actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The
report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days
after the end of each fiscal year.

(2) The attorney
general and the office of financial management shall modify the attorney
general billing system to meet the needs of user agencies for greater
predictability, timeliness, and explanation of how legal services are being
used by the agency. The attorney general shall provide the following
information each month to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The full-time
equivalent attorney services provided for the month; (b) the full-time
equivalent investigator services provided for the month; (c) the full-time
equivalent paralegal services provided for the month; and (d) direct legal
costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged to the agency for the month.

(3) $154,000 of the
fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and $308,000 of the
fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided solely
for the costs associated with the legal defense and implementation of initiative
measures ((No. 695)) approved by the voters in fiscal
years 2000 and 2001.

(4) $486,000 of the
legal services revolving account appropriation is provided solely to support
activities related to vulnerable adults. Such activities include providing
technical assistance for guardianships, financial exploitation cases,
protection orders, and providing assistance to police and prosecutors
addressing vulnerable adults.

(5) $200,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided
solely for costs associated with enforcing state authority on taxation of
liquor with respect to Resolution T-022-00, or any other tax or regulatory
ordinances regarding liquor, adopted by the Confederated Tribes and Bands of
the Yakama Nation.

Sec. 110. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 129
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST
COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 431,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((479,000))

490,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((910,000))

921,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $25,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $75,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely
for the implementation of House Bill No. 2344 (community supervision
caseloads).

Sec. 111. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 117
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 12,600,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((13,208,000))

13,350,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((23,340,000))

23,628,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((49,648,000))

50,078,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided solely
to evaluate and promote the use by state and local agencies of the training
facilities at the Hanford reservation.

(2) Funding in this
section provides for a feasibility study to collect Washington enrollment data
on distance learning programs sponsored by in-state and out-of-state private
institutions in cooperation with the higher education coordinating board and
the state board for community and technical colleges. Findings shall be
submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 2000.

(3) $75,000 of the
fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and $75,000 of the
fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided solely to
track and administer state and federal funding for salmon recovery allocated by
the salmon recovery funding board established under Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5595 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2079.

(4) The office of
financial management, in collaboration with the institutions of higher
education, the higher education coordinating board, and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall modify state information systems in
order to provide consistent data on students engaged in distance learning.
Higher education institutions shall provide enrollment information in support of
this effort. Reporting on the numbers and categories of students enrolled in
distance learning by class level and institutions shall begin by fall term,
2000. Washington independent institutions of higher education are encouraged
to participate in this process and to provide distance learner enrollment data.

(5) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation and $500,000 of the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation are provided solely for the commission on early learning.
One-half of the amount provided from the general fund‑-state shall not be
expended unless matched by an equal amount from private sources.

(6) $329,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal 2001 is provided solely to develop
a centralized database of social service contract information as recommended by
the task force on agency contracting services.

(7) $689,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for information
systems improvements at the department of fish and wildlife, including a
network upgrade, purchase of personal computers, and support for agency
information systems.

(8) $795,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
improvements in the basic business practices at the department of fish and
wildlife, including budget monitoring, cost accounting, time accounting and
payroll systems, and license revenue forecasting.

(9) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for the task force on health care reinsurance established by Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6067 (health insurance coverage). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $285,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely for
the office of financial management to adopt and publish uniform guidelines for
the effective and efficient management of personal service contracts and client
service contracts by all state agencies, conduct training on these guidelines
for agency personnel, and conduct risk-based audits of personal service and
client service contracts, as generally described in Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2738 (state agency personal service contract practices).

(a) The guidelines
shall, at a minimum, include: (i) Accounting methods, systems, measures, and
principles to be used by agencies and contractors; (ii) precontract procedures
for selecting potential contractors based on their qualifications and ability
to perform; (iii) incorporation of performance measures and measurable
benchmarks in contracts, and the use of performance audits; (iv) uniform
contract terms to ensure contract performance and compliance with state and
federal standards; (v) proper payment and reimbursement methods to ensure that
the state receives full value for taxpayer moneys, including cost settlements
and cost allowance; (vi) post-contract procedures, including methods for
recovering improperly spent or overspent moneys for disallowance and
adjustment; (vii) adequate contract remedies and sanctions to ensure
compliance; (viii) monitoring, fund tracking, risk assessment, and auditing
procedures and requirements; (ix) financial reporting, record retention, and
record access procedures and requirements; (x) procedures and criteria for
terminating contracts for cause or otherwise; and (xi) other subjects related
to effective and efficient contract management.

(b) The office of
financial management shall provide a training course for agency personnel
responsible for executing and managing personal service contracts and client
service contracts. The course must contain training on effective and efficient
contract management under the guidelines established under this subsection.

(c) The office of
financial management shall conduct risk-based audits of the contracting
practices associated with individual personal service and client service
contracts from multiple state agencies to ensure compliance with the guidelines
established in this subsection. The office of financial management shall
forward the results of the audits conducted under this subsection to the
governor, the appropriate standing committees of the legislature, and the joint
legislative audit and review committee.

(11) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for a review of K-12 regional cost differences. The office of financial management
shall conduct research, including a review of existing methods of determining
regional cost differences. Regional cost differences shall include, but not be
limited to, the cost of renting, leasing, or purchasing housing. The office of
financial management shall report findings on cost differences on a regional
basis and make recommendations on options for mitigating these differences to
the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and senate by
December 15, 2000.

(12) $243,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for an audit of the state ferry capital program. The audit of ferry capital
operations shall determine the following: Whether the ferry system is
acquiring, protecting, and using its resources economically and efficiently;
the causes of inefficiencies or uneconomical practices; and whether the ferry
system has complied with laws and regulations governing economy and
efficiency. This audit shall build on audits performed by, or under the
direction of, the joint legislative audit and review committee on ferry capital
operations. In establishing the scope of this audit, the director of financial
management shall solicit public comments from interested parties and benchmark
the state ferry capital operations to other public and private ferry capital
operations. To address the intent of this subsection, the director may
contract for specialized expertise. The audit report shall be delivered on or
before January 1, 2001, to the governor and to the fiscal committees of the
state legislature.

Sec. 112. 1999 c 309 s 130
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((20,749,000))

20,880,000

Sec. 113. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 118
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,999,000

Higher Education Personnel
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,640,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,639,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall reduce its charge for personnel services to the lowest rate possible.

(2) The department of
personnel service account appropriation contains sufficient funds to continue
the employee exchange program with the Hyogo prefecture in Japan.

(3) $515,000 of the department
of personnel service account appropriation is provided solely for the
development and implementation of a new employment application processing
system to: Provide for electronic applications via the internet, provide
continuous application acceptance, provide increased public access to job
openings, allow for single applications for multiple jobs, and provide for
scanning of larger applicant databases as job openings arise.

(4) $190,000 of the
department of personnel service account appropriation is provided solely for
the expansion of the executive fellowship program.

(5) $108,000 of the
department of personnel service account appropriation is provided solely for
increased funding of the administrative expenses of the combined fund drive.

(6) $52,000 of the
department of personnel service account appropriation is provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 5432 (retiree charitable deductions). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(7) The department of
personnel has the authority to charge agencies for expenses associated with
converting its payroll/personnel computer system to accommodate the year 2000
date change and to implement plan 3 of the public employees' retirement
system. Funding to cover these expenses shall be realized from the agency
FICA savings associated with the pretax benefits contributions plan.

Sec. 114. 1999 c 309 s 133
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC
AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 216,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((225,000))

234,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((441,000))

450,000

Sec. 115. 1999 c 309 s 134
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMISSION ON
AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 190,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((188,000))

197,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((378,000))

387,000

Sec. 116. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 119
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-OPERATIONS

Dependent Care
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 361,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((44,608,000))

44,662,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((44,969,000))

45,023,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $92,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (Washington state patrol
surviving spouse retirement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) $259,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1024 (retirement system option).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3) $55,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (investment board fund
values). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $22,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5432 (PERS retiree charitable deductions).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(5) $50,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the department to prepare and distribute to state employees
information about options under the federal tax code for tax-advantaged
retirement savings.

(6) $3,731,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for the information systems project known as the electronic document
image management system. Authority to expend this amount is conditioned on
compliance with section 902 of this act.

(7) The department
shall adjust the retirement systems administrative rate during the 1999-2001
biennium as necessary to provide for law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system employer funding for a study of LEOFF plan 1
medical liabilities by the office of the state actuary.

(8) $293,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2604 (survivor options). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(9) $2,879,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6530 (pension
enhancements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $480,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for increased charges for services provided by the department of
information systems. The two departments shall submit a report on the causes
of the increased charges to the office of financial management no later than
September 1, 2000.

Sec. 117. 1999 c 309 s 138
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 69,998,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((68,171,000))

67,156,000

Timber Tax Distribution
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,893,000

Waste
Education/Recycling/Litter Control‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 101,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 67,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((143,244,000))

142,229,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of revenue shall conduct a study and prepare a report of current
state and local taxation of the electricity industry and options for changes to
avoid revenue loss, promote competitive neutrality, and encourage economic
development within the electricity industry. The study shall include an
analysis of the following: (1) Current state and local taxation of the
wholesale and retail electricity industry, including tax incidence, rate, base,
collection, and allocation of taxes; (2) trends in the wholesale and retail
electricity markets affecting current and future revenue streams, including
power imports and exports by in-state and out-of-state suppliers; (3) The
extent to which existing state and local tax laws may be insufficient to
protect revenue streams in light of identifiable wholesale and retail market
changes; and (4) whether the tax code is adequate to fairly tax new participants
in the market such as brokers, marketers, aggregators, and traders. The
department shall conduct the study with support from the utilities and
transportation commission, the energy division of the department of community,
trade, and economic development, and the state auditor. The department shall
consult with energy utilities, retail electric customers, local governments,
independent power producers, brokers, marketers, traders, other interested
parties, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees of the
senate and the house of representatives with jurisdiction over electricity
issues periodically throughout the course of the study, and shall submit its
report to the legislature and the governor by December 1, 1999.

Sec. 118. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 124
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,293,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((1,284,000))

1,526,000

Liquor Control Board
Construction and Maintenance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((9,998,000))

12,883,000

Liquor Revolving Account‑-State
Appropriation... $........................................... ((129,422,000))

130,313,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((141,997,000))

146,015,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,804,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the agency
information technology upgrade. This amount provided in this subsection is
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

(2) $105,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5712 (motel liquor
licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $300,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the board to
develop a business plan. The board shall provide copies of the plan to the
office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 30, 1999.

(4) $1,985,000 of the
liquor control board construction and maintenance account appropriation is
provided solely for the operation of the temporary distribution center.

(5) $53,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely to train new
enforcement agents. In cooperation with the board, the criminal justice
training commission shall establish a training curriculum that is appropriate
for liquor enforcement officers. Nothing in this subsection makes liquor
officers eligible for membership in the law enforcement and fire fighters'
pension systems.

(6) $2,885,000 of
the liquor control board construction and maintenance account appropriation is
provided solely for mandatory redemption of certificates of participation used
to finance the distribution center and material handling system.

Sec. 119. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 126
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 10,889,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((8,344,000))

11,648,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((22,148,000))

22,192,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 238,000

Enhanced 911 Account‑-State
Appropriation...... $ ((19,507,000))

16,607,000

Disaster Response Account‑-State
Appropriation. $ ((10,157,000))

12,226,000

Disaster Response Account‑-Federal
Appropriation $ ((46,699,000))

42,566,000

Worker and Community Right
to Know Fund‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 285,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((118,267,000))

116,651,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,470,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 ((is)) and
$3,227,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for deposit in the disaster response account to cover
costs pursuant to section 402(9) of this act and subsection (2) of this
section.

(2) (($9,855,000))
$8,787,000 of the disaster response account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for the state share of response and recovery costs
associated with federal emergency management agency (FEMA) disaster 1079
(November/December 1995 storms), FEMA disaster 1100 (February 1996 floods),
FEMA disaster 1152 (November 1996 ice storm), FEMA disaster 1159 (December 1996
holiday storm), FEMA disaster 1172 (March 1997 floods), FEMA disaster 1252
(1998 northeast counties floods), and FEMA disaster 1255 (Kelso landslide).
The military department may, upon approval of the director of the office of financial
management, use portions of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation to offset costs of new disasters occurring before June 30, 2001.
The military department is to submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the house of representatives
and senate detailing disaster costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs;
(b) incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual expenditures;
(d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and (d) estimates of future
payments by biennium. This information is to be displayed by individual
disaster, by fund, and by type of assistance.

(3) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter
28B.103 RCW.

(4) $35,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $35,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided solely
for the north county emergency medical service.

(5) $302,000 of the
disaster response account--state appropriation is provided solely for the costs
of activating the national guard during the world trade organization conference
in Seattle.

(6)
$4,003,000 of the disaster response account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for fire mobilization costs.

(End
of part)

PART
II

HUMAN SERVICES

Sec. 201. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 201
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services
shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment
modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this
act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for
other than that purpose, except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the
office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees.
As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes
block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3)(a) The
appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified herein.
However, after May 1, 2000, unless specifically prohibited by this act, the
department may transfer general fund‑‑state appropriations for fiscal
year 2000 among programs after approval by the director of financial
management. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(b) After May 1,
2001, after approval by the director of financial management and unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer moneys among
programs, including federal moneys that are provided solely for a specified
purpose. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in subsection
(3)(d) of this section.

(c) To the
extent that transfers under subsection (3)(a) of this section are insufficient
to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2000 caseload forecasts
and utilization assumptions in the medical assistance, long‑term care,
foster care, adoption support, voluntary placement, and child support programs,
the department may transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a
specified purpose after approval by the director of financial management.

(((c))) (d)
To the extent that transfers under subsection (3)(b) of this section are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2001 caseload
forecasts and utilization assumptions in the medical assistance, long-term
care, foster care, adoption support, and child support programs, the department
may transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose
after approval by the director of financial management.

(e) The director
of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any allotment
modifications.

Sec. 202. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 202
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 196,694,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((214,000,000))

210,463,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((355,146,000))

354,027,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,194,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 457,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((770,891,000))

766,235,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $594,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,964,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $195,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 5557 (the HOPE
act) or sections 10 through 29 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1493. If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1999, the funds shall be provided
for:

(a) The department to
contract for 10 temporary residential placements, for up to 30 days, for street
youth by June 30, 2000, and for 29 temporary residential placements for street
youth by June 30, 2001. These street youth ((shall be sixteen to
eighteen years old who are dependents of the state, and)) are persons
under the age of eighteen who live outdoors or in other unsafe
locations not intended for occupancy by a minor((, and whose permanency plan
of care does not include return to home or family reunification. The
department shall contact the missing children's clearinghouse regarding these
youth. The department may approve placements for fourteen and fifteen-year
olds who also meet these criteria. Youth who receive these placements may
receive one or more of the following services: Educational services,
vocational training, job readiness assistance, job search assistance, chemical
dependency treatment, and counseling)) and who are not residing with a
parent or at their legally authorized residence; and

(b) For the department
to contract for 10 residential placements for dependent youth by June 30, 2000,
and for 29 residential placements for youth by June 30, 2001. These youth
shall be aged sixteen through eighteen who live outdoors or in unsafe locations
not intended for occupancy by a minor, and whose permanency plan does not
include return to home or family reunification. These placements may be
available to youth up to eighteen years of age. Youth who receive these
placements shall receive training related to one or more of the following:
Basic education, employment, money management and other skills that will assist
the youth in developing independent living skills.

(2) $2,191,000 of the fiscal
year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation, $2,191,000 of the fiscal
year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $1,540,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the category
of services titled "intensive family preservation services." The
reduction in funds assumed in this section is intended to realign the
appropriation with actual service levels and expenditures and is not intended
to reduce the current level of intensive family preservation services across
the state.

(3) $670,925 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $670,925 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided to
contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care facility. The
facility shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two
years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must
be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or
foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to parents accepting placement of children from the
facility. The facility may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents
for infants served by the facility. The department shall not require case
management as a condition of the contract.

(4) $513,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $513,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided for up to
three nonfacility-based programs for the training, consultation, support, and
recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive parents of children through age
three in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers,
except that each program may serve up to three medically fragile
nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs,
preference shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing pediatric
interim care program.

(5) $140,000 of the
fiscal year 2001 state general fund appropriation is provided solely for the
department to establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number and an
electronic on-line system for communication of information regarding child
day-care centers and family day-care providers. This number shall be available
during standard business hours, and during nonbusiness hours callers shall be
able to leave messages. The number shall be published in reasonably available
printed and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a
method that callers may use to determine whether a day-care provider is
licensed, determine whether a day-care provider is in good standing regarding
licensing requirements, determine the general nature of enforcement actions
against the provider, obtain information on how to report suspected or observed
noncompliance with licensing requirements, obtain information on how to report
health, safety, and welfare concerns, receive follow-up assistance including
information on the office of the family and children's ombudsman, and receive
referral information on other agencies or entities that may be of further
assistance to the caller. Upon request, the department shall disclose the
receipt, general nature, current status and resolution of all complaints on
record with the department after the effective date of this section against a
child day-care center or family day-care provider that result in an enforcement
action. The department shall make available to the public during business
hours all inspection reports and notices of enforcement actions involving child
day-care centers and family day-care providers consistent with chapter 42.17
RCW. The department shall include in the inspection report a statement of the
corrective measures taken by the center or provider.

(6) $2,311,000 of the
fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation, $2,370,000 of the
fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $4,182,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely for the family policy council and community public health and safety
networks.

(7) $90,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $91,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $64,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to implement
Substitute House Bill No. 1619 (foster parent reimbursements). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(8) $121,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $101,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $80,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1668 (foster parent training). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(9) $213,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $93,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $78,000 of
the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are provided solely to
implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1692 or sections 1 through 7 of
Senate Bill No. 5127 (child abuse investigations). If neither of these bills
is enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(10) $348,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for the department
to determine the character of persons who have unsupervised access to children
in care, including exempt child care providers defined in RCW 74.15.020,
through a conviction record and pending charges check at the Washington state
patrol, in order to authorize payment for care. If a check through the
Washington state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has been
completed within the preceding year of the department's request, the department
may rely upon the previous check for persons who confirm no offenses have been
committed within the last year. Further, the appropriation is provided to the
department to implement a waiver process and administrative hearing review
process for exempt child care providers whose background check may otherwise
disqualify them. This subsection does not establish any obligation, duty, or
cause of action.

(11) $457,000 of the
public safety and education account is provided to train service providers in
serving and advocating for domestic violence victims with disabilities, monitor
batterer treatment programs for compliance with certification standards, fund
domestic violence services to underserved populations, and support the fatality
review process.

(12) $2,214,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and $686,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for an
increase in the combined adoption support and foster care caseloads. Of the
amounts provided in this subsection, $1,107,000 shall not be expended if the
total expenditures for these programs or per capita expenditures for fiscal
year 2000 or for the first quarter of fiscal year 2001 for any portion of these
caseloads exceed the November 1999 expenditure forecast and the department does
not provide a detailed report comparing the forecasted and actual expenditures
per case by rate payment category and the reasons for each overexpenditure by
December 1, 2000, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature.

(13) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for allocation, without deduction for administrative costs by the department,
to the educational institute for rural families to ensure continued seasonal
child care in region two of the department. These funds are not intended to
supplant the contracted rate of reimbursement or the total reimbursement for
the provision of seasonal child care by this provider.

(14) $174,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for a foster parent retention pilot program. This program will be directed at
foster parents caring for children who act out sexually, as described in House
Bill No. 2709 (foster parent retention program).

(15) The amounts
provided in this section are sufficient to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6400 (domestic violence).

Sec. 203. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 203
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 35,379,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((38,283,000))

35,408,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((9,732,000))

9,884,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 380,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,548,000

Public Safety and Education
Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,700,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((20,977,000))

19,871,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((121,999,000))

118,170,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $666,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs
to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this
subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b) $5,742,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide
funding for county impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338,
Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(c) $1,161,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,162,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, $5,000,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation, and $177,000 of
the juvenile accountability incentive account‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant
to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this
subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.

(d) $2,419,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally
committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award
these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the
provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall
assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(e) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with the
institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions).

(f) The juvenile
rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the juvenile court
administrators, may agree on a formula to allow the transfer of funds among
amounts appropriated for consolidated juvenile services, community juvenile
accountability act grants, the chemically dependent disposition alternative,
and the special sex offender disposition alternative.

(g) $75,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for a contract for expanded services of the teamchild project.

(h) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided solely
for the Skagit county delinquency prevention project.

(i) $350,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $735,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, $229,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, and $673,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to
increase payment rates for contracted service providers. It is the
legislature's intent that these amounts be used primarily to increase
compensation for persons employed in direct, front‑line service delivery.

(j) No later than
January 1, 2001, the Washington state institute for public policy shall report
to the legislature on the outcomes of low and moderate risk juvenile
rehabilitation administration offenders who were released without supervision
compared to those who were released with supervision. The study shall compare
both the recidivism rates as well as the nature of any new criminal offenses
each group commits. The legislature shall consider the results of this study
in making any decision to continue or revise parole services for this group of
offenders.

(k) $16,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $16,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (firearms on school
property). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse. The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 and shall be distributed to
counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services (CJS)
formula.

(l) $3,440,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $3,441,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the
costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth
petitions. The department shall not retain any portion of these funds to cover
administrative or any other departmental costs. The department, in conjunction
with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding
distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher
than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with
lower than average per-petition processing costs.

(m) $6,000,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the
costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth
petitions. To the extent that distributions made under (l) and (m) of this
subsection and pursuant to section 801 of this act exceed actual costs of
processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions,
the department, in consultation with the respective juvenile court
administrator and the county, may approve expenditure of funds provided in this
subsection on other costs of the civil or criminal justice system. When this
occurs, the department shall notify the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees. The department shall not retain any portion of
these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental costs. The
department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall
develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither
reward counties with higher than average per petition processing costs nor
shall it penalize counties with lower than average per petition processing
costs.

(n) $4,700,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
distribution to counties pursuant to stipulation and agreed-to order of
dismissal in Thurston county superior court case number 98-2-02458. The
department shall not retain any portion of these funds to cover administrative
or any other departmental costs.

(o) The distributions
made under (l), (m), and (n) of this subsection and distributions from the
county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this
act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or
increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(p) Each quarter during
the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions
processed and the total actual costs of processing the petitions in each of the
following categories: Truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk
youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no later than 45
days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward this
information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(q) $31,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for the evaluation of the juvenile offender co-occurring disorder pilot
program implemented pursuant to section 204 of this 2000 act.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 46,815,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((48,061,000))

44,022,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 740,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((15,282,000))

14,645,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((110,898,000))

106,222,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$37,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$74,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted service providers. It
is the legislature's intent that these amounts be used primarily to increase
compensation for persons employed in direct, front‑line service delivery.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,419,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,421,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 317,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,100,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,678,000

Sec. 204. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 205
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY
SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 165,723,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((179,190,000))

184,775,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((305,644,000))

311,421,000

General Fund‑-Local
Appropriation.............. $ 1,827,000

Health Services Account
Appropriation.......... $ 1,225,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((653,609,000))

664,971,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Regional support
networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
implementation of working agreements with the vocational rehabilitation program
which will maximize the use of federal funding for vocational programs.

(b) From the general
fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the secretary of social
and health services shall assure that regional support networks reimburse the
aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state cost of
medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c) $711,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $757,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely to directly reimburse eligible providers for the medicaid share of
mental health services provided to persons eligible for both medicaid and medicare.

(d) $64,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for regional support networks to participate in prerelease treatment
planning and to conduct involuntary commitment evaluations, as required by
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 (mentally ill offenders). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(e) $5,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $466,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for case management and other community support services, as authorized
by Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 (mentally ill offenders). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(f) Within funds
appropriated in this subsection, the department shall contract with the Clark
county regional support network for development and operation of a pilot
project demonstrating new and collaborative methods for providing intensive
mental health services in the school setting for severely emotionally disturbed
children who are medicaid eligible. Project services are to be delivered by
teachers and teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the
supervision of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of WAC
275-57. The department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional
support network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable
costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit specified for
the regional support network in the department's medicaid waiver agreement with
the federal government. The regional support network shall provide the
department with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and
outcomes; (ii) protocols, guidelines, and handbooks suitable for use by other
school districts and regional support networks seeking to replicate the pilot
project's approach; and (iii) intergovernmental transfer equal to the state
share of the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.

(g) $47,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $47,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (firearms on school
premises). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided
shall lapse.

(h) The general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 includes $1,891,000 to replace
federal funding for outpatient services which is no longer available due to the
reduction in the federal medical assistance percentage. The department shall
distribute these additional state funds among the regional support networks
according to each regional support network's capitation rate by eligibility
category.

(i) The appropriations
in this subsection include an increase in funding for medicaid outpatient
services as a result of the forecasted increase in the number of persons
eligible for medicaid over the number previously budgeted. The department
shall distribute these additional appropriations among the regional support
networks according to each regional support network's capitation rate by
eligibility category.

(j) The health services
account appropriation is provided solely for implementation of strategies which
the department and the affected regional support networks conclude will best
assure continued availability of community-based inpatient psychiatric services
in all areas of the state. Such strategies may include, but are not limited
to, emergency contracts for continued operation of inpatient facilities
otherwise at risk of closure because of demonstrated, disproportionate
uncompensated care; start-up grants for development of evaluation and treatment
facilities; and increases in the rate paid for inpatient psychiatric services
for medically indigent and/or general assistance for the unemployed patients.
The funds provided in this subsection must be: (i)(A) Prioritized for use in
those areas of the state which are at greatest risk of lacking sufficient
inpatient psychiatric treatment capacity; (B) prioritized for use by those
hospitals which do not receive low-income disproportionate share hospital
payments as of the date of application for funding; (C) matched on a
one-quarter local, three-quarters state basis by funding from the regional
support network or networks in the area in which the funds are expended; and
(D) used to support strategies which can be sustained during the 2001-03
biennium at a state cost no more than 100 percent greater than the amount
provided in this subsection. ((Payments from the amount provided in this
subsection shall not be made to any provider that has not agreed: (ii)(A)
That, except for prospective rate increases, the payment shall offset, on a
dollar-for-dollar basis, any liability that may be established against the
state for the rate of state reimbursement for inpatient psychiatric care; and
(B) that the provider will maintain or enhance its inpatient psychiatric
treatment capacity throughout the period ending June 30, 2001, or for the
duration of the funding, whichever is later.)) The funds provided in this
subsection shall not be considered "available resources" as defined
in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject to the distribution formula established
pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(k) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2663 (atypical antipsychotic
medications). If Substitute House Bill No. 2663 is not enacted by June 30,
2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Prior to
implementing the projects established in the bill, the department shall report
to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on proposed
medication delivery and monitoring systems and arrangements for obtaining
manufacturer discounts or rebates. No more than $175,000 of the funds provided
in this subsection may be used for state and contractor start-up, evaluation,
and administration of the projects, and no more than $100,000 of that amount
may be for ongoing costs which continue beyond fiscal year 2001. The
department may transfer and allot the state component of such administrative costs
to its mental health program support subprogram. The funds provided in this
subsection shall not be considered "available resources" as defined
in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject to the distribution formula established
pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 69,797,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((72,279,000))

71,919,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((141,129,000))

140,780,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 29,809,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((313,014,000))

312,305,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state mental
hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and
supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is
cost-effective to do so.

(b) The mental health
program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor provided by the
Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c) The department
shall use general fund‑-local appropriations in this subsection to
establish a third-party revenue incentive pool, which shall be used for
staff-initiated projects which will increase the quality of care at the state
hospitals. For fiscal year 2000, the incentive pool shall be (i) the first
$200,000 by which revenues from third-party payers exceed $28,000,000; and (ii)
fifty percent of any amounts beyond $28,200,000, up to a maximum of $500,000.
For fiscal year 2001, the incentive pool shall be (iii) the first $350,000 by
which third-party revenues exceed $28,480,000; and (iv) fifty percent of any
amounts beyond $28,830,000, up to a maximum of $700,000. For purposes of this
subsection, "third-party revenues" does not include disproportionate
share hospital payments or the federal share of salaries and benefit
allocations. The department may establish separate incentive pools for each
hospital. The department may also divide the annual revenue target into
quarterly goals, and make funds available from the incentive pool on a
quarterly basis.

(d) $444,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,866,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, $196,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation, and $157,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation are provided for improved, more specialized
care for persons with developmental disabilities during their treatment for a
psychiatric illness at the state hospitals.

(e) By March 1, 2001,
the department shall modify the treatment approach on at least two state
hospital wards to more cost-effective models of care. The models shall place
greater emphasis upon community transition, or upon long-term support, than
upon intensive psychiatric rehabilitation for residents for whom such an
alternative model of care is determined appropriate by their treatment team.
The alternative treatment approaches may include closure of a ward and use of
hospital staff to provide transitional community services, in coordination with
the regional support networks.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 10,895,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((11,940,000))

13,275,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 14,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((36,835,000))

38,170,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department
shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 1999, on
plans for increasing the efficiency of staffing patterns at the civil
commitment center sufficiently to operate within authorized staffing and
expenditure levels.

(b) The violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the state building and construction account for design and
construction of a new special commitment center facility (capital project
00-2-001). These funds shall not be transferred for other purposes as
otherwise provided in section 201(3)(b) of this act. The amount provided in
this subsection is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 and 903 of chapter 379, Laws of 1999. In accordance with section
909 of chapter 379, Laws of 1999, the department of corrections is responsible
for project management.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 444,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 443,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,169,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,612,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((2,706,000))

2,688,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,227,000))

3,220,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((8,545,000))

8,520,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) By December 1,
1999, the department shall provide the fiscal committees of the legislature
with an independent assessment of options for increasing the efficiency and
effectiveness of current systems and organizational structures for billing
third-party payers for hospital services.

(b) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $120,000 of
the general fund federal appropriation are provided solely for the institute
for public policy to evaluate the impacts of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011
(mentally ill offenders), and of chapter 297, Laws of 1998 (commitment of
mentally ill persons). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, one-half of each of these amounts shall lapse.

Sec. 205. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 206
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 185,473,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((205,593,000))

212,352,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((325,535,000))

326,295,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 262,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((716,863,000))

724,382,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The health services
account appropriation and $127,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who
are employed through state contracts for twenty hours per week or more.
Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made only
to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage
either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan with
substantially equivalent benefits.

(b) $3,100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $4,650,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $8,250,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
services and supports for people with developmental disabilities. These funds
shall be expended in accordance with priorities established by the stakeholder
advisory group established in accordance with chapter 216, Laws of 1998
(developmental disabilities), except that (i) at least 50 percent of these
amounts must be used to increase the number of people receiving residential,
employment, family support, or other direct services; (ii) the services and supports
must be designed and implemented such that the cost of continuing them in the
2001-03 biennium does not exceed $19.2 million, of which no more than $9.3
million is from state funds; and (iii) strong consideration shall be given to
the need for increased wages for direct care workers in contracted residential
programs.

(c) $413,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,172,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $694,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
employment, or other day activities and training programs, for young people who
complete their high school curriculum in 1999 or 2000.

(d) $1,919,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $6,673,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $7,361,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to improve
services for persons with developmental disabilities who would otherwise be at
risk of needing involuntary commitment to or prolonged treatment at state
psychiatric hospitals. The department shall use these funds to enhance the
community crisis response system managed by regional support networks, improve
crisis prevention and stabilization services through the developmental
disabilities community services system, and expand community residential
capacity for persons with developmental disabilities who are ready for
discharge from state psychiatric hospitals. Funding for community residential capacity
is sufficient to move a biennium total of 48 patients out of the state
hospitals at a reasonable pace by June 30, 2001. The department shall manage
the intensity of services provided so that the average cost per day does not
exceed $300 per person placed in this expanded community residential capacity.
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
progress towards implementing this subsection after each calendar quarter. The
legislature finds that, in addition to the appropriations in this subsection
for improvements in services to persons with developmental disabilities who are
committed to the custody of the secretary under chapter 71.05 RCW, it is
necessary to study long-term treatment alternatives and their legal, fiscal,
and policy implications. Therefore, the department shall provide a report to
the ways and means committee of the senate and the appropriations committee of
the house of representatives by December 1, 2000, containing options and
recommendations for secure treatment programs. The report shall identify
various treatment models that could be implemented and various types and
locations of secure facilities, both state-owned and leased, in which programs
could be sited, together with the department's recommendations. The report
shall evaluate the potential for siting such programs on the grounds of
existing state residential habilitation centers. The report shall also include
analysis of advantages and disadvantages associated with contracting for some
or all of the new program options identified. The report shall evaluate the
options based on short-term and long-term costs, client and community security,
efficiency of coordination with other service delivery systems, and how they
address specific legal issues. In developing this report, the department shall
invite participation by representatives of the Washington protection and
advocacy system (WPAS), and shall include in the report WPAS' position on
options and recommendations submitted by the department and any additional
recommendations made by WPAS. The legislature recognizes a need to improve
long-term services provided to individuals with developmental disabilities who
are undergoing involuntary treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW. The legislature
is committed to providing resources necessary to address issues in the U.S.
District Court case of Allen v. Western State Hospital.

(e) $513,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,421,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $2,033,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided to develop and
operate secure residential and day program placements for persons who seem
likely to pose a significant risk to the public safety if their current
residential arrangement were to continue.

(f) $209,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $664,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $939,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided to increase wages as
required by Initiative No. 688 (state minimum wage) for contracted adult family
homes, adult residential care facilities, hourly and daily family support
providers, and hourly attendant care providers.

(g) $1,978,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $4,475,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $6,989,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
compensation for individual and agency home care workers. Payments to
individual providers are to be increased from $6.18 per hour to $6.68 per hour
on July 1, 1999, and to $7.18 per hour on July 1, 2000. Payments to agency
providers are to be increased to $11.97 per hour on July 1, 1999, and to $12.62
per hour on July 1, 2000. All but 14 cents per hour of the July 1, 1999,
increase to agency providers, and all but 15 cents per hour of the additional
July 1, 2000, increase is to be used to increase wages for direct care
workers. The appropriations in this subsection also include the funds needed
for the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes on the amount
of the increase.

(h) Within amounts
appropriated in this subsection, the developmental disabilities program shall
contract for a pilot program to test an alternative service delivery model for
persons with autism. The department must use a competitive process to
determine the site of the pilot. The pilot program must be time-limited and
subject to an evaluation of client outcomes to determine the effectiveness and
efficiency of the pilot program compared to the standard service model for
persons with autism.

(i) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and $160,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for increased
family support services and related case management support.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 66,076,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((67,478,000))

66,904,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((146,482,000))

145,834,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 10,227,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((290,263,000))

289,041,000

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,431,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,435,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,946,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,007,000

Sec. 206. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 207
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 446,025,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((475,043,000))

476,865,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((979,301,000))

977,019,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 3,910,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((2,104,000))

3,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,906,383,000))

1,906,986,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire health
services account appropriation, (($2,118,000)) $4,756,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, $923,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, and (($958,000)) $1,019,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for health care benefits for home care workers who are employed
through state contracts for at least twenty hours per week. Premium payments
for individual provider home care workers shall be made only to the subsidized
basic health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage either through the
basic health plan or through an alternative plan with substantially equivalent
benefits.

(2) $1,640,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,640,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, plus the
associated vendor rate increase for each year, are provided solely for
operation of the volunteer chore services program.

(3) For purposes of
implementing Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1484 (nursing home
payment rates), the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for fiscal
year 2000 shall be no more than $10.85 for the capital portion of the rate and
no more than $108.20 for the noncapital portion of the rate. For fiscal year
2001, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall be no more than
$11.44 for the capital portion of the rate and no more than (($111.21)) $111.64
for the noncapital portion of the rate. These rates include vendor rate
increases, but exclude nurse's aide training.

(4) In addition to the
rates set forth in subsection (3), $286,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $310,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for supplemental rate adjustments for certain
nursing facilities. In accordance with RCW 74.46.431, the department shall use
these funds to apply an additional economic trends and conditions adjustment
factor to the rate of any facility whose total rate allocation would otherwise
be less than its April 1, 1999, total rate, adjusted for case-mix changes.
This supplemental adjustment factor shall be the percentage by which the
facility's April 1, 1999, rate would otherwise exceed the rate calculated in
accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW and subsection (3) of this section, except
that (a) no adjustment shall be provided for any amounts by which a facility's
rate is lower due to a reduction in its facility-average medicaid case-mix
score; and (b) the adjustment factor shall be reduced proportionately for all
facilities by the percentage by which total supplemental payments would
otherwise exceed the funds provided for such payments in this subsection. This
subsection applies only to rates paid for services provided between July 1,
1999, and March 31, 2000.

(5) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely
for payments to any nursing facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW which
meets all of the following criteria: (a) The nursing home entered into an
arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1, 1980; (b) the
lessee purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980; and (c) the
lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home after
January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided pursuant to
this subsection shall not be subject to the settlement, audit, or rate-setting
requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(6) Funds are
appropriated in this section to increase compensation for individual and for
agency home care providers. Payments to individual home care providers are to
be increased from $6.18 per hour to $6.68 per hour on July 1, 1999, and to
$7.18 per hour on July 1, 2000. Payments to agency providers are to increase
to $11.97 per hour on July 1, 1999, and to $12.62 per hour on July 1, 2000.
All but 14 cents per hour of the July 1, 1999, increase to agency providers,
and all but 15 cents per hour of the additional July 1, 2000, increase is to be
used to increase wages for direct care workers. The appropriations in this
subsection also include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment
and social security taxes on the amount of the increase.

(7) $200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $280,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
enhancement and integration of existing management information systems to (a)
provide data at the local office level on service utilization, costs, and
recipient characteristics; and (b) reduce the staff time devoted to data entry.

(8) The department of
social and health services shall provide access and choice to consumers of
adult day health services for the purposes of nursing services, physical
therapy, occupational therapy, and psychosocial therapy. Adult day health
services shall not be considered a duplication of services for persons
receiving care in long-term care settings licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36,
or 70.128 RCW.

(9) $1,452,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,528,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $2,980,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 (in-home care
services). If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 is not enacted by June 30,
1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $610,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2454 (caregiver support). If
Substitute House Bill No. 2454 is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) $8,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $131,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $139,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2637 (background checks). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 207. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 208
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 427,742,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((410,913,000))

421,371,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,229,774,000))

1,226,044,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 30,807,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,099,236,000))

2,105,964,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $284,083,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $268,114,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$1,140,342,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and
$28,371,000 of the general fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely
for the WorkFirst program and child support operations. WorkFirst expenditures
include TANF grants, diversion services, subsidized child care, employment and
training, other WorkFirst related services, allocated field services operating
costs, and allocated economic services program administrative costs. Within
the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall:

(a) Continue to
implement WorkFirst program improvements that are designed to achieve progress
against outcome measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures
of job retention and wage progression shall be developed and reported quarterly
to appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who
leave assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. An increased
attention to job retention and wage progression is necessary to emphasize the
legislature's goal that the WorkFirst program succeed in helping recipients
gain long-term economic independence and not cycle on and off public
assistance. The wage progression measure shall report the median percentage
increase in quarterly earnings and hourly wage after 12 months, 24 months, and
36 months. The wage progression report shall also report the percent with
earnings above one hundred percent and two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level. The report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with
similar workers who did not participate in WorkFirst. The department shall
also report percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance
for needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months.

(b) Develop
informational materials that educate families about the difference between cash
assistance and work support benefits. These materials must explain, among
other facts, that the benefits are designed to support their employment, that
there are no time limits on the receipts of work support benefits, and that
immigration or residency status will not be affected by the receipt of
benefits. These materials shall be posted in all community service offices and
distributed to families. Materials must be available in multiple languages.
When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy families program,
receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a temporary assistance for
needy families application, the department of social and health services shall
educate them about the difference between cash assistance and work support
benefits and offering them the opportunity to begin or to continue receiving
work support benefits, so long as they are eligible. The department shall
provide this information through in-person interviews, over the telephone,
and/or through the mail. Work support benefits include food stamps, medicaid
for all family members, medicaid or state children's health insurance program
for children, and child care assistance. The department shall report annually
to the legislature the number of families who have had exit interviews, been
reached successfully by phone, and sent mail. The report shall also include
the percentage of families who elect to continue each of the benefits and the
percentage found ineligible by each substantive reason code. A substantive
reason code shall not be "other." The report shall identify barriers
to informing families about work support benefits and describe existing and
future actions to overcome such barriers.

(c) Provide $500,000
from the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$500,000 from the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
for continuation of the WorkFirst evaluation conducted by the joint legislative
audit and review committee.

(d) Report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, by December 1, 2000, how the new
federal child support incentive system can be used to maximize federal
incentive payments and to support the greatest achievement of WorkFirst program
goals. In the event that the department earns federal child support incentive
payments in excess of amounts budgeted, the department shall use one-half of
those additional funds to offset general fund‑-state allotments and
one-half of those additional funds to improve child support services. The
department shall also work with the Washington state association of county
clerks to identify ways to protect the confidentiality of social security
numbers on court documents needed by the child support enforcement system while
ensuring the reliability of this information without significantly increasing
the cost to administer the child support system. The department shall report its
recommendations for protecting the confidentiality of social security numbers
to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000.

(e) Provide up to
$500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation to the office of
financial management for a study of rate setting methods and policy for
subsidized child care, the best method for coordinating and consolidating child
care and early education programs currently funded by state government, and for
a review of the various state programs for low-income families with children.
The child care rate study shall analyze the effects of rate setting policy on
the affordability and quality of the overall child care market. The child care
and early education program study shall evaluate how current programs may be
coordinated and consolidated to provide the most efficient level of
administration, grant funding, and increased accessibility by families who are
served by these programs. The study of state programs for low-income families
shall compare and contrast eligibility and access to these programs and
identify ways to coordinate or consolidate these programs to reduce
administrative costs and improve access. The office shall submit a report to
the department of social and health services and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2000.

(f) Convene a working
group that includes stakeholders and recipients of public assistance to
establish basic customer service performance measures and goals. The customer
service measures and goals will seek to make support for working families a
priority. Customer service measures and goals may include, but are not limited
to: Hours of operation that allow working families to get services without
missing work, reduced wait times, systems for answering and returning phone
calls in a timely manner, access to benefits that support work, access to job
training and education, and, access to services for families with limited
literacy or English skills, and families with special needs. The department
shall report to the legislature by January 2001 the establishment of customer
service measures and goals, and the departmental actions to assure the goals
are being met.

(g) Use existing
flexibility in federal and state welfare laws and regulations to support, on a
limited basis, longer education and training plans that have a strong
likelihood to lead to long-term economic independence for recipient.

(h) Provide up to
$1,400,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation for after-school
care for middle school youth through programs such as those described in House
Bill No. 2530 (after-school care).

(i) Provide up to
$2,710,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation for training and
technical assistance for child care providers seeking training to enable them
to competently serve children with special needs as described in House Bill No.
2869 (child care provider training).

(j) Provide $230,000,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, to the department of health to expand
the vasectomy project to temporary assistance for needy families clients and
their partners until such time as a federal family planning waiver is granted
that will cover these services.

(k) Ensure that funds
provided in this subsection to implement policies that disregard or exempt a
portion of recipients' income are designed to achieve stated WorkFirst program
goals and outcomes. Income disregards are effective incentives to help
WorkFirst families move towards economic independence. Income disregard policy
shall not discriminate based on who the specific employer is.

(2) $43,408,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $43,386,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients in the general
assistance‑-unemployable program. Within these amounts, the department
may expend funds for services that assist recipients to reduce their dependence
on public assistance, provided that expenditures for these services and cash
assistance do not exceed funds provided. The department shall, by July 1,
2000, begin using federal funds provided in subsection (1) of this section, as
allowed by federal rules, for the costs of providing income assistance to
children with court-appointed guardians or court-appointed custodians.

(3) $5,444,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $5,632,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the food assistance program for legal immigrants. The level of
benefits shall be equivalent to the benefits provided by the federal food stamp
program.

(4) RCW 74.08A.280
permits the department to develop contracts for state-wide welfare-to-work
services. Within amounts available in this section, the department shall
provide progress reports on the use of such contracting to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2001. Each of these reports shall
describe the number of current contracts for temporary assistance for needy
families (TANF) or WorkFirst services that the department has with community
social service providers and a description of the services being provided
through each of those contracts.

(5) The legislature
finds that, since the passage of the federal personal responsibility and work
opportunity act in 1997, Washington's public assistance population has declined
dramatically, and that the currently appropriated level for the temporary
assistance for needy families program is sufficient for the 1999-01 biennium.
The legislature further finds that federal funding for the temporary assistance
for needy families program may decrease after the current five-year block grant
has expired. The legislature declares that at least $60,000,000 of the
year-end balance in the federal TANF grant shall be held in reserve by the office
of financial management at the close of the 1999-01 biennium.

Sec. 208. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 209
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE
ABUSE PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 21,338,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((22,101,000))

22,066,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((90,373,000))

90,364,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,204,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,102,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 77,150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((219,268,000))

219,224,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,960,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,960,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
expansion of 50 drug and alcohol treatment beds for persons committed under RCW
70.96A.140. Patients meeting the commitment criteria of RCW 70.96A.140 but who
voluntarily agree to treatment in lieu of commitment shall also be eligible for
treatment in these additional treatment beds. The department shall develop
specific placement criteria for these expanded treatment beds to ensure that
this new treatment capacity is prioritized for persons incapacitated as a
result of chemical dependency and who are also high utilizers of hospital
services.

(2) $18,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $88,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $116,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for activities related to
chemical dependency services under subsection 202(1) of this act. If that
subsection is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3) $1,444,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,484,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $330,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided for implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5480 (drug-affected infants) or sections 1
through 17 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1574. If legislation expanding
services to prevent drug-affected infants is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided solely for the
development and implementation of comprehensive programs for alcohol and drug
abusing mothers and their young children. The pilot programs shall be
implemented in several locations, including at least one rural location. The
pilot programs shall also be supported with TANF funds provided in section 208
of this act as a way to reduce prolonged dependency on public assistance for
program participants.

(4) $442,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for drug courts that have a net loss of federal grant funding from
fiscal year 2000 to fiscal year 2001. The legislature finds that drug courts
reduce criminal justice costs for both state and local governments. This
appropriation is intended to cover approximately one-half of the lost federal
funding. It is the intent of the legislature to provide state assistance to
counties to cover a part of lost federal funding for drug courts for a maximum
of three years.

Sec. 209. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 210
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 744,327,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((834,864,000))

976,059,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,542,652,000))

2,701,092,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((258,616,000))

256,704,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ ((487,040,000))

527,852,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,876,699,000))

5,215,234,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall continue to make use of the special eligibility category created for
children through age 18 and in households with incomes below 200 percent of the
federal poverty level made eligible for medicaid as of July 1, 1994.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that Harborview medical center continue to be an economically
viable component of the health care system and that the state's financial
interest in Harborview medical center be recognized.

(3) Funding is provided
in this section for the adult dental program for Title XIX categorically
eligible and medically needy persons and to provide foot care services by
podiatric physicians and surgeons.

(4) $1,647,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,672,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
for treatment of low-income kidney dialysis patients.

(5) $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $160,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
prenatal triage clearinghouse to provide access and outreach to reduce infant
mortality.

(6) The department
shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 15, 1999,
and again by December 15, 1999, on (a) actions it has taken and proposes to
take to increase the share of medicare part B premium payments upon which it is
collecting medicaid matching funds; (b) the percentage of such premium payments
for each month of service subsequent to June 1998 which have been paid with
unmatched, state-only funds; and (c) why matching funds could not be collected
on those payments.

(7) The department
shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 1999,
and again by October 1, 2000, on the amount which has been recovered from
third-party payers as a result of its efforts to improve coordination of
benefits on behalf of "basic health plan-plus" enrollees.

(8) The department
shall report to the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 1999, on options for controlling the growth in medicaid
prescription drug expenditures through strategies such as but not limited to
volume purchasing, selective contracting, supplemental drug discounts, and
improved care coordination for high utilizers.

(9) $3,992,000 of the
health services account appropriation and $7,651,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health insurance coverage for children
with family incomes between 200 percent and 250 percent of the federal poverty
level, as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5416 (children's health
insurance program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, these amounts
shall lapse.

(10) Upon approval from
the federal health care financing administration, the department shall
implement the section 1115 family planning waiver to provide family planning
services to persons with family incomes at or below two hundred percent of the
federal poverty level.

(11) In accordance with
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5968, $70,821,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, (($42,041,000)) $67,331,000
of the health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and (($120,278,000))
$146,579,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, or so much
thereof as may be expended without exceeding the medicare upper payment limit,
are provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by
rural public hospital districts. Such payments shall be distributed among the
participating rural public hospital districts proportional to the number of
days of medicaid-funded nursing home care provided by each district during the
preceding calendar year, relative to the total number of such days of care
provided by all participating rural public hospital districts. Prior to making
any supplemental payments, the department shall first obtain federal approval
for such payments under the medicaid state plan. The payments shall further be
conditioned upon (a) a contractual commitment by the association of public
hospital districts and participating rural public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the state treasurer, for deposit into the health
services account, equal to at least ((87)) 89 percent of the
total supplemental payment amounts received during the 1999-01 fiscal biennium;
and (b) a contractual commitment by the participating districts to not allow
expenditures covered by the supplemental payments to be used for medicaid
nursing home rate-setting. The participating districts shall retain no more
than a total of $30,000,000 for the 1999-01 biennium.

(12) In determining
financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the department is
authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds
or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(13) $1,529,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $4,077,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $5,394,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
the settlement negotiated by the department and the attorney general in the
case of Allenmore et al. vs. DSHS.

(14) From funds
provided in this section, the department shall develop disease state management
and therapeutic substitution programs which will substantially maintain or
enhance the quality of the drug benefit for medical assistance recipients,
while controlling overall health care costs. In designing the disease state
management programs, the department shall research programs which have proven
effective with similar populations in other states, and shall then work with
concerned provider and consumer groups to adapt those strategies to
Washington's service delivery system. The department shall work with its drug
utilization and education council to develop a therapeutic substitution program
for at least two classes of drugs. Under the therapeutic substitution program,
the council shall analyze pharmacoeconomic research on the costs and benefits
of all drugs within the class, and identify the most cost-effective drug or
drugs within the class for placement on the formulary. Other drugs within the
class shall be preauthorized when clinically indicated under criteria
established by the council. The department shall report to appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000, prior to implementing its
proposed strategies.

(15) (($14,848,000))
$27,100,000 of the health services account appropriation for fiscal year
2001 and (($15,269,000)) $27,800,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for additional disproportionate share
hospital payments to public hospital districts. Such additional payments shall
not be made prior to federal approval of a revision in the medicaid payment
methodology for state teaching hospitals, and shall not exceed the increase in
medicaid payments which results from that change. The payments shall further be
conditioned upon a contractual commitment by the participating public hospital
districts to make an intergovernmental transfer to the health services account
equal to at least ((77)) 85 percent of the additional
disproportionate share payment. The participating districts shall retain no
more than (($7,000,000)) $7,800,000 of the additional
disproportionate share payment. At least 28 percent of the amounts retained by
the participating hospital districts shall be allocated to the state teaching
hospitals.

(16)(a) $49,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and $49,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the medical assistance administration and the health care authority
to jointly conduct a state-wide study to:

(i) Determine payment
sources and rates paid for primary health care providers performing outpatient
primary care services and primary care in hospital emergency rooms for the
state's medical assistance programs, including healthy options, and the basic
health plan. To determine payment sources and rates paid, the agencies may
seek information in relation to such factors as:

(A) The rates paid to
primary care providers for their medical assistance programs, including healthy
options, and basic health plan contracts; and

(B) How these rates
compare with nonpublic pay clients for the same services.

The agencies are
authorized to attain this information from health plans or providers. The
agencies shall maintain the confidentiality of data collected for the purpose
of the study;

(ii) Determine which
primary care providers serve a relatively high number of low-income clients,
and how that affects their medical practice. For purposes of the study,
"primary care providers" includes pediatricians, family
practitioners, general practitioners, internists, physician assistants, and
advanced registered nurse practitioners; and

(iii) Develop proposals
to support these providers' medical practices. The agencies must determine
what constitutes a relatively high percentage of low-income clients for individual
primary care providers who contract for medical assistance administration
programs, including healthy options, and the basic health plan, and recommend
whether and at what point this disproportionately high percentage should result
in additional compensation to the primary care provider. The agencies shall
recommend a method to calculate a payment adjustment designed to help support
medical practices, according to the study's findings.

(b) In conducting the
study, the agencies shall determine which regions of the state to include in
the study, based on factors the agencies determine will provide the most
representative data state-wide. The agencies shall also consult with
interested parties, including any organization or agency affected by this subsection,
throughout the course of the study.

(c) The agencies shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2000, with the results of the primary
health care provider study. The report shall include recommendations on: (i)
What constitutes a disproportionately high percentage of low-income clients;
(ii) possible payment adjustments for these providers; (iii) methods to
implement such a rate adjustment; and (iv) what such a payment adjusted program
will cost.

(17) From funds
appropriated in this section, the medical assistance program shall assist the
Washington state institute for public policy with the assessment of options for
expanding medicaid eligibility required in section 607 of this 2000 act. Such
assistance shall include analysis of medicaid enrollment and expenditure data
needed for enrollment and cost projections; information and advice on state and
federal medicaid requirements; and liaison with state and federal officials in
other states undertaking similar expansions.

(18) $290,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for implementation of the asset exemption provisions of House Bill No. 2686.
If these provisions are not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 210. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 211
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 8,770,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((8,635,000))

8,600,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((81,906,000))

81,797,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,865,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((101,176,000))

101,032,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The division of
vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative interagency agreements
with state and local organizations to improve and expand employment
opportunities for people with severe disabilities served by those
organizations.

(2) $190,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $240,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $1,590,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
vocational rehabilitation services for individuals enrolled for services with
the developmental disabilities program who complete their high school
curriculum in 1999 or 2000.

Sec. 211. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 212
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 26,004,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((20,119,000))

26,281,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((43,227,000))

47,157,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 720,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((90,070,000))

100,162,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided
for the incremental cost of lease renewals and for the temporary increased
costs for relocating staff out of state office building no. 2 (OB2) during the
renovation of that building. Of this increase, $2,400,000 is provided for
relocating staff. This amount is recognized as one-time-only funding for the
1999-01 biennium. As part of the 2001-2003 budget request, the department
shall update the estimate of increased cost for relocating staff, including
specifying what portion of that increase is due to providing more square
footage per FTE in the new leased space compared to the space occupied
previously.

(2) The department may
transfer up to $528,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000, $1,057,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001, and $812,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to
the administration and supporting services program from various other programs
to implement administrative reductions.

(3) The department may
transfer and allot up to $5,560,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and $3,518,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation to the administration and supporting services program from
various other programs in the department to achieve fiscal reductions assumed
in this section. In selecting reductions in the various other programs, the
department shall place a higher priority on reductions in administrative
support functions as opposed to direct client services. Reductions in
positions providing direct client services shall be implemented only if those
reductions can be justified by reduced workload or through reorganization or
other efficiencies that do not result in a risk of failing to meet federal or
state certification or licensing standards. In achieving the level of savings
assumed in this subsection, the department shall not eliminate or reduce
funding and/or staff that would shift or transfer filing or appeal workload to
superior courts. By September 1, 2000, the department shall report its plan to
implement the savings in this section to the fiscal committees of the
legislature.

(4) $187,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $746,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $2,251,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided to implement a new fraud
and abuse detection system. By December 1, 2000, the department shall provide
a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature that will include: The
actual cost recovery in fiscal year 1999 and fiscal year 2000, prior to
implementation of the new fraud and abuse detection system; actual cost avoidance
in fiscal year 1999 and fiscal year 2000, prior to implementation of the new
fraud and abuse detection system; actual cost recovery and actual cost
avoidance achieved to date after implementation in fiscal year 2000 and 2001,
compared to the savings included in sections 202, 205, 206, and 209 of this
2000 act; and the criteria and methodology used for determining cost recovery
and cost avoidance.

Sec. 212. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 216
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 100,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 148,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((17,632,000))

16,492,000

Municipal Criminal
Justice Assistance Account--

Local Appropriation........................ $ 412,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((17,880,000))

17,152,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $125,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
information technology upgrades and improvements for the criminal justice
training commission.

(2) $481,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of provisions of chapter 351, Laws of 1997 (criminal justice
training) dealing with supervisory and management training of law enforcement
personnel. Within the funds provided in this subsection, the criminal justice
training commission shall provide the required training in the least disruptive
manner to local law enforcement agencies and may include, but is not limited
to, regional on-site training, interactive training, and credit for training
given by the home department.

(3) $1,990,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
expanding the basic law enforcement academy (BLEA) from 469 hours to 720
hours. The funds provided in this subsection are assumed sufficient for the
criminal justice training commission to provide expanded BLEA training to 330
attendees in fiscal year 2000 and 660 attendees in fiscal year 2001.

(4) $180,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176 (sexually violent
offender records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $276,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1692 or sections 1 through 7
of Senate Bill No. 5127 (child abuse investigations). If neither of these
bills is enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(6) $50,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
additional domestic violence training courses for 911 operators.

(7) $215,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to conduct a study of law
enforcement services and expenditures for both counties and cities within the
county for counties with populations over one hundred fifty thousand. The
study shall begin no later than July 1, 2000, and shall be completed by ((June
30)) October 31, 2001. The final report shall be distributed by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature. The study shall:

(a) Make
recommendations to improve the efficiency of delivering law enforcement
services. The recommendations may be made to law enforcement jurisdictions,
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, units of local
government, and the legislature;

(b) Research, compile,
and analyze data sufficient to provide a comprehensive analysis of the costs
and total expenditures for law enforcement. These costs include but are not
limited to special services, defined as but not limited to: SWAT teams, bomb
disposal units, air support, marine units, hostage negotiation teams, homicide
investigation units, drug units, canine units, arson investigation teams,
computer fraud and forensics units, domestic violence and special assault
units, and gang and youth violence units. The study shall identify
duplications and inefficiencies in current service delivery;

(c) Obtain data from
all local governments on the types of costs identified in (b) of this
subsection. This data will be compiled and analyzed by the agency or
organization that conducts the study for each county; and

(d) Obtain data from
those counties and law enforcement agencies where master interlocal agreements,
joint specialty service units, and other cooperative arrangements have been
developed between law enforcement agencies to improve the effectiveness,
efficiency, and ensured quality of specialty law enforcement services.

Sec. 213. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 217
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 7,268,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 7,240,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((18,756,000))

20,156,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,950,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,057,000

Electrical License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,402,000

Farm Labor Revolving
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,211,000

Public Works Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,996,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 167,092,000

Accident Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 9,112,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 169,172,000

Medical Aid Account‑-Federal
Appropriation..... $ 1,592,000

Plumbing Certificate
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 971,000

Pressure Systems Safety
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((422,014,000))

423,414,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims compensation program
within the public safety and education account funds appropriated in this
section. In the event that cost containment measures are necessary, the
department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b) develop preferred
provider and managed care contracts; (c) coordinate with the department of
social and health services to use the public safety and education account as
matching funds for federal Title XIX reimbursement, to the extent this
maximizes total funds available for services to crime victims. Cost
containment measures shall not include holding invoices received in one fiscal
period for payment from appropriations in subsequent fiscal periods.

(2) $2,665,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for additional costs for client benefits in the crime victims
compensation program, provided that no more than $5,095,000 of the
appropriations provided in subsection (1) of this section is expended for
department administration of the crime victims compensation program.

(3) From within funds
provided, the department shall improve customer service and satisfaction for
injured workers by speeding up the process for reporting injuries, and shall
enhance vocational rehabilitation services for injured workers.

Sec. 214. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 218
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,640,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,628,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 134,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 78,000

Industrial Insurance
Premium Refund Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 78,000

Charitable, Educational,
Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,560,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $39,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely as an additional
state contribution toward the cost of constructing a memorial on the state
capitol grounds to the men and women who served in the nation's armed forces
during the second world war.

(b) $231,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided solely for
disbursement to the national World War II memorial fund for construction and
maintenance of the national monument honoring the men and women from Washington
and the other states who served in the nation's armed forces during the second
world war.

(c) $200,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely to
conduct a predesign study for replacement of aging skilled nursing facilities.
The predesign study shall comply with the requirements of sections 902 and 903,
chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

(2) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,466,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,494,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((26,000))

78,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,495,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,481,000))

6,533,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,346,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 4,790,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,002,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 16,527,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 49,665,000

Sec. 215. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 219
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 62,840,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((64,284,000))

65,034,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((268,032,000))

268,081,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((68,648,000))

74,989,000

Hospital Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,378,000

Health Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 37,529,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 14,856,000

State Drinking Water
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,531,000

Drinking Water Assistance
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,456,000

Waterworks Operator
Certification‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 593,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 3,124,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 258,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 45,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,614,000

Health Services Account
Appropriation.......... $ ((12,992,000))

12,242,000

Medical Test Site Licensure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,651,000

Youth Tobacco Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,804,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,620,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((565,255,000))

571,645,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,434,000 of the
health professions account appropriation is provided solely for the development
and implementation of a licensing and disciplinary management system.
Expenditures are conditioned upon compliance with section 902 of this act.
These funds shall not be expended without appropriate project approval by the department
of information systems.

(2) The department or
any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees charged to the
nursing assistants, podiatrists, and osteopaths; for certificate of need; for
temporary worker housing; for state institution inspection; for residential
care facilities and for transient accommodations, in excess of the fiscal
growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet
the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this
section.

(3) $339,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $339,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $678,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for technical
assistance to local governments and special districts on water conservation and
reuse. $339,000 of the general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in
each fiscal year of the biennium, only if the state receives greater than
$25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in that
fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001.

(4) $1,685,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $1,686,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided solely
for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and agency action
items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.

(5) The department of
health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state
general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The
department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted
federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act
or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any
moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects
or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(6) $620,000 of the
tobacco prevention and control account appropriation and $209,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5516 or, if the bill is
not enacted, for the development of a sustainable, long-term, comprehensive
tobacco control program. The plan shall identify a specific set of outcome
measures that shall be used to track long range progress in reducing the use of
tobacco. Nationally accepted measures that can be used to compare progress
with other states shall be included. The plan shall emphasize programs that
have demonstrated effectiveness in achieving progress towards the specified
outcome measures. Components of the plan that do not have a record of success
may be included, provided that the plan also includes the means of evaluating
those components. The plan shall also include an inventory of existing
publically funded programs that seek to prevent the use of tobacco, alcohol, or
other drugs by children and youth and recommendations to coordinate and
consolidate these programs in order to achieve greatest positive outcomes
within total available resources. A preliminary plan shall be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 1999.

(7) $2,075,000 of
fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and $2,075,000 of
fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided for the
Washington poison center. The department shall require the center to develop a
long range financing plan that identifies options for diversifying funding for
center operations, including, but not limited to, federal grants, private
sector grants and sponsorships, and multistate or regional operating
agreements. The plan shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2000.

(8) $50,000 of fiscal
year 2000 general fund--state appropriation and $50,000 of fiscal year 2001
general fund--state appropriation are provided solely for fund raising and
other activities for the development of early hearing loss clinics. The
development plan for these clinics shall not assume ongoing general fund‑-state
appropriations.

(9) $15,000,000 of the
tobacco prevention and control account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of a sustainable, long-term tobacco control program. The
integrated components of the program may include: Community-based programs,
cessation, public awareness and education, youth access, and assessment and
evaluation. A final plan will define the sustainable implementation of the
long-term program given the remaining available balance in the tobacco
prevention and control account. This plan shall be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2000.

(10) $24,000 of the
fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and $117,000 of the
fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided solely to
implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6199 (patient bill of rights). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 216. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 220
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

The appropriations to
the department of corrections in chapter 309, Laws of 1999, as amended, shall
be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified therein. However,
after April 1, ((2000)) 2001, unless specifically prohibited by
this act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state appropriations
for fiscal year ((2000)) 2001 between the correctional operations
and community supervision programs after approval by the director of financial
management. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior
to approving any deviations from appropriation levels.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 26,064,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 28,022,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,962,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account Appropriation...................... $ 2,000,000

Cost of Supervision Fund
Appropriation......... $ 2,254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 61,302,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $72,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $212,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, $2,962,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation, $2,000,000 of the violence
reduction drug enforcement account appropriation, and $2,254,000 of the cost of
supervision fund appropriation are provided solely for replacement of the
department's offender-based tracking system. These amounts are subject to
section 902 of this act.

(b) $462,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $538,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL
OPERATIONS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 360,685,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((364,386,000))

371,428,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((35,577,000))

25,830,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((1,614,000))

2,684,000

Public Health Services
Account Appropriation... $ ((1,884,000))

1,117,000

Institutional Welfare
Betterment Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,570,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((766,716,000))

764,314,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Not more than
$3,000,000 may be expended to provide financial assistance to counties for
monitoring and treatment services provided to felony offenders involved in drug
court programs pursuant to sections 7 though 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1006 (drug offender sentencing). The secretary may negotiate
terms, conditions, and amounts of assistance with counties or groups of
counties operating drug courts, and may review charging and other documents to
verify eligibility for payment. The secretary may contract with the division
of alcohol and substance abuse, department of social and health services, for
monitoring and treatment services provided pursuant to this subsection.

(b) The department may
expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered into for mitigation of
severe overcrowding in local jails. If any funds are generated in excess of
actual costs, they shall be deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures
shall not exceed revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as
recovery of costs.

(c) The department
shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the Washington
corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that provided in the
1995‑97 biennium.

(d) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(e) $583,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,178,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely to increase payment rates for contracted education providers and
contracted work release facilities. It is the legislature's intent that these
amounts be used primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in
direct, front‑line service delivery.

(f) $151,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $57,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g) $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $334,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5538 (sentencing) or section 3
of House Bill No. 1544 (sentencing corrections). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h) $171,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,094,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1006 (drug offender sentencing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i) The department of
corrections shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives, by December 15, 1999, a report on how the
department plans to manage hepatitis C in the inmate population. In developing
the plan, the department shall work with recognized experts in the field and
shall take notice of the current national institutes of health hepatitis C
guidelines and hepatitis C protocols observed in other correctional settings.
Included in the plan shall be offender education about the disease, how and
when offenders would be tested, how the disease would be managed if an inmate
is determined to have hepatitis C, and an estimate of the number of inmates in
the Washington prison system with hepatitis C. The proposed plan must also
include recommendations to the legislature on ways to improve hepatitis C
disease management and what level of funding would be necessary to appropriately
test for and treat the disease.

(j) For the acquisition
of properties and facilities, the department of corrections is authorized to
enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. This
authority applies to the following:

(A) Enter into a
long-term ground lease or a long-term lease with purchase option for
development of a Tacoma prerelease facility for approximately $360,000 per
year. Prior to entering into any lease, the department of corrections shall
obtain written confirmation from the city of Tacoma and Pierce county that the
prerelease facility planned for the site meets all land use, environmental
protection, and community notification requirements.

(B) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $21,350,000 to acquire, construct, or
remodel a 400-bed, expandable to 600-bed, Tacoma prerelease facility.

(C) Lease-develop with
the option to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 100 work release beds in
facilities throughout the state for $7,000,000.

(k) (($1,884,000))
$1,117,000 of the public health services account appropriation is
provided solely for costs associated with the testing, treatment, and other
activities related to managing hepatitis C in the inmate population.

(l) $117,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6255 (anhydrous
ammonia). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(m) $2,570,000 of the
institutional welfare betterment account appropriation is provided solely for
deposit in the public health services account.

(n) During the 1999-01
biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for offender pay phone and
other telephone services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors: (i) The
lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone
call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department to
provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient revenues for
the activities funded from the institutional welfare betterment account as of
January 1, 2000.

(3) COMMUNITY
SUPERVISION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 48,451,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((53,787,000))

53,311,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 9,861,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((112,099,000))

111,623,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(b) Amounts provided in
this subsection are sufficient for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability).

(c) $109,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $126,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 (dangerous
mentally ill offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d) $219,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the department of corrections to contract with the institute for
public policy for responsibilities assigned in Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability act) and sections 7 through 12 of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1006 (drug offender sentencing).

(4) CORRECTIONAL
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 817,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((3,523,000))

100,000

Institutional Welfare
Betterment Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,509,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,849,000))

4,426,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the
amounts provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(b) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 ((and $50,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are)) is
provided solely for the correctional industries board of directors to hire one
staff person, responsible directly to the board, to assist the board in
fulfilling its duties.

(5) INTERAGENCY
PAYMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 12,898,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((11,983,000))

12,255,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((24,881,000))

25,153,000

Sec. 217. 1999 c 309 s 223
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES
FOR THE BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,481,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,513,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((11,062,000))

11,612,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 80,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,136,000))

14,686,000

Sec. 218. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 222
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,263,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,259,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 209,498,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 29,135,000

Unemployment Compensation
Administration Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ ((169,985,000))

177,799,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,443,000

Employment Service
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,457,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((440,040,000))

447,854,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Expenditures of
funds appropriated in this section for the information systems project to
improve the agency's labor exchange system are conditioned upon compliance with
section 902 of this act.

(2) $327,000 of the
unemployment compensation administration account‑-federal appropriation
is provided consistent with section 903(c)(2) of the federal social security
act to address deficiencies in the tax and wage information system (TAXIS) and
to improve the quality and timeliness of employer tax information and employee
wage records.

(3)
$2,567,000 of the employment service administrative account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill
No. 3077 (unemployment insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End
of part)

PART
III

NATURAL RESOURCES

Sec. 301. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 301
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 36,462,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 42,225,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 55,141,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 4,234,000

Special Grass Seed Burning
Research Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 14,000

Reclamation Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,735,000

Flood Control Assistance
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ ((3,989,000))

3,957,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 749,000

State Emergency Water
Projects Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 317,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 13,193,000

State Drought Preparedness
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((675,000))

350,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,120,000

State and Local
Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply
Facilities)‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 557,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 3,881,000

Wood Stove Education and
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 551,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,155,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((48,369,000))

48,608,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 377,000

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,587,000

Water Quality Permit
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 21,763,000

Underground Storage Tank
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,475,000

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,000

Biosolids Permit Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 572,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,943,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,576,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,172,000

Air Operating Permit
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,549,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,430,000

Oil Spill Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,078,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 43,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 439,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 2,200,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((278,591,000))

278,473,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,432,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $3,438,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, $394,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,070,000 of the oil spill
administration account‑-state appropriation, $819,000 of the state toxics
control account‑-state appropriation, and $3,686,000 of the water quality
permit account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DOE-01, DOE-02,
DOE-03, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.

(2) $170,000 of the oil
spill administration account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02 through a
contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to develop an
educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels,
ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(3) $374,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $283,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
the department to digitize water rights documents and to provide this
information to watershed planning groups.

(4) $1,566,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, $1,033,000 of the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, and $919,000 of the water quality account appropriation are
provided to employ residents of the state between eighteen and twenty-five
years of age in activities to enhance Washington's natural, historic,
environmental, and recreational resources.

(5) $250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided solely for
study of the impacts of gravel removal on the hydrology of Maury Island. The
study shall consider impacts to the nearshore environment and aquifer recharge,
and assess the potential for groundwater or marine sediment contamination. The
department shall contract for the study, which shall be completed by June 30,
2000.

(6) $250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided solely for a
study of the impacts of gravel deposit on the Highline aquifer. The study
shall consider impacts to instream flow and sedimentation of Des Moines,
Miller, and Walker creeks. The department shall contract for the study, which
shall be completed by June 30, 2000.

(7) The entire
freshwater aquatic weeds account appropriation shall be distributed according to
the provisions of RCW 43.21A.660. Funding may be provided for chemical control
of Eurasian watermilfoil.

(8) $15,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $15,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely to
monitor and address, in coordination with the marine operations division of the
department of transportation, odor problems in Fauntleroy Cove.

(9) $144,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $133,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for water quality activities related to forest practices.

(10) $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided solely for
the department to form an advisory committee for the purpose of updating the
department's storm water management plan and the Puget Sound storm water
management manual. The advisory committee shall be appointed no later than
September 1, 1999, and it shall provide its recommendations on storm water
management to the legislature by December 31, 2000.

(11) $383,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $384,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for an agency permit assistance center, including four regional permit
assistance offices.

(12) $438,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,025,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $1,870,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
establishment of total maximum daily loads for water bodies across the state,
and for pilot projects to evaluate the ability of existing voluntary and
regulatory programs to improve water quality in water quality limited segments
listed pursuant to section 303(d) of the federal clean water act. In areas
with a ground water management area, total maximum daily loads that include a
ground water element will be done in cooperation with the ground water
management area process. Pilot projects shall include the following
allocations from the general fund‑-state amounts provided in this
subsection: $100,000 shall be provided to a conservation district in the
Palouse region; $100,000 shall be provided to the Lake Whatcom management
committee through the city of Bellingham; and $250,000 shall be provided to the
Roza-Sunnyside irrigation district joint board of control. Each pilot project
sponsor shall provide a report to the legislature by January 1, 2001,
describing the water quality goals of the project, how the goals relate to
meeting state water quality standards, the strategies to accomplish those
goals, and the method of evaluating project effectiveness. The pilot project
sponsors shall also submit final reports to the legislature at project
completion.

(13) $591,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,131,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely to
process water rights applications.

(14) $414,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $383,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
technical assistance and project review for water conservation and reuse
projects.

(15) The entire salmon
recovery account appropriation is provided to increase compliance with existing
water quality and water resources laws.

(16) $4,250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $4,750,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
grants to local governments to conduct watershed planning. Of the general fund‑‑state
amounts provided in this subsection: (a) $500,000 is provided solely for a
grant to the Methow river planning unit to develop baseline hydrological data
for the Methow river; and (b) $85,000 is provided for the lower
Yakima/Naches/upper Yakima planning unit contingent upon recommendations of the
governor's fact finder that a dual watershed assessment process is necessary.
If such a recommendation is not provided, this amount is available for the
purposes of this subsection.

(17) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $82,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the department, in cooperation with the department of fish and
wildlife, to establish fish and habitat index monitoring sites to measure the
effectiveness of salmon recovery activities.

(18) $276,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $207,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely to
implement Senate Bill No. 5424 (aquatic plant management). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the continuation of the southwest Washington coastal erosion study.

(20) $638,000 of the
oil spill administration account appropriation is provided solely to implement
Substitute House Bill No. 2247 (oil spill response tax). Of this amount: (a)
$120,000 is provided solely for spill response equipment; (b) $307,000 is
provided solely to develop an oil spill risk management plan; and (c) $211,000
is provided solely for spills information management improvements. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(21) $145,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $145,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided solely
for training and technical assistance to support the activities of county water
conservancy boards.

(22) $3,154,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$6,649,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely to maintain the state's air quality program. Within the
funds provided in this subsection, the department shall maintain funding for
local air pollution control authorities at no less than ninety percent of the
level of grants provided prior to January 1, 2000.

(23) $749,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean up activities.

(24) $300,000 of the
state drought preparedness account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely for a preconstruction and feasibility analysis of the
Roza irrigation district off-stream storage project at Washout canyon. Moneys
may be expended from the amount provided in this subsection only to the extent
that matching funds in cash and in-kind contributions are provided by the Roza
irrigation district. If this match is not provided by the district, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25) $1,500,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for cleanup
actions related to the Everett smelter site in the city of Everett. The
department shall seek recovery of the funds expended for this purpose from the
liable parties by way of a settlement agreement or court action under the
authority of chapter 70.105D RCW, the model toxics control act. Moneys
collected as a result of a cost recovery action at the Everett smelter site
shall be used first to reimburse the local toxics control account for the total
amount of this appropriation. This appropriation is the result of a one-time
loan from the local toxics control account and does not imply that the
legislature will use this loan source or the state toxics control account for
future cleanup of the Everett smelter site.

(26) (($375,000))
$50,000 of the state drought preparedness account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for an environmental impact statement of the
Pine Hollow reservoir project to be conducted in conjunction with the local
irrigation district.

(27) $150,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely for
creating the task force on water storage. The purpose of the task force is to
examine the role of increased water storage in providing water supplies to meet
the needs of fish, population growth, and economic development, and to enhance
the protection of people's lives and their property and the protection of
aquatic habitat through flood control facilities. For this purpose, increased
storage may be in the form of surface storage including off-stream storage,
underground storage, or the enlargement or enhancement of existing structures.
The task force shall also examine means of providing funding for increased
water storage.

The department of
ecology shall provide staff support for the task force and the director of the
department of ecology shall convene the first meeting of the task force not
less than thirty days after the effective date of this section.

No member of the task
force shall receive compensation, per diem, or reimbursement of expenses from
the task force or the department of ecology for his or her activities as a
member of the task force. However, each may receive such compensation, per
diem, and/or reimbursement as is authorized by the entity he or she is employed
by, is appointed from, or represents on the task force.

Following its
examination, the task force shall report its recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2000.

(28) Within the funds
appropriated in this section, the department shall develop for review by the
legislature a proposed long-term strategy to address persistent,
bio-accumulative and toxic chemicals in the environment. The department shall
submit its proposal to the appropriate legislative committees by December 30,
2000.

(29) $1,650,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
to the oil spill administration account to be used for a rescue tug. By
December 1, 2000, the department shall report to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the activities of the dedicated rescue tug.
The report shall include information on rescues, assists, or responses
performed by the tug. The report shall also indicate the class of vessels
involved and the nature of the rescue, assist, or response.

(30) $84,375 of the
flood control assistance account appropriation is provided solely as a
reappropriation for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, to complete the Latah
Creek feeder bank stabilization project. The amount provided by this
subsection shall be reduced by the amount expended from this account for this
project during the biennium ending June 30, 2001.

Sec. 302. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 302
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 27,522,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((28,227,000))

28,259,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,113,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((59,000))

167,000

Winter Recreation Program
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 763,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 264,000

Snowmobile Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 3,653,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 325,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 48,000

Water Trail Program Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 25,907,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((88,895,000))

89,035,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $189,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action items P&RC-01 and
P&RC-03.

(2) $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $71,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the state parks and recreation commission to meet its
responsibilities under the Native American graves protection and repatriation
act (P.L. 101-601).

(3) $2,000,000 of the
parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is dependent upon the parks
and recreation commission generating revenue to the account in excess of
$26,000,000 for the biennium. These funds shall be used for deferred
maintenance and visitor and ranger safety activities.

(4) $772,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $849,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
to employ residents of the state between eighteen and twenty-five years of age
in activities to enhance Washington's natural, historic, environmental, and
recreational resources.

(5) Fees approved by
the state parks and recreation commission in 1998 for camping, group camping,
extra vehicles, and the sno-park daily permit are authorized to exceed the
fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(6) $79,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $79,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
a grant for the operation of the Northwest avalanche center.

(7) The state parks and
recreation commission may increase fees adopted prior to January 1, 2000, for
implementation on or after July 1, 2000, in excess of the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.

(8) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for a study on existing and future recreational needs and opportunities
on the west slope of the Cascade foothills. The study shall include an
inventory of existing land and facilities, an assessment of projected demand,
and recommendations for regional coordination among public and private outdoor
recreation providers to promote expanded recreation opportunities within the
Cascade foothills. The study shall be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2001.

Sec. 303. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 305
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 42,616,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((44,567,000))

45,212,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((37,380,000))

55,005,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ ((16,800,000))

23,850,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 490,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,992,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 586,000

Recreational Fisheries
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,596,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,105,000

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,499,000))

2,899,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 851,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ ((41,133,000))

42,223,000

Wildlife Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 38,040,000

Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,072,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,939,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,603,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,000

Regional Fisheries Salmonid
Recovery Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 1,750,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 969,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((274,353,000))

301,163,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,252,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,244,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action items
DFW-01, DFW-02, DFW-03, DFW-04, and DFW-05.

(2) $776,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for the department's
review of forest practices applications and related hydraulic permit
applications.

(3) $1,500,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for the department to
update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory and, in cooperation with the
department of ecology, to establish fish and habitat index monitoring sites to
measure the effectiveness of salmon recovery activities.

(4) $232,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $232,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
for the control of European green crab (Carcinus maenas). The department shall
submit a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by
September 1, 2000, evaluating the effectiveness of various control strategies
and providing recommendations on long-term control strategies. $248,000 of
this amount is for implementation of Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item DFW-23.

(5) $191,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $191,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
for noxious weed control and survey activities on department lands. Of this
amount, $48,000 is provided for the biological control of yellowstar thistle.

(6) All salmon habitat
restoration and protection projects proposed for funding by regional fisheries
enhancement groups shall be submitted by January 1st or July 1st of each year
for review to the salmon recovery funding board.

(7) $2,340,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation and $7,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement a license buy-back program for
commercial fishing licenses.

(8) $511,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $488,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
to employ residents of the state between eighteen and twenty-five years of age
in activities to enhance Washington's natural, historic, environmental, and
recreational resources.

(9) Any indirect cost
reimbursement received by the department from federal grants must be spent on
agency administrative activities and cannot be redirected to direct program
activities.

(10) $43,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $42,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive center.

(11) $32,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $33,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely to
support the activities of the aquatic nuisance species coordination committee
to foster state, federal, tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance
species issues. The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of
nonnative aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are introduced.

(12) $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely to
implement Senate Bill No. 5508 (crab catch record cards). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) $6,440,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $5,796,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, $12,260,000 of the
wildlife account--state appropriation, $710,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement
account appropriation, and $500,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation are provided solely for operation of the enforcement division.
Within these funds, the department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related
to protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and steelhead.
Within these funds, the department shall provide support to the department of
health to enforce state shellfish harvest laws.

(14) $500,000 of the
salmon recovery account, $624,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000, and $624,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the department to implement a hatchery
endangered species act response. The strategy shall include emergency hatchery
responses and retrofitting of hatcheries for salmon recovery.

(15) $45,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $46,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
operation of the Rod Meseberg (ringold) warm water fish hatchery to implement
House Bill No. 1716 (warm water fish culture). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16) $2,500,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for grants to lead
entities established in accordance with RCW 75.46.060.

(17) $200,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for salmon and
steelhead predation control and bycatch monitoring strategies.

(18) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $200,000 of
the wildlife account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for field
surveys and harvest management for Washington elk herds.

(19) $155,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $345,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely to purchase and implement the automated recreational license data base
system.

(20) $1,400,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,400,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for fish passage barrier and screening technical assistance, engineering
services, and construction assistance for local governments, state agencies,
volunteer groups, and regional fisheries enhancement groups.

(21) $1,500,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for local salmon
recovery technical assistance. Technical assistance shall be coordinated among
all state agencies including the conservation commission, department of fish and
wildlife, department of ecology, department of health, department of
agriculture, department of transportation, state parks and recreation,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, governor's salmon recovery
office, Puget Sound water quality action team, department of community, trade,
and economic development, and department of natural resources.

(22) $400,000 of the
wildlife account appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No.
1681 (trout purchase by state). The fish and wildlife commission may authorize
expenditure of these funds only if the costs of the program will be recovered
by the increase in license sales directly attributable to the planting of
privately grown trout. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23) $2,000,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided for cooperative
volunteer projects.

(24) $245,000 of the
state wildlife account appropriation is provided solely for winter feeding of
deer and winter range rehabilitation on the Chiliwist wildlife area.

(25) Within the
appropriation from the wildlife account the department shall, at a minimum,
operate Reiter Pond at fiscal year 2000 production levels.

(26) Within the
appropriations in this section the department shall, at a minimum, operate the
Colville hatchery at fiscal year 2000 production levels.

(27) $384,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation is provided solely to implement
Senate Bill No. 6277 (authorizing cost reimbursement agreements). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(28) $400,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action items
DFW-10 and DFW-18, implementing a comprehensive Puget Sound ground fish and
forage fish recovery plan.

(29) $203,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for data collection and analysis related to Lake Washington sockeye.

(30) $800,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for additional enforcement staff to respond and take appropriate action in
response to public complaints regarding bear and cougar.

(31) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and $200,000 of
the wildlife account‑‑state appropriation are provided solely to
implement an endangered species act strategy for state hatchery operations,
including fish passage improvements, screen compliance, rearing strategies, and
restoration of production.

(32) $789,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for screening of
irrigation diversions and projects to improve instream flows in the Methow
river basin.

(33) $645,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression
costs during the 2000 fire season and to feed elk and deer.

Sec. 304. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 306
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 25,784,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((28,576,000))

34,662,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,865,000))

5,025,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,604,000

Forest Development Account‑-State

Appropriation............................... $ 48,086,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,668,000

Surveys and Maps Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,221,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,656,000

Resources Management Cost
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 79,097,000

Surface Mining Reclamation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,435,000

Disaster Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,651,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,483,000

Aquatic Land Dredged
Material Disposal Site

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,014,000

Natural Resource
Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account Appropriation...................... $ 1,100,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 687,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 63,000

Agricultural College Trust
Management Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,736,000))

1,913,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((206,426,000))

215,054,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $1,058,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01,
DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(2) $7,304,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $7,304,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $2,651,000 of
the disaster response account‑-state appropriation are provided solely
for emergency fire suppression.

(3) $331,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $339,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for geologic studies to evaluate ground stability in high growth areas
and to provide geologic expertise to small communities.

(4) $663,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $689,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
to employ residents of the state between eighteen and twenty-five years of age
in activities to enhance Washington's natural, historic, environmental, and
recreational resources.

(5) $3,483,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation and $3,000,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for implementation of
chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess.

(a) Of the salmon
recovery account appropriation in this subsection:

(i) $2,580,000 is
provided solely for costs associated with adopting and implementing new forest
rules for protection of riparian habitat and water quality; road maintenance
and abandonment planning; fish and water quality compliance staff; geographic information
systems improvements for forest roads and hydrography; and updating the forest
practices permit application system; and

(ii) $903,000 is
provided solely to implement sections 501 through 505 of chapter 4, Laws of
1999 sp. sess., including:

(A) The establishment
of a small landowner office;

(B) Administration of
the forestry riparian easement program;

(C) Contracting with
private consultants to perform timber cruises;

(D) Development of
small landowner options through alternate management plans;

(E) Evaluation of
cumulative impacts of alternate plans;

(F) Establishment of a
small landowners advisory committee;

(G) Development of
criteria for determining compensation for qualifying timber; and

(H) Collection and
reporting of the statistical information on small landowners as directed in
section 503 of chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess.

(b) Of the general fund‑-state
appropriation in this subsection:

(i) $2,128,000 is
provided solely for cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research projects;
hazard zonation; adopting and implementing new forest rules to protect riparian
habitat and water quality; and geographic information systems improvements for
forest roads and hydrography; and

(ii) $872,000 is
provided solely for the department to implement sections 501 through 505 of
chapter 4, laws of 1999 sp. sess., including providing technical assistance for
small forest landowners for the following:

(A) Determining
streamside buffers;

(B) Preparation of road
management plans;

(C) Participation in
watershed analysis and adaptive management;

(D) Determining culvert
replacement needs; and

(E) Developing
alternative plans to comply with forest and fish rules.

(6) $44,000 of the
resource management cost account appropriation is provided solely for
maintenance and safety improvements at the Gull Harbor marine station. The
department shall develop a plan for use or disposal of the marine station by
December 1, 1999.

(7) $582,000 of the
resource management cost account appropriation is provided solely to expand
geoduck resource management activities.

(8) $172,000 of the
resource management cost account appropriation is provided solely to convert
aquatic land maps and records to an electronic format.

(9) $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $100,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $400,000 of the aquatic
lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for spartina
control. Within these amounts, the department shall continue support for a
field study of biological control methods.

(10) $2,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $2,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for fire protection activities.

(11) $450,000 of the
resource management cost account appropriation is provided solely for the
control and eradication of class B designate weeds on state lands.

(12) $1,100,000 of the
natural resources conservation areas stewardship account is provided solely to
the department for planning, management, and stewardship of natural area
preserves and natural resources conservation areas.

(13) $384,000 of the general
fund‑-private/local appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 6277 (authorizing cost reimbursement agreements). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((15))) (14)
$2,000,000 of the forest development account appropriation is provided solely
for immediate road decommissioning, maintenance, and repair in the Lake Whatcom
watershed.

(((16))) (15)
The department shall submit a report of the uses of the access road revolving
fund to the legislature and the office of financial management no later than
December 1, 2000. The report shall include the following:

(a) Distribution of
funds from fiscal year 1996 through fiscal year 2000;

(b) Types of activities
funded;

(c) Method for
prioritizing road projects, state-wide and by region; and

(d) Proposed plan for
road maintenance and repair in the 2001-2003 biennium.

(16)
$6,131,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation and $2,160,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the costs of
fighting wildfires on state and federal lands during the 2000 fire season.

(End
of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 401. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 401
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,630,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((4,871,000))

5,023,000

Architects' License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((678,000))

668,000

Cemetery Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 205,000

Profession Engineers'
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,703,000

Real Estate Commission‑-State
Appropriation.... $ ((6,824,000))

6,784,000

Master License Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 7,317,000

Uniform Commercial Code
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,448,000

Real Estate Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 630,000

Funeral Directors and
Embalmers Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 472,000

Washington Real Estate
Research Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 313,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((33,091,000))

33,193,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $100,000 of the
professional engineers' account appropriation are provided solely for Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5821 (on-site wastewater treatment). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(2) $313,000 of the
Washington real estate research account appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5720 (real estate research).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 402. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 402
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 21,496,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((20,826,000))

20,939,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,999,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 344,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,689,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,611,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,887,000

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,118,000

Fire Service Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 125,000

Disaster Response
Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,386,000

Fire Service Training
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,730,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 442,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 260,000

Fingerprint Identification
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,958,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((75,871,000))

75,984,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $255,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $95,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely
for replacement of fire training equipment at the fire service training
academy.

(2) $604,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5108 (missing/exploited
children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $2,816,000 of the
death investigation account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1560 (forensic lab services). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4) $2,900,000 of the
fire service training account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5102 (fire fighter
training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse. In providing the fire fighter one training
program required by the bill, the state patrol shall, to the extent possible,
utilize existing public and private fire fighting training facilities in
southeastern Washington.

(5) $354,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
additional law enforcement and security coverage on the west capitol campus.

(6) $66,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $58,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for activities of the missing children's clearinghouse as related to services
performed under subsection 202(1) of this act. If that subsection is not
enacted, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) When a program
within the agency is supported by more than one fund and one of the funds is
the state general fund, the agency shall charge its expenditures in such a
manner as to ensure that each fund is charged in proportion to its support of
the program. The agency may adopt guidelines for the implementation of this
subsection. The guidelines may account for federal matching requirements,
budget provisos, or other requirements to spend other moneys in a particular
manner.

(8) $300,000 of the
death investigations account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
operation of the state toxicology laboratory. If House Bill No. 2330 (liquor
disbursements) is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(9) $1,386,000 of the
disaster response account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
costs associated with the state patrol's participation in support of the world
trade organization conference.

(10)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 2420 (oil/gas pipeline safety). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End
of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

Sec. 501. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 501
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 34,844,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 42,315,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((83,099,000))

93,143,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((160,258,000))

170,302,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) AGENCY OPERATIONS

(a) $404,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $403,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely
for the operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities.

(b) $348,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for administration of the
traffic safety education program, including in-service training related to
instruction in the risks of driving while under the influence of alcohol and
other drugs.

(c) $128,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for increased costs
of providing a norm-referenced test to all third grade students and retests of
certain third grade students and other costs in accordance with chapter 319,
Laws of 1998 (student achievement).

(d) $145,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an institutional
education program director.

(2) STATE-WIDE PROGRAMS

(a) $2,524,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for in-service training and
educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science Center. Of this amount,
$350,000 is provided to add a math van.

(b) $63,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for operation of the Cispus
environmental learning center.

(c) $2,754,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for educational centers,
including state support activities. $100,000 of this amount is provided to
help stabilize funding through distribution among existing education centers
that are currently funded by the state at an amount less than $100,000 a
biennium.

(d) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an organization in
southwest Washington that received funding from the Spokane educational center
in the 1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to students who have
dropped out of school.

(e) $5,923,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for matching grants
to enhance security in schools. Not more than seventy-five percent of a
district's total expenditures for school security in any school year may be
paid from a grant under this subsection. The grants shall be expended solely
for the costs of employing or contracting for building security monitors in
schools during school hours and school events. Of the amount provided in this
subsection, at least $2,850,000 shall be spent for grants to districts that,
during the 1988-89 school year, employed or contracted for security monitors in
schools during school hours. However, these grants may be used only for
increases in school district expenditures for school security over expenditure
levels for the 1988-89 school year.

(f) $5,649,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for FY 2001 is provided for school
safety allocations to school districts. The amount provided in this subsection
(2)(f) is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) School districts
may use funds allocated under this subsection (2)(f) for school safety purposes
for the 2000-01 school year, including but not limited to the following:
Planning; training; equipment; before, during, and after-school safety; and
minor building renovations.

(ii) Allocations to
school districts shall be made beginning on July 1, 2000, at a maximum rate of
$10.00 multiplied by the full-time equivalent enrollment of the district. A
district's allocation shall be reduced by any amount awarded to that district
for security and safety grants under section 501 (2)(e) of this act and under
sections 1 (2) and 2 of chapter 12, Laws of 1999 sp. sess. For purposes of
this subsection "full-time equivalent enrollment" means the average
K-12 full-time equivalent enrollment from September 1, 1999, to May 31, 2000,
or 150 full-time equivalent students, whichever is greater.

(g) $200,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $200,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $400,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation transferred from the department of health
are provided solely for a program that provides grants to school districts for
media campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and addressing the importance of
delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until individuals are
ready to nurture and support their children. Grants to the school districts
shall be for projects that are substantially designed and produced by
students. The grants shall require a local private sector match equal to
one-half of the state grant, which may include in-kind contribution of
technical or other assistance from consultants or firms involved in public
relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other
related fields.

(h) $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely
for school district petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided
in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation of this money to school
districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed.

(i) A maximum of
$300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for alcohol
and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(j) $5,702,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for shared
infrastructure costs, data equipment maintenance, and depreciation costs for
operation of the K-20 telecommunications network.

(k) $4,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a K-20
telecommunications network technical support system in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the
data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These
funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for
the network. A maximum of $650,000 may be expended for state-level
administration and staff training on the K-20 network.

(l) $50,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $50,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
allocation to the primary coordinators of the state geographic alliance to
improve the teaching of geography in schools.

(m) $2,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for start-up grants for
alternative programs and services that improve instruction and learning for
at-risk students. Grants shall be awarded to applicants showing the greatest
potential for improved student learning for at-risk students including:

(i) Students who are
disruptive or have been suspended, expelled, or subject to other disciplinary
actions;

(ii) Students with
unexcused absences who need intervention;

(iii) Students who have
left school; and

(iv) Students involved
with the court system.

(n) $1,600,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for grants for magnet
schools.

(o) $4,300,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for complex need grants.
Grants shall be provided according to amounts shown in LEAP Document 30C as
developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.

(p) $431,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely to implement
Engrossed House Bill No. 2760 (educator quality). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for grants to schools and school districts to establish school safety
plans.

(r) $5,242,000 of the
general fund‑-state is provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care
to students, health education, and training for school staff.

(s) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided as matching funds for
district contributions to provide analysis of the efficiency of school district
business practices.

(t) $750,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for computer system
programming and upgrades to benefit the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, schools, and school districts.

(u) $21,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$21,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
appropriation are provided solely for the increased costs resulting from
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1477 (school district
organization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts in
this subsection shall lapse.

(v) $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the excellence
in mathematics training program as specified in Substitute House Bill No. 1569
(excellence in mathematics). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amount in this subsection shall lapse.

(w) $2,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for teacher
institutes during the summer of 2000, programs, and administration costs, as
provided for in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2085 (disruptive
students). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount in this
subsection shall lapse.

(x) $200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for support for
vocational student leadership organizations.

(y) $1,100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an equal matching grant
to the Northeast vocational area cooperative to establish high-technology
learning centers to provide college-level technology curriculum for high school
students leading to an information technology certificate or degree. Only the
following sources may be used as matching for the state funds: Private sector
contributions; operating levy revenues; capital levy revenues; technology levy
revenues; or other local funds not from federal or state sources.

(z) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for speech pathology grants
to charitable organizations as qualified under the internal revenue code and
incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington. These grants shall be
used for the purpose of providing childhood speech pathology by nationally
certified speech pathologists to children who have demonstrated a lack of
verbal communication skills and who would benefit from such a program. Speech
pathology services shall be provided at no cost to the child receiving the
benefits or to the parents or guardians of the child.

(aa) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for competitive
grants to school districts to obtain curriculum or programs that allow high
school students to have access to internet-based curriculum that leads directly
to higher education credits or provides preparation for tests that lead to
higher education credit in subjects including but not limited to mathematics,
languages, and science.

(bb) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,800,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided
solely for grants to school districts for programs to prepare high school
students to achieve information technology industry skills certifications. The
funds may be expended to provide or improve internet access; purchase and
install networking or computer equipment; train faculty; or acquire curriculum
materials. A match of cash or in-kind contributions from nonstate sources
equal to at least half of the cash amount of the grant is required. To assure
continuity of the curriculum with higher education institutions, the grant
program will be designed and implemented by an interagency team comprised of
representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher education
coordinating board, and the office of financial management. School districts
may apply for grants in cooperation with other school districts or community or
technical colleges and must demonstrate in the grant application a cooperative
relationship with a community or technical college in information technology
programs. Preference for grants shall be made to districts with sound
technology plans, which offer student access to computers outside of school
hours, which demonstrate involvement of the private sector in information
technology programs, and which serve the needs of low-income communities.

(cc) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for the Washington civil liberties education program pursuant to Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1572 (civil liberties education). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(dd) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for the World War II oral history project pursuant to Substitute House Bill No.
2418 (WWII oral history project). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(ee) $431,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of
filtering servers necessary for districts to implement a computer technology
filtering system for schools. Priority shall be given to districts that do not
have any filtering systems in place. Funding shall be provided only at the request
of that district's school board.

(ff) $297,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for training in oral
medications administration. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6328 (oral
medications training) is enacted, the funds are provided to implement the
provisions of the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the
superintendent shall provide training in administration of oral medications
using the model program developed by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.

Sec. 502. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 502
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 3,507,296,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((3,480,701,000))

3,489,806,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,987,997,000))

6,997,102,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
certificated staff salaries for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years shall be
determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated pursuant to
this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in (d) through
(f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6
shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under
(d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be as
follows:

(a) On the basis of
each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments, excluding full-time
equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated staff unit
allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i) Four certificated
administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-12;

(ii) 49 certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-3;

(iii) An additional 4.2
certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3 and an additional 7.2
certificated instructional staff units for grade 4. Any funds allocated for
these additional certificated units shall not be considered as basic education
funding;

(A) Funds provided
under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of the amount required to maintain
the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be
allocated only if the district documents an actual ratio equal to or greater
than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-4. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio achieved in
that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B) Districts at or
above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding
ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned to
basic education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C) Any district
maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 53.2 certificated instructional
staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may use
allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of that
required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b)
to employ additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall only be expended to reduce class size in grades
K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional funding ratio amount
may be expended for provision of classified instructional assistants; and

(iv) Forty‑six
certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades 4-12;

(b) For school
districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent students whose
full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month exceeds the
first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5 percent, an
additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such increased
enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time equivalent students
been included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;

(c)(i) On the basis of
full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(A) Vocational
education programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction, a
maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent vocational
students for the 1999-00 school year and the 2000-01 school year. Districts
documenting staffing ratios of less than 1 certificated staff per 19.5 students
shall be allocated the greater of the total ratio in subsections (2)(a)(i) and
(iv) of this section or the actual documented ratio; and

(B) Skills center
programs meeting the standards for skill center funding recommended by the
superintendent of public instruction, January 1999, 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative units for each
16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students;

(ii) Indirect cost
charges, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction, to
vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 10 percent; and

(iii) Vocational
full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as
the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be
adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same monthly basis as those
adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

(d) For districts
enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district
which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of
education and enroll not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling
no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and
0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than
five students, plus one‑twentieth of a certificated instructional staff
unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those
enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not
more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated instructional
staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e) For specified
enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five but not more
than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8,
and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than
twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8
and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of
education:

(i) For enrollment of
up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative
staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of
up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8,
0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units;

(f) For districts
operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades
9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i) For remote and
necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty‑five
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one‑half
certificated instructional staff units and one‑quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other
small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff
units and one‑half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the
first sixty average annual full time equivalent students, and additional staff
units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and
0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty‑three
and one‑half average annual full time equivalent students.

Units calculated under
(f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated staff units at the
rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff units and four
certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational full-time
equivalent students.

(g) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half
of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one‑half
of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3) Allocations for
classified salaries for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years shall be
calculated using formula‑generated classified staff units determined as
follows:

(a) For enrollments
generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection (2)(d) through
(h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three certificated
staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b) For all other
enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students; and

(c) For each nonhigh
school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time
equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional
one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4) Fringe benefit
allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.49 percent in the 1999‑00
school year and 15.62 percent in the 2000-01 school year for certificated
salary allocations provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of
15.56 percent in the 1999‑00 school year and 15.82 percent in the 2000-01
school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of
this section.

(5) Insurance benefit
allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section
504(2) of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of
certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this section; and

(b) The number of
classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied
by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the
purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with
no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(6)(a) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $8,117 per certificated staff unit in the
1999‑00 school year and a maximum of $8,239 per certificated staff unit
in the 2000-01 school year.

(b) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $19,933 per certificated staff unit in the 1999‑00
school year and a maximum of $20,232 per certificated staff unit in the 2000-01
school year.

(c) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $15,467 per certificated staff unit in the 1999-00 school
year and a maximum of $15,699 per certificated staff unit in the 2000-01 school
year.

(7) Allocations for
substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at a maintenance
rate of $365.28 for the 1999-00 school year and $479.94 for the 2000-01 school
year per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of salary increase amounts
provided in section 504 of this act. Solely for the purposes of this
subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall be equal to the number of
certificated instructional staff units allocated under subsection (2) of this
section, multiplied by the ratio between the number of actual basic education
certificated teachers and the number of actual basic education certificated
instructional staff reported state‑wide for the 1998-99 school year.

(8) Any school district
board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by
submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any
portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The
superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if
it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be
for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant
to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9) The superintendent
may distribute a maximum of (($10,598,000)) $10,423,000 outside
the basic education formula during fiscal years 2000 and 2001 as follows:

(a) For fire protection
for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of $457,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2000 and a maximum of $464,000 may be expended in
fiscal year 2001;

(b) For summer
vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $2,098,000 may be expended
each fiscal year;

(c) A maximum of
$585,000 may be expended for school district emergencies provided that up to
$260,000 shall be for the Toutle Lake school district emergency;

(d) A maximum of
$500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing skills training
for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work
programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds
shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent
student enrolled in those programs; and

(e) A maximum of
$3,117,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and (($779,000)) $604,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided for the 1999-00 school year for
districts which experience an enrollment decline in the 1999-00 school year
from the 1998-99 school year of more than 4.5 percent in full-time equivalent
enrollment or more than 300 full-time equivalent students. The superintendent
shall allocate funds to eligible school districts for up to one-half of the
enrollment loss at the basic education unenhanced rate for the district.
School districts receiving small school factor bonus funds shall not be
eligible for enrollment decline funds to the extent that the district has no
state apportionment loss as a result of the enrollment decline.

(10) For purposes of
RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student in state basic
education appropriations provided under chapter 309, Laws of 1999, including
appropriations for salary and benefits increases, is 4.0 percent from the
1998-99 school to the 1999-00 school year, and 3.0 percent from the 1999-00
school year to the 2000-01 school year. This subsection supersedes section 1,
chapter 10, Laws of 1999 sp. sess.

(11) If two or more
school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic
education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this
section, the following shall apply:

(a) For three school
years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff
units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units
received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth
through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the
basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school
year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section shall
be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec. 503. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 504
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 186,314,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((344,013,000))

345,596,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((530,327,000))

531,910,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($406,511,000))
$407,693,000 is provided for a cost of living adjustment of 3.0 percent
effective September 1, 1999, and another 3.0 percent effective September 1,
2000, for state formula staff units. The appropriations include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates of 15.85 percent for school
year 1999-00 and 14.98 percent for school year 2000-01 for certificated staff
and 12.06 percent for school year 1999-00 and 12.32 percent for school year
2000-01 for classified staff. The appropriation also includes 1.67 percent
effective September 1, 1999, for three learning improvement days pursuant to
section 503(7) of this act and the salary allocation schedule adjustments for
beginning and senior certificated instructional staff.

(a) The appropriations
in this section include the increased portion of salaries and incremental
fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this
act. Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of superintendent of
public instruction and the education reform program are provided in part VII of
this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic education) are based on
the salary allocation schedules and methodology in section 502 of this act.
Increases for special education result from increases in each district's basic
education allocation per student. Increases for educational service districts
and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of
public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and
benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b) The appropriations
in this section provide cost-of-living, learning improvement days for
certificated instructional staff, and incremental fringe benefit allocations
based on formula adjustments as follows:

(i) For pupil
transportation, an increase of $0.60 per weighted pupil‑mile for the 1999‑00
school year and $1.23 per weighted pupil-mile for the 2000-01 school year;

(ii) For education of
highly capable students, an increase of $14.04 per formula student for the 1999‑00
school year and $21.09 per formula student for the 2000-01 school year; and

(iii) For transitional
bilingual education, an increase of $36.19 per eligible bilingual student for
the 1999‑00 school year and $54.51 per eligible student for the 2000-01
school year; and

(iv) For learning
assistance, an increase of $13.97 per entitlement unit for the 1999‑00
school year and $23.04 per entitlement unit for the 2000-01 school year.

(c) The appropriations
in this section include $417,000 for fiscal year 2000 and (($1,214,000))
$1,227,000 for fiscal year 2001 for salary increase adjustments for
substitute teachers.

(2) (($123,816,000))
$124,217,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $335.75
per month for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years. The appropriations in this
section provide for a rate increase to $388.02 per month for the 1999-00 school
year and $425.89 per month for the 2000-01 school year at the following rates:

(a) For pupil
transportation, an increase of $0.48 per weighted pupil‑mile for the 1999‑00
school year and $0.82 for the 2000-01 school year;

(b) For education of
highly capable students, an increase of $3.32 per formula student for the 1999‑00
school year and $5.72 for the 2000-01 school year;

(c) For transitional
bilingual education, an increase of $8.46 per eligible bilingual student for
the 1999‑00 school year and $14.59 for the 2000-01 school year; and

(d) For learning
assistance, an increase of $6.65 per funded unit for the 1999‑00 school
year and $11.47 for the 2000-01 school year.

(3) The rates specified
in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

Sec. 504. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 505
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 181,204,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((181,061,000))

183,660,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((362,265,000))

364,864,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$1,473,000 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted
by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest
extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(3) $10,000 of the
fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $10,000 of the fiscal year 2001
appropriation are provided solely for the transportation of students enrolled
in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be limited to low-income
students who are transferring to "choice" programs solely for
educational reasons.

(4) Allocations for
transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement rates of $34.96 per
weighted mile in the 1999-00 school year and $35.17 per weighted mile in the
2000-01 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in
section 504 of this act. Allocations for transportation of students
transported more than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as
determined by superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for transportation of
students living within one radius mile shall be based on the number of enrolled
students in grades kindergarten through five living within one radius mile of
their assigned school multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rate for the
school year multiplied by 1.29.

Sec. 505. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 507
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 387,011,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((385,482,000))

391,076,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. ((171,667,000))

176,111,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((944,160,000))

954,198,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding for special
education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW
28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure, to the greatest extent possible,
that special education students receive their appropriate share of the general
apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To
the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for
special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment
allocation, it shall provide services through the special education allocation
funded in this section.

(2) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(3) The superintendent
of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school districts based on
two categories: The optional birth through age two program for special
education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the
mandatory special education program for special education eligible students
ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible student"
means a student receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly
formulated individualized education program.

(4) For the 1999-00 and
2000-01 school years, the superintendent shall distribute state funds to each
district based on the sum of:

(a) A district's annual
average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed infants and toddlers
ages birth through two, multiplied by the district's average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and

(b) A district's annual
average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment multiplied by the
funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection (5)(c) of this
section, multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.

(5) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Average basic
education allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district
shall be based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.

(b) "Annual
average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment" means the
resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(c) "Enrollment
percent" means the district's resident special education annual average
enrollment including those students counted under the special education
demonstration projects, excluding the birth through age two enrollment, as a
percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment. For the 1999-00 and the 2000-01 school years, each district's
funded enrollment percent shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent for the school year for which the allocation is being
determined or 12.7 percent.

(6) At the request of any
interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost
services for special education students of the districts are provided by the
cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be 12.7, and shall be
calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For
purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.

(7) A maximum of
$12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and a maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided as safety net funding for districts with
demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (4) of this section. Safety net funding shall be
awarded by the state safety net oversight committee.

(a) The safety net
oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts adversely
affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding formula. Awards
shall be based on the amount required to maintain the 1994-95 state special
education excess cost allocation to the school district in aggregate or on a
dollar per funded student basis.

(b) The committee shall
then consider unusual needs of districts due to a special education population
which differs significantly from the assumptions of the state funding formula.
Awards shall be made to districts that convincingly demonstrate need due to the
concentration and/or severity of disabilities in the district. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy or service delivery style are
not a basis for safety net awards.

(c) The maximum
allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net eligibility may not exceed
the federal restricted indirect cost rate for the district plus one percent.

(d) Safety net awards
shall be adjusted based on the percent of potential medicaid eligible students
billed as calculated by the superintendent in accordance with Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5626 (medicaid payments to schools).

(e) Safety net awards
must be adjusted for any audit findings or exceptions related to special
education funding.

(f) The superintendent
may expend up to $100,000 per year of the amounts provided in this subsection
to provide staff assistance to the committee in analyzing applications for
safety net funds received by the committee.

(8) The superintendent
of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as are necessary to
administer the special education funding and safety net award process. Prior
to revising any standards, procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall
consult with the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of
the legislature.

(9) The safety net
oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public instruction shall
consist of:

(a) Staff of the office
of superintendent of public instruction;

(b) Staff of the office
of the state auditor;

(c) Staff of the office
of the financial management; and

(d) One or more
representatives from school districts or educational service districts
knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(10) To the extent
necessary, $5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall be
expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or more
individual special education students. If safety net awards to meet the
extraordinary needs of one or more individual special education students exceed
$5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, the superintendent
shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this
need. General fund‑-state funds shall not be expended for this purpose.

(11) A maximum of
$678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state appropriations to
fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at
children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of
money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special
education program.

(12) A maximum of
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for
projects to provide special education students with appropriate job and
independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(13) A school district
may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of general fund‑-state
funds allocated under this program; however, carry over funds shall be expended
in the special education program.

(14) The superintendent
shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85
percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased
federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education
services from educational service districts, and for staff development
activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(15) A maximum of
$1,200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation may be expended by the
superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion strategies by school
districts for provision of special education services. The superintendent
shall prepare an information database on laws, best practices, examples of
programs, and recommended resources. The information may be disseminated in a
variety of ways, including workshops and other staff development activities.

Sec. 506. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 508
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 7,738,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((7,771,000))

7,276,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((15,509,000))

15,014,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in each
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$507,000 may be expended for regional traffic safety education coordinators.

(3) The maximum basic
state allocation per student completing the program shall be $137.16 in the
1999-00 and 2000-01 school years.

(4) Additional
allocations to provide tuition assistance for students from low-income families
who complete the program shall be a maximum of $66.81 per eligible student in
the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years.

Sec. 507. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 510
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 102,563,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((122,114,000))

124,107,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((224,677,000))

226,670,000

Sec. 508. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 511
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 19,296,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((19,469,000))

18,249,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((47,313,000))

46,093,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding
provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a
220‑day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall
monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs
to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for
each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual
average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each
category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97
biennium.

(4) The funded staffing
ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of
corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99
biennium.

(5) $92,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($143,000))
$139,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional
staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12
enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated
instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of
institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social
and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for juveniles under
the juvenile rehabilitation administration.

(6) Ten percent of the
funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the
next.

Sec. 509. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 512
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 6,164,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((6,105,000))

6,090,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,269,000))

12,254,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
school district programs for highly capable students shall be distributed at a
maximum rate of $312.19 per funded student for the 1999-00 school year and (($310.43))
$310.40 per funded student for the 2000-01 school year, exclusive of
salary and benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number
of funded students shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's
full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

(3) $350,000 of the
appropriation is for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(4) $186,000 of the
appropriation is for the Washington imagination network and future
problem-solving programs.

Sec. 510. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 514
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 33,234,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((36,300,000))

35,413,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((69,534,000))

68,647,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $268,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $322,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the commission established under PART I of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5418 or Second Substitute House Bill No. 1462. If neither bill is enacted
by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall be used for
implementation of education reform and an accountability system by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) $9,307,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($11,329,000))
$10,442,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided for development and implementation of the Washington
assessments of student learning. Up to $689,000 of the appropriation may be
expended for data analysis and data management of test results.

(3) $2,190,000 is
provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom assistants and
certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as provided in RCW
28A.415.310.

(4) $6,818,000 is
provided for mentor teacher assistance, including state support activities,
under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260. Funds for the teacher assistance
program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number of beginning
teachers. The 1999 teacher preparation and development report from the
Washington institute for public policy found that (a) there are no state-wide
standards for what teacher assistance programs are intended to accomplish and
(b) the program has not been changed to reflect increased expectations for
improved student learning under education reform. By November 15, 2001, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report to the
education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate
documenting the outcomes of program changes implemented in response to the
study.

(5) $4,050,000 is
provided for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on
school district technology development, promoting standards for school district
technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support centers,
including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.

(6) $7,200,000 is
provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of care for
children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant proposals
from school districts shall contain local plans designed collaboratively with
community service providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area
in which the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible. Grant
funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(7) $5,000,000 is
provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through
28A.235.155.

(8) $1,260,000 is
provided for technical assistance related to education reform through the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the
commission on student learning or its successor, as specified in RCW
28A.300.130 (center for the improvement of student learning).

(9) $2,208,000 is
provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents,
principals, and program administrators.

(10) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely to establish a mathematics helping corps subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(a) In order to
increase the availability and quality of technical mathematics assistance
state-wide, the superintendent of public instruction, shall employ regional
school improvement coordinators and mathematics school improvement specialists
to provide assistance to schools and districts. The regional coordinators and
specialists shall be hired by and work under the direction of a state-wide
school improvement coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall
serve on a rotating basis from one to three years and shall not be permanent
employees of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) The school
improvement coordinators and specialists shall provide the following:

(i) Assistance to
schools to disaggregate student performance data and develop improvement plans
based on those data;

(ii) Consultation with
schools and districts concerning their performance on the Washington assessment
of student learning and other assessments emphasizing the performance on the
mathematics assessments;

(iii) Consultation
concerning curricula that aligns with the essential academic learning
requirements emphasizing the academic learning requirements for mathematics,
the Washington assessment of student learning, and meets the needs of diverse
learners;

(iv) Assistance in the
identification and implementation of research-based instructional practices in
mathematics;

(v) Staff training that
emphasizes effective instructional strategies and classroom-based assessment
for mathematics;

(vi) Assistance in
developing and implementing family and community involvement programs
emphasizing mathematics; and

(vii) Other assistance
to schools and school districts intended to improve student mathematics
learning.

(11) A maximum of
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided to expand
the number of summer accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of
public instruction and the commission on student learning or its successor.
The institutes shall provide school district staff with training in the
analysis of student assessment data, information regarding successful district
and school teaching models, research on curriculum and instruction, and
planning tools for districts to improve instruction in reading, mathematics,
language arts, and guidance and counseling but placing an emphasis on
mathematics.

(12) $8,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $8,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the Washington reading corps subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a) Grants shall be
allocated to schools and school districts to implement proven, research-based
mentoring and tutoring programs in reading for low-performing students in
grades K-6. If the grant is made to a school district, the principals of
schools enrolling targeted students shall be consulted concerning design and
implementation of the program.

(b) The programs may be
implemented before, after, or during the regular school day, or on Saturdays,
summer, intercessions, or other vacation periods.

(c) Two or more schools
may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) A program is
eligible for a grant if it meets one of the following conditions:

(i) The program is
recommended either by the education commission of the states or the Northwest
regional educational laboratory; or

(ii) The program is
developed by schools or school districts and is approved by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction based on the following criteria:

(A) The program employs
methods of teaching and student learning based on reliable reading/literacy
research and effective practices;

(B) The program design
is comprehensive and includes instruction, on-going student assessment,
professional development, parental/community involvement, and program
management aligned with the school's reading curriculum;

(C) It provides quality
professional development and training for teachers, staff, and volunteer
mentors and tutors;

(D) It has measurable
goals for student reading aligned with the essential academic learning
requirements; and

(E) It contains an
evaluation component to determine the effectiveness of the program.

(e) Funding priority
shall be given to low-performing schools.

(f) Beginning, interim,
and end-of-program testing data shall be available to determine the
effectiveness of funded programs and practices. Common evaluative criteria
across programs, such as grade-level improvements shall be available for each
reading corps program. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide
program evaluations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
Administrative and evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual
appropriation for the program.

(g) Grants provided
under this section may be used by schools and school districts for expenditures
from July 1, 1999, through August 31, 2001.

(13) $120,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $272,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for salary bonuses for teachers who attain certification by the national
board for professional teaching standards.

(a) During the 1999-00
school year, teachers who have attained certification by the national board
will receive a one-time 15 percent salary bonus. The bonus is provided in
recognition of their outstanding performance. The bonuses shall be provided
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i) For teachers
achieving certification prior to September 1, 1999, the bonus shall begin on
September 1, 1999.

(ii) Teachers enrolled
in the program prior to September 1, 1999, achieving certification during the
1999-2000 school year shall be eligible for the bonus for the number of months
during the school year that the individual has achieved certification.

(b) During the 2000-01
school year, teachers who have attained certification by the national board
during the 2000-01 school year or in prior school years will receive an annual
bonus of $3,500. The annual bonus will be paid in a lump sum amount. The
annual bonus provided under this subsection shall not be included in the
definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).

(c) It is the intent of
the legislature that teachers achieving certification by the national board of
professional teaching standards will receive no more than two bonus payments
under this subsection.

(14) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided for a
principal support program. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may contract with an independent organization to administer the
program. The program shall include: (a) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate; and (b)
participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of between one and
three years with the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her
build the skills identified as critical to the success of the professional
growth plan.

(15) $35,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $71,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the second grade reading test. The funds shall be expended
for assessment training for new second grade teachers and replacement of assessment
materials.

Sec. 511. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 515
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 35,876,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((37,605,000))

37,776,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((73,481,000))

73,652,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) The superintendent
shall distribute a maximum of $646.06 per eligible bilingual student in the
1999-00 school year and $641.64 in the 2000-01 school year, exclusive of salary
and benefit adjustments provided in section ((503 of this act)) 504,
chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess..

Sec. 512. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 516
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 68,936,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((69,470,000))

68,392,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((138,406,000))

137,328,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Funding for school
district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at maximum rates of
$382.08 per funded unit for the 1999-00 school year and $381.90 per funded unit
for the 2000-01 school year.

(3) A school district's
funded units for the 1999-2000 and 2000-01 school years shall be the sum of the
following:

(a) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6, multiplied by the 5-year average
4th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes
in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 3rd grade
test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year
lag; and

(b) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9, multiplied by the 5-year average
8th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes
in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 6th grade
test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these
grades on a 1-year lag; and

(c) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by the 5-year
average 11th grade lowest quartile test results, multiplied by 0.92. As
the 9th grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year
average for these grades on a 1-year lag; and

(d) If, in the prior
school year, the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded the state
average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible for free
and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result
by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.

(4) School districts may
carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning
assistance program.

Sec. 513. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 517
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 32,981,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((27,315,000))

27,389,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((60,296,000))

60,370,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Funds are provided
for local education program enhancements to meet educational needs as
identified by the school district, including alternative education programs.

(3) Allocations for the
1999-00 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of $28.81 per full-time
equivalent student and $28.81 per full-time equivalent student for the 2000-01
school year. Allocations shall be made on the monthly apportionment payment
schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250 and shall be based on school district
annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades kindergarten through
twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not more than one
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for small school
plants within any school district designated as remote and necessary schools,
the allocations shall be as follows:

(a) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students;

(b) Enrollment of not
more than twenty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven
and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time equivalent students;
and

(c) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine
through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time equivalent
students.

(4) Funding provided
pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition of basic education
for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the state's funding
duty thereunder.

(5) The superintendent
shall not allocate up to one-fourth of a district's funds under this section
if:

(a) The district is not
maximizing federal matching funds for medical services provided through special
education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX
funding); or

(b) The district is not
in compliance in filing truancy petitions as required under chapter 312, Laws
of 1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

Sec. 514. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 518
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BETTER SCHOOLS PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((57,500,000))

56,096,000

Better schools program
funds are appropriated to provide additional school improvement resources to
help students meet the essential academic learning requirements and student
assessment performance standards. ((It is the intent of the legislature
that these funds will be appropriated on an ongoing basis in future biennia.))
Allocations received under this section shall be used for the following new and
expanded educational enhancements as follows:

(1) (($37,389,000))
$35,985,000 of the appropriation shall be allocated for class size reduction
and expanded learning opportunities as follows:

(a) For the 2000-01
school year, an additional 2.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-4 per thousand full-time equivalent students are provided to
supplement the certificated staffing allocations under section 502 (2)(a) of
this act. Funds allocated for these additional certificated units shall not be
considered as basic education funding. The allocation may be used (i) for
reducing class sizes in grades K-4 or (ii) to provide additional classroom
contact hours for kindergarten, before-and-after-school programs, weekend
school programs, summer school programs, and intercession opportunities to
assist elementary school students in meeting the essential academic learning
requirements and student assessment performance standards. For purposes of
this subsection, additional classroom contact hours provided by teachers beyond
the normal school day under a supplemental contract shall be converted to a
certificated full-time equivalent by dividing the classroom contact hours by
900.

(b) Any district
maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 55.4 certificated instructional
staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may use
allocations generated under this subsection to employ additional certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades K-12 or to
provide additional classroom opportunities under (a) of this subsection in
grades K-12.

(c) Salary
calculations, nonemployee related costs, and substitute teacher allocations
shall be calculated in the same manner as provided under section 502 of this
act. The allocation includes salary and benefit increases equivalent to those
provided under section 503 of this act.

(2) $20,111,000 of the
appropriation shall be allocated for professional development and training as
follows:

(a) For fiscal year
2001, the funds shall be used for additional professional development for
certificated and classified staff, including additional paid time for
curriculum and lesson redesign and development work and training to ensure that
instruction is aligned with state standards and student needs.

(b) For fiscal year
2001, the superintendent shall allocate the funds to school districts at a rate
of $20.04 per student based on the October 1999 P-105 unduplicated headcount.

(c) School districts
shall allocate the funds to schools and the expenditure of the funds shall be
determined by the staff at each school site.

Sec. 515. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 519
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Education Savings Account‑-State
Appropriation. $ ((78,612,000))

28,077,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 35,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((113,612,000))

63,077,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($42,612,000 in
fiscal year 2000 and $36,000,000 in fiscal year 2001 are)) $28,077,000
of the education savings account is appropriated to the common school
construction account.

(2) The
education construction account appropriation shall be deposited in the common
school construction account.

(End
of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

Sec. 601. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 602
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 456,291,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((489,677,000))

490,377,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,404,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,000,000

Employment and Training
Trust Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 888,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((959,260,000))

959,960,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The technical
colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor to
conform with the percentage increase in community college operating fees.

(2)(a) $5,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $5,000,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to increase salaries and related benefits for part-time
faculty. The state board for community and technical colleges shall allocate
these funds to college districts based on the headcount of part-time faculty
under contract for the 1998-99 academic year. To earn these funds, a college
district must match the state funds with local revenue, the amounts for which
shall be determined by the state board. State fund allocations that go
unclaimed by a college district shall lapse. The board may provide salary
increases to part-time faculty in a total amount not to exceed $10,000,000 from
tuition revenues. The board shall report to the office of financial management
and legislative fiscal committees on the distribution of state funds, match
requirements of each district, and the wage adjustments for part-time faculty
by October 1 of each fiscal year.

(b) Each college
district shall examine its current ratio of part-time to full-time faculty by
discipline and report to the board a plan to reduce wage disparity and reliance
on part-time faculty through salary improvements, conversion of positions to
full-time status, and other remedies deemed appropriate given labor market
conditions and educational programs offered in each community. The board shall
set long-term performance targets for each district with respect to use of
part-time faculty and monitor progress annually. The board shall report to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature on implementation of
this subsection by no later than December 1, 1999, with recommendations for the
ensuing biennium provided no later than December 1, 2000.

(3) $1,155,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $2,345,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for faculty salary increments and associated benefits and may be used in
combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide
faculty salary increments and associated benefits. To the extent general
salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the general salary
increase shall be reduced by the same amount.

(4) $950,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $950,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely to lower the part-time faculty retirement eligibility threshold to fifty
percent of the full-time workload.

(5) $332,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $3,153,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for Cascadia Community College start-up and enrollment costs.

(6) $1,441,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,441,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for 500 FTE enrollment slots to implement RCW 28B.50.259
(timber-dependent communities).

(7) $27,775,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $28,761,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and the
entire employment and training trust account appropriation are provided solely
as special funds for training and related support services, including financial
aid, child care, and transportation, as specified in chapter 226, Laws of 1993
(employment and training for unemployed workers).

(a) Funding is provided
to support up to 7,200 full-time equivalent students in each fiscal year.

(b) The state board for
community and technical colleges shall submit a plan for allocation of the
full-time equivalent students provided in this subsection to the workforce
training and education coordinating board for review and approval.

(8) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for tuition support for students enrolled in work-based learning
programs.

(9) $567,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $568,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job
skills program.

(10) $750,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $750,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for grants to expand information technology and computer science
programs. Successful grant applications from a college, partnerships of
colleges, or partnerships of colleges and K-12 school districts must include a
match of cash, in-kind, or donations equivalent to the grant amount. Grant
applications shall receive priority that prepare students to meet industry
standards, achieve industry skill certificates, or continue to upper division
computer science or computer engineering studies. No college may receive more
than $300,000 from appropriations in this section. The state board for
community and technical colleges shall report the implementation of this
section to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2001,
including plans of successful grant recipients for the continuation of programs
funded by this section.

(11) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the Pierce College branch at Puyallup.

(12) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are solely for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5277 (higher education student
child care matching grants). In no case shall funds provided in this
subsection be used to construct or remodel facilities. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13) Funding in this
section provides for the collection and reporting of Washington enrollment
data, and related activities, for the distance learning information project
described in section 129 of this act.

(14) $425,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to
Olympic college. Olympic college shall contract with accredited baccalaureate
institution(s) to bring a program of upper-division courses, concentrating on
but not limited to business, education, and human relations, to Bremerton.
Moneys may be used by Olympic college during either fiscal year to equip and
support a state-owned or state-leased facility in Bremerton where contracted
courses are delivered.

(15) $1,000,000 of the
education construction account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
is provided to replace failing roofs at Columbia basin college.

(16) $500,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided for
assistance to students with disabilities.

(17) $750,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely for a
student centered online delivery system to broaden access and increase use of
college catalogs, schedules, and registration systems.

(18) $658,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely
for maintenance and operations of Cascadia college phase 2, and for facilities
previously authorized for construction with certificates of participation:

(a) Workforce training
facility at Columbia basin college;

(b) Student services
auditorium at Columbia basin college;

(c) Music building at
Edmonds community college;

(d) Student center at
South Puget Sound community college;

(e) Addition to the
Lair student center at Spokane community college;

(f) Addition to the
student union building at Yakima Valley community college; and

(g) Classroom and child
care facility at Whatcom community college.

Sec. 602. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 606
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 42,060,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((44,726,000))

45,026,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((86,786,000))

87,086,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $312,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $312,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely
for competitively offered recruitment, retention, and equity salary adjustments
for instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section to
further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments. The university
shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating budget request
submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of this
section.

(2) The
office of financial management shall hold and release funds to the university
at the rate of $4,756 per enrolled state FTE student in excess of fiscal year
2000 actual annualized enrollment as determined in the budget driver tracking
report prepared by the office of financial management. Of the amounts held
pursuant to this subsection, $300,000 shall be released to the university for
the sole purpose of implementing enrollment improvement initiatives, and any
remaining moneys not earned by the university for enrolling additional
state students during the 2000-2001 academic year shall lapse to the education
savings account at the close of the biennium.

(End
of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 701. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 701
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT
TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 634,792,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((435,288,000))

436,354,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,797,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retirement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 2,565,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,079,442,000))

1,080,508,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriations are for deposit into the debt-limit general fund
bond retirement account. The appropriation for fiscal year 2000 shall be
deposited in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by June 30,
2000.

Sec. 702. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 703
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 23,678,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 23,283,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((695,000))

545,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account--

State Appropriation........................ $ 150,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((119,977,000))

117,077,000

Stadium and Exhibition
Center Construction‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,970,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((169,603,000))

166,703,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriation is for deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund
bond retirement account.

Sec. 703. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 704
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 567,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 568,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((83,000))

63,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation...................... ........ $ 1,237,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account--

State Appropriation........................ $ 20,000

Public Safety Reimbursable
Bond Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 0

Stadium/Exhibition Center
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,705,000

Total Bond Retirement and
Interest Appropriations

contained in sections
701 through 704

of this act and section
704, chapter 309,

Laws of 1999............................... $ ((1,295,863,000))

1,292,963,000

Sec. 704. 1999 c 309 s 708
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL

General Fund--State
Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,000,000

Disaster Response
Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,000,000

((The sum of three
million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on June 30, 1999, from
the total amount of unspent fiscal year 1999 fire contingency funding in)) The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund--state appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the disaster response account. The disaster response
account((, is appropriated)) appropriation is provided for the
purpose of making allocations to the military department for fire mobilizations
costs or to the department of natural resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
705. A new section is added
to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for
sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved
by the director of general administration, except as otherwise provided, as
follows:

(1) Reimbursement of
criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW
9A.16.110:

(a) Gregory Sykes,
claim number SCJ 2001-01 $ 6,647

(b) Daniel Anker, claim
number SCJ 2001-02 $ 17,584

(c) Joshua Swaney,
claim number SCJ 2001-03 $ 32,000

(d) Yanis Nadzins,
claim number SCJ 2001-04 $ 5,000

(e) Shawn Kostelec,
claim number SCJ 2001-05 $ 2,800

(f) Terry Hanson, claim
number SCJ 2001-07 $ 6,742

(g) Allen West, claim
number SCJ 2001-08 $ 9,001

(h) Kim McLemore, claim
number SCJ 2001-09 $ 920

(i) Norma Vasquez,
claim number SCJ 2001-11 $ 1,110

(j) Clifford Stewart,
claim number SCJ 2001-12 $ 2,948

(k) Lee Sumerlin, claim
number SCJ 2001-14 $ 135

(l) Maxwell Jones,
claim number SCJ 2001-16 $ 6,840

(2) Payment from the
state wildlife account for damage to crops by wildlife, pursuant to RCW
77.36.050:

(a) Carl Anderson,
claim number SCG 2001-02 $ 30,357

(b) Marshall Anderson,
claim number SCG 2001-03 $ 20,439

(c) Richard Anderson,
claim number SCG 2001-04 $ 34,196

(d) Bud Hamilton, claim
number SCG 2001-05 $ 97,761

(e) Ice Brothers, claim
number SCG 2001-06 $ 23,922

(f) Dick Rubenser,
claim number SCG 2001-07 $ 14,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
706. A new section is added
to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

Any program costs or
money in this act that is shifted to the general fund from another fund or
account requires an adjustment to the state expenditure limit under RCW
43.135.035(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
707. A new section is added
to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY--AGRICULTURAL COLLEGE
TRUST LANDS. The sum of sixteen
million dollars is appropriated from the education construction account to the
agricultural permanent account as full and final payment of the agricultural
college trust land settlement effective May 24, 1999, between the office of
financial management and Washington State University, and shall be used to
support financing of the health sciences building in Spokane.

Sec. 708. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 730
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH
ASSISTANCE

The sum of $33,183,801
is appropriated from the health services account to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for distribution for the purposes of
public health. Of the amounts provided, $11,061,266 is to be distributed for
((calendar)) fiscal year 2000 for the period from ((July))
January 1 through ((December 31)) June 30, and $22,122,535
is to be distributed for ((calendar)) fiscal year 2001, to the
following counties and health districts in the amounts designated:

1999-2001

County or Health District FY 2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Adams County Health District 15,165 30,330 45,495

Asotin County Health District 30,008 60,015 90,023

Benton-Franklin Health District 551,371 1,102,742 1,654,113

Chelan-Douglas Health District 79,726 159,451 239,177

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department 68,512 137,024 205,536

Southwest Washington Health District 512,816 1,025,631 1,538,447

Columbia County Health District 19,857 39,715 59,572

Cowlitz County Health Department 129,921 259,842 389,763

Garfield County Health District 7,363 14,726 22,089

Grant County Health District 48,355 96,710 145,065

Grays Harbor Health Department 90,088 180,176 270,264

Island County Health Department 37,465 74,930 112,395

Jefferson County Health and Human Services 38,072 76,145 114,217

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health 4,153,122 8,306,245 12,459,367

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District 271,037 542,074 813,111

Kittitas County Health Department 38,712 77,425 116,137

Klickitat County Health Department 24,002 48,004 72,006

Lewis County Health Department 49,704 99,409 149,113

Lincoln County Health Department 10,306 20,613 30,919

Mason County Department of Health Services 40,946 81,893 122,839

Okanogan County Health District 30,549 61,099 91,648

Pacific County Health Department 37,935 75,871 113,806

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department 1,372,177 2,744,353 4,116,530

San Juan County Health and Community Services 15,058 30,116 45,174

Skagit County Health Department 98,115 196,230 294,345

Snohomish Health District 1,090,447 2,180,893 3,271,340

Spokane County Health District 1,027,015 2,054,031 3,081,046

Northeast Tri-County Health District 47,995 95,991 143,986

Thurston County Health Department 287,121 574,242 861,363

Wahkiakum County Health Department 6,748 13,495 20,243

Walla Walla County-City Health Department 83,532 167,063 250,595

Whatcom County Health Department 409,608 819,215 1,228,823

Whitman County Health Department 38,071 76,142 114,213

Yakima Health District 300,347 600,694 901,041

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $11,061,266 $22,122,535 $33,183,801

(End
of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 801. 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 802
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

Local Toxics Control
Account: For transfer to

the state toxics
control account on or

before June 1, 2000, an
amount equal to

$1,500,000. This
transfer shall be

repaid to the local toxics
control account

from moneys in the
state toxics control

account by June 30,
2005. The transfer

shall be repaid prior
to June 30, 2005,

to the extent that
moneys are received

from the cost recovery
action at the

Everett smelter site....................... $ 1,500,000

Park Land Trust Revolving
Fund: For transfer

to the common school
construction fund,

$13,350,000 of the
amount deposited into

the park land trust
revolving fund on

January 6, 2000, plus
all interest attributed

to that amount that has
accrued since

deposit, up to (($13,550,000))
$13,650,400.

Nothing in this section
constitutes an

authorization or
ratification of the transaction

that resulted in this
deposit.............. $ ((13,550,000))

13,650,400

Park Land Trust Revolving
Fund: For transfer

to the natural
resources real property

replacement account,
$3,200,000 of the

amount deposited into
the park land trust

revolving fund on
January 6, 2000, plus

all interest attributed
to that amount

that has accrued since
deposit, up to

$3,300,000. Nothing in
this section

constitutes an
authorization or ratification

of the transaction that
resulted in this

deposit.................................... $ 3,300,000

Sec. 802. 1999 c 309 s 803
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

General Fund: For transfer
to the Water Quality

Account.................................... $ 83,423,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the Flood Control

Assistance Account......................... $ 4,000,000

State Convention and Trade
Center Account: For

transfer to the State
Convention and Trade

Center Operations
Account.................. $ 3,800,000

Water Quality Account: For
transfer to the Water

Pollution Control
Account. Transfers shall be

made at intervals coinciding
with deposits of

federal capitalization
grant money into the

account. The amounts
transferred shall not

exceed the match
required for each federal

deposit.................................... $ 16,350,000

State Treasurer's Service
Account: For transfer to

the general fund on or
before June 30, 2001, an

amount up to
$10,000,000 in excess of the cash

requirements of the
State Treasurer's Service

Account.................................... $ 10,000,000

Public Works Assistance
Account: For transfer to

the Drinking Water
Assistance Account...... $ 7,700,000

County Sales and Use Tax
Equalization Account:

For transfer to the
County Public Health

Account.................................... $ 2,577,664

Public Health Services
Account: For transfer to

the County Public
Health Account........... $ 1,056,000

State Emergency Water
Projects Revolving Account:

For transfer to the
State Drought Preparedness

Account.................................... $ 6,800,000

Tobacco Settlement
Account: For transfer to

the Health Services
Account in an amount not

to exceed the actual
balance of the tobacco

settlement account......................... $ 223,087,000

State Toxics Control
Account: For transfer to the

local toxics control
account on or before

June 30, 2001, up to
$2,500,000, but not

greater than the loan
enacted in the 1999

supplemental budget.
The exact amount and

timing of the transfer
shall be determined

by the office of
financial management,

based on state toxics
control account fund

balances................................... $ 2,500,000

Health Services
Account: For transfer to the

state general fund
by June 30, 2001, for health

services purposes
consistent with RCW 43.72.900.

Pursuant to RCW
43.135.035(5), the state

expenditure limit
shall be increased in fiscal

year
2001 to reflect this transfer......... $ 123,000,000

(End
of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

Sec. 901. 2000 c 241 s 4
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

JOINT TASK FORCE ON
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS

This act expires March
30, ((2002)) 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
902. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 903. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS.................................... 2

ATTORNEY
GENERAL............................................... 10

CASELOAD
FORECAST COUNCIL...................................... 11

CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 137

CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS.......... 9

COMMISSION
ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS......................... 17

COMMISSION
ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS............................ 9

COMMISSION
ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS................................. 16

COMMISSION
ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT.................................. 1

CRIMINAL
JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION........................... 61

DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

COUNTY
PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE............................... 141

DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 69

DEPARTMENT
OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 77

DEPARTMENT
OF FISH AND WILDLIFE................................ 86

DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH........................................... 65

DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES............................. 63

DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING........................................ 96

DEPARTMENT
OF NATURAL RESOURCES................................ 91

DEPARTMENT
OF PERSONNEL........................................ 15

DEPARTMENT
OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

OPERATIONS..................................................... 17

DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE.......................................... 18

DEPARTMENT
OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND........................... 75

DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES....................... 23

ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM................. 59

AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM............................... 44

ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM............................ 52

CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM........................... 24

DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM............................. 40

ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM...................................... 47

JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM................................ 29

MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM..................................... 53

MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM.......................................... 34

VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM.............................. 58

DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS................................. 64

EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT................................. 75

JOINT
TASK FORCE ON LOCAL GOVERNMENTS......................... 146

LIQUOR
CONTROL BOARD........................................... 19

MILITARY
DEPARTMENT............................................ 21

OFFICE
OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.............................. 15

OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT................................. 12

FIRE
CONTINGENCY POOL......................................... 139

OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE........................................ 4

OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR.......................................... 5

PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION.................................... 6

SECRETARY
OF STATE.............................................. 6

STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES.............. 133

STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 132

STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION.......................... 84

STATE
PATROL................................................... 97

STATE
TREASURER

BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST............................. 138, 139

TRANSFERS................................................ 143,
144

SUNDRY
CLAIMS................................................. 140

SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

BETTER
SCHOOLS PROGRAM........................................ 131

EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS..................................... 123

GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT.................................... 100, 106

INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.............................. 121

LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM................................... 128

LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE....................................... 121

LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS....................................... 129

PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS.......................... 122

PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION.......................................... 115

SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS...................... 113

SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.................................... 116

STATE
ADMINISTRATION.......................................... 100

TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS............................. 120

TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS............................... 128

WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

AGRICULTURAL
COLLEGE TRUST LANDS.............................. 141

---
END ---