BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

Deferred Maintenance
Reduction Backlog Projects: Regional Archive (02-1-002)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 415,000

-------------

TOTAL.... ................................ $ 515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE
SECRETARY OF STATE

Eastern Branch ArchivesBDesign (98-2-001)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the design of the eastern regional archives
facilities to be sited at the Riverpoint higher education park in Spokane.
Construction of the facility will be financed through alternative financing authority
provided in section 907 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 295,482

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 530,972

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 826,454

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Rural Washington Loan
Fund (RWLF)(88-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 558,554

Rural Washington Loan
Account‑-Federal.......... $ 441,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 999,554

Appropriation:

Rural Washington Loan
Account‑-Federal.......... $ 5,650,367

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,745,331

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,395,252

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Grays Harbor Dredging
(88-2-006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 982,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 17,500

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Snohomish County
Drainage (92-2-011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 128,584

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 79,584

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 208,168

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seventh Street Theatre
(90-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 51,110

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 78,890

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Mirabeau Point
Community Complex (98-2-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The amount is
provided solely for a grant to Spokane county for design and development costs
for Mirabeau Point community complex.

(2) The amount
represents the entire state contribution to the project and shall be matched by
$8,500,000 in contributions toward the project from nonstate sources.

(3) The reappropriation
is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 351,255

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,148,745

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Sand Point Shoreline
Restoration (00-1-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided to the city of Seattle for shoreline improvements and
wetland restoration at Sand Point. The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Building for the Arts
(00-2-005)

The reappropriation in
this section shall support the projects as listed in section 113, chapter 379,
Laws of 1999.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 664,268

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 31,183,732

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 31,848,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Building for the Arts
(02-4-100)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750. The following
projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Recommendation

Orcas Theatre, Eastsound $400,000

Empty Space Theatre,
Fremont $29,000

Music Works Northwest,
Bellevue $475,000

Hands on Children's Museum,
Olympia $130,000

Spokane Symphony, Spokane $230,000

Mt. Baker Theatre,
Bellingham $128,000

IKEA Performing Arts
Center, Renton $135,000

Seattle Art Museum, Seattle $1,000,000

Town Hall, Seattle $175,000

Gladish Center, Pullman $29,000

Broadway Center, Tacoma $50,000

CREATE, Newport $21,000

Spectrum Dance Theatre,
Seattle $78,000

Gallery One, Ellensburg $225,000

Lake Chelan Bachfest,
Chelan $38,000

Historic Seattle
Preservation, Seattle $390,000

Historic Everett Theatre,
Everett $350,000

Holy Names Music Center,
Spokane $50,000

Youth Theatre Northwest,
Mercer Island $67,000

Subtotal $4,000,000

Alternate Projects

Youth Theatre Northwest,
Mercer Island $158,000

Subtotal $158,000

Total $4,158,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Services
Facilities Program (00-02-006)

The reappropriation in
this section shall support the projects as listed in section 1007, chapter 1,
Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 872,738

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 10,780,262

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,653,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Services
Facilities Program (02-4-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125. The following
projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Recommendation

YMCA of Grays Harbor,
Aberdeen $300,000

Community Youth Services,
Olympia $300,000

Skagit County Community
Action, Concrete $300,000

Kindering Center, Bellevue $300,000

Bellevue Family YMCA,
Bellevue $300,000

Refugee Women's Alliance,
Seattle $300,000

YWCA of Walla Walla, Walla
Walla $300,000

Pierce County Alliance
(facility), Tacoma $61,000

Compass Health, Everett $300,000

Mid-City Concerns, Spokane $28,000

Children's Home Society,
Vaughn $70,000

Children's Home society,
Spokane $238,000

Catholic Family/Child
Services, Yakima $152,000

Korean Women's Association,
Tacoma $218,000

Factory Small Biz
Incubator, Tacoma $300,000

Lao Highland Association of
King County, Seattle $119,000

First Place, Seattle $300,000

NE Washington Rural
Resources, Colville $300,000

Subtotal $4,186,000

Alternate Projects

Nooksack Community Aid
Society, Deming $165,000

Childhaven, Seattle $149,000

Subtotal $500,000

Total $4,500,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,186,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,186,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing for Homeless
Families With Children Program (00-2-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided solely for the development of emergency shelters and
transitional housing opportunities for homeless families with children. The
department shall minimize the amount of funds that are utilized for staff and administrative
purposes.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
114. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing for Homeless
Families with Children Program (02-4-012)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the development of emergency shelters and
transitional housing opportunities for homeless families with children. The
department shall minimize the amount of funds that are utilized for staff and
administrative purposes.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
115. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Farmworker Housing
Assistance (00-2-011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
is provided solely for facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, and
temporary farmworkers.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that operation of the facilities built under this section be in
compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342.

(3) The department
shall minimize the amount of these funds that are utilized for staff and
administrative purposes or for other administrative purposes.

(4) By December 15,
2001, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the progress of the development of housing for
farmworkers, including a list of projects funded under this section.

(5) The department
shall work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize funding
of projects to the areas of highest need.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
116. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Farmworker Housing
Assistance (02-4-011)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is provided solely for facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or
temporary farmworkers.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that operation of the facilities built under this section be in
compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342.

(3) The department
shall minimize the amount of these funds that are utilized for staff and
administrative purposes or other operational expenses.

(4) By September 1,
2002, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the progress of the development of housing for
farmworkers, including a list of projects funded under this section.

(5) The department
shall work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize funding
of projects to the areas of highest need.

(6) Funding may also be
provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for health and safety
projects.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 32,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing Assistance,
Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (00‑2‑003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in section
111, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 26,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 35,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 61,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
118. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing Assistance,
Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (02‑4‑010)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the
new appropriation from the state building construction account is provided
solely to promote development of safe and affordable housing units for persons
eligible for services from the division of developmental disabilities within
the department of social and health services.

(2) $3,000,000 of the
appropriation from the state building construction account is provided solely
for grants to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for
revolving loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income
families.

(3) If chapter
. . . (Senate Bill No. 5936 (providing funds for housing projects)),
Laws of 2001 is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the appropriation in this section
from the Washington housing trust account shall lapse.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 65,000,000

Washington Housing
Trust Account................ $ 5,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 70,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 270,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
119. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Burke Museum Governance
and Siting Study (00-2-012)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funds are provided
for a study of the governance of the Burke museum and for an examination of the
potential expansion of the museum facility including siting issues. The study
shall be facilitated by the University of Washington, the department of
community, trade, and economic development's tourism and economic development
units, the executive director of the Washington state historical society, the
city of Seattle, King county, and members of the community and businesses from
various geographic regions of the state. The department shall provide a report
to the legislature by June 30, 2002, outlining funding strategies for an
expanded state natural history museum that recognizes the limited state
resources for capital facilities programmatic enhancements, and outlines
alternative funding resources and partners.

(2) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

University of
Washington Building

Account‑-State.......................... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
120. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Clark County Skills
Center (00-4-100)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section must be matched by at least $1,300,000 from other sources.

(2) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section
906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
121. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Holly Park Education
Center (00-4-101)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for education space in the Holly Park
housing development for South Seattle Community College.

(2) The reappropriation
in this section must be matched by an equal amount from other sources.

(3) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section
906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
122. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB) (86-1-001)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 655,517

Public Facility
Construction Loan

Revolving
Account‑‑State.................. $ 4,868,347

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,523,864

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,433,892

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,957,756

NEW SECTION. Sec.
123. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

County Public Facility
Construction (00-2-010)

The reappropriations in
this section shall be used solely for financial assistance to distressed
counties that have experienced extraordinary costs due to the location of a
major new business facility or the substantial expansion of an existing
business facility in the county. The entire reappropriation from the state
building construction account shall be provided as a grant to support the Grays
Harbor water system project and is subject to the conditions and limitations of
section 906(2)(b) of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,500,000

Distressed County
Facilities Construction Loan

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,619,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 6,119,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,119,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
124. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB)(00-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section from the public facilities construction loan revolving account is
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall ensure that all funds transferred from the public works assistance
account into the public facility construction loan revolving account during the
1999‑2001 biennium are used only for loans to local governments.

(2) The department
shall ensure that all principal and interest payments from these loans are paid
into the public works assistance account.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,519,054

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,121,946

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
125. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community Economic
Revitalization (CERB) (02-4-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall ensure that the $5,000,000 transferred from the public works assistance
account into the public facilities construction loan revolving account during
the 2001-2003 biennium is used only for loans to local governments. The
department shall ensure that all principal and interest payments from these
loans are paid into the public works assistance account.

(2) Appropriations from
the public facility construction loan revolving account shall be used solely to
provide loans to eligible local governments and grants to the extent
permissible by law. The department shall ensure that all principal and
interest payments from loans made on moneys from this account are paid into
this account, except as otherwise required in subsection (1) of this section.

Appropriation:

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 7,725,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,725,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
126. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (98-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding from the
state public works trust fund program shall be matched with federal sources to
improve the quality of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely
for projects that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

(2) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2002, on the progress of the program, including administrative and technical
assistance procedures, the application process and funding priorities.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 3,926,937

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 13,722,063

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
127. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (00-2-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding from the
state public works trust fund program shall be matched with new federal sources
to improve the quality of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely
for projects that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

(2) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2002, on the progress of the program, including administrative and technical
assistance procedures, the application process, and funding priorities.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 7,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (02-4-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding from the
state public works trust fund program shall be matched with new federal sources
to improve the quality of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely
for projects that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

(2) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2002, on the progress of the program, including administrative and technical
assistance procedures, the application process, and funding priorities.

Appropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 7,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 30,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public Works Trust Fund
(94-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 75,159,028

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 68,460,146

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 143,619,174

NEW SECTION. Sec.
130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public Works Trust Fund
(00-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 143,971,288

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 59,178,712

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 203,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public Works Trust Fund
(02-4-013)

Preconstruction,
emergency, and planning loans shall be provided in accordance with the
provisions of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1000), Laws of
2001. If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1000), Laws of
2001 is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the following conditions and limitations
apply:

(1) $10,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the preconstruction
program as set forth in RCW 43.155.068.

(2) $2,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section is for the emergency loan program as set forth in
RCW 43.155.065.

(3) Not more than one
percent of the appropriation may be used for planning loans.

Appropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State..... $ 225,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)........... $ 1,215,700,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 1,441,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seattle Chinese Gardens
(02-4-014)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $200,000
of the appropriation in this section shall be matched by $200,000 in additional
contributions toward the project from local government.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Filipino Community of
Seattle (02-4-009)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000
of the appropriation in this section shall be matched by $250,000 in additional
contributions toward the project from local government.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seahurst Environmental
Learning Center (01-S-007)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
135. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seattle Center
Redevelopment (01-S-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Fort Vancouver National
Historic Reserve (01-S-002)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
137. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Chewelah Peak
Environmental Learning Center (01-S-003)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
138. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Cancer Research
Facility Grant (01-S-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriation in
this section is provided as a grant for equipment and facilities improvements
for a joint cancer research project between the University of Washington and
the Fred Hutchinson cancer research center. The appropriation shall be matched
by an equal amount of nonstate funds.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
139. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Fox Theater Project
(01-S-006)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
140. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Historic Carriage
Museum (01-S-008)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 239,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 239,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
141. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Des Moines Beach Park -
Structure Relocation (01-S-010)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
142. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Wapato Filipino
Community Center, Roof Repairs (01-S-015)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
143. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Upper Kittitas County,
Emergency Management Service Facility (01-S-16)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 920,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
144. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

Budget System
Improvements (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

Funds are provided
solely for the following studies and activities:

(1) Budget evaluation
study team reviews of project proposals;

(2) The compilation of
benchmarking data and the development of standards for construction costs;

(3) Contracts
associated with a higher education facility financial responsibility study to
be conducted in conjunction with the higher education coordinating board and
the state board for community and technical colleges that shall provide
guidelines for project cost sharing between state and federal funds,
institutional funds, student fees and charges, and private donations; and

(4) Other studies and
system improvements planned in consultation with the house capital budget
committee and the senate committee on ways and means.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
145. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Residential
Habilitation Study (01-S-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The office of financial
management shall enter into a contract with the joint legislative audit and
review committee to conduct a study of the possible alternative uses of the
land and facilities currently used by state operated residential habilitation
centers and nursing facilities for persons with developmental disabilities.
The study shall include an assessment of fair market value of the land and
facilities at each of the five locations. The study shall estimate the
possible future revenue from alternative uses of the land, or the facilities,
or both, that would produce the highest rate of return for the support of the
state developmental disabilities program. The study shall also project the
trend of declining resident population due to recent court rulings and natural
attrition.

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational,
Penal and

Reformatory
Institutions Account‑-State... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
146. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

East Plaza Repairs
(96-1-002)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$16,000,000 of the appropriation from the state vehicle parking account is
subject to the approval of a reimbursable bond.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 900,000

Appropriation:

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State............. $ 19,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 21,667,150

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,767,150

NEW SECTION. Sec.
147. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Transportation Building
Preservation (98-1-008)

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,884,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,234,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
148. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Transportation Building
Preservation (02-1-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,001,250

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,098,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,099,250

NEW SECTION. Sec.
149. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Heritage Park/Capitol
Lake (00-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction

Account‑‑State........................... $ 250,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 950,000

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction

Account‑‑State........................... $ 2,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 13,209,774

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,180,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,439,774

NEW SECTION. Sec.
150. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative Buildings:
Safety and Infrastructure (98-1-005)

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 660,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 440,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,210,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
151. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative Building:
Rehabilitation (01‑1‑008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,000,000

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
152. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Emergency/Small Repairs
and Improvements (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 100,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 900,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)................ ... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
153. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Thurston County
Facilities: Preservation (00-1-009)

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
154. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Thurston County
Facilities: Preservation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 1,110,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,860,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,861,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,831,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 35,636,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,467,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
155. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol Campus
Facilities: Preservation (00-1-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 900,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 75,000

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,025,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,140,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
156. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol Campus
Infrastructure Preservation (02-1-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 24,050,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
157. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

North Cascades Gateway
Center: Preservation (00-1-010)

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 210,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 397,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 607,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
158. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

North Cascades Gateway
Center Minor Works (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General
Fund/Private/Local....................... $ 500,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,685,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
159. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Cherberg Building:
Rehabilitation (02-1-005)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 695,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
160. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Pritchard Library:
Rehabilitation (02-1-006)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
161. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (02-1-999)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
162. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol Campus Chiller
Plant and Loop (02-2-006)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 50,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 550,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,220,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
163. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Engineering and
Architectural Services (02-2-012)

The appropriation in
this section shall be used to provide those services to state agencies required
by RCW 43.19.450 that are essential and mandated activities defined as core
services and are included in the engineering and architectural services
responsibilities and task list for general public works projects of normal
complexity. The department may negotiate agreements with agencies for
additional fees to manage exceptional projects including projects financed with
alternative financing or for services above core services as described as
optional and extra services in the task list.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 220,700

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 772,700

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,057,800

Thurston County Capital
Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 386,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 9,437,200

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 43,049,325

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 52,486,525

NEW SECTION. Sec.
164. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Isabella Bush Records
Center: Expansion (02-3-001)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital
Facilities Account‑-State $ 344,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 344,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
165. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Tumwater Office
Building 1 (01-S-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

Planning funds are
provided to lease/develop a state office building of 150,000 to 200,000 square
feet on state-owned property in Tumwater according to the terms of the
agreement with the Port of Olympia when the property was acquired. The
building shall be constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will
not exceed comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general
office space rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston county
leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for
inflation as determined by the department of general administration. The
department of general administration shall coordinate with potential state
agency tenants whose current lease expire near the time of occupancy so that
buyout of current leases do not add to state expense.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
166. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works to Support
Federal Construction Projects (98-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 280,913

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 305,193

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 586,106

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,766,394

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,352,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
167. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Minor Works to Support
Federal Construction Projects (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 10,248,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,277,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 12,525,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 62,340,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 74,865,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
168. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Yakima Readiness
Center: Construction (98-2-001)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funds expended on
this project for off‑site utility infrastructure that may include the
provision of electricity, natural gas service, water service, or sewer service
shall be for the benefit of the state. Entities that subsequently connect or
use this off‑site utility infrastructure shall reimburse the state at a
rate proportional to their use. The department shall develop policies and
procedures to ensure that this reimbursement occurs.

(2) The appropriations
in this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(3) No money shall be
committed or expended from the state building construction account until the
general fund‑‑federal construction funds are received and allotted
in accordance with section 903 of this act.

(4) In addition to the
annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the
department will file quarterly project progress reports with the office of
financial management. These reports will contain local, state, and federal
funding reconciliations and balance sheets for this project and will detail any
federal intentions on future readiness center projects.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,523,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,520,966

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,043,966

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 6,522,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 653,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,175,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,737,876

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,956,842

NEW SECTION. Sec.
169. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Centralia Readiness
Center: Preservation (00-1-030)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 700,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
170. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Preservation
Projects-Statewide (02-1-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,478,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,116,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,594,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
171. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Infrastructure
Projects-Savings (02-1-009)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
172. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Spokane Combined Public
Safety Training Center (02-2-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) No money shall be
committed or expended from the state building construction account until the
general fund‑‑federal construction funds are received and allotted
in accordance with section 903 of this act.

(3) In addition to the
annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the
department will file quarterly project progress reports with the office of
financial management. These reports will contain local, state, and federal
funding reconciliations and balance sheets for this project and will detail any
federal intentions on future readiness center projects.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 9,996,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,613,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 14,609,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,899,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
173. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Bremerton Readiness
Center (02-2-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) No money shall be
committed or expended from the state building construction account until the
general fund‑‑federal construction funds are received and allotted
in accordance with section 903 of this act.

(3) In addition to the
annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the
department will file quarterly project progress reports with the office of
financial management. These reports will contain local, state, and federal
funding reconciliations and balance sheets for this project and will detail any
federal intentions on future readiness center projects.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 5,446,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State.. ... $ 3,921,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 9,367,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
174. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Fort Lewis Readiness
Center (02-2-010)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 19,941,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,941,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
175. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Combined Support
Maintenance Shop (02-2-011)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 17,032,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,032,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
176. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Combined Regional
Training Institute (02-2-012)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 14,712,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,712,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
177. FOR THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Phase 2 Yakima Maneuver
and Training Equipment Site (02-2-013)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 11,304,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
178. FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND
TRADE CENTER

Seattle Convention
Center: Replacement Housing (00-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State Convention and
Trade Center

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,745,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,255,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
179. FOR THE STATE CONVENTION
AND TRADE CENTER

Repairs and
Improvements (01-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $545,000 is
provided for payment to the department of transportation for fire control and
other improvements to the I-90 tunnel.

(2) $2,650,000 is
provided for chiller and window replacement and roof repairs.

Appropriation:

State Convention and
Trade Center

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,195,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,195,000

(End
of part)

PART
2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

Site Improvements -
Minor Works (02-1-005)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

Building Omnibus Minor
Works (02-1-007)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES

Facilities Preservation
and Improvement (02-1-001)

Appropriation:

Accident Account‑‑State......................... $ 325,000

Medical Aid Account‑‑State....................... $ 325,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 650,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane School:
Wastewater Treatment Plant (94‑1‑201)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 339,945

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,767,109

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,107,054

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Crisis Residential
Centers (96‑1‑900)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen Children's
Center ‑ Site: Infrastructure Improvements (96‑2‑229)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,215,229

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,312,523

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,527,752

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School
Redevelopment: 416 Bed Institution (96‑2‑230)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,853,668

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 14,995,479

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,849,147

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Medical Lake Wastewater
Treatment Facility (96‑1‑301)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 921,597

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 8,459,550

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,381,147

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State
Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98‑2‑002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,365,463

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 15,330,537

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen Children's
Center ‑ Vocational Education: Construction (98‑2‑211)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 298,838

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,916,667

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 180,162

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,361,450

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State
Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98‑2‑052)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 25,829,040

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,059,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 22,406,301

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,294,341

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane: 124 Bed
Housing (98-2-216)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 126,545

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,620,021

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,746,566

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State
Hospital: Security Improvements (99‑1‑001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 487,963

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 166,037

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 654,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Americans with
Disabilities Act (00-9-036)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 103,348

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 14,852

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 118,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and
Treatment Center - Cottages: Modifications (00‑1‑015)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,376,682

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 23,318

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,678,262

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,478,262

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State
Hospital: Campus Renovation, Phase 5 (00-2-002)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 677,100

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 9,154,750

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 268,150

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................. ................. $ 10,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen Children's
Center ‑ Eleven Cottages: Renovation (00‑1‑041)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 75,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,131,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,906,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Emergency and Small
Repairs (00-1-006)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 475,165

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 875,165

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Emergency
and Small Repair Projects (02‑1‑042)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,609,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,359,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village:
Cottage Renovation (00-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 425,057

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 24,943

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane School -
Multi-Services Building: Renovation (00-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 640,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 60,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,550,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works:
Preservation (00-1-018)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State...... ........ $ 3,200,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,700,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 6,900,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,459,966

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,359,966

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Omnibus
Preservation Projects (02‑1‑069)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 2,700,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 5,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 42,253,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 47,753,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works: Program
(00‑2‑019)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 148,725

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,148,725

NEW SECTION. Sec.
225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Omnibus
Programmatic Projects (02‑2‑070)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 500,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,812,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,812,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Mission Creek Youth
Camp - Main Building: Renovation Phase 2 (00‑1‑010)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,642,973

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 357,027

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment
Center ‑ Secure Facility: Construction (00‑2‑001)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act. To the extent that the department projects savings and
efficiencies through design or scope changes, funds appropriated in this
section may be transferred to the statewide omnibus preservation project
(02-1-069) for expenditure for minor works projects in accordance with the
provisions of section 905 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 13,100,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 47,665,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,970,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,135,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment
Center ‑ Less Restrictive Alternative (02‑2‑075)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,207,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,207,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital ‑
Administration and AT Building: Renovation (02‑1‑060)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,415,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School ‑
Entry/Security/Visitation: Addition (02‑2‑064)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,000,000

-------------

TOTAL................................ ... $ 3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School ‑
Health Center Building: Renovation (02‑1‑061)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
232. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School ‑
Intensive Management Unit: Renovation (02‑1‑054)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00‑1‑053)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 563,057

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 436,944

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,001

NEW SECTION. Sec.
234. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (02‑1‑053)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act, may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Capital Project
Management (02-1-041)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Penal,
Educational, and

Reformatory
Institutions Account‑‑State... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,625,800

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,625,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School -
Laundry: Equipment (00-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 435,602

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 14,398

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide ‑
Laundry Facilities: Upgrades and New Equipment (02‑1‑076)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
238. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Facilities
Condition Assessment and Preservation Plan (02‑1‑047)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 185,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 985,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
239. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Hazardous
Materials Abatement (02‑1‑043)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,430,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Care Facilities
for Students and State Employees (01-S-003)

Funds are provided to
recapitalize child care facilities grant programs. These funds may be used by
state agencies and higher education institutions to provide child care
facilities for employees and students. Grants to state agencies will be
provided and administered per chapter 41.04 RCW. The department shall develop
guidelines for grant application for student child care facilities at institutions
of higher education in conjunction with the office of financial management, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community and
technical colleges. Grants for higher education child care facilities will be
transferred into accounts administered through chapter 28B.135 RCW.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Referendum 38 (86‑2‑099)

Reappropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply
Facilities)‑‑State......... $ 158,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 541,483

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 699,483

NEW SECTION. Sec.
242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Repairs and Improvements (96‑1‑001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,292,693

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,292,693

NEW SECTION. Sec.
243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratories: Consolidation of Facilities (96‑2‑001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,228,332

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,444,719

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,673,051

NEW SECTION. Sec.
244. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Wastewater Treatment Systems (00-1-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 208,802

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 208,802

NEW SECTION. Sec.
245. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Chiller Plant Upgrade (02‑1‑004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,355,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
246. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Repairs and Improvements (02‑1‑005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 172,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,944,200

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,116,600

NEW SECTION. Sec.
247. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: Biosafety Level 3 Facility (02‑2‑001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,231,485

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,231,485

NEW SECTION. Sec.
248. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: C‑Wing Remodel (02‑2‑002)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 295,900

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 295,900

NEW SECTION. Sec.
249. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Public Health
Laboratory: E‑Wing Remodel (02‑2‑003)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 295,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
250. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (97‑2‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑‑Federal...... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 30,086,024

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 35,086,024

NEW SECTION. Sec.
251. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH

Drinking Water
Assistance Program (02‑4‑004)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Appropriation:

Drinking Water
Assistance Account‑‑Federal...... $ 24,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 77,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 101,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
252. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS'
AFFAIRS

Retsil Veterans' Home:
Minor Works Mechanical/Electrical/HVAC (02‑1‑001)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 1,070,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 777,750

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,847,750

NEW SECTION. Sec.
253. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

Orting Soldiers' Home:
Minor Works Mechanical/Electrical/HVAC (02‑1‑002)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 127,736

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,060,835

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,188,571

NEW SECTION. Sec.
254. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

Orting Soldiers' Home:
Minor Works Buildings (02‑1‑004)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 140,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,813,590

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,953,590

NEW SECTION. Sec.
255. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

Emergency Funds (02‑1‑007)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
256. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

Retsil Veterans' Home:
Steam Plant Seismic Upgrade (02‑1‑010)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 1,391,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,391,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
257. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS' AFFAIRS

240 Bed Nursing
Facility (02‑2‑008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section, combined with the authorities granted in section 907(5) of
this act, for a total of $16.5 million, are authorized to apply for a matching
grant from the federal department of veterans' affairs.

(2) The department
shall not commit or expend funds from these authorities until the federal
construction grant has been certified and is available to Washington state for
the purpose of constructing replacement nursing care beds.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 4,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 30,477,200

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 34,977,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
258. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Expand Coyote Ridge
Corrections Center (98‑2‑011)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 447,348

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 802,069

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 227,237,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 230,162,417

NEW SECTION. Sec.
259. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Clallam Bay Corrections
Center - Youthful Offender Facility Improvements (97‑2‑005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,170,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,330,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
260. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Stafford Creek
Corrections Center Construction (98‑2‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 7,648,233

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 16,389,590

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 24,037,823

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 172,988,377

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 197,026,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
261. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center ‑ Expand Special Offender Unit (98‑2‑010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,436,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 37,499,280

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,935,280

NEW SECTION. Sec.
262. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center for Women ‑ Special Needs and Reception Unit (96‑2‑006)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 15,336,885

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,463,115

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
263. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center: Infrastructure Evaluation (99‑2‑005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 310,438

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 39,562

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
264. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Violent Offender/Truth
in Sentencing Grant Administration (99‑2‑004)

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 359,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 55,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 414,000

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 385,536

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 49,592

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 435,128

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 194,514

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 214,743

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,258,385

NEW SECTION. Sec.
265. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Americans with
Disabilities Act (00‑1‑011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 66,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 20,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 86,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
266. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Local Criminal Justice
Facilities (99-2-003)

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 2,952,091

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 1,335,619

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,193,270

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 966,338

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,447,318

NEW SECTION. Sec.
267. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island ‑
Special Commitment Center (00‑2‑005)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 259,665

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,240,335

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
268. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island
Underground Storage Tank (00‑1‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 377,896

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 414,415

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 792,311

NEW SECTION. Sec.
269. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center: Kitchen Consolidations/Modifications (00‑2‑011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 952,109

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 147,891

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
270. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center ‑ Hazardous Materials (00‑1‑002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 52,950

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 52,950

NEW SECTION. Sec.
271. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center - 100 Bed Intensive Management and Segregation Units (00‑2‑008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 40,665

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 18,162,205

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,521,795

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 20,684,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 149,335

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,727,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
272. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington State
Penitentiary ‑ Intensive Management Unit Improvements (00‑1‑025)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑‑State...... $ 3,199,502

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 852,462

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 300,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,351,964

NEW SECTION. Sec.
273. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Correctional Industries
Space Statewide (98‑2‑005)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 327,206

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 4,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,972,794

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,652,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,452,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
274. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

McNeil Island: Replace
Main Institution Water Storage Tank (02‑1‑022)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,644,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,644,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
275. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Minor Works:
Preservation (00‑1‑020)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 15,520,719

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,479,281

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
276. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Minor Works: Omnibus
Preservation (02‑1‑015)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,619,247

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,619,247

NEW SECTION. Sec.
277. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Minor Works: Program
(00‑2‑010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,933,797

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,066,203

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
278. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Minor Works: Omnibus
Program Request (02‑2‑030)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
279. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections
Center: Firing Range and Regional Training Center (02‑2‑017)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,355,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
280. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Department
of Corrections Emergency Funds (02‑1‑028)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State............. $ 1,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 901,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,401,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
281. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Intensive
Management Unit Repairs (02‑1‑040)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,612,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,612,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
282. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center ‑ Building Water Pipe Replacement Phase 2 (02‑1‑008)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,694,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
283. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center ‑ Domestic Water Systems Improvements (02‑1‑007)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 3,531,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
284. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections
Center ‑ Replace Steam and Condensate Piping (02‑1‑006)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,170,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
285. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington State
Penitentiary ‑ Replace Old Sanitary and Domestic Water Lines (02‑1‑026)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,070,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 2,640,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
286. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Washington State
Penitentiary ‑ Replace Electrical Supply System (02‑1‑024)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 4,061,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,655,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,716,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
287. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Omnibus
Telecommunications Projects

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 4,054,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,054,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
288. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

Statewide: Emergency
Funds (R) (00-1-021)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑‑State.............. $ 433,984

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 13,723,016

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,157,000

(End
of part)

PART
3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum 26 Waste
Disposal Facilities (74-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account (Waste
Facilities)‑-State........ $ 398,083

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,810,539

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,208,622

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

State Emergency Water
Projects (76-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State Emergency Water
Projects Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 577,833

Appropriation:

State Emergency Water
Projects Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 214,167

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 792,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Referendum 39 Waste
Disposal Facilities (82-2-005)

Reappropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account - Waste
Facilities 1980‑-State... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 9,928,221

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,428,221

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Local Toxics Grants to
Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for projects under contract on or before
June 30, 2001. Reappropriated funds not associated with contracted projects
shall lapse on June 30, 2001. The office of financial management may grant waivers
from this lapse requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional
circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of representatives
capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee.

(2) The department
shall submit a report to the office of financial management and house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee by
December 1, 2001, listing all projects funded from this section.

(3) The department of
ecology shall offer the port of Ridgefield a funding package totaling
$8,400,000 to conduct an emergency cleanup action on port-owned property. A
portion of the appropriation in this section shall be combined with funds from
the appropriation to the department from the state toxics control account in
the omnibus operating budget for the 2001-2003 biennium to provide a funding
package consisting of 65 percent grant and 35 percent loan. The terms of the
loan shall provide for repayment by the port of Ridgefield commencing ten years
from the effective date of this section and is contingent upon an independent
financial audit conducted at the direction of the department to determine the
port's ability to repay the loan. It is the intent of the legislature to
support necessary action by the port of Ridgefield to protect public health and
the environment without jeopardizing the port's financial standing.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State............. $ 20,749,772

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State............. $ 42,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 84,103,008

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 146,852,780

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Methow Basin Water
Conservation (92-2-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contract
on or before June 30, 2001. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 2001.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 87,689

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 87,689

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste
Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account‑-State..................... $ 5,292,009

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,045,451

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,337,460

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Rights Purchase
(99-1-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is provided for the purchase of water rights under the trust water rights
program under chapter 90.42 RCW, for the purpose of improving stream and river
flows in fish critical basins. This appropriation shall only be used to
acquire water rights in basins with current or proposed listings of salmon or
steelhead under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et
seq.) and where low flows have been identified as a limiting factor for salmon
recovery. Priority for funding such purchases and leases shall take into
consideration the following:

(a) Proposals providing
the greatest benefit for restoring and protecting fish;

(b) Proposals providing
benefits in addition to protecting fish critical streams and rivers;

(c) Proposals that
include funds from other sources;

(d) Proposals showing a
broad level of support among interested parties;

(e) Proposals requiring
the lowest administrative costs to implement; and

(f) Proposals requiring
the lowest overall cost within the context of the local marketplace.

(2) In making the
selection of water rights to purchase, the department shall consult with the
department of fish and wildlife.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Minor Works (02-1-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,550,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,291,745

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,841,745

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay (02-2-006)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,885,800

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 808,200

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,694,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............. ...................... $ 2,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Local Hazardous Waste
Liability (02-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely for grants to local governmental agencies
named as potentially liable persons or potentially responsible parties when
those agencies have conducted a moderate risk waste or similar program, and have
become financially liable for clean-up and corrective action due to
circumstances at a facility they used for hazardous waste treatment, storage,
recycling, or disposal services.

(2) The department
shall adopt rules for this financial assistance program. For the purposes of
this grant program, the department may offer grants up to one hundred percent
of total eligible costs. Eligible costs may include retroactive costs and
legal fees associated with facility cleanup or corrective action.

Appropriation:

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State............. $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 38,403,302

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal.................................. $ 44,795,830

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 83,199,132

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 169,901,509

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 253,100,641

NEW SECTION. Sec.
312. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account (02-4-002)

Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 113,835,792

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal.................................. $ 45,277,010

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 159,112,802

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 467,108,040

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 626,220,842

NEW SECTION. Sec.
313. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Referendum 38 Water
Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
is provided solely for projects under contracts on or before June 30, 2001.
Reappropriated funds not associated with contracted projects shall lapse on
June 30, 2001.

(2) The office of
financial management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific
projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the
chairs of the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways
and means committee.

(3) The department
shall submit a report to the office of financial management and house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee by
December 1, 2001, listing all projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:

State Drought
Preparedness‑-State............... $ 5,525,000

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account (Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State. $ 6,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 11,525,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,029,098

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............. ...................... $ 17,554,098

NEW SECTION. Sec.
314. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water
Fund (86-2-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is provided solely for projects under contract on or before
June 30, 2001. Reappropriated funds not associated with contracted projects
shall lapse on June 30, 2001.

(2) The office of
financial management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific
projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the
chairs of the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways
and means committee.

(3) The department
shall submit a report to the office of financial management and house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means committee by
December 1, 2001, listing all projects funded from this section.

(4) The entire public
works assistance account appropriation is provided for water quality facility
grants for communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department
shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a regulatory
order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with water quality
regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been completed; and (c)
projects with a local match from reasonable water quality rates and charges.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State.......... $ 7,013,151

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 27,318,809

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 34,331,960

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 131,764,921

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 166,096,881

NEW SECTION. Sec.
315. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water
Fund (02-4-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $11,322,022
of the water quality account appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Metro/King county.

(2) Up to $10,000,000
of the water quality account appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.

(3) The entire state
building construction account appropriation is provided for water quality
facility grants for communities with a population of less than 5,000. The
department shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with water
quality regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been completed; and
(c) projects with a local match from reasonable water quality rates and
charges.

(4) The remaining
appropriation in this section is provided for statewide water quality
implementation and planning grants and loans. The department shall give
priority consideration to projects located in basins with critical or depressed
salmonid stocks.

Appropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 48,000,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 50,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 208,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 258,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
316. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Referendum 38 Water
Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

Appropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account (Water
Supply Facilities)‑-

State.................................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
317. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

Yakima Basin Water
Investments (02-4-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for agricultural water
conservation projects and agricultural water system improvements in the Yakima
river basin to match federal funding authorized by Title 12 of P.L. 103-434
(Yakima river basin water enhancement project).

Appropriation:

State and Local
Improvements Revolving

Account (Water
Supply Facilities)‑-

State.................................... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
318. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Spokane Centennial
Trail (89-5-112)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 206,534

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 89,888

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 296,422

NEW SECTION. Sec.
319. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Recreation
Development Program (98-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) $33,881 of the
general fund‑-federal reappropriation is provided for the continuation of
the United States national park service and the United States department of
energy grants as described in section 325, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

(3) $647,240 of the
general fund‑-federal reappropriation is provided for the continuation of
the United States forest service grant as described in section 325, chapter
379, Laws of 1999.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 868,255

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 29,294

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,502,376

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,399,925

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,154,673

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,554,598

NEW SECTION. Sec.
320. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Recreation Development
(02-2-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
funds predesign studies of major park developments that have new revenue
potential and provide significant new recreational opportunities.

(2) $164,000 of this
appropriation is provided as state match to federal funds for the Iron Horse
depot.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 664,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,664,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
321. FOR THE STATE PARKS
AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cama Beach State Park
Development (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account‑-State.... $ 310,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 690,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
322. FOR THE STATE PARKS
AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cama Beach State Parks
Infrastructure Development (01-S-002)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely to complete electrical power, water, and sewer
utilities to enable development of the retreat lodge, dining hall, and cabins.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
323. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Coastal Facility
Relocation (00-1-005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
324. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Coastal Facility
Relocation (02-1-017)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902
and 903 of this act.

(2) The commission
shall ensure that all funds transferred from the public works assistance
account to the parks renewal and stewardship account during the 2001‑2003
biennium are used only for this project.

(3) Funds expended on
this project for off‑site utility infrastructure that may include the
provision of electricity, water service, or sewer service shall be for the
benefit of the state. Entities that subsequently connect to or use this off‑site
utility infrastructure shall reimburse the state at a rate proportional to
their use. The commission, in consultation with the public works board, shall
develop policies and procedures to ensure this reimbursement occurs.

(4) The commission
shall ensure that all reimbursement recovered as specified in subsection (3) of
this section shall be paid into the public works assistance account.

(5) Ownership of the
off‑site sewer and water utility infrastructure constructed in this
section shall transfer to the city of Ilwaco.

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal and Stewardship
Account‑-State.... $ 5,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
325. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Historic Structure and
Land Use Program (00-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,477,393

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,022,607

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
326. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Lewis and Clark Trail
Bicentennial (00-1-010)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely to renovate facilities and enhance exhibits at
Lewis and Clark trail interpretive centers located at Sacajawea state park and
Fort Canby state park.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,250,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 250,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
327. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Park Housing (00-1-014)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 250,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
328. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Park Housing (02-2-008)

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely to replace existing substandard housing or
construct new housing at park locations that presently do not have a full-time,
on-site ranger.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
329. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Americans with
Disabilities Act (00-9-036)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) The department
shall minimize the expenditure of these funds for staff and administrative
purposes or for other operational expenses.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 226,845

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 195,887

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 422,732

NEW SECTION. Sec.
330. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Facilities
Preservation: Statewide (98-1-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 5,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,934,532

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,634,532

NEW SECTION. Sec.
331. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Facility
Preservation and Deferred Maintenance (99-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,700,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
332. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Facility
Preservation (02-1-001)

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is provided solely to continue minor works projects that reduce
the deferred maintenance backlog.

(3) If the state parks
and recreation commission establishes and implements a basic parkland access
fee or parking fee during the biennium ending June 30, 2003, $4,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 14,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 54,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
333. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden State Park
(02-1-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
334. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Emergency and Unforseen
Needs (02-1-004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
335. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

State Parks Road
Preservation and Repair (01-S-004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
336. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Natural/Historic
Stewardship (02-1-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
337. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Environmental Learning
Centers (02-1-010)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriation funds predesign studies of environmental learning centers that
have new revenue potential and provide significant new recreational
opportunities.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
338. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Facilities Assessment
Program (02-2-005)

The appropriation in
this section shall lapse on June 30, 2003.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
339. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Trails (02-2-012)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the following projects:

(1) Beacon Rock state
park: Completion of the park trail plan to separate cyclist, pedestrian, and
equestrian users;

(2) Wallace Falls state
park: Trail relocation to separate vehicle, mountain bike, and pedestrian
trail users;

(3)
Riverside/Centennial Trail: Complete the nonmotorized-only bridge crossing the
Spokane river;

(4) Deception Pass
state park: Trail relocation to protect natural resources, adding to the trail
system, and connecting existing trails to the Cross Island trail; and

(5) Squak Mountain
state park: Purchase equipment time and materials to replace trails to meet
current standards for use and safety to match community volunteer provision of
labor.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,950,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
340. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition
Account (02-2-016)

Appropriation:

Parkland Acquisition
Account‑-State............. $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
341. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Boat Pumpouts
Federal Clean Vessel Act (02-2-020)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
342. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

Beacon Rock State
Park: Pierce Trust Donation (02-3-018)

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal
Stewardship Account‑-State........ $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
343. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE
FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Firearms Range Program
(FARR) (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account‑-State................... $ 256,120

Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account‑-State................... $ 50,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,021,638

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,327,758

NEW SECTION. Sec.
344. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating Facilities
Projects (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State............. $ 13,331,774

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 9,825,791

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,157,565

NEW SECTION. Sec.
345. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating Facilities
Projects (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State............. $ 8,318,013

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,300,368

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 48,618,381

NEW SECTION. Sec.
346. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway Road and
Off-Road Vehicle Activities (NOVA) (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account‑-State..................... $ 7,273,884

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,682,997

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,956,881

NEW SECTION. Sec.
347. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway Road and
Off-Road Vehicle Activities (NOVA) (02-4-002)

(1) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(i) is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Fifty percent of the new appropriation is provided solely for grants to
projects to research, develop, publish, and distribute informational guides and
maps of nonhighway and off-road vehicle trails and associated facilities
meeting the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal
Americans with disabilities act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(ii) is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
The portion of the new appropriation that applies to grants for capital
facilities is provided solely for grants to projects that meet the
requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act and do not compromise or impair sensitive natural resources.
The portion of the new appropriation that applies to grants for management,
maintenance, and operation of existing off-road vehicle recreation facilities
is provided solely to bring the facilities into compliance with the
requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act.

(3) The appropriation
in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW
46.09.170(1)(d)(iii) is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$75,000 is provided solely for the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
to contract with an independent entity to study the source and make
recommendations on the distribution and use of funds provided to off-road
vehicle and nonhighway road recreational activities under RCW 46.09.170. The
study shall determine the relative portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax
revenues deposited to the general fund under RCW 46.09.170 that are
attributable to vehicles operating off-road or on nonhighway roads for recreational
purposes as provided in RCW 46.09.170. The study shall include the types of
vehicles and location of their use, the types of recreational activities, the
types of recreational facilities used, and the recreational use of state forest
roads relative to other, nonrecreational uses. The interagency committee for
outdoor recreation shall review the analysis and submit a report to the
standing committees of the legislature, including recommendations regarding
amendments to RCW 46.09.170 to allocate revenues consistent with the relative
proportion of the uses generating such revenues. The report shall be submitted
no later than December 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account‑-State..................... $ 5,527,551

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 23,559,218

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,086,769

NEW SECTION. Sec.
348. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington Wildlife and
Recreation Program (98-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,663,227

Outdoor Recreation
Account‑-State............... $ 28,237,251

Habitat Conservation
Account‑-State............. $ 37,205,932

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 69,106,410

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 247,993,590

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 317,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
349. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington Wildlife and
Recreation Program (02-4-003)

The appropriation in
this section for the wildlife and recreation program under chapter 43.99A RCW
and RCW 43.99A.040 is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
new appropriation is provided for the approved list of projects included in
LEAP capital document No. 01-25, as developed on March 28, 2001.

Appropriation:

Outdoor Recreation
Account‑-State............... $ 22,500,000

Habitat Conservation
Account‑-State............. $ 22,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 45,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 180,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 225,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
350. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Critical Habitat and
Natural Area Acquisition (01-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely to acquire critical habitat and natural areas
on the approved list of projects included in LEAP capital document No. 01-25,
as developed on March 28, 2001.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
351. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Land and Water
Conservation Fund (LWCF) (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation
Account‑-Federal............. $ 975,325

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 849,761

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,825,087

NEW SECTION. Sec.
352. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Land and Water
Conservation Fund (LWCF) (02-4-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,400,000 of the
recreation resources account‑‑federal is appropriated for projects
chosen by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation.

(2) By January 1, 2002,
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide a report to the
legislature that:

(a) Describes those
projects funded subject to subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Recommends
legislation creating a competitive process for the selection of projects that
will result in a list of projects to be submitted to the legislature for its
approval.

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
353. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

National Recreation
Trails (NRTP) (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ 1,768,874

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 782,443

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,551,317

NEW SECTION. Sec.
354. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

National Recreation
Trails (NRTP) (02-4-006)

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ 2,132,936

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 977,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,109,936

NEW SECTION. Sec.
355. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Salmon Recovery
(00-2-001)

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 56,200,530

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,121,243

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State.................. $ 24,285,080

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 83,606,853

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 36,321,147

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 119,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
356. FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Salmon Recovery
(02-4-007)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 26,189,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 28,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 54,189,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 264,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 318,189,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
357. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Hatchery Management
(02-4-009)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 11,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 440,627

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,640,627

NEW SECTION. Sec.
358. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating Infrastructure
Grant (BIG) Program (02-4-010)

Appropriation:

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal........... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
359. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION
COMMISSION

Water Quality Grants
Program (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 1,227,740

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 14,272,260

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
360. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Reserve
Enhancement Program (00-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,100,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,053,148

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,403,148

NEW SECTION. Sec.
361. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Water Irrigation System
Improvements and Water Leases (01-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 is
provided for irrigation district enhancements.

(2) $750,000 is
provided for water leases and exchanges.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,750,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
362. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Water Quality Grants
Program (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
363. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Waste Management
Grants Program (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 971,830

State Building
Construction Account--State...... $ 2,304,535

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,276,365

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,223,635

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
364. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Nutrient
Management Grants Program (02-4-002)

Appropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 5,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 22,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
365. FOR THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Puget Sound District
Grants (02-4-003)

Appropriation:

Water Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 840,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,360,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
366. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE

Tideland Acquisition
(94-2-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 640,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,360,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
367. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Nemah Hatchery Building
and Incubation System Replacement (96‑1‑006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 110,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,590,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
368. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Shellfish Laboratory
and Hatchery Upgrades (96-1-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 120,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 354,947

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 504,947

NEW SECTION. Sec.
369. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works
Preservation (98-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,030,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,998,572

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,028,572

NEW SECTION. Sec.
370. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Facilities Renovation
(98-1-005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-

State.... ................................ $ 420,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,831,201

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,251,201

NEW SECTION. Sec.
371. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Renovation
(98-1-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,227,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 6,165,326

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,392,326

NEW SECTION. Sec.
372. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational Access
Redevelopment (98-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,357,787

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,437,787

NEW SECTION. Sec.
373. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Coast and Puget Sound
Wild Salmonid Habitat Restoration (98-1-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,300,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
374. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Coast and Puget Sound
Wildstock Restoration: Hatcheries (98-1-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 110,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 890,000

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
375. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Statewide Fencing
Renovation and Construction (98-1-012)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) Expenditures of the
reappropriation in this section for fencing shall comply with chapter 16.60
RCW.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 85,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 826,118

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 911,118

NEW SECTION. Sec.
376. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wildlife Renovation
(98-1-013)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 170,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
377. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Issaquah Hatchery
Improvements (98-1-015)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,285,955

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,435,955

NEW SECTION. Sec.
378. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Warm Water Game Fish
Access Facilities (98-2-006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State............. $ 340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,095,955

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,435,955

NEW SECTION. Sec.
379. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational Fish
Enhancement (98-2-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Recreational Fisheries
Enhancement‑‑State........ $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 678,313

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,078,313

NEW SECTION. Sec.
380. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and
Dedicated Funds (98‑2‑008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑‑State............. $ 81,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑‑Private/Local.... $ 898,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 979,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 342,383

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,321,383

NEW SECTION. Sec.
381. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl
Habitat Acquisition and Development (98‑2‑009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Wildlife Account‑‑State......................... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 669,849

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 869,849

NEW SECTION. Sec.
382. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clam and Oyster Beach
Enhancement (98‑2‑019)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 35,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,988,803

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,023,803

NEW SECTION. Sec.
383. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deep Water Slough
Restoration (98‑2‑013)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 119,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 281,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
384. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Salmon Restoration (99‑2‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 210,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑‑State.................. $ 500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 710,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,040,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
385. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upland Wildlife
Habitat: Replacement (00-2-005)

Reappropriation:

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
386. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Goldsborough Creek
Restoration (00-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 63,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,067,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
387. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Reform
Facility Retrofits (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 10,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 60,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
388. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forest and Fish Road
Upgrade and Abandonment on Agency Lands (02‑1‑003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,900,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 11,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
389. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Code Compliance and
Protection (02-1-005)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 550,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 1,250,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,350,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 28,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 32,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
390. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Facility and
Infrastructure Standards and Renovations (02-1-009)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) $305,000 of the
appropriation in this section shall be used to replace the caretaker residence
and construct pheasant rearing pens at the Lewis county game farm.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 3,100,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 1,500,000

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 150,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,700,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 46,420,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 57,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
391. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Infrastructure Savings
(02-1-010)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
392. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Endangered Species Act
Compliance on Agency Lands (02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 8,800,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 9,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 39,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
393. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Diverse Fish and
Wildlife Population Health and Protection (02‑2‑004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 1,200,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
394. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Commercial and
Recreational Customer Satisfaction Improvements (02‑2‑006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State............. $ 560,000

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,060,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
395. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Watchable Wildlife
Program (00-2-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 42,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 58,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
396. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Watchable Fish and
Wildlife and Recreation Sites (02-2-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Wildlife Account‑-State......................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,628,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,628,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
397. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Partnership
Improvements with Internal and External Customers (02‑2-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

(2) Expenditures of the
appropriation in this section for fencing shall comply with chapter 16.60 RCW.

Appropriation:

General Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 4,000,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 2,000,000

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 150,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-State............. $ 50,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Federal.......... $ 3,725,400

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local.... $ 50,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,375,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 46,824,700

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 57,200,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
398. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

Grandy Creek Hatchery
(92-5-024)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,660,762

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 712,080

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,372,842

NEW SECTION. Sec.
399. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES

Administrative Site
Preservation (02‑1‑002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 231,089

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 375,535

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 331,563

Agricultural College
Trust Management

Account‑‑State........................... $ 66,550

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,004,737

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,365,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,369,737

NEW SECTION. Sec.
400. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Real Estate Repair,
Maintenance, and Tenant Improvements (02‑1‑005)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 146,923

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 911,220

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,065,000

-------------

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 4,123,143

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Hazardous Waste Removal
(02‑1‑006)

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 25,000

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 25,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 50,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 107,110

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 357,110

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Recreation Facilities
Preservation (02‑1‑011)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 340,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,360,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Area Facilities
Preservation (02‑1‑016)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 508,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,032,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Agricultural Asset
Preservation (02‑1‑017)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 53,041

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 154,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,620,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,827,041

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Communication Site
Repairs (02‑1‑024)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 230,000

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 169,730

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 399,730

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 202,750

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,220,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,822,480

NEW SECTION. Sec.
406. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor Works ‑
Programmatic (00‑2‑011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 119,610

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 301,305

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 212,695

Agricultural College
Trust Management

Account‑‑State........................... $ 31,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 664,610

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 631,480

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,296,090

NEW SECTION. Sec.
407. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor Works ‑
Programmatic (02‑2‑001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 136,620

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 181,161

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 242,880

Agricultural College
Trust Management

Account‑‑State........................... $ 37,950

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 598,611

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,289,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,887,611

NEW SECTION. Sec.
408. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Small Timber Landowner
Program (00‑5‑001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
409. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Small Timber Landowner
Program (02‑2‑003)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
410. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Right‑of‑Way
Acquisition (02‑2‑007)

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 321,400

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 124,009

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 445,409

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,355,480

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,248,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,048,889

NEW SECTION. Sec.
411. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Mineral Resource
Testing (02‑2‑008)

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 11,900

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 6,100

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 18,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 18,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
412. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES

Commercial
Development/Local Improvement Districts (02‑2‑009)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 90,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 245,120

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 450,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 785,120

NEW SECTION. Sec.
413. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer
Program (02‑2‑010)

The state building
construction account appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1) The total
appropriation is provided to the department solely to transfer from trust
status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest restrictive easements for
certain trust lands of state-wide significance deemed appropriate for state
park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources
conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes.

(2) Property
transferred under this section shall be appraised and transferred at fair
market value. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by the
department to the common school construction account in the same manner as
timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be
made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value
of the land transferred shall be deposited in the natural resources real
property replacement account. These funds shall be expended by the department
for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real property of equal value to be
managed as common school trust land.

(3) Property subject to
easement agreements under this section shall be appraised at fair market value
both with and without the imposition of the easement. The entire difference in
appraised value shall be deposited by the department to the common school
construction fund in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040.

(4) All reasonable
costs incurred by the department to implement this section are authorized to be
paid out of this appropriation. Authorized costs include the actual cost of
appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar
costs.

(5) Intergrant
exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value may occur
if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by the board of
natural resources.

(6) Prior to or
concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department, with full
cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a real property
instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified
in subsection (1) of this section for a minimum period of thirty years. The
department of natural resources, in consultation with the receiving state
agencies, shall develop policy to address requests to replace transferred
properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no longer
deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(7) The department and
receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this
section. However, the department or receiving agencies may remove a property
from the transfer list based on new, substantive information, if it is
determined that transfer of the property is not in the statewide interest of
either the common school trust or the receiving agency.

(8) The department shall
execute trust land transfers and easements such that 80 percent of the
appropriation in this section is deposited in the common school construction
fund. To achieve the 80:20 ratio, the department may offset transfers of
property with low timber-to-land ratios with easements on other properties.

(9) On June 30, 2003,
the state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted funds from this
appropriation to the common school construction fund and the appropriation in
this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

(10) The appropriation
in this section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP capital document No.
01-42, as developed on March 28, 2001.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 50,000,000

Natural Resources Real
Property Replacement

Account‑-State........................... $ 10,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 60,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 66,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 320,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 446,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
414. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Bank (02‑2‑013)

Appropriation:

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
415. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Community and Technical
College Trust Land Acquisition (02‑2‑014)

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Forest Reserve

Account‑‑State........................... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
416. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy and
Wetlands Conservation Grants (00‑2‑020)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 2,270,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,517,480

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,787,480

NEW SECTION. Sec.
417. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy and
Wetlands Conservation Grants (02‑2‑015)

Appropriation:

General Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 26,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
418. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Marine Station Public
Access (02‑2‑019)

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
419. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Commencement Bay
Freshwater Channel (02‑2‑020)

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
420. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Mobile Radio System
Upgrade (02‑2‑022)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 405,000

Resources Management
Cost Account‑‑State........ $ 776,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 582,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,763,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 783,500

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,273,700

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,195,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
421. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Riparian Open Space
Program (02‑2‑023)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
422. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Larch Mountain Road
Reconstruction (01-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely to reconstruct the Larch mountain road to
provide safe access to the Larch mountain correction camp and department-managed
state forest lands.

Appropriation:

Access Road Revolving
Fund‑‑Nonappropriated..... $ 3,000,000

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
423. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Grants (00‑2‑014)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 2,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 10,422,070

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,522,070

NEW SECTION. Sec.
424. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Grants (02‑4‑018)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP capital document No.
01-44, as developed on March 28, 2001.

(2) To the extent that projects
on this list receive funds from the appropriation in this act to the Washington
wildlife and recreation program, the funds provided in this section shall
lapse.

(3) The department
shall submit a list of recommended projects to be funded from the aquatic lands
enhancement account in the 2003‑2005 capital budget. The list shall
result from a competitive grants program developed by the department based
upon, at a minimum: A uniform criteria for the selection of projects and
awarding of grants for up to fifty percent of the total project cost; local
community support for the project; and a statewide geographic distribution of
projects. The list of projects shall be submitted to the office of financial
management by September 15, 2002.

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands
Enhancement Account‑‑State........ $ 5,565,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 22,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,565,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
425. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Mountain
Asset Evaluation (01‑S‑002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is provided solely for an evaluation of the social, ecological, and financial
values of forest board lands on Blanchard Mountain in Skagit county. The
department may contract for the conduct of the evaluation.

(2) The evaluation
shall be completed by June 30, 2002. The department shall provide a report to
the legislature on the evaluation.

(3) For the duration of
the study, the department shall defer timber sales in the project area that
prescribe clear cut harvest.

(4) If the
appropriation in this section is not matched equally by contributions of nonstate
funds, these funds shall lapse.

Appropriation:

Forest Development
Account‑‑State............... $ 25,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000

(End
of part)

PART
4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Seattle Crime
Laboratory - New Forensic Laboratory (00-2-008)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,100,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State............. $ 2,500,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

State.................................... $ 350,000

Municipal Criminal
Justice Assistance Account‑-

State.................................... $ 249,795

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 12,199,795

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 300,205

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Fire Training Academy -
Water System (00-2-009)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 652,211

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,192,789

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Boarding Home Fire
Safety Program (00-4-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided solely for grants for the installation or retrofit of
fire sprinklers in boarding homes. The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state fire
marshal, in consultation with the department of social and health services,
shall implement the grant program.

(2) To be eligible for
a grant under this section, the boarding home must be licensed with the
department of social and health services.

(3) Determination of
grant eligibility and the percentage of grant funding shall be determined by
the following formula:

(a) At the time of
application for a grant, a boarding home with a resident ratio of fifteen
percent or greater department of social and health services clients and/or
low-income residents is eligible for one hundred percent of the difference
between the cost of retrofitting and the cost of installing sprinklers during
original construction.

(b) At the time of
application for a grant, a boarding home with a resident ratio of less than
fifteen percent department of social and health services clients and/or
low-income residents is eligible for fifty percent of the difference between
the cost of retrofitting and the cost of installing sprinklers during original
construction.

(c) At the time of
application for a grant, a boarding home with a resident ratio of seventy-five
percent or greater department of social and health services clients and/or
low-income residents is eligible for one hundred percent of the cost of
installing fire sprinklers.

(4) Any boarding home
receiving this grant, or that has previously entered into a contract to receive
grant funding, shall complete the installation of the fire sprinklers by June
30, 2003.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Fire Training Academy -
Preservation (02-1-006)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
PATROL

Spokane Crime
Laboratory - New Crime Laboratory (02‑2‑013)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,950,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,450,000

(End
of part)

PART
5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public School Building
Construction (00-2-001 and 00-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 37,000

Common School
Construction Account‑-State........ $ 150,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 150,037,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 588,570,973

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 775,570,973

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF
EDUCATION

State School
Construction Assistance Grants (02-4-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $400,000 from this
appropriation is provided to fund up to two FTEs in the office of state fire
marshal to exclusively review K‑12 construction documents for fire and
life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent of
this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that are
located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(2) Of the fiscal year
2002 appropriation, $80,000 is provided for skills centers study and survey.

(3) For state
assistance grants starting July 1, 2001, for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.

(4) $5,400,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation is provided for skills centers capital
improvements. Skills centers shall submit a budget plan to the state board of
education for proposed expenditures and the proposed expenditures shall conform
with state board of education rules and procedures for reimbursement of capital
items. Funds not expended by June 30, 2003, lapse.

(5) The common school
construction appropriations provided in this section are based on the space
allocations in WAC 180-27-035 in effect as of March 1, 2001, except for the
adjustment for kindergarten students provided in subsection (3) of this
section, and the area cost allowance base as specified in WAC 180-27-060(1) in
effect as of March 1, 2001.

Appropriation:

Common School
Construction Account‑-State

(FY 2002)................................ $ 196,625,308

Common School Construction
Account‑-State

(FY 2003)................................ $ 211,931,421

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 408,556,729

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,831,522,031

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,239,999,489

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

State School
Construction Assistance Program Staff (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

Common School
Construction Account‑-State........ $ 1,930,989

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,457,312

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,554,976

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,943,277

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND

Old Main and Alhsten
Buildings, HVAC: Upgrade (00-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,414,160

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,914,160

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE BLIND

Irwin, Old Main,
Kennedy, and Dry Building Preservation (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,981,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE BLIND

School for the Blind:
Campus Preservation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 3,060,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
607. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE BLIND

Alsten Material Center
and Braille Production (02-2-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,341,278

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,341,278

NEW SECTION. Sec.
608. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE BLIND

Distance Learning
Center (02-2-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,789,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
609. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
DEAF

Clark Hall/Lloyd:
Upgrade (00-1-006)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
610. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE DEAF

Clark Hall/Lloyd:
Seismic Stabilization (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
611. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE DEAF

School for the Deaf:
Campus Preservation (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,760,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,759,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,519,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
612. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR
THE DEAF

School for the Deaf:
Phase 2B (02-2-001)

The appropriation in
this section shall be held in allotment reserve by the office of financial
management until completion of the study of capacity planning and educational
delivery systems to be performed by the institute for public policy and the
joint legislative audit and review committee.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,616,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
613. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW CSE/EE Phase
(90-2-013)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,300,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
614. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Power Plant Boiler No.
7 (96-2-020)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 486,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).. ................. $ 3,325,384

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,811,384

NEW SECTION. Sec.
615. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Minor Works: Safety
(98-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,174,684

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,671,684

NEW SECTION. Sec.
616. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Building
Communications: Upgrade (98-2-009)

Reappropriation:

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 285,855

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 685,855

NEW SECTION. Sec.
617. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Bothell/Cascadia
Community College Phase I (98-2-899)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,486,336

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 43,126,889

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL................................ ... $ 44,613,225

NEW SECTION. Sec.
618. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bothell/Cascadia
Community College Future Phase (98-2-999)

No money from the
reappropriation in this section may be expended that would be inconsistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 273,645

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,085,268

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,358,913

NEW SECTION. Sec.
619. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Center
BB Tower Elevators (96-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 5,740,000

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 93,100

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,833,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 715,910

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,549,010

NEW SECTION. Sec.
620. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Harborview Medical
Research Center (94-2-013)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,316,618

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,613,678

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 4,930,296

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,851,453

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,781,749

NEW SECTION. Sec.
621. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

New Law School Building
(94-2-017)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 44,801,500

Higher Education
Nonproprietary Local

Capital Account‑-Private/Local........... $ 24,186,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 68,987,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 68,987,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
622. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Tacoma Branch Campus
(94-2-500)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,456,934

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,472,660

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,929,594

NEW SECTION. Sec.
623. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Minor Works: Various
Infrastructure Upgrades (00-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act. This reappropriation is a combination of section 616, chapter
379, Laws of 1999, and section 1036, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,771,800

University of
Washington Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 7,571,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,215,360

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,787,160

NEW SECTION. Sec.
624. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Classroom Improvements
and Minor Works (01-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902, 903,
and 905 of this act.

Appropriation:

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 21,567,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 51,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 73,167,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
625. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bothell 2A/Cascadia
Community College (00-2-015)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
through 904 of this act. No money from this reappropriation may be expended
that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the
office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 29,123,099

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 20,976,901

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
626. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Tacoma Branch Campus
Phase 2A (00-2-017)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902, 903,
904, and 906 of this act. No money may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 21,635,933

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,635,933

NEW SECTION. Sec.
627. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Tacoma Branch Campus
Phase 3 (00-2-021)

No money from the
reappropriation in this section may be expended that would be inconsistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 69,846,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,346,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
628. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Land
Acquisition (01-2-029)

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
629. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

University of
Washington Condon Hall - Renovation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 75,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,370,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
630. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

University of
Washington Johnson Hall - Renovation (02-1-005)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

University of
Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 250,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 47,488,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 47,988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
631. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Emergency Power
Expansion - Phase I (02-1-009)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
632. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Wire Plant Upgrade
(02-1-011)

Appropriation:

University of
Washington Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
633. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Special Projects - Code
Requirements (02-1-025)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
634. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Minor Repairs Programs
(02-1-026)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
635. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Deferred
Renewal/Modernization/Current Access (02-1-031)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

University of
Washington Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,500,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,700,000

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 48,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
636. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma - Technology
Institute (02-1-150)

This appropriation is
being made as part of an assumed $4,550,000 total equipment capitalization
plan. The state share will be released once at least $3,000,000 in nonstate
matching contributions have been raised.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 550,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
637. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bothell Phase 2B
Offramp (02-2-014)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,650,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
638. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Phase 2B
(02-2-027)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902, 903,
and 904 of this act. No money may be expended that would be inconsistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 41,899,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
639. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Bio-Sciences
Research (02-2-028)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the University of Washington providing sufficient
evidence to the office of financial management of local revenue to support
issuance of bonded debt and accompanying debt service associated with this
project.

Appropriation:

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 29,025,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 29,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
640. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

Suzzallo Library
Renovation (94-1-015)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 24,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,563,375

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 17,415,445

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,978,820

NEW SECTION. Sec.
641. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF
WASHINGTON

UW Medical Center
Improvements (99-2-010)

Reappropriation:

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State.... $ 30,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 50,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 80,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
642. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Works: Safety and Environmental Projects (00‑1‑001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,750,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
643. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Capital Safety/Environmental (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
644. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Works - Preservation (00‑1‑004)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 275,000

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State.............. ............ $ 1,300,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,575,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 4,425,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
645. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Americans
with Disabilities Act Projects (00-1-011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 72,374

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 97,374

NEW SECTION. Sec.
646. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Child
Care Facility: Renovation (00-1-039)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
647. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Scholars
Hall/White Hall Renovation: Renovation (00‑1‑078)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,750,000

Institutions of Higher
Education - Housing

and Food Account‑-Private/Local.......... $ 2,800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 4,550,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 10,750,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
648. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Branch Campuses -
Minor Works: Branch Campuses (00-1-901)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 550,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 450,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
649. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Branch Campuses -
Minor Capital Projects (02-1-901)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
650. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Works Program (00‑2‑002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,200,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
651. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Capital Improvements (02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 28,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 34,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
652. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Equipment
Omnibus Acquisition (00‑2‑003)

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
653. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Equipment
Omnibus Appropriation (02-2-003)

For the purchase of
equipment to improve, upgrade, or replace necessary instructional and research
apparatus throughout the university.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
654. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Johnson
Hall Addition-Plant BioScience Building: New (00-2-007)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 96,500

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 203,500

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 45,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
655. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Shock
Physics Building: New Facility (00-2-080)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,540,000

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 7,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,640,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 760,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
656. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver -
Engineering and Life Sciences Building: New Facility (00-2-904)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 22,470,650

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,470,650

NEW SECTION. Sec.
657. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver - Student
Services Center: New Facility (00-2-905)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 55,213

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 194,787

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 14,001,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,751,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
658. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Minor
Capital Preservation/Renewal (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,775,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,775,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 28,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
659. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Campus
Infrastructure: Preservation (98-1-073)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,044,984

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,505,016

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
660. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Campus
Infrastructure: Preservation (02-1-073)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,019,300

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,460,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,479,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 35,479,300

NEW SECTION. Sec.
661. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Energy
Plant - Heat: Renovation (02-1-501)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 23,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
662. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - WSUnet
Infrastructure (98-2-074)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,975,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
663. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - WSUnet
Infrastructure (02-2-074)

Appropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
664. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver -
Multimedia/Electronic Communication Classroom Building: (02-2-907)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,900,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 600,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
665. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU ICNE Spokane -
College of Nursing: Nursing Addition (04-2-075)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections 902 and 903 of
this act.

(2) A predesign shall
be completed, in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office
of financial management, and submitted by September 2001.

(3) Future
appropriations for this project are contingent upon the submission of the
design documents, program, and related cost schedules on or before July 1,
2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,036,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,079,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
666. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Bohler
Renovation: Renovation (94-1-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 98,845

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,249,412

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,348,257

NEW SECTION. Sec.
667. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Kimbrough
Hall Renovation/Addition: Renovation (94‑2‑019)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 89,475

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 121,875

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 211,350

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,521,650

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,733,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
668. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman -
Infrastructure: Savings (94-1-999)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 496,542

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 214,924

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 711,466

NEW SECTION. Sec.
669. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Hazardous
Waste Facilities - Statewide: New (94‑2‑006)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington State
University Building

Account‑-State......... ................. $ 3,400,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,100,001

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,001

NEW SECTION. Sec.
670. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Cleveland
Hall Renovation/Addition (98-2-032)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,210,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
671. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Murrow
Hall Addition: New Facility (98-2-008)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,250,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,910,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
672. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Teaching
and Learning Center: New Facility (98‑2‑062)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 22,870,175

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,870,175

NEW SECTION. Sec.
673. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Apparel,
Merchandising, Interior Design, and Landscape Architecture Building: New
Facility (98-2-072)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,242,308

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 537,692

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 27,850,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
674. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Spokane - Health
Sciences Building: New Facility (98-2-903)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Higher Education
Construction

Account‑-State........................... $ 13,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 22,800,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 36,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
675. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver - Phase 2
Construction (98-2-911)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,350,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,715,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,065,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
676. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Senior Hall Design
(00-1-003)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 43,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,211,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 57,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,999,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
677. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Minor Works
Programs (00-2-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,210,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 980,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
678. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Childcare Center
(00-2-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 47,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 546,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 593,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 546,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
679. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Cheney Hall -
Design (00-2-009)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 225,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,600,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 75,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
680. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Infrastructure
Preservation (98-1-007)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 725,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,831,879

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,556,879

NEW SECTION. Sec.
681. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Infrastructure
Preservation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 26,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
682. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works:
Preservation (00-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 74,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 926,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
683. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Minor Works
Preservation (02-1-003)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 21,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
684. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Roof Replacement
2001 (02-1-004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,619,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,425,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
685. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU HVAC Systems
Upgrade (02-1-007)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
686. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Water System
Preservation and Expansion (02-1-008)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,236,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 7,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,736,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
687. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Property
Acquisition (02-2-001)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 650,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
688. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Campus Network
Upgrade (02-2-004)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
689. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Classroom Renewal
(96-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 143,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 801,838

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 944,838

NEW SECTION. Sec.
690. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Classroom Renewal
(02-2-007)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 of
this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,566,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,366,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
691. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Minor Works
Programs (02-2-008)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 515,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,985,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,800,000

-------------

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 13,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
692. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Monroe Hall
Renovation (96-1-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,617,000

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 125,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,742,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,514,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
693. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Water System
Preservation and Expansion (98-1-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 615,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 265,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
694. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

EWU Boiler Plant
Expansion/Upgrade (98-1-011)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,695,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,327,844

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,022,844

NEW SECTION. Sec.
695. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Electrical Utility:
Upgrades (98-1-110)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902, 903, and 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,842,824

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,042,824

NEW SECTION. Sec.
696. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Music Facility
(00-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,225,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 25,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
697. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program
(00-2-110)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 850,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,150,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
698. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Fiber Optic Backbone
Upgrade (00-2-130)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 150,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
699. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works
Preservation (00-1-120)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 740,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,260,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
700. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Omnibus Preservation
(02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,175,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,471,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,646,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
701. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Savings
(02-1-002)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
702. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Randall/Michaelsen Life
Safety and Mechanical System Improvements (02-1-003)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,800,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
703. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

McConnell Stage and
Classroom Remodel (02-1-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
704. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Omnibus - Program
(02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,200,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 12,559,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
705. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

CWU/Highline Higher
Education Center (02-2-101)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 75,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 10,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
706. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Steam/Electric/Chilled
Water/Fiber Optic (98-1-120)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,000,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,500,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
707. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Lynnwood Higher
Education Center (98-2-080)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902, 903,
and 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Central Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 875,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
708. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Minor Works
Preservation (00-1-002)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,100,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
709. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Minor Works
Preservation (02-1-014)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 800,000

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,200,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 22,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
710. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Emergency Repairs
(02-1-003)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 560,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 2,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
711. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Life Safety/Code
Compliance (02-1-013)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
712. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Minor Works Program
(02-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 450,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
713. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Seminar Building Phase
2 - Construction (02-2-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 41,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 41,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
714. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

COM Building Renovation
and Expansion (02-2-011)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 15,750,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
715. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

Lab II 3rd Floor -
Chemistry Lab Remodel (04-02-001)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 619,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 2,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 3,119,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,119,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
716. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure
Projects: Savings (94-1-999)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 249,801

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 249,801

NEW SECTION. Sec.
717. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Savings
(02-1-999)

Projects that are
completed in accordance with section 915 of this act may have their remaining
funds transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW SECTION. Sec.
718. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works:
Preservation (00-1-068)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 3,000,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
719. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works:
Preservation - Infrastructure (02-1-070)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
720. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works:
Preservation - Safety (02-1-071)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
721. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program
(00-2-069)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

Western Washington
University Capital

Projects Account‑-State.................. $ 3,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,730,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
722. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program
(02-2-072)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Western Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,831,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 46,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
723. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Campus Services
Facility (96-2-025)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,300,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,887,050

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,187,050

NEW SECTION. Sec.
724. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Integrated Signal
Distribution (96-2-056)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,700,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,548,250

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,248,250

NEW SECTION. Sec.
725. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Campus Infrastructure
Development (98-2-024)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,000,000

Western Washington
University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 669,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,669,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,250,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 8,780,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,899,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
726. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

Communications Facility
(98-2-053)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 26,519,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 6,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 32,519,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,454,400

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,473,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
727. FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD

NSIS Consortium
Development (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
728. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage
Projects (98-2-004)

The reappropriation in
this section shall support the projects as listed in section 748, chapter 379,
Laws of 1999.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 8,978,904

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,178,904

NEW SECTION. Sec.
729. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Stadium Way Facility:
Seismic (96-1-102)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 120,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,047,626

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,167,626

NEW SECTION. Sec.
730. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

State Capital Museum:
Preservation (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 69,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 415,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 484,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
731. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Olympia - State Capital
Museum Preservation (02-1-001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 238,679

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 238,679

NEW SECTION. Sec.
732. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Tacoma - State History
Museum Preservation Projects (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 373,016

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,738,605

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,111,621

NEW SECTION. Sec.
733. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Tacoma - Stadium Way
Research Center Preservation Projects (02‑1‑004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 339,847

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 527,721

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 867,568

NEW SECTION. Sec.
734. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Lewis and Clark Trail
Interpretive Infrastructure Grant Program (02-4-001)

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
735. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage
Projects (02-4-004)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation
is provided for the following list of projects:

Total

Amount Project

Organization Recommended Cost

Jefferson
County Historical Society - Bell Tower $ 100,000 386,083

Spokane
Parks and Recreation - Corbin and Moore-

Turner
Heritage Gardens 54,437 266,831

Clallam
County Historical Society - Lincoln School 83,500 250,000

Orcas
Island Historical Society - Museum 54,136 167,604

Gig Harbor
Peninsula Historical Society - Heritage

and Arts
Center 400,000 7,301,518

Vashon-Maury
Island Historical Society - Heritage

Museum 175,000 526,879

Loon Lake
Historical Society - Old Schoolhouse 8,292 29,896

Northwest
School of Wooden Boatbuilding - Port Hadlock 97,500 463,832

Drayton
Harbor Maritime Group - Dock Restoration

and Replacement 216,790 650,372

Volunteers
for Outdoor Washington - Twin Tunnels

Bridge 200,000 1,360,000

Historic
Seattle PDA - Dearborn House 200,000 2,131,227

Vancouver
National Historic Reserve - American

Red Cross
House 400,000 2,195,000

Maritime
Heritage Foundation - Historic Ship Wharf 400,000 2,031,000

Cowlitz
County Museum - Museum Expansion and Remodel 350,000 1,059,152

Mansfield
Museum and Historical Society - Museum

Renovation 10,916 35,750

Fox Island
Chapel - Chapel on Echo Bay 49,665 149,000

Kirkman
House Museum - Museum Repair and Stabilization 20,000 64,080

City of
Mount Vernon - Lincoln Theatre 250,000 1,535,082

Squaxin
Island Tribe - Tu Ha'Buts Cultural Center -

Phase 2 225,000 1,734,000

Western
Forest Industries Museum - Train Shed and

Baldwin
Locomotive 150,000 450,000

Steamer
Virginia V Foundation - Restoration of

Virginia
V 100,000 4,077,663

Ferry
County Fair Association - Carousel Restoration 60,000 190,500

White River
Valley Museum - Olson Farm 200,000 1,647,750

Alderwood
Manor Heritage Association - Superintendent's

Cottage 24,000 150,000

Kitsap
County Historical Society Museum - Storage

Systems
for Artifacts 70,000 516,422

Kalakala
Foundation - Dry-dock and Renovation Phase 175,764 2,321,550

----------------------------

$4,075,000 31,691,191

Alternate
Organizations

Kalakala
Foundation - remaining balance recommended 99,236

Museum of
Flight 50,000 5,009,667

Friends of
Skamokawa 9,900 30,199

City of
Raymond 239,000 719,000

City of
Morton 100,000 301,230

----------------------------

$
573,136 6,060,096

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,075,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 19,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
736. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Cheney Cowles Museum:
Preservation (02-1-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
737. FOR THE EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Cheney Cowles Museum:
Addition and Remodel (98-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 902 and
903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,150,774

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,033,406

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,184,180

NEW SECTION. Sec.
738. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGE SYSTEM

Project Artwork
Consolidation Account (96-2-400)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 92,634

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 71,788

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 164,422

NEW SECTION. Sec.
739. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community
College - Vocational/Child Care Building: Construction (96-2-651)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 877,226

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,016,077

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,893,303

NEW SECTION. Sec.
740. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community
College - Instructional Technical Center: Construction (96-2-652)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 931,266

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 941,435

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,872,701

NEW SECTION. Sec.
741. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community
College - Integrated Learning Assistance Resource Center: Construction
(96-2-653)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction
Account‑-State...... $ 520,099

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,928,519

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,448,618

NEW SECTION. Sec.
742. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College -
Poulsbo Center: Construction (96-2-654)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,932,340

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 114,335

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,046,675

NEW SECTION. Sec.
743. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park -
Transportation Trade: Construction (96-2-662)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 955,049

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,784,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 306,351

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,045,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
744. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park Technical
College - Aviation Trades Complex: Construction (96-2-998)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under section 906 of
this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,497,614

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,338,879

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,836,493

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,021,159

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,857,652

NEW SECTION. Sec.
745. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Underground Storage
Tanks (98-1-003)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 132,055

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 77,950

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 210,005

NEW SECTION. Sec.
746. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical
College: Renovation (98-1-190)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 78,915

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,815,502

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,894,417

NEW SECTION. Sec.
747. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College -
Library: Replacement (98-2-500)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 89,666

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,480,944

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,570,610

NEW SECTION. Sec.
748. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline Community
College - Classroom/Laboratory Building: Construction (98-2-660)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,748,626

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 1,315,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 6,063,626

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,151,374

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............. ...................... $ 7,215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
749. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Community
College - Allied Health Building: Addition (98‑2‑661)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,203,134

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,833,641

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,036,775

NEW SECTION. Sec.
750. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical College
- Health/Business Building: New Facility (98-2-672)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 661,660

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,086,600

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 188,339

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,936,599

NEW SECTION. Sec.
751. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington - Phase
3: New Facility (98-2-673)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 642,251

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,840,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 522,749

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
752. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton Technical
College - Technology Resource Center (98-2-674)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 663,699

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,591,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 516,301

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
753. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit Valley College -
Whidbey Higher Education Center (98-2-675)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 455,201

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,175,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 289,112

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,919,613

NEW SECTION. Sec.
754. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Community
College/University of Washington Bothell: Construction (98-2-999)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money from the reappropriation in this section
may be expended that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the
higher education coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule
approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,664,903

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 28,384,506

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,049,409

NEW SECTION. Sec.
755. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia College -
Instructional Building: Replacement (99-2-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,262,736

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,137,264

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
756. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College
- Electrical Substation (99-H-004)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 770,134

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 229,866

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
757. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Repair and Minor
Improvements (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 367,779

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,037,224

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,405,003

NEW SECTION. Sec.
758. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

HVAC Repairs (98-1-040)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 289,513

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,178,354

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.... ................................ $ 1,467,867

NEW SECTION. Sec.
759. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Mechanical Repairs
(98-1-070)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 322,215

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 128,190

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 450,405

NEW SECTION. Sec.
760. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Electrical Repairs
(98-1-090)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 807,423

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,070,769

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,878,192

NEW SECTION. Sec.
761. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Exterior Repairs
(98-1-110)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,131,342

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,310,007

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,441,349

NEW SECTION. Sec.
762. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Interior Repairs
(98-1-130)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 592,634

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 256,037

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 848,671

NEW SECTION. Sec.
763. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Minor Works:
Preservation (00-1-001)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,060,145

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 6,639,855

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
764. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (98-1-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is provided for Corbert hall at Centralia College, subject to the
conditions and limitations of section 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,800,360

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,477,124

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,277,484

NEW SECTION. Sec.
765. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Roof
Repairs: Infrastructure Improvements (00-1-010)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,064,310

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 2,532,690

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
766. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Facility
Repairs (00-1-050)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,964,850

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,285,563

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 15,250,413

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 12,149,587

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
767. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Site Repairs
(00-1-090)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,209,931

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,632,069

Future Biennia (Projected
Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
768. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Improvements
(98-2-200)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,278,167

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,025,487

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,303,654

NEW SECTION. Sec.
769. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Minor Works:
Program (00-1-130)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,285,830

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 531,792

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,817,622

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 11,032,378

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
770. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College -
Portable Buildings: Replacement (00-1-223)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,327,170

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 312,830

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
771. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community
College - Relocatable Buildings: Replacement (00‑1‑236)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,371,732

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,028,268

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
772. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Puget Sound
Community College - Portable Buildings Replacement (00-1-237)

Reappropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,364,576

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 247,824

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,612,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
773. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Puget Sound
Community College - General Education Complex (00‑2‑679)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 24,046

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,781,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 99,954

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,937,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
774. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College -
Physical Plant Building: Replacement (00-2-002)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 5,086,600

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,029,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,115,600

NEW SECTION. Sec.
775. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community
College - Robinswood School: Replacement (00‑2‑005)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,197,017

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 5,609,583

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,806,600

NEW SECTION. Sec.
776. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline Community
College - Library/Technical Center: New Facility (00-2-319)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,708,051

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 541,949

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
777. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community
College - Drama/Music Class/Laboratories: Renovation (00-2-322)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,336,754

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 93,246

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
778. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark Community College
- Applied Arts 4 Building Renovation (00‑2‑326)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 759,936

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,780,064

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
779. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College/WSU
Vancouver - Classroom/Laboratories: Design (00‑2‑680)

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904 of this act. No money from the appropriations may be expended
that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the
office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,997

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,644,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 108,003

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,712,900

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,476,900

NEW SECTION. Sec.
780. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley
College - Sexton Hall Computer Laboratories: Renovation (00‑2‑327)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 104,395

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 595,605

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
781. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley
College - Omak Science Laboratory: New Facility (00‑2‑952)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 59,366

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 840,634

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
782. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community
College - Mechanics Complex: Renovation (00‑2‑328)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,425,106

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 289,894

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
783. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community
College - Building 5: Renovation (00‑2‑335)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,492,736

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 7,264

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
784. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical
College - Building B: Renovation (00‑2‑338)

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 482,087

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 1,444,713

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,926,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
785. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Community
College: Development (00-2-501)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 through 904, and 906 of this act. No money may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 26,581,595

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 23,518,405

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
786. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College
- Emergency Roof: Replacement (00-2-600)

Reappropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 92,792

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 907,208

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
787. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College Puyallup
- Phase 3 Expansion: Design (00-2-676)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,743,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 217,200

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 19,917,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,877,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
788. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community
College - Design Classroom/Laboratory Building: New Facility (00-2-677)

For both the design and
construction phases of the project in this section, the appropriations are
subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections 902 and 903 of
this act. Before bids for construction are sought, complete design documents,
program, and related cost schedules must be submitted to the office of
financial management for its review and approval.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 13,117

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,545,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 66,883

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,625,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
789. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline Community
College - Higher Education Center and Childcare (00-2-678)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,228,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 117,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,991,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
790. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Hazardous
Material Pool (00‑9‑031)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 256,373

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 281,286

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 537,659

NEW SECTION. Sec.
791. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Statewide Americans
with Disabilities Pool (00‑9‑036)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of section 906(2)(b)
of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 555,788

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 381,583

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 937,371

NEW SECTION. Sec.
792. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works ‑
Preservation (Emergency Funds) (02‑1‑001)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 58,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
793. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs
"A" (02‑1‑010)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 7,473,077

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,473,077

NEW SECTION. Sec.
794. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs
"A" (02‑1‑050)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 21,660,328

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 100,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 121,660,328

NEW SECTION. Sec.
795. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs
"A" ‑ Community and Technical College System (02‑1‑090)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations of sections 905 and
906 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 8,343,232

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 32,343,232

NEW SECTION. Sec.
796. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works ‑
Program ‑ Community and Technical College System (02‑1‑130)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided
from the education construction account as capital project matching funds to
the following colleges: Olympic College-Shelton, $500,000; Skagit Valley,
$500,000; Seattle Central, $500,000; South Seattle, $500,000; Yakima Valley,
$500,000; Spokane Falls, $500,000; Whatcom, $267,500; and Edmonds, $500,000.
State funds shall be matched by an equal or greater amount of nonstate moneys.

(2) Following the
allocation of funds for the projects in subsection (1) of this section, the
appropriation in this section is subject to the requirements of sections 905
and 906 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 14,732,500

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 5,535,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 20,267,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 80,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 100,267,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
797. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit Valley College ‑
Office Space: Replacement (02‑1‑213)

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 762,689

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 762,689

NEW SECTION. Sec.
798. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central
Community College ‑ Portables: Replacement (02‑1‑215)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,897,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,897,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
799. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central
Community College ‑ Edison Hall: Renovation (02‑1‑315)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,809,200

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,809,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
800. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community
College ‑ Building A: Replacement (02‑1‑217)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 5,477,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,477,400

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley
College ‑ Greenhouse: Replacement (02‑1‑220)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 441,360

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 441,360

NEW SECTION. Sec.
802. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley
College ‑ Agriculture Program: Renovation (02‑1‑328)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 794,536

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 794,536

NEW SECTION. Sec.
803. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community
College ‑ International Program: Replacement (02‑1‑222)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 587,070

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 587,070

NEW SECTION. Sec.
804. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College Fort
Steilacoom ‑ Portables: Replacement (02‑1‑223)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 2,452,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,452,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
805. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lower Columbia College ‑
Physical Science Portables: Replacement (02‑1‑226)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 1,959,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,959,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
806. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lower Columbia College ‑
Vocational Building: Renovation/Addition (02‑1‑326)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑‑State........... $ 1,090,700

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,090,700

NEW SECTION. Sec.
807. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community
College ‑ Child Care: Replacement (02‑1‑229)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 969,900

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 969,900

NEW SECTION. Sec.
808. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community
College ‑ Sundquist Hall: Renovation (02‑1‑329)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 1,812,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,812,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
809. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley College -
Higher Education Center (00-2-954)

The reappropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 635,279

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 3,364,721

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
810. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Higher
Education Center (02-2-100)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2) The appropriation
in this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under section 911
of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 18,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
811. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community
College ‑ Fine Arts Building: Replacement (02‑1‑231)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 672,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 672,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
812. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community
College ‑ Library: Renovation (02‑1‑331)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 5,602,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
813. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical
College ‑ Replacement: New Facility (02‑1‑239)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 4,357,900

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,357,900

NEW SECTION. Sec.
814. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington
Community College ‑ Replacement: New Facility (02‑1‑240)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,915,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,915,300

NEW SECTION. Sec.
815. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College ‑
Buildings D and E: Renovation (02‑1‑310)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,669,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,669,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
816. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor Community
College ‑ Library: Renovation (02‑1‑311)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑‑State........................... $ 4,579,500

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,579,500

NEW SECTION. Sec.
817. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline Community
College ‑ Building 800: Renovation (02‑1‑319)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,021,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,021,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
818. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community
College ‑ "A" Building: Renovation (02‑1‑320)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act. State funds must be matched by an equal or greater
amount of nonstate moneys.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 2,783,050

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,783,050

NEW SECTION. Sec.
819. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin
Community College ‑ Building A: Renovation (02‑1‑333)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑‑State...... $ 6,434,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,434,100

NEW SECTION. Sec.
820. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park - Building
18 Machine Trades: New Facility (02-1-343)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,791,800

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,791,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
821. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Community
College - Multicultural Student Service Center (02-2-230)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 235,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 235,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
822. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

University of
Washington - Bothell/Cascadia Phase 2B: New Facilities (02-2-999)

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the south campus access and is subject to
the review and allotment procedures under sections 902 through 904, and 906 of
this act. No money from this appropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 17,476,750

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,976,750

NEW SECTION. Sec.
823. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend Community
College - Library Replacement: New Facility (02-1-232)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 7,415,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 82,000

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,497,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
824. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Community
College - Parent/Child Center: Replacement (02-1-234)

Appropriation:

Community and Technical
Colleges Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 391,230

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 391,230

NEW SECTION. Sec.
825. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community
College - Portable Buildings: Replacement (02-1-236)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Education Construction
Account‑-State........... $ 3,457,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
826. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community
College - Information Technology/Vocational Center: New Facility (02-2-683)

The appropriation in
this section is for all design phases of the project described in this
section. A predesign of the project shall be completed first, on or before
September 1, 2001, in accordance with the predesign manual published by the
office of financial management. Future appropriations for this project are
subject to the submission of design documents, program, and related cost
schedules on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,198,100

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 13,049,900

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,248,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
827. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community
College - Instructional Technology Building (04-2-681)

The appropriation in
this section is for all design phases of the project described in this
section. A predesign of the project shall be completed first, on or before
September 1, 2001, in accordance with the predesign manual published by the
office of financial management. Future appropriations for this project are
subject to the submission of design documents, program, and related cost
schedules on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,624,400

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,587,400

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,211,800

NEW SECTION. Sec.
828. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community
College - Computer Laboratory Building (04-2-682)

The appropriation in
this section is for all design phases of the project described in this
section. A predesign of the project shall be completed first, on or before
September 1, 2001, in accordance with the predesign manual published by the
office of financial management. Future appropriations for this project are
subject to the submission of design documents, program, and related cost
schedules on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,014,700

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 9,287,500

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,302,200

NEW SECTION. Sec.
829. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Puget Sound
Community College - Family Education/Child Center (04-1-238)

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the conditions and limitations under sections 902
and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,132,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,132,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
830. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Technology Institute
Partner College Computer Labs (01-S-003)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to construct and equip six computer science and
language labs, an approximate size being 1,200 square feet, one at each of the
following college districts: Highline, Olympic, Pierce, South Seattle, South
Puget Sound, and Tacoma.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,337,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
831. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Science
Building: New Facility (01-S-001)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
832. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green River Community
College - Sciences Building: New Facility (01-S-002)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 18,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
833. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical College
- Phase III Expansion: New Facility (02-2-684)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 94,346

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 16,965,108

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,059,454

NEW SECTION. Sec.
834. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community
College - Instructional Lab: New Facility (02-2-685)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to
the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 68,838

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 15,159,624

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,228,462

NEW SECTION. Sec.
835. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Basic
Skills Lab: New Addition (02-2-686)

The appropriation in
this section is provided to conduct a predesign of the project described in
this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to the
submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

State Building
Construction Account‑-State...... $ 36,300

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 5,309,540

-------------

TOTAL.... ................................ $ 5,345,870

(End
of part)

PART
6

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. The estimated debt
service costs impacting future general fund expenditures related solely to new
capital appropriations within this act are $18,427,449 during the 2001-2003
fiscal period; $106,954,937 during the 2003-2005 fiscal period; $149,523,472 during
the 2005-2007 fiscal period; $149,899,611 during the 2007-2009 fiscal period;
and $149,899,611 during the 2009-2011 fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
902. To ensure that major
construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and
executive intent, appropriations in this act referencing this section or in
excess of $5,000,000 shall not be expended until the office of financial
management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign and other documents
and approved an allotment for the project. The predesign document shall
include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in accordance
with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management. To
improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports shall be
submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial
management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
senate. Reports will be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a
format to be developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
903. Allotments for
appropriations shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management. The office of
financial management shall notify the house of representatives capital budget
committee and the senate ways and means committee of allotment releases based
on review by the office of financial management. No expenditure may be
incurred or obligation entered into for appropriations referring to this
section until the office of financial management has approved the allotment of
the funds to be expended. Projects that will be employing alternative public
works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the
allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110. Contracts
shall not be executed that call for expenditures in excess of the approved
allotment, and the total amount shown in such contracts for the cost of future
work that has not been appropriated shall not exceed the amount identified for
such work in the level of funding approved by the office of financial
management at the completion of predesign.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
904. Appropriations for design
and construction of facilities on higher education branch campuses shall be
expended only after funds are allotted to institutions of higher education on
the basis of: (1) Comparable unit cost standards, as determined by the office
of financial management in consultation with the higher education coordinating
board; (2) costs consistent with other higher education teaching facilities in
the state; and (3) student full-time equivalent enrollment levels as
established by the office of financial management in consultation with the
higher education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
905. To ensure that minor
works appropriations are carried out in accordance with legislative intent,
funds shall not be allotted until project lists are on file at the office of
financial management. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered
into for appropriations referring to this section until the office of financial
management has approved the allotment of the funds to be expended.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
906. (1) Agencies shall
expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in order to:
(a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental
rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's
natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment
opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(2) In order to meet
the goals of this section, the following conditions apply to appropriations
that reference this section: (a) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed
to accelerate expenditure rates at the current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to
meet the goals of this section; and (b) reappropriations that reference this
subsection (2)(b) shall lapse on June 30, 2003.

(3) The office of
financial management shall report the following to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature by January 30, 2003: (a) A listing of
reappropriations in the governor's 2003-2005 capital budget recommendation that
have been reappropriated one or more times and have ten percent or more of the
original appropriation unexpended; and (b) an explanation of why the
appropriation remains unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
907. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES
AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter
into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal
amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall
use the most economical financial contract option available, including
long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to
purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of
participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated
purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract may be
reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract to the extent provided in
the financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

The director of general
administration shall ensure that the clustering of state facilities and the
collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place where such
configurations are economical and consistent with agency space needs. Agencies
shall assist the department of general administration with facility collocation
and consolidation efforts.

State agencies may
enter into agreements with the department of general administration and the
state treasurer's office to develop requests to the legislature for acquisition
of properties and facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may
include charges for services rendered.

(1) Secretary of state:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $13,582,200 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a
regional archives building in eastern Washington to be sited at, or in the
proximity of, the Riverpoint higher education park in Spokane.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $653,800 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase technology
equipment and software for an electronic data archive, provided that authority
to expend funding for acquisition of technology equipment and software
associated with the electronic data archive is conditioned on compliance with
section 902 of the 2001-2003 operating budget bill (information services
projects).

(2) Department of
general administration:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $3,956,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to expand the existing
Isabella Bush records center in Tumwater for use by state agencies.

(b) Enter into a financing
contract in the amount of $35,656,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase two existing office
buildings and associated land in Tacoma for use by the department of social and
health services.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state office building of 150,000
to 200,000 square feet on state-owned property in Tumwater according to the
terms of the agreement with the Port of Olympia when the property was
acquired. The building shall be constructed and financed so that agency
occupancy costs will not exceed comparable private market rental rates. The
comparable general office space rate shall be calculated based on the three
latest Thurston county leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square
feet adjusted for inflation as determined by the department of general administration.
The department of general administration shall coordinate with potential state
agency tenants whose current lease expire near the time of occupancy so that
buyout of current leases do not add to state expense.

(3) Military
department:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $1,307,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct additional space
at the Spokane combined public safety training center.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $1,614,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct additional space
at the Bremerton readiness center.

(4) Department of
corrections:

Enter into a financing
contract in the amount of $4,588,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a correctional
industries transportation services warehouse.

(5) Department of
veterans affairs:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a skilled nursing
home in Retsil.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract in the amount of $7,850,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a state veterans'
home in eastern Washington.

(6) State parks and
recreation: It is the intent of the legislature that the operating revenues of
the department provide the primary source of funds necessary to meet financing
contract obligations for the projects financed under this authority. In
addition, state parks and recreation is authorized to pledge to make payments
from appropriated funds pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW in order to:

Enter into financing
contracts in the amount of $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install cabins and yurts
statewide.

(7) Community and
technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the amount of
$4,106,300 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to renovate Lynnwood hall and Montlake Terrace hall.

(b) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the amount of
$3,134,900 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct an addition to the student center building.

(c) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the amount of
$15,066,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to replace the student union building.

(d) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College in the amount of
$2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for up to $2,500,000 to purchase the maple terrace apartments.

(e) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College in the amount of
$1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for remodeling of the fitness center.

(f) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the amount of
$500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the college
campus.

(g) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Olympic College in the amount of $900,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for
development of off-street student parking.

(h) Enter into a
financing contract on behalf of Renton Technical College in the amount of
$1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for the purchase of approximately ten acres within the district
boundary to support a future relocation of apprenticeship programs off the main
campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
908. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION‑-ART
WORK ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in
this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund
larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school district
boards.

(2) One-half of one
percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any
major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars by
colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
28B.10.027. The Washington state arts commission may combine the proceeds from
individual projects in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays
in consultation with the board of regents or trustees.

(3) One-half of one
percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any
public building by a state agency as defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission
may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works
of art or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.

(4) At least
eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission
during the 2001-2003 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027,
and 43.17.200 shall be spent solely for direct acquisition of works of art.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
909. The amounts shown under
the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and
"Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not
constitute legislative approval of these amounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
910. "Reappropriations"
in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides
otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances
remaining on June 30, 2001, from the 1999-2001 biennial appropriations for each
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
911. To carry out the
provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign,
design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
912. If any federal moneys
appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state,
the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the
federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No
replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the
director of financial management in consultation with the senate committee on
ways and means and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
913. (1) Unless otherwise
stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate
money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the
state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of
total project costs.

(2) Provision of the
full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the
expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a
proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each
distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
914. Any capital improvements
or capital projects involving construction or major expansion of a state office
facility, including, but not limited to, district headquarters, detachment
offices, and off-campus faculty offices, shall be reviewed by the department of
general administration for possible consolidation, collocation, and compliance
with state office standards before allotment of funds. The intent of the
requirement imposed by this section is to eliminate duplication and reduce
total office space requirements where feasible, while ensuring proper service
to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
915. The governor, through the
office of financial management, may authorize a transfer of appropriation
authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount
required for the completion of such project to another capital project for
which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to
expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended by the legislature in
making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of
higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the
same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local
government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single
omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by
the implementing statutes which govern the grants.

For purposes of this
section, the governor may find that an amount is in excess of the amount
required for the completion of a project only if: (1) The project as defined
in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are
funds remaining; or (2) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a
substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget
document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount
appropriated in this act.

For the purposes of
this section, the legislature intends that each project be defined as proposed
to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears
from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope
of a project in a different way.

A report of any
transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer
under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at
least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of
financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
916. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE
BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act
from the state building construction account may be transferred to the state
taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance
committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The state
treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial
management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority from the
state building construction account to the state taxable building construction
account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
917. State contracts for the
legislative building renovation, Nisqually earthquake repair, and future
earthquake mitigation shall conform to all rules, regulations, and requirements
of the federal emergency management agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
918. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 919. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End
of part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY................................. 156

COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM........................ 172

CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION........................... 38

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT........ 2

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 57

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 68

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE................................ 95

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION........................... 23

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH........................................... 51

DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES............................. 38

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES............................... 107

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES....................... 39

DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS................................ 55

EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 171

EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 149

HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD........................... 167

INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION................... 87

MILITARY DEPARTMENT............................................ 31

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT................................. 21

OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE................................ 1

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 122

STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION.................................. 93

STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER.............................. 36

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION.......................... 76

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 123

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 125

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION.......................... 123

THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 160

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON...................................... 126

WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY........................... 167

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL....................................... 119

WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 137

WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 163

---
END ---