BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited
as the uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. DEFINITIONS. The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1)
"Abandoned" means left without provision for reasonable and necessary
care or supervision.

(2) "Child"
means an individual who has not attained eighteen years of age.

(3) "Child custody
determination" means a judgment, decree, parenting plan, or other order of
a court providing for the legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with
respect to a child. The term includes a permanent, temporary, initial, and
modification order. The term does not include an order relating to child
support or other monetary obligation of an individual.

(4) "Child custody
proceeding" means a proceeding in which legal custody, physical custody, a
parenting plan, or visitation with respect to a child is an issue. The term
includes a proceeding for dissolution, divorce, separation, neglect, abuse,
dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of parental rights, and
protection from domestic violence, in which the issue may appear. The term
does not include a proceeding involving juvenile delinquency, emancipation
proceedings under chapter 13.64 RCW, proceedings under chapter 13.32A RCW, or
enforcement under Article 3.

(5)
"Commencement" means the filing of the first pleading in a
proceeding.

(6) "Court"
means an entity authorized under the law of a state to establish, enforce, or
modify a child custody determination.

(7) "Home
state" means the state in which a child lived with a parent or a person
acting as a parent for at least six consecutive months immediately before the
commencement of a child custody proceeding. In the case of a child less than
six months of age, the term means the state in which the child lived from birth
with a parent or person acting as a parent. A period of temporary absence of a
child, parent, or person acting as a parent is part of the period.

(8) "Initial
determination" means the first child custody determination concerning a
particular child.

(9) "Issuing
court" means the court that makes a child custody determination for which
enforcement is sought under this chapter.

(10) "Issuing
state" means the state in which a child custody determination is made.

(11)
"Modification" means a child custody determination that changes,
replaces, supersedes, or is otherwise made after a previous determination
concerning the same child, whether or not it is made by the court that made the
previous determination.

(12) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal
or commercial entity.

(13) "Person
acting as a parent" means a person, other than a parent, who:

(a) Has physical
custody of the child or has had physical custody for a period of six
consecutive months, including any temporary absence, within one year
immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding; and

(b) Has been awarded
legal custody by a court or claims a right to legal custody under the law of
this state.

(14) "Physical
custody" means the physical care and supervision of a child.

(15) "State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States.

(16) "Tribe"
means an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan Native village, that is recognized by
federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

(17)
"Warrant" means an order issued by a court authorizing law
enforcement officers to take physical custody of a child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. PROCEEDINGS GOVERNED BY
OTHER LAW. This chapter does not govern an adoption proceeding or a proceeding
pertaining to the authorization of emergency medical care for a child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. APPLICATION TO INDIAN
TRIBES. (1) A child custody proceeding that pertains to an Indian child as
defined in the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et
seq., is not subject to this chapter to the extent that it is governed by the
federal Indian child welfare act.

(2) A court of this state
shall treat a tribe as if it were a state of the United States for the purpose
of applying Articles 1 and 2.

(3) A child custody
determination made by a tribe under factual circumstances in substantial
conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this chapter must be recognized
and enforced under Article 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. INTERNATIONAL APPLICATION
OF CHAPTER. (1) A court of this state shall treat a foreign country as if it
were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying Articles 1 and 2.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (3) of this section, a child custody determination made
in a foreign country under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with
the jurisdictional standards of this chapter must be recognized and enforced
under Article 3.

(3) A court of this
state need not apply this chapter if the child custody law of a foreign country
violates fundamental principles of human rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. EFFECT OF CHILD CUSTODY
DETERMINATION. A child custody determination made by a court of this state
that had jurisdiction under this chapter binds all persons who have been served
in accordance with the laws of this state or notified in accordance with
section 108 of this act or who have submitted to the jurisdiction of the court,
and who have been given an opportunity to be heard. As to those persons, the
determination is conclusive as to all decided issues of law and fact except to
the extent the determination is modified.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. PRIORITY. If a question
of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under this chapter is raised in a
child custody proceeding, the question, upon proper motion, must be given
priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. NOTICE TO PERSONS OUTSIDE
STATE. (1) Notice required for the exercise of jurisdiction when a person is
outside this state may be given in a manner prescribed for service of process
by the law of the state in which the service is made or given in a manner
reasonably calculated to give actual notice, and may be made in any of the
following ways:

(a) Personal delivery
outside this state in the manner prescribed for service of process within this
state;

(b) By any form of mail
addressed to the person to be served and requesting a receipt; or

(c) As directed by the
court, including publication if other means of notification are ineffective.

(2) Proof of service
outside this state may be made:

(a) By affidavit of the
individual who made the service;

(b) In the manner
prescribed by the law of this state or the law of the state in which the
service is made; or

(c) As directed by the
order under which the service is made.

If service is made by
mail, proof may be a receipt signed by the addressee or other evidence of
delivery to the addressee.

(3) Notice is not
required for the exercise of jurisdiction with respect to a person who submits
to the jurisdiction of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. APPEARANCE AND LIMITED
IMMUNITY. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a party to
a child custody proceeding, including a modification proceeding, or a
petitioner or respondent in a proceeding to enforce or register a child custody
determination, is not subject to personal jurisdiction in this state for
another proceeding or purpose solely by reason of having participated, or of
having been physically present for the purpose of participating, in the
proceeding.

(2) A person who is
subject to personal jurisdiction in this state on a basis other than physical
presence is not immune from service of process in this state. A party present
in this state who is subject to the jurisdiction of another state is not immune
from service of process allowable under the laws of that state.

(3) The immunity
granted by subsection (1) of this section does not extend to civil litigation
based on acts unrelated to the participation in a proceeding under this chapter
committed by an individual while present in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. COMMUNICATION BETWEEN
COURTS. (1) A court of this state may communicate with a court in another
state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter.

(2) The court may allow
the parties to participate in the communication. If the parties are not able
to participate in the communication, they must be given the opportunity to
present facts and legal arguments before a decision on jurisdiction is made.

(3) Communication
between courts on schedules, calendars, court records, and similar matters may
occur without informing the parties. A record need not be made of the
communication.

(4) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (3) of this section, a record must be made of a
communication under this section. The parties must be informed promptly of the
communication and granted access to the record.

(5) For the purposes of
this section, "record" means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. TAKING TESTIMONY IN
ANOTHER STATE. (1) In addition to other procedures available to a party, a
party to a child custody proceeding may offer testimony of witnesses who are
located in another state, including testimony of the parties and the child, by
deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in
another state. The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a
person be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the
terms upon which the testimony is taken.

(2) A court of this
state may permit an individual residing in another state to be deposed or to
testify by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means before a
designated court or at another location in that state. A court of this state
shall cooperate with courts of other states in designating an appropriate
location for the deposition or testimony.

(3) Documentary
evidence transmitted from another state to a court of this state by
technological means that do not produce an original writing may not be excluded
from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. COOPERATION BETWEEN
COURTS‑-PRESERVATION OF RECORDS. (1) A court of this state may request
the appropriate court of another state to:

(a) Hold an evidentiary
hearing;

(b) Order a person to
produce or give evidence pursuant to procedures of that state;

(c) Order that an
evaluation be made with respect to the custody of a child involved in a pending
proceeding;

(d) Forward to the
court of this state a certified copy of the transcript of the record of the
hearing, the evidence otherwise presented, and any evaluation prepared in
compliance with the request; and

(e) Order a party to a
child custody proceeding or any person having physical custody of the child to
appear in the proceeding with or without the child.

(2) Upon request of a
court of another state, a court of this state may hold a hearing or enter an
order described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Travel and other
necessary and reasonable expenses incurred under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section may be assessed against the parties according to the law of this
state.

(4) A court of this state
shall preserve the pleadings, orders, decrees, records of hearings,
evaluations, and other pertinent records with respect to a child custody
proceeding until the child attains eighteen years of age. Upon appropriate
request by a court or law enforcement official of another state, the court
shall forward a certified copy of those records.

ARTICLE
2

JURISDICTION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. INITIAL CHILD CUSTODY
JURISDICTION. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 204 of this act, a
court of this state has jurisdiction to make an initial child custody
determination only if:

(a) This state is the
home state of the child on the date of the commencement of the proceeding, or
was the home state of the child within six months before the commencement of
the proceeding and the child is absent from this state but a parent or person
acting as a parent continues to live in this state;

(b) A court of another
state does not have jurisdiction under (a) of this subsection, or a court of
the home state of the child has declined to exercise jurisdiction on the ground
that this state is the more appropriate forum under section 207 or 208 of this
act, and:

(i) The child and the
child's parents, or the child and at least one parent or a person acting as a
parent, have a significant connection with this state other than mere physical
presence; and

(ii) Substantial
evidence is available in this state concerning the child's care, protection,
training, and personal relationships;

(c) All courts having
jurisdiction under (a) of this subsection have declined to exercise
jurisdiction on the ground that a court of this state is the more appropriate
forum to determine the custody of the child under section 207 or 208 of this
act; or

(d) No court of any
other state would have jurisdiction under the criteria specified in (a), (b),
or (c) of this subsection.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section is the exclusive jurisdictional basis for making a child custody
determination by a court of this state.

(3) Physical presence
of, or personal jurisdiction over, a party or a child is not necessary or
sufficient to make a child custody determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. EXCLUSIVE, CONTINUING
JURISDICTION. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 204 of this act, a
court of this state that has made a child custody determination consistent with
section 201 or 203 of this act has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction over the
determination until:

(a) A court of this
state determines that neither the child, the child's parents, and any person
acting as a parent do not have a significant connection with this state and
that substantial evidence is no longer available in this state concerning the
child's care, protection, training, and personal relationships; or

(b) A court of this
state or a court of another state determines that the child, the child's
parents, and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside in this
state.

(2) A court of this
state that has made a child custody determination and does not have exclusive,
continuing jurisdiction under this section may modify that determination only
if it has jurisdiction to make an initial determination under section 201 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. JURISDICTION TO MODIFY
DETERMINATION. Except as otherwise provided in section 204 of this act, a
court of this state may not modify a child custody determination made by a
court of another state unless a court of this state has jurisdiction to make an
initial determination under section 201(1) (a) or (b) of this act and:

(1) The court of the
other state determines it no longer has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction
under section 202 of this act or that a court of this state would be a more
convenient forum under section 207 of this act; or

(2) A court of this
state or a court of the other state determines that the child, the child's
parents, and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside in the other
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. TEMPORARY EMERGENCY
JURISDICTION. (1) A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction
if the child is present in this state and the child has been abandoned or it is
necessary in an emergency to protect the child because the child, or a sibling
or parent of the child, is subjected to or threatened with abuse.

(2) If there is no
previous child custody determination that is entitled to be enforced under this
chapter and a child custody proceeding has not been commenced in a court of a
state having jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act, a child
custody determination made under this section remains in effect until an order
is obtained from a court of a state having jurisdiction under sections 201
through 203 of this act. If a child custody proceeding has not been or is not
commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under sections 201 through
203 of this act, a child custody determination made under this section becomes
a final determination, if it so provides and this state becomes the home state
of the child.

(3) If there is a
previous child custody determination that is entitled to be enforced under this
chapter, or a child custody proceeding has been commenced in a court of a state
having jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act, any order
issued by a court of this state under this section must specify in the order a
period that the court considers adequate to allow the person seeking an order
to obtain an order from the state having jurisdiction under sections 201
through 203 of this act. The order issued in this state remains in effect
until an order is obtained from the other state within the period specified or
the period expires.

(4) A court of this
state that has been asked to make a child custody determination under this
section, upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced
in, or a child custody determination has been made by, a court of a state
having jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act, shall
immediately communicate with the other court. A court of this state that is
exercising jurisdiction pursuant to sections 201 through 203 of this act, upon
being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced in, or a
child custody determination has been made by, a court of another state under a
statute similar to this section shall immediately communicate with the court of
that state to resolve the emergency, protect the safety of the parties and the
child, and determine a period for the duration of the temporary order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. NOTICE‑-OPPORTUNITY
TO BE HEARD‑-JOINDER. (1) Before a child custody determination is made
under this chapter, notice and an opportunity to be heard in accordance with
the standards of section 108 of this act must be given to: (a) All persons
entitled to notice under the law of this state as in child custody proceedings
between residents of this state; (b) any parent whose parental rights have not
been previously terminated; and (c) any person having physical custody of the
child.

(2) This chapter does
not govern the enforceability of a child custody determination made without
notice or an opportunity to be heard.

(3) The obligation to
join a party and the right to intervene as a party in a child custody
proceeding under this chapter are governed by the law of this state as in child
custody proceedings between residents of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. SIMULTANEOUS
PROCEEDINGS. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 204 of this act, a
court of this state may not exercise its jurisdiction under this article if, at
the time of the commencement of the proceeding, a proceeding concerning the
custody of the child has been commenced in a court of another state having
jurisdiction substantially in conformity with this chapter, unless the proceeding
has been terminated or is stayed by the court of the other state because a
court of this state is a more convenient forum under section 207 of this act.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in section 204 of this act, a court of this state, before hearing a
child custody proceeding, shall examine the court documents and other
information supplied by the parties pursuant to section 209 of this act. If
the court determines that a child custody proceeding has been commenced in a
court in another state having jurisdiction substantially in accordance with
this chapter, the court of this state shall stay its proceeding and communicate
with the court of the other state. If the court of the state having
jurisdiction substantially in accordance with this chapter does not determine
that the court of this state is a more appropriate forum, the court of this
state shall dismiss the proceeding.

(3) In a proceeding to
modify a child custody determination, a court of this state shall determine
whether a proceeding to enforce the determination has been commenced in another
state. If a proceeding to enforce a child custody determination has been
commenced in another state, the court may:

(a) Stay the proceeding
for modification pending the entry of an order of a court of the other state
enforcing, staying, denying, or dismissing the proceeding for enforcement;

(b) Enjoin the parties
from continuing with the proceeding for enforcement; or

(c) Proceed with the
modification under conditions it considers appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. INCONVENIENT FORUM. (1)
A court of this state which has jurisdiction under this chapter to make a child
custody determination may decline to exercise its jurisdiction at any time if
it determines that it is an inconvenient forum under the circumstances and that
a court of another state is a more appropriate forum. The issue of
inconvenient forum may be raised upon motion of a party, the court's own
motion, or request of another court.

(2) Before determining
whether it is an inconvenient forum, a court of this state shall consider
whether it is appropriate for a court of another state to exercise
jurisdiction. For this purpose, the court shall allow the parties to submit
information and shall consider all relevant factors, including:

(a) Whether domestic
violence has occurred and is likely to continue in the future and which state
could best protect the parties and the child;

(b) The length of time
the child has resided outside this state;

(c) The distance
between the court in this state and the court in the state that would assume
jurisdiction;

(d) The relative
financial circumstances of the parties;

(e) Any agreement of
the parties as to which state should assume jurisdiction;

(f) The nature and
location of the evidence required to resolve the pending litigation, including
testimony of the child;

(g) The ability of the
court of each state to decide the issue expeditiously and the procedures
necessary to present the evidence; and

(h) The familiarity of
the court of each state with the facts and issues in the pending litigation.

(3) If a court of this
state determines that it is an inconvenient forum and that a court of another
state is a more appropriate forum, it shall stay the proceedings upon condition
that a child custody proceeding be promptly commenced in another designated
state and may impose any other condition the court considers just and proper.

(4) A court of this
state may decline to exercise its jurisdiction under this chapter if a child
custody determination is incidental to an action for dissolution or another
proceeding while still retaining jurisdiction over the dissolution or other
proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. JURISDICTION DECLINED BY
REASON OF CONDUCT. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 204 of this act
or by other law of this state, if a court of this state has jurisdiction under
this chapter because a person seeking to invoke its jurisdiction has engaged in
unjustifiable conduct, the court shall decline to exercise its jurisdiction
unless:

(a) The parents and all
persons acting as parents have acquiesced in the exercise of jurisdiction;

(b) A court of the
state otherwise having jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act
determines that this state is a more appropriate forum under section 207 of
this act; or

(c) No court of any
other state would have jurisdiction under the criteria specified in sections
201 through 203 of this act.

(2) If a court of this
state declines to exercise its jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, it may fashion an appropriate remedy to ensure the safety of the child
and prevent a repetition of the unjustifiable conduct, including staying the
proceeding until a child custody proceeding is commenced in a court having
jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act.

(3) If a court
dismisses a petition or stays a proceeding because it declines to exercise its
jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it shall assess
against the party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction necessary and reasonable
expenses including costs, communication expenses, attorneys' fees, investigative
fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the course
of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees are sought establishes that
the assessment would be clearly inappropriate. The court may not assess fees,
costs, or expenses against this state unless authorized by law other than this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. INFORMATION TO BE
SUBMITTED TO COURT. (1) Subject to laws providing for the confidentiality of
procedures, addresses, and other identifying information, in a child custody
proceeding, each party, in its first pleading or in an attached affidavit,
shall give information, if reasonably ascertainable, under oath as to the
child's present address or whereabouts, the places where the child has lived
during the last five years, and the names and present addresses of the persons
with whom the child has lived during that period. The pleading or affidavit
must state whether the party:

(a) Has participated,
as a party or witness or in any other capacity, in any other proceeding
concerning the custody of or visitation with the child and, if so, identify the
court, the case number, and the date of the child custody determination, if
any;

(b) Knows of any
proceeding that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings for
enforcement and proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective orders,
termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so, identify the court,
the case number, and the nature of the proceeding; and

(c) Knows the names and
addresses of any person not a party to the proceeding who has physical custody
of the child or claims rights of legal custody or physical custody of, or
visitation with, the child and, if so, the names and addresses of those persons.

(2) If the information
required by subsection (1) of this section is not furnished, the court, upon
motion of a party or its own motion, may stay the proceeding until the
information is furnished.

(3) If the declaration
as to any of the items described in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this
section is in the affirmative, the declarant shall give additional information
under oath as required by the court. The court may examine the parties under
oath as to details of the information furnished and other matters pertinent to
the court's jurisdiction and the disposition of the case.

(4) Each party has a
continuing duty to inform the court of any proceeding in this or any other
state that could affect the current proceeding.

(5) If a party alleges
in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of
a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of identifying information,
the information must be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or
the public unless the court orders the disclosure to be made after a hearing in
which the court takes into consideration the health, safety, or liberty of the
party or child and determines that the disclosure is in the interest of
justice.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. APPEARANCE OF PARTIES AND
CHILD. (1) In a child custody proceeding in this state, the court may order a
party to the proceeding who is in this state to appear before the court in
person with or without the child. The court may order any person who is in
this state and who has physical custody or control of the child to appear in
person with the child.

(2) If a party to a
child custody proceeding whose presence is desired by the court is outside this
state, the court may order that a notice given pursuant to section 108 of this
act include a statement directing the party to appear in person with or without
the child and informing the party that failure to appear may result in a
decision adverse to the party.

(3) The court may enter
any orders necessary to ensure the safety of the child and of any person
ordered to appear under this section.

(4) If a party to a
child custody proceeding who is outside this state is directed to appear under
subsection (2) of this section or desires to appear personally before the court
with or without the child, the court may require another party to pay
reasonable and necessary travel and other expenses of the party so appearing
and of the child.

ARTICLE
3

ENFORCEMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this article, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Petitioner" means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for
return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of
International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

(2)
"Respondent" means a person against whom a proceeding has been
commenced for enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague
Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement
of a child custody determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. ENFORCEMENT UNDER HAGUE
CONVENTION. Under this article a court of this state may enforce an order for
the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of
International Child Abduction as if it were a child custody determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. DUTY TO ENFORCE. (1) A court
of this state shall recognize and enforce a child custody determination of a
court of another state if the latter court exercised jurisdiction in
substantial conformity with this chapter or the determination was made under
factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of this chapter and
the determination has not been modified in accordance with this chapter.

(2) A court of this
state may use any remedy available under other law of this state including
writs of habeas corpus under chapter 7.36 RCW and enforcement proceedings under
Title 26 RCW to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of
another state. The remedies provided in this article are cumulative and do not
affect the availability of other remedies to enforce a child custody
determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. TEMPORARY VISITATION.
(1) A court of this state that does not have jurisdiction to modify a child
custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing:

(a) A visitation
schedule made by a court of another state; or

(b) The visitation
provisions of a child custody determination of another state that does not
provide for a specific visitation schedule.

(2) If a court of this
state makes an order under subsection (1)(b) of this section, it shall specify
in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the petitioner to
obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under the criteria specified
in Article 2. The order remains in effect until an order is obtained from the
other court or the period expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. REGISTRATION OF CHILD
CUSTODY DETERMINATION. (1) A child custody determination issued by a court of
another state may be registered in this state, with or without a simultaneous
request for enforcement, by sending to the appropriate court in this state:

(a) A letter or other
document requesting registration;

(b) Two copies,
including one certified copy, of the determination sought to be registered, and
a statement under penalty of perjury that to the best of the knowledge and
belief of the person seeking registration, the determination has not been
modified; and

(c) Except as otherwise
provided in section 209 of this act, the name and address of the person seeking
registration and any parent or person acting as a parent who has been awarded
custody or visitation in the child custody determination sought to be
registered.

(2) On receipt of the
documents required by subsection (1) of this section, the registering court
shall:

(a) Cause the
determination to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of any
accompanying documents and information, regardless of their form; and

(b) Serve notice upon
the persons named pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section and provide
them with an opportunity to contest the registration in accordance with this
section.

(3) The notice required
by subsection (2)(b) of this section must state that:

(a) A registered
determination is enforceable as of the date of the registration in the same
manner as a determination issued by a court of this state;

(b) A hearing to
contest the validity of the registered determination must be requested within twenty
days after service of notice; and

(c) Failure to contest
the registration will result in confirmation of the child custody determination
and preclude further contest of that determination with respect to any matter
that could have been asserted.

(4) A person seeking to
contest the validity of a registered determination must request a hearing
within twenty days after service of the notice. At that hearing, the court
shall confirm the registered determination unless the person contesting
registration establishes that:

(a) The issuing court
did not have jurisdiction under Article 2;

(b) The child custody
determination sought to be registered has been vacated, stayed, or modified by
a court having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2; or

(c) The person
contesting registration was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in
accordance with the standards of section 108 of this act, in the proceedings
before the court that issued the determination for which registration is
sought.

(5) If a timely request
for a hearing to contest the validity of the registration is not made, the
registration is confirmed as a matter of law and the person requesting
registration and all persons served must be notified of the confirmation.

(6) Confirmation of a
registered determination, whether by operation of law or after notice and
hearing, precludes further contest of the determination with respect to any
matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. ENFORCEMENT OF REGISTERED
DETERMINATION. (1) A court of this state may grant any relief normally
available under the law of this state to enforce a registered child custody
determination made by a court of another state.

(2) A court of this
state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, except in accordance
with Article 2, a registered child custody determination of a court of another
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. SIMULTANEOUS
PROCEEDINGS. If a proceeding for enforcement under this article is commenced
in a court of this state and the court determines that a proceeding to modify
the determination is pending in a court of another state having jurisdiction to
modify the determination under Article 2, the enforcing court shall immediately
communicate with the modifying court. The proceeding for enforcement continues
unless the enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays
or dismisses the proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. EXPEDITED ENFORCEMENT OF
CHILD CUSTODY DETERMINATION. (1) A petition under this article must be
verified. Certified copies of all orders sought to be enforced and of any
order confirming registration must be attached to the petition. A copy of a
certified copy of an order may be attached instead of the original.

(2) A petition for
enforcement of a child custody determination must state:

(a) Whether the court
that issued the determination identified the jurisdictional basis it relied
upon in exercising jurisdiction and, if so, what the basis was;

(b) Whether the
determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or
modified by a court whose decision must be enforced under this chapter and, if
so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

(c) Whether any
proceeding has been commenced that could affect the current proceeding,
including proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective orders,
termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so, identify the court,
the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

(d) The present
physical address of the child and the respondent, if known;

(e) Whether relief in
addition to the immediate physical custody of the child and attorneys' fees is
sought, including a request for assistance from law enforcement officials and,
if so, the relief sought; and

(f) If the child
custody determination has been registered and confirmed under section 305 of
this act, the date and place of registration.

(3) Upon the filing of
a petition, the court shall issue an order directing the respondent to appear
in person with or without the child at a hearing and may enter any order
necessary to ensure the safety of the parties and the child. The hearing must
be held on the next judicial day after service of the order unless that date is
impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first
judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of hearing at the request
of the petitioner.

(4) An order issued
under subsection (3) of this section must state the time and place of the
hearing and advise the respondent that at the hearing the court will order that
the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child and the payment
of fees, costs, and expenses under section 312 of this act, and may schedule a
hearing to determine whether further relief is appropriate, unless the
respondent appears and establishes that:

(a) The child custody
determination has not been registered and confirmed under section 305 of this
act and that:

(i) The issuing court
did not have jurisdiction under Article 2;

(ii) The child custody
determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or
modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2;

(iii) The respondent
was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the
standards of section 108 of this act, in the proceedings before the court that
issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

(b) The child custody
determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed
under section 304 of this act, but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a
court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. SERVICE OF PETITION AND
ORDER. Except as otherwise provided in section 311 of this act, the petition
and order must be served, by any method authorized by the law of this state,
upon the respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. HEARING AND ORDER. (1)
Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order pursuant to section 204 of
this act, upon a finding that a petitioner is entitled to immediate physical
custody of the child, the court shall order that the petitioner may take
immediate physical custody of the child unless the respondent establishes that:

(a) The child custody
determination has not been registered and confirmed under section 305 of this
act and that:

(i) The issuing court
did not have jurisdiction under Article 2;

(ii) The child custody
determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or
modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2; or

(iii) The respondent
was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the
standards of section 108 of this act, in the proceedings before the court that
issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

(b) The child custody
determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed
under section 305 of this act but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a
court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2.

(2) The court shall
award the fees, costs, and expenses authorized under section 312 of this act
and may grant additional relief, including a request for the assistance of law
enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine whether
additional relief is appropriate.

(3) If a party called
to testify refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be
self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

(4) A privilege against
disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense of immunity based on
the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child may not be invoked in
a proceeding under this article.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
311. AUTHORIZATION TO TAKE
PHYSICAL CUSTODY OF CHILD. An order under this chapter directing law
enforcement to obtain physical custody of the child from the other parent or a
third party holding the child may only be sought pursuant to a writ of habeas
corpus under chapter 7.36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
312. COSTS, FEES, AND
EXPENSES. (1) The court shall award the prevailing party, including a state,
necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party,
including costs, communication expenses, attorneys' fees, investigative fees,
expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the course of
the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees or expenses are sought
establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

(2) The court may not
assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other
than this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
313. RECOGNITION AND
ENFORCEMENT. A court of this state shall accord full faith and credit to an
order issued by another state and consistent with this chapter that enforces a
child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has
been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under
Article 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
314. APPEALS. An appeal may
be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this article in accordance
with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases relating to minor
children. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under section
204 of this act, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child
custody determination pending appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
315. ROLE OF PROSECUTOR OR
ATTORNEY GENERAL. (1) In a case arising under this chapter or involving the
Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, the
prosecutor or attorney general may take any lawful action, including resorting
to a proceeding under this article or any other available civil proceeding to
locate a child, obtain the return of a child, or enforce a child custody
determination if there is:

(a) An existing child
custody determination;

(b) A request to do so
from a court in a pending child custody proceeding;

(c) A reasonable belief
that a criminal statute has been violated; or

(d) A reasonable belief
that the child has been wrongfully removed or retained in violation of the
Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

(2) A prosecutor or
attorney general acting under this section acts on behalf of the court and may
not represent any party.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
316. ROLE OF LAW ENFORCEMENT.
At the request of a prosecutor or attorney general acting under section 315 of
this act, a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably
necessary to locate a child or a party and assist a prosecutor or attorney general
with responsibilities under section 315 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
317. COSTS AND EXPENSES. If
the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against the
respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the prosecutor or attorney
general and law enforcement officers under section 315 or 316 of this act.

ARTICLE
4

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. APPLICATION AND
CONSTRUCTION. In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be
given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject
matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 26.27.010 (Purposes of
chapter--Construction of provisions) and 1979 c 98 s 1;

(2) RCW 26.27.020 (Definitions) and 1979 c
98 s 2;

(3) RCW 26.27.030 (Jurisdiction) and 1979 c
98 s 3;

(4) RCW 26.27.040 (Notice and opportunity to
be heard) and 1979 c 98 s 4;

(5) RCW 26.27.050 (Notice to persons outside
this state--Submission to jurisdiction) and 1979 c 98 s 5;

(6) RCW 26.27.060 (Simultaneous proceedings
in other states) and 1979 c 98 s 6;

(7) RCW 26.27.070 (Inconvenient forum) and
1979 c 98 s 7;

(8) RCW 26.27.080 (Jurisdiction declined by
reason of conduct) and 1979 c 98 s 8;

(9) RCW 26.27.090 (Information under oath to
be submitted to court) and 1979 c 98 s 9;

(10) RCW 26.27.100 (Additional parties) and
1979 c 98 s 10;

(11) RCW 26.27.110 (Appearance of parties and
child) and 1979 c 98 s 11;

(12) RCW 26.27.120 (Binding force and res
judicata effect of custody decree) and 1979 c 98 s 12;

(13) RCW 26.27.130 (Recognition of
out-of-state custody decrees) and 1979 c 98 s 13;

(14) RCW 26.27.140 (Modification of custody
decree of another state) and 1979 c 98 s 14;

(15) RCW 26.27.150 (Filing and enforcement of
custody decree of another state) and 1979 c 98 s 15;

(16) RCW 26.27.160 (Registry of out-of-state
custody decrees and proceedings) and 1984 c 128 s 7 & 1979 c 98 s 16;

(17) RCW 26.27.170 (Certified copies of
custody decree) and 1979 c 98 s 17;

(18) RCW 26.27.180 (Taking testimony in
another state) and 1979 c 98 s 18;

(19) RCW 26.27.190 (Hearings and studies in
another state--Orders to appear) and 1979 c 98 s 19;

(20) RCW 26.27.200 (Assistance to courts of
other states) and 1979 c 98 s 20;

(21) RCW 26.27.210 (Preservation of records
of custody proceedings‑-Forwarding to another state) and 1979 c 98 s 21;

(22) RCW 26.27.220 (Request for court records
of another state) and 1979 c 98 s 22;

(23) RCW 26.27.230 (International
application) and 1979 c 98 s 23;

(24) RCW 26.27.900 (Construction with chapter
26.09 RCW) and 1979 c 98 s 24;

(25) RCW 26.27.910 (Short title) and 1979 c
98 s 25;

(26) RCW 26.27.920 (Severability--1979 c 98)
and 1979 c 98 s 26; and

(27) RCW 26.27.930 (Section captions) and
1979 c 98 s 27.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. TRANSITIONAL PROVISION.
A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to
enforce a child custody determination that was commenced before the effective
date of this section is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or
other request was made.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
405. CAPTIONS, ARTICLE
DESIGNATIONS, AND ARTICLE HEADINGS NOT LAW. Captions, article designations,
and article headings used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 406. Sections 101 through 112,
201 through 210, 301 through 317, 401, 404, and 405 of this act are each added
to chapter 26.27 RCW.

---
END ---