BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The state military
department is hereby authorized to sell, lease, or exchange the state armory
land and buildings in the city of Seattle at the address 1601 W. Armory Way,
Seattle, Washington 98119-2786, commonly known as the Pier 91 property, legally
described as follows:

All those lands lying
and being situate in Seattle, King County, Washington and being that portion of
Seattle tide lands and streets and alleys of the City of Seattle, King County,
State of Washington, lying south of Lawton Way viaduct more particularly
described as follows:

Beginning at a city
monument located at the intersection of the centerlines of 15th Avenue West and
West Garfield Street, thence S. 89E 51' 38" W. along the centerline of said
Garfield Street, 381.69 feet, thence N. 0E 08' 22" W. 50.00 feet to the north line of
Garfield Street, the true point of beginning of parcel, thence N. 0E 08' 22" W. along the westerly edge of the
existing rope walk structure a distance of 65.00 feet, thence N. 89E 51' 38" E. along said structure a distance
of 9.62 feet to a point which is 21 feet west of the cast line of lot 8, Block
131, Seattle Tide Lands, thence N. 0E 08' 22" W. parallel to and 21 feet westerly
from the east line of lots 8 to 1, inclusive, of block 131, extended across
West Howe Street, now vacated, and 21 feet westerly from the east line of lots
9 to 3, inclusive, of block 128, Seattle Tide Lands to a point which is 21 feet
westerly from the east line of said lot 3 and 30 feet southerly from the north
line of said Lot 3, thence S. 89E 51' 38" W. parallel to the north line of
said Lot 3 a distance of 34.68 feet, thence N. 0E 08' 22" W. parallel to and 55.68 feet
westerly from the east line of lots 2 and 3 of said block 128 a distance of
130.00 feet to the southeast corner of lot 1 of said block 128, thence N. 33E 43' 50" W. a distance of 142.38 feet to a
point 20 feet southwesterly from (when measured at right angles to) the
centerline of the most southwesterly line of tracks of the Northern Pacific
Railway Company along Lawton Way, thence N. 39E 52' 00" W. parallel to and 20 feet
southwesterly from said track centerline, a distance of 754.03 feet to an
intersection with a line which is the northerly extension of a line parallel to
and 20 feet easterly from (when measured at right angles to) the centerline of
the most easterly line of tracks of said Railroad Company as said tracks are
tangent through lots 6 and 7 of block 126 and lots 1 to 9 inclusive of block
129 of said addition, thence S. 0E 06' 52" E. along the above described line
parallel to and 20 feet easterly from said railroad centerline a distance of
1479.39 feet, thence parallel to and 20 feet easterly from said railroad
centerline of a 1030.84 foot radius curve to the left (the long chord of which
curve bears S. 16E
23' 52" E. 578.07 feet) an arc distance of 585.92 feet, thence S. 32E 40' 52" E. parallel to and 20 feet easterly
from said railroad centerline and the southerly extension thereof tangent
through lots 5 and 6 of block 130 of said addition a distance of 423.46 feet to
the north line of Garfield Street, thence N. 89E 51' 38" E. along the north line of Garfield
Street, a distance of 196.79 feet to the true point of beginning; containing 24.7485
acres, more or less.

(2) Before any sale,
lease, or exchange is made under the provisions of this section the property
must be independently appraised by a certified commercial real estate
appraiser. Any such sale, lease, or exchange shall be made to the highest
competent bidder for a price not less than the independently appraised value of
the property and pursuant to a call for bids published in at least one issue of
a legal newspaper of general circulation in King county at least thirty days prior
to the date fixed for the bid closing.

(3) The sale, lease, or
exchange shall be under the direction of the adjutant general in accordance
with procedures provided by law. The adjutant general shall proceed with the
sale, lease, or exchange only if, in the opinion of the adjutant general, the
proceeds from the sale, lease, or exchange of the land and buildings described
in this section, together with federal funds available to the state military
department, are sufficient to purchase or otherwise acquire other real property
for the state military department and for the acquisition, purchase,
construction, furnishing, and equipping of buildings and other improvements on
said real property and the appurtenances thereto.

(4) The proceeds of the
sale, lease, or exchange of the property legally described in this section
shall be transmitted by the adjutant general to the state treasurer to be set
aside and used exclusively by the military department for the purposes set
forth in this section.

(5) Upon
the sale, lease, or exchange of the property described in this section, the
state military department may select a site or sites for a new armory or
readiness center and purchase or otherwise acquire real property for the state
of Washington for the purposes set forth in this section and to acquire,
purchase, construct, furnish, and equip buildings and other improvements on
such real property and the appurtenances thereto.

---
END ---