BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to give the department of community, trade, and economic development the
authority to issue civil penalties to enforce the provisions of permits issued
under RCW 27.53.060 and to take into consideration prior penalties issued under
chapter 27.53 RCW and under comparable federal laws when issuing permits.
Additionally, this act provides guidance to state agencies and political subdivisions
of the state when approving archaeological activities on public lands.

Sec. 2. RCW 27.53.020 and 1986 c
266 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The discovery,
identification, excavation, and study of the state's archaeological resources,
the providing of information on archaeological sites for their nomination to
the state and national registers of historic places, the maintaining of a
complete inventory of archaeological sites and collections, and the providing of
information to state, federal, and private construction agencies regarding the
possible impact of construction activities on the state's archaeological
resources, are proper public functions; and the ((Washington archaeological
research center)) office of archaeology and historic preservation,
created under the authority of chapter 39.34 RCW ((as now existing or
hereafter amended)), is hereby designated as an appropriate agency to carry
out these functions. The director, in consultation with the ((Washington
archaeological research center)) office of archaeology and historic
preservation, shall provide guidelines for the selection of depositories
designated by the state for archaeological resources. The legislature directs
that there shall be full cooperation amongst the department, the ((Washington
archaeological research center)) office of archaeology and historic
preservation, and other agencies of the state.

Sec. 3. RCW 27.53.060 and 1989 c
44 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On the private and
public lands of this state it shall be unlawful for any person, firm,
corporation, or any agency or institution of the state or a political
subdivision thereof to knowingly remove, alter, dig into, or excavate by use of
any mechanical, hydraulic, or other means, or to damage, deface, or destroy any
historic or prehistoric archaeological resource or site, or remove any
archaeological object from such site, except for Indian graves or cairns, or
any glyptic or painted record of any tribe or peoples, or historic graves as
defined in chapter 68.05 RCW, disturbances of which shall be a class C felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW, without having obtained a written permit
from the director for such activities.

(2) The director must
obtain the consent of the private or public property owner or agency
responsible for the management thereof, prior to issuance of the permit. The
property owner or agency responsible for the management of such land may
condition its consent on the execution of a separate agreement, lease, or other
real property conveyance with the applicant as may be necessary to carry out
the legal rights or duties of the public property landowner or agency.

(3) The
director, in consultation with the affected tribes, shall develop guidelines
for the issuance and processing of permits.

(4) Such written
permit and any agreement or lease or other conveyance required by any public
property owner or agency responsible for management of such land shall be
physically present while any such activity is being conducted.

(5) The
provisions of this section shall not apply to the removal of artifacts found
exposed on the surface of the ground which are not historic archaeological
resources or sites.

(6) When determining
whether to grant or condition a permit, the director may give great weight to
the final record of previous civil or criminal penalties against either the
applicant, the parties responsible for conducting the work, or the parties
responsible for carrying out the terms and conditions of the permit, either
under this chapter or under comparable federal laws. If the director denies a
permit, the applicant may request a hearing as provided for in chapter 34.05
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 27.53 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons found to
have violated this chapter, either by a knowing and willful failure to obtain a
permit where required under RCW 27.53.060 or by a knowing and willful failure
to comply with the provisions of a permit issued by the director where required
under RCW 27.53.060, in addition to other remedies as provided for by law, may
be subject to one or more of the following:

(a) Reasonable
investigative costs incurred by a mutually agreed upon independent professional
archaeologist investigating the alleged violation;

(b) Reasonable site
restoration costs; and

(c) Civil penalties, as
determined by the director, in an amount of not more than five thousand dollars
per violation.

(2) Any person
incurring the penalty may file an application for an adjudicative proceeding
and may pursue subsequent review as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW and
applicable rules of the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3) Any penalty imposed
by final order following an adjudicative proceeding becomes due and payable
upon service of the final order.

(4) The attorney
general may bring an action in the name of the department in the superior court
of Thurston county or of any county in which the violator may do business to
collect any penalty imposed under this chapter and to enforce subsection (5) of
this section.

(5) Any and all
artifacts in possession of a violator shall become the property of the state
until proper identification of artifact ownership may be determined by the
director.

(6) Penalties
overturned on appeal entitle the appealing party to fees and other expenses,
including reasonable attorneys' fees, as provided in RCW 4.84.350.

Sec. 5. RCW 27.53.080 and 1986 c
266 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Qualified or
professional archaeologists, in performance of their duties, ((are hereby
authorized to)) may enter upon public lands of the state of
Washington and its political subdivisions after first notifying the entity
responsible for managing those public lands, at such times and in such
manner as not to interfere with the normal management thereof, for the purposes
of doing archaeological resource location and evaluation studies, including
site sampling activities. The results of such studies shall be provided to
the state agency or political subdivision responsible for such lands and the
office of archaeology and historic preservation and are confidential unless the
director, in writing, declares otherwise. Scientific excavations are to be
carried out only after appropriate agreement has been made between a
professional archaeologist or an institution of higher education and the agency
or political subdivision responsible for such lands. ((Notice)) A
copy of such agreement shall be filed with the ((Washington
archaeological research center)) office of archaeology and historic
preservation and by them to the department.

(2)
Amateur societies may engage in such activities by submitting and having
approved by the responsible agency or political subdivision a written proposal
detailing the scope and duration of the activity. Before approval, a proposal
from an amateur society shall be submitted to the ((Washington
archaeological research center)) office of archaeology and historic
preservation for review and recommendation. The approving agency or
political subdivision shall impose conditions on the scope and duration of the
proposed activity necessary to protect the archaeological resources and ensure
compliance with applicable federal, state, and local laws. The findings and
results of activities authorized under this section shall be made known to the
approving agency or political subdivision approving the activities and to the
office of archaeology and historic preservation.

---
END ---