BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.21.010 and 1998 c
124 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3) "Fund"
means the mobile home park relocation fund established under RCW 59.21.050.

(4) "Mobile home
park" or "park" means real property that is rented or held out
for rent to others for the placement of two or more mobile homes for the
primary purpose of production of income, except where the real property is
rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only and is not
intended for year-round occupancy.

(5)
"Landlord" or "park-owner" means the owner of the mobile
home park that is being closed at the time relocation assistance is provided.

(6) "Relocate"
means to remove the mobile home from the mobile home park being closed and
to either reinstall it in another location or to demolish it and purchase
another mobile/manufactured home constructed to the standards set by the
department of housing and urban development.

(7) "Relocation
assistance" means the monetary assistance provided under this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 59.21.021 and 1998 c
124 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a mobile home
park is closed or converted to another use after December 31, 1995, eligible
tenants shall be entitled to assistance on a first-come, first-serve basis.
Payments shall be made upon the department's verification of eligibility,
subject to the availability of remaining funds.

(2) Assistance for
closures occurring after December 31, 1995, is limited to persons who maintain
ownership of and relocate their mobile home or who dispose of a home not
relocatable to a new site.

(3) Persons who removed
and disposed of their mobile home or maintained ownership of and relocated
their mobile homes are entitled to reimbursement of actual relocation
expenses up to seven thousand dollars for a double-wide home and up to
three thousand five hundred dollars for a single-wide home.

(4) Any individual
or organization may apply to receive funds from the mobile home park
relocation fund, for use in combination with funds from public or private
sources, toward relocation of tenants eligible under this section. Funds
received from the mobile home park relocation fund shall only be used for
relocation assistance expenses or other mobile/manufactured home ownership
expenses, that include down payment assistance, if the owners are not planning
to relocate their mobile home as long as their original home is removed from
the park.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 59.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A fee is imposed
upon the purchaser that is equal to one percent of the lesser of the sale price
or the first fifty thousand dollars of the sale price on every transfer of
title issued under chapter 46.12 RCW on a mobile home five years old or more where
(a) the ownership of the mobile home changes; and (b) the mobile home is
located in a mobile home park. A transfer of title does not include the
addition or deletion of a spouse co-owner or secured interest.

(2) Mobile homes with a
sale price of less than one thousand dollars are not subject to the fee imposed
in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department of
licensing or its agents shall collect the fee when processing an application
for transfer of title. The fee collected under this section shall be forwarded
to the state treasurer for deposit into the mobile home park relocation fund
created in this chapter. The department of licensing may deduct a percentage
amount, not to exceed two percent of the fees collected, for the collection expenses
incurred by the department of licensing.

(4) The department of
licensing and the state treasurer may adopt rules necessary to carry out this
section.

Sec. 4. RCW 59.21.050 and 1998 c
124 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The existence of
the mobile home park relocation fund in the custody of the state treasurer is
affirmed. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for relocation
assistance awarded under this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the fund. All relocation payments to tenants
shall be made from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

(2) A park tenant is eligible
for assistance under this chapter only after an application is submitted by
that tenant or an organization acting on the tenant's account under RCW
59.21.021(4) on a form approved by the director which shall include:

(a) For those persons
who maintained ownership of and relocated their homes or removed their homes
from the park: (i) A copy of the notice from the park-owner, or other
adequate proof, that the tenancy is terminated due to closure of the park or
its conversion to another use; (ii) a copy of the rental agreement then in
force, or other proof that the applicant was a tenant at the time of notice of
closure; (iii) a copy of the contract for relocating the home which includes
the date of relocation, or other proof of actual relocation expenses incurred
on a date certain; and (iv) a statement of any other available assistance;

(b) For those persons
who sold their homes and incurred no relocation expenses: (i) A copy of the
notice from the park-owner, or other adequate proof, that the tenancy is
terminated due to closure of the park or its conversion to another use; (ii) a
copy of the rental agreement then in force, or other proof that the applicant
was a tenant at the time of notice of closure; and (iii) a copy of the record
of title transfer issued by the department of licensing when the tenant sold
the home rather than relocate it due to park closure or conversion.

(3) The department
may deduct a percentage amount of the fee collected under section 3 of this
act, not to exceed five percent of the fees received, for administration
expenses incurred by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---