BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.140.155 and 1993
c 30 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A real estate
appraiser from another state who is licensed or certified by another state may
apply for registration to receive temporary licensing or certification in
Washington by paying a fee and filing a notarized application with the
department on a form provided by the department.

(2) The director is
authorized to adopt by rule the term or duration of the licensing and
certification privileges granted under the provisions of this section ((shall
expire ninety days from issuance)). Licensing or certification shall not
be renewed((, nor shall an applicant receive more than two registrations
within any twelve-month period)). However, an applicant may receive an
extension of a temporary practice permit to complete an assignment, provided
that a written request is received by the department prior to the expiration
date, stating the reason for the extension.

(3) A temporary
practice permit issued under this section allows an appraiser to perform
independent appraisal services required by a contract for appraisal services.

(4) Persons
granted temporary licensing or certification privileges under this section
shall not advertise or otherwise hold themselves out as being licensed or
certified by the state of Washington.

(((4)))
(5) Persons granted temporary licensure or certification are subject to
all provisions under this chapter.

--- END ---