BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.43.080 and 1985 c
7 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

The
renewal fee, renewal interval, and date of renewal for certificates of
registration, professional licenses, and certificates of authorization
((and renewals thereof shall expire on the last day of the month of December
following their issuance or renewal and shall become invalid on that date
unless renewed. It shall be the duty of the administrator of the division of
professional licensing to notify every person, firm or corporation registered
under this chapter, of the date of the expiration of his certificate and the
amount of the renewal fee that shall be required for its renewal for one year.
Such notice shall be mailed at least thirty days before the end of December of
each year. Renewal may be effected during the month of December by the payment
of a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086. In case any
professional engineer and/or land surveyor registered under this chapter shall
fail to pay the renewal fee hereinabove provided for, within ninety days from
the date when the same shall become due, the renewal fee shall be)) issued
under the provisions of this chapter shall be determined by the director of the
department of licensing in accordance with chapter 43.24 RCW. Notices of
pending renewals may be sent by the director of the department of licensing to
the certificate holder or licensee as a courtesy reminder specifying the date
of expiration and amount of the renewal fee. Certificates and licenses that
are not renewed by the date of expiration become invalid on that date. It is
the responsibility of the certificate holder or licensee to ensure timely
renewal of their credential. In a case where a certificate or license is
expired for a period of ninety days, the reinstatement of the certificate or
license shall be conditioned upon payment of the current renewal fee
plus a penalty fee in an amount equal to one year's renewal fee.

--- END ---