BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.04.170 and 1 H.C.
s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

King
county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Beginning at
the point of intersection of the center of East Passage (also known as
Admiralty Inlet) on Puget Sound and the northerly line of the Puyallup Indian
Reservation (projected northwesterly); thence southeasterly in a straight line
along said northerly line of Puyallup Indian Reservation and same extended to a
point on the east line of section thirty-one, township twenty-one, north, range
four east, Willamette Meridian; thence south along said east line of section
thirty-one, township twenty-one, range four east, Willamette Meridian, to the
township line between township twenty north and township twenty-one north
(being the fifth standard parallel north); thence east along said township line
between township twenty north and township twenty-one north to the middle of
the main channel of White river, near the northeast corner of section three,
township twenty north, range five east, Willamette Meridian; thence upstream
along the middle of the main channel of White river to the forks of White river
and Greenwater river; thence upstream along the middle of the main channel of
the Greenwater river to the forks of the Greenwater river and Meadow creek;
thence upstream along the middle of the main channel of Meadow creek to the
summit of the Cascade mountains, at a point known as Naches Pass, said point
lying in the southwest quarter of section thirty-five, township nineteen north,
range eleven east, Willamette Meridian; thence northerly along the summit of
the Cascade mountains to a point on the township line between township
twenty-six north and township twenty-seven north, said point lying near the
north quarter-corner of section three, township twenty-six north, range
thirteen east, Willamette Meridian; thence west along said township line
between township twenty-six north and twenty-seven north to the middle of the
channel known as Admiralty Inlet on Puget Sound; thence southerly along said
middle of channel known as Admiralty Inlet through Colvo's Passage (West
Passage) on the west side of Vashon Island to a point due north of Point
Defiance; thence southeasterly along middle of channel between Vashon Island
and Point Defiance (Dalcos Passage) to a point due south of Quartermaster
Harbor; thence northeasterly along middle of channel known as Admiralty Inlet
to point of beginning. King county is named in honor of the Reverend Doctor
Martin Luther King, Jr.

--- END ---