BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.130.060 and 1995
c 336 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
authority specified in RCW 18.130.050, the secretary has the following
additional authority:

(1) To employ such
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the
enforcement of this chapter;

(2) Upon the request of
a board, to appoint ((not more than three pro tem members for the purpose of
participating as members of one or more committees of the board in connection
with)) pro tem members to participate as members of a panel of the board
in connection with proceedings specifically identified in the request.
Individuals so appointed must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular
members of the board. Pro tem members appointed for matters under this
chapter are appointed for a term of no more than one year. No pro tem member
may serve more than four one-year terms. While serving as board members
pro tem, persons so appointed have all the powers, duties, and immunities, and
are entitled to the emoluments, including travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular members of the board. The chairperson
of a ((committee)) panel shall be a regular member of the board
appointed by the board chairperson. ((Committees)) Panels have
authority to act as directed by the board with respect to all matters
concerning the review, investigation, and adjudication of all complaints,
allegations, charges, and matters subject to the jurisdiction of the board.
The authority to act through ((committees)) panels does not
restrict the authority of the board to act as a single body at any phase of
proceedings within the board's jurisdiction. Board ((committees)) panels
may make interim orders and issue final decisions with respect to matters and
cases delegated to the ((committee)) panel by the board. Final
decisions may be appealed as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act;

(3) To establish fees
to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses, and consultants used in any
investigation and to establish fees to witnesses in any agency adjudicative
proceeding as authorized by RCW 34.05.446;

(4) To conduct
investigations and practice reviews at the direction of the disciplining
authority and to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and take depositions in the
course of conducting those investigations and practice reviews at the direction
of the disciplining authority;

(5) To
have the health professions regulatory program establish a system to recruit
potential public members, to review the qualifications of such potential
members, and to provide orientation to those public members appointed pursuant
to law by the governor or the secretary to the boards and commissions specified
in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b), and to the advisory committees and councils for
professions specified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(a).

--- END ---