BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that developing, creating, and maintaining partnerships between the public and
private sectors can enhance and augment current public health services. The
legislature further finds that the department of health should have the ability
to establish such partnerships, and seek out and accept gifts, grants, and
other funding to advance worthy public health goals and programs.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that gifts and other funds received by the department of health
under the authority granted by RCW 43.70.040 may be used to expand or enhance
program operations so long as program standards established by the department
are maintained, but may not supplant or replace funds for federal, state,
county, or city-supported programs.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.70.040 and 1995 c
403 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other powers granted the secretary, the secretary may:

(1) Adopt, in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to carry out the provisions
of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.: PROVIDED, That for rules adopted
after July 23, 1995, the secretary may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the
statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for
statutory authority to adopt any rule;

(2) Appoint such
advisory committees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter
9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess. Members of such advisory committees are
authorized to receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The secretary and the board of health shall review each advisory
committee within their jurisdiction and each statutory advisory committee on a
biennial basis to determine if such advisory committee is needed((. The
criteria specified in RCW 43.131.070 shall be used to determine whether or not
each advisory committee shall be continued));

(3) Undertake studies,
research, and analysis necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 9, Laws
of 1989 1st ex. sess. in accordance with RCW 43.70.050;

(4) Delegate powers,
duties, and functions of the department to employees of the department as the
secretary deems necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 9, Laws of
1989 1st ex. sess.;

(5) Enter into
contracts on behalf of the department to carry out the purposes of chapter 9,
Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.;

(6) Act for the state
in the initiation of, or the participation in, any intergovernmental program to
the purposes of chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex. sess.; or

(7) Solicit and accept
gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public and
private sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The public health
supplemental account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only
receipts from gifts, bequests, devises, or funds whose use is determined to
further the purposes of the account may be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for maintaining and improving
the health of Washington residents through the public health system. Only the
secretary of health or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) The state
investment board shall invest the funds in the public health supplemental
account and, except for costs under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160, the account
shall retain all earnings from these investments.

(3) The department
shall file an annual statement of the financial condition, transactions, and
affairs of any program funded under this section in a form and manner
prescribed by the office of financial management. A copy of the annual
statement shall be filed with the speaker of the house of representatives and
the president of the senate.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2000
c 79 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the agricultural
local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the basic health
plan self-insurance reserve account, the Washington international exchange
scholarship endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment trust
fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account,
the public health supplemental account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
((grant)) account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, and the children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account,
the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In
conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

---
END ---