BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.20

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 Any contract entered into between the department and a
private

_8 vendor in which the vendor provides services involving
drivers'

_9 licenses or identicards must contain the following
language:

10 "Drivers' licenses and identicards must not contain:
(1) Driver

11 social security numbers in either visible or machine readable

12 form; or (2) driver fingerprints or thumbprints."

13 Sec. 2. RCW 26.23.140
and 1998 c 160 s 6 are each amended to read

14 as follows:

15 The federal personal responsibility and work
opportunity

16 reconciliation act of 1996, P.L. 104-193, requires states
to

17 collect social security numbers as part of the application
process

p. 1 ESSB
5364

_1 for professional licenses, driver's licenses,
occupational

_2 licenses, and recreational licenses. The legislature
finds that if

_3 social security numbers are accessible to the public, it
will be

_4 relatively easy for someone to use another's social
security

_5 number fraudulently to assume that person's identity and
gain

_6 access to bank accounts, credit services, billing
information,

_7 driving history, and other sources of personal
information.

_8 ((Public Law 104-193 could compound and exacerbate
the disturbing

_9 trend of social security number-related fraud. In
order to prevent

10 fraud and curtail invasions of privacy, the governor,
through the

11 department of social and health services, shall seek
a waiver to

12 the federal mandate to record social security numbers
on

13 applications for professional, driver's, occupational,
and

14 recreational licenses. If a waiver is not granted,
the licensing

15 agencies shall collect and disclose social security
numbers as

16 required under RCW 26.23.150.))

17 Sec. 3. RCW 26.23.150
and 1999 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read

18 as follows:

19 In order to assist in child support enforcement as
required by

20 federal law, all applicants for an original, replacement,
or

21 renewal of a professional license, ((commercial))
driver's

22 license, occupational license, or recreational license must

23 furnish the licensing agency with the applicant's social
security

24 number, which shall be recorded on the application. ((No
applicant

25 for an original, replacement, or renewal noncommercial
driver's

26 license is required to furnish the licensing agency with
the

27 applicant's social security number for purposes of
assisting in

28 child support enforcement prior to the time necessary to
comply

29 with the federal deadline.)) The licensing agencies
collecting

30 social security numbers shall not display the social
security

31 number on the license document. Social security numbers
collected

32 by licensing agencies shall not be disclosed except as
required by

33 state or federal law or under RCW 26.23.120. Provided,
that the

34 governor, through the department of social and health
services,

35 shall seek a waiver to the federal mandate to record
social

36 security numbers on applications for professional,
driver's,

ESSB 5364 p. 2

_1 occupational, and recreational licenses, and, if such
a waiver is

_2 obtained, then this section shall be null and void.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 ESSB
5364