BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.08

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 The taxes levied by RCW 82.08.020 do not apply to
materials and

_8 labor used in the construction or maintenance of
publicly owned

_9 roads, streets, or highways.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5365