BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that funding for common school construction, remodeling, and maintenance is
scarce. The legislature also finds that taxpayers have strongly expressed
their desire for frugal public spending. Yet laws requiring the payment of
prevailing wages on public works and maintenance contracts force taxpayers to
pay more than they otherwise would for school construction, remodeling, and
maintenance. Thus, the legislature intends to exempt public works and maintenance
contracts of school districts from prevailing wage requirements, and permit
wage competition among firms seeking such contracts.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.12.020 and 1989 c
12 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The hourly wages to be
paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public works and under all
public building service maintenance contracts of the state or any county,
municipality or political subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less
than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or
occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is performed. For
a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay the
prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily visible to workers at
the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline,
transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field
office is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of
wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete, or
asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the wage
statement to any employee on request:

(1) A copy of a
statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW 39.12.040; and

(2) The address and
telephone number of the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be
made.

This
chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly employed on
monthly or per diem salary by the state, or any county, municipality, or
political subdivision created by its laws. This chapter shall not apply to
public works and public building service maintenance contracts of a school
district, as defined in chapter 28A.315 RCW, or an educational service
district, as defined in chapter 28A.310 RCW.

---
END ---