BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.270.010 and 1989
c 271 s 315 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that state-wide efforts aimed at reducing the incidence of substance
abuse, including alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence must
be increased. The legislature further recognizes that the most effective
strategy for reducing the impact of alcohol ((and)), tobacco,
other drug abuse, and violence is through the collaborative efforts of
educators, law enforcement, local government officials, local treatment
providers, and concerned community and citizens' groups.

The legislature intends
to support the development and activities of community mobilization strategies
against ((substance)) alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse,
and violence, through the following efforts:

(1) ((Provide)) Providing
funding support for prevention, treatment, and enforcement activities
identified by communities that have brought together education, treatment,
local government, law enforcement, and other key elements of the community;

(2) ((Provide)) Providing
technical assistance and support to help communities develop and carry out
effective activities; and

(3) ((Provide)) Providing
communities with opportunities to share suggestions for state program
operations and budget priorities.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.270.020 and 1989
c 271 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established in the ((office of the governor)) department of
community, trade, and economic development a grant program to provide
incentive for and support for communities to develop targeted and coordinated
strategies to reduce the incidence and impact of ((substance)) alcohol,
tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence.

(2) The department
of community, trade, and economic development shall make awards, subject to
funds appropriated by the legislature, under the following terms:

(a) Starting July 1,
2001, funds will be available to county-wide programs through a formula
developed by the department of community, trade, and economic development in
consultation with program contractors, which will take into consideration
county population size.

(b) In order to be
eligible for consideration, applicants must demonstrate, at a minimum:

(i) That the
community has developed and is committed to carrying out a coordinated strategy
of prevention, treatment, and law enforcement activities;

(ii) That the
community has considered research-based theory when developing its strategy;

(iii) That proposals
submitted for funding are based on a local assessment of need and address
specific objectives contained in a coordinated strategy of prevention,
treatment, and law enforcement against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse,
or violence;

(iv) Evidence of
active participation in preparation of the proposal and specific commitments to
implementing the community-wide agenda by leadership from education, law
enforcement, local government, tribal government, and treatment entities in the
community, and the opportunity for meaningful involvement from others such as
neighborhood and citizen groups, businesses, human service, health and job
training organizations, and other key elements of the community, particularly
those whose responsibilities in law enforcement, treatment, prevention,
education, or other community efforts provide direct, ongoing contact with substance
abusers or those who exhibit violent behavior, or those at risk for alcohol,
tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violent behavior;

(v) Evidence of
additional local resources committed to the applicant's strategy totaling at
least twenty-five percent of funds awarded under this section. These resources
may consist of public or private funds, donated goods or services, and other
measurable commitments, including in-kind contributions such as volunteer
services, materials, supplies, physical facilities, or a combination thereof;
and

(vi) That the funds
applied for, if received, will not be used to replace funding for existing
activities.

(c) At a minimum,
grant applications must include the following:

(i) A definition of
geographic area;

(ii) A needs assessment
describing the extent and impact of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, and
violence in the community, including an explanation of those who are most
severely impacted and those most at risk of substance abuse or violent
behavior;

(iii) An explanation
of the community-wide strategy for prevention, treatment, and law enforcement
activities related to alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence, with
particular attention to those who are most severely impacted and/or those most
at risk of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violent behavior;

(iv) An explanation
of who was involved in development of the strategy and what specific
commitments have been made to carry it out;

(v) Identification
of existing prevention, education, treatment, and law enforcement resources
committed by the applicant, including financial and other support, and an
explanation of how the applicant's strategy involves and builds on the efforts
of existing organizations or coalitions that have been carrying out community
efforts against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence;

(vi) Identification
of activities that address specific objectives in the strategy for which
additional resources are needed;

(vii) Identification
of additional local resources, including public or private funds, donated goods
or services, and other measurable commitments, that have been committed to the
activities identified in (c)(vi) of this subsection;

(viii)
Identification of activities that address specific objectives in the strategy
for which funding is requested;

(ix) For each
activity for which funding is requested, an explanation in sufficient detail to
demonstrate:

(A) Feasibility
through deliberative design, specific objectives, and a realistic plan for
implementation;

(B) A rationale for
how this activity will achieve measurable results and how it will be evaluated;

(C) That funds
requested are necessary and appropriate to effectively carry out the activity;
and

(x) Identification
of a contracting agent meeting state requirements for each activity proposed
for funding.

Each contracting
agent must execute a written agreement with its local community mobilization
advisory board that reflects the duties and powers of each party.

(3) Activities
((which)) that may be funded through this grant program include
those ((which)) that:

(((1))) (a)
Prevent ((substance)) alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse,
or violence through educational ((and self-esteem)) efforts,
development of positive alternatives, intervention with high-risk groups, and
other prevention strategies;

(((2))) (b)
Support effective treatment by increasing access to and availability of
treatment opportunities, particularly for underserved or highly impacted populations,
developing aftercare and support mechanisms, and other strategies to increase
the availability and effectiveness of treatment;

(((3))) (c)
Provide meaningful consequences for participation in illegal activity and
promote safe and healthy communities through support of law enforcement
strategies;

(((4))) (d)
Create or build on efforts by existing community programs, coordinate their
efforts, and develop cooperative efforts or other initiatives to make most
effective use of resources to carry out the community's strategy against ((substance))
alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence; and

(((5))) (e)
Other activities ((which)) that demonstrate both feasibility and
a rationale for how the activity will achieve measurable results in the strategy
against ((substance)) alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse,
or violence.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.270.070 and 1989
c 271 s 321 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((governor))
department of community, trade, and economic development shall ask
communities for suggestions on state practices, policies, and priorities that
would help communities implement their strategies against ((substance)) alcohol,
tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence. The ((governor or
appropriate agency officials)) department of community, trade, and
economic development shall review and respond to those suggestions making
necessary changes where feasible, making recommendations to the legislature
where appropriate, and providing an explanation as to why suggested changes
cannot be accomplished, if the suggestions cannot be acted upon.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.270.080 and 1989
c 271 s 322 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((governor))
department of community, trade, and economic development may receive
such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of RCW 43.270.010 through 43.270.080 and expend the same or any income
therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.270.030 (Content of application)
and 1989 c 271 s 317;

(2) RCW 43.270.050 (Application requirements)
and 1989 c 271 s 319; and

(3) RCW 43.270.060 (Criteria for making
awards) and 1989 c 271 s 320.

---
END ---