BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The department of
community, trade, and economic development was created in 1993 by dissolving
the prior department of community development and the prior department of trade
and economic development and transferring their responsibilities and authorities
to that newly created department.

The purpose of this act
is to effectively organize state efforts to address the community and economic
development needs of the citizens of the state of Washington by restructuring
the department of community, trade, and economic development into two separate
agencies, the department of community development and the department of trade
and economic development. The department of trade and economic development
will consist of the existing divisions of economic development, energy policy,
and international trade. The department of community development will consist
of the existing divisions of housing, community services, and local government.

It is the intent of the
legislature that the restructuring will allow each agency to: (1) Identify and
develop a focused mission; (2) organize and deliver services in a manner that
is responsive to current and future needs; and (3) effectively target resources
to meet the identified mission and needs of the citizens of the state of
Washington in the most efficient and effective manner.

PART
I

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT

Sec. 101. RCW 43.330.020 and 1993
c 280 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((A)) The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development is
created. Except as provided in chapter . . ., Laws of 2002 (this
act), the department shall be vested with all powers and duties ((established
or transferred to it under this chapter)) formerly exercised by the
prior department of community development, before its merger with the prior
department of trade and economic development into the department of community,
trade, and economic development by chapter 280, Laws of 1993, and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. ((Unless otherwise
specifically provided in chapter 280, Laws of 1993, the existing
responsibilities and functions of the agency programs will continue to be
administered in accordance with their implementing legislation.))

Sec. 102. RCW 43.63A.021 and 1997
c 367 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Department"
means the department of community development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community development.

(3)
"Dislocated forest products worker" means a forest products worker
who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of termination from
employment and is unlikely to return to employment in the individual's
principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing demand for
his or her skills in that occupation or industry; or (ii) is self-employed and
has been displaced from his or her business because of the diminishing demand
for the business's services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation
from employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources impact
area.

(((2))) (4)
"Forest products worker" means a worker in the forest products industries
affected by the reduction of forest fiber enhancement, transportation, or
production. The workers included within this definition shall be determined by
the employment security department, but shall include workers employed in the
industries assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes
"24" and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting
and management of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of
wood products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further interpreting these
definitions. For the purposes of this subsection, "standard industrial
classification code" means the code identified in RCW 50.29.025(6)(((c)))
(b).

(((3))) (5)
"Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish products worker
who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of termination from
employment and is unlikely to return to employment in the individual's
principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing demand for
his or her skills in that occupation or industry; or (ii) is self-employed and
has been displaced from his or her business because of the diminishing demand
for the business's services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation
from employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources impact
area.

(((4))) (6)
"Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish industry
affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included within this
definition shall be determined by the employment security department, but shall
include workers employed in the industries involved in the commercial and
recreational harvesting of finfish including buying and processing finfish.
The commissioner may adopt rules further interpreting these definitions.

Sec. 103. RCW 43.330.040 and 1993
c 280 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
supervise and administer the activities of the department and shall advise the
governor and the legislature with respect to community ((and economic))
development matters affecting the state.

(2) In addition to
other powers and duties granted to the director, the director shall have the
following powers and duties:

(a) Enter into
contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Act for the state
in the initiation of or participation in any multigovernmental program relative
to the purpose of this chapter;

(c) Accept and expend
gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(d) To appoint
((such)) a deputy director((s,)) and assistant
directors, and ((up to seven special assistants)) other positions
as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from
the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e) Prepare and submit
budgets for the department for executive and legislative action;

(f) Submit
recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to further the
purposes of this chapter;

(g) Adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary and
proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(h) Delegate powers,
duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient
administration, but the director shall be responsible for the official acts of
the officers and employees of the department; and

(i) Perform other
duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) When federal or
other funds are received by the department, they shall be promptly transferred
to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon the approval of the
director.

(4) The director may
request information and assistance from all other agencies, departments, and
officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies, departments, or
officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses upon any such
agency, department, or official.

(5) The director shall,
in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult with governmental
officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials of other states.
All state agencies and their officials and the officials of any political
subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such assistance to the
department, including the submission of requested information, to allow the
department to carry out its purposes under this chapter.

(6) The director may
establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the legislature,
within state government, with state and other governmental units, with the
private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7) The internal
affairs of the department shall be under the control of the director in order
that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent
manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically
limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers
over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the
director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in accordance with
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 104. RCW 43.330.050 and 1993
c 280 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall be
responsible for promoting community ((and economic)) development within
the state by assisting the state's communities to increase the quality of life
of their citizens and their economic vitality, ((and by assisting the
state's businesses to maintain and increase their economic competitiveness,))
while maintaining a healthy environment. Community ((and economic))
development efforts ((shall)) include((: Efforts to increase
economic opportunity;)), but are not limited to: Assisting local
planning to manage growth((;)), service and advocacy for crime
victims, the promotion and provision of affordable housing and
housing-related services((;)), providing public infrastructure((;
business and trade development; assisting firms and industrial sectors to
increase their competitiveness; fostering the development of minority and
women-owned businesses; facilitating technology development, transfer, and
diffusion;)), providing support and assistance for early childhood
education, providing community services and advocacy for low-income
persons((;)), and public safety efforts. The department shall
have the following general functions and responsibilities:

(1) Provide advisory
assistance to the governor, other state agencies, and the legislature on
community ((and economic)) development matters and issues;

(2) Assist the governor
in coordinating the activities of state agencies that have an impact on local
government and communities;

(3) Cooperate with the
legislature and the governor in the development and implementation of strategic
plans for the state's community ((and economic)) development efforts;

(4) Solicit private and
federal grants for ((economic and)) community development programs and
administer such programs in conjunction with other programs assigned to the
department by the governor or the legislature;

(5) Cooperate with and
provide technical and financial assistance to local governments((,
businesses,)) and community-based organizations serving the communities of
the state for the purpose of aiding and encouraging orderly, productive, and
coordinated community development of the state, and, unless stipulated
otherwise, give additional consideration to local communities and ((individuals))
community‑based organizations with the greatest relative need and
the fewest resources;

(6) Participate with
other states or subdivisions thereof in interstate programs and assist cities, towns,
counties, municipal corporations, governmental conferences or councils, and
regional planning commissions to participate with other states and provinces or
their subdivisions;

(7) Hold public
hearings and meetings to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(8) Conduct research
and analysis in furtherance of the state's ((economic and)) community
development efforts including maintenance of current information on ((market,
demographic, and economic trends as they affect different industrial sectors,))
geographic regions((,)) and communities with special economic and social
problems in the state; and

(9) Develop a schedule
of fees for services where appropriate.

Sec. 105. RCW 43.330.070 and 1993
c 280 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall work closely with local communities to increase their capacity to respond
to economic, environmental, and social problems and challenges. The department
shall coordinate the delivery of ((development services and)) related
technical assistance to local communities or regional areas((. It shall
promote partnerships between the public and private sectors and between state
and local officials to encourage appropriate economic growth and opportunity in
communities throughout the state. The department)) and shall
promote appropriate ((local)) community development by: ((Supporting
the ability of communities to develop and implement strategic development
plans; assisting businesses to start up, maintain, or expand their operations;))
Encouraging public infrastructure investment and private and public
capital investment in local communities((;)), supporting efforts
to manage growth and provide affordable housing and housing services((;)),
and providing for the identification and preservation of the state's
historical and cultural resources((; and expanding employment opportunities)).

(2) The department
shall define a set of services including related training and technical
assistance that it will make available to local communities, community-based
nonprofit organizations, and regional areas((, or businesses)).
The department shall simplify access to these programs by providing more
centralized and user-friendly information and referral. The department shall
coordinate community ((and economic)) development efforts to minimize
program redundancy and maximize accessibility. The department shall develop a
set of criteria for targeting services to local communities.

(3) The department
shall develop a coordinated and systematic approach to providing related
training to community-based nonprofit organizations, local communities, and ((businesses))
regional areas. The approach shall be designed to increase the ((economic
and)) community development skills available in local communities by
providing training and funding for training for local citizens((,)) and
nonprofit organizations((, and businesses)). The department shall
emphasize providing training in those communities most in need of state
assistance.

Sec. 106. RCW 43.330.125 and 1995
c 347 s 430 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall provide training and
technical assistance to counties and cities to assist them in fulfilling the
requirements of chapter 36.70B RCW.

Sec. 107. RCW 43.330.135 and 1995
c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall distribute such funds as
are appropriated for the statewide technical support, development, and
enhancement of court-appointed special advocate programs.

(2) In order to receive
money under subsection (1) of this section, an organization providing statewide
technical support, development, and enhancement of court-appointed special
advocate programs must meet all of the following requirements:

(a) The organization
must provide statewide support, development, and enhancement of court-appointed
special advocate programs that offer guardian ad litem services as provided in
RCW 26.12.175, 26.44.053, and 13.34.100;

(b) All guardians ad
litem working under court-appointed special advocate programs supported,
developed, or enhanced by the organization must be volunteers and may not
receive payment for services rendered pursuant to the program. The
organization may include paid positions that are exclusively administrative in
nature, in keeping with the scope and purpose of this section; and

(c) The organization
providing statewide technical support, development, and enhancement of
court-appointed special advocate programs must be a public benefit nonprofit
corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490.

(3) If more than one
organization is eligible to receive money under this section, the department
shall develop criteria for allocation of appropriated money among the eligible
organizations.

Sec. 108. RCW 43.63A.066 and 1993
c 280 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall have primary
responsibility for providing child abuse and neglect prevention training to
preschool age children participating in the federal head start program or the
early childhood education and assistance program established under RCW
28A.215.010 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908.

Sec. 109. RCW 43.63A.115 and 1993
c 280 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The community
action agency network, established initially under the federal economic
opportunity act of 1964 and subsequently under the federal community services
block grant program of 1981, as amended, shall be a delivery system for federal
and state anti-poverty programs in this state, including but not limited to the
community services block grant program, the low-income energy assistance
program, and the federal department of energy weatherization program.

(2) Local community
action agencies comprise the community action agency network. The community
action agency network shall serve low-income persons in the counties. Each
community action agency and its service area shall be designated in the state
federal community service block grant plan as prepared by the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)).

(3) Funds for
anti-poverty programs may be distributed to the community action agencies by
the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) and
other state agencies in consultation with the authorized representatives of
community action agency networks.

Sec. 110. RCW 43.63A.155 and 1993
c 280 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall retain the bond
information it receives under RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230 and shall publish
summaries of local government bond issues at least once a year.

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to implement RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230.

Sec. 111. RCW 43.63A.275 and 1993
c 280 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each biennium the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
distribute such funds as are appropriated for retired senior volunteer programs
(RSVP) as follows:

(a) At least sixty-five
percent of the moneys may be distributed according to formulae and criteria to
be determined by the department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) in consultation with the RSVP directors association.

(b) Up to twenty
percent of the moneys may be distributed by competitive grant process to
develop RSVP projects in counties not presently being served, or to expand
existing RSVP services into counties not presently served.

(c) Ten percent of the
moneys may be used by the department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) for administration, monitoring of the grants, and providing
technical assistance to the RSVP projects.

(d) Up to five percent
of the moneys may be used to support projects that will benefit RSVPs
statewide.

(2) Grants under
subsection (1) of this section shall give priority to programs in the areas of
education, tutoring, English as a second language, combating of and education
on drug abuse, housing and homeless, and respite care, and shall be distributed
in accordance with the following:

(a) None of the grant
moneys may be used to displace any paid employee in the area being served.

(b) Grants shall be
made for programs that focus on:

(i) Developing new
roles for senior volunteers in nonprofit and public organizations with special
emphasis on areas targeted in section 1, chapter 65, Laws of 1992. The roles
shall reflect the diversity of the local senior population and shall respect
their life experiences;

(ii) Increasing the
expertise of volunteer managers and RSVP managers in the areas of
communication, recruitment, motivation, and retention of today's over-sixty
population;

(iii) Increasing the
number of senior citizens recruited, referred, and placed with nonprofit and
public organizations; and

(iv) Providing
volunteer support such as: Mileage to and from the volunteer assignment,
recognition, and volunteer insurance.

Sec. 112. RCW 43.63A.400 and 1993
c 280 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) shall distribute grants to eligible
public radio and television broadcast stations under RCW 43.63A.410 and
43.63A.420 (as recodified by this act) to assist with programming,
operations, and capital needs.

Sec. 113. RCW 43.63A.410 and 1993
c 280 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Eligibility for
grants under this section shall be limited to broadcast stations which are:

(a) Licensed to
Washington state organizations, nonprofit corporations, or other entities under
section 73.621 of the regulations of the federal communications commission; and

(b) Qualified to
receive community service grants from the federally chartered corporation for
public broadcasting. Eligibility shall be established as of February 28th of
each year.

(2) The formula in this
subsection shall be used to compute the amount of each eligible station's grant
under this section.

(a) Appropriations
under this section shall be divided into a radio fund, which shall be
twenty-five percent of the total appropriation under this section, and a
television fund, which shall be seventy-five percent of the total appropriation
under this section. Each of the two funds shall be divided into a base grant
pool, which shall be fifty percent of the fund, and an incentive grant pool,
which shall be the remaining fifty percent of the fund.

(b) Each eligible
participating public radio station shall receive an equal share of the radio
base grant pool, plus a share of the radio incentive grant pool equal to the
proportion its nonfederal financial support bears to the sum of all
participating radio stations' nonfederal financial support as most recently
reported to the corporation for public broadcasting.

(c) Each eligible
participating public television station shall receive an equal share of the
television base grant pool, plus a share of the television incentive grant pool
equal to the proportion its nonfederal financial support bears to the sum of
all participating television stations' nonfederal financial support as most
recently reported to the corporation for public broadcasting.

(3) Annual financial
reports to the corporation for public broadcasting by eligible stations shall
also be submitted by the stations to the department ((of community, trade,
and economic development)).

Sec. 114. RCW 43.63A.440 and 1997
c 367 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall provide technical and
financial assistance to communities adversely impacted by reductions in timber
harvested from federal, state, and private lands and reduction of salmon
fishing caused by efforts to maintain the long-term viability of salmon
stocks. The department shall use existing technical and financial assistance
resources to aid communities in planning, implementing, and assembling financing
for high priority community economic development projects.

Sec. 115. RCW 43.63A.460 and 1993
c 280 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

((Beginning on July
1, 1991,)) The department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) shall be responsible for performing all the consumer
complaint and related functions of the state administrative agency that are
required for purposes of complying with the regulations established by the
federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing,
including the preparation and submission of the state administrative plan.

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) may enter into state or local
interagency agreements to coordinate site inspection activities with record
monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency agreement may also provide
for the reimbursement for cost of work that an agency performs. The department
may include other related areas in any interagency agreements which are
necessary for the efficient provision of services.

((The department of
labor and industries shall transfer all records, files, books, and documents
necessary for the department of community, trade, and economic development to
assume these new functions.

The directors of
community, trade, and economic development and the department of labor and
industries shall immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that
this act is implemented on June 7, 1990.))

Sec. 116. RCW 43.63A.600 and 1995
c 226 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)), as a member of the agency
rural community assistance task force shall establish and administer the emergency
mortgage and rental assistance program. The department shall identify the
communities most adversely affected by reductions in timber and salmon harvest
levels and shall prioritize assistance under this program to these
communities. The department shall work with the department of social and
health services and the rural community assistance ((recovery))
coordinator to develop the program in rural natural resources impact areas.
Organizations eligible to receive grant funds for distribution under the
program are those organizations that are eligible to receive assistance through
the Washington housing trust fund. The department shall disburse the funds to
eligible local organizations as grants. The local organizations shall use the
funds to make grants or loans as specified in RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640
(as recodified by this act). If funds are disbursed as loans, the local
organization shall establish a revolving grant and loan fund with funds
received as loan repayments and shall continue to make grants or loans or both
grants and loans from funds received as loan repayments to dislocated forest
products and dislocated salmon fishing workers eligible under the provisions of
RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640 (as recodified by this act) and to
other persons residing in rural natural resources impact areas who meet the
requirements of RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640 (as recodified by this
act).

(2) The goals of the
program are to:

(a) Provide temporary
emergency mortgage loans or rental assistance grants or loans on behalf of
dislocated forest products and dislocated salmon fishing workers in rural
natural resources impact areas who are unable to make mortgage, property tax,
or rental payments on their permanent residences and are subject to immediate
eviction for nonpayment of mortgage installments, property taxes, or nonpayment
of rent;

(b) Prevent the
dislocation of individuals and families from their permanent residences and
their communities; and

(c) Maintain economic
and social stability in rural natural resources impact areas.

Sec. 117. RCW 43.330.152 and 1994
c 284 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to extend its
services and programs, the department may charge reasonable fees for services
and products provided in the areas of financial assistance, housing, ((international
trade,)) community assistance, ((economic development,)) and other
service delivery areas, except as otherwise provided. These fees are not
intended to exceed the costs of providing the service or preparing and
distributing the product.

Sec. 118. RCW 43.330.155 and 1994
c 284 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The community ((and
economic)) development fee account is created in the state treasury. The
department may create subaccounts as necessary. The account consists of all
receipts from fees charged by the department under RCW 43.330.150((,)) and
43.330.152((, and 43.210.110)) (as recodified by this act).
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this
chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. Expenditures from the account may be spent only
after appropriation.

Sec. 119. RCW 43.330.156 and 1994
c 284 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The fees authorized
under RCW 43.330.150((,)) and 43.330.152((, 70.95H.040, and
43.210.110)) (as recodified by this act) shall be adopted by rule
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 120. RCW 43.330.904 and 1996
c 186 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the state energy office relating to ((energy resource
policy and planning and)) energy facility siting are transferred to the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)). All
references to the director or the state energy office in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.

((The director shall
appoint an assistant director for energy policy, and energy policy staff shall
have no additional responsibilities beyond activities concerning energy policy.))

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)). All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, software, data base, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the state energy office in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)).

(b) Any appropriations
made to the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred ((shall, on July 1, 1996, be)) are transferred
and credited to the department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)).

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3) ((All employees
of the state energy office engaged in performing the powers, functions, and
duties pertaining to the energy facility site evaluation council are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of community, trade, and
economic development. All employees engaged in energy facility site evaluation
council duties classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law,
are assigned to the department of community, trade, and economic development to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4))) All rules and all pending business before the
state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the department ((of community, trade,
and economic development)). All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)).

(((5))) (4)
The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office
does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, ((1996))
2000.

(((6))) (5)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of the office of financial management
shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor,
and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and
adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(((7) The department
of community, trade, and economic development shall direct the closure of the
financial records of the state energy office.

(8) Responsibility
for implementing energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs rests with Washington State University. The department of community,
trade, and economic development shall provide Washington State University
available existing and future oil overcharge restitution and federal energy
block funding for a minimum period of five years to carry out energy programs
under an interagency agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development. The interagency agreement shall also outline the working
relationship between the department of community, trade, and economic development
and Washington State University as it pertains to the relationship between
energy policy development and public outreach. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of
1996 prohibits Washington State University from seeking grant, contract, or
fee-for-service funding for energy or related programs directly from other
entities.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
121. A new section is added
to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the department of community, trade, and economic development
pertaining to community development are transferred to the department of
community development. All references to the director or the department of community,
trade, and economic development in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the director or the department of community development when
referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the department of community, trade, and economic development
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered
to the custody of the department of community development. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property
employed by the department of community, trade, and economic development in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available
to the department of community development. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be assigned to the department of community development.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the department of community, trade, and economic development for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the
effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department
of community development.

(c) Whenever any question
arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the
exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of
the department of community, trade, and economic development engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of community development. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned
to the department of community development to perform their usual duties upon
the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action
that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules
governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all
pending business before the department of community, trade, and economic
development pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be continued and acted upon by the department of community development. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the department of community development.

(5) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall not affect the validity of any act performed
before the effective date of this section.

(6) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments
to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of
these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

(7) Nothing contained
in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining
unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until
the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by
action of the personnel board as provided by law.

Sec. 122. RCW 41.06.072 and 1995 c
399 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
exemptions set forth in this chapter, this chapter shall not apply within the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development to the
director, one confidential secretary, the deputy directors, all assistant
directors, and the state historic preservation officer((, and up to
two professional staff members within the emergency management program)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
123. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.330.005 (Intent) and 1993 c 280 s
1;

(2) RCW 43.330.007 (Management
responsibility) and 1993 c 280 s 2;

(3) RCW 43.330.010 (Definitions) and 1993 c
280 s 3; and

(4) RCW 43.330.900 (References to director
and department) and 1993 c 280 s 79.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
124. The following sections
are each recodified as new sections in chapter 43.330 RCW:

RCW 43.63A.021

RCW 43.63A.066

RCW 43.63A.067

RCW 43.63A.075

RCW 43.63A.105

RCW 43.63A.115

RCW 43.63A.125

RCW 43.63A.150

RCW 43.63A.155

RCW 43.63A.190

RCW 43.63A.215

RCW 43.63A.240

RCW 43.63A.245

RCW 43.63A.247

RCW 43.63A.249

RCW 43.63A.265

RCW 43.63A.270

RCW 43.63A.275

RCW 43.63A.400

RCW 43.63A.410

RCW 43.63A.420

RCW 43.63A.440

RCW 43.63A.460

RCW 43.63A.465

RCW 43.63A.4651

RCW 43.63A.470

RCW 43.63A.475

RCW 43.63A.480

RCW 43.63A.485

RCW 43.63A.490

RCW 43.63A.500

RCW 43.63A.510

RCW 43.63A.550

RCW 43.63A.600

RCW 43.63A.610

RCW 43.63A.620

RCW 43.63A.630

RCW 43.63A.640

RCW 43.63A.650

RCW 43.63A.660

RCW 43.63A.670

RCW 43.63A.680

RCW 43.63A.720

RCW 43.63A.725

RCW 43.63A.730

RCW 43.63A.735

RCW 43.63A.740

RCW 43.63A.900

RCW 43.63A.901

RCW 43.63A.902

RCW 43.63A.903

NEW SECTION. Sec.
125. The following sections
are recodified in chapter 43.330 RCW near the end of the chapter:

RCW 43.330.150

RCW 43.330.152

RCW 43.330.155

RCW 43.330.156

NEW SECTION. Sec.
126. The code reviser may
recodify the following sections in chapter 43.330 RCW:

RCW 43.330.190

RCW 43.330.200

RCW 43.330.210

RCW 43.330.220

RCW 43.330.230

NEW SECTION. Sec.
127. The code reviser shall
insert notes following all sections containing references to the department of
community, trade, and economic development indicating that this agency is now
referred to as the department of community development.

PART
II

DEPARTMENT OF TRADE AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. The department of trade
and economic development is created. Except as provided in this act, the
department shall be vested with all powers and duties formerly exercised by the
prior department of trade and economic development, before its merger with the
prior department of community development into the department of community,
trade, and economic development by chapter 280, Laws of 1993, and such other
powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Associate
development organization" means a local economic development nonprofit
corporation that is broadly representative of community interests.

(2)
"Department" means the department of trade and economic development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of trade and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. (1) The director shall
supervise and administer the activities of the department and shall advise the
governor and the legislature with respect to economic development matters
affecting the state.

(2) In addition to
other powers and duties granted to the director, the director shall have the
following powers and duties:

(a) To enter into
contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) To act for the
state in the initiation of or participation in any multigovernmental program
relative to the purpose of this chapter;

(c) To accept and
expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(d) To appoint a deputy
director, assistant directors, and other positions as may be needed to
administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of
chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e) To prepare and
submit budgets for the department for executive and legislative action;

(f) To submit
recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to further the
purposes of this chapter;

(g) To adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary and
proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(h) To delegate powers,
duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient
administration, but the director shall be responsible for the official acts of
the officers and employees of the department; and

(i) To perform other
duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) When federal or
other funds are received by the department, they shall be promptly transferred
to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon the approval of the
director.

(4) The director may
request information and assistance from all other agencies, departments, and
officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies, departments, or
officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses upon any such
agency, department, or official.

(5) The director shall,
in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult with governmental
officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials of other states.
All state agencies and their officials and the officials of any political
subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such assistance to the
department, including the submission of requested information, to allow the
department to carry out its purposes under this chapter.

(6) The director may
establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the legislature,
within state government, with state and other governmental units, with the
private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7) The internal
affairs of the department shall be under the control of the director in order
that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent
manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically
limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers
over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the
director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in accordance with
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

(8) The director may
enter into an interagency agreement with the department of community
development to appoint an employee of that agency as the director's designee to
the forest practices board under RCW 76.09.030(1)(b) if it is in the best
interests of the department to do so. Any interagency agreement entered into
under this subsection shall expire upon the final adoption of permanent rules
under RCW 76.09.370. The department may not enter into an interagency
agreement under this subsection after the final adoption of such permanent
rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. The department shall be
responsible for promoting economic development within the state by assisting
the state's communities to increase the quality of life and their economic
vitality, while maintaining a quality environment. Economic development
efforts include, but are not limited to, efforts to increase economic
opportunities, business and trade development, work force development, assisting
firms and industrial sectors to increase their competitiveness, fostering the
development of minority and women-owned businesses, and facilitating the
development, transfer, and diffusion of technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. (1) The department shall
work closely with local communities to increase their capacity to respond to
economic problems and challenges. The department shall coordinate the delivery
of development services and related technical assistance to local communities
or regional areas. It shall promote partnerships between the public and
private sectors and between state and local officials to encourage and manage
appropriate economic growth and opportunity in communities throughout the state
and shall promote appropriate local economic development by supporting the
ability of communities to develop and implement strategic development plans,
assisting businesses to start up, maintain, or expand their operations, and
expanding employment opportunities.

(2) The department
shall define a set of services including related training and technical
assistance that it will make available to local communities, community-based
nonprofit organizations, regional areas, or businesses. The department shall
simplify access to these programs by providing more centralized and
user-friendly information and referral. The department shall coordinate
economic development efforts to minimize program redundancy and maximize
accessibility. The department shall develop a set of criteria for targeting
services to local communities.

(3) The department
shall develop a coordinated and systematic approach to providing related
training to community-based nonprofit organizations, local communities, and
businesses. The approach shall be designed to increase the economic
development skills available in local communities by providing training and
funding for training for local citizens, nonprofit organizations, and
businesses. The department shall emphasize providing training in those communities
most in need of state assistance.

Sec. 206. RCW 43.330.065 and 1996
c 253 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)), in consultation with the
office of protocol, the office of the secretary of state, the department of
agriculture, and the employment security department shall identify up to
fifteen countries that are of strategic importance to the development of
Washington's international trade relations.

Sec. 207. RCW 43.330.080 and 1997
c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall contract with associate development organizations or other local
organizations to increase the support for and coordination of ((community
and)) economic development services in communities or regional areas. The
organizations contracted with in each community or regional area shall be
broadly representative of community and economic interests. The organization
shall be capable of identifying key economic ((and community))
development problems, developing appropriate solutions, and mobilizing broad
support for recommended initiatives. The contracting organization shall work
with and include local governments, local chambers of commerce, private
industry councils, port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher
education, community action programs, and other appropriate private, public, or
nonprofit ((community and)) economic development groups. The department
shall be responsible for determining the scope of services delivered under
these contracts.

(2) Associate
development organizations or other local development organizations contracted
with shall promote and coordinate, through local service agreements with local
governments, small business development centers, port districts, community and
technical colleges, private industry councils, and other development
organizations, for the efficient delivery of ((community and)) economic
development services in their areas.

(3) The department
shall consult with associate development organizations, port districts, local
governments, and other local development organizations in the establishment of
service delivery regions throughout the state. The legislature encourages local
associate development organizations to form partnerships with other associate
development organizations in their region to combine resources for better
access to available services, to encourage regional delivery of state services,
and to build the local capacity of communities in the region more effectively.

(4) The department
shall contract on a regional basis for surveys of key sectors of the regional
economy and the coordination of technical assistance to businesses and
employees within the key sectors. The department's selection of contracting
organizations or consortiums shall be based on the sufficiency of the
organization's or consortium's proposal to examine key sectors of the local
economy within its region adequately and its ability to coordinate the delivery
of services required by businesses within the targeted sectors. Organizations
contracting with the department shall work closely with the department to
examine the local economy and to develop strategies to focus on developing key
sectors that show potential for long-term sustainable growth. The contracting
organization shall survey businesses and employees in targeted sectors on a
periodic basis to gather information on the sector's business needs, expansion
plans, relocation decisions, training needs, potential layoffs, financing
needs, availability of financing, and other appropriate information about
economic trends and specific employer and employee needs in the region.

(5) The contracting
organization shall participate with the work force training and education
coordinating board as created in chapter 28C.18 RCW, and any regional entities
designated by that board, in providing for the coordination of job skills
training within its region.

Sec. 208. RCW 43.31.057 and 1993 c
280 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) is directed to develop and
promote means to stimulate the expansion of the market for Washington products
and shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To develop a
pamphlet for statewide circulation which will encourage the purchase of items
produced in the state of Washington;

(2) To include in the
pamphlet a listing of products of Washington companies which individuals can
examine when making purchases so they may have the opportunity to select one of
those products in support of this program;

(3) To distribute the
pamphlets on the broadest possible basis through local offices of state
agencies, business organizations, chambers of commerce, or any other means the
department deems appropriate;

(4) In carrying out
these powers and duties the department shall cooperate and coordinate with
other agencies of government and the private sector.

Sec. 209. RCW 43.31.093 and 1995 c
399 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall contract with public and
private agencies, institutions, and organizations to conduct entrepreneurial
training courses for minority and women-owned small businesses. The
instruction shall be intensive, practical training courses in financing,
marketing, managing, accounting, and recordkeeping for a small business, with
an emphasis on federal, state, local, or private programs available to assist
small businesses. The ((business assistance center)) department
may recommend professional instructors, with practical knowledge and experience
on how to start and operate a business, to teach the courses. Instruction
shall be offered in major population centers throughout the state at times and
locations which are convenient for minority and women small business owners and
entrepreneurs.

Sec. 210. RCW 43.31.205 and 1993 c
280 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

In an effort to enhance
the economy of the Tri-Cities area, the department ((of community, trade,
and economic development)) is directed to promote the existence of the
lease between the state of Washington and the federal government executed
September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of land lying within the
Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington, and the opportunity of
subleasing the land to entities for nuclear-related industry, in agreement with
the terms of the lease. When promoting the existence of the lease, the
department shall work in cooperation with any associate development
organization located in or near the Tri-Cities area.

Sec. 211. RCW 43.31.422 and 1998 c
76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The Hanford area
economic investment fund is established in the custody of the state treasurer.
Moneys in the fund shall only be used for reasonable assistant attorney general
costs in support of the committee or pursuant to the recommendations of the
committee created in RCW 43.31.425 and the approval of the director ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) for Hanford area revolving
loan funds, Hanford area infrastructure projects, or other Hanford area
economic development and diversification projects, but may not be used for
government or nonprofit organization operating expenses. Up to five percent of
moneys in the fund may be used for program administration. For the purpose of
this chapter "Hanford area" means Benton and Franklin counties.
Disbursements from the fund shall be on the authorization of the director ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) or the director's designee
after an affirmative vote of at least six members of the committee created in
RCW 43.31.425 on any recommendations by the committee created in RCW
43.31.425. The fund is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements. The legislature
intends to establish similar economic investment funds for areas that develop
low-level radioactive waste disposal facilities.

Sec. 212. RCW 43.31.504 and 1993 c
280 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

The child care facility
fund committee is established within the ((business assistance center of the))
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)). The
committee shall administer the child care facility fund, with review by the
director ((of community, trade, and economic development)).

(1) The committee shall
have five members. The director ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) shall appoint the members, who shall include:

(a) Two persons
experienced in investment finance and having skills in providing capital to new
businesses, in starting and operating businesses, and providing professional
services to small or expanding businesses;

(b) One person
representing a philanthropic organization with experience in evaluating funding
requests;

(c) One child care
services expert; and

(d) One early childhood
development expert.

In making these
appointments, the director shall give careful consideration to ensure that the various
geographic regions of the state are represented and that members will be
available for meetings and are committed to working cooperatively to address
child care needs in Washington state.

(2) The committee shall
elect officers from among its membership and shall adopt policies and
procedures specifying the lengths of terms, methods for filling vacancies, and
other matters necessary to the ongoing functioning of the committee.

(3) Committee members
shall serve without compensation, but may request reimbursement for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) Committee members
shall not be liable to the state, to the child care facility fund, or to any
other person as a result of their activities, whether ministerial or discretionary,
as members except for willful dishonesty or intentional violation of the law.
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) may
purchase liability insurance for members and may indemnify these persons
against the claims of others.

Sec. 213. RCW 43.31.522 and 1993 c
280 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout))
As used in RCW 43.31.524 and 43.31.526((:

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(2)
"Center" means the business assistance center established under RCW
43.31.083.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4))) "local nonprofit
organization" means a local nonprofit organization organized to provide
economic development or community development services, including but not
limited to associate development organizations, economic development councils,
and community development corporations.

Sec. 214. RCW 43.31.524 and 1993 c
280 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

There is established a
Washington marketplace program within the ((business assistance center
established under RCW 43.31.083)) department. The program shall
assist businesses to competitively meet their needs for goods and services
within Washington state by providing information relating to the replacement of
imports or the fulfillment of new requirements with Washington products
produced in Washington state. The program shall place special emphasis on
strengthening rural economies in economically distressed areas of the state
meeting the criteria of an "eligible area" as defined in RCW
82.60.020(3).

Sec. 215. RCW 43.31.641 and 1997 c
367 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)), as a member of the agency
rural community assistance task force, shall:

(1) Administer
available federal grant funds to support strategic diversification needs and
opportunities of timber-dependent communities, value-added forest products
firms, and the value-added forest products industry in Washington state.

(2) Provide value-added
wood products companies with building products export development assistance.

Sec. 216. RCW 43.31.830 and 1993 c
280 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be the
duty of the director ((of community, trade, and economic development))
to certify, from the applications received, the state international trade fair
or fairs qualified and entitled to receive funds under RCW 67.16.100, and under
rules established by the director.

(2) The director shall
make annual allotments to state international trade fairs determined qualified
to be entitled to participate in the state trade fair fund and shall fix times
for the division of and payment from the state trade fair fund: PROVIDED, That
total payment to any one state international trade fair shall not exceed sixty
thousand dollars in any one year, where participation or presentation occurs
within the United States, and eighty thousand dollars in any one year, where
participation or presentation occurs outside the United States: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That a state international trade fair may qualify for the full
allotment of funds under either category. Upon certification of the allotment
and division of fair funds by the director the treasurer shall proceed to pay
the same to carry out the purposes of RCW 67.16.100.

Sec. 217. RCW 43.31.840 and 1993 c
280 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

The director ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall at the end of each year
for which an annual allotment has been made, conduct a post audit of all of the
books and records of each state international trade fair participating in the
state trade fair fund. The purpose of such post audit shall be to determine
how and to what extent each participating state international trade fair has
expended all of its funds.

The audit required by
this section shall be a condition to future allotments of money from the state
international trade fair fund, and the director shall make a report of the
findings of each post audit and shall use such report as a consideration in an
application for any future allocations.

Sec. 218. RCW 43.31.960 and 1995 c
399 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

The principal proceeds
from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.31.956 shall be administered by
the director ((of community, trade, and economic development)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. In order to extend its
services and programs the department may charge reasonable fees for services,
products, and conferences provided in the areas of financial assistance,
international trade, economic development, and other service delivery areas,
except as otherwise provided. These fees are not intended to exceed the costs
of providing the service or preparing and distributing the product.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. The fees authorized under
RCW 70.95H.040 shall be adopted by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. (1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the state energy office relating to energy resource policy and
planning are transferred to the department. All references to the director or
the state energy office in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to
mean the director or the department when referring to the functions transferred
in this section.

The director shall
appoint an assistant director for energy policy, and energy policy staff shall
have no additional responsibilities beyond activities concerning energy policy.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, data base, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed by the state energy office in carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the
department.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred are transferred and credited to the department.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all
pending business before the state energy office pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the
department. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force
and shall be performed by the department.

(4) The transfer of the
powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office does not affect the
validity of any act performed before July 1, 2001.

(5) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of the office of financial management shall certify the
apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation.

(6) The department
shall direct the closure of the financial records of the state energy office.

(7) Responsibility for
implementing energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs rests with Washington State University. The department shall provide
Washington State University available existing and future oil overcharge
restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of five years
to carry out energy programs under an interagency agreement with the
department. The interagency agreement shall also outline the working relationship
between the department and Washington State University as it pertains to the
relationship between energy policy development and public outreach. Nothing in
chapter 186, Laws of 1996 prohibits Washington State University from seeking
grant, contract, or fee-for-service funding for energy or related programs
directly from other entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. (1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the department of community, trade, and economic development
pertaining to trade and economic development are transferred to the department
of trade and economic development. All references to the director or the
department of community, trade, and economic development in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of trade
and economic development when referring to the functions transferred in this
section.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the department of community, trade, and economic development
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered
to the custody of the department of trade and economic development. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of community, trade, and economic
development in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be made available to the department of trade and economic development. All
funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department of trade and
economic development.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the department of community, trade, and economic development for carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date
of this section, be transferred and credited to the department of trade and
economic development.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in
the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of
the department of community, trade, and economic development engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of trade and economic development. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the department of trade and economic development to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the
laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all
pending business before the department of community, trade, and economic
development pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be continued and acted upon by the department of trade and economic
development. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force
and shall be performed by the department of trade and economic development.

(5) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall not affect the validity of any act performed
before the effective date of this section.

(6) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments
to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of
these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

(7) Nothing contained
in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining
unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until
the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by
action of the personnel board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the
exemptions in this chapter, this chapter shall not apply within the department
of trade and economic development to the director, one confidential secretary,
the deputy directors, all assistant directors, and other positions as may be
necessary to administer the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. RCW 43.31.800 (State international trade
fairs--"Director" defined) and 1993 c 280 s 52, 1987 c 195 s 4, &
1965 c 148 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
225. The following sections
are each recodified as new sections in chapter 43.31 RCW:

RCW 43.63A.230

RCW 43.63A.715

RCW 43.330.060

RCW 43.330.065

RCW 43.330.080

RCW 43.330.090

RCW 43.330.092

RCW 43.330.094

RCW 43.330.095

RCW 43.330.096

RCW 43.63A.690

RCW 43.330.180

PART
III

REFERENCES TO DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT

Sec. 301. RCW 19.27.070 and 1995 c
399 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby
established a state building code council to be appointed by the governor.

(1) The state building
code council shall consist of fifteen members, two of whom shall be county
elected legislative body members or elected executives and two of whom shall be
city elected legislative body members or mayors. One of the members shall be a
local government building code enforcement official and one of the members
shall be a local government fire service official. Of the remaining nine
members, one member shall represent general construction, specializing in
commercial and industrial building construction; one member shall represent
general construction, specializing in residential and multifamily building
construction; one member shall represent the architectural design profession;
one member shall represent the structural engineering profession; one member
shall represent the mechanical engineering profession; one member shall
represent the construction building trades; one member shall represent
manufacturers, installers, or suppliers of building materials and components;
one member shall be a person with a physical disability and shall represent the
disability community; and one member shall represent the general public. At
least six of these fifteen members shall reside east of the crest of the
Cascade mountains. The council shall include: Two members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one from each caucus;
two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, one from
each caucus; and an employee of the electrical division of the department of
labor and industries, as ex officio, nonvoting members with all other
privileges and rights of membership. Terms of office shall be for three
years. The council shall elect a member to serve as chair of the council for
one-year terms of office. Any member who is appointed by virtue of being an
elected official or holding public employment shall be removed from the council
if he or she ceases being such an elected official or holding such public
employment. Before making any appointments to the building code council, the
governor shall seek nominations from recognized organizations which represent
the entities or interests listed in this subsection. Members serving on the
council on July 28, 1985, may complete their terms of office. Any vacancy
shall be filled by alternating appointments from governmental and
nongovernmental entities or interests until the council is constituted as
required by this subsection.

(2) Members shall not
be compensated but shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall provide
administrative and clerical assistance to the building code council.

Sec. 302. RCW 19.27.097 and 1995 c
399 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant for
a building permit of a building necessitating potable water shall provide
evidence of an adequate water supply for the intended use of the building.
Evidence may be in the form of a water right permit from the department of
ecology, a letter from an approved water purveyor stating the ability to
provide water, or another form sufficient to verify the existence of an
adequate water supply. In addition to other authorities, the county or city
may impose conditions on building permits requiring connection to an existing
public water system where the existing system is willing and able to provide
safe and reliable potable water to the applicant with reasonable economy and
efficiency. An application for a water right shall not be sufficient proof of
an adequate water supply.

(2) Within counties not
required or not choosing to plan pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040, the county and the
state may mutually determine those areas in the county in which the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply. The departments
of health and ecology shall coordinate on the implementation of this section.
Should the county and the state fail to mutually determine those areas to be
designated pursuant to this subsection, the county may petition the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development to mediate or, if
necessary, make the determination.

(3) Buildings that do
not need potable water facilities are exempt from the provisions of this
section. The department of ecology, after consultation with local governments,
may adopt rules to implement this section, which may recognize differences
between high-growth and low-growth counties.

Sec. 303. RCW 19.27.150 and 1995 c
399 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Every month a copy of
the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census' "report of
building or zoning permits issued and local public construction" or
equivalent report shall be transmitted by the governing bodies of counties and
cities to the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

Sec. 304. RCW 19.27.190 and 1996 c
186 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Not later than
January 1, 1991, the state building code council, in consultation with the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, shall
establish interim requirements for the maintenance of indoor air quality in
newly constructed residential buildings. In establishing the interim
requirements, the council shall take into consideration differences in heating
fuels and heating system types. These requirements shall be in effect July 1,
1991, through June 30, 1993.

(b) The interim
requirements for new electrically space heated residential buildings shall
include ventilation standards which provide for mechanical ventilation in areas
of the residence where water vapor or cooking odors are produced. The
ventilation shall be exhausted to the outside of the structure. The
ventilation standards shall further provide for the capacity to supply outside
air to each bedroom and the main living area through dedicated supply air inlet
locations in walls, or in an equivalent manner. At least one exhaust fan in
the home shall be controlled by a dehumidistat or clock timer to ensure that
sufficient whole house ventilation is regularly provided as needed.

(c)(i) For new single
family residences with electric space heating systems, zero lot line homes,
each unit in a duplex, and each attached housing unit in a planned unit
development, the ventilation standards shall include fifty cubic feet per
minute of effective installed ventilation capacity in each bathroom and one
hundred cubic feet per minute of effective installed ventilation capacity in
each kitchen.

(ii) For other new residential
units with electric space heating systems the ventilation standards may be
satisfied by the installation of two exhaust fans with a combined effective
installed ventilation capacity of two hundred cubic feet per minute.

(iii) Effective
installed ventilation capacity means the capability to deliver the specified
ventilation rates for the actual design of the ventilation system. Natural
ventilation and infiltration shall not be considered acceptable substitutes for
mechanical ventilation.

(d) For new residential
buildings that are space heated with other than electric space heating systems,
the interim standards shall be designed to result in indoor air quality
equivalent to that achieved with the interim ventilation standards for electric
space heated homes.

(e) The interim
requirements for all newly constructed residential buildings shall include
standards for indoor air quality pollutant source control, including the
following requirements: All structural panel components of the residence shall
comply with appropriate standards for the emission of formaldehyde; the
back-drafting of combustion by-products from combustion appliances shall be
minimized through the use of dampers, vents, outside combustion air sources, or
other appropriate technologies; and, in areas of the state where monitored data
indicate action is necessary to inhibit indoor radon gas concentrations from
exceeding appropriate health standards, entry of radon gas into homes shall be
minimized through appropriate foundation construction measures.

(2) No later than
January 1, 1993, the state building code council, in consultation with the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, shall
establish final requirements for the maintenance of indoor air quality in newly
constructed residences to be in effect beginning July 1, 1993. For new
electrically space heated residential buildings, these requirements shall
maintain indoor air quality equivalent to that provided by the mechanical
ventilation and indoor air pollutant source control requirements included in
the February 7, 1989, Bonneville power administration record of decision for
the environmental impact statement on new energy efficient homes programs
(DOE/EIS-0127F) built with electric space heating. In residential units other
than single family, zero lot line, duplexes, and attached housing units in
planned unit developments, ventilation requirements may be satisfied by the
installation of two exhaust fans with a combined effective installed
ventilation capacity of two hundred cubic feet per minute. For new residential
buildings that are space heated with other than electric space heating systems,
the standards shall be designed to result in indoor air quality equivalent to
that achieved with the ventilation and source control standards for electric
space heated homes. In establishing the final requirements, the council shall
take into consideration differences in heating fuels and heating system types.

Sec. 305. RCW 27.34.020 and 1995 c
399 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter:

(1) "Advisory
council" means the advisory council on historic preservation.

(2) "Department"
means the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(4) "Federal
act" means the national historic preservation act of 1966 (Public Law
89-655; 80 Stat. 915).

(5) "Heritage
council" means the Washington state heritage council.

(6) "Historic
preservation" includes the protection, rehabilitation, restoration,
identification, scientific excavation, and reconstruction of districts, sites,
buildings, structures, and objects significant in American and Washington state
history, architecture, archaeology, or culture.

(7) "Office"
means the office of archaeology and historic preservation within the
department.

(8) "Preservation
officer" means the state historic preservation officer as provided for in
RCW 27.34.210.

(9) "Project"
means programs leading to the preservation for public benefit of historical
properties, whether by state and local governments or other public bodies, or private
organizations or individuals, including the acquisition of title or interests
in, and the development of, any district, site, building, structure, or object
that is significant in American and Washington state history, architecture,
archaeology, or culture, and property used in connection therewith, or for its
development.

(10) "State
historical agencies" means the state historical societies and the office
of archaeology and historic preservation within the department.

(11) "State
historical societies" means the Washington state historical society and
the eastern Washington state historical society.

(12) "Cultural
resource management plan" means a comprehensive plan which identifies and
organizes information on the state of Washington's historic, archaeological,
and architectural resources into a set of management criteria, and which is to
be used for producing reliable decisions, recommendations, and advice relative
to the identification, evaluation, and protection of these resources.

Sec. 306. RCW 27.34.310 and 1995 c
399 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply throughout RCW
27.34.320.

(1) "Agency"
means the state agency, department, or institution that has ownership of
historic property.

(2) "Historic
properties" means those buildings, sites, objects, structures, and
districts that are listed in or eligible for listing in the National Register
of Historic Places.

(3) "Office"
means the office of archaeology and historic preservation within the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development.

Sec. 307. RCW 27.53.030 and 1995 c
399 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions contained in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Archaeology" means systematic, scientific study of man's past
through material remains.

(2)
"Archaeological object" means an object that comprises the physical
evidence of an indigenous and subsequent culture including material remains of
past human life including monuments, symbols, tools, facilities, and
technological by-products.

(3)
"Archaeological site" means a geographic locality in Washington,
including but not limited to, submerged and submersible lands and the bed of
the sea within the state's jurisdiction, that contains archaeological objects.

(4)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(5) "Director"
means the director of community((, trade, and economic)) development or
the director's designee.

(6)
"Historic" means peoples and cultures who are known through written
documents in their own or other languages. As applied to underwater archaeological
resources, the term historic shall include only those properties which are
listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington State Register of Historic
Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the National Register of Historic Places as defined
in the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public
Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.

(7)
"Prehistoric" means peoples and cultures who are unknown through
contemporaneous written documents in any language.

(8) "Professional
archaeologist" means a person who has met the educational, training, and
experience requirements of the ((society)) register of
professional archaeologists.

(9) "Qualified
archaeologist" means a person who has had formal training and/or
experience in archaeology over a period of at least three years, and has been
certified in writing to be a qualified archaeologist by two professional
archaeologists.

(10) "Amateur
society" means any organization composed primarily of persons who are not
professional archaeologists, whose primary interest is in the archaeological
resources of the state, and which has been certified in writing by two
professional archaeologists.

(11) "Historic
archaeological resources" means those properties which are listed in or
eligible for listing in the Washington State Register of Historic Places (RCW
27.34.220) or the National Register of Historic Places as defined in the
National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law
89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 308. RCW 28A.215.110 and 1999
c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908.

(1) "Advisory
committee" means the advisory committee under RCW 28A.215.140.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3) "Eligible
child" means a child not eligible for kindergarten whose family income is
at or below one hundred ten percent of the federal poverty level, as published
annually by the federal department of health and human services, and includes a
child whose family is eligible for public assistance, and who is not a
participant in a federal or state program providing comprehensive services and
may include children who are eligible under rules adopted by the department if
the number of such children equals not more than ten percent of the total
enrollment in the early childhood program. Priority for enrollment shall be
given to children from families with the lowest income or to eligible children
from families with multiple needs.

(4) "Approved
programs" means those state-supported education and special assistance
programs which are recognized by the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development as meeting the minimum program rules adopted by the
department to qualify under RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900
through 28A.215.908 and are designated as eligible for funding by the
department under RCW 28A.215.160 and 28A.215.180.

(5)
"Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the needs
of the child and includes education, health, and family support services.

(6) "Family
support services" means providing opportunities for parents to:

(a) Actively participate
in their child's early childhood program;

(b) Increase their
knowledge of child development and parenting skills;

(c) Further their
education and training;

(d) Increase their
ability to use needed services in the community;

(e) Increase their
self-reliance.

Sec. 309. RCW 28A.215.120 and 1994
c 166 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall administer a
state-supported early childhood education and assistance program to assist
eligible children with educational, social, health, nutritional, and cultural
development to enhance their opportunity for success in the common school
system. Eligible children shall be admitted to approved early childhood programs
to the extent that the legislature provides funds, and additional eligible
children may be admitted to the extent that grants and contributions from
community sources provide sufficient funds for a program equivalent to that
supported by state funds.

Sec. 310. RCW 28A.300.160 and 1995
c 399 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall be the lead agency and shall assist
the department of social and health services, the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development, and school districts in establishing a
coordinated primary prevention program for child abuse and neglect.

(2) In developing the
program, consideration shall be given to the following:

(a) Parent, teacher,
and children's workshops whose information and training is:

(i) Provided in a
clear, age-appropriate, nonthreatening manner, delineating the problem and the
range of possible solutions;

(ii) Culturally and
linguistically appropriate to the population served;

(iii) Appropriate to
the geographic area served; and

(iv) Designed to help
counteract common stereotypes about child abuse victims and offenders;

(b) Training for school
age children's parents and school staff, which includes:

(i) Physical and
behavioral indicators of abuse;

(ii) Crisis counseling
techniques;

(iii) Community
resources;

(iv) Rights and
responsibilities regarding reporting;

(v) School district
procedures to facilitate reporting and apprise supervisors and administrators
of reports; and

(vi) Caring for a
child's needs after a report is made;

(c) Training for
licensed day care providers and parents that includes:

(i) Positive child
guidance techniques;

(ii) Physical and
behavioral indicators of abuse;

(iii) Recognizing and
providing safe, quality day care;

(iv) Community
resources;

(v) Rights and
responsibilities regarding reporting; and

(vi) Caring for the
abused or neglected child;

(d) Training for
children that includes:

(i) The right of every
child to live free of abuse;

(ii) How to disclose
incidents of abuse and neglect;

(iii) The availability
of support resources and how to obtain help;

(iv) Child safety
training and age-appropriate self-defense techniques; and

(v) A period for crisis
counseling and reporting immediately following the completion of each
children's workshop in a school setting which maximizes the child's privacy and
sense of safety.

(3) The primary
prevention program established under this section shall be a voluntary program
and shall not be part of the basic program of education.

(4)
Parents shall be given notice of the primary prevention program and may refuse
to have their children participate in the program.

Sec. 311. RCW 28B.06.030 and 1995
c 335 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board for
community and technical colleges, in consultation with the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, the department of social
and health services, the superintendent of public instruction, and
community-based, nonprofit providers of adult literacy services, shall develop
an adult literacy program to serve eligible parents as defined under RCW ((28A.610.020))
28B.06.020. The program shall give priority to serving parents with
children who have not yet enrolled in school or are in grades kindergarten
through three.

(2) In addition to
providing basic skills instruction to eligible parents, the program may include
other program components which may include transportation, child care, and such
other directly necessary activities as may be necessary to accomplish the
purposes of this chapter.

(3) Parents who elect
to participate in training or work programs, as a condition of receiving public
assistance, shall have the hours spent in parent participation programs,
conducted as part of a federal head start program, or the state early childhood
education and assistance program under RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and
28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908, or parent literacy programs under this
chapter, counted toward the fulfillment of their work and training obligation
for the receipt of public assistance.

(4) State funds as may
be appropriated for project even start shall be used solely to expand and
complement, but not supplant, federal funds for adult literary programs.

(5) The state board for
community and technical colleges shall adopt rules as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 312. RCW 34.05.330 and 1998 c
280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person may
petition an agency requesting the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule.
The office of financial management shall prescribe by rule the format for such
petitions and the procedure for their submission, consideration, and
disposition and provide a standard form that may be used to petition any
agency. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the agency shall
either (a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) its reasons for the
denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the petitioner, and,
where appropriate, (ii) the alternative means by which it will address the
concerns raised by the petitioner, or (b) initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance
with RCW 34.05.320.

(2) If an agency denies
a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under subsection (1) of this
section, and the petition alleges that the rule is not within the intent of the
legislature or was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of
law, the person may petition for review of the rule by the joint administrative
rules review committee under RCW 34.05.655.

(3) If an agency denies
a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under subsection (1) of this
section, the petitioner, within thirty days of the denial, may appeal the
denial to the governor. The governor shall immediately file notice of the
appeal with the code reviser for publication in the Washington state register.
Within forty-five days after receiving the appeal, the governor shall either
(a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) his or her reasons for the
denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the petitioner, and,
(ii) where appropriate, the alternative means by which he or she will address
the concerns raised by the petitioner; (b) for agencies listed in RCW
43.17.010, direct the agency to initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance
with this chapter; or (c) for agencies not listed in RCW 43.17.010, recommend
that the agency initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with this
chapter. The governor's response to the appeal shall be published in the
Washington state register and copies shall be submitted to the chief clerk of
the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate.

(4) In petitioning for
repeal or amendment of a rule under this section, a person is encouraged to
address, among other concerns:

(a) Whether the rule is
authorized;

(b) Whether the rule is
needed;

(c) Whether the rule
conflicts with or duplicates other federal, state, or local laws;

(d) Whether
alternatives to the rule exist that will serve the same purpose at less cost;

(e) Whether the rule
applies differently to public and private entities;

(f) Whether the rule
serves the purposes for which it was adopted;

(g) Whether the costs
imposed by the rule are unreasonable;

(h) Whether the rule is
clearly and simply stated;

(i) Whether the rule is
different than a federal law applicable to the same activity or subject matter
without adequate justification; and

(j) Whether the rule
was adopted according to all applicable provisions of law.

(5) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development and the office of
financial management shall coordinate efforts among agencies to inform the
public about the existence of this rules review process.

(6) The office of
financial management shall initiate the rule making required by subsection (1)
of this section by September 1, 1995.

Sec. 313. RCW 35.02.260 and 1995 c
399 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall identify federal,
state, and local agencies that should receive notification that a new city or
town is about to incorporate and shall assist newly formed cities and towns
during the interim period before the official date of incorporation in
providing such notification to the identified agencies.

Sec. 314. RCW 35.21.300 and 1995 c
399 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The lien for
charges for service by a city waterworks, or electric light or power plant may
be enforced only by cutting off the service until the delinquent and unpaid
charges are paid, except that until June 30, 1991, utility service for
residential space heating may be terminated between November 15th and
March 15th only as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section.
In the event of a disputed account and tender by the owner of the premises of
the amount the owner claims to be due before the service is cut off, the right
to refuse service to any premises shall not accrue until suit has been entered
by the city and judgment entered in the case.

(2) Utility service for
residential space heating shall not be terminated between November 15th
through March 15th if the customer:

(a) Notifies the
utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security deposit. This
notice should be provided within five business days of receiving a payment
overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the customer
fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b) Provides
self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to a grantee
of the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
which administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee
shall determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed
for eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under
42 U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information in the
self-certification;

(c) Has applied for
home heating assistance from applicable government and private sector
organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied to the
current bill and future utility bills;

(d) Has applied for
low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other appropriate agency
if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e) Agrees to a payment
plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan will be designed both
to pay the past due bill by the following October 15th and to pay for
continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the following
October 15th, the customer shall not be eligible for protections under
this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require
monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income
plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and
thereafter during November 15th through March 15th. A customer
may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in
default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent of monthly
income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is
made and thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the customer
subsequent to implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact the
utility to reformulate the plan; and

(f) Agrees to pay the
moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(3) The utility shall:

(a) Include in any
notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be subject to
termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b) Assist the customer
in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c) Be authorized to
transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has established a
plan under this section moves from one residence to another within the same
utility service area;

(d) Be permitted to
disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment program.
Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices authorized by
law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this section. Customers who
qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their payment plans
and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections afforded
under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by paying all
amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of the applicable
payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is reconnected; and

(e) Advise the customer
in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will restore service if
the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other requirements of this
section.

(4) All municipal
utilities shall offer residential customers the option of a budget billing or
equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall be offered
low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income energy
assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without limiting
availability to certain months of the year, without regard to the length of
time the customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to whether the
customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(5) An agreement
between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written, shall not waive
the protections afforded under this chapter.

Sec. 315. RCW 35.21.687 and 1995 c
399 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every city and
town, including every code city operating under Title 35A RCW, shall identify
and catalog real property owned by the city or town that is no longer required
for its purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing for
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW
43.63A.510 (as recodified by this act). The inventory shall include the
location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property.
Every city and town shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development by November 1, 1993, with
inventory revisions each November 1st thereafter.

(2) By
November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, every city and town, including
every code city operating under Title 35A RCW, shall purge the inventory of
real property of sites that are no longer available for the development of
affordable housing. The inventory revision shall also contain a list of real
property that has become available since the last update. As used in this
section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and
land.

Sec. 316. RCW 35.21.779 and 1995 c
399 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In cities or towns
where the estimated value of state-owned facilities constitutes ten percent or
more of the total assessed valuation, the state agency or institution owning
the facilities shall contract with the city or town to pay an equitable share
for fire protection services. The contract shall be negotiated as provided in
subsections (2) through (6) of this section and shall provide for payment by
the agency or institution to the city or town.

(2) A city or town
seeking to enter into fire protection contract negotiations shall provide
written notification to the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development and the state agencies or institutions that own property within the
jurisdiction, of its intent to contract for fire protection services. Where there
are multiple state agencies located within a single jurisdiction, a city may
choose to notify only the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, which in turn shall notify the agencies or institution that own
property within the jurisdiction of the city's intent to contract for fire
protection services. Any such notification shall be based on the valuation
procedures, based on commonly accepted standards, adopted by the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development in consultation with the
department of general administration and the association of Washington cities.

(3) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall review any such
notification to ensure that the valuation procedures and results are accurate.
The department will notify each affected city or town and state agency or
institution of the results of their review within thirty days of receipt of
notification.

(4) The parties
negotiating fire protection contracts under this section shall conduct those
negotiations in good faith. Whenever there are multiple state agencies located
within a single jurisdiction, every effort shall be made by the state to
consolidate negotiations on behalf of all affected agencies.

(5) In the event of
notification by one of the parties that an agreement cannot be reached on the
terms and conditions of a fire protection contract, the director of the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
mediate a resolution of the disagreement. In the event of a continued impasse,
the director of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall recommend a resolution.

(6) If the parties
reject the recommendation of the director and an impasse continues, the
director shall direct the parties to arbitration. The parties shall agree on a
neutral arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the arbitrator shall be shared
equally between the parties. The arbitration shall be a final offer, total
arbitration, with the arbitrator empowered only to pick the final offer of one
of the parties or the recommended resolution by the director of the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development. The decision of the
arbitrator shall be final, binding, and nonappealable on the parties.

(7) The provisions of
this section shall not apply if a city or town and a state agency or
institution have contracted pursuant to RCW 35.21.775.

(8) The provisions of
this section do not apply to cities and towns not meeting the conditions in
subsection (1) of this section. Cities and towns not meeting the conditions of
subsection (1) of this section may enter into contracts pursuant to RCW 35.21.775.

Sec. 317. RCW 36.27.100 and 1995 c
399 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that, due to the magnitude or volume of offenses in a
given area of the state, there is a recurring need for supplemental assistance
in the prosecuting of drug and drug-related offenses that can be directed to
the area of the state with the greatest need for short-term assistance. A
statewide drug prosecution assistance program is created within the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development to assist county
prosecuting attorneys in the prosecution of drug and drug-related offenses.

Sec. 318. RCW 36.34.137 and 1993 c
461 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every county shall
identify and catalog real property owned by the county that is no longer
required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510 (as recodified by this act). The inventory
shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification
of the property. Every county shall provide a copy of the inventory to the
department of community development by November 1, 1993, with inventory
revisions each November 1st thereafter.

(2) By November 1st
of each year, beginning in 1994, every county shall purge the inventory of real
property of sites that are no longer available for the development of
affordable housing. The inventory revision shall include an updated listing of
real property that has become available since the last update. As used in this
section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and
land.

Sec. 319. RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997
c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adopt a
comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use
plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal
products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not
subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish
in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.

(3) "City"
means any city or town, including a code city.

(4) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means
a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a
county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Critical
areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b)
areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c)
fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and
(e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(7) "Development
regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on
development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not
limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master
programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision
ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments
thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a
project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the
decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body
of the county or city.

(8) "Forest
land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term
commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically
managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise
tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term
commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is primarily
devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land
that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the
following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9) "Geologically
hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to
erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the
siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with
public health or safety concerns.

(10) "Long-term
commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and
soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in
consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12) "Public
facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road
lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary
sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and schools.

(13) "Public
services" include fire protection and suppression, law enforcement, public
health, education, recreation, environmental protection, and other governmental
services.

(14) "Rural
character" refers to the patterns of land use and development established
by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a) In which open
space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built
environment;

(b) That foster
traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both
live and work in rural areas;

(c) That provide visual
landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;

(d) That are compatible
with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;

(e) That reduce the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low‑density
development;

(f) That generally do
not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g) That are consistent
with the protection of natural surface water flows and ground water and surface
water recharge and discharge areas.

(15) "Rural
development" refers to development outside the urban growth area and
outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses and
residential densities, including clustered residential development, at levels
that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(16) "Rural
governmental services" or "rural services" include those public
services and public facilities historically and typically delivered at an
intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include domestic water systems,
fire and police protection services, transportation and public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with rural development and
normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm
or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).

(17) "Urban
growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location
of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a degree as to be
incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other
agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural
uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW
36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over wide areas,
urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(18) "Urban growth
areas" means those areas designated by a county pursuant to RCW
36.70A.110.

(19) "Urban
governmental services" or "urban services" include those public
services and public facilities at an intensity historically and typically
provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer systems,
domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police protection
services, public transit services, and other public utilities associated with
urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(20)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 320. RCW 36.70A.040 and 2000
c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county that
has both a population of fifty thousand or more and, until May 16, 1995, has
had its population increase by more than ten percent in the previous ten years
or, on or after May 16, 1995, has had its population increase by more than
seventeen percent in the previous ten years, and the cities located within such
county, and any other county regardless of its population that has had its
population increase by more than twenty percent in the previous ten years, and
the cities located within such county, shall conform with all of the
requirements of this chapter. However, the county legislative authority of
such a county with a population of less than fifty thousand population may
adopt a resolution removing the county, and the cities located within the
county, from the requirements of adopting comprehensive land use plans and
development regulations under this chapter if this resolution is adopted and
filed with the department by December 31, 1990, for counties initially meeting
this set of criteria, or within sixty days of the date the office of financial management
certifies that a county meets this set of criteria under subsection (5) of this
section. For the purposes of this subsection, a county not currently planning
under this chapter is not required to include in its population count those
persons confined in a correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the
department of corrections that is located in the county.

Once a county meets
either of these sets of criteria, the requirement to conform with all of the
requirements of this chapter remains in effect, even if the county no longer
meets one of these sets of criteria.

(2) The county
legislative authority of any county that does not meet either of the sets of
criteria established under subsection (1) of this section may adopt a
resolution indicating its intention to have subsection (1) of this section
apply to the county. Each city, located in a county that chooses to plan under
this subsection, shall conform with all of the requirements of this chapter.
Once such a resolution has been adopted, the county and the cities located
within the county remain subject to all of the requirements of this chapter.

(3) Any county or city
that is initially required to conform with all of the requirements of this
chapter under subsection (1) of this section shall take actions under this
chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall adopt a
countywide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city
located within the county shall designate critical areas, agricultural lands,
forest lands, and mineral resource lands, and adopt development regulations
conserving these designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral
resource lands and protecting these designated critical areas, under RCW
36.70A.170 and 36.70A.060; (c) the county shall designate and take other
actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; (d) if the county
has a population of fifty thousand or more, the county and each city located
within the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan under this chapter and
development regulations that are consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan on or before July 1, 1994, and if the county has a
population of less than fifty thousand, the county and each city located within
the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan under this chapter and development
regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan by
January 1, 1995, but if the governor makes written findings that a county with
a population of less than fifty thousand or a city located within such a county
is not making reasonable progress toward adopting a comprehensive plan and
development regulations the governor may reduce this deadline for such actions
to be taken by no more than one hundred eighty days. Any county or city
subject to this subsection may obtain an additional six months before it is
required to have adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter
notifying the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive
plan and development regulations.

(4) Any county or city
that is required to conform with all the requirements of this chapter, as a
result of the county legislative authority adopting its resolution of intention
under subsection (2) of this section, shall take actions under this chapter as
follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall adopt a countywide
planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city that is
located within the county shall adopt development regulations conserving
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands it designated
under RCW 36.70A.060 within one year of the date the county legislative
authority adopts its resolution of intention; (c) the county shall designate
and take other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and
(d) the county and each city that is located within the county shall adopt a
comprehensive plan and development regulations that are consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan not later than four years from the date the
county legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention, but a county
or city may obtain an additional six months before it is required to have
adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter notifying the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development of its need
prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and development
regulations.

(5) If the office of
financial management certifies that the population of a county that previously
had not been required to plan under subsection (1) or (2) of this section has
changed sufficiently to meet either of the sets of criteria specified under
subsection (1) of this section, and where applicable, the county legislative
authority has not adopted a resolution removing the county from these
requirements as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the county and each
city within such county shall take actions under this chapter as follows: (a)
The county legislative authority shall adopt a countywide planning policy under
RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city located within the county shall
adopt development regulations under RCW 36.70A.060 conserving agricultural
lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands it designated within one year
of the certification by the office of financial management; (c) the county
shall designate and take other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city located within the county shall
adopt a comprehensive land use plan and development regulations that are
consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan within four years of the
certification by the office of financial management, but a county or city may
obtain an additional six months before it is required to have adopted its
development regulations by submitting a letter notifying the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development of its need prior to the
deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and development regulations.

(6) A copy of each
document that is required under this section shall be submitted to the
department at the time of its adoption.

(7) Cities and counties
planning under this chapter must amend the transportation element of the
comprehensive plan to be in compliance with this chapter and chapter 47.80 RCW
no later than December 31, 2000.

Sec. 321. RCW 36.70A.131 and 1998
c 286 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

As part of the review required
by RCW 36.70A.130(1), a county or city shall review its mineral resource lands
designations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170 and mineral resource lands
development regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 and 36.70A.060. In
its review, the county or city shall take into consideration:

(1) New information
made available since the adoption or last review of its designations or
development regulations, including data available from the department of
natural resources relating to mineral resource deposits; and

(2) New or modified
model development regulations for mineral resource lands prepared by the
department of natural resources, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, or the Washington state association of counties.

Sec. 322. RCW 39.44.210 and 1995 c
399 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

For each state or local
government bond issued, the underwriter of the issue shall supply the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development with
information on the bond issue within twenty days of its issuance. In cases
where the issuer of the bond makes a direct or private sale to a purchaser
without benefit of an underwriter, the issuer shall supply the required
information. The bond issue information shall be provided on a form prescribed
by the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development and
shall include but is not limited to: (1) The par value of the bond issue; (2)
the effective interest rates; (3) a schedule of maturities; (4) the purposes of
the bond issue; (5) cost of issuance information; and (6) the type of bonds
that are issued. A copy of the bond covenants shall be supplied with this
information.

For each state or local
government bond issued, the issuer's bond counsel promptly shall provide to the
underwriter or to the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development information on the amount of any fees charged for services rendered
with regard to the bond issue.

Each local government
that issues any type of bond shall make a report annually to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development that includes a summary
of all the outstanding bonds of the local government as of the first day of
January in that year. Such report shall distinguish the outstanding bond
issues on the basis of the type of bond, as defined in RCW 39.44.200, and shall
report the local government's outstanding indebtedness compared to any
applicable limitations on indebtedness, including RCW 35.42.200, 39.30.010, and
39.36.020.

Sec. 323. RCW 39.44.230 and 1995 c
399 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may adopt
rules ((and regulations)) pursuant to the administrative procedure act
to require (1) the submission of bond issuance information by underwriters and
bond counsel to the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development in a timely manner and (2) the submission of additional information
on bond issues by state and local governments, including summaries of
outstanding bond issues.

Sec. 324. RCW 39.84.090 and 1998 c
245 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to issuance
of any revenue bonds, each public corporation shall submit a copy of its
enabling ordinance and charter, a description of any industrial development
facility proposed to be undertaken, and the basis for its qualification as an
industrial development facility to the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(2) If the industrial
development facility is not eligible under this chapter, the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall give notice to the
public corporation, in writing and by certified mail, within twelve working
days of receipt of the description.

(3) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall provide such advice
and assistance to public corporations and municipalities which have created or
may wish to create public corporations as the public corporations or
municipalities request and the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development considers appropriate.

Sec. 325. RCW 43.08.260 and 1997 c
319 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The legislature
recognizes the ethical obligation of attorneys to represent clients without
interference by third parties in the discharge of professional obligations to clients.
However, to ensure the most beneficial use of state resources, the legislature
finds that it is within the authority of the legislature to specify the
categories of legal cases in which qualified legal aid programs may provide
civil representation with state moneys. Accordingly, moneys appropriated for
civil legal representation pursuant to this section shall not be used for legal
representation that is either outside the scope of this section or prohibited
by this section.

(b) Nothing in this section
is intended to limit the authority of existing entities, including but not
limited to the Washington state bar association, the public disclosure
commission, the state auditor, and the federal legal services corporation to
resolve issues within their respective jurisdictions.

(2) Any money
appropriated by the legislature from the public safety and education account
pursuant to RCW 43.08.250 or from any other state fund or account for civil
representation of indigent persons shall be used solely for the purpose of
contracting with qualified legal aid programs for legal representation of
indigent persons in matters relating to: (a) Domestic relations and family law
matters, (b) public assistance and health care, (c) housing and utilities, (d)
social security, (e) mortgage foreclosures, (f) home protection bankruptcies,
(g) consumer fraud and unfair sales practices, (h) rights of residents of
long-term care facilities, (i) wills, estates, and living wills, (j) elder
abuse, and (k) guardianship.

(3) For purposes of
this section, a "qualified legal aid program" means a not-for-profit
corporation incorporated and operating exclusively in Washington which has
received basic field funding for the provision of civil legal services to
indigents from the federal legal services corporation or that has received
funding for civil legal services for indigents under this section before July
1, 1997.

(4) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall establish a
distribution formula based on the distribution by county of individuals with
incomes below the official federal poverty level guidelines. When entering
into a contract with a qualified legal services provider under this section,
the department shall require the provider to provide legal services in a manner
that maximizes geographic access in accordance with the formula established in
this subsection (4).

(5) Funds distributed
to qualified legal aid programs under this section may not be used directly or
indirectly for:

(a) Lobbying.

(i) For purposes of
this section, "lobbying" means any personal service, advertisement,
telegram, telephone communication, letter, printed or written matter, or other
device directly or indirectly intended to influence any member of congress or
any other federal, state, or local nonjudicial official, whether elected or
appointed:

(A) In connection with
any act, bill, resolution, or similar legislation by the congress of the United
States or by any state or local legislative body, or any administrative rule,
rule-making activity, standard, rate, or other enactment by any federal, state,
or local administrative agency;

(B) In connection with
any referendum, initiative, constitutional amendment, or any similar procedure
of the congress, any state legislature, any local council, or any similar
governing body acting in a legislative capacity; or

(C) In connection with
inclusion of any provision in a legislative measure appropriating funds to, or
defining or limiting the functions or authority of, the recipient of funds
under this section.

(ii)
"Lobbying" does not include the response of an employee of a legal
aid program to a written request from a governmental agency, an elected or
appointed official, or committee on a specific matter. This exception does not
authorize communication with anyone other than the requesting party, or agent
or employee of such agency, official, or committee.

(b) Grass roots
lobbying. For purposes of this section, "grass roots lobbying" means
preparation, production, or dissemination of information the purpose of which
is to encourage the public at large, or any definable segment thereof, to contact
legislators or their staff in support of or in opposition to pending or
proposed legislation; or contribute to or participate in a demonstration,
march, rally, lobbying campaign, or letter writing or telephone campaign for
the purpose of influencing the course of pending or proposed legislation.

(c) Class action
lawsuits.

(d) Participating in or
identifying the program with prohibited political activities. For purposes of
this section, "prohibited political activities" means (i) any
activity directed toward the success or failure of a political party, a
candidate for partisan or nonpartisan office, a partisan political group, or a
ballot measure; (ii) advertising or contributing or soliciting financial
support for or against any candidate, political group, or ballot measure; or
(iii) voter registration or transportation activities.

(e) Representation in
fee-generating cases. For purposes of this section, "fee-generating"
means a case that might reasonably be expected to result in a fee for legal services
if undertaken by a private attorney. The charging of a fee pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section does not establish the fee-generating nature of
a case.

A fee-generating case
may be accepted when: (i) The case has been rejected by the local lawyer
referral services or by two private attorneys; (ii) neither the referral
service nor two private attorneys will consider the case without payment of a
consultation fee; (iii) after consultation with the appropriate representatives
of the private bar, the program has determined that the type of case is one
that private attorneys do not ordinarily accept, or do not accept without
prepayment of a fee; or (iv) the director of the program or the director's
designee has determined that referral of the case to the private bar is not
possible because documented attempts to refer similar cases in the past have
been futile, or because emergency circumstances compel immediate action before
referral can be made, but the client is advised that, if appropriate and
consistent with professional responsibility, referral will be attempted at a
later time.

(f) Organizing any
association, union, or federation, or representing a labor union. However,
nothing in this subsection (5)(f) prohibits the provision of legal services to
clients as otherwise permitted by this section.

(g) Representation of
undocumented aliens.

(h) Picketing,
demonstrations, strikes, or boycotts.

(i) Engaging in
inappropriate solicitation. For purposes of this section, "inappropriate
solicitation" means promoting the assertion of specific legal claims among
persons who know of their rights to make a claim and who decline to do so.
Nothing in this subsection precludes a legal services program or its employees
from providing information regarding legal rights and responsibilities or
providing information regarding the program's services and intake procedures
through community legal education activities, responding to an individual's
specific question about whether the individual should consult with an attorney
or take legal action, or responding to an individual's specific request for
information about the individual's legal rights or request for assistance in
connection with a specific legal problem.

(j) Conducting training
programs that: (i) Advocate particular public policies; (ii) encourage or
facilitate political activities, labor or antilabor activities, boycotts,
picketing, strikes, or demonstrations; or (iii) attempt to influence
legislation or rule making. Nothing in this subsection (5)(j) precludes
representation of clients as otherwise permitted by this section.

(6) The department may
establish requirements for client participation in the provision of civil legal
services under this section, including but not limited to copayments and sliding
fee scales.

(7)(a) Contracts
entered into by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development with qualified legal services programs under this section must
specify that the program's expenditures of moneys distributed under this section:

(i) Must be audited
annually by an independent outside auditor. These audit results must be
provided to the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development; and

(ii) Are subject to
audit by the state auditor.

(b)(i) Any entity auditing
a legal services program under this section shall have access to all records of
the legal services program to the full extent necessary to determine compliance
with this section, with the exception of confidential information protected by
the United States Constitution, the state Constitution, the attorney-client
privilege, and applicable rules of attorney conduct.

(ii) The legal services
program shall have a system allowing for production of case-specific
information, including client eligibility and case type, to demonstrate
compliance with this section, with the exception of confidential information
protected by the United States Constitution, the state Constitution, the
attorney-client privilege, and applicable rules of attorney conduct. Such information
shall be available to any entity that audits the program.

(8) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development must recover or withhold
amounts determined by an audit to have been used in violation of this section.

(9) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development may adopt rules to
implement this section.

Sec. 326. RCW 43.19.1920 and 1995
c 399 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

The division of
purchasing may donate state-owned, surplus, tangible personal property to
shelters that are: Participants in the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development's emergency shelter assistance program; and
operated by nonprofit organizations or units of local government providing
emergency or transitional housing for homeless persons. A donation may be made
only if all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The division of
purchasing has made reasonable efforts to determine if any state agency has a
requirement for such personal property and no such agency has been identified.
Such determination shall follow sufficient notice to all state agencies to
allow adequate time for them to make their needs known;

(2) The agency owning
the property has authorized the division of purchasing to donate the property
in accordance with this section;

(3) The nature and
quantity of the property in question is directly germane to the needs of the
homeless persons served by the shelter and the purpose for which the shelter
exists and the shelter agrees to use the property for such needs and purposes;
and

(4) The
director of general administration has determined that the donation of such
property is in the best interest of the state.

Sec. 327. RCW 43.19.19201 and 1995
c 399 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
general administration shall identify and catalog real property that is no
longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income
households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510 (as recodified by this act).
The inventory shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department of general administration shall
provide a copy of the inventory to the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development by November 1, 1993, and every November 1st
thereafter.

(2) By November
1st of each year, beginning in 1994, the department of general
administration shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no
longer available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become available
since the last update. As used in this section, "real property"
means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec. 328. RCW 43.20A.037 and 1995
c 399 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing
for very low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510
(as recodified by this act). The inventory shall include the location,
approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property. The
department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development by November 1, 1993, and
every November 1st thereafter.

(2) By November 1st
of each year, beginning in 1994, the department shall purge the inventory of
real property of sites that are no longer available for the development of
affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of real
property that has become available since the last update. As used in this
section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and
land.

Sec. 329. RCW 43.21A.612 and 1995
c 399 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:

Before the director shall
construct said steam generating facility within the state, or make application
for any permit, license or other right necessary thereto, the director shall
give notice thereof by publishing once a week for four consecutive weeks in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which such
project is located a statement of intention setting forth the general nature,
extent and location of the project. If any public utility in the state or any
operating agency desires to construct such facility, such utility or operating
agency shall notify the director thereof within ten days after the last date of
publication of such notice. If the director determines that it is in the best
public interest that the director proceed with such construction rather than
the public utility or operating agency, the director shall so notify the
director of community((, trade, and economic)) development, who shall
set a date for hearing thereon. If after considering the evidence introduced
the director of community((, trade, and economic)) development finds
that the public utility or operating agency making the request intends to
immediately proceed with such construction and is financially capable of
carrying out such construction and further finds that the plan of such utility
or operating agency is equally well adapted to serve the public interest, the
director shall enter an order so finding and such order shall divest the
director of authority to proceed further with such construction or acquisition
until such time as the other public utility or agency voluntarily causes an
assignment of its right or interest in the project to the director or fails to
procure any further required governmental permit, license or authority or
having procured such, has the same revoked or withdrawn, in accordance with the
laws and regulations of such governmental entity, in which event the director
shall have the same authority to proceed as though the director had originally
entered an order so authorizing the director to proceed. If, after considering
the evidence introduced, the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development finds that the public utility or agency making the request does not
intend to immediately proceed with such construction or acquisition or is not
financially capable of carrying out such construction or acquisition, or finds
that the plan of such utility or operating agency is not equally well adapted
to serve the public interest, the director shall then enter an order so finding
and authorizing the director to proceed with the construction or acquisition of
the facility.

Sec. 330. RCW 43.21C.110 and 1997
c 429 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty
and function of the department of ecology:

(1) To adopt and amend
thereafter rules of interpretation and implementation of this chapter, subject
to the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, for the purpose of providing uniform
rules and guidelines to all branches of government including state agencies,
political subdivisions, public and municipal corporations, and counties. The
proposed rules shall be subject to full public hearings requirements associated
with rule promulgation. Suggestions for modifications of the proposed rules
shall be considered on their merits, and the department shall have the
authority and responsibility for full and appropriate independent promulgation
and adoption of rules, assuring consistency with this chapter as amended and
with the preservation of protections afforded by this chapter. The rule-making
powers authorized in this section shall include, but shall not be limited to,
the following phases of interpretation and implementation of this chapter:

(a) Categories of
governmental actions which are not to be considered as potential major actions
significantly affecting the quality of the environment, including categories
pertaining to applications for water right permits pursuant to chapters 90.03
and 90.44 RCW. The types of actions included as categorical exemptions in the
rules shall be limited to those types which are not major actions significantly
affecting the quality of the environment. The rules shall provide for certain
circumstances where actions which potentially are categorically exempt require
environmental review. An action that is categorically exempt under the rules
adopted by the department may not be conditioned or denied under this chapter.

(b) Rules for criteria
and procedures applicable to the determination of when an act of a branch of
government is a major action significantly affecting the quality of the
environment for which a detailed statement is required to be prepared pursuant
to RCW 43.21C.030.

(c) Rules and
procedures applicable to the preparation of detailed statements and other
environmental documents, including but not limited to rules for timing of
environmental review, obtaining comments, data and other information, and
providing for and determining areas of public participation which shall include
the scope and review of draft environmental impact statements.

(d) Scope of coverage
and contents of detailed statements assuring that such statements are simple,
uniform, and as short as practicable; statements are required to analyze only
reasonable alternatives and probable adverse environmental impacts which are
significant, and may analyze beneficial impacts.

(e) Rules and
procedures for public notification of actions taken and documents prepared.

(f) Definition of terms
relevant to the implementation of this chapter including the establishment of a
list of elements of the environment. Analysis of environmental considerations
under RCW 43.21C.030(2) may be required only for those subjects listed as
elements of the environment (or portions thereof). The list of elements of the
environment shall consist of the "natural" and "built"
environment. The elements of the built environment shall consist of public
services and utilities (such as water, sewer, schools, fire and police
protection), transportation, environmental health (such as explosive materials
and toxic waste), and land and shoreline use (including housing, and a
description of the relationships with land use and shoreline plans and
designations, including population).

(g) Rules for
determining the obligations and powers under this chapter of two or more
branches of government involved in the same project significantly affecting the
quality of the environment.

(h) Methods to assure
adequate public awareness of the preparation and issuance of detailed
statements required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).

(i) To prepare rules
for projects setting forth the time limits within which the governmental entity
responsible for the action shall comply with the provisions of this chapter.

(j) Rules for
utilization of a detailed statement for more than one action and rules
improving environmental analysis of nonproject proposals and encouraging better
interagency coordination and integration between this chapter and other
environmental laws.

(k) Rules relating to
actions which shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter in situations
of emergency.

(l) Rules relating to
the use of environmental documents in planning and decision making and the
implementation of the substantive policies and requirements of this chapter,
including procedures for appeals under this chapter.

(m) Rules and
procedures that provide for the integration of environmental review with
project review as provided in RCW 43.21C.240. The rules and procedures shall
be jointly developed with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development and shall be applicable to the preparation of environmental
documents for actions in counties, cities, and towns planning under RCW
36.70A.040. The rules and procedures shall also include procedures and
criteria to analyze planned actions under RCW 43.21C.031(2) and revisions to
the rules adopted under this section to ensure that they are compatible with
the requirements and authorizations of chapter 347, Laws of 1995, as amended by
chapter 429, Laws of 1997. Ordinances or procedures adopted by a county, city,
or town to implement the provisions of chapter 347, Laws of 1995 prior to the
effective date of rules adopted under this subsection (1)(m) shall continue to
be effective until the adoption of any new or revised ordinances or procedures
that may be required. If any revisions are required as a result of rules
adopted under this subsection (1)(m), those revisions shall be made within the
time limits specified in RCW 43.21C.120.

(2) In exercising its
powers, functions, and duties under this section, the department may:

(a) Consult with the
state agencies and with representatives of science, industry, agriculture,
labor, conservation organizations, state and local governments, and other
groups, as it deems advisable; and

(b) Utilize, to the
fullest extent possible, the services, facilities, and information (including
statistical information) of public and private agencies, organizations, and
individuals, in order to avoid duplication of effort and expense, overlap, or conflict
with similar activities authorized by law and performed by established
agencies.

(3) Rules adopted
pursuant to this section shall be subject to the review procedures of chapter
34.05 RCW.

Sec. 331. RCW 43.22.495 and 1995 c
399 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning on July 1, ((1991))
2001, the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall be responsible for performing all the consumer complaint and
related functions of the state administrative agency that are required for
purposes of complying with the regulations established by the federal
department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing, including
the preparation and submission of the state administrative plan.

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development may enter into state or
local interagency agreements to coordinate site inspection activities with
record monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency agreement may also
provide for the reimbursement for cost of work that an agency performs. The
department may include other related areas in any interagency agreements which
are necessary for the efficient provision of services.

The directors of the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development and the
department of labor and industries shall immediately take such steps as are
necessary to ensure that chapter 176, Laws of 1990 is implemented on June 7,
1990.

Sec. 332. RCW 43.63B.010 and 1998
c 124 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Authorized
representative" means an employee of a state agency, city, or county
acting on behalf of the department.

(2) "Certified
manufactured home installer" means a person who is in the business of
installing mobile or manufactured homes and who has been issued a certificate
by the department as provided in this chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(4)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(5) "Manufactured
home" means a single-family dwelling built in accordance with the
department of housing and urban development manufactured home construction and
safety standards act, which is a national, preemptive building code.

(6) "Mobile or
manufactured home installation" means all on-site work necessary for the
installation of a manufactured home, including:

(a) Construction of the
foundation system;

(b) Installation of the
support piers and earthquake resistant bracing system;

(c) Required connection
to foundation system and support piers;

(d) Skirting;

(e) Connections to the
on-site water and sewer systems that are necessary for the normal operation of
the home; and

(f) Extension of the
pressure relief valve for the water heater.

(7) "Manufactured
home standards" means the manufactured home construction and safety
standards as promulgated by the United States department of housing and urban
development (HUD).

(8) "Mobile
home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to June 15, 1976, to
standards other than the HUD code, and acceptable under applicable state codes
in effect at the time of construction or introduction of the home into the
state. Mobile homes have not been built since introduction of the HUD
manufactured home construction and safety standards act.

(9) "Training
course" means the education program administered by the department, or the
education course administered by an approved educational provider, as a
prerequisite to taking the examination for certification.

(10) "Approved
educational provider" means an organization approved by the department to
provide education and training of manufactured home installers and local
inspectors.

Sec. 333. RCW 43.70.530 and 1998 c
245 s 75 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
health, the department of social and health services, the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, the superintendent of
public instruction, and the employment security department shall, collectively
and collaboratively, develop a plan for a home health visitor program that
shall have as its primary purpose the prevention of child abuse and neglect
through the provision of selected educational and supportive services to high
risk parents of newborns.

(1) The program shall:
(a) Be community-based; (b) include early hospital-based screening to identify
high risk parents of newborns; (c) provide for an effective, in-home outreach
and support program for high risk parents of newborns that involves: (i)
Frequent home visits, (ii) parent training on early childhood development,
parenting, and the stress factors that lead to abuse and neglect, and (iii)
referrals to needed social and health services; and (d) demonstrate effective
coordination among current community-based programs that may also serve high
risk parents and their infants, including child abuse prevention programs,
first steps, second steps, the early childhood education and assistance
program, the healthy kids program, child welfare services, the women, infants,
and children program, the high priority infant tracking program, the birth to
six program, local and state public health prevention and early intervention
services, and other services as identified.

(2) The plan shall:
(a) Include an estimate and a description of the high risk groups to be served;
(b) detail the screening process and mechanisms to be used to identify high
risk parents; (c) detail the services to be included in the in-home program;
(d) describe staffing that may include the use of teams of professionals,
paraprofessionals, and volunteers; (e) describe how the program will be
evaluated, including the measurable outcomes to be achieved; and (f) provide an
estimate of the costs to fully implement the program statewide, and for
possible consideration, a series of pilot projects with a phased-in schedule.

Sec. 334. RCW 43.70.540 and 1995 c
399 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that the state patrol, the office of the administrator for the
courts, the sheriffs' and police chiefs' association, the department of social
and health services, the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, the sentencing guidelines commission, the department of
corrections, and the superintendent of public instruction each have
comprehensive data and analysis capabilities that have contributed greatly to
our current understanding of crime and violence, and their causes.

The legislature finds,
however, that a single health-oriented agency must be designated to provide
consistent guidelines to all these groups regarding the way in which their data
systems collect this important data. It is not the intent of the legislature
by RCW 43.70.545 to transfer data collection requirements from existing
agencies or to require the addition of major new data systems. It is rather
the intent to make only the minimum required changes in existing data systems
to increase compatibility and comparability, reduce duplication, and to
increase the usefulness of data collected by these agencies in developing more
accurate descriptions of violence.

Sec. 335. RCW 43.79.201 and 1995 c
399 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The charitable,
educational, penal and reformatory institutions account is hereby created, in
the state treasury, into which account there shall be deposited all moneys
arising from the sale, lease or transfer of the land granted by the United
States government to the state for charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions by section 17 of the enabling act, or otherwise set
apart for such institutions, except all moneys arising from the sale, lease, or
transfer of that certain one hundred thousand acres of such land assigned for
the support of the University of Washington by chapter 91, Laws of 1903 and
section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893.

(2) If feasible, not
less than one-half of all income to the charitable, educational, penal, and
reformatory institutions account shall be appropriated for the purpose of
providing housing, including repair and renovation of state institutions, for
persons who are mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or youth who are blind,
deaf, or otherwise disabled. If moneys are appropriated for community-based
housing, the moneys shall be appropriated to the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development for the housing assistance program under
chapter 43.185 RCW.

Sec. 336. RCW 43.105.020 and 1999
c 285 s 1 and 1999 c 80 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following definitions
shall apply:

(1) "Department"
means the department of information services;

(2) "Board"
means the information services board;

(3) "Local
governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal corporations and
political subdivisions, and all agencies of such corporations and subdivisions
authorized to contract separately;

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department;

(5) "Purchased
services" means services provided by a vendor to accomplish routine,
continuing, and necessary functions. This term includes, but is not limited
to, services acquired for equipment maintenance and repair, operation of a
physical plant, security, computer hardware and software installation and
maintenance, data entry, keypunch services, programming services, and computer
time-sharing;

(6) "Backbone
network" means the shared high-density portions of the state's
telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes specially conditioned
high-speed communications carrier lines, multiplexors, switches associated with
such communications lines, and any equipment and software components necessary
for management and control of the backbone network;

(7)
"Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by wire,
radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;

(8) "Information
processing" means the electronic capture, collection, storage,
manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and presentation of information in the
form of data, text, voice, or image and includes telecommunications and office
automation functions;

(9) "Information
services" means data processing, telecommunications, and office
automation;

(10)
"Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities
used in information processing, such as computers, word processors, terminals,
telephones, and cables;

(11) "Information
technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a strategic
management process documenting relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments;

(12)
"Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology resources;

(13) "Proprietary
software" means that software offered for sale or license;

(14) "Video
telecommunications" means the electronic interconnection of two or more
sites for the purpose of transmitting and/or receiving visual and associated
audio information. Video telecommunications shall not include existing public
television broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development under chapter 43.330 RCW;

(15) "K-20
educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the K-20
educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800;

(16) "K-20 network
technical steering committee" or "committee" means the K-20
network technical steering committee created in RCW 43.105.810;

(17) "K-20
network" means the network established in RCW 43.105.820;

(18) "Educational
sectors" means those institutions of higher education, school districts,
and educational service districts that use the network for distance education,
data transmission, and other uses permitted by the K-20 board.

Sec. 337. RCW 43.132.030 and 1995
c 399 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of
financial management is hereby empowered to designate the director of
community((, trade, and economic)) development as the official
responsible for the preparation of fiscal notes authorized and required by this
chapter. It is the intent of the legislature that when necessary the resources
of other state agencies, appropriate legislative staffs, and the various
associations of local government may be employed in the development of such
fiscal notes.

Sec. 338. RCW 43.133.030 and 1995
c 399 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial
management and the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall, in cooperation with appropriate legislative committees and
legislative staff, establish a procedure for the provision of sunrise notes on
the expected impact of bills and resolutions that authorize the creation of new
boards and new types of special purpose districts.

Sec. 339. RCW 43.133.050 and 1995
c 399 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of
financial management shall prepare sunrise notes for legislation concerning the
creation of new boards. The department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall prepare sunrise notes for legislation creating new types of
special purpose districts.

(2) A sunrise note
shall be prepared for all executive and agency request legislation that creates
a board or special purpose district.

(3) The office of
financial management or the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall also provide a sunrise note at the request of any committee
of the legislature.

Sec. 340. RCW 43.150.040 and 1995
c 399 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The governor may
establish a statewide center for volunteerism and citizen service within the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development and appoint
an executive administrator, who may employ such staff as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. The provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW do not apply
to the executive administrator and the staff.

Sec. 341. RCW 43.155.020 and 2001
c 131 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.

(2) "Capital
facility plan" means a capital facility plan required by the growth
management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local governments not fully
planning under the growth management act, a plan required by the public works
board.

(3)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(4) "Financing
guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public works assistance
account, or money to be received by the public works assistance account, to the
repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations
issued by local governments to finance public works projects.

(5) "Local
governments" means cities, towns, counties, special purpose districts, and
any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
excluding school districts and port districts.

(6) "Public works
project" means a project of a local government for the planning,
acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation,
or improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water systems, or storm and
sanitary sewage systems and solid waste facilities, including recycling
facilities. A planning project may include the compilation of biological,
hydrological, or other data on a county, drainage basin, or region necessary to
develop a base of information for a capital facility plan.

(7) "Solid waste
or recycling project" means remedial actions necessary to bring abandoned
or closed landfills into compliance with regulatory requirements and the
repair, restoration, and replacement of existing solid waste transfer,
recycling facilities, and landfill projects limited to the opening of landfill
cells that are in existing and permitted landfills.

(8) "Technical
assistance" means training and other services provided to local
governments to: (a) Help such local governments plan, apply, and qualify for
loans and financing guarantees from the board, and (b) help local governments
improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire, construct, repair,
replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public facilities.

Sec. 342. RCW 43.168.010 and 1999
c 164 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that:

(1) The economic health
and well-being of the state, particularly in areas of high unemployment,
economic stagnation, and poverty, is of substantial public concern.

(2) The consequences of
minimal economic activity and persistent unemployment and underemployment are
serious threats to the safety, health, and welfare of residents of these areas,
decreasing the value of private investments and jeopardizing the sources of
public revenue.

(3) The economic and social
interdependence of communities and the vitality of industrial and economic
activity necessitates, and is in part dependent on preventing substantial
dislocation of residents and rebuilding the diversification of the areas'
economy.

(4) The ability to
remedy problems in stagnant areas of the state is beyond the power and control
of the regulatory process and influence of the state, and the ordinary
operations of private enterprise without additional governmental assistance are
insufficient to adequately remedy the problems of poverty and unemployment.

(5) The revitalization
of depressed communities requires the stimulation of private investment, the
development of new business ventures, the provision of capital to ventures
sponsored by local organizations and capable of growth in the business markets,
and assistance to viable, but under-financed, small businesses in order to
create and preserve jobs that are sustainable in the local economy.

Therefore, the
legislature declares there to be a substantial public purpose in providing
capital to promote economic development and job creation in areas of economic
stagnation, unemployment, and poverty. To accomplish this purpose, the
legislature hereby creates the rural Washington loan fund and vests in the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development the authority to spend
federal funds to stimulate the economy of distressed areas.

Sec. 343. RCW 43.168.020 and 1999
c 164 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(3) "Distressed
area" means: (a) A rural county; (b) a county which has an unemployment
rate which is twenty percent above the state average for the immediately
previous three years; (c) a county that has a median household income that is
less than seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the
previous three years; (d) a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the
office of federal statistical policy and standards, United States department of
commerce, in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year
immediately preceding the year in which an application is filed under this
chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for such calendar year by twenty
percent; (e) an area within a county, which area: (i) Is composed of
contiguous census tracts; (ii) has a minimum population of five thousand
persons; (iii) has at least seventy percent of its families and unrelated
individuals with incomes below eighty percent of the county's median income for
families and unrelated individuals; and (iv) has an unemployment rate which is
at least forty percent higher than the county's unemployment rate; or (f) a
county designated as a rural natural resources impact area under RCW 43.31.601
if an application is filed by July 1, 1997. For purposes of this definition,
"families and unrelated individuals" has the same meaning that is
ascribed to that term by the federal department of housing and urban
development in its regulations authorizing action grants for economic
development and neighborhood revitalization projects.

(4) "Fund"
means the rural Washington loan fund.

(5) "Local
development organization" means a nonprofit organization which is
organized to operate within an area, demonstrates a commitment to a
long-standing effort for an economic development program, and makes a
demonstrable effort to assist in the employment of unemployed or underemployed
residents in an area.

(6) "Project"
means the establishment of a new or expanded business in an area which when
completed will provide employment opportunities. "Project" also
means the retention of an existing business in an area which when completed
will provide employment opportunities.

(7) "Rural
county" means a county with a population density of fewer that one hundred
persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial management.

Sec. 344. RCW 43.168.031 and 1995
c 399 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
development loan fund committee shall be terminated on June 30, 1994, and its
powers and duties transferred to the director of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development.

Sec. 345. RCW 43.168.040 and 1987
c 461 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the
restrictions contained in this chapter, the ((committee)) director
is authorized to approve applications of local governments for federal
community development block grant funds which the local governments would use
to make loans to finance business projects within their jurisdictions.
Applications approved by the ((committee)) director under this
chapter shall conform to applicable federal requirements and shall be
approved based upon the recommendations of the director of the department of
trade and economic development.

Sec. 346. RCW 43.168.050 and 1993
c 512 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((committee))
director may only approve an application providing a loan for a project
which the ((committee)) director finds:

(a) Will result in the
creation of employment opportunities, the maintenance of threatened employment,
or development or expansion of business ownership by minorities and women;

(b) Has been approved
by the director as conforming to federal rules and regulations governing the
spending of federal community development block grant funds;

(c) Will be of public
benefit and for a public purpose, and that the benefits, including increased or
maintained employment, improved standard of living, the employment of
disadvantaged workers, and development or expansion of business ownership by
minorities and women, will primarily accrue to residents of the area;

(d) Will probably be
successful;

(e) Would probably not
be completed without the loan because other capital or financing at feasible
terms is unavailable or the return on investment is inadequate.

(2) The ((committee))
director shall, subject to federal block grant criteria, give higher
priority to economic development projects that contain provisions for child
care.

(3) The ((committee))
director may not approve an application if it fails to provide for
adequate reporting or disclosure of financial data to the ((committee)) director.
The ((committee)) director may require an annual or other
periodic audit of the project books.

(4) The ((committee))
director may require that the project be managed in whole or in part by
a local development organization and may prescribe a management fee to be paid
to such organization by the recipient of the loan or grant.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the ((committee)) director
shall not approve any application which would result in a loan or grant in
excess of three hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(b) The ((committee))
director may approve an application which results in a loan or grant of
up to seven hundred thousand dollars if the application has been approved by
the director.

(6) The ((committee))
director shall fix the terms and rates pertaining to its loans.

(7) Should there be
more demand for loans than funds available for lending, the ((committee))
director shall provide loans for those projects which will lead to the
greatest amount of employment or benefit to a community. In determining the
"greatest amount of employment or benefit" the ((committee)) director
shall also consider the employment which would be saved by its loan and the
benefit relative to the community, not just the total number of new jobs or
jobs saved.

(8) To the extent
permitted under federal law the ((committee)) director shall
require applicants to provide for the transfer of all payments of principal and
interest on loans to the rural Washington ((state development))
loan fund created under this chapter. Under circumstances where the federal
law does not permit the ((committee)) director to require such
transfer, the ((committee)) director shall give priority to
applications where the applicants on their own volition make commitments to
provide for the transfer.

(9) The ((committee))
director shall not approve any application to finance or help finance a
shopping mall.

(10) For loans not made
to minority and women-owned businesses, the ((committee)) director
shall make at least eighty percent of the appropriated funds available to
projects located in distressed areas, and may make up to twenty percent
available to projects located in areas not designated as distressed. For loans
not made to minority and women-owned businesses, the ((committee)) director
shall not make funds available to projects located in areas not designated as
distressed if the fund's net worth is less than seven million one hundred
thousand dollars.

(11) If an objection is
raised to a project on the basis of unfair business competition, the ((committee))
director shall evaluate the potential impact of a project on similar
businesses located in the local market area. A grant may be denied by the ((committee))
director if a project is not likely to result in a net increase in
employment within a local market area.

(12) For loans to
minority and women-owned businesses who do not meet the credit criteria, the ((committee))
director may consider nontraditional credit standards to offset past
discrimination that has precluded full participation of minority or women-owned
businesses in the economy. For applicants with high potential who do not meet
the credit criteria, the ((committee)) director shall consider
developing alternative borrowing methods. For applicants denied loans due to
credit problems, the ((committee)) director shall provide
financial counseling within available resources and provide referrals to credit
rehabilitation services. In circumstances of competing applications, priority
shall be given to members of eligible groups which previously have been least
served by this fund.

Sec. 347. RCW 43.180.040 and 1995
c 399 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
established a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate
succession, to be known as the Washington state housing finance commission.
The commission is an instrumentality of the state exercising essential government
functions and, for purposes of the code, acts as a constituted authority on
behalf of the state when it issues bonds pursuant to this chapter. The
commission is a "public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

(2) The commission
shall consist of the following voting members:

(a) The state
treasurer, ex officio;

(b) The director of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, ex officio;

(c) An elected local
government official, ex officio, with experience in local housing programs, who
shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(d) A representative of
housing consumer interests, appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate;

(e) A representative of
labor interests, appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
after consultation with representatives of organized labor;

(f) A representative of
low-income persons, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(g) Five members of the
public appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, on the basis
of geographic distribution and their expertise in housing, real estate,
finance, energy efficiency, or construction, one of whom shall be appointed by
the governor as chair of the commission and who shall serve on the commission
and as chair of the commission at the pleasure of the governor.

The term of the persons
appointed by the governor, other than the chair, shall be four years from the
date of their appointment, except that the terms of three of the initial
appointees shall be for two years from the date of their appointment. The
governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year terms. An
appointee may be removed by the governor for cause pursuant to RCW 43.06.070
and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy in an appointed position by
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the department of
community development is abolished, the resulting vacancy shall be filled by a
state official who shall be appointed to the commission by the governor. If
this official occupies an office or position for which senate confirmation is
not required, then his or her appointment to the commission shall be subject to
the consent of the senate. The members of the commission shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be reimbursed, solely from the funds
of the commission, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under
this chapter, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A majority
of the commission constitutes a quorum. Designees shall be appointed in such
manner and shall exercise such powers as are specified by the rules of the
commission.

(3) The commission may
adopt an official seal and may select from its membership a vice chair, a
secretary, and a treasurer. The commission shall establish rules concerning
its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. The rules shall be
adopted in conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 348. RCW 43.180.200 and 1995
c 399 s 99 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of the
code:

(1) The legislature
reserves the right at any time to alter or change the structure, organization,
programs, or activities of the commission and to terminate the commission, so
long as the action does not impair any outstanding contracts entered into by
the commission;

(2) Any net earnings of
the commission beyond that necessary to retire its bonds and to carry out the
purposes of this chapter shall not inure to the benefit of any person other
than the state;

(3) Upon dissolution of
the commission, title to all of its remaining property shall vest in the state;

(4) The commission
constitutes the only housing finance agency of the state of Washington; and

(5) In order to take
advantage of the maximum amount of tax exempt bonds for housing financing
available pursuant to the code, any state ceiling with respect to housing shall
be allocated in accordance with the following formula:

(a) Eighty percent of
the state ceiling shall be allocated to the commission and twenty percent shall
be allocated to the other issuing authorities in the state.

(b) The allocation to
the issuing authorities other than the commission shall be distributed to such
issuing authorities in amounts as determined following public notice by the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development pursuant to
rules promulgated by it. The distribution shall be in response to applications
received from such issuing authorities and shall be based on the following
factors: (i) The amount of housing to be made available by such applicant;
(ii) the population within the jurisdiction of the applicant; (iii)
coordination with other applicable federal and state housing programs; (iv) the
likelihood of implementing the proposed financing during that year; and (v)
consistency with the plan of the commission. On or before February 1st
of each year, the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall distribute the state ceiling allocation among such issuing
authorities and any unused portion shall be added to the allocation of the
commission. Each issuing authority other than the commission shall confirm its
allocation distribution by providing to the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development no later than June 1st a copy of
an executed bond purchase contract or alternative documentation deemed
sufficient by the commission to evidence the reasonable likelihood of the
allocation distribution being fully used. Any portion of such allocation not
so confirmed shall be added to the allocation of the commission on July 1st.
Prior to July 1st, the commission shall provide written notice of the
allocation decrease to the affected issuing authority. The reallocation shall
not limit the authority of the commission to assign a portion of its allocation
pursuant to subsection (5)(c) of this section.

(c) The commission may
assign a portion of its allocation to another issuing agency.

Sec. 349. RCW 43.180.220 and 1994
c 235 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission, in
cooperation with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, and the state investment board, shall develop and implement a
housing finance program that:

(1) Provides subsidized
or unsubsidized mortgage financing for single-family home ownership, including
a single condominium unit, located in the state of Washington;

(2) Requests the state
investment board to make investments, within its policies and investment
guidelines, in mortgage-backed securities that are collateralized by loans made
within the state of Washington; and

(3) Provides flexible
loan underwriting guidelines, including but not limited to provisions that will
allow reduced downpayment requirements for the purchaser.

Sec. 350. RCW 43.185.020 and 1995
c 399 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

"Department"
means the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development.
"Director" means the director of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development.

Sec. 351. RCW 43.185A.010 and 2000
c 255 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Affordable
housing" means residential housing for rental occupancy which, as long as
the same is occupied by low-income households, requires payment of monthly
housing costs, including utilities other than telephone, of no more than thirty
percent of the family's income. The department shall adopt policies for
residential homeownership housing, occupied by low-income households, which
specify the percentage of family income that may be spent on monthly housing
costs, including utilities other than telephone, to qualify as affordable
housing.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development.

(4) "First-time
home buyer" means an individual or his or her spouse who have not owned a
home during the three-year period prior to purchase of a home.

(5) "Low-income
household" means a single person, family or unrelated persons living
together whose adjusted income is less than eighty percent of the median family
income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the project is located.

Sec. 352. RCW 43.185B.010 and 1995
c 399 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Affordable
housing" means residential housing that is rented or owned by a person or
household whose monthly housing costs, including utilities other than
telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the household's monthly income.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(4) "Nonprofit
organization" means any public or private nonprofit organization that:
(a) Is organized under federal, state, or local laws; (b) has no part of its
net earnings inuring to the benefit of any member, founder, contributor, or
individual; and (c) has among its purposes significant activities related to
the provision of decent housing that is affordable to very low-income, low-income,
or moderate-income households and special needs populations.

(5) "Regulatory
barriers to affordable housing" and "regulatory barriers" mean
any public policies (including those embodied in statutes, ordinances,
regulations, or administrative procedures or processes) required to be
identified by the state or local government in connection with its strategy
under section 105(b)(4) of the Cranston-Gonzalez national affordable housing
act (42 U.S.C. 12701 et seq.).

(6) "Tenant-based
organization" means a nonprofit organization whose governing body includes
a majority of members who reside in the housing development and are considered
low-income households.

Sec. 353. RCW 43.190.030 and 1997
c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created the
office of the state long-term care ombudsman. The department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development shall contract with a private nonprofit
organization to provide long-term care ombudsman services as specified under,
and consistent with, the federal older Americans act as amended, federal
mandates, the goals of the state, and the needs of its citizens. The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
ensure that all program and staff support necessary to enable the ombudsman to
effectively protect the interests of residents, patients, and clients of all
long-term care facilities is provided by the nonprofit organization that
contracts to provide long-term care ombudsman services. The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall adopt rules to
carry out this chapter and the long-term care ombudsman provisions of the
federal older Americans act, as amended, and applicable federal regulations.
The long-term care ombudsman program shall have the following powers and
duties:

(1) To provide services
for coordinating the activities of long-term care ombudsmen throughout the
state;

(2) Carry out such
other activities as the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development deems appropriate;

(3) Establish
procedures consistent with RCW 43.190.110 for appropriate access by long-term
care ombudsmen to long-term care facilities and patients' records, including
procedures to protect the confidentiality of the records and ensure that the
identity of any complainant or resident will not be disclosed without the
written consent of the complainant or resident, or upon court order;

(4) Establish a
statewide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze data relating to
complaints and conditions in long-term care facilities for the purpose of
identifying and resolving significant problems, with provision for submission
of such data to the department of social and health services and to the federal
department of health and human services, or its successor agency, on a regular
basis; and

(5) Establish
procedures to assure that any files maintained by ombudsman programs shall be
disclosed only at the discretion of the ombudsman having authority over the
disposition of such files, except that the identity of any complainant or
resident of a long-term care facility shall not be disclosed by such ombudsman
unless:

(a) Such complainant or
resident, or the complainant's or resident's legal representative, consents in
writing to such disclosure; or

(b) Such disclosure is
required by court order.

Sec. 354. RCW 43.270.020 and 2001
c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established in the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development a grant program to provide incentive for and support for
communities to develop targeted and coordinated strategies to reduce the
incidence and impact of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence.

(2) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall make awards,
subject to funds appropriated by the legislature, under the following terms:

(a) Starting July 1,
2001, funds will be available to countywide programs through a formula
developed by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development in consultation with program contractors, which will take into
consideration county population size.

(b) In order to be
eligible for consideration, applicants must demonstrate, at a minimum:

(i) That the community
has developed and is committed to carrying out a coordinated strategy of
prevention, treatment, and law enforcement activities;

(ii) That the community
has considered research-based theory when developing its strategy;

(iii) That proposals
submitted for funding are based on a local assessment of need and address
specific objectives contained in a coordinated strategy of prevention,
treatment, and law enforcement against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse,
or violence;

(iv) Evidence of active
participation in preparation of the proposal and specific commitments to
implementing the community-wide agenda by leadership from education, law
enforcement, local government, tribal government, and treatment entities in the
community, and the opportunity for meaningful involvement from others such as
neighborhood and citizen groups, businesses, human service, health and job
training organizations, and other key elements of the community, particularly
those whose responsibilities in law enforcement, treatment, prevention,
education, or other community efforts provide direct, ongoing contact with
substance abusers or those who exhibit violent behavior, or those at risk for
alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violent behavior;

(v) Evidence of
additional local resources committed to the applicant's strategy totaling at
least twenty-five percent of funds awarded under this section. These resources
may consist of public or private funds, donated goods or services, and other
measurable commitments, including in-kind contributions such as volunteer
services, materials, supplies, physical facilities, or a combination thereof;
and

(vi) That the funds
applied for, if received, will not be used to replace funding for existing
activities.

(c) At a minimum, grant
applications must include the following:

(i) A definition of
geographic area;

(ii) A needs assessment
describing the extent and impact of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, and
violence in the community, including an explanation of those who are most
severely impacted and those most at risk of substance abuse or violent
behavior;

(iii) An explanation of
the community-wide strategy for prevention, treatment, and law enforcement
activities related to alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence, with
particular attention to those who are most severely impacted and/or those most
at risk of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violent behavior;

(iv) An explanation of
who was involved in development of the strategy and what specific commitments
have been made to carry it out;

(v) Identification of
existing prevention, education, treatment, and law enforcement resources
committed by the applicant, including financial and other support, and an
explanation of how the applicant's strategy involves and builds on the efforts
of existing organizations or coalitions that have been carrying out community
efforts against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence;

(vi) Identification of
activities that address specific objectives in the strategy for which
additional resources are needed;

(vii) Identification of
additional local resources, including public or private funds, donated goods or
services, and other measurable commitments, that have been committed to the
activities identified in (c)(vi) of this subsection;

(viii) Identification
of activities that address specific objectives in the strategy for which
funding is requested;

(ix) For each activity
for which funding is requested, an explanation in sufficient detail to
demonstrate:

(A) Feasibility through
deliberative design, specific objectives, and a realistic plan for
implementation;

(B) A rationale for how
this activity will achieve measurable results and how it will be evaluated;

(C) That funds
requested are necessary and appropriate to effectively carry out the activity;
and

(x) Identification of a
contracting agent meeting state requirements for each activity proposed for
funding.

Each contracting agent
must execute a written agreement with its local community mobilization advisory
board that reflects the duties and powers of each party.

(3) Activities that may
be funded through this grant program include those that:

(a) Prevent alcohol,
tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence through educational efforts,
development of positive alternatives, intervention with high-risk groups, and
other prevention strategies;

(b) Support effective
treatment by increasing access to and availability of treatment opportunities,
particularly for underserved or highly impacted populations, developing
aftercare and support mechanisms, and other strategies to increase the
availability and effectiveness of treatment;

(c) Provide meaningful
consequences for participation in illegal activity and promote safe and healthy
communities through support of law enforcement strategies;

(d) Create or build on
efforts by existing community programs, coordinate their efforts, and develop
cooperative efforts or other initiatives to make most effective use of
resources to carry out the community's strategy against alcohol, tobacco, or
other drug abuse, or violence; and

(e) Other activities
that demonstrate both feasibility and a rationale for how the activity will
achieve measurable results in the strategy against alcohol, tobacco, or other
drug abuse, or violence.

Sec. 355. RCW 43.270.070 and 2001
c 48 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall ask communities for
suggestions on state practices, policies, and priorities that would help
communities implement their strategies against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug
abuse, or violence. The department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall review and respond to those suggestions making necessary
changes where feasible, making recommendations to the legislature where
appropriate, and providing an explanation as to why suggested changes cannot be
accomplished, if the suggestions cannot be acted upon.

Sec. 356. RCW 43.270.080 and 2001
c 48 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development may receive such gifts,
grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time
to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of RCW
43.270.010 through 43.270.080 and expend the same or any income therefrom
according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 357. RCW 43.280.011 and 1996
c 123 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
sexual assault services advisory committee issued a report to the department of
community, trade, and economic development and the department of social and
health services in June of 1995. The committee made several recommendations to
improve the delivery of services to victims of sexual abuse and assault: (1)
Consolidate the administration and funding of sexual assault and abuse services
in one agency instead of splitting those functions between the department of
social and health services and the department of community, trade, and economic
development; (2) adopt a funding allocation plan to pool all funds for sexual assault
services and to distribute them across the state to ensure the delivery of core
and specialized services; (3) establish service, data collection, and
management standards and outcome measurements for recipients of grants; and (4)
create a data collection system to gather pertinent data concerning the
delivery of sexual assault services to victims.

The legislature
approves the recommendations of the advisory committee and consolidates the
functions and funding for sexual assault services in the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development to implement the advisory
committee's recommendations.

The legislature does
not intend to effect a reduction in service levels within available funding by
transferring department of social and health services' powers and duties to the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development. At a
minimum, the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall distribute the same percentage of the services it provides
victims of sexual assault and abuse, pursuant to RCW 43.280.020, 70.125.080,
and 74.14B.060, to children as were distributed to children through these
programs in fiscal year 1996.

Sec. 358. RCW 43.280.020 and 1996
c 123 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

There is established in
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development a grant
program to enhance the funding for treating the victims of sex offenders.
Activities that can be funded through this grant program are limited to those
that:

(1) Provide effective
treatment to victims of sex offenders;

(2) Increase access to
and availability of treatment for victims of sex offenders, particularly if
from underserved populations; and

(3) Create or build on
efforts by existing community programs, coordinate those efforts, or develop
cooperative efforts or other initiatives to make the most effective use of
resources to provide treatment services to these victims.

Funding
shall be given to those applicants that emphasize providing stable,
victim-focused sexual abuse services and possess the qualifications to provide
core services, as defined in RCW 70.125.030. Funds for specialized services,
as defined in RCW 70.125.030, shall be disbursed through the request for
proposal or request for qualifications process.

Sec. 359. RCW 43.280.060 and 1996
c 123 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds
appropriated by the legislature, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development shall make awards under the grant program
established by RCW 43.280.020.

(2) To aid the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development in making its funding
determinations, the department shall form a peer review committee comprised of
individuals who are knowledgeable or experienced in the management or delivery
of treatment services to victims of sex offenders. The peer review committee
shall advise the department on the extent to which each eligible applicant
meets the treatment and management standards, as developed by the department.
The department shall consider this advice in making awards.

(3)
Activities funded under this section may be considered for funding in future
years, but shall be considered under the same terms and criteria as new
activities. Funding under this chapter shall not constitute an obligation by
the state of Washington to provide ongoing funding.

Sec. 360. RCW 43.280.070 and 1995
c 399 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may receive
such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of this chapter and expend the same or any income therefrom according
to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 361. RCW 43.280.080 and 1995
c 241 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of crime
victims advocacy is established in the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development. The office shall assist communities in planning
and implementing services for crime victims, advocate on behalf of crime
victims in obtaining needed services and resources, and advise local and state
governments on practices, policies, and priorities that impact crime victims.
In addition, the office shall administer grant programs for sexual assault
treatment and prevention services, as authorized in this chapter.

Sec. 362. RCW 43.280.090 and 1995
c 269 s 2102 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may
establish ad hoc advisory committees, as necessary, to obtain advice and
guidance regarding the office of crime victims advocacy program.

Sec. 363. RCW 43.310.020 and 1995
c 399 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development may recommend existing
programs or contract with either school districts or community organizations,
or both, through a request for proposal process for the development,
administration, and implementation in the county of community-based gang risk
prevention and intervention pilot programs.

(2) Proposals by the
school district for gang risk prevention and intervention pilot program grant
funding shall begin with school years no sooner than the 1994-95 session, and
last for a duration of two years.

(3) The school district
or community organization proposal shall include:

(a) A description of
the program goals, activities, and curriculum. The description of the program
goals shall include a list of measurable objectives for the purpose of evaluation
by the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development. To
the extent possible, proposals shall contain empirical data on current
problems, such as drop-out rates and occurrences of violence on and off campus
by school-age individuals.

(b) A description of
the individual school or schools and the geographic area to be affected by the
program.

(c) A demonstration of
broad-based support for the program from business and community organizations.

(d) A clear description
of the experience, expertise, and other qualifications of the community
organizations to conduct an effective prevention and intervention program in
cooperation with a school or a group of schools.

(e) A proposed budget
for expenditure of the grant.

(4) Grants awarded
under this section may not be used for the administrative costs of the school
district or the individual school.

Sec. 364. RCW 43.330.110 and 1993
c 280 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community development shall maintain an active effort to help communities,
families, and individuals build and maintain capacity to meet housing needs in
Washington state. The department shall facilitate partnerships among the many
entities related to housing issues and leverage a variety of resources and
services to produce comprehensive, cost-effective, and innovative housing
solutions.

(2) The department
shall assist in the production, development, rehabilitation, and operation of
owner-occupied or rental housing for very low, low, and moderate-income
persons; operate programs to assist home ownership, offer housing services, and
provide emergency, transitional, and special needs housing services; and
qualify as a participating state agency for all programs of the federal
department of housing and urban development or its successor. The department
shall develop or assist local governments in developing housing plans required
by the state or federal government.

(3) The department
shall coordinate and administer energy assistance and residential energy
conservation and rehabilitation programs of the federal and state government
through nonprofit organizations, local governments, and housing authorities.

Sec. 365. RCW 43.330.130 and 1993
c 280 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community development shall coordinate services to communities that are
directed to the poor and disadvantaged through private and public nonprofit
organizations and units of general purpose local governments. The department
shall coordinate these programs using, to the extent possible, integrated case
management methods, with other community and economic development efforts that
promote self-sufficiency.

(2) These services may
include, but not be limited to, comprehensive education services to preschool
children from low-income families, providing for human service needs and
advocacy, promoting volunteerism and citizen service as a means for
accomplishing local community and economic development goals, coordinating and
providing emergency food assistance to distribution centers and needy
individuals, and providing for human service needs through community-based
organizations.

(3) The department
shall provide local communities and at-risk individuals with programs that
provide community protection and assist in developing strategies to reduce
substance abuse. The department shall administer programs that develop
collaborative approaches to prevention, intervention, and interdiction
programs. The department shall administer programs that support crime victims,
address youth and domestic violence problems, provide indigent defense for
low-income persons, border town disputes, and administer family services and
programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025.

(((4) The department
shall provide fire protection and emergency management services to support and
strengthen local capacity for controlling risk to life, property, and community
vitality that may result from fires, emergencies, and disasters.))

Sec. 366. RCW 43.330.210 and 2000
c 120 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The developmental
disabilities endowment governing board is established to design and administer
the developmental disabilities endowment. To the extent funds are appropriated
for this purpose, the director of the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development shall provide staff and administrative support to
the governing board.

(1) The governing board
shall consist of seven members as follows:

(a) Three of the
members, who shall be appointed by the governor, shall be persons who have
demonstrated expertise and leadership in areas such as finance, actuarial
science, management, business, or public policy.

(b) Three members of
the board, who shall be appointed by the governor, shall be persons who have
demonstrated expertise and leadership in areas such as business, developmental
disabilities service design, management, or public policy, and shall be family
members of persons with developmental disabilities.

(c) The seventh member
of the board, who shall serve as chair of the board, shall be appointed by the
remaining six members of the board.

(2) Members of the
board shall serve terms of four years and may be appointed for successive terms
of four years at the discretion of the appointing authority. However, the
governor may stagger the terms of the initial six members of the board so that
approximately one-fourth of the members' terms expire each year.

(3) Members of the
board shall be compensated for their service under RCW 43.03.240 and shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) The board shall
meet periodically as specified by the call of the chair, or a majority of the
board.

(5) Members of the
governing board and the state investment board shall not be considered an
insurer of the funds or assets of the endowment trust fund or the individual
trust accounts. Neither of these two boards or their members shall be liable
for the action or ((inactions [inaction])) inaction of the other.

(6) Members of the
governing board and the state investment board are not liable to the state, to
the fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities as members,
whether ministerial or discretionary, except for willful dishonesty or
intentional violations of law. The department and the state investment board,
respectively, may purchase liability insurance for members.

Sec. 367. RCW 46.12.295 and 1995 c
399 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((licensing))
community, trade, and economic development shall transfer all titling
functions pertaining to mobile homes to the housing division of the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development by July 1, ((1991))
2001. The department of ((licensing)) community, trade, and
economic development shall transfer all books, records, files, and
documents pertaining to mobile home titling to the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development. The directors of the departments may
immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that ((chapter 176,
Laws of 1990)) this section is implemented ((on June 7, 1990))
July 1, 2001.

Sec. 368. RCW 47.06C.090 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 2 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature expects
the department to continue its efforts to improve training and compliance. The
department shall:

(1) Provide training in
environmental procedures and permit requirements for those responsible for
project delivery activities;

(2) Require wetland
mitigation sites to be designed by a qualified interdisciplinary team that
meets training requirements developed by the department's environmental affairs
office in consultation with the department of ecology. Environmental
mitigation site improvements must have oversight by environmental staff;

(3) Develop an
environmental compliance data system to track all permit conditions;

(4) Report all
noncompliance activities to applicable agencies of jurisdiction along with a
remedy plan;

(5) Fund the
departments of ecology, natural resources, and fish and wildlife, operating
under their permit-granting authority to conduct audits of the department's
permit drafting and compliance activities. The department of ecology must
collate the audits in an annual report to the legislature;

(6) Seek federal
funding for dedicated technical staff at federal permit decision-making
agencies and for state costs associated with implementation of this chapter;

(7) Fund dedicated
technical staff at federal permit decision-making entities, as appropriate, and
the state departments of ecology, natural resources, community((, trade, and
economic)) development, and fish and wildlife to implement the requirements
of this chapter;

(8) Fund a technical
specialist at the Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission and the Columbia River
Intertribal Fisheries Commission for the purpose of implementing this chapter;

(9) Reimburse local
jurisdictions for costs associated with local participation on the committee
and technical subcommittees.

Sec. 369. RCW 47.12.064 and 1995 c
399 s 121 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing
for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in
RCW 43.63A.510 (as recodified by this act). The inventory shall include
the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the
property. The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development by November
1, 1993, and every November 1st thereafter.

(2) By
November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, the department shall purge
the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for the
development of affordable housing. The department shall include an updated
listing of real property that has become available since the last update. As
used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or
buildings and land.

Sec. 370. RCW 47.50.090 and 1995 c
399 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall develop, adopt, and maintain an access control classification system for
all routes on the state highway system, the purpose of which shall be to
provide for the implementation and continuing applications of the provision of
this chapter.

(2) The principal
component of the access control classification system shall be access
management standards, the purpose of which shall be to provide specific minimum
standards to be adhered to in the planning for and approval of access to state highways.

(3) The control
classification system shall be developed consistent with the following:

(a) The department
shall, no later than January 1, 1993, adopt rules setting forth procedures
governing the implementation of the access control classification system
required by this chapter. The rule shall provide for input from the entities
described in (b) of this subsection as well as for public meetings to discuss
the access control classification system. Nothing in this chapter shall affect
the validity of the department's existing or subsequently adopted rules
concerning access to the state highway system. Such rules shall remain in
effect until repealed or replaced by the rules required by this chapter.

(b) The access control
classification system shall be developed in cooperation with counties, cities
and towns, the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, regional transportation planning organizations, and other local
governmental entities, and for city streets designated as state highways
pursuant to chapter 47.24 RCW, adopted with the concurrence of the city design
standards committee.

(c) The rule required
by this section shall provide that assignment of a road segment to a specific
access category be made in consideration of the following criteria:

(i) Local land use
plans and zoning, as set forth in comprehensive plans;

(ii) The current
functional classification as well as potential future functional classification
of each road on the state highway system;

(iii) Existing and
projected traffic volumes;

(iv) Existing and
projected state, local, and metropolitan planning organization transportation
plans and needs;

(v) Drainage
requirements;

(vi) The character of
lands adjoining the highway;

(vii) The type and
volume of traffic requiring access;

(viii) Other
operational aspects of access;

(ix) The availability
of reasonable access by way of county roads and city streets to a state
highway; and

(x) The cumulative
effect of existing and projected connections on the state highway system's
ability to provide for the safe and efficient movement of people and goods
within the state.

(d) Access management
standards shall include, but not be limited to, connection location standards,
safety factors, design and construction standards, desired levels of service,
traffic control devices, and effective maintenance of the roads. The standards
shall also contain minimum requirements for the spacing of connections,
intersecting streets, roads, and highways.

(e) An access control category
shall be assigned to each segment of the state highway system by July 1, 1993.

Sec. 371. RCW 53.36.030 and 1996 c
66 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, a port district may at any time contract
indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue general
obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, together with any existing
indebtedness of the district not authorized by the voters, of one-fourth of one
percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.

(b) Port districts
having less than eight hundred million dollars in value of taxable property
during 1991 may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for port
district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding
an amount, combined with existing indebtedness of the district not authorized
by the voters, of three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable
property in the district. Prior to contracting for any indebtedness authorized
by this subsection (1)(b), the port district must have a comprehensive plan for
harbor improvements or industrial development and a long-term financial plan
approved by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development. The department of community((, trade, and economic))
development is immune from any liability for its part in reviewing or approving
port district's improvement or development plans, or financial plans. Any
indebtedness authorized by this subsection (1)(b) may be used only to acquire
or construct a facility, and, prior to contracting for such indebtedness, the
port district must have a lease contract for a minimum of five years for the
facility to be acquired or constructed by the debt.

(2) With the assent of
three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at a general or special port election
called for that purpose, a port district may contract indebtedness or borrow
money for district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor
provided the total indebtedness of the district at any such time shall not
exceed three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the
district.

(3) In addition to the
indebtedness authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, port
districts having less than two hundred million dollars in value of taxable
property and operating a municipal airport may at any time contract
indebtedness or borrow money for airport capital improvement purposes and may
issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an additional one-eighth
of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district without
authorization by the voters; and, with the assent of three-fifths of the voters
voting thereon at a general or special port election called for that purpose,
may contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport capital improvement
purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor for an additional
three-eighths of one percent provided the total indebtedness of the district
for all port purposes at any such time shall not exceed one and one-fourth
percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.

(4) Any port district
may issue general district bonds evidencing any indebtedness, payable at any
time not exceeding fifty years from the date of the bonds. Any contract for
indebtedness or borrowed money authorized by RCW 53.36.030(1)(b) shall not
exceed twenty-five years. The bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

(5) Elections required
under this section shall be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050.

(6) For the purpose of
this section, "indebtedness of the district" shall not include any
debt of a countywide district with a population less than twenty-five hundred
people when the debt is secured by a mortgage on property leased to the federal
government; and the term "value of the taxable property" shall have
the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

(7) This section does
not apply to a loan made under a loan agreement under chapter 39.69 RCW, and a
computation of indebtedness under this chapter must exclude the amount of a
loan under such a loan agreement.

Sec. 372. RCW 54.16.285 and 1995 c
399 s 144 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A district
providing utility service for residential space heating shall not terminate
such utility service between November 15th through March 15th if
the customer:

(a) Notifies the
utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security deposit. This
notice should be provided within five business days of receiving a payment overdue
notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the customer fails to
notify the utility within five business days and service is terminated, the
customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and fulfilling the
requirements of this section, receive the protections of this chapter;

(b) Provides
self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to a grantee
of the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
which administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee
shall determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed
for eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under
42 U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information provided in the
self-certification;

(c) Has applied for
home heating assistance from applicable government and private sector
organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied to the
current bill and future utility bills;

(d) Has applied for
low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other appropriate agency
if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e) Agrees to a payment
plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan will be designed both
to pay the past due bill by the following October 15th and to pay for
continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the following
October 15th, the customer shall not be eligible for protections under
this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require
monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income
plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and
thereafter during November 15th through March 15th. A customer
may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in
default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent of monthly
income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is
made and thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the customer
subsequent to implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact the
utility to reformulate the plan; and

(f) Agrees to pay the
moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(2) The utility shall:

(a) Include in any
notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be subject to
termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b) Assist the customer
in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c) Be authorized to
transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has established a
plan under this section moves from one residence to another within the same
utility service area;

(d) Be permitted to
disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment program.
Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices authorized by
law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this section. Customers who
qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their payment plans
and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections afforded
under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by paying all
amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of the applicable
payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is reconnected; and

(e) Advise the customer
in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will restore service if
the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other requirements of this
section.

(3) All districts
providing utility service for residential space heating shall offer residential
customers the option of a budget billing or equal payment plan. The budget
billing or equal payment plan shall be offered low-income customers eligible
under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance prepared in accordance
with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without limiting availability to certain months of
the year, without regard to the length of time the customer has occupied the
premises, and without regard to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of
the premises occupied.

(4) An
agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written, shall
not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

Sec. 373. RCW 54.52.010 and 1995 c
399 s 145 are each amended to read as follows:

A public utility
district may include along with, or as part of its regular customer billings, a
request for voluntary contributions to assist qualified low-income residential
customers of the district in paying their electricity bills. All funds
received by the district in response to such requests shall be transmitted to
the grantee of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development which administers federally funded energy assistance programs for
the state in the district's service area or to a charitable organization within
the district's service area. All such funds shall be used solely to supplement
assistance to low-income residential customers of the district in paying their
electricity bills. The grantee or charitable organization shall be responsible
to determine which of the district's customers are qualified for low-income
assistance and the amount of assistance to be provided to those who are
qualified.

Sec. 374. RCW 54.52.020 and 1995 c
399 s 146 are each amended to read as follows:

All assistance provided
under this chapter shall be disbursed by the grantee or charitable
organization. Where possible the public utility district will be paid on
behalf of the customer by the grantee or the charitable organization. When
direct vendor payment is not feasible, a check will be issued jointly payable
to the customer and the public utility district. The availability of funds for
assistance to a district's low-income customers as a result of voluntary
contributions shall not reduce the amount of assistance for which the
district's customers are eligible under the federally funded energy assistance programs
administered by the grantee of the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development within the district's service area. The grantee or
charitable organization shall provide the district with a quarterly report on
January 15th, April 15th, July 15th, and October 15th which includes
information concerning the total amount of funds received from the district,
the names of all recipients of assistance from these funds, the amount received
by each recipient, and the amount of funds received from the district currently
on hand and available for future low-income assistance.

Sec. 375. RCW 57.46.010 and 1996 c
230 s 1401 are each amended to read as follows:

A district may include
along with, or as part of its regular customer billings, a request for
voluntary contributions to assist qualified low-income residential customers of
the district in paying their district bills. All funds received by the
district in response to such requests shall be transmitted to the grantee of
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development which
administers federally funded energy assistance programs for the state in the
district's service area or to a charitable organization within the district's
service area. All such funds shall be used solely to supplement assistance to
low-income residential customers of the district in paying their district
bills. The grantee or charitable organization shall be responsible to
determine which of the district's customers are qualified for low-income
assistance and the amount of assistance to be provided to those who are
qualified.

Sec. 376. RCW 57.46.020 and 1996 c
230 s 1402 are each amended to read as follows:

All assistance provided
under this chapter shall be disbursed by the grantee or charitable
organization. Where possible the district shall be paid on behalf of the
customer by the grantee or the charitable organization. When direct vendor
payment is not feasible, a check shall be issued jointly payable to the
customer and the district. The availability of funds for assistance to a
district's low-income customers as a result of voluntary contributions shall
not reduce the amount of assistance for which the district's customers are
eligible under the federally funded energy assistance programs administered by
the grantee of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development within the district's service area. The grantee or charitable
organization shall provide the district with a quarterly report on January
15th, April 15th, July 15th, and October 15th which includes information
concerning the total amount of funds received from the district, the names of
all recipients of assistance from these funds, the amount received by each recipient,
and the amount of funds received from the district currently on hand and
available for future low-income assistance.

Sec. 377. RCW 59.18.440 and 1997 c
452 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any city, town,
county, or municipal corporation that is required to develop a comprehensive
plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) is authorized to require, after reasonable notice
to the public and a public hearing, property owners to provide their portion of
reasonable relocation assistance to low-income tenants upon the demolition,
substantial rehabilitation whether due to code enforcement or any other reason,
or change of use of residential property, or upon the removal of use
restrictions in an assisted-housing development. No city, town, county, or
municipal corporation may require property owners to provide relocation
assistance to low-income tenants, as defined in this chapter, upon the
demolition, substantial rehabilitation, upon the change of use of residential
property, or upon the removal of use restrictions in an assisted-housing
development, except as expressly authorized herein or when authorized or
required by state or federal law. As used in this section, "assisted
housing development" means a multifamily rental housing development that
either receives government assistance and is defined as federally assisted
housing in RCW 59.28.020, or that receives other federal, state, or local
government assistance and is subject to use restrictions.

(2) As used in this section,
"low-income tenants" means tenants whose combined total income per
dwelling unit is at or below fifty percent of the median income, adjusted for
family size, in the county where the tenants reside.

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall adopt rules
defining county median income in accordance with the definitions promulgated by
the federal department of housing and urban development.

(3) A requirement that
property owners provide relocation assistance shall include the amounts of such
assistance to be provided to low-income tenants. In determining such amounts,
the jurisdiction imposing the requirement shall evaluate, and receive public
testimony on, what relocation expenses displaced tenants would reasonably incur
in that jurisdiction including:

(a) Actual physical
moving costs and expenses;

(b) Advance payments
required for moving into a new residence such as the cost of first and last
month's rent and security and damage deposits;

(c) Utility connection
fees and deposits; and

(d) Anticipated
additional rent and utility costs in the residence for one year after
relocation.

(4)(a) Relocation
assistance provided to low-income tenants under this section shall not exceed
two thousand dollars for each dwelling unit displaced by actions of the
property owner under subsection (1) of this section. A city, town, county, or
municipal corporation may make future annual adjustments to the maximum amount
of relocation assistance required under this subsection in order to reflect any
changes in the housing component of the consumer price index as published by
the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics.

(b) The property
owner's portion of any relocation assistance provided to low-income tenants
under this section shall not exceed one-half of the required relocation
assistance under (a) of this subsection in cash or services.

(c) The portion of
relocation assistance not covered by the property owner under (b) of this
subsection shall be paid by the city, town, county, or municipal corporation
authorized to require relocation assistance under subsection (1) of this
section. The relocation assistance may be paid from proceeds collected from
the excise tax imposed under RCW 82.46.010.

(5) A city, town, county,
or municipal corporation requiring the provision of relocation assistance under
this section shall adopt policies, procedures, or regulations to implement such
requirement. Such policies, procedures, or regulations shall include
provisions for administrative hearings to resolve disputes between tenants and
property owners relating to relocation assistance or unlawful detainer actions
during relocation, and shall require a decision within thirty days of a request
for a hearing by either a tenant or property owner.

Judicial review of an
administrative hearing decision relating to relocation assistance may be had by
filing a petition, within ten days of the decision, in the superior court in
the county where the residential property is located. Judicial review shall be
confined to the record of the administrative hearing and the court may reverse
the decision only if the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions, or
decision is:

(a) In violation of
constitutional provisions;

(b) In excess of the authority
or jurisdiction of the administrative hearing officer;

(c) Made upon unlawful
procedure or otherwise is contrary to law; or

(d) Arbitrary and
capricious.

(6) Any city, town,
county, or municipal corporation may require relocation assistance, under the
terms of this section, for otherwise eligible tenants whose living arrangements
are exempted from the provisions of this chapter under RCW 59.18.040(3) and if
the living arrangement is considered to be a rental or lease not defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.

(7)(a) Persons who move
from a dwelling unit prior to the application by the owner of the dwelling unit
for any governmental permit necessary for the demolition, substantial
rehabilitation, or change of use of residential property or prior to any
notification or filing required for condominium conversion shall not be
entitled to the assistance authorized by this section.

(b) Persons who move
into a dwelling unit after the application for any necessary governmental
permit or after any required condominium conversion notification or filing
shall not be entitled to the assistance authorized by this section if such
persons receive written notice from the property owner prior to taking
possession of the dwelling unit that specifically describes the activity or
condition that may result in their temporary or permanent displacement and
advises them of their ineligibility for relocation assistance.

Sec. 378. RCW 59.21.010 and 1998 c
124 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Director" means the director of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3) "Fund"
means the mobile home park relocation fund established under RCW 59.21.050.

(4) "Mobile home
park" or "park" means real property that is rented or held out
for rent to others for the placement of two or more mobile homes for the
primary purpose of production of income, except where the real property is
rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only and is not
intended for year-round occupancy.

(5)
"Landlord" or "park-owner" means the owner of the mobile
home park that is being closed at the time relocation assistance is provided.

(6)
"Relocate" means to remove the mobile home from the mobile home park
being closed.

(7) "Relocation
assistance" means the monetary assistance provided under this chapter.

Sec. 379. RCW 59.22.020 and 1995 c
399 s 155 are each amended to read as follows:

The following
definitions shall apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise:

(1) "Account"
means the mobile home affairs account created under RCW 59.22.070.

(2)
"Affordable" means that, where feasible, low-income residents should
not pay more than thirty percent of their monthly income for housing costs.

(3) "Conversion
costs" includes the cost of acquiring the mobile home park, the costs of
planning and processing the conversion, the costs of any needed repairs or
rehabilitation, and any expenditures required by a government agency or lender
for the project.

(4)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(5) "Fee"
means the mobile home title transfer fee imposed under RCW 59.22.080.

(6) "Fund" or
"park purchase account" means the mobile home park purchase account
created pursuant to RCW 59.22.030.

(7) "Housing
costs" means the total cost of owning, occupying, and maintaining a mobile
home and a lot or space in a mobile home park.

(8) "Individual
interest in a mobile home park" means any interest which is fee ownership
or a lesser interest which entitles the holder to occupy a lot or space in a
mobile home park for a period of not less than either fifteen years or the life
of the holder. Individual interests in a mobile home park include, but are not
limited to, the following:

(a) Ownership of a lot
or space in a mobile home park or subdivision;

(b) A membership or
shares in a stock cooperative, or a limited equity housing cooperative; or

(c) Membership in a
nonprofit mutual benefit corporation which owns, operates, or owns and operates
the mobile home park.

(9) "Low-income
resident" means an individual or household who resided in the mobile home
park prior to application for a loan pursuant to this chapter and with an
annual income at or below eighty percent of the median income for the county of
standard metropolitan statistical area of residence. Net worth shall be
considered in the calculation of income with the exception of the resident's
mobile/manufactured home which is used as their primary residence.

(10) "Low-income
spaces" means those spaces in a mobile home park operated by a resident
organization which are occupied by low-income residents.

(11) "Mobile home
park" means a mobile home park, as defined in RCW 59.20.030(((4))),
or a manufactured home park subdivision as defined by RCW 59.20.030(((6)))
created by the conversion to resident ownership of a mobile home park.

(12) "Resident
organization" means a group of mobile home park residents who have formed
a nonprofit corporation, cooperative corporation, or other entity or
organization for the purpose of acquiring the mobile home park in which they
reside and converting the mobile home park to resident ownership. The
membership of a resident organization shall include at least two-thirds of the
households residing in the mobile home park at the time of application for
assistance from the department.

(13) "Resident
ownership" means, depending on the context, either the ownership, by a
resident organization, as defined in this section, of an interest in a mobile
home park which entitles the resident organization to control the operations of
the mobile home park for a term of no less than fifteen years, or the ownership
of individual interests in a mobile home park, or both.

(14)
"Landlord" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW 59.20.030.

(15) "Manufactured
housing" means residences constructed on one or more chassis for transportation,
and which bear an insignia issued by a state or federal regulatory agency
indication compliance with all applicable construction standards of the United
States department of housing and urban development.

(16) "Mobile
home" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW 46.04.302.

(17) "Mobile home
lot" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW 59.20.030.

(18) "Tenant"
means a person who rents a mobile home lot for a term of one month or longer
and owns the mobile home on the lot.

Sec. 380. RCW 59.22.090 and 1998 c
245 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A manufactured
housing task force is established to study and make recommendations concerning
the structure state government should use to regulate manufactured housing in
this state. In conducting this study, the task force shall review the
structures used in other states, including those states with a commission
structure. The task force shall consider the report prepared by the department
of licensing, the department of labor and industries, and the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development on consolidating mobile
home-related functions in conducting its study. The task force may not
consider any form of mobile home rent control, but shall consider mobile home
park siting and density regulatory issues.

(2) The task force
shall terminate on December 31, 1992.

(3) The task force
shall consist of the following members:

(a) Two members of the
house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, from different political caucuses;

(b) Two members of the
senate appointed by the president of the senate, from different political
caucuses;

(c) Two members who
represent mobile home park owners, appointed by the governor;

(d) Two members who
represent mobile home owners, appointed by the governor;

(e) One member who
represents mobile home manufacturers, appointed by the governor;

(f) One member who
represents mobile home dealers, appointed by the governor;

(g) One member who
represents mobile home transporters, appointed by the governor;

(h) One member who
represents local building officials, appointed by the governor;

(i) One member who is
either an elected or appointed government official of a county with a
population of one hundred thousand or more persons, appointed by the governor;

(j) One member who is
either an elected or appointed government official of a county with a
population of less than one hundred thousand persons, appointed by the governor;

(k) One member who is
either an elected or appointed government official of a city with a population
of thirty-five thousand persons, appointed by the governor;

(l) One member who is
either an elected or appointed government official of a city with a population
of less than thirty-five thousand persons, appointed by the governor;

(m) One member who
represents local health officials, appointed by the governor; and

(n) The director, or
the director's designee from the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, the department of licensing, the department of
labor and industries, and the attorney general's office. The designees shall
be nonvoting, ex officio members of the task force.

(4) The members of the
task force shall select the chair or co-chairs of the task force.

(5) Staff assistance
for the task force will be provided by legislative staff and staff from the
agencies or offices listed in subsection (3)(n) of this section.

Sec. 381. RCW 59.24.020 and 1995 c
399 s 157 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall establish the
rental security deposit guarantee program. Through this program the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall provide grants
and technical assistance to local governments or nonprofit corporations,
including local housing authorities as defined in RCW 35.82.030, who operate
emergency housing shelters or transitional housing programs. The grants are to
be used for the payment of residential rental security deposits under this
chapter. The technical assistance is to help the local government or nonprofit
corporation apply for grants and carry out the program. In order to be
eligible for grants under this program, the recipient local government or
nonprofit corporation shall provide fifteen percent of the total amount needed
for the security deposit. The security deposit may include last month's rent
where such rent is required as a normal practice by the landlord.

(2) The grants and
matching funds shall be placed by the recipient local government or nonprofit
corporation in a revolving loan fund and deposited in a bank or savings
institution in an account that is separate from all other funds of the
recipient. The funds and interest earned on these funds shall be utilized only
as collateral to guarantee the payment of a security deposit required by a
residential rental property owner as a condition for entering into a rental
agreement with a prospective tenant.

(3) Prospective tenants
who are eligible to participate in the rental security deposit guarantee
program shall be limited to homeless persons or families who are residing in an
emergency shelter or transitional housing operated by a local government or a
nonprofit corporation, or to families who are temporarily residing in a park,
car, or are otherwise without adequate shelter. The local government or
nonprofit corporation shall make a determination regarding the person's or
family's eligibility to participate in this program and a determination that a
local rental unit is available for occupation. A determination of eligibility
shall include, but is not limited to: (a) A determination that the person or
family is homeless or is in transitional housing; (b) a verification of income
and that the person or family can reasonably make the monthly rental payment;
and (c) a determination that the person or family does not have the financial
resources to make the rental security deposit.

Sec. 382. RCW 59.24.050 and 1995 c
399 s 158 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development may adopt rules to
implement this chapter, including but not limited to: (1) The eligibility of
and the application process for local governments and nonprofit corporations;
(2) the criteria by which grants and technical assistance shall be provided to
local governments and nonprofit corporations; and (3) the criteria local
governments and nonprofit corporations shall use in entering into contracts
with tenants and rental property owners.

Sec. 383. RCW 59.24.060 and 1995 c
399 s 159 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development may receive such gifts,
grants, or endowments from public or private sources, as may be made from time
to time, in trust or otherwise, to be used by the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development for its programs, including the rental
security deposit guarantee program. Funds from the housing trust fund, chapter
43.185 RCW, up to one hundred thousand dollars, may be used for the rental
security deposit guarantee program by the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development, local governments, and nonprofit organizations,
provided all the requirements of this chapter and chapter 43.185 RCW are met.

Sec. 384. RCW 59.28.040 and 2000 c
255 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in
RCW 59.28.030, all owners of federally assisted housing shall, at least twelve
months before the expiration of the rental assistance contract or prepayment of
a mortgage or loan, serve a written notice of the anticipated expiration or
prepayment date on each tenant household residing in the housing, on the clerk
of the city, or county if in an unincorporated area, in which the property is
located, on any public housing agency that would be responsible for administering
tenant-based rental assistance to persons who would otherwise be displaced from
this housing, and on the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, by regular and certified mail. All owners of federally assisted
housing shall also serve written notice of the anticipated expiration or
prepayment date on each tenant household that moves into the housing after the
initial notice has been given, but before the expiration of the rental
assistance contract or prepayment of the mortgage or loan. This notice shall
be given before a new tenant is asked to execute a rental agreement or required
to pay any deposits.

Sec. 385. RCW 59.28.050 and 1995 c
399 s 161 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not
in any way prohibit an owner of federally assisted housing from terminating a
rental assistance contract or prepaying a mortgage or loan. The requirement in
this chapter for notice shall not be construed as conferring any new or
additional regulatory power upon the city or county clerk or upon the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development.

Sec. 386. RCW 59.28.060 and 2000 c
255 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The notice to
tenants required by RCW 59.28.040 shall state: (a) Whether the owner (i)
intends to prepay the mortgage or loan or allow the rental assistance contract
to expire in order to operate the housing without any low-income use
restrictions, (ii) plans on renewing the rental assistance contract subject to
the availability of adequate appropriations, or (iii) is seeking additional
financial incentives or higher rents as a condition of remaining in the federal
program; (b) the reason the owner plans on taking this action; (c) the owner's
plans for the project, including any timetables or deadlines for actions to be
taken by the owner and any specific federal, state, or local agency approvals
that the owner is required to obtain; (d) the anticipated date of the prepayment
of the mortgage or loan or expiration of the rental assistance contract; (e)
the effect, if any, that prepayment of the mortgage or loan or expiration of
the rental assistance contract will have upon the tenants' rent and other terms
of their rental agreement; and (f) that additional information will be served
on the city or county, on the local public housing agency, and on the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development and will be
posted at the development. The owner shall also include with the notice
written information, prepared by the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development under RCW 59.28.120(1), concerning the legal rights,
responsibilities, and options of owners and tenants when an owner intends to
prepay a mortgage or loan or terminate a rental assistance contract.

(2) The notice to the
city or county clerk and to the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development required by RCW 59.28.040 shall state: (a) The
name, location, and project number of the federally assisted housing and the
type of assistance received from the federal government; (b) the number and
size of units; (c) the age, race, family size, and estimated incomes of the
tenants who will be affected by the prepayment of the loan or mortgage or
expiration of the federal assistance contract; (d) the current rents and
projected rent increases for each affected tenant after the prepayment of the
mortgage or loan or expiration of the rental assistance contract without
disclosing the identities of the affected tenants; (e) the availability and
type, if any, of rental assistance after the prepayment of the mortgage or loan
or expiration of the rental assistance contract; and (f) the age, race, family
size, and estimated incomes of any applicants on the project's waiting list
without disclosing the identities of the applicants. The owner shall attach to
this notice a copy of the notice the owner sends to the tenants under this
chapter.

(3) All owners of
federally assisted housing shall immediately post a copy of any notices they
send the city or county clerk, any public housing agency, and the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, under RCW 59.28.040, in
a conspicuous place at the development where they are likely to be seen by
current and prospective tenants. The notices shall be maintained intact and in
legible form for twelve months from the date they are posted.

All owners of federally
assisted housing shall, upon request of any state or local agency, provide the agency
with a copy of any rent comparability study, market analysis, or projected
budget that they submit to the United States department of housing and urban
development or other federal agency in conjunction with the prepayment of their
mortgage or loan or in anticipation of the expiration of their rental
assistance contract, together with any physical inspection reports or capital
needs assessments completed by the owner or federal agency within the last
three years.

Sec. 387. RCW 66.08.195 and 2001 c
8 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter:

(1) "Border
area" means any incorporated city or town, or unincorporated area, located
within seven miles of the Washington-Canadian border or any unincorporated area
that is a point of land surrounded on three sides by saltwater and adjacent to
the Canadian border.

(2) "Border area
per-capita law-enforcement spending" equals total per capita expenditures
in a border area on: Law enforcement operating costs, court costs, law
enforcement-related insurance, and detention expenses, minus funds allocated to
a border area under RCW 66.08.190 and 66.08.196.

(3)
"Border-crossing traffic total" means the number of vehicles,
vessels, and aircraft crossing into the United States through a United States
customs service border crossing that enter into the border area during a federal
fiscal year, using border crossing statistics and criteria included in
guidelines adopted by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(4)
"Border-related crime statistic" means the sum of infractions and
citations issued, and arrests of persons permanently residing outside
Washington state in a border area during a calendar year.

Sec. 388. RCW 66.08.198 and 1995 c
159 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall develop guidelines
to determine the figures used under the three distribution factors defined in
RCW 66.08.195. At the request of any border community, the department may
review these guidelines once every three years.

Sec. 389. RCW 67.38.070 and 1995 c
399 s 167 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive
cultural arts, stadium and convention plan adopted by the district shall be
reviewed by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development to determine:

(1) Whether the plan
will enhance the progress of the state and provide for the general welfare of
the population; and

(2) Whether such plan
is eligible for matching federal funds.

After reviewing the
comprehensive cultural arts, stadium and convention plan, the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall have sixty days in
which to approve such plan and to certify to the state treasurer that such
district shall be eligible to receive funds. To be approved a plan shall
provide for coordinated cultural arts, stadium and convention planning, and be
consistent with the public cultural arts, stadium and convention coordination
criteria in a manner prescribed by chapter 35.60 RCW. In the event such
comprehensive plan is disapproved and ruled ineligible to receive funds, the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
provide written notice to the district within thirty days as to the reasons for
such plan's disapproval and such ineligibility. The district may resubmit such
plan upon reconsideration and correction of such deficiencies cited in such
notice of disapproval.

Sec. 390. RCW 68.60.030 and 1995 c
399 s 168 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
archaeological and historical division of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development may grant by nontransferable certificate
authority to maintain and protect an abandoned cemetery upon application made
by a preservation organization which has been incorporated for the purpose of
restoring, maintaining, and protecting an abandoned cemetery. Such authority
shall be limited to the care, maintenance, restoration, protection, and
historical preservation of the abandoned cemetery, and shall not include
authority to make burials, unless specifically granted by the cemetery board.

(b) Those preservation
and maintenance corporations that are granted authority to maintain and protect
an abandoned cemetery shall be entitled to hold and possess burial records,
maps, and other historical documents as may exist. Maintenance and
preservation corporations that are granted authority to maintain and protect an
abandoned cemetery shall not be liable to those claiming burial rights, ancestral
ownership, or to any other person or organization alleging to have control by
any form of conveyance not previously recorded at the county auditor's office
within the county in which the abandoned cemetery exists. Such organizations
shall not be liable for any reasonable alterations made during restoration work
on memorials, roadways, walkways, features, plantings, or any other detail of
the abandoned cemetery.

(c) Should the
maintenance and preservation corporation be dissolved, the archaeological and
historical division of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall revoke the certificate of authority.

(d) Maintenance and
preservation corporations that are granted authority to maintain and protect an
abandoned cemetery may establish care funds pursuant to chapter 68.44 RCW, and
shall report in accordance with chapter 68.44 RCW to the state cemetery board.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (1) of this section, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development may, in its sole discretion, authorize any
Washington nonprofit corporation that is not expressly incorporated for the
purpose of restoring, maintaining, and protecting an abandoned cemetery, to
restore, maintain, and protect one or more abandoned cemeteries. The
authorization may include the right of access to any burial records, maps, and
other historical documents, but shall not include the right to be the permanent
custodian of original records, maps, or documents. This authorization shall be
granted by a nontransferable certificate of authority. Any nonprofit
corporation authorized and acting under this subsection is immune from
liability to the same extent as if it were a preservation organization holding
a certificate of authority under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall establish standards
and guidelines for granting certificates of authority under subsections (1) and
(2) of this section to assure that any restoration, maintenance, and protection
activities authorized under this subsection are conducted and supervised in an
appropriate manner.

Sec. 391. RCW 70.05.125 and 1998 c
266 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county public
health account is created in the state treasury. Funds deposited in the county
public health account shall be distributed by the state treasurer to each local
public health jurisdiction based upon amounts certified to it by the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development in consultation with
the Washington state association of counties. The account shall include funds
distributed under RCW ((82.44.110 and)) 82.14.200(8) and such funds as
are appropriated to the account from the health services account under RCW
43.72.900, the public health services account under RCW 43.72.902, and such
other funds as the legislature may appropriate to it.

(2)(a) The director of
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall certify
the amounts to be distributed to each local public health jurisdiction using
1995 as the base year of actual city contributions to local public health.

(b) Only if funds are
available and in an amount no greater than available funds under RCW 82.14.200(8),
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
adjust the amount certified under (a) of this subsection to compensate for any
annexation of an area with fifty thousand residents or more to any city as a
result of a petition during calendar year 1996 or 1997, or for any city that
became newly incorporated as a result of an election during calendar year 1994
or 1995. The amount to be adjusted shall be equal to the amount which
otherwise would have been lost to the health jurisdiction due to the annexation
or incorporation as calculated using the jurisdiction's 1995 funding formula.

(c) The county
treasurer shall certify the actual 1995 city contribution to the department.
Funds in excess of the base shall be distributed proportionately among the
health jurisdictions based on incorporated population figures as last
determined by the office of financial management.

(3) Moneys distributed
under this section shall be expended exclusively for local public health
purposes.

Sec. 392. RCW 70.94.537 and 1997 c
250 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A twenty-eight
member state commute trip reduction task force is established as follows:

(a) The secretary of
the department of transportation or the secretary's designee who shall serve as
chair;

(b) The director of the
department of ecology or the director's designee;

(c) The director of the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development or the
director's designee;

(d) The director of the
department of general administration or the director's designee;

(e) Three
representatives from counties appointed by the governor from a list of at least
six recommended by the Washington state association of counties;

(f) Three
representatives from cities and towns appointed by the governor from a list of
at least six recommended by the association of Washington cities;

(g) Three
representatives from transit agencies appointed by the governor from a list of
at least six recommended by the Washington state transit association;

(h) Twelve
representatives of employers at or owners of major worksites in Washington
appointed by the governor from a list recommended by the association of
Washington business or other statewide business associations representing major
employers, provided that every affected county shall have at least one
representative; and

(i) Three citizens
appointed by the governor.

Members of the commute
trip reduction task force shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Members appointed by the governor shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.220. The task force has all powers necessary to carry out its duties as
prescribed by this chapter. The task force shall be dissolved on July 1, 2006.

(2) By March 1, 1992,
the commute trip reduction task force shall establish guidelines for commute
trip reduction plans. The guidelines are intended to ensure consistency in
commute trip reduction plans and goals among jurisdictions while fairly taking
into account differences in employment and housing density, employer size,
existing and anticipated levels of transit service, special employer
circumstances, and other factors the task force determines to be relevant. The
guidelines shall include:

(a) Criteria for
establishing commute trip reduction zones;

(b) Methods and
information requirements for determining base year values of the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle miles
traveled per employee and progress toward meeting commute trip reduction plan
goals;

(c) Model commute trip
reduction ordinances;

(d) Methods for
assuring consistency in the treatment of employers who have worksites subject
to the requirements of this chapter in more than one jurisdiction;

(e) An appeals process
by which major employers, who as a result of special characteristics of their
business or its locations would be unable to meet the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan, may obtain a waiver or modification of those requirements
and criteria for determining eligibility for waiver or modification;

(f) Methods to ensure
that employers shall receive full credit for the results of transportation
demand management efforts and commute trip reduction programs which have been
implemented by major employers prior to the base year;

(g) Alternative commute
trip reduction goals for major employers which cannot meet the goals of this
chapter because of the unique nature of their business;

(h) Alternative commute
trip reduction goals for major employers whose worksites change and who contribute
substantially to traffic congestion in a trip reduction zone; and

(i) Methods to insure
that employers receive credit for scheduling changes enacted pursuant to the
criteria identified in RCW 70.94.527(11).

(3) The task force
shall work with jurisdictions, major employers, and other parties to develop
and implement a public awareness campaign designed to increase the
effectiveness of local commute trip reduction programs and support achievement
of the objectives identified in this chapter.

(4) The task force
shall assess the commute trip reduction options available to employers other
than major employers and make recommendations to the legislature by October 1,
1992. The recommendations shall include the minimum size of employer who shall
be required to implement trip reduction programs and the appropriate methods
those employers can use to accomplish trip reduction goals.

(5) The task force
shall review progress toward implementing commute trip reduction plans and
programs and the costs and benefits of commute trip reduction plans and
programs and shall make recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 1995,
December 1, 1999, December 1, 2001, December 1, 2003, and December 1, 2005. In
assessing the costs and benefits, the task force shall consider the costs of
not having implemented commute trip reduction plans and programs. The task
force shall examine other transportation demand management programs nationally
and incorporate its findings into its recommendations to the legislature. The
recommendations shall address the need for continuation, modification, or
termination or any or all requirements of this chapter. The recommendations
made December 1, 1995, shall include recommendations regarding extension of the
requirements of this chapter to employers with fifty or more full-time
employees at a single worksite who begin their regular work day between 6:00
a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays for more than twelve continuous months.

Sec. 393. RCW 70.95.260 and 1995 c
399 s 189 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall in
addition to its other powers and duties:

(1) Cooperate with the
appropriate federal, state, interstate and local units of government and with
appropriate private organizations in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter.

(2) Coordinate the
development of a solid waste management plan for all areas of the state in
cooperation with local government, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, and other appropriate state and regional agencies.
The plan shall relate to solid waste management for twenty years in the future
and shall be reviewed biennially, revised as necessary, and extended so that
perpetually the plan shall look to the future for twenty years as a guide in
carrying out a state coordinated solid waste management program. The plan
shall be developed into a single integrated document and shall be adopted no
later than October 1990. The plan shall be revised regularly after its initial
completion so that local governments revising local comprehensive solid waste
management plans can take advantage of the data and analysis in the state plan.

(3) Provide technical
assistance to any person as well as to cities, counties, and industries.

(4) Initiate, conduct,
and support research, demonstration projects, and investigations, and
coordinate research programs pertaining to solid waste management systems.

(5) Develop statewide
programs to increase public awareness of and participation in tire recycling,
and to stimulate and encourage local private tire recycling centers and public
participation in tire recycling.

(6) May, under the
provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, from time to time promulgate such rules ((and regulations))
as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 394. RCW 70.95.265 and 1995 c
399 s 190 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
work closely with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, the department of general administration, and with other state
departments and agencies, the Washington state association of counties, the
association of Washington cities, and business associations, to carry out the
objectives and purposes of chapter 41, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess.

Sec. 395. RCW 70.95.810 and 1998 c
245 s 132 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to establish
the feasibility of composting food and yard wastes, the department shall
provide funds, as available, to local governments submitting a proposal to
compost such wastes.

(2) The department, in
cooperation with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, may approve an application if the project can demonstrate the
essential parameters for successful composting, including, but not limited to,
cost-effectiveness, handling and safety requirements, and current and potential
markets.

Sec. 396. RCW 70.105.020 and 1994
c 264 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

The department after
notice and public hearing shall:

(1) Adopt regulations
designating as extremely hazardous wastes subject to the provisions of this
chapter those substances which exhibit characteristics consistent with the
definition provided in RCW 70.105.010(6);

(2) Adopt and may
revise when appropriate, minimum standards and regulations for disposal of
extremely hazardous wastes to protect against hazards to the public, and to the
environment. Before adoption of such standards and regulations, the department
shall consult with appropriate agencies of interested local governments and
secure technical assistance from the department of agriculture, the department
of social and health services, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of natural resources, the department of labor and industries, and
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development,
through the director of fire protection.

Sec. 397. RCW 70.114A.070 and 1995
c 220 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall contract with
private, nonprofit corporations to provide technical assistance to any private
individual or nonprofit organization wishing to construct temporary or
permanent worker housing. The assistance may include information on state and
local application and approval procedures, information or assistance in
applying for federal, state, or local financial assistance, including tax
incentives, information on cost-effective housing designs, or any other assistance
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may
deem helpful in obtaining the active participation of private individuals or
groups in constructing or operating temporary or permanent worker housing.

Sec. 398. RCW 70.119A.170 and 2001
c 141 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A drinking water
assistance account is created in the state treasury. Such subaccounts as are
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter are permitted to be established
within the account. Therefore, the drinking water assistance administrative
account and the drinking water assistance repayment account are created in the
state treasury. The purpose of the account is to allow the state to use any
federal funds that become available to states from congress to fund a state
revolving loan fund program as part of the reauthorization of the federal safe
drinking water act. Expenditures from the account may only be made by the
secretary, the public works board, or the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development, after appropriation. Moneys in the account may
only be used, consistent with federal law, to assist water systems to provide
safe drinking water through a program administered through the department of
health, the public works board, and the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development and for other activities authorized under
federal law. Money may be placed in the account from the proceeds of bonds
when authorized by the legislature, transfers from other state funds or
accounts, federal capitalization grants or other financial assistance, all
repayments of moneys borrowed from the account, all interest payments made by
borrowers from the account or otherwise earned on the account, or any other
lawful source. All interest earned on moneys deposited in the account,
including repayments, shall remain in the account and may be used for any
eligible purpose. Moneys in the account may only be used to assist local
governments and water systems to provide safe and reliable drinking water, for
other services and assistance authorized by federal law to be funded from these
federal funds, and to administer the program.

(2) The department and
the public works board shall establish and maintain a program to use the moneys
in the drinking water assistance account as provided by the federal government
under the safe drinking water act. The department and the public works board,
in consultation with purveyors, local governments, local health jurisdictions,
financial institutions, commercial construction interests, other state
agencies, and other affected and interested parties, shall by January 1, 1999,
adopt final joint rules and requirements for the provision of financial
assistance to public water systems as authorized under federal law. Prior to
the effective date of the final rules, the department and the public works
board may establish and utilize guidelines for the sole purpose of ensuring the
timely procurement of financial assistance from the federal government under
the safe drinking water act, but such guidelines shall be converted to rules by
January 1, 1999. The department and the public works board shall make every
reasonable effort to ensure the state's receipt and disbursement of federal
funds to eligible public water systems as quickly as possible after the federal
government has made them available. By December 15, 1997, the department and
the public works board shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature reflecting the input from the affected interests and parties on
the status of the program. The report shall include significant issues and
concerns, the status of rule making and guidelines, and a plan for the adoption
of final rules.

(3) If the department,
public works board, or any other department, agency, board, or commission of
state government participates in providing service under this section, the
administering entity shall endeavor to provide cost-effective and timely
services. Mechanisms to provide cost-effective and timely services include:
(a) Adopting federal guidelines by reference into administrative rules; (b)
using existing management mechanisms rather than creating new administrative
structures; (c) investigating the use of service contracts, either with other
governmental entities or with nongovernmental service providers; (d) the use of
joint or combined financial assistance applications; and (e) any other method
or practice designed to streamline and expedite the delivery of services and
financial assistance.

(4) The department
shall have the authority to establish assistance priorities and carry out
oversight and related activities, other than financial administration, with
respect to assistance provided with federal funds. The department, the public
works board, and the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall jointly develop, with the assistance of water purveyors and
other affected and interested parties, a memorandum of understanding setting forth
responsibilities and duties for each of the parties. The memorandum of
understanding at a minimum, shall include:

(a) Responsibility for
developing guidelines for providing assistance to public water systems and
related oversight prioritization and oversight responsibilities including
requirements for prioritization of loans or other financial assistance to
public water systems;

(b) Department
submittal of preapplication information to the public works board for review
and comment;

(c) Department submittal
of a prioritized list of projects to the public works board for determination
of:

(i) Financial
capability of the applicant; and

(ii) Readiness to
proceed, or the ability of the applicant to promptly commence the project;

(d) A process for determining
consistency with existing water resource planning and management, including
coordinated water supply plans, regional water resource plans, and
comprehensive plans under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW;

(e) A determination of:

(i) Least-cost
solutions, including consolidation and restructuring of small systems, where
appropriate, into more economical units;

(ii) The provision of
regional facilities;

(iii) Projects and
activities that facilitate compliance with the federal safe drinking water act;
and

(iv) Projects and
activities that are intended to achieve the public health objectives of federal
and state drinking water laws;

(f) Implementation of
water conservation and other demand management measures consistent with state
guidelines for water utilities;

(g) Assistance for the
necessary planning and engineering to assure that consistency, coordination,
and proper professional review are incorporated into projects or activities
proposed for funding;

(h) Minimum standards
for water system capacity, financial viability, and water system planning;

(i) Testing and
evaluation of the water quality of the state's public water system to assure
that priority for financial assistance is provided to systems and areas with
threats to public health from contaminated supplies and reduce in appropriate
cases the substantial increases in costs and rates that customers of small
systems would otherwise incur under the monitoring and testing requirements of
the federal safe drinking water act;

(j) Coordination, to
the maximum extent possible, with other state programs that provide financial
assistance to public water systems and state programs that address existing or
potential water quality or drinking contamination problems;

(k) Definitions of
"affordability" and "disadvantaged community" that are
consistent with these and similar terms in use by other state or federal
assistance programs;

(l) Criteria for the
financial assistance program for public water systems, which shall include, but
are not limited to:

(i) Determining
projects addressing the most serious risk to human health;

(ii) Determining the
capacity of the system to effectively manage its resources, including meeting
state financial viability criteria; and

(iii) Determining the
relative benefit to the community served; and

(m) Ensure that each
agency fulfills the audit, accounting, and reporting requirements under federal
law for its portion of the administration of this program.

(5) The department and
the public works board shall begin the process to disburse funds no later than
October 1, 1997, and shall adopt such rules as are necessary under chapter
34.05 RCW to administer the program by January 1, 1999.

Sec. 399. RCW 70.125.030 and 2000
c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter
and unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "Core
services" means treatment services for victims of sexual assault including
information and referral, crisis intervention, medical advocacy, legal
advocacy, support, system coordination, and prevention for potential victims of
sexual assault.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3) "Law
enforcement agencies" means police and sheriff's departments of this
state.

(4) "Personal
representative" means a friend, relative, attorney, or employee or
volunteer from a community sexual assault program or specialized treatment
service provider.

(5) "Rape crisis
center" means a community-based social service agency which provides
services to victims of sexual assault.

(6) "Community
sexual assault program" means a community-based social service agency that
is qualified to provide and provides core services to victims of sexual
assault.

(7) "Sexual
assault" means one or more of the following:

(a) Rape or rape of a
child;

(b) Assault with intent
to commit rape or rape of a child;

(c) Incest or indecent
liberties;

(d) Child molestation;

(e) Sexual misconduct
with a minor;

(f) Custodial sexual
misconduct;

(g) Crimes with a
sexual motivation; or

(h) An attempt to
commit any of the aforementioned offenses.

(8) "Specialized
services" means treatment services for victims of sexual assault including
support groups, therapy, and specialized sexual assault medical examination.

(9) "Victim"
means any person who suffers physical and/or mental anguish as a proximate
result of a sexual assault.

Sec. 400. RCW 70.164.020 and 1995
c 399 s 199 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(2) "Energy
assessment" means an analysis of a dwelling unit to determine the need for
cost-effective energy conservation measures as determined by the department.

(3)
"Household" means an individual or group of individuals living in a
dwelling unit as defined by the department.

(4) "Low
income" means household income that is at or below one hundred twenty-five
percent of the federally established poverty level.

(5) "Nonutility
sponsor" means any sponsor other than a public service company,
municipality, public utility district, mutual or cooperative, furnishing gas or
electricity used to heat low-income residences.

(6)
"Residence" means a dwelling unit as defined by the department.

(7) "Sponsor"
means any entity that submits a proposal under RCW 70.164.040, including but
not limited to any local community action agency, community service agency, or
any other participating agency or any public service company, municipality,
public utility district, mutual or cooperative, or any combination of such
entities that jointly submits a proposal.

(8) "Sponsor
match" means the share, if any, of the cost of weatherization to be paid
by the sponsor.

(9)
"Weatherization" means materials or measures, and their installation,
that are used to improve the thermal efficiency of a residence.

(10) "Weatherizing
agency" means any approved department grantee or any public service
company, municipality, public utility district, mutual or cooperative, or other
entity that bears the responsibility for ensuring the performance of
weatherization of residences under this chapter and has been approved by the
department.

Sec. 401. RCW 70.190.010 and 1996
c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Administrative costs" means the costs associated with procurement;
payroll processing; personnel functions; management; maintenance and operation
of space and property; data processing and computer services; accounting;
budgeting; auditing; indirect costs; and organizational planning, consultation,
coordination, and training.

(2)
"Assessment" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.70.010.

(3) "At-risk"
children are children who engage in or are victims of at-risk behaviors.

(4) "At-risk
behaviors" means violent delinquent acts, teen substance abuse, teen
pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide attempts, dropping out of school,
child abuse or neglect, and domestic violence.

(5) "Community
public health and safety networks" or "networks" means the
organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060.

(6) "Comprehensive
plan" means a two-year plan that examines available resources and unmet needs
for a county or multicounty area, barriers that limit the effective use of
resources, and a plan to address these issues that is broadly supported by
local residents.

(7) "Participating
state agencies" means the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the department of social and health services, the department of health, the
employment security department, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, and such other departments as may be specifically
designated by the governor.

(8) "Family policy
council" or "council" means the superintendent of public
instruction, the secretary of social and health services, the secretary of
health, the commissioner of the employment security department, and the
director of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development or their designees, one legislator from each caucus of the senate
and house of representatives, and one representative of the governor.

(9) "Fiduciary
interest" means (a) the right to compensation from a health, educational,
social service, or justice system organization that receives public funds, or
(b) budgetary or policy-making authority for an organization listed in (a) of
this subsection. A person who acts solely in an advisory capacity and receives
no compensation from a health, educational, social service, or justice system
organization, and who has no budgetary or policy-making authority is deemed to
have no fiduciary interest in the organization.

(10)
"Outcome" or "outcome based" means defined and measurable
outcomes used to evaluate progress in reducing the rate of at-risk children and
youth through reducing risk factors and increasing protective factors.

(11) "Matching
funds" means an amount no less than twenty-five percent of the amount
budgeted for a network. The network's matching funds may be in-kind goods and
services. Funding sources allowable for match include appropriate federal or
local levy funds, private charitable funding, and other charitable giving.
Basic education funds shall not be used as a match. State general funds shall
not be used as a match for violence reduction and drug enforcement account
funds created under RCW 69.50.520.

(12) "Policy
development" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.70.010.

(13) "Protective
factors" means those factors determined by the department of health to be
empirically associated with behaviors that contribute to socially acceptable
and healthy nonviolent behaviors. Protective factors include promulgation,
identification, and acceptance of community norms regarding appropriate
behaviors in the area of delinquency, early sexual activity, alcohol and
substance abuse, educational opportunities, employment opportunities, and
absence of crime.

(14) "Risk
factors" means those factors determined by the department of health to be
empirically associated with at-risk behaviors that contribute to violence.

Sec. 402. RCW 71.09.255 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 12 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receiving the
notification required by RCW 71.09.250, counties must promptly notify the
cities within the county of the maximum number of secure community transition
facility beds that may be required and the projected number of beds to be
needed in that county.

(2) The incentive
grants provided under this section are subject to the following provisions:

(a) Counties and the
cities within the county must notify each other of siting plans to promote the
establishment and equitable distribution of secure community transition
facilities;

(b) Development
regulations, ordinances, plans, laws, and criteria established for siting must
be consistent with statutory requirements and rules applicable to siting and
operating secure community transition facilities;

(c) The minimum size
for any facility is three beds; and

(d) The department must
approve any sites selected.

(3) Any county or city
that makes a commitment to initiate the process to site one or more secure
community transition facilities by February 1, 2002, shall receive a planning
grant as proposed and approved by the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(4) Any county or city
that has issued all necessary permits by May 1, 2003, for one or more secure
community transition facilities that comply with the requirements of this
section shall receive an incentive grant in the amount of fifty thousand
dollars for each bed sited.

(5) To encourage the
rapid permitting of sites, any county or city that has issued all necessary
permits by January 1, 2003, for one or more secure community transition
facilities that comply with the requirements of this section shall receive a
bonus in the amount of twenty percent of the amount provided under subsection
(4) of this section.

(6) Any county or city
that establishes secure community transition facility beds in excess of the
maximum number that could be required to be sited in that county shall receive
a bonus payment of one hundred thousand dollars for each bed established in
excess of the maximum requirement.

(7) No payment shall be
made under subsection (4), (5), or (6) of this section until all necessary
permits have been issued.

Sec. 403. RCW 72.09.055 and 1995 c
399 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing
for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in
RCW 43.63A.510 (as recodified by this act). The inventory shall include
the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the
property. The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development by November
1, 1993, and every November 1st thereafter.

(2) By
November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, the department shall purge
the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for the
development of affordable housing. The department shall include an updated
listing of real property that has become available since the last update. As
used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or
buildings and land.

Sec. 404. RCW 72.65.210 and 1998 c
245 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish, by rule, inmate eligibility standards for participation in the
work release program.

(2) The department
shall:

(a) Conduct an annual
examination of each work release facility and its security procedures;

(b) Investigate and set
standards for the inmate supervision policies of each work release facility;

(c) Establish physical
standards for future work release structures to ensure the safety of inmates,
employees, and the surrounding communities;

(d) Evaluate its
recordkeeping of serious infractions to determine if infractions are properly
and consistently assessed against inmates eligible for work release;

(e) The department
shall establish a written treatment plan best suited to the inmate's needs,
cost, and the relationship of community placement and community corrections
officers to a system of case management;

(f) Adopt a policy to
encourage businesses employing work release inmates to contact the appropriate
work release facility whenever an inmate is absent from his or her work
schedule. The department of corrections shall provide each employer with
written information and instructions on who should be called if a work release
employee is absent from work or leaves the job site without authorization; and

(g) Develop a siting
policy, in conjunction with cities, counties, community groups, and the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development for the
establishment of additional work release facilities. Such policy shall include
at least the following elements: (i) Guidelines for appropriate site selection
of work-release facilities; (ii) notification requirements to local government
and community groups of intent to site a work release facility; and (iii)
guidelines for effective community relations by the work release program
operator.

The department shall
comply with the requirements of this section by July 1, 1990.

Sec. 405. RCW 74.08A.010 and 1997
c 58 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A family that
includes an adult who has received temporary assistance for needy families for
sixty months after July 27, 1997, shall be ineligible for further temporary
assistance for needy families assistance.

(2) For the purposes of
applying the rules of this section, the department shall count any month in
which an adult family member received a temporary assistance for needy families
cash assistance grant unless the assistance was provided when the family member
was a minor child and not the head of the household or married to the head of
the household.

(3) The department
shall refer recipients who require specialized assistance to appropriate
department programs, crime victims' programs through the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, or the crime victims'
compensation program of the department of labor and industries.

(4) The department may
exempt a recipient and the recipient's family from the application of
subsection (1) of this section by reason of hardship or if the recipient meets
the family violence options of section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal
social security act as amended by P.L. 104-193. The number of recipients and
their families exempted from subsection (1) of this section for a fiscal year
shall not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly number of recipients and
their families to which assistance is provided under the temporary assistance
for needy families program.

(5) The department
shall not exempt a recipient and his or her family from the application of
subsection (1) of this section until after the recipient has received fifty-two
months of assistance under this chapter.

Sec. 406. RCW 74.14B.060 and 1996
c 123 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Treatment services
for children who have been sexually assaulted must be designed and delivered in
a manner that accommodates their unique developmental needs and also considers
the impact of family dynamics on treatment issues. In addition, the complexity
of the civil and criminal justice systems requires that children who are
involved receive appropriate consideration and attention that recognizes their
unique vulnerability in a system designed primarily for adults.

(2) The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall provide, subject to
available funds, comprehensive sexual assault services to sexually abused
children and their families. The department shall provide treatment services
by qualified, registered, certified, or licensed professionals on a one-to-one
or group basis as may be deemed appropriate.

(3) Funds appropriated
under this section shall be provided solely for contracts or direct purchase of
specific treatment services from community organizations and private service
providers for child victims of sexual assault and sexual abuse. Funds shall be
disbursed through the request for proposal or request for qualifications
process.

(4) As part of the
request for proposal or request for qualifications process the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall ensure that there
be no duplication of services with existing programs including the crime
victims' compensation program as provided in chapter 7.68 RCW. The department
shall also ensure that victims exhaust private insurance benefits available to
the child victim before providing services to the child victim under this
section.

Sec. 407. RCW 79A.30.050 and 1995
c 200 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the authority
and state agencies find it mutually beneficial to do so, they are authorized to
collaborate and cooperate on projects of shared interest. Agencies authorized
to collaborate with the authority include but are not limited to: The
commission for activities and projects related to public recreation; the department
of agriculture for projects related to the equine agricultural industry; the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development with
respect to community and economic development and tourism issues associated
with development of the state horse park; Washington State University with
respect to opportunities for animal research, education, and extension; the
department of ecology with respect to opportunities for making the state horse
park's waste treatment facilities a demonstration model for the handling of
waste to protect water quality; and with local community colleges with respect
to programs related to horses, economic development, business, and tourism.

(2) The authority shall
cooperate with 4-H clubs, pony clubs, youth groups, and local park departments
to provide youth recreational activities. The authority shall also provide for
preferential use of an area of the horse park facility for youth and the
disabled at nominal cost.

Sec. 408. RCW 79A.50.100 and 1995
c 399 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public hearing
may be held prior to any withdrawal of state trust lands and shall be held
prior to any revocation of withdrawal or modification of withdrawal of state
trust lands used for recreational purposes by the department of natural
resources or by other state agencies.

(2) The department
shall cause notice of the withdrawal, revocation of withdrawal or modification
of withdrawal of state trust lands as described in subsection (1) of this
section to be published by advertisement once a week for four weeks prior to
the public hearing in at least one newspaper published and of general
circulation in the county or counties in which the state trust lands are
situated, and by causing a copy of said notice to be posted in a conspicuous
place in the department's Olympia office, in the district office in which the
land is situated, and in the office of the county auditor in the county where
the land is situated thirty days prior to the public hearing. The notice shall
specify the time and place of the public hearing and shall describe with
particularity each parcel of state trust lands involved in said hearing.

(3) The board of
natural resources shall administer the hearing according to its prescribed
rules and regulations.

(4) The board of
natural resources shall determine the most beneficial use or combination of
uses of the state trust lands. Its decision will be conclusive as to the
matter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That said decisions as to uses shall conform to
applicable state plans and policy guidelines adopted by the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development.

Sec. 409. RCW 80.28.010 and 1995 c
399 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All charges made,
demanded or received by any gas company, electrical company or water company
for gas, electricity or water, or for any service rendered or to be rendered in
connection therewith, shall be just, fair, reasonable and sufficient.

(2) Every gas company,
electrical company and water company shall furnish and supply such service,
instrumentalities and facilities as shall be safe, adequate and efficient, and
in all respects just and reasonable.

(3) All rules and
regulations issued by any gas company, electrical company or water company,
affecting or pertaining to the sale or distribution of its product, shall be
just and reasonable.

(4) Utility service for
residential space heating shall not be terminated between November 15th
through March 15th if the customer:

(a) Notifies the
utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security deposit. This
notice should be provided within five business days of receiving a payment
overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the customer
fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b) Provides
self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to a grantee
of the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
which administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee
shall determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed
for eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under
42 U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information provided in the self-certification;

(c) Has applied for
home heating assistance from applicable government and private sector
organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied to the
current bill and future utility bills;

(d) Has applied for
low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other appropriate agency
if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e) Agrees to a payment
plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan will be designed both
to pay the past due bill by the following October 15th and to pay for
continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the following
October 15th, the customer shall not be eligible for protections under
this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly
payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus
one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and
thereafter during November 15th through March 15th. A customer
may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in
default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent of monthly
income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is
made and thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the customer
subsequent to implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact the
utility to reformulate the plan; and

(f) Agrees to pay the
moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(5) The utility shall:

(a) Include in any
notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be subject to
termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b) Assist the customer
in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c) Be authorized to
transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has established a
plan under this section moves from one residence to another within the same
utility service area;

(d) Be permitted to
disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment program.
Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices authorized by
law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this subsection. Customers
who qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their payment
plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections
afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by
paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of the
applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is
reconnected; and

(e) Advise the customer
in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will restore service if
the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other requirements of this
section.

(6) A payment plan
implemented under this section is consistent with RCW 80.28.080.

(7) Every gas company
and electrical company shall offer residential customers the option of a budget
billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall
be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income
energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without
limiting availability to certain months of the year, without regard to the
length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to
whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(8) Every gas company,
electrical company and water company shall construct and maintain such
facilities in connection with the manufacture and distribution of its product
as will be efficient and safe to its employees and the public.

(9) An agreement
between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written, shall not waive
the protections afforded under this chapter.

(10) In establishing
rates or charges for water service, water companies as defined in RCW 80.04.010
may consider the achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement
of wasteful water use practices.

Sec. 410. RCW 82.14.330 and 1998 c
321 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in fiscal
year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the municipal criminal
justice assistance account for distribution under this section from the general
fund the sum of four million six hundred thousand dollars divided into four
equal deposits occurring on July 1st, October 1st, January 1st,
and April 1st. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer
shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in
RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year. The moneys deposited in the
municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this
section, shall be distributed to the cities of the state as follows:

(a) Twenty percent
appropriated for distribution shall be distributed to cities with a three-year
average violent crime rate for each one thousand in population in excess of one
hundred fifty percent of the statewide three-year average violent crime rate
for each one thousand in population. The three-year average violent crime rate
shall be calculated using the violent crime rates for each of the preceding
three years from the annual reports on crime in Washington state as published
by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. Moneys shall be
distributed under this subsection (1)(a) ratably based on population as last
determined by the office of financial management, but no city may receive more
than one dollar per capita. Moneys remaining undistributed under this
subsection at the end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the
criminal justice training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement
agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of
temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement
training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.

(b) Sixteen percent
shall be distributed to cities ratably based on population as last determined
by the office of financial management, but no city may receive less than one
thousand dollars.

The moneys deposited in
the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
subsection shall be distributed at such times as distributions are made under
RCW 82.44.150.

Moneys distributed
under this subsection shall be expended exclusively for criminal justice
purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding.
Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist
the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary
benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic
violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020.
Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year
1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude
the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur,
changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the
control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(2) In addition to the
distributions under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Fourteen percent
shall be distributed to cities that have initiated innovative law enforcement
strategies, including alternative sentencing and crime prevention programs. No
city may receive more than one dollar per capita under this subsection (2)(a).

(b) Twenty percent
shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs to help at-risk
children or child abuse victim response programs. No city may receive more
than fifty cents per capita under this subsection (2)(b).

(c) Twenty percent shall
be distributed to cities that have initiated programs designed to reduce the
level of domestic violence within their jurisdictions or to provide counseling
for domestic violence victims. No city may receive more than fifty cents per
capita under this subsection (2)(c).

(d) Ten percent shall
be distributed to cities that contract with another governmental agency for a
majority of the city's law enforcement services.

Moneys distributed
under this subsection shall be distributed to those cities that submit funding
requests under this subsection to the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development based on criteria developed under RCW 82.14.335.
Allocation of funds shall be in proportion to the population of qualified
jurisdictions, but the distribution to a city shall not exceed the amount of
funds requested. Cities shall submit requests for program funding to the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development by November
1st of each year for funding the following year. The department shall
certify to the state treasurer the cities eligible for funding under this
subsection and the amount of each allocation.

The moneys deposited in
the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
subsection, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of
this section, shall be distributed at the times as distributions are made under
RCW 82.44.150. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the end
of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice training
commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement agencies with ten or
fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement
of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided
in RCW 43.101.200.

If a city is found by
the state auditor to have expended funds received under this subsection in a
manner that does not comply with the criteria under which the moneys were
received, the city shall be ineligible to receive future distributions under
this subsection until the use of the moneys are justified to the satisfaction
of the director or are repaid to the state general fund. The director may
allow noncomplying use of moneys received under this subsection upon a showing
of hardship or other emergent need.

(3) Notwithstanding
other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city that
substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990,
and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases
under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the
city is located.

(4) Not more than five
percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal justice assistance
account shall be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state
patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these
enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall
not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 411. RCW 82.14.335 and 1995 c
399 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall adopt criteria to
be used in making grants to cities under RCW 82.14.330(2). In developing the
criteria, the department shall create a temporary advisory committee consisting
of the director of community((, trade, and economic)) development, two
representatives nominated by the association of Washington cities, and two
representatives nominated by the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs.

Sec. 412. RCW 82.16.0497 and 2001
c 214 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a) "Base
credit" means the maximum amount of credit against the tax imposed by this
chapter that each light and power business or gas distribution business may
take each fiscal year as calculated by the department. The base credit is
equal to the proportionate share that the total grants received by each light
and power business or gas distribution business in the prior fiscal year bears
to the total grants received by all light and power businesses and gas
distribution businesses in the prior fiscal year multiplied by two million five
hundred thousand dollars.

(b) "Billing
discount" means a reduction in the amount charged for providing service to
qualifying persons in Washington made by a light and power business or a gas
distribution business. Billing discount does not include grants received by
the light and power business or a gas distribution business.

(c) "Grant"
means funds provided to a light and power business or gas distribution business
by the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development or
by a qualifying organization.

(d) "Low-income
home energy assistance program" means energy assistance programs for
low-income households as defined on December 31, 2000, in the low-income home
energy assistance act of 1981 as amended August 1, 1999, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8623 et
seq.

(e) "Qualifying
person" means a Washington resident who applies for assistance and
qualifies for a grant regardless of whether that person receives a grant.

(f) "Qualifying
contribution" means money given by a light and power business or a gas
distribution business to a qualifying organization, exclusive of money received
in the prior fiscal year from its customers for the purpose of assisting other
customers.

(g) "Qualifying
organization" means an entity that has a contractual agreement with the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development to
administer in a specified service area low-income home energy assistance funds
received from the federal government and such other funds that may be received
by the entity.

(2) Subject to the
limitations in this section, a light and power business or a gas distribution
business may take a credit each fiscal year against the tax imposed under this
chapter.

(a)(i) A credit may be
taken for qualifying contributions if the dollar amount of qualifying
contributions for the fiscal year in which the tax credit is taken is greater
than one hundred twenty-five percent of the dollar amount of qualifying
contributions given in fiscal year 2000.

(ii) If no qualifying
contributions were given in fiscal year 2000, a credit shall be allowed for the
first fiscal year that qualifying contributions are given. Thereafter, credit
shall be allowed if the qualifying contributions given exceed one hundred
twenty-five percent of qualifying contributions given in the first fiscal year.

(iii) The amount of
credit shall be fifty percent of the dollar amount of qualifying contributions
given in the fiscal year in which the tax credit is taken.

(b)(i) A credit may be
taken for billing discounts if the dollar amount of billing discounts for the
fiscal year in which the tax credit is taken is greater than one hundred
twenty-five percent of the dollar amount of billing discounts given in fiscal
year 2000.

(ii) If no billing
discounts were given in fiscal year 2000, a credit shall be allowed in the
first fiscal year that billing discounts are given. Thereafter, credit shall
be allowed if the dollar amount of billing discounts given exceeds one hundred
twenty-five percent of billing discounts given in the first fiscal year.

(iii) The amount of credit
shall be fifty percent of the dollar amount of the billing discounts given in
the fiscal year in which the tax credit is taken.

(c) The total amount of
credit that may be taken for qualifying contributions and billing discounts in
a fiscal year is limited to the base credit for the same fiscal year.

(3) The total amount of
credit, statewide, that may be taken in any fiscal year shall not exceed two
million five hundred thousand dollars. By May 1st of each year starting in
2002, the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
shall notify the department of revenue in writing of the grants received in the
current fiscal year by each light and power business and gas distribution
business.

(4)(a) Not later than
June 1st of each year beginning in 2002, the department shall publish the base
credit for each light and power business and gas distribution business for the
next fiscal year.

(b) Not later than July
1st of each year beginning in 2002, application for credit must by made to the
department including but not limited to the following information: Billing
discounts given by the applicant in fiscal year 2000; qualifying contributions
given by the applicant in the prior fiscal year; the amount of money received
in the prior fiscal year from customers for the purpose of assisting other
customers; the base credit for the next fiscal year for the applicant; the
qualifying contributions anticipated to be given in the next fiscal year; and
billing discounts anticipated to be given in the next fiscal year. No credit
under this section will be allowed to a light and power business or gas
distribution business that does not file the application by July 1st.

(c) Not later than
August 1st of each year beginning in 2002, the department shall notify each
applicant of the amount of credit that may be taken in that fiscal year.

(d) The balance of base
credits not used by other light and power businesses and gas distribution
businesses shall be ratably distributed to applicants under the formula in
subsection (1)(a) of this section. The total amount of credit that may be
taken by an applicant is the base credit plus any ratable portion of unused
base credit.

(5) The credit taken
under this section is limited to the amount of tax imposed under this chapter
for the fiscal year. The credit must be claimed in the fiscal year in which
the billing reduction is made. Any unused credit expires. Refunds shall not
be given in place of credits.

(6) No credit may be
taken for billing discounts made before July 1, 2001. Within two weeks of May
8, 2001, the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall notify the department of revenue in writing of the grants
received in fiscal year 2001 by each light and power business and gas distribution
business. Within four weeks of May 8, 2001, the department of revenue shall
publish the base credit for each light and power business and gas distribution
business for fiscal year 2002. Within eight weeks of May 8, 2001, application
to the department must be made showing the information required in subsection
(4)(b) of this section. Within twelve weeks of May 8, 2001, the department
shall notify each applicant of the amount of credit that may be taken in fiscal
year 2002.

Sec. 413. RCW 82.34.075 and 2001 c
214 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following
definitions apply throughout this section:

(a) "Qualifying
facility" means an air pollution control facility as that term is defined
in RCW 82.34.010(1)(a) to be installed or acquired for a thermal electric
peaking plant with a capacity of less than one hundred megawatts and which is
approved pursuant to the Washington clean air act, chapter 70.94 RCW.

(b) "Thermal
electric peaking plant" means a natural gas-fired thermal electric
generating facility operated by a light and power business and placed into
service between January 1, 1978, and December 31, 1984, and that is registered
for the calendar year 2000 pursuant to RCW 70.94.151.

(c) "Light and
power business" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.16.010.

(2) A light and power
business is exempt from sales tax on the installation or acquisition of up to
two qualifying facilities after January 1, 2001, as provided in this section.
Upon written request of a light and power business to which the approval issued
under chapter 70.94 RCW is attached, the department shall make a determination
as to whether a plant is a thermal electric peaking plant acquiring or
installing a qualifying facility eligible under this section. The department
shall consult with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development and the department of ecology in making the determination. If the
determination is in the affirmative, the department shall issue the light and
power business a sales and use tax exemption certificate in a form and manner
as deemed appropriate by the department.

(3) The charges for
installation or acquisition of a qualifying facility by the holder of the
certificate are exempt from sales tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW and use
tax imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW. The purchaser must provide the seller
with a copy of the sales and use tax exemption certificate. The seller shall
retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(4) The exemption in
this section is limited to the installation or acquisition of a qualifying
facility and does not apply to servicing, maintenance, operation, or repairs of
a thermal electric peaking plant or of an air pollution control facility.

(5) This section
expires June 30, 2003.

Sec. 414. RCW 84.36.560 and 2001
1st sp.s. c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The real and
personal property owned or used by a nonprofit entity in providing rental
housing for very low-income households or used to provide space for the
placement of a mobile home for a very low-income household within a mobile home
park is exempt from taxation if:

(a) The benefit of the
exemption inures to the nonprofit entity;

(b) At least
seventy-five percent of the occupied dwelling units in the rental housing or
lots in a mobile home park are occupied by a very low-income household; and

(c) The rental housing
or lots in a mobile home park were insured, financed, or assisted in whole or
in part through:

(i) A federal or state
housing program administered by the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development; or

(ii) An affordable
housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105.

(2) If less than
seventy-five percent of the occupied dwelling units within the rental housing
or lots in the mobile home park are occupied by very low-income households, the
rental housing or mobile home park is eligible for a partial exemption on the
real property and a total exemption of the housing's or park's personal
property as follows:

(a) A partial exemption
shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in the rental housing or for each lot
in a mobile home park occupied by a very low-income household.

(b) The amount of
exemption shall be calculated by multiplying the assessed value of the property
reasonably necessary to provide the rental housing or to operate the mobile
home park by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of
dwelling units or lots occupied by very low-income households as of December
31st of the first assessment year in which the rental housing or mobile home
park becomes operational or on January 1st of each subsequent assessment year
for which the exemption is claimed. The denominator of the fraction is the
total number of dwelling units or lots occupied as of December 31st of the
first assessment year the rental housing or mobile home park becomes
operational and January 1st of each subsequent assessment year for which
exemption is claimed.

(3) If a currently
exempt rental housing unit in a facility with ten units or fewer or mobile home
lot in a mobile home park with ten lots or fewer was occupied by a very
low-income household at the time the exemption was granted and the income of
the household subsequently rises above fifty percent of the median income but
remains at or below eighty percent of the median income, the exemption will
continue as long as the housing continues to meet the certification
requirements of a very low-income housing program administered by the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development or the
affordable housing levy under RCW 84.52.105. For purposes of this section,
median income, as most recently determined by the federal department of housing
and urban development for the county in which the rental housing or mobile home
park is located, shall be adjusted for family size. However, if a dwelling
unit or a lot becomes vacant and is subsequently rerented, the income of the
new household must be at or below fifty percent of the median income adjusted
for family size as most recently determined by the federal department of
housing and urban development for the county in which the rental housing or
mobile home park is located to remain exempt from property tax.

(4) If at the time of
initial application the property is unoccupied, or subsequent to the initial
application the property is unoccupied because of renovations, and the property
is not currently being used for the exempt purpose authorized by this section
but will be used for the exempt purpose within two assessment years, the
property shall be eligible for a property tax exemption for the assessment year
in which the claim for exemption is submitted under the following conditions:

(a) A commitment for financing
to acquire, construct, renovate, or otherwise convert the property to provide
housing for very low-income households has been obtained, in whole or in part,
by the nonprofit entity claiming the exemption from:

(i) A federal or state
housing program administered by the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development; or

(ii) An affordable
housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105;

(b) The nonprofit
entity has manifested its intent in writing to construct, remodel, or otherwise
convert the property to housing for very low-income households; and

(c) Only the portion of
property that will be used to provide housing or lots for very low-income
households shall be exempt under this section.

(5) To be exempt under
this section, the property must be used exclusively for the purposes for which
the exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

(6) The nonprofit
entity qualifying for a property tax exemption under this section may agree to
make payments to the city, county, or other political subdivision for
improvements, services, and facilities furnished by the city, county, or
political subdivision for the benefit of the rental housing. However, these
payments shall not exceed the amount last levied as the annual tax of the city,
county, or political subdivision upon the property prior to exemption.

(7) As used in this
section:

(a) "Group
home" means a single-family dwelling financed, in whole or in part, by the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development or by an
affordable housing levy under RCW 84.52.105. The residents of a group home
shall not be considered to jointly constitute a household, but each resident
shall be considered to be a separate household occupying a separate dwelling
unit. The individual incomes of the residents shall not be aggregated for
purposes of this exemption;

(b) "Mobile home
lot" or "mobile home park" means the same as these terms are
defined in RCW 59.20.030;

(c) "Occupied
dwelling unit" means a living unit that is occupied by an individual or
household as of December 31st of the first assessment year the rental housing
becomes operational or is occupied by an individual or household on January 1st
of each subsequent assessment year in which the claim for exemption is submitted.
If the housing facility is comprised of three or fewer dwelling units and there
are any unoccupied units on January 1st, the department shall base the amount
of the exemption upon the number of occupied dwelling units as of December 31st
of the first assessment year the rental housing becomes operational and on May
1st of each subsequent assessment year in which the claim for exemption is
submitted;

(d) "Rental
housing" means a residential housing facility or group home that is
occupied but not owned by very low-income households;

(e) "Very
low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons
living together whose income is at or below fifty percent of the median income
adjusted for family size as most recently determined by the federal department
of housing and urban development for the county in which the rental housing is
located and in effect as of January 1st of the year the application for
exemption is submitted; and

(f) "Nonprofit
entity" means a:

(i) Nonprofit as
defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of
the federal internal revenue code;

(ii) Limited
partnership where a nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code, a public
corporation established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670, or 35.21.730, a housing
authority created under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, or a housing authority
meeting the definition in RCW 35.82.210(2)(a) is a general partner; or

(iii) Limited liability
company where a nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code, a public
corporation established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670, or 35.21.730, a housing
authority established under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, or a housing authority
meeting the definition in RCW 35.82.210(2)(a) is a managing member.

Sec. 415. RCW 88.02.053 and 1996 c
3 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The maritime
historic restoration and preservation account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from the voluntary donations made simultaneously
with the registration of vessels under chapter 88.02 RCW shall be deposited
into this account. These deposits are not public funds and are not subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2) At the end of each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall pay from this account to the department
of licensing an amount equal to the reasonable administrative expenses of that
agency for that fiscal year for collecting the voluntary donations and
transmitting them to the state treasurer and shall pay to the state treasurer
an amount equal to the reasonable administrative expenses of that agency for
that fiscal year for maintaining the account and disbursing funds from the
account.

(3) At the end of each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall pay one-half of the balance of the funds
in the account after payment of the administrative costs provided in subsection
(2) of this section, to the Grays Harbor historical seaport or its corporate
successor and the remainder to the Steamer Virginia V foundation or its
corporate successor.

(4) If either the Grays
Harbor historical seaport and its corporate successors or the Steamer Virginia
V foundation and its corporate successors legally ceases to exist, the state
treasurer shall, at the end of each fiscal year, pay the balance of the funds
in the account to the remaining organization.

(5) If both the Grays
Harbor historical seaport and its corporate successors and the Steamer Virginia
V foundation and its corporate successors legally cease to exist, the
department of licensing shall discontinue the collection of the voluntary
donations in conjunction with the registration of vessels under RCW 88.02.052,
and the balance of the funds in the account escheat to the state. If funds in
the account escheat to the state, one-half of the fund balance shall be
provided to the office of archaeology and historic preservation and the
remainder shall be deposited into the parks renewal and stewardship account.

(6) The secretary of
state, the directors of the state historical societies, the director of the
office of archaeology and historic preservation within the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, and two members
representing the recreational boating community appointed by the secretary of
state, shall review the success of the voluntary donation program for maritime
historic restoration and preservation established under RCW 88.02.052 and
report their findings to the appropriate legislative committees by January 31,
1998. The findings must include the progress of the program and the potential
to expand the voluntary funding to other historic vessels.

Sec. 416. RCW 90.03.247 and 1996 c
186 s 523 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever an application
for a permit to make beneficial use of public waters is approved relating to a
stream or other water body for which minimum flows or levels have been adopted
and are in effect at the time of approval, the permit shall be conditioned to
protect the levels or flows. No agency may establish minimum flows and levels
or similar water flow or level restrictions for any stream or lake of the state
other than the department of ecology whose authority to establish is exclusive,
as provided in chapter 90.03 RCW and RCW 90.22.010 and 90.54.040. The
provisions of other statutes, including but not limited to RCW ((75.20.100))
77.55.100 and chapter 43.21C RCW, may not be interpreted in a manner
that is inconsistent with this section. In establishing such minimum flows,
levels, or similar restrictions, the department shall, during all stages of
development by the department of ecology of minimum flow proposals, consult
with, and carefully consider the recommendations of, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, the department of agriculture, and representatives of the affected
Indian tribes. Nothing herein shall preclude the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, or the department of agriculture from presenting its views on
minimum flow needs at any public hearing or to any person or agency, and the
department of fish and wildlife, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, and the department of agriculture are each
empowered to participate in proceedings of the federal energy regulatory
commission and other agencies to present its views on minimum flow needs.

Sec. 417. RCW 90.71.020 and 1998 c
246 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Puget Sound
action team is created. The action team shall consist of: The directors of
the departments of ecology; agriculture; natural resources; fish and wildlife;
and community((, trade, and economic)) development; the secretaries of
the departments of health and transportation; the director of the parks and
recreation commission; the director of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation; the administrative officer of the conservation commission
designated in RCW 89.08.050; one person representing cities, appointed by the
governor; one person representing counties, appointed by the governor; one
person representing federally recognized tribes, appointed by the governor; and
the chair of the action team. The action team shall also include the following
ex officio nonvoting members: The regional director of the United States
environmental protection agency; the regional administrator of the national
marine fisheries service; and the regional supervisor of the United States fish
and wildlife service. The members representing cities and counties shall each
be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) The action team
shall:

(a) Prepare a Puget
Sound work plan and budget for inclusion in the governor's biennial budget;

(b) Coordinate
monitoring and research programs as provided in RCW 90.71.060;

(c) Work under the
direction of the action team chair as provided in RCW 90.71.040;

(d) Coordinate
permitting requirements as necessary to expedite permit issuance for any local
watershed plan developed pursuant to rules adopted under this chapter;

(e) Identify and
resolve any policy or rule conflicts that may exist between one or more
agencies represented on the action team;

(f) Periodically amend
the Puget Sound management plan;

(g) Enter into, amend,
and terminate contracts with individuals, corporations, or research
institutions for the purposes of this chapter;

(h) Receive such gifts,
grants, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of the action team. The action team may expend the same or any income
therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments;

(i) Promote extensive
public participation, and otherwise seek to broadly disseminate information
concerning Puget Sound;

(j) Receive and expend
funding from other public agencies;

(k) To reduce costs and
improve efficiency, review by December 1, 1996, all requirements for reports
and documentation from state agencies and local governments specified in the
plan for the purpose of eliminating and consolidating reporting requirements;
and

(l) Beginning in
December 1998, and every two years thereafter, submit a report to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature that describes and
evaluates the successes and shortcomings of the current work plan relative to
the priority problems identified for each geographic area of Puget Sound.

(3) By July 1, 1996,
the action team shall begin developing its initial work plan, which shall
include the coordination of necessary support staff.

(4) The action team
shall incorporate, to the maximum extent possible, the recommendations of the
council regarding amendments to the Puget Sound management plan and the work
plan.

(5) All proceedings of
the action team are subject to the open public meetings act under chapter 42.30
RCW.

PART
IV

REFERENCES
TO DEPARTMENT OF

TRADE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Sec. 501. RCW 19.27A.020 and 1998
c 245 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No later than
January 1, 1991, the state building code council shall adopt rules to be known
as the Washington state energy code as part of the state building code.

(2) The council shall
follow the legislature's standards set forth in this section to adopt rules to
be known as the Washington state energy code. The Washington state energy code
shall be designed to require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy
efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and heating
equipment efficiencies within that framework. The Washington state energy code
shall be designed to allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or substitute
for building envelope thermal performance.

(3) The Washington
state energy code shall take into account regional climatic conditions.
Climate zone 1 shall include all counties not included in climate zone 2.
Climate zone 2 includes: Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas,
Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties.

(4) The Washington
state energy code for residential buildings shall require:

(a) New residential
buildings that are space heated with electric resistance heating systems to
achieve energy use equivalent to that used in typical buildings constructed
with:

(i) Ceilings insulated
to a level of R‑38. The code shall contain an exception which permits
single rafter or joist vaulted ceilings insulated to a level of R‑30 (R
value includes insulation only);

(ii) In zone 1, walls
insulated to a level of R‑19 (R value includes insulation only), or constructed
with two by four members, R‑13 insulation batts, R‑3.2 insulated
sheathing, and other normal assembly components; in zone 2 walls insulated to a
level of R‑24 (R value includes insulation only), or constructed with two
by six members, R‑22 insulation batts, R‑3.2 insulated sheathing,
and other normal construction assembly components; for the purpose of
determining equivalent thermal performance, the wall U-value shall be 0.058 in
zone 1 and 0.044 in zone 2;

(iii) Below grade
walls, insulated on the interior side, to a level of R‑19 or, if
insulated on the exterior side, to a level of R‑10 in zone 1 and R‑12
in zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);

(iv) Floors over
unheated spaces insulated to a level of R‑30 (R value includes insulation
only);

(v) Slab on grade
floors insulated to a level of R‑10 at the perimeter;

(vi) Double glazed
windows with values not more than U‑0.4;

(vii) In zone 1 the
glazing area may be up to twenty-one percent of floor area and in zone 2 the
glazing area may be up to seventeen percent of floor area where consideration
of the thermal resistance values for other building components and solar heat
gains through the glazing result in thermal performance equivalent to that
achieved with thermal resistance values for other components determined in
accordance with the equivalent thermal performance criteria of (a) of this
subsection and glazing area equal to fifteen percent of the floor area.
Throughout the state for the purposes of determining equivalent thermal
performance, the maximum glazing area shall be fifteen percent of the floor
area; and

(viii) Exterior doors
insulated to a level of R‑5; or an exterior wood door with a thermal
resistance value of less than R‑5 and values for other components
determined in accordance with the equivalent thermal performance criteria of
(a) of this subsection.

(b) New residential
buildings which are space-heated with all other forms of space heating to
achieve energy use equivalent to that used in typical buildings constructed
with:

(i) Ceilings insulated
to a level of R‑30 in zone 1 and R‑38 in zone 2 the code shall
contain an exception which permits single rafter or joist vaulted ceilings
insulated to a level of R‑30 (R value includes insulation only);

(ii) Walls insulated to
a level of R‑19 (R value includes insulation only), or constructed with
two by four members, R‑13 insulation batts, R‑3.2 insulated
sheathing, and other normal assembly components;

(iii) Below grade
walls, insulated on the interior side, to a level of R‑19 or, if
insulated on the exterior side, to a level of R‑10 in zone 1 and R‑12
in zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);

(iv) Floors over
unheated spaces insulated to a level of R‑19 in zone 1 and R‑30 in
zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);

(v) Slab on grade
floors insulated to a level of R‑10 at the perimeter;

(vi) Heat pumps with a
minimum heating season performance factor (HSPF) of 6.8 or with all other
energy sources with a minimum annual fuel utilization efficiency (AFUE) of
seventy-eight percent;

(vii) Double glazed
windows with values not more than U‑0.65 in zone 1 and U‑0.60 in
zone 2. The state building code council, in consultation with the department
of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development, shall
review these U-values, and, if economically justified for consumers, shall
amend the Washington state energy code to improve the U-values by December 1,
1993. The amendment shall not take effect until July 1, 1994; and

(viii) In zone 1, the
maximum glazing area shall be twenty-one percent of the floor area. In zone 2
the maximum glazing area shall be seventeen percent of the floor area.
Throughout the state for the purposes of determining equivalent thermal
performance, the maximum glazing area shall be fifteen percent of the floor
area.

(c) The requirements of
(b)(ii) of this subsection do not apply to residences with log or solid timber
walls with a minimum average thickness of three and one-half inches and with
space heat other than electric resistance.

(d) The state building
code council may approve an energy code for pilot projects of residential
construction that use innovative energy efficiency technologies intended to
result in savings that are greater than those realized in the levels specified
in this section.

(5) U-values for
glazing shall be determined using the area weighted average of all glazing in
the building. U-values for vertical glazing shall be determined, certified,
and labeled in accordance with the appropriate national fenestration rating
council (NFRC) standard, as determined and adopted by the state building code
council. Certification of U-values shall be conducted by a certified,
independent agency licensed by the NFRC. The state building code council may
develop and adopt alternative methods of determining, certifying, and labeling
U-values for vertical glazing that may be used by fenestration manufacturers if
determined to be appropriate by the council. The state building code council
shall review and consider the adoption of the NFRC standards for determining,
certifying, and labeling U-values for doors and skylights when developed and
published by the NFRC. The state building code council may develop and adopt
appropriate alternative methods for determining, certifying, and labeling
U-values for doors and skylights. U-values for doors and skylights determined,
certified, and labeled in accordance with the appropriate NFRC standard shall
be acceptable for compliance with the state energy code. Sealed insulation
glass, where used, shall conform to, or be in the process of being tested for,
ASTM E‑774‑81 class A or better.

(6) The minimum state
energy code for new nonresidential buildings shall be the Washington state
energy code, 1986 edition, as amended.

(7)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington state energy code for
residential structures shall preempt the residential energy code of each city,
town, and county in the state of Washington.

(b) The state energy
code for residential structures does not preempt a city, town, or county's
energy code for residential structures which exceeds the requirements of the
state energy code and which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to
March 1, 1990. Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend
their energy code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.

(8) The state building
code council shall consult with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development as provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior to publication of
proposed rules. The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development shall review the proposed rules for consistency with the
guidelines adopted in subsection (4) of this section. The director of the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
shall recommend to the state building code council any changes necessary to
conform the proposed rules to the requirements of this section.

Sec. 502. RCW 19.29A.010 and 2000
c 213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Biomass
generation" means electricity derived from burning solid organic fuels
from wood, forest, or field residue, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chroma-arsenic.

(2) "Bonneville
power administration system mix" means a generation mix sold by the
Bonneville power administration that is net of any resource specific sales and
that is net of any electricity sold to direct service industrial customers, as
defined in section 3(8) of the Pacific Northwest electric power planning and
conservation act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 839(a)(8)).

(3) "Coal
generation" means the electricity produced by a generating facility that
burns coal as the primary fuel source.

(4)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(5)
"Conservation" means an increase in efficiency in the use of energy
use that yields a decrease in energy consumption while providing the same or
higher levels of service. Conservation includes low-income weatherization
programs.

(6) "Consumer-owned
utility" means a municipal electric utility formed under Title 35 RCW, a
public utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an irrigation district
formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW,
or a mutual corporation or association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, that is
engaged in the business of distributing electricity to more than one retail
electric customer in the state.

(7) "Declared
resource" means an electricity source specifically identified by a retail
supplier to serve retail electric customers. A declared resource includes a
stated quantity of electricity tied directly to a specified generation facility
or set of facilities either through ownership or contract purchase, or a
contractual right to a stated quantity of electricity from a specified
generation facility or set of facilities.

(8)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(9) "Electricity
information coordinator" means the organization selected by the department
under RCW 19.29A.080 to: (a) Compile generation data in the Northwest power
pool by generating project and by resource category; (b) compare the quantity
of electricity from declared resources reported by retail suppliers with
available generation from such resources; (c) calculate the net system power
mix; and (d) coordinate with other comparable organizations in the western
interconnection.

(10) "Electric
meters in service" means those meters that record in at least nine of
twelve calendar months in any calendar year not less than two hundred fifty
kilowatt hours per month.

(11) "Electricity
product" means the electrical energy produced by a generating facility or
facilities that a retail supplier sells or offers to sell to retail electric
customers in the state of Washington, provided that nothing in this title shall
be construed to mean that electricity is a good or product for the purposes of
Title 62A RCW, or any other purpose. It does not include electrical energy
generated on-site at a retail electric customer's premises.

(12) "Electric
utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned utility as defined in
this section.

(13)
"Electricity" means electric energy measured in kilowatt hours, or
electric capacity measured in kilowatts, or both.

(14) "Fuel
mix" means the actual or imputed sources of electricity sold to retail
electric customers, expressed in terms of percentage contribution by resource
category. The total fuel mix included in each disclosure shall total one
hundred percent.

(15) "Geothermal
generation" means electricity derived from thermal energy naturally
produced within the earth.

(16) "Governing
body" means the council of a city or town, the commissioners of an
irrigation district, municipal electric utility, or public utility district, or
the board of directors of an electric cooperative or mutual association that
has the authority to set and approve rates.

(17) "High
efficiency cogeneration" means electricity produced by equipment, such as
heat or steam used for industrial, commercial, heating, or cooling purposes,
that meets the federal energy regulatory commission standards for qualifying
facilities under the public utility regulatory policies act of 1978.

(18)
"Hydroelectric generation" means a power source created when water
flows from a higher elevation to a lower elevation and the flow is converted to
electricity in one or more generators at a single facility.

(19)
"Investor-owned utility" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in distributing
electricity to more than one retail electric customer in the state.

(20) "Landfill gas
generation" means electricity produced by a generating facility that uses
waste gases produced by the decomposition of organic materials in landfills.

(21) "Natural gas
generation" means electricity produced by a generating facility that burns
natural gas as the primary fuel source.

(22) "Northwest
power pool" means the generating resources included in the United States
portion of the Northwest power pool area as defined by the western systems
coordinating council.

(23) "Net system
power mix" means the fuel mix in the Northwest power pool, net of: (a)
Any declared resources in the Northwest power pool identified by in-state retail
suppliers or out-of-state entities that offer electricity for sale to retail
electric customers; (b) any electricity sold by the Bonneville power
administration to direct service industrial customers; and (c) any resource
specific sales made by the Bonneville power administration.

(24) "Oil
generation" means electricity produced by a generating facility that burns
oil as the primary fuel source.

(25) "Proprietary
customer information" means: (a) Information that relates to the source
and amount of electricity used by a retail electric customer, a retail electric
customer's payment history, and household data that is made available by the
customer solely by virtue of the utility-customer relationship; and (b)
information contained in a retail electric customer's bill.

(26) "Renewable
resources" means electricity generation facilities fueled by: (a) Water;
(b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; or (f)
biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field
residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol,
or copper-chrome-arsenic.

(27) "Resale"
means the purchase and subsequent sale of electricity for profit, but does not
include the purchase and the subsequent sale of electricity at the same rate at
which the electricity was purchased.

(28) "Retail
electric customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity for
ultimate consumption and not for resale.

(29) "Retail
supplier" means an electric utility that offers an electricity product for
sale to retail electric customers in the state.

(30) "Small
utility" means any consumer-owned utility with twenty-five thousand or
fewer electric meters in service, or that has an average of seven or fewer
customers per mile of distribution line.

(31) "Solar
generation" means electricity derived from radiation from the sun that is
directly or indirectly converted to electrical energy.

(32) "State"
means the state of Washington.

(33) "Waste
incineration generation" means electricity derived from burning solid or
liquid wastes from businesses, households, municipalities, or waste treatment
operations.

(34) "Wind
generation" means electricity created by movement of air that is converted
to electrical energy.

Sec. 503. RCW 24.46.010 and 1995 c
399 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the finding of
the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important public purpose by
the creation of employment opportunities within the state and that the
establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be encouraged.
It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development provide assistance to entities
planning to apply to the United States for permission to establish such zones.

Sec. 504. RCW 28A.515.320 and 1996
c 186 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

The common school
construction fund is to be used exclusively for the purpose of financing the
construction of facilities for the common schools. The sources of said fund
shall be: (1) Those proceeds derived from sale or appropriation of timber and
other crops from school and state land other than those granted for specific
purposes; (2) the interest accruing on the permanent common school fund less
the allocations to the state treasurer's service ((account [fund])) fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account
pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and other revenue derived
therefrom and from land and other property devoted to the permanent common
school fund; (3) all moneys received by the state from the United States under
the provisions of section 191, Title 30, United States Code, Annotated, and
under section 810, chapter 12, Title 16, (Conservation), United States Code,
Annotated, except moneys received before June 30, 2001, and when thirty
megawatts of geothermal power is certified as commercially available by the
receiving utilities and the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development, eighty percent of such moneys, under the Geothermal
Steam Act of 1970 pursuant to RCW 43.140.030; and (4) such other sources as the
legislature may direct. That portion of the common school construction fund
derived from interest on the permanent common school fund may be used to retire
such bonds as may be authorized by law for the purpose of financing the
construction of facilities for the common schools.

The interest accruing
on the permanent common school fund less the allocations to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment
board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and
other revenues accruing thereto pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
prior to July 1, 1967, shall be exclusively applied to the current use of the
common schools.

To the extent that the
moneys in the common school construction fund are in excess of the amount
necessary to allow fulfillment of the purpose of said fund, the excess shall be
available for deposit to the credit of the permanent common school fund or
available for the current use of the common schools, as the legislature may
direct. Any money from the common school construction fund which is made
available for the current use of the common schools shall be restored to the
fund by appropriation, including interest income foregone, before the end of
the next fiscal biennium following such use.

Sec. 505. RCW 28B.20.283 and 1995
c 399 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the development and commercialization of new technology is a vital part of
economic development.

The legislature also
finds that it is in the interests of the state of Washington to provide a
mechanism to transfer and apply research and technology developed at the
institutions of higher education to the private sector in order to create new
products and technologies which provide job opportunities in advanced
technology for the citizens of this state.

It is the intent of the
legislature that the University of Washington, the Washington State University,
and the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development work cooperatively with the private sector in the development and
implementation of a world class technology transfer program.

Sec. 506. RCW 28B.20.289 and 1995
c 399 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The technology
center shall be administered by the board of directors of the technology
center.

(2) The board shall
consist of the following members: Fourteen members from among individuals who
are associated with or employed by technology-based industries and have broad
business experience and an understanding of high technology; eight members from
the state's universities with graduate science and engineering programs; the
executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and Technology
Institute or his or her designated representative; the provost of the
University of Washington or his or her designated representative; the provost
of the Washington State University or his or her designated representative; and
the director of the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development or his or her designated representative. The term of
office for each board member, excluding the executive director of the Spokane
Intercollegiate Research and Technology Institute, the provost of the
University of Washington, the provost of the Washington State University, and
the director of the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development, shall be three years. The executive director of the
technology center shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of the board. The
board shall meet at least quarterly. Board members shall be appointed by the
governor based on the recommendations of the existing board of the technology
center, and the research universities. The governor shall stagger the terms of
the first group of appointees to ensure the long term continuity of the board.

(3) The duties of the
board include:

(a) Developing the
general operating policies for the technology center;

(b) Appointing the
executive director of the technology center;

(c) Approving the
annual operating budget of the technology center;

(d) Establishing
priorities for the selection and funding of research projects that guarantee
the greatest potential return on the state's investment;

(e) Approving and
allocating funding for research projects conducted by the technology center,
based on the recommendations of the advisory committees for each of the
research centers;

(f) In cooperation with
the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, developing a biennial work plan and five-year strategic plan for
the technology center that are consistent with the statewide technology
development and commercialization goals;

(g) Coordinating with
the University of Washington, Washington State University, and other
participating institutions of higher education in the development of training,
research, and development programs to be conducted at the technology center
that shall be targeted to meet industrial needs;

(h) Assisting the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
in the department's efforts to develop state science and technology public
policies and coordinate publicly funded programs;

(i) Reviewing annual
progress reports on funded research projects that are prepared by the advisory
committees for each of the research centers;

(j) Providing an annual
report to the governor and the legislature detailing the activities and
performance of the technology center; and

(k) Submitting annually
to the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development an updated strategic plan and a statement of performance measured
against the mission, roles, and contractual obligations of the technology
center.

Sec. 507. RCW 28B.20.293 and 1995
c 399 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall contract with the University
of Washington for the expenditure of state-appropriated funds for the operation
of the Washington technology center. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall provide guidance to the
technology center regarding expenditure of state-appropriated funds and the
development of the center's strategic plan. The director of the department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development shall not
withhold funds appropriated for the technology center if the technology center
complies with the provisions of its contract with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development. The department shall be
responsible to the legislature for the contractual performance of the center.

Sec. 508. RCW 28B.30.537 and 1998
c 245 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The IMPACT center
shall:

(1) Coordinate the
teaching, research, and extension expertise of the college of agriculture and
home economics at Washington State University to assist in:

(a) The design and
development of information and strategies to expand the long-term international
markets for Washington agricultural products; and

(b) The dissemination
of such information and strategies to Washington exporters, overseas users, and
public and private trade organizations;

(2) Research and
identify current impediments to increased exports of Washington agricultural
products, and determine methods of surmounting those impediments and
opportunities for exporting new agricultural products and commodities to
foreign markets;

(3) Prepare curricula
to present and distribute information concerning international trade in
agricultural commodities and products to students, exporters, international
traders, and the public;

(4) Provide
high-quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree
training in international trade in agricultural commodities in cooperation with
other existing programs;

(5) Ensure that
activities of the center adequately reflect the objectives for the state's
agricultural market development programs established by the department of
agriculture as the lead state agency for such programs under chapter 43.23 RCW;
and

(6) Link itself through
cooperative agreements with the center for international trade in forest
products at the University of Washington, the state department of agriculture,
the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, Washington's agriculture businesses and associations, and other
state agency data collection, processing, and dissemination efforts.

Sec. 509. RCW 28B.30.900 and 1996
c 186 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the state energy office under RCW 43.21F.045 relating to
implementing energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs shall be transferred to Washington State University.

(2) The specific
programs transferred to Washington State University shall include but not be
limited to the following: Renewable energy, energy software, industrial energy
efficiency, education and information, energy ideas clearinghouse, and
telecommunications.

(3)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of Washington State
University. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, data base,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state energy office
in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made
available to Washington State University.

(b) Any appropriations
made to, any other funds provided to, or any grants made to or contracts with
the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall, on July 1, 1996, be transferred and credited to Washington
State University.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, an arbitrator mutually agreed upon by the parties in
dispute shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the
same to the state agencies concerned.

(d) All rules and all
pending business before the state energy office pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by
Washington State University. All existing contracts, grants, and obligations,
excluding personnel contracts and obligations, shall remain in full force and
shall be assigned to and performed by Washington State University.

(e) The transfer of the
powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office does not affect the
validity of any act performed before July 1, 1996.

(f) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of the office of financial management shall certify the
apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation.

(4) Washington State
University shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development regarding the relationship between
policy development and public outreach. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall provide Washington State University
available existing and future oil overcharge restitution and federal energy
block funding for a minimum period of five years to carry out energy programs.
Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996 prohibits Washington State University from
seeking grant funding for energy-related programs directly from other entities.

(5) Washington State
University shall select and appoint existing state energy office employees to
positions to perform the duties and functions transferred. Employees appointed
by Washington State University are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06
RCW unless otherwise designated by the institution. Any future vacant or new
positions will be filled using Washington State University's standard hiring
procedures.

Sec. 510. RCW 28B.38.020 and 1998
c 344 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The institute shall
be administered by the board of directors.

(2) The board shall
consist of the following members:

(a) Nine members of the
general public. Of the general public membership, at least six shall be
individuals who are associated with or employed by technology-based or
manufacturing-based industries and have broad business experience and an
understanding of high technology;

(b) The executive director
of the Washington technology center or the director's designee;

(c) The provost of
Washington State University or the provost's designee;

(d) The provost of
Eastern Washington University or the provost's designee;

(e) The provost of
Central Washington University or the provost's designee;

(f) The provost of the
University of Washington or the provost's designee;

(g) An academic
representative from the Spokane community colleges;

(h) One member from
Gonzaga University; and

(i) One member from
Whitworth College.

(3) The term of office
for each board member, excluding the executive director of the Washington
technology center, the provosts of Washington State University, Eastern
Washington University, Central Washington University, and the University of
Washington, shall be three years. The executive director of the institute
shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of the board. Board members shall be
appointed by the governor. Initial appointments shall be for staggered terms
to ensure the long-term continuity of the board. The board shall meet at least
quarterly.

(4) The duties of the
board include:

(a) Developing the
general operating policies for the institute;

(b) Appointing the
executive director of the institute;

(c) Approving the
annual operating budget of the institute;

(d) Establishing
priorities for the selection and funding of research projects that guarantee
the greatest potential return on the state's investment;

(e) Approving and
allocating funding for research projects conducted by the institute;

(f) In cooperation with
the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, developing a biennial work plan and five-year strategic plan for
the institute that are consistent with the statewide technology development and
commercialization goals;

(g) Coordinating with
public, independent, and private institutions of higher education, and other
participating institutions of higher education in the development of training,
research, and development programs to be conducted at the institute that are
targeted to meet industrial needs;

(h) Assisting the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
in the department's efforts to develop state science and technology public
policies and coordinate publicly funded programs;

(i) Reviewing annual
progress reports on funded research projects;

(j) Providing an annual
report to the governor and the legislature detailing the activities and
performance of the institute; and

(k) Submitting annually
to the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development an updated strategic plan and a statement of performance measured
against the mission, roles, and contractual obligations of the institute.

(5) The
board may enter into contracts to fulfill its responsibilities and purposes
under this chapter.

Sec. 511. RCW 28B.38.050 and 1998
c 344 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
shall contract with the institute for the expenditure of state-appropriated
funds for the operation of the institute. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall provide guidance to the
institute regarding expenditure of state-appropriated funds and the development
of the institute's strategic plan. The director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall not withhold funds
appropriated for the institute if the institute complies with the provisions of
its contract with the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development. The department is responsible to the legislature for the
contractual performance of the institute.

Sec. 512. RCW 28B.50.262 and 1995
c 226 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The state board for
community and technical colleges shall develop, in conjunction with the center
for international trade in forest products, the Washington State University
wood materials and engineering laboratory, and the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, a competency-based technical degree
program in wood product manufacturing and wood technology and make it available
in every college district that serves a rural natural resources impact area.

Sec. 513. RCW 28B.65.040 and 1995
c 399 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
high-technology coordinating board is hereby created.

(2) The board shall be
composed of eighteen members as follows:

(a) Eleven shall be
citizen members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, for
four-year terms. In making the appointments the governor shall ensure that a
balanced geographic representation of the state is achieved and shall attempt
to choose persons experienced in high-technology fields, including at least one
representative of labor. Any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring
before a term expires shall be appointed only for the remainder of that term;
and

(b) Seven of the
members shall be as follows: One representative from each of the state's two
research universities, one representative of the state college and regional
universities, the director for the state system of community and technical
colleges or the director's designee, the superintendent of public instruction
or the superintendent's designee, a representative of the higher education
coordinating board, and the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or the director's designee.

(3) Members of the
board shall not receive any salary for their services, but shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for each day actually
spent in attending to duties as a member of the board.

(4) A
citizen member of the board shall not be, during the term of office, a member
of the governing board of any public or private educational institution, or an
employee of any state or local agency.

Sec. 514. RCW 28B.65.050 and 1998
c 245 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
oversee, coordinate, and evaluate the high-technology programs.

(2) The board shall:

(a) Determine the
specific high-technology occupational fields in which technical training is
needed and advise the institutions of higher education and the higher education
coordinating board on their findings;

(b) Identify economic
areas and high-technology industries in need of technical training and research
and development critical to economic development and advise the institutions of
higher education and the higher education coordinating board on their findings;

(c) Oversee and
coordinate the Washington high-technology education and training program to
ensure high standards, efficiency, and effectiveness;

(d) Work cooperatively
with the superintendent of public instruction to identify the skills
prerequisite to the high-technology programs in the institutions of higher
education;

(e) Work cooperatively
with and provide any information or advice which may be requested by the higher
education coordinating board during the board's review of new baccalaureate
degree program proposals which are submitted under this chapter. Nothing in
this chapter shall be construed as altering or superseding the powers or
prerogatives of the higher education coordinating board over the review of new
degree programs as established in ((section 6(2) of this 1985 act)) RCW
28B.80.340;

(f) Work cooperatively
with the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development to identify the high-technology education and training needs of
existing Washington businesses and businesses with the potential to locate in
Washington;

(g) Work towards
increasing private sector participation and contributions in Washington
high-technology programs;

(h) Identify and
evaluate the effectiveness of state sponsored research related to high
technology; and

(i) Establish and
maintain a plan, including priorities, to guide high-technology program
development in public institutions of higher education, which plan shall
include an assessment of current high-technology programs, steps to increase
existing programs, new initiatives and programs necessary to promote high
technology, and methods to coordinate and target high-technology programs to
changing market opportunities in business and industry.

(3) The board may adopt
rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes
of this chapter.

(4) The board shall
cease to exist on June 30, 1987, unless extended by law for an additional fixed
period of time.

Sec. 515. RCW 28B.65.060 and 1995
c 399 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

Staff support for the
high-technology coordinating board shall be provided by the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development.

Sec. 516. RCW 28B.109.020 and 1996
c 253 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington
international exchange scholarship program is created subject to funding under
RCW 28B.109.060. The program shall be administered by the board. In
administering the program, the board may:

(1) Convene an advisory
committee that may include but need not be limited to representatives of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, the secretary of state, private
business, and institutions of higher education;

(2) Select students to
receive the scholarship with the assistance of a screening committee composed
of leaders in business, international trade, and education;

(3) Adopt necessary
rules and guidelines including rules for disbursing scholarship funds to
participants;

(4) Publicize the
program;

(5) Solicit and accept
grants and donations from public and private sources for the program;

(6) Establish and
notify participants of service obligations; and

(7) Establish a formula
for selecting the countries from which participants may be selected in
consultation with the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development.

Sec. 517. RCW 28C.18.060 and 1996
c 99 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, in
cooperation with the operating agencies of the state training system and
private career schools and colleges shall:

(1) Concentrate its
major efforts on planning, coordination evaluation, policy analysis, and
recommending improvements to the state's training system.

(2) Advocate for the
state training system and for meeting the needs of employers and the work force
for work force education and training.

(3) Establish and
maintain an inventory of the programs of the state training system, and related
state programs, and perform a biennial assessment of the vocational education,
training, and adult basic education and literacy needs of the state; identify
ongoing and strategic education needs; and assess the extent to which
employment, training, vocational and basic education, rehabilitation services,
and public assistance services represent a consistent, integrated approach to
meet such needs.

(4) Develop and
maintain a state comprehensive plan for work force training and education,
including but not limited to, goals, objectives, and priorities for the state
training system, and review the state training system for consistency with the
state comprehensive plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan for work
force training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be limited
to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office of
financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management and
employment security department labor force, industry employment, and
occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based outcome, net-impact
and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of employers as evidenced in formal
employer surveys and other employer input; and the needs of program
participants and workers as evidenced in formal surveys and other input from
program participants and the labor community.

(5) In consultation
with the higher education coordinating board, review and make recommendations
to the office of financial management and the legislature on operating and
capital facilities budget requests for operating agencies of the state training
system for purposes of consistency with the state comprehensive plan for work
force training and education.

(6) Provide for
coordination among the different operating agencies and components of the state
training system at the state level and at the regional level.

(7) Develop a
consistent and reliable data base on vocational education enrollments, costs,
program activities, and job placements from publicly funded vocational
education programs in this state.

(8) Establish standards
for data collection and maintenance for the operating agencies of the state
training system in a format that is accessible to use by the board. The board
shall require a minimum of common core data to be collected by each operating
agency of the state training system.

The board shall develop
requirements for minimum common core data in consultation with the office of
financial management and the operating agencies of the training system.

(9) Establish minimum
standards for program evaluation for the operating agencies of the state
training system, including, but not limited to, the use of common survey
instruments and procedures for measuring perceptions of program participants
and employers of program participants, and monitor such program evaluation.

(10) Every two years
administer scientifically based outcome evaluations of the state training
system, including, but not limited to, surveys of program participants, surveys
of employers of program participants, and matches with employment security
department payroll and wage files. Every five years administer scientifically
based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the state training system.

(11) In cooperation
with the employment security department, provide for the improvement and
maintenance of quality and utility in occupational information and forecasts
for use in training system planning and evaluation. Improvements shall
include, but not be limited to, development of state-based occupational change
factors involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of skill
and training requirements by education level associated with current and
forecasted occupations.

(12) Provide for the
development of common course description formats, common reporting
requirements, and common definitions for operating agencies of the training
system.

(13) Provide for
effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the state training system.

(14) In cooperation
with the higher education coordinating board, facilitate transfer of credit
policies and agreements between institutions of the state training system, and
encourage articulation agreements for programs encompassing two years of
secondary work force education and two years of postsecondary work force
education.

(15) In cooperation
with the higher education coordinating board, facilitate transfer of credit
policies and agreements between private training institutions and institutions
of the state training system.

(16) Participate in the
development of coordination criteria for activities under the job training
partnership act with related programs and services provided by state and local
education and training agencies.

(17) Make
recommendations to the commission of student assessment, the state board of
education, and the superintendent of public instruction, concerning basic skill
competencies and essential core competencies for K‑12 education. Basic
skills for this purpose shall be reading, writing, computation, speaking, and
critical thinking, essential core competencies for this purpose shall be
English, math, science/technology, history, geography, and critical thinking.
The board shall monitor the development of and provide advice concerning
secondary curriculum which integrates vocational and academic education.

(18) Establish and
administer programs for marketing and outreach to businesses and potential
program participants.

(19) Facilitate the
location of support services, including but not limited to, child care,
financial aid, career counseling, and job placement services, for students and
trainees at institutions in the state training system, and advocate for support
services for trainees and students in the state training system.

(20) Facilitate private
sector assistance for the state training system, including but not limited to:
Financial assistance, rotation of private and public personnel, and vocational
counseling.

(21) Facilitate
programs for school-to-work transition that combine classroom education and
on-the-job training in industries and occupations without a significant number
of apprenticeship programs.

(22) Encourage and
assess progress for the equitable representation of racial and ethnic
minorities, women, and people with disabilities among the students, teachers,
and administrators of the state training system. Equitable, for this purpose,
shall mean substantially proportional to their percentage of the state
population in the geographic area served. This function of the board shall in
no way lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for representation
of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities.

(23) Participate in the
planning and policy development of governor set-aside grants under P.L. 97‑300,
as amended.

(24) Administer
veterans' programs, licensure of private vocational schools, the job skills
program, and the Washington award for vocational excellence.

(25) Allocate funding
from the state job training trust fund.

(26) Work with the
director of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development to
ensure coordination between work force training priorities and that
department's economic development efforts.

(27) Adopt rules as
necessary to implement this chapter.

The board may delegate
to the director any of the functions of this section.

Sec. 518. RCW 36.01.120 and 1995 c
399 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the finding of
the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important public purpose by
the creation of employment opportunities within the state and that the
establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be
encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development provide
assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to
establish such zones.

Sec. 519. RCW 36.110.030 and 1995
c 399 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

A statewide jail
industries board of directors is established. The board shall consist of the
following members:

(1) One sheriff and one
police chief, to be selected by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs;

(2) One county
commissioner or one county councilmember to be selected by the Washington state
association of counties;

(3) One city official
to be selected by the association of Washington cities;

(4) Two jail
administrators to be selected by the Washington state jail association, one of
whom shall be from a county or a city with an established jail industries
program;

(5) One prosecuting
attorney to be selected by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(6) One administrator
from a city or county corrections department to be selected by the Washington
correctional association;

(7) One county clerk to
be selected by the Washington association of county clerks;

(8) Three
representatives from labor to be selected by the governor. The representatives
may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by statewide labor
organizations representing a cross-section of trade organizations;

(9) Three
representatives from business to be selected by the governor. The
representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by statewide
business organizations representing a cross-section of businesses, industries,
and all sizes of employers;

(10) The governor's
representative from the employment security department;

(11) One member
representing crime victims, to be selected by the governor;

(12) One member
representing on-line law enforcement officers, to be selected by the governor;

(13) One member from
the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development to be selected by the governor;

(14) One member
representing higher education, vocational education, or adult basic education
to be selected by the governor; and

(15) The governor's
representative from the correctional industries division of the state
department of corrections shall be an ex officio member for the purpose of
coordination and cooperation between prison and jail industries and to further
a positive relationship between state and local government offender programs.

Sec. 520. RCW 39.86.110 and 1995 c
399 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Agency"
means the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development.

(2) "Board"
means the community economic revitalization board established under chapter
43.160 RCW.

(3) "Bonds"
means bonds, notes, or other obligations of an issuer.

(4) "Bond use
category" means any of the following categories of bonds which are subject
to the state ceiling: (a) Housing, (b) student loans, (c) small issue, (d)
exempt facility, (e) redevelopment, (f) public utility; and (g) remainder.

(5)
"Carryforward" is an allocation or reallocation of the state ceiling
which is carried from one calendar year to a later year, in accordance with the
code.

(6) "Code"
means the federal internal revenue code of 1986 as it exists on May 8, 1987.
It also means the code as amended after May 8, 1987, but only if the amendments
are approved by the agency under RCW 39.86.180.

(7)
"Director" means the director of the agency or the director's
designee.

(8) "Exempt
facility" means the bond use category which includes all bonds which are
exempt facility bonds as described in the code, except those for qualified residential
rental projects.

(9) "Firm and
convincing evidence" means documentation that satisfies the director that
the issuer is committed to the prompt financing of, and will issue tax exempt
bonds for, the project or program for which it requests an allocation from the
state ceiling.

(10)
"Housing" means the bond use category which includes: (a) Mortgage
revenue bonds and mortgage credit certificates as described in the code; and
(b) exempt facility bonds for qualified residential rental projects as described
in the code.

(11) "Initial
allocation" means the portion or dollar value of the state ceiling which
initially in each calendar year is allocated to a bond use category for the
issuance of private activity bonds, in accordance with RCW 39.86.120.

(12) "Issuer"
means the state, any agency or instrumentality of the state, any political
subdivision, or any other entity authorized to issue private activity bonds
under state law.

(13) "Private
activity bonds" means obligations that are private activity bonds as
defined in the code or bonds for purposes described in section 1317(25) of the
tax reform act of 1986.

(14)
"Program" means the activities for which housing bonds or student
loan bonds may be issued.

(15) "Public
utility" means the bond use category which includes those bonds described
in section 1317(25) of the tax reform act of 1986.

(16)
"Redevelopment" means the bond use category which includes qualified
redevelopment bonds as described in the code.

(17)
"Remainder" means that portion of the state ceiling remaining after
initial allocations are made under RCW 39.86.120 for any other bond use
category.

(18) "Small
issue" means the bond use category which includes all industrial
development bonds that constitute qualified small issue bonds, as described in
the code.

(19) "State"
means the state of Washington.

(20) "State
ceiling" means the volume limitation for each calendar year on tax-exempt
private activity bonds, as imposed by the code.

(21) "Student
loans" means the bond use category which includes qualified student loan
bonds as described in the code.

Sec. 521. RCW 43.17.065 and 1995 c
226 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Where power is
vested in a department to issue permits, licenses, certifications, contracts,
grants, or otherwise authorize action on the part of individuals, businesses,
local governments, or public or private organizations, such power shall be
exercised in an expeditious manner. All departments with such power shall
cooperate with officials of the ((business assistance center of the))
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
and any other state officials, when such officials request timely action on the
part of the issuing department.

(2) ((After August
1, 1991,)) Any agency to which subsection (1) of this section
applies shall, with regard to any permits or other actions that are necessary
for economic development in rural natural resources impact areas, as defined in
RCW 43.31.601, respond to any completed application within forty-five days of
its receipt; any response, at a minimum, shall include:

(a) The specific steps
that the applicant needs to take in order to have the application approved; and

(b) The assistance that
will be made available to the applicant by the agency to expedite the
application process.

(3) The agency rural
community assistance task force established in RCW 43.31.621 shall oversee
implementation of this section.

(4) Each agency shall
define what constitutes a completed application and make this definition
available to applicants.

Sec. 522. RCW 42.17.319 and 2001 c
87 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 42.17.260 through 42.17.340, the following information
supplied to the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(a) Financial and
proprietary information collected from any person and provided to the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and

(b) Financial or
proprietary information collected from any person and provided to the
department or the office of the governor in connection with the siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's business and
until a siting decision is made, identifying information of any person
supplying information under this section and the locations being considered for
siting, relocation, or expansion of a business.

(2) Any work product
developed by the department based on information as described in subsection
(1)(a) of this section is not exempt from disclosure.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "siting decision" means the decision to acquire or not
to acquire a site.

(4) If there is no
written contact for a period of sixty days to the department from a person
connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business, information described in subsection (1)(b) of this section
will be available to the public under the provisions of RCW 42.17.250 through
42.17.340.

(5) Nothing in this
section shall apply to records of any other state agency or of a local agency.

Sec. 523. RCW 43.20A.750 and 1997
c 367 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
social and health services shall help families and workers in rural natural
resources impact areas make the transition through economic difficulties and
shall provide services to assist workers to gain marketable skills. The
department, as a member of the agency rural community assistance task force
and, where appropriate, under an interagency agreement with the department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development, shall provide
grants through the office of the secretary for services to the unemployed in
rural natural resources impact areas and to dislocated salmon fishing workers
as defined in RCW 43.63A.021 (as recodified by this act) who live in
urban areas of qualifying rural natural resource impact counties, including
providing direct or referral services, establishing and operating service
delivery programs, and coordinating delivery programs and delivery of
services. These grants may be awarded for family support centers, reemployment
centers, or other local service agencies.

(2) The services
provided through the grants may include, but need not be limited to: Credit
counseling; social services including marital counseling; psychotherapy or
psychological counseling; mortgage foreclosures and utilities problems
counseling; drug and alcohol abuse services; medical services; and residential
heating and food acquisition.

(3) Funding for these
services shall be coordinated through the agency rural community assistance
task force which will establish a fund to provide child care assistance,
mortgage assistance, and counseling which cannot be met through current
programs. No funds shall be used for additional full-time equivalents for
administering this section.

(4)(a) Grants for
family support centers are intended to provide support to families by
responding to needs identified by the families and communities served by the
centers. Services provided by family support centers may include parenting
education, child development assessments, health and nutrition education,
counseling, and information and referral services. Such services may be
provided directly by the center or through referral to other agencies
participating in the interagency team.

(b) The department
shall consult with the council on child abuse or neglect regarding grants for
family support centers.

(5) "Rural natural
resources impact area" means:

(a) A nonmetropolitan
county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (6) of this section;

(b) A nonmetropolitan
county with a population of less than forty thousand in the 1990 decennial census,
that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in subsection (6) of this
section; or

(c) A nonurbanized
area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located in a
metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(6) of this section.

(6) For the purposes of
designating rural natural resources impact areas, the following criteria shall
be considered:

(a) A lumber and wood
products employment location quotient at or above the state average;

(b) A commercial salmon
fishing employment location quotient at or above the state average;

(c) Projected or actual
direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred positions or more;

(d) Projected or actual
direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred positions or more;
and

(e) An unemployment
rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The counties that meet
these criteria shall be determined by the employment security department for
the most recent year for which data is available. For the purposes of
administration of programs under this chapter, the United States post office
five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine residence status
for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized area is
considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip codes qualifying
as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered nonurbanized. The
office of financial management shall make available a zip code listing of the
areas to all agencies and organizations providing services under this chapter.

Sec. 524. RCW 43.21A.510 and 1995
c 399 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to assist the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
in providing information to businesses interested in locating in Washington
state, the department shall develop an environmental profile of the state.
This profile shall identify the state's natural resources and describe how
these assets are valuable to industry. Examples of information to be included
are water resources and quality, air quality, and recreational opportunities
related to natural resources.

Sec. 525. RCW 43.21A.515 and 1995
c 399 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to emphasize
the importance of the state's environmental laws and regulations and to
facilitate compliance with them, the department of ecology shall provide assistance
to businesses interested in locating in Washington state. When the department
of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development receives a
query from an interested business through its industrial marketing activities,
it shall arrange for the department of ecology to provide information on the
state's environmental laws and regulations and methods of compliance. This
section shall facilitate compliance with state environmental laws and
regulations and shall not weaken their application or effectiveness.

Sec. 526. RCW 43.21F.025 and 1996
c 186 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Energy"
means petroleum or other liquid fuels; natural or synthetic fuel gas; solid
carbonaceous fuels; fissionable nuclear material; electricity; solar radiation;
geothermal resources; hydropower; organic waste products; wind; tidal activity;
any other substance or process used to produce heat, light, or motion; or the
savings from nongeneration technologies, including conservation or improved
efficiency in the usage of any of the sources described in this subsection;

(2) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation,
association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal
corporation, government agency, public utility district, joint operating
agency, or any other entity, public or private, however organized;

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development;

(4) "Assistant
director" means the assistant director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development responsible for energy policy
activities;

(5)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development;

(6)
"Distributor" means any person, private corporation, partnership,
individual proprietorship, utility, including investor-owned utilities,
municipal utility, public utility district, joint operating agency, or
cooperative, which engages in or is authorized to engage in the activity of
generating, transmitting, or distributing energy in this state; and

(7) "State energy
strategy" means the document and energy policy direction developed under
section 1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991 including any related appendices.

Sec. 527. RCW 43.21F.090 and 1996
c 186 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

With the guidance of
an advisory committee, the department shall review the state energy
strategy as originally developed under section 1, chapter 201, Laws of
1991, ((periodically with the guidance of an advisory committee)) and
subsequently revised. ((For each review,)) An advisory
committee shall be established with a membership resembling ((as closely as
possible)) but not limited by the composition of the original energy
strategy advisory committee specified under section 1, chapter 201, Laws of
1991. Upon completion of ((a)) one or more public hearings
regarding the advisory committee's advice and recommendations for revisions to
the energy strategy, a written report shall be conveyed by the department to
the governor and the appropriate legislative committees. Any advisory
committee established under this section shall be ((dissolved within three months
after their written report is conveyed)) the advisory committee for the
energy division.

Sec. 528. RCW 43.21G.010 and 1996
c 186 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that energy in various forms is increasingly subject to possible shortages and
supply disruptions, to the point that there may be foreseen an emergency
situation, and that without the ability to institute appropriate emergency
measures to regulate the production, distribution, and use of energy, a severe
impact on the public health, safety, and general welfare of our state's
citizens may occur. The prevention or mitigation of such energy shortages or
disruptions and their effects is necessary for preservation of the public health,
safety, and general welfare of the citizens of this state.

It is the intent of
this chapter to:

(1) Establish necessary
emergency powers for the governor and define the situations under which such
powers are to be exercised;

(2) Provide penalties
for violations of this chapter.

It is further the
intent of the legislature that in developing proposed orders under the powers
granted in RCW 43.21G.040 as now or hereafter amended the governor may utilize,
on a temporary or ad hoc basis, the knowledge and expertise of persons
experienced in the technical aspects of energy supply, distribution, or use.
Such utilization shall be in addition to support received by the governor from
the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development under RCW 43.21F.045 ((and 43.21F.065)) and from other state
agencies.

Sec. 529. RCW 43.23.035 and 1995 c
399 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
agriculture is hereby designated as the agency of state government for the
administration and implementation of state agricultural market development
programs and activities, both domestic and foreign, and shall, in addition to
the powers and duties otherwise imposed by law, have the following powers and
duties:

(1) To study the
potential marketability of various agricultural commodities of this state in
foreign and domestic trade;

(2) To collect,
prepare, and analyze foreign and domestic market data;

(3) To establish a
program to promote and assist in the marketing of Washington-bred horses:
PROVIDED, That the department shall present a proposal to the legislature no
later than December 1, 1986, that provides for the elimination of all state
funding for the program after June 30, 1989;

(4) To encourage and
promote the sale of Washington's agricultural commodities and products at the
site of their production through the development and dissemination of referral
maps and other means;

(5) To encourage and
promote those agricultural industries, such as the wine industry, which attract
visitors to rural areas in which other agricultural commodities and products
are produced and are, or could be, made available for sale;

(6) To encourage and
promote the establishment and use of public markets in this state for the sale
of Washington's agricultural products;

(7) To maintain close
contact with foreign firms and governmental agencies and to act as an effective
intermediary between foreign nations and Washington traders;

(8) To publish and
disseminate to interested citizens and others information which will aid in
carrying out the purposes of chapters 43.23, 15.64, 15.65, and 15.66 RCW;

(9) To encourage and
promote the movement of foreign and domestic agricultural goods through the
ports of Washington;

(10) To conduct an active
program by sending representatives to, or engaging representatives in, foreign
countries to promote the state's agricultural commodities and products;

(11) To assist and to
make Washington agricultural concerns more aware of the potentials of foreign
trade and to encourage production of those commodities that will have high
export potential and appeal;

(12) To coordinate the
trade promotional activities of appropriate federal, state, and local public
agencies, as well as civic organizations; and

(13) To develop a
coordinated marketing program with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, utilizing existing trade offices
and participating in mutual trade missions and activities.

As used in this
section, "agricultural commodities" includes products of both
terrestrial and aquatic farming.

Sec. 530. RCW 43.31.805 and 1998 c
345 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The state trade fair
fund is created in the custody of the state treasury. All moneys received by
the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development for the purposes of this fund shall be deposited into the fund.
Expenditures from the fund may be used only for the purpose of assisting state
trade fairs. Only the director of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

Sec. 531. RCW 43.63A.230 and 1993
c 280 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall integrate an employee
ownership program within its existing technical assistance programs. The
employee ownership program shall provide technical assistance to cooperatives
authorized under chapter 23.78 RCW and conduct educational programs on employee
ownership and self-management. The department shall include information on the
option of employee ownership wherever appropriate in its various programs.

(2) The department
shall maintain a list of firms and individuals with expertise in the field of
employee ownership and utilize such firms and individuals, as appropriate, in
delivering and coordinating the delivery of technical, managerial, and
educational services. In addition, the department shall work with and rely on
the services of the employment security department and state institutions of
higher education to promote employee ownership.

(3) ((The department
shall report to the governor, the appropriate economic development committees
of the senate and the house of representatives, and the ways and means
committees of each house by December 1 of 1988, and each year thereafter, on
the accomplishments of the employee-ownership program. Such reports shall
include the number and types of firms assisted, the number of jobs created by
such firms, the types of services, the number of workshops presented, the
number of employees trained, and the results of client satisfaction surveys
distributed to those using the services of the program.

(4))) For purposes of this section, an employee
stock ownership plan qualifies as a cooperative if at least fifty percent, plus
one share, of its voting shares of stock are voted on a one-person-one-vote
basis.

Sec. 532. RCW 43.88.093 and 1998 c
299 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When developing a
biennial budget for the tourism development division of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, the request for funding submitted
to the office of financial management shall be calculated according to the
formula in RCW 43.88.094. The request shall be a specific designated amount in
the budget request for the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(2) This section
expires June 30, 2008.

Sec. 533. RCW 43.88.094 and 1998 c
299 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The budget amount
designated in RCW 43.88.093(1) is the sum of the base amount and the growth
component as calculated under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The director of the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
shall calculate the tourism development division budget in consultation with
the appropriate agencies in the following manner:

(a) The base amount,
beginning in the budget for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, and for each
subsequent biennium thereafter, equals the previous biennial budget, including
any supplemental allocations and any growth component amounts from previous
biennia.

(b) For the growth
component, beginning in the budget for the biennium ending June 30, 2001: (i)
Compute the state retail sales tax revenues for the target business categories
for the calendar year two years prior to the beginning of the biennium for
which the budget request will be made; (ii) compute the state retail sales tax
revenues for the target business categories for the calendar year four years
prior to the beginning of the biennium for which the budget request will be
made; (iii) calculate the percentage change in these two sales tax revenue amounts;
(iv) if the percentage exceeds eight percent growth, calculate the amount of
sales tax revenue that represents the excess in revenue growth greater than six
percent; and (v) calculate the growth component by dividing the excess revenue
growth by two. The amount of the growth component for any biennium shall not
exceed two million dollars per fiscal year for the biennium.

(3) As used in this
section:

(a) "Target
business categories" means businesses in standard industrial
classification codes 58 (eating and drinking), 70 (lodging), 7514 (auto
rental), and 79 (recreation). If at any time the United States office of
management and budget or a successor agency should change or replace the
present standard industrial classification code system, the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall use the code system issued by
the office of management and budget or its successor agency to determine codes
corresponding to those listed in this definition.

(b) "Retail
sales" means the gross sales subject to the tax imposed in chapter 82.08
RCW received by businesses identified in department of revenue records by
standard industrial classification codes 58, 70, 7514, and 79.

(4) This section
expires June 30, 2008.

Sec. 534. RCW 43.160.020 and 1999
c 164 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the community economic revitalization board.

(2) "Bond"
means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other evidence of
financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(4) "Financial
institution" means any bank, savings and loan association, credit union,
development credit corporation, insurance company, investment company, trust
company, savings institution, or other financial institution approved by the
board and maintaining an office in the state.

(5) "Industrial
development facilities" means "industrial development
facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.

(6) "Industrial
development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue bonds used to fund
industrial development facilities.

(7) "Local
government" or "political subdivision" means any port district,
county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other municipal
corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state providing for public facilities
under this chapter.

(8) "Sponsor"
means any of the following entities which customarily provide service or
otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and are approved as a sponsor by
the board: A bank, trust company, savings bank, investment bank, national
banking association, savings and loan association, building and loan
association, credit union, insurance company, or any other financial
institution, governmental agency, or holding company of any entity specified in
this subsection.

(9) "Umbrella
bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds from which the proceeds
are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made available to two or more users under
this chapter.

(10) "User"
means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower
under a financing document and receiving or applying to receive revenues from
bonds issued under this chapter.

(11) "Public
facilities" means a project of a local government for the planning,
acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation,
or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water, earth
stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity,
telecommunications, transportation, natural gas, buildings or structures, and
port facilities, all for the purpose of job creation, job retention, or job
expansion.

(12) "Rural
county" means a county with a population density of fewer than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial management.

(13) "Rural
natural resources impact area" means:

(a) A nonmetropolitan
county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (14) of this section;

(b) A nonmetropolitan
county with a population of less than forty thousand in the 1990 decennial
census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in subsection (14) of
this section; or

(c) A nonurbanized
area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located in a
metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (14) of this section.

(14) For the purposes
of designating rural natural resources impact areas, the following criteria
shall be considered:

(a) A lumber and wood
products employment location quotient at or above the state average;

(b) A commercial salmon
fishing employment location quotient at or above the state average;

(c) Projected or actual
direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred positions or more;

(d) Projected or actual
direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred positions or more;
and

(e) An unemployment
rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The counties that meet
these criteria shall be determined by the employment security department for
the most recent year for which data is available. For the purposes of
administration of programs under this chapter, the United States post office
five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine residence status
for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized area is
considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip codes qualifying
as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered nonurbanized. The
office of financial management shall make available a zip code listing of the
areas to all agencies and organizations providing services under this chapter.

Sec. 535. RCW 43.160.115 and 1995
c 399 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to its
powers and duties under this chapter, the community economic revitalization
board shall cooperate with the ((Washington state development loan fund
committee)) department in order to provide for coordination of their
very similar programs. Under this chapter, it is the duty of the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development and the board)) to financially
assist the committee to the extent required by law. ((Funds appropriated to
the board or the department of community, trade, and economic development for
the use of the board shall be transferred to the department of community,
trade, and economic development to the extent required by law.))

Sec. 536. RCW 43.160.180 and 1995
c 399 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created the private activity bond subcommittee of the board.

(2) The subcommittee
shall be primarily responsible for reviewing and making recommendations to the
board on requests for certification and allocation pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 39.86 RCW and as authorized by rules adopted by the board.

(3) The subcommittee
shall consist of the following members: Six members of the board including:
(a) The chair; (b) the county official; (c) the city official; (d) the port
district official; (e) a legislator, appointed by the chair; and (f) the
representative of the public. The members' terms shall coincide with their
terms of appointment to the board.

(4) Staff support to
the subcommittee shall be provided by the department ((of community, trade,
and economic development)).

(5) Members of the
subcommittee shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) If a vacancy on the
subcommittee occurs by death, resignation, failure to hold the office from
which the member was appointed, or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled
through the procedures specified for filling the corresponding vacancy on the
board.

Sec. 537. RCW 43.163.020 and 1995
c 399 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington economic
development finance authority is established as a public body corporate and politic,
with perpetual corporate succession, constituting an instrumentality of the
state of Washington exercising essential governmental functions. The authority
is a public body within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

The authority shall
consist of eighteen (([seventeen])) members as follows: The director of
the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, the director of the department of community development,
the director of the department of agriculture, the state treasurer, one member
from each caucus in the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of
the house, one member from each caucus in the senate appointed by the president
of the senate, and ten public members with one representative of women-owned
businesses and one representative of minority-owned businesses and with at
least three of the members residing east of the Cascades. The public members
shall be residents of the state appointed by the governor on the basis of their
interest or expertise in trade, agriculture or business finance or jobs
creation and development. One of the public members shall be appointed by the
governor as chair of the authority and shall serve as chair of the authority at
the pleasure of the governor. The authority may select from its membership
such other officers as it deems appropriate.

The term of the persons
appointed by the governor as public members of the authority, including the
public member appointed as chair, shall be four years from the date of
appointment, except that the term of three of the initial appointees shall be
for two years from the date of appointment and the term of four of the initial
appointees shall be for three years from the date of appointment. The governor
shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year and three-year
terms.

In the event of a
vacancy on the authority due to death, resignation or removal of one of the
public members, or upon the expiration of the term of one of the public
members, the governor shall appoint a successor for the remainder of the
unexpired term. If either of the state offices is abolished, the resulting
vacancy on the authority shall be filled by the state officer who shall succeed
substantially to the power and duties of the abolished office.

Any public member of
the authority may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance or
willful neglect of duty after notice and a public hearing, unless such notice
and hearing shall be expressly waived in writing by the affected public member.

The state officials
serving in ex officio capacity may each designate an employee of their
respective departments to act on their behalf in all respects with regard to
any matter to come before the authority. Such designations shall be made in
writing in such manner as is specified by the rules of the authority.

The members of the
authority shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to
reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses incurred in
the discharge of their duties under this chapter. The authority may borrow
funds from the department for the purpose of reimbursing members for expenses;
however, the authority shall repay the department as soon as practicable.

A majority of the
authority shall constitute a quorum.

Sec. 538. RCW 43.163.120 and 1998
c 245 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall
receive no appropriation of state funds. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall provide staff to the
authority, to the extent permitted by law, to enable the authority to
accomplish its purposes; the staff from the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development may assist the authority in
organizing itself and in designing programs, but shall not be involved in the
issuance of bonds or in making credit decisions regarding financing provided to
borrowers by the authority.

Sec. 539. RCW 43.170.020 and 1995
c 399 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(3) "Program"
means the small business innovators' opportunity program.

(4)
"Inventor" or "innovator" means one who thinks of,
imagines, or creates something new which may result in a device, contrivance,
or process for the first time, through the use of the imagination or ingenious
thinking and experimentation.

(5)
"Proposal" means a plan provided by an inventor or innovator on an
idea for an invention or an improvement.

(6) "Higher
education" means any university, college, community college, or technical
institute in this state.

Sec. 540. RCW 43.172.011 and 1995
c 399 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 43.172.020 through 43.172.110.

(1) "Approved
surety company" means a surety company approved by the department for
participation in providing direct bonding assistance to qualified contractors.

(2) "Bond"
means any bond or security required for bid, payment, or performance of
contracts.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(4) "Program"
means the Washington state small business bonding assistance program provided
for in this chapter.

(5) "Qualified
contractor" means any resident minority business enterprise or women's
business enterprise, as determined by the department to be consistent with the
requirements of chapter 39.19 RCW and engaged in the contracting business,
which has obtained a certificate of accreditation from the Washington state
small business bonding assistance program.

Sec. 541. RCW 43.210.030 and 1998
c 109 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The small
business export finance assistance center and its branches shall be governed
and managed by a board of seven directors appointed by the governor, with the
advice of the board, and confirmed by the senate. The directors shall serve
terms of four years following the terms of service established by the initial
appointments after June 11, 1998. Three appointees, including directors on
June 11, 1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial terms of two years and,
if a director is reappointed that director may serve a consecutive four-year
term. Four appointees, including directors on June 11, 1998, who are
reappointed, must serve initial terms of four years and, if a director is
reappointed that director may serve a consecutive four-year term. After the
initial appointments, directors may serve two consecutive terms. The directors
may provide for the payment of their expenses. The directors shall include the
director of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development or
the director's designee; representatives of a large financial institution
engaged in financing export transactions in the state of Washington; a small
financial institution engaged in financing export transactions in the state of
Washington; a large exporting company domiciled in the state of Washington; a
small exporting company in the state of Washington; organized labor in a trade
involved in international commerce; and a representative at large. To the
extent possible, appointments to the board shall reflect geographical balance
and the diversity of the state population. Any vacancies on the board due to
the expiration of a term or for any other reason shall be filled by appointment
by the governor for the unexpired term.

Sec. 542. RCW 43.210.050 and 1998
c 245 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The small business
export finance assistance center formed under RCW 43.210.020 and 43.210.030
shall enter into a contract under this chapter with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or its statutory successor. The
contract shall require the center to provide export assistance services,
consistent with RCW 43.210.070 and 43.210.100 through 43.210.120, shall have a
duration of two years, and shall require the center to aggressively seek to
fund its continued operation from nonstate funds. The contract shall also
require the center to report annually to the department on its success in
obtaining nonstate funding. Upon expiration of the contract, any provisions
within the contract applicable to the Pacific Northwest export assistance
project shall be automatically renewed without change provided the legislature
appropriates funds for administration of the small business export assistance
center and the Pacific Northwest export assistance project. The provisions of
the contract related to the Pacific Northwest export assistance project may be
changed at any time if the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or the president of the small
business export finance assistance center present compelling reasons supporting
the need for a contract change to the board of directors and a majority of the
board of directors agrees to the changes. The department of agriculture shall
be included in the contracting negotiations with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development and the small business export
finance assistance center when the Pacific Northwest export assistance project
provides export services to industrial sectors within the administrative domain
of the Washington state department of agriculture.

Sec. 543. RCW 43.210.060 and 1995
c 399 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or its statutory successor shall
adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.

Sec. 544. RCW 43.330.092 and 1997 c
220 s 222 are each amended to read as follows:

The film and video
promotion account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from RCW
36.102.060(14) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
by the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) only
for the purposes of promotion of the film and video production industry in the
state of Washington.

Sec. 545. RCW 43.330.094 and 1997
c 220 s 223 are each amended to read as follows:

The tourism development
and promotion account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from RCW
36.102.060(10) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by
the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) only
for the purposes of promotion of the tourism industry in the state of
Washington.

Sec. 546. RCW 50.72.030 and 1994
sp.s. c 3 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington
youthbuild program is established within the department. The commissioner, in
cooperation and consultation with the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, shall:

(1) Make grants, up to
the lesser of three hundred thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the
total costs of the youthbuild activities, to applicants eligible to provide
education and employment training under federal or state employment training
programs, for the purpose of carrying out a wide range of multidisciplinary
activities and services to assist economically disadvantaged youth under the
federal opportunities for youth: Youthbuild program (106 Stat. 3723; 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 8011), or locally developed youthbuild-type programs for economically
disadvantaged youth; and

(2) Coordinate youth
employment and training efforts under the department's jurisdiction and
cooperate with other agencies and departments providing youth services to
ensure that funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter will be used to
supplement funding from federal, state, local, or private sources.

Sec. 547. RCW 67.28.8001 and 1997
c 452 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each municipality
imposing a tax under chapter 67.28 RCW shall submit a report to the department
of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development on October
1, 1998, and October 1, 2000. Each report shall include the following
information:

(a) The rate of tax
imposed under chapter 67.28 RCW;

(b) The total revenue
received under chapter 67.28 RCW for each of the preceding six years;

(c) A list of projects
and activities funded with revenue received under chapter 67.28 RCW; and

(d) The amount of
revenue under chapter 67.28 RCW expended for each project and activity.

(2) The department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development shall
summarize and analyze the data received under subsection (1) of this section in
a report submitted to the legislature on January 1, 1999, and January 1, 2001.
The report shall include, but not be limited to, analysis of factors
contributing to growth in revenue received under chapter 67.28 RCW and the
effects of projects and activities funded with revenue received under chapter
67.28 RCW on tourism growth.

Sec. 548. RCW 70.95H.007 and 1995
c 399 s 192 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created the
clean Washington center within the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development. As used in this chapter, "center" means
the clean Washington center.

Sec. 549. RCW 70.95H.050 and 1995
c 399 s 194 are each amended to read as follows:

The center
shall solicit financial contributions and support from manufacturing industries
and other private sector sources, foundations, and grants from governmental
sources to assist in conducting its activities. It may also use separately
appropriated funds of the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development for the center's activities.

Sec. 550. RCW 74.13.090 and 1995 c
399 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established a child care coordinating committee to provide coordination and
communication between state agencies responsible for child care and early
childhood education services. The child care coordinating committee shall be
composed of not less than seventeen nor more than thirty-three members who
shall include:

(a) One representative
each from the department of social and health services, the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and any other agency having responsibility for regulation,
provision, or funding of child care services in the state;

(b) One representative
from the department of labor and industries;

(c) One representative
from the department of revenue;

(d) One representative
from the employment security department;

(e) One representative
from the department of personnel;

(f) One representative
from the department of health;

(g) At least one
representative of family home child care providers and one representative of
center care providers;

(h) At least one
representative of early childhood development experts;

(i) At least one
representative of school districts and teachers involved in the provision of
child care and preschool programs;

(j) At least one parent
education specialist;

(k) At least one
representative of resource and referral programs;

(l) One pediatric or
other health professional;

(m) At least one
representative of college or university child care providers;

(n) At least one
representative of a citizen group concerned with child care;

(o) At least one
representative of a labor organization;

(p) At least one
representative of a head start - early childhood education assistance program
agency;

(q) At least one
employer who provides child care assistance to employees;

(r) Parents of children
receiving, or in need of, child care, half of whom shall be parents needing or
receiving subsidized child care and half of whom shall be parents who are able
to pay for child care.

The named state
agencies shall select their representative to the child care coordinating
committee. The department of social and health services shall select the
remaining members, considering recommendations from lists submitted by
professional associations and other interest groups until such time as the
committee adopts a member selection process. The department shall use any
federal funds which may become available to accomplish the purposes of RCW
74.13.085 through 74.13.095.

The committee shall elect
officers from among its membership and shall adopt policies and procedures
specifying the lengths of terms, methods for filling vacancies, and other
matters necessary to the ongoing functioning of the committee. The secretary
of social and health services shall appoint a temporary chair until the
committee has adopted policies and elected a chair accordingly. Child care
coordinating committee members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) To the extent
possible within available funds, the child care coordinating committee shall:

(a) Serve as an
advisory coordinator for all state agencies responsible for early childhood or
child care programs for the purpose of improving communication and interagency
coordination;

(b) Annually review
state programs and make recommendations to the agencies and the legislature
which will maximize funding and promote furtherance of the policies set forth
in RCW 74.13.085. Reports shall be provided to all appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1 of each year. At a minimum the committee shall:

(i) Review and propose
changes to the child care subsidy system in its December 1989 report;

(ii) Review alternative
models for child care service systems, in the context of the policies set forth
in RCW 74.13.085, and recommend to the legislature a new child care service
structure; and

(iii) Review options
and make recommendations on the feasibility of establishing an allocation for
day care facilities when constructing state buildings;

(c) Review department
of social and health services administration of the child care expansion grant
program described in RCW 74.13.095;

(d) Review rules
regarding child care facilities and services for the purpose of identifying
those which unnecessarily obstruct the availability and affordability of child
care in the state;

(e) Advise and assist
the office of child care policy in implementing his or her duties under RCW
74.13.0903;

(f) Perform other
functions to improve the quantity and quality of child care in the state,
including compliance with existing and future prerequisites for federal
funding; and

(g) Advise and assist
the department of personnel in its responsibility for establishing policies and
procedures that provide for the development of quality child care programs for
state employees.

Sec. 551. RCW 76.09.030 and 1999
sp.s. c 4 s 1001 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created the forest practices board of the state of Washington as an agency of
state government consisting of members as follows:

(a) The commissioner of
public lands or the commissioner's designee;

(b) The director of the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
or the director's designee;

(c) The director of the
department of agriculture or the director's designee;

(d) The director of the
department of ecology or the director's designee;

(e) The director of the
department of fish and wildlife or the director's designee;

(f) An elected member
of a county legislative authority appointed by the governor: PROVIDED, That
such member's service on the board shall be conditioned on the member's
continued service as an elected county official; and

(g) Six members of the
general public appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be an owner of not
more than five hundred acres of forest land, and one of whom shall be an
independent logging contractor.

(2) The director of the
department of fish and wildlife's service on the board may be terminated two
years after August 18, 1999, if the legislature finds that after two years the
department has not made substantial progress toward integrating the laws,
rules, and programs governing forest practices, chapter 76.09 RCW, and the
laws, rules, and programs governing hydraulic projects, chapter ((75.20))
77.55 RCW. Such a finding shall be based solely on whether the
department of fish and wildlife makes substantial progress as defined in this
subsection, and will not be based on other actions taken as a member of the
board. Substantial progress shall include recommendations to the legislature
for closer integration of the existing rule-making authorities of the board and
the department of fish and wildlife, and closer integration of the forest
practices and hydraulics permitting processes, including exploring the
potential for a consolidated permitting process. These recommendations shall
be designed to resolve problems currently associated with the existing dual
regulatory and permitting processes.

(3) The members of the
initial board appointed by the governor shall be appointed so that the term of
one member shall expire December 31, 1975, the term of one member shall expire
December 31, 1976, the term of one member shall expire December 31, 1977, the
terms of two members shall expire December 31, 1978, and the terms of two
members shall expire December 31, 1979. Thereafter, each member shall be
appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies on the board shall be filled in
the same manner as the original appointments. Each member of the board shall
continue in office until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The
commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee shall be the
chairman of the board.

(4) The board shall
meet at such times and places as shall be designated by the chairman or upon
the written request of the majority of the board. The principal office of the
board shall be at the state capital.

(5) Members of the
board, except public employees and elected officials, shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.250. Each member shall be entitled to reimbursement
for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) The board may
employ such clerical help and staff pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW as is
necessary to carry out its duties.

Sec. 552. RCW 76.56.020 and 1994 c
282 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The center shall:

(1) Coordinate the
University of Washington's college of forest resources' faculty and staff
expertise to assist in:

(a) The development of
research and analysis for developing policies and strategies which will expand
forest-based international trade, including a major focus on secondary
manufacturing;

(b) The development of
technology or commercialization support for manufactured products that will
meet the evolving needs of international customers;

(c) The development of
research and analysis on other factors critical to forest-based trade,
including the quality and availability of raw wood resources; and

(d) The coordination,
development, and dissemination of market and technical information relevant to
international trade in forest products, including a major focus on secondary
manufacturing;

(2) Further develop and
maintain computer data bases on worldwide forest products production and trade
in order to monitor and report on trends significant to the Northwest forest
products industry and support the center's research functions; and coordinate
this system with state, federal, and private sector efforts to insure a
cost-effective information resource that will avoid unnecessary duplication;

(3) Monitor
international forest products markets and assess the status of the state's
forest products industry, including the competitiveness of small and
medium-sized secondary manufacturing firms in the forest products industry,
which for the purposes of this chapter shall be firms with annual revenues of
twenty-five million or less, and including the increased exports of
Washington-produced products of small and medium-sized secondary manufacturing
firms;

(4) Provide
high-quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree
training in international trade in forest products in cooperation with the
University of Washington's graduate school of business administration, the
school of law, the Jackson school of international studies, the Northwest
policy center of the graduate school of public administration, and other
supporting academic units;

(5) Develop cooperative
linkages with the international marketing program for agricultural commodities
and trade at Washington State University, the international trade project of
the United States forest service, the department of natural resources, the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
the small business export finance assistance center, and other state and
federal agencies to avoid duplication of effort and programs;

(6) Cooperate with
personnel from the state's community and technical colleges in their
development of wood products manufacturing and wood technology curriculum and
offer periodic workshops on wood products manufacturing, wood technology, and
trade opportunities to community colleges and private educators and trainers;

(7) Provide for public
dissemination of research, analysis, and results of the center's programs to
all groups, including direct assistance groups, through technical workshops,
short courses, international and national symposia, cooperation with private
sector networks and marketing associations, or other means, including
appropriate publications;

(8) Establish an
executive policy board, including representatives of small and medium-sized
businesses, with at least fifty percent of its business members representing
small businesses with one hundred or fewer employees and medium-sized
businesses with one hundred to five hundred employees. The executive policy
board shall also include a representative of the community and technical
colleges, representatives of state and federal agencies, and a representative
of a wood products manufacturing network or trade association of small and
medium-sized wood product manufacturers. The executive policy board shall
provide advice on: Overall policy direction and program priorities, state and
federal budget requests, securing additional research funds, identifying
priority areas of focus for research efforts, selection of projects for
research, and dissemination of results of research efforts; and

(9) Establish advisory
or technical committees for each research program area, to advise on research
program area priorities, consistent with the international trade opportunities
achievable by the forest products sector of the state and region, to help
ensure projects are relevant to industry needs, and to advise on and support
effective dissemination of research results. Each advisory or technical
committee shall include representatives of forest products industries that
might benefit from this research.

Service on the
committees and the executive policy board established in subsections (8) and
(9) of this section shall be without compensation but actual travel expenses
incurred in connection with service to the center may be reimbursed from
appropriated funds in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 553. RCW 77.12.710 and 1998 c
245 s 159 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
directs the department to determine the feasibility and cost of doubling the
statewide game fish production by the year 2000. The department shall seek to
equalize the effort and investment expended on anadromous and resident game
fish programs. The department shall provide the legislature with a specific
plan for legislative approval that will outline the feasibility of increasing
game fish production by one hundred percent over current levels by the year
2000. The plan shall contain specific provisions to increase both hatchery and
naturally spawning game fish to a level that will support the production goal
established in this section consistent with department policies. Steelhead
trout, searun cutthroat trout, resident trout, and warmwater fish producing
areas of the state shall be included in the plan.

The plan shall include
the following critical elements:

(1) Methods of
determining current catch and production, and catch and production in the year
2000;

(2) Methods of
involving fishing groups, including Indian tribes, in a cooperative manner;

(3) Methods for using
low capital cost projects to produce game fish as inexpensively as possible;

(4) Methods for
renovating and modernizing all existing hatcheries and rearing ponds to
maximize production capability;

(5) Methods for
increasing the productivity of natural spawning game fish;

(6) Application of new
technology to increase hatchery and natural productivity;

(7) Analysis of the
potential for private contractors to produce game fish for public fisheries;

(8) Methods to optimize
public volunteer efforts and cooperative projects for maximum efficiency;

(9) Methods for
development of trophy game fish fisheries;

(10) Elements of
coordination with the Pacific Northwest Power Council programs to ensure
maximum Columbia river benefits;

(11) The role that
should be played by private consulting companies in developing and implementing
the plan;

(12) Coordination with
federal fish and wildlife agencies, Indian tribes, and department fish
production programs;

(13) Future needs for
game fish predator control measures;

(14) Development of
disease control measures;

(15) Methods for
obtaining access to waters currently not available to anglers; and

(16) Development of
research programs to support game fish management and enhancement programs.

The department, in
cooperation with the department of revenue, shall assess various funding
mechanisms and make recommendations to the legislature in the plan. The
department, in cooperation with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development, shall prepare an analysis of the economic benefits to
the state that will occur when the game fish production is increased by one
hundred percent in the year 2000.

Sec. 554. RCW 79A.60.480 and 2000
c 11 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
licensing shall issue a whitewater river outfitter's license to an applicant
who submits a completed application, pays the required fee, and complies with
the requirements of this section.

(2) An applicant for a
whitewater river outfitter's license shall make application upon a form
provided by the department of licensing. The form must be submitted annually
and include the following information:

(a) The name, residence
address, and residence telephone number, and the business name, address, and
telephone number of the applicant;

(b) Certification that
all employees, subcontractors, or independent contractors hired as guides meet
training standards under RCW 79A.60.430 before carrying any passengers for
hire;

(c) Proof that the
applicant has liability insurance for a minimum of three hundred thousand
dollars per claim for occurrences by the applicant and the applicant's
employees that result in bodily injury or property damage. All guides must be
covered by the applicant's insurance policy;

(d) Certification that
the applicant will maintain the insurance for a period of not less than one
year from the date of issuance of the license; and

(e) Certification by
the applicant that for a period of not less than twenty-four months immediately
preceding the application the applicant:

(i) Has not had a
license, permit, or certificate to carry passengers for hire on a river revoked
by another state or by an agency of the government of the United States due to
a conviction for a violation of safety or insurance coverage requirements no
more stringent than the requirements of this chapter; and

(ii) Has not been
denied the right to apply for a license, permit, or certificate to carry
passengers for hire on a river by another state.

(3) The department of
licensing shall charge a fee for each application, to be set in accordance with
RCW 43.24.086.

(4) Any person
advertising or representing himself or herself as a whitewater river outfitter
who is not currently licensed is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(5) The department of
licensing shall submit annually a list of licensed persons and companies to the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
tourism promotion division.

(6) If an insurance
company cancels or refuses to renew insurance for a licensee, the insurance
company shall notify the department of licensing in writing of the termination
of coverage and its effective date not less than thirty days before the
effective date of termination.

(a) Upon receipt of an
insurance company termination notice, the department of licensing shall send
written notice to the licensee that on the effective date of termination the
department of licensing will suspend the license unless proof of insurance as
required by this section is filed with the department of licensing before the
effective date of the termination.

(b) If an insurance company
fails to give notice of coverage termination, this failure shall not have the
effect of continuing the coverage.

(c) The department of
licensing may suspend a license under this section if the licensee fails to
maintain in full force and effect the insurance required by this section.

(7) The state of
Washington shall be immune from any civil action arising from the issuance of a
license under this section.

Sec. 555. RCW 81.80.450 and 1998 c
245 s 167 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development, in
conjunction with the utilities and transportation commission and the department
of ecology, shall evaluate the effect of exempting motor vehicles transporting
recovered materials from rate regulation as provided under RCW 81.80.440. The
evaluation shall, at a minimum, describe the effect of such exemption on:

(a) The cost and
timeliness of transporting recovered materials within the state;

(b) The volume of recovered
materials transported within the state;

(c) The number of
safety violations and traffic accidents related to transporting recovered
materials within the state; and

(d) The availability of
service related to transporting recovered materials from rural areas of the
state.

(2) The commission
shall adopt rules requiring persons transporting recovered materials to submit
information required under RCW 70.95.280. In adopting such rules, the
commission shall include procedures to ensure the confidentiality of
proprietary information.

Sec. 556. RCW 82.35.080 and 1999 c
358 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall revoke any certificate
issued under this chapter if it finds that any of the following have occurred
with respect to the certificate:

(a) The certificate was
obtained by fraud or deliberate misrepresentation;

(b) The certificate was
obtained through the use of inaccurate data but without any intention to commit
fraud or misrepresentation;

(c) The facility was
constructed or operated in violation of any provision of this chapter or
provision imposed by the department as a condition of certification; or

(d) The cogeneration
facility is no longer capable of being operated for the primary purpose of
cogeneration.

(2) If the department
finds that there are few inaccuracies under subsection (1)(b) of this section
and that cumulatively they are insignificant in terms of the cost or operation
of the facility or that the inaccurate data is not attributable to carelessness
or negligence and its inclusion was reasonable under the circumstances, then
the department may provide for the continuance of the certificate and whatever
modification it considers in the public interest.

(3) Any person, firm,
corporation, or organization that obtains a certificate revoked under this
section shall be liable for the total amount of money saved by claiming the
credits and exemptions provided under this chapter. The total amount of the
credits shall be collected as delinquent business and occupation taxes, and the
total of the exemptions shall be collected and distributed as delinquent
property taxes. Interest shall accrue on the amounts of the credits and exemptions
from the date the taxes were otherwise due.

(4) The department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development shall provide
technical assistance to the department in carrying out its responsibilities
under this section.

PART
V

REFERENCES TO
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT

AND DEPARTMENT OF TRADE AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. The department of
community development and the department of trade and economic development
shall continue to strengthen their existing working relationships. The
existing partnerships are especially notable in rural economic development, and
in infrastructure financing but there should be no limitation placed on, or
barriers raised to continuing efforts to find new areas of collaboration. To
increase the efficiency of service delivery by both departments, new ways of
collaborating in the delivery of services should not be limited only to the two
departments but should be sought and implemented with other departments of
state government and with local and federal governments.

Sec. 602. RCW 41.06.070 and 1998 c
245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply to:

(a) The members of the
legislature or to any employee of, or position in, the legislative branch of
the state government including members, officers, and employees of the
legislative council, joint legislative audit and review committee, statute law
committee, and any interim committee of the legislature;

(b) The justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior courts or
of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or position in the judicial
branch of state government;

(c) Officers, academic
personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d) The officers of the
Washington state patrol;

(e) Elective officers
of the state;

(f) The chief executive
officer of each agency;

(g) In the departments
of employment security and social and health services, the director and the
director's confidential secretary; in all other departments, the executive head
of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the director, his or her
confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;

(h) In the case of a
multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the members thereof are
elected, appointed by the governor or other authority, serve ex officio, or are
otherwise chosen:

(i) All members of such
boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii) If the members of
the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time basis and there is a
statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board, commission, or
committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or committee;
and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of the board,
commission, or committee;

(iii) If the members of
the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time basis: The chief
executive officer or administrative officer as designated by the board,
commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair of the
board, commission, or committee;

(iv) If all members of
the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The chief executive
officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive officer;

(i) The confidential
secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate offices of the
elective officers of the state;

(j) Assistant attorneys
general;

(k) Commissioned and
enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l) Inmate, student,
part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as
defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m) The public printer
or to any employees of or positions in the state printing plant;

(n) Officers and
employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o) Officers and
employees of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p) Officers and
employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q) Officers and
employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r) Officers and
employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s) Officers and
employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t) ((Officers and
employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter 15.63 RCW;

(u))) Officers and employees of agricultural
commissions formed under chapter 15.65 RCW;

(((v))) (u)
Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 67.40
RCW;

(((w))) (v)
Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor relations in all
state agencies employing such executive assistants including but not limited to
all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards, or other bodies
subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection shall prevail
over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is
made in such law;

(((x))) (w)
In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads, assistant
directors or division directors, and not more than three principal policy
assistants who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency heads;

(((y))) (x)
All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z) Up to a total
of five senior staff positions of the western library network under chapter
27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing program
management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z) shall expire
on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y) Staff employed by the departments
of community((, trade, and economic)) development and trade and
economic development to administer energy policy functions and manage
energy site evaluation council activities under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb))) (z)
Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy education,
applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as
provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2) The following
classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of higher education
and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this chapter:

(a) Members of the
governing board of each institution of higher education and related boards, all
presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential secretaries,
administrative, and personal assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic
personnel; and executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions
employed by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial or
professional employees in an institution or related board having substantial
responsibility for directing or controlling program operations and accountable
for allocation of resources and program results, or for the formulation of
institutional policy, or for carrying out personnel administration or labor
relations functions, legislative relations, public information, development,
senior computer systems and network programming, or internal audits and
investigations; and any employee of a community college district whose place of
work is one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational program
operating outside of the state of Washington;

(b) Student, part-time,
or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by
the Washington personnel resources board, employed by institutions of higher
education and related boards;

(c) The governing board
of each institution, and related boards, may also exempt from this chapter
classifications involving research activities, counseling of students,
extension or continuing education activities, graphic arts or publications
activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or special training as
determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in
office, clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;

(d) Printing craft
employees in the department of printing at the University of Washington.

(3) In addition to the exemptions
specifically provided by this chapter, the Washington personnel resources board
may provide for further exemptions pursuant to the following procedures. The
governor or other appropriate elected official may submit requests for
exemption to the Washington personnel resources board stating the reasons for
requesting such exemptions. The Washington personnel resources board shall
hold a public hearing, after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to
this subsection. If the board determines that the position for which exemption
is requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the formulation of
basic agency or executive policy or one involving directing and controlling
program operations of an agency or a major administrative division thereof, the
Washington personnel resources board shall grant the request and such
determination shall be final as to any decision made before July 1, 1993. The
total number of additional exemptions permitted under this subsection shall not
exceed one percent of the number of employees in the classified service not
including employees of institutions of higher education and related boards for
those agencies not directly under the authority of any elected public official
other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total of twenty-five for all
agencies under the authority of elected public officials other than the
governor.

The salary and fringe
benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted except for the chief
executive officer of each agency, full-time members of boards and commissions,
administrative assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office
of an elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (((v), (y), (z),)) (u) and (x) and (2) of this section,
shall be determined by the Washington personnel resources board. However,
beginning with changes proposed for the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, changes to the
classification plan affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for
classified salary increases resulting from adjustments to the classification
plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.

Any person holding a
classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, when and
if such position is subsequently exempted from the application of this chapter,
be afforded the following rights: If such person previously held permanent
status in another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of
similar nature and salary.

Any classified employee
having civil service status in a classified position who accepts an appointment
in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion to the highest class of
position previously held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.

A person occupying an
exempt position who is terminated from the position for gross misconduct or
malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a classified position as
provided for in this section.

Sec. 603. RCW 42.17.2401 and 2001
c 36 s 1 and 2001 c 9 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW
42.17.240, the term "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief
administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, the administrator of the
Washington basic health plan, the director of the department of services for
the blind, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of community((, trade, and economic)) development,
the secretary of corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of
employment security, the chairman of the energy facility site evaluation
council, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of
financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive
secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of health,
the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive
secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of
the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the
executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the director of the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, the executive director of the state
investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of
licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office
of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the public
disclosure commission, the director of retirement systems, the director of
revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the
Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the
director of trade and economic development, the secretary of
transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission,
the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and
state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, each
district and each campus president of each state community college;

(2) Each professional
staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional
staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Central Washington
University board of trustees, board of trustees of each community college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees, Washington
economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board, forest
practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, each member of the Washington health services commission, higher
education coordinating board, higher education facilities authority, horse
racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission,
indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals,
information services board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board,
liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission,
public pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public employees' benefits
board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax appeals, transportation
commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and
transportation commission, Washington state maritime commission, Washington
personnel resources board, Washington public power supply system executive
board, Washington State University board of regents, Western Washington
University board of trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 604. RCW 43.06.115 and 1998 c
245 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may,
by executive order, after consultation with or notification of the
executive-legislative committee on economic development created by chapter
. . . (Senate Bill No. 5300), Laws of 1993, declare a community to be
a "military impacted area." A "military impacted area"
means a community or communities, as identified in the executive order, that
experience serious social and economic hardships because of a change in defense
spending by the federal government in that community or communities.

(2) If the governor
executes an order under subsection (1) of this section, the governor shall
establish a response team to coordinate state efforts to assist the military
impacted community. The response team may include, but not be limited to, one
member from each of the following agencies: (a) The department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development; (b) the department of trade and
economic development; (c) the department of social and health services; (((c)))
(d) the employment security department; (((d))) (e) the
state board for community and technical colleges; (((e))) (f) the
higher education coordinating board; and (((f))) (g) the
department of transportation. The governor may appoint a response team
coordinator. The governor shall seek to actively involve the impacted
community or communities in planning and implementing a response to the
crisis. The governor may seek input or assistance from the community
diversification advisory committee, and the governor may establish task forces
in the community or communities to assist in the coordination and delivery of
services to the local community. The state and community response shall
consider economic development, human service, and training needs of the
community or communities impacted.

605. RCW 43.17.010 and 1993
sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17, and 1993 c 280 s 18 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

There shall be
departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the department
of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3) the
department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5) the
department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7) the
department of licensing, (8) the department of general administration, (9) the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, (10) the
department of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the
department of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, ((and))
(14) the department of health, ((and)) (15) the department of financial
institutions, and (16) the department of trade and economic development,
which shall be charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of
such laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such duties,
as the legislature may provide.

Sec. 606. RCW 43.17.020 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a chief
executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The secretary of
social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the director of
labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish
and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the director of
licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the director of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, (10) the director of
veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement
systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary
of health, ((and)) (15) the director of financial institutions, and
(16) the director of trade and economic development.

Such officers, except
the secretary of transportation and the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold office at
the pleasure of the governor. The secretary of transportation shall be appointed
by the transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director
of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 607. RCW 19.02.050 and 1997 c
391 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
directs the full participation by the following agencies in the implementation
of this chapter:

(1) Department of
agriculture;

(2) Secretary of state;

(3) Department of
social and health services;

(4) Department of
revenue;

(5) Department of fish
and wildlife;

(6) Department of
employment security;

(7) Department of labor
and industries;

(8) Department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development;

(9) Department of
community development;

(10) Liquor
control board;

(((10))) (11)
Department of health;

(((11))) (12)
Department of licensing;

(((12))) (13)
Parks and recreation commission;

(((13))) (14)
Utilities and transportation commission; and

(((14))) (15)
Other agencies as determined by the governor.

Sec. 608. RCW 43.21J.030 and 1998
c 245 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created
the environmental enhancement and job creation task force within the office of
the governor. The purpose of the task force is to provide a coordinated and
comprehensive approach to implementation of chapter 516, Laws of 1993. The
task force shall consist of the commissioner of public lands, the director of
the department of fish and wildlife, the director of the department of ecology,
the director of the parks and recreation commission, the timber team
coordinator, the executive director of the work force training and education
coordinating board, and the executive director of the Puget Sound ((water
quality authority)) action team, or their designees. The task force
may seek the advice of the following agencies and organizations: The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, the
department of trade and economic development, the conservation commission,
the employment security department, the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation, appropriate federal agencies, appropriate special districts, the
Washington state association of counties, the association of Washington cities,
labor organizations, business organizations, timber-dependent communities,
environmental organizations, and Indian tribes. The governor shall appoint the
task force chair. Members of the task force shall serve without additional
pay. Participation in the work of the committee by agency members shall be
considered in performance of their employment. The governor shall designate
staff and administrative support to the task force and shall solicit the
participation of agency personnel to assist the task force.

(2) The task force
shall have the following responsibilities:

(a) Soliciting and
evaluating, in accordance with the criteria set forth in RCW 43.21J.040,
requests for funds from the environmental and forest restoration account and
making distributions from the account. The task force shall award funds for
projects and training programs it approves and may allocate the funds to state
agencies for disbursement and contract administration;

(b) Coordinating a
process to assist state agencies and local governments to implement effective
environmental and forest restoration projects funded under this chapter;

(c) Considering
unemployment profile data provided by the employment security department.

(3) Beginning July 1,
1994, the task force shall have the following responsibilities:

(a) To solicit and
evaluate proposals from state and local agencies, private nonprofit
organizations, and tribes for environmental and forest restoration projects;

(b) To rank the
proposals based on criteria developed by the task force in accordance with RCW
43.21J.040; and

(c) To determine
funding allocations for projects to be funded from the account created in RCW
43.21J.020 and for projects or programs as designated in the omnibus operating
and capital appropriations acts.

Sec. 609. RCW 43.157.010 and 1997
c 369 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.80.330, 28C.18.080, 43.21A.350,
47.06.030, and 90.58.100 and (([an])) an industrial project of
statewide significance is a border crossing project that involves both private
and public investments carried out in conjunction with adjacent states or
provinces or a private industrial development with private capital investment
in manufacturing or research and development. To qualify as an industrial
project of statewide significance, the project must be completed after January
1, 1997, and have:

(a) In counties with a
population of less than or equal to twenty thousand, a capital investment of
twenty million dollars;

(b) In counties with a
population of greater than twenty thousand but no more than fifty thousand, a
capital investment of fifty million dollars;

(c) In counties with a
population of greater than fifty thousand but no more than one hundred
thousand, a capital investment of one hundred million dollars;

(d) In counties with a
population of greater than one hundred thousand but no more than two hundred
thousand, a capital investment of two hundred million dollars;

(e) In counties with a
population of greater than two hundred thousand but no more than four hundred
thousand, a capital investment of four hundred million dollars;

(f) In counties with a
population of greater than four hundred thousand but no more than one million,
a capital investment of six hundred million dollars;

(g) In counties with a
population of greater than one million, a capital investment of one billion
dollars; or

(h) Been designated by
the director of community((, trade, and economic)) development or the
director of trade and economic development as an industrial project of
statewide significance either: (i) Because the county in which the project is
to be located is a distressed county and the economic circumstances of the
county merit the additional assistance such designation will bring; or (ii)
because the impact on a region due to the size and complexity of the project
merits such designation.

(2) The term
manufacturing shall have the meaning assigned it in RCW 82.61.010.

(3) The term research
and development shall have the meaning assigned it in RCW 82.61.010.

Sec. 610. RCW 43.157.030 and 1997
c 369 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development and the department of
trade and economic development shall assign an ombudsman to each industrial
project of statewide significance. The ((ombudsman)) ombudsmen
shall be responsible for assembling a team of state and local government and
private officials to help meet the planning and development needs of each
project. The ((ombudsman)) ombudsmen shall strive to include in
the teams those responsible for planning, permitting and licensing,
infrastructure development, work force development services including higher
education, transportation services, and the provision of utilities. The ((ombudsman))
ombudsmen shall encourage each team member to expedite their actions in
furtherance of the project.

Sec. 611. RCW 43.160.030 and 1996
c 51 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The community
economic revitalization board is hereby created to exercise the powers granted
under this chapter.

(2) The board shall
consist of the chairman of and one minority member appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives from the committee of the house of representatives
that deals with issues of economic development, the chairman of and one minority
member appointed by the president of the senate from the committee of the
senate that deals with issues of economic development, and the following
members appointed by the governor: A recognized private or public sector
economist; one port district official; one county official; one city official;
one representative of the public; one representative of small businesses each
from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area east of Puget Sound and
west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of the Cascade range and west of
the Columbia river, and (d) the area east of the Columbia river; one executive
from large businesses each from the area west of the Cascades and the area east
of the Cascades. The appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms
as follows: Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year
terms, and three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair.
Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of the
board shall be selected by the governor. The members of the board shall elect
one of their members to serve as vice-chair. The director of community((,
trade, and economic)) development, the director of trade and economic
development, the director of revenue, the commissioner of employment
security, and the secretary of transportation shall serve as nonvoting advisory
members of the board.

(3) Management
services, including fiscal and contract services, shall be provided by the
department to assist the board in implementing this chapter and the allocation
of private activity bonds.

(4) Members of the
board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

(5) If a vacancy occurs
by death, resignation, or otherwise of appointive members of the board, the
governor shall fill the same for the unexpired term. Members of the board may
be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written
charges by the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) A member appointed
by the governor may not be absent from more than fifty percent of the regularly
scheduled meetings in any one calendar year. Any member who exceeds this
absence limitation is deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be
replaced by the governor.

Sec. 612. RCW 43.163.060 and 1995
c 399 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority is
authorized to participate fully in federal and other governmental economic
development finance programs and to take such actions as are necessary and
consistent with this chapter to secure to itself and the people of the state
the benefits of those programs and to meet their requirements.

(2) The authority shall
coordinate its programs with those contributing to a common purpose found elsewhere
in the departments of community((, trade, and economic)) development, trade
and economic development, agriculture or employment security, or any other
department or organization of, or affiliated with, the state or federal
government, and shall avoid any duplication of such activities or programs
provided elsewhere. The departments of community((, trade, and economic))
development, trade and economic development, agriculture, employment
security and other relevant state agencies shall provide to the authority all
reports prepared in the course of their ongoing activities which may assist in
the identification of unmet capital financing needs by small-sized and
medium-sized businesses in the state.

Sec. 613. RCW 47.39.090 and 1995 c
399 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

In developing the
scenic and recreational highways program, the department shall consult with the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, the
department of trade and economic development, the department of natural
resources, the parks and recreation commission, affected cities, towns, and
counties, regional transportation planning organizations, statewide bicycling
organizations, and other interested parties. The scenic and recreational
highways program may identify entire highway loops or similar tourist routes
that could be developed to promote tourist activity and provide concurrent
economic growth while protecting the scenic and recreational quality
surrounding state highways.

Sec. 614. RCW 47.76.230 and 1995 c
380 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
transportation shall continue its responsibility for the development and
implementation of the state rail plan and programs, and the utilities and
transportation commission shall continue its responsibility for intrastate
rates, service, and safety issues.

(2) The department of
transportation shall maintain an enhanced data file on the rail system.
Proprietary annual station traffic data from each railroad and the modal use of
major shippers shall be obtained to the extent that such information is
available.

(3) The department of
transportation shall provide technical assistance, upon request, to state
agencies and local interests. Technical assistance includes, but is not
limited to, the following:

(a) Rail project
cost-benefit analyses conducted in accordance with methodologies recommended by
the Federal Railroad Administration;

(b) Assistance in the
formation of county rail districts and port districts; and

(c) Feasibility studies
for rail service continuation and/or rail service assistance.

(4) With funding
authorized by the legislature, the department of transportation, in
collaboration with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, the department of trade and economic development, and local
economic development agencies, and other interested public and private
organizations, shall develop a cooperative process to conduct community and
business information programs and to regularly disseminate information on rail
matters.

Sec. 615. RCW 50.38.030 and 1995 c
399 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

The employment security
department shall consult with the following agencies prior to the issuance of
the state occupational forecast:

(1) Office of financial
management;

(2) Department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development;

(3) Department of labor
and industries;

(4) State board for
community and technical colleges;

(5) Superintendent of
public instruction;

(6) Department of
social and health services;

(7) Department of
trade and economic development;

(8) Work force
training and education coordinating board; and

(((8))) (9)
Other state and local agencies as deemed appropriate by the commissioner of the
employment security department.

These agencies shall
cooperate with the employment security department, submitting information
relevant to the generation of occupational forecasts.

Sec. 616. RCW 80.50.030 and 2001 c
214 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created
and established the energy facility site evaluation council.

(2)(a) The chair of the
council shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the
senate, shall have a vote on matters before the council, shall serve for a term
coextensive with the term of the governor, and is removable for cause. The
chair may designate a member of the council to serve as acting chair in the
event of the chair's absence. The salary of the chair shall be determined
under RCW 43.03.040. The chair is a "state employee" for the
purposes of chapter 42.52 RCW. As applicable, when attending meetings of the
council, members may receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and are eligible for compensation under RCW
43.03.250.

(b) The chair or a
designee shall execute all official documents, contracts, and other materials
on behalf of the council. The ((Washington state)) department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall provide all
administrative and staff support for the council. The director of the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development has
supervisory authority over the staff of the council and shall employ such
personnel as are necessary to implement this chapter. Not more than three such
employees may be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3)(a) The council
shall consist of the directors, administrators, or their designees, of the
following departments, agencies, commissions, and committees or their statutory
successors:

(i) Department of
ecology;

(ii) Department of fish
and wildlife;

(iii) Department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development;

(iv) Utilities and
transportation commission; ((and))

(v) Department of
trade and economic development; and

(vi) Department
of natural resources.

(b) The directors,
administrators, or their designees, of the following departments, agencies, and
commissions, or their statutory successors, may participate as councilmembers
at their own discretion provided they elect to participate no later than sixty days
after an application is filed:

(i) Department of
agriculture;

(ii) Department of
health;

(iii) Military
department; and

(iv) Department of
transportation.

(c) Council membership
is discretionary for agencies that choose to participate under (b) of this
subsection only for applications that are filed with the council on or after
May 8, 2001. For applications filed before May 8, 2001, council membership is mandatory
for those agencies listed in (b) of this subsection.

(4) The appropriate
county legislative authority of every county wherein an application for a
proposed site is filed shall appoint a member or designee as a voting member to
the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council
only at such times as the council considers the proposed site for the county
which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve until there
has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.

(5) The city
legislative authority of every city within whose corporate limits an energy
plant is proposed to be located shall appoint a member or designee as a voting
member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit with the
council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site for the
city which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve until
there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.

(6) For any port
district wherein an application for a proposed port facility is filed subject
to this chapter, the port district shall appoint a member or designee as a
nonvoting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit
with the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site
for the port district which he or she represents, and such member or designee
shall serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the
proposed site. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the port
district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or association with
any other person.

PART
VI

MISCELLANEOUS REFERENCES

Sec. 701. RCW 46.16.340 and 1995 c
391 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The director, from time
to time, shall furnish the state military department, ((the department of
community, trade, and economic development,)) the Washington state patrol,
and all county sheriffs a list of the names, addresses, and license plate or
radio station call letters of each person possessing the special amateur radio
station license plates so that the facilities of such radio stations may be
utilized to the fullest extent in the work of these governmental agencies.

Sec. 702. RCW 43.220.070 and 1999
c 280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Conservation corps
members shall be unemployed residents of the state between eighteen and
twenty-five years of age at the time of enrollment who are citizens or lawful
permanent residents of the United States. The age requirements may be waived
for corps leaders and specialists with special leadership or occupational
skills; such members shall be given special responsibility for providing
leadership, character development, and sense of community responsibility to the
corps members, groups, and work crews to which they are assigned. The upper
age requirement may be waived for residents who have a sensory or mental
handicap. Special effort shall be made to recruit minority and disadvantaged
youth who meet selection criteria of the conservation corps. Preference shall
be given to youths residing in areas, both urban and rural, in which there
exists substantial unemployment exceeding the state average unemployment rate.

(2) The legislature
finds that people with developmental disabilities would benefit from
experiencing a meaningful work experience, and learning the value of labor and
of membership in a productive society.

The legislature urges
state agencies that are participating in the Washington conservation corps
program to consider for enrollment in the program people who have developmental
disabilities, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

If an agency chooses to
enroll people with developmental disabilities in its Washington conservation
corps program, the agency may apply to the United States department of labor,
employment standards administration for a special subminimum wage certificate
in order to be allowed to pay enrollees with developmental disabilities
according to their individual levels of productivity.

(3) Corps members shall
not be considered state employees. Other provisions of law relating to civil
service, hours of work, rate of compensation, sick leave, unemployment
compensation, state retirement plans, and vacation leave do not apply to the
Washington conservation corps except for the crew supervisors, who shall be
project employees, and the administrative and supervisory personnel.

(4) Enrollment shall be
for a period of six months which may be extended for additional six-month
periods by mutual agreement of the corps and the corps member, not to exceed
two years. Corps members shall be reimbursed at the minimum wage rate established
by state or federal law, whichever is higher, which may be increased by up to
five percent for each additional six-month period worked: PROVIDED, That if
agencies elect to run a residential program, the appropriate costs for room and
board shall be deducted from the corps member's paycheck as provided in chapter
43.220 RCW.

(5) Corps members are
to be available at all times for emergency response services coordinated
through the military department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) or other public agency. Duties may include sandbagging and
flood cleanup, search and rescue, and other functions in response to
emergencies.

Sec. 703. RCW 90.56.280 and 1995 c
399 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of
any person discharging oil or hazardous substances or otherwise causing,
permitting, or allowing the same to enter the waters of the state, unless the
discharge or entry was expressly authorized by the department prior thereto or
authorized by operation of law under RCW 90.48.200, to immediately notify the
coast guard and the division of emergency management. The notice to the
division of emergency management within the military department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) shall be made to the
division's twenty-four hour statewide toll-free number established for
reporting emergencies.

PART
VII

DECODIFIED AND REPEALED SECTIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. The following sections
are each decodified:

(1) RCW 35.22.660 (Child care
facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(2) RCW 35.22.680 (Residential care
facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(3) RCW 35A.63.149 (Residential care
facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(4) RCW 35A.63.210 (Child care
facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(5) RCW 36.32.520 (Child care
facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(6) RCW 36.32.560 (Home rule charter
counties--Residential care facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of
ordinances);

(7) RCW 36.70.675 (Child care
facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(8) RCW 36.70.755 (Residential care
facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(9) RCW 70.95H.005 (Finding);

(10) RCW 70.95H.010 (Purpose--Market
development defined);

(11) RCW 70.95H.030 (Duties and
responsibilities);

(12) RCW 70.95H.040 (Authority);

(13) RCW 70.95H.900 (Termination); and

(14) RCW 70.95H.901 (Captions not law).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
802. RCW 43.31.409 (Investment opportunities
office--Created) and 1993 c 280 s 42 & 1989 c 312 s 3 are each repealed.

PART
VIII

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. Section 368 of this act
expires March 31, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
902. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
903. Sections 201 through 205
and 219 through 222 of this act are each added to chapter 43.31 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 904. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---