BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.36.020 and 2000 c
103 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and imposed upon motor vehicle fuel users a tax at the rate computed in
the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel.

(2) The tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section is imposed when any of the following occurs:

(a) Motor vehicle fuel
is removed in this state from a terminal if the motor vehicle fuel is removed
at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to
a destination outside of the state;

(b) Motor vehicle fuel
is removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:

(i) The removal is by
bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the motor vehicle fuel
immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or

(ii) The removal is at
the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct
delivery to a destination outside of the state;

(c) Motor vehicle fuel
enters into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage if either of the
following applies:

(i) The entry is by
bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensee; or

(ii) The entry is not
by bulk transfer;

(d) Motor vehicle fuel
is removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there was a prior
taxable removal, entry, or sale of the motor vehicle fuel;

(e) Blended motor
vehicle fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The
number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel subject to the tax is the
difference between the total number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel
removed or sold and the number of gallons of previously taxed motor vehicle
fuel used to produce the blended motor vehicle fuel.

(3) The proceeds of the
motor vehicle fuel excise tax shall be distributed as provided in RCW ((46.68.090))
82.36.410.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.36.410 and 1973 c
95 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys
collected by the director shall be transmitted forthwith to the state treasurer,
together with a statement showing whence the moneys were derived((, and
shall be by him credited to the motor vehicle fund)). Proceeds
collected from King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties shall be distributed back
to these counties in the same proportions in which the proceeds were remitted
to the treasurer, and used by these counties only for transportation purposes.
All other proceeds shall be credited to the motor vehicle fund and distributed
in accordance with RCW 46.68.090.

---
END ---