BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to further the government-to-government relationship between the state of
Washington and Indians in the state of Washington by authorizing the governor
to enter into cooperative agreements concerning the sale of cigarettes. The
legislature finds that these agreements will provide a means to promote
economic development, provide needed revenues for tribal governments and Indian
persons, and enhance enforcement of the state's cigarette tax law, ultimately
saving the state money and reducing conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governor may
enter into cooperative agreements concerning the sale of cigarettes. All
cooperative agreements shall meet the requirements for cooperative agreements
under this section. Except for cooperative agreements under section 3 of this
act, the rates, revenue sharing, and exemption terms of a cooperative agreement
are not effective unless authorized in a bill enacted by the legislature.

(2) Cooperative
agreements shall be in regard to retail sales in which Indian retailers make
delivery and physical transfer of possession of the cigarettes from the seller
to the buyer within the Indian lands. In addition, cooperative agreements
shall provide that retailers shall not sell or give, or permit to be sold or
given, cigarettes to any person under the age of eighteen years.

(3) A cooperative agreement
with a tribe shall provide for a tribal cigarette tax in lieu of all state
cigarette taxes and state and local sales and use taxes on sales of cigarettes
on Indian lands by Indian retailers. The tribe may allow an exemption for
sales to tribal members.

(4) Cooperative
agreements shall provide that all cigarettes possessed or sold by a retailer
shall bear a cigarette stamp obtained by wholesalers from a bank or other
suitable stamp vendor and applied to the cigarettes.

(5) Cooperative
agreements shall provide that retailers shall purchase cigarettes only from:

(a) Wholesalers or
manufacturers licensed to do business in the state of Washington;

(b) Out-of-state
wholesalers or manufacturers who, although not licensed to do business in the
state of Washington, agree to comply with the terms of the cooperative
agreement, are certified to the state as having so agreed, and who do in fact
so comply. However, the state may in its sole discretion exercise its
administrative and enforcement powers over such wholesalers or manufacturers to
the extent permitted by law;

(c) A tribal wholesaler
that purchases only from a wholesaler or manufacturer described in (a), (b), or
(d) of this subsection; and

(d) A tribal
manufacturer.

(6) Cooperative
agreements shall be for renewable periods of no more than eight years. A
renewal may not include a renewal of the phase-in period.

(7) Cooperative
agreements shall include provisions for compliance.

(8) Tax revenue
retained by a tribe must be used for essential government services. Use of tax
revenue for subsidization of cigarette and food retailers is prohibited.

(9) Cooperative
agreements may provide for the submission of disputes regarding the
interpretation and administration of their provisions for judicial resolution,
and, if such submissions are agreed, shall include provision for a limited
waiver of sovereign immunity and consent by the state for the resolution
conditioned upon a similar limited waiver of sovereign immunity by the other
parties to the agreement.

(10) The governor may
delegate the power to negotiate cooperative agreements to the department of
revenue.

(11) Information
received by the state or open to state review under the terms of an agreement
is subject to the provisions of RCW 82.32.330.

(12) For purposes of
this section and sections 3 through 6 of this act:

(a) "Essential
government services" means services such as tribal administration, public
facilities, fire, police, public health, education, job services, sewer, water,
environmental and land use, transportation, utility services, and economic
development;

(b) "Indian
lands" means all land held in trust for a tribe or Indian person by the
United States;

(c) "Indian
retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly owned and
operated by an Indian tribe, (ii) a business wholly owned and operated by a
tribal member and licensed by the tribe, or (iii) a business owned and operated
by the Indian person or persons in whose name the land is held in trust; and

(d) "Indian
tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian tribe
located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The governor is
authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with the Squaxin Island Tribe,
the Nisqually Tribe, Tulalip Tribes, the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, the Quinault
Nation, the Jamestown S'Klallam Indian Tribe, the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe,
the Stillaguamish Tribe, the Sauk-Suiattle Tribe, the Skokomish Indian Tribe,
the Nooksack Indian Tribe, and the Lummi Nation. Each agreement adopted under
this section shall provide that the tribal cigarette tax rate be one hundred
percent of the state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes within
three years of enacting the tribal tax and shall be set no lower than eighty
percent of the state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes during
the three-year phase-in period. The three-year phase-in period shall be
shortened by three months each quarter the number of cartons of nontribal
manufactured cigarettes is at least ten percent or more than the quarterly
average number of cartons of nontribal manufactured cigarettes from the six-month
period preceding the imposition of the tribal tax under the agreement. Sales
at a retailer operation not in existence as of the date a tribal tax under this
section is imposed are subject to the full rate of the tribal tax under the
agreement. The tribal cigarette tax is in lieu of the state cigarette and
state and local sales and use taxes, as provided in section 2(3) of this act.

(2) A cooperative
agreement under this section is subject to section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of cigarettes by an Indian retailer during
the effective period of a cooperative agreement subject to section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of cigarettes sold by an Indian
retailer during the effective period of a cooperative agreement subject to
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does
not apply to the sale, use, consumption, handling, possession, or distribution
of cigarettes by an Indian retailer during the effective period of a
cooperative agreement subject to section 2 of this act.

(2) Effective July 1,
2002, wholesalers and retailers subject to the provisions of this chapter shall
be allowed compensation for their services in affixing the stamps required
under this chapter a sum computed at the rate of six dollars per one thousand
stamps purchased or affixed by them.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. RCW 82.24.070 (Compensation of dealers),
as now or hereafter amended, and 1987 c 496 s 5, 1987 c 80 s 2, 1971 ex.s. c
299 s 14, 1965 ex.s. c 173 s 24, 1961 ex.s. c 24 s 4, & 1961 c 15 s
82.24.070 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Section 7 of this act
takes effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---