BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.06.050 and 1982 c
188 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Following a
hearing as prescribed by court rule, the arbitrator shall file his decision and
award with the clerk of the superior court, together with proof of service
thereof on the parties. Within twenty days after such filing, any aggrieved
party may file with the clerk a written notice of appeal and request for a
trial de novo in the superior court on all issues of law and fact. Such trial
de novo shall thereupon be held, including a right to jury, if demanded.

(a) Up to thirty
days prior to the actual date of a trial de novo, a nonappealing party may
serve upon the appealing party a written offer of compromise.

(b) In any case in
which an offer of compromise is not accepted by the appealing party within ten
calendar days after service thereof, for purposes of MAR 7.3, the amount of the
offer of compromise shall replace the amount of the arbitrator's award for
determining whether the party appealing the arbitrator's award has failed to
improve that party's position on the trial de novo.

(c) A
postarbitration offer of compromise shall not be filed or communicated to the
court or the trier of fact until after judgment on the trial de novo, at which
time a copy of the offer of compromise shall be filed for purposes of
determining whether the party who appealed the arbitrator's award has failed to
improve that party's position on the trial de novo, pursuant to MAR 7.3.

(2) If no appeal
has been filed at the expiration of twenty days following filing of the
arbitrator's decision and award, a judgment shall be entered and may be
presented to the court by any party, on notice, which judgment when entered
shall have the same force and effect as judgments in civil actions.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.06.060 and 1979 c
103 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((supreme))
superior court ((may by rule provide for)) shall assess
costs and reasonable attorney's fees ((that may be assessed)) against a
party ((appealing from)) who appeals the award ((who)) and
fails to improve his or her position on the trial de novo. The court
may assess costs and reasonable attorneys' fees against a party who voluntarily
withdraws a request for a trial de novo if the withdrawal is not requested in
conjunction with the acceptance of an offer of compromise.

(2) For the purposes
of this section, "costs and reasonable attorneys' fees" means those
provided for by statute or court rule, or both, as well as all expenses related
to expert witness testimony, that the court finds were reasonably necessary
after the request for trial de novo has been filed.

(3) If the
prevailing party in the arbitration also prevails at the trial de novo, even
though at the trial de novo the appealing party may have improved his or her
position from the arbitration, this section does not preclude the prevailing
party from recovering those costs and disbursements otherwise allowed under
chapter 4.84 RCW, for both actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 7.06 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
7.06.050 and 7.06.060 apply to all requests for a trial de novo filed pursuant
to and in appeal of an arbitrator's decision and filed on or after the
effective date of this act.

---
END ---