BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)(a) "Unused
property market" means any event:

(i) At which two or
more persons offer personal property for sale or exchange, at which a fee is
charged for sale or exchange of personal property, or at which a fee is charged
to prospective buyers for admission to the area at which personal property is
offered or displayed for sale or exchange; or

(ii) Regardless of the
number of persons offering or displaying personal property or the absence of
fees, at which personal property is offered or displayed for sale or exchange
if the event is held more than six times in any twelve-month period.

(b) "Unused
property market" is interchangeable with and applicable to swap meet,
indoor swap meet, flea market, or other similar terms, regardless of whether
these events are held inside a building or outside in the open. The primary
characteristic is that these activities involve a series of sales sufficient in
number, scope, and character to constitute a regular course of business.

(c) "Unused
property market" does not include:

(i) An event that is
organized for the exclusive benefit of any community chest, fund, foundation,
association, or corporation organized and operated for religious, educational,
or charitable purposes, provided that no part of any admission fee or parking
fee charged vendors or prospective purchasers or the gross receipts or net
earnings from the sale or exchange of personal property, whether in the form of
a percentage of the receipts or earnings, as salary, or otherwise, inures to
the benefit of any private shareholder or person participating in the
organization or conduct of the event; or

(ii) An event at which
all of the personal property offered for sale or displayed is new, and all
persons selling or exchanging personal property, or offering or displaying
personal property for sale or exchange, are manufacturers or authorized
representatives of manufacturers or distributors.

(2) "Unused
property merchant" means any person, other than a vendor or merchant with
an established retail store in the county, who transports an inventory of goods
to a building, vacant lot, or other unused property market location and who, at
that location, displays the goods for sale and sells the goods at retail or
offers the goods for sale at retail, except a person who offers five or less
items of the same new and unused merchandise for sale or exchange at an unused
property market.

(3) "Baby
food" or "infant formula" means any food manufactured, packaged,
and labeled specifically for sale for consumption by a child under the age of
two years.

(4)
"Nonprescription drug" or "over-the-counter drug" means any
nonnarcotic medicine or drug that may be sold without a prescription and is
prepackaged for use by the consumer, prepared by the manufacturer or producer
for use by the consumer, and should be properly labeled and unadulterated in
accordance with the requirements of the state food and drug laws and the
federal food, drug, and cosmetic act. "Nonprescription drug" does
not include herbal products, dietary supplements, botanical extracts, or
vitamins.

(5) "Medical
device" means any instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance,
implant, in vitro reagent, tool, or other similar or related article, including
any component part or accessory, which is required under federal law to bear
the label "caution: federal law requires dispensing by or on the order of
a physician"; or which is defined by federal law as a medical device and
is intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or in the
cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animals or is
intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or animals,
which does not achieve any of its principal intended purposes through chemical
action within or on the body of man or animals and which is not dependent upon
being metabolized for achievement of any of its principal intended purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. No unused property
merchant shall offer at an unused property market for sale or knowingly permit
the sale of baby food, infant formula, cosmetics, nonprescription drugs, or
medical devices. This section does not apply to a person who keeps available
for public inspection a written authorization identifying that person as an
authorized representative of the manufacturer or distributor of such product,
as long as the authorization is not false, fraudulent, or fraudulently
obtained.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This chapter does not
apply to:

(1) Business conducted
in any industry or association trade show; or

(2) Anyone who sells by
sample, catalog, or brochure for future delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A first violation of
this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(2) A second violation
of this chapter within five years is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) A third or
subsequent violation of this chapter within five years is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---