BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
46.55.105 and 1999 c 86 s 5 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) The abandonment of any vehicle creates a prima
facie

_8 presumption that the last registered owner of record is

_9 responsible for the abandonment and is liable for costs
incurred

10 in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned
vehicle, less

11 amounts realized at auction.

12 (2) If an unauthorized vehicle is found abandoned
under

13 subsection (1) of this section and removed at the
direction of law

14 enforcement, the last registered owner of record is
guilty of a

15 traffic infraction and must pay the penalty imposed
in RCW

16 46.63.110(2), unless the vehicle is redeemed as
provided in RCW

17 46.55.120. In addition to any other monetary penalty
payable under

18 chapter 46.63 RCW, the court shall not consider all
monetary

p. 1 SB
5375

_1 penalties as having been paid until the court is
satisfied that

_2 the person found to have committed the infraction has
made

_3 restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining
after

_4 disposal of the vehicle under RCW 46.55.140.

_5 (3) A vehicle theft report filed with a law enforcement
agency

_6 relieves the last registered owner of liability under
subsection

_7 (2) of this section for failure to redeem the vehicle.
However, the

_8 last registered owner remains liable for the costs
incurred in

_9 removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned
vehicle under

10 subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this section
limits in

11 any way the registered owner's rights in a civil action
or as

12 restitution in a criminal action against a person
responsible for

13 the theft of the vehicle.

14 (4) Properly filing a report of sale or transfer
regarding the

15 vehicle involved in accordance with RCW 46.12.101(1)
relieves the

16 last registered owner of liability under subsections (1)
and (2)

17 of this section. If the date of sale as indicated on
the report of

18 sale is on or before the date of impoundment, the buyer
identified

19 on the latest properly filed report of sale with the
department is

20 assumed liable for the costs incurred in removing,
storing, and

21 disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less amounts
realized at

22 auction. If the date of sale is after the date of
impoundment, the

23 previous registered owner is assumed to be liable for
such costs. A

24 licensed vehicle dealer is not liable under subsections
(1) and

25 (2) of this section if the dealer, as transferee or
assignee of

26 the last registered owner of the vehicle involved, has
complied

27 with the requirements of RCW 46.70.122 upon selling or
otherwise

28 disposing of the vehicle, or if the dealer has timely
filed a

29 transitional ownership record or report of sale under
RCW

30 46.12.103. In that case the person to whom the licensed
vehicle

31 dealer has sold or transferred the vehicle is assumed
liable for

32 the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing
of the

33 abandoned vehicle, less amounts realized at auction.

34 (5) For the purposes of reporting notices of traffic
infraction

35 to the department under RCW 46.20.270 and 46.52.101, and
for

36 purposes of reporting notices of failure to appear,
respond, or

37 comply regarding a notice of traffic infraction to the
department

SB 5375 p. 2

_1 under RCW 46.63.070(((5))) (6), a traffic
infraction under

_2 subsection (2) of this section is not considered to be a
standing,

_3 stopping, or parking violation.

_4 (6) A notice of infraction for a violation of this
section may

_5 be filed with a court of limited jurisdiction organized
under

_6 Title 3, 35, or 35A RCW, or with a violations bureau
subject to

_7 the court's jurisdiction.

_8 Sec. 2. RCW
46.55.130 and 2000 c 193 s 2 are each amended to read

_9 as follows:

10 (1) If, after the expiration of fifteen days from
the date of

11 mailing of notice of custody and sale required in RCW
46.55.110(3)

12 to the registered and legal owners, the vehicle remains
unclaimed

13 and has not been listed as a stolen vehicle, or a
suspended

14 license impound has been directed, but no security paid
under RCW

15 46.55.120, then the registered tow truck operator having
custody

16 of the vehicle shall conduct a sale of the vehicle at
public

17 auction after having first published a notice of the
date, place,

18 and time of the auction in a newspaper of general
circulation in

19 the county in which the vehicle is located not less than
three

20 days and no more than ten days before the date of the
auction. No

21 vehicle meeting the definition of junk vehicle, as
defined in RCW

22 46.55.010, shall be resold at auction. The
notice shall contain a

23 description of the vehicle including the make, model,
year, and

24 license number and a notification that a three-hour
public viewing

25 period will be available before the auction. The
auction shall be

26 held during daylight hours of a normal business day.

27 (2) The following procedures are required in any
public auction

28 of such abandoned vehicles:

29 (a) The auction shall be held in such a manner that
all persons

30 present are given an equal time and opportunity to bid;

31 (b) All bidders must be present at the time of
auction unless

32 they have submitted to the registered tow truck
operator, who may

33 or may not choose to use the preauction bid method, a
written bid

34 on a specific vehicle. Written bids may be submitted up
to five

35 days before the auction and shall clearly state which
vehicle is

36 being bid upon, the amount of the bid, and who is
submitting the

37 bid;

p. 3 SB
5375

_1 (c) The open bid process, including all written
bids, shall be

_2 used so that everyone knows the dollar value that must
be

_3 exceeded;

_4 (d) The highest two bids received shall be recorded
in written

_5 form and shall include the name, address, and telephone
number of

_6 each such bidder;

_7 (e) In case the high bidder defaults, the next
bidder has the

_8 right to purchase the vehicle for the amount of his or
her bid;

_9 (f) ((The successful bidder shall apply for title
within

10 fifteen days;

11 (g))) The registered tow truck operator shall
post a copy of

12 the auction procedure at the bidding site. If the
bidding site is

13 different from the licensed office location, the
operator shall

14 post a clearly visible sign at the office location that
describes

15 in detail where the auction will be held. At the
bidding site a

16 copy of the newspaper advertisement that lists the
vehicles for

17 sale shall be posted;

18 (((h))) (g) All surplus moneys derived
from the auction after

19 satisfaction of the registered tow truck operator's lien
shall be

20 remitted within thirty days to the department for
deposit in the

21 state motor vehicle fund. A report identifying the
vehicles

22 resulting in any surplus shall accompany the remitted
funds. If the

23 director subsequently receives a valid claim from the
registered

24 vehicle owner of record as determined by the department
within one

25 year from the date of the auction, the surplus moneys
shall be

26 remitted to such owner;

27 (((i))) (h) If an operator receives no
bid, or if the operator

28 is the successful bidder at auction, the operator shall,
within

29 forty-five days, sell the vehicle to a licensed
vehicle wrecker,

30 hulk hauler, or scrap processor ((by use of the
abandoned vehicle

31 report- affidavit of sale)) subject to
subsection (4) of this

32 section, or the operator shall apply for title to
the vehicle.

33 (3) A tow operator can refuse to accept a bid at
an auction

34 under this section for any of the following reasons:
(a) The

35 bidder is currently indebted to the operator; (b) the
operator has

36 knowledge that the bidder has previously abandoned
vehicles

37 purchased at auction; or (c) the bidder has
purchased, at auction,

SB 5375 p. 4

_1 more than four vehicles in the last calendar year
without

_2 obtaining title to any or all of the vehicles.

_3 (4)(a) The successful bidder must apply for title
at the time

_4 the bidder takes possession of the vehicle. The
application

_5 completed by the bidder must contain the following
information:

_6 (i) The bidder's name, address, and phone number;
(ii) the

_7 bidder's driver's license number; (iii) the name or
names of the

_8 coowner or legal owner; and (iv) the vehicle
identification number

_9 of the vehicle.

10 (b) If the successful bidder is a scrap processor
or hulk

11 hauler, as those terms are defined in RCW 46.79.010,
in addition

12 to the information required in this section, the
bidder must also

13 include on the application the number of his or her
hulk hauler or

14 scrap processor license.

15 (c) The tow operator must submit the completed
application to

16 the department no later than five days after the
successful bidder

17 takes possession of the vehicle.

18 (d) The department must ensure that all the
information

19 contained in the application is available by
electronic means to

20 law enforcement within seven days after the
department receives

21 the application from the operator.

22 (e) The department may charge a reasonable fee to
process the

23 application.

24 (5) In no case may an operator hold a vehicle
for longer than

25 ninety days without holding an auction on the vehicle,
except for

26 vehicles that are under a police or judicial hold.

27 (((4))) (6)(a) In no case may the
accumulation of storage

28 charges exceed fifteen days from the date of receipt of
the

29 information by the operator from the department as
provided by RCW

30 46.55.110(3).

31 (b) The failure of the registered tow truck operator
to comply

32 with the time limits provided in this chapter limits the

33 accumulation of storage charges to five days except
where delay is

34 unavoidable. Providing incorrect or incomplete
identifying

35 information to the department in the abandoned vehicle
report

36 shall be considered a failure to comply with these time
limits if

37 correct information is available. However, storage
charges begin to

p. 5 SB
5375

_1 accrue again on the date the correct and complete
information is

_2 provided to the department by the registered tow truck
operator.

_3 Sec. 3. RCW
46.63.110 and 1997 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 (1) A person found to have committed a traffic
infraction shall

_6 be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed
two hundred

_7 and fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by
this

_8 chapter or title.

_9 (2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW
46.55.105(2) is

10 two hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No
penalty assessed

11 under this subsection (2) shall be reduced.

12 (3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule
a schedule of

13 monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions.
This rule

14 shall also specify the conditions under which local
courts may

15 exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for
traffic

16 infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the
supreme

17 court to adjust this schedule every two years for
inflation.

18 (((3))) (4) There shall be a penalty
of twenty-five dollars for

19 failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction
except where

20 the infraction relates to parking as defined by local
law,

21 ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a
monetary

22 penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local
legislative body

23 may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five
dollars for

24 failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction
relating to

25 parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation,
or

26 resolution. The local court, whether a municipal,
police, or

27 district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by
the local

28 legislative body.

29 (((4))) (5) Monetary penalties
provided for in chapter 46.70

30 RCW which are civil in nature and penalties which may be
assessed

31 for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size,
weight, and

32 load of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation
on the

33 amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed
pursuant to this

34 chapter.

35 (((5))) (6) Whenever a monetary penalty
is imposed by a court

36 under this chapter it is immediately payable. If the
person is

37 unable to pay at that time the court may, in its
discretion, grant

SB 5375 p. 6

_1 an extension of the period in which the penalty may be
paid. If the

_2 penalty is not paid on or before the time established
for payment

_3 the court shall notify the department of the failure to
pay the

_4 penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's
driver's

_5 license or driving privilege until the penalty has been
paid and

_6 the penalty provided in subsection (((3))) (4)
of this section has

_7 been paid.

_8 (((6))) (7) In addition to any other
penalties imposed under

_9 this section and not subject to the limitation of
subsection (1)

10 of this section, a person found to have committed a
traffic

11 infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per

12 infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be
reduced or

13 waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the
state

14 treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services
and trauma

15 care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.

16 Sec. 4. RCW
46.12.101 and 1998 c 203 s 11 are each amended to read

17 as follows:

18 A transfer of ownership in a motor vehicle is
perfected by

19 compliance with the requirements of this section.

20 (1) If an owner transfers his or her interest in a
vehicle,

21 other than by the creation, deletion, or change of a
security

22 interest, the owner shall, at the time of the delivery
of the

23 vehicle, execute an assignment to the transferee and
provide an

24 odometer disclosure statement under RCW 46.12.124 on the

25 certificate of ownership or as the department otherwise

26 prescribes, and cause the certificate and assignment to
be

27 transmitted to the transferee. The owner shall notify
the

28 department or its agents or subagents, in writing, on
the

29 appropriate form, of the date of the sale or transfer,
the name

30 and address of the owner and of the transferee, the
transferee's

31 driver's license number if available, and such
description of the

32 vehicle, including the vehicle identification number,
the license

33 plate number, or both, as may be required in the
appropriate form

34 provided or approved for that purpose by the
department. The report

35 of sale will be deemed properly filed if all information
required

36 in this section is provided on the form and includes a
department-

37 authorized notation that the document was received by
the

p. 7 SB
5375

_1 department, its agents, or subagents on or before the
fifth day

_2 after the sale of the vehicle, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and

_3 state and federal holidays. Agents and subagents shall
immediately

_4 electronically transmit the seller's report of sale to
the

_5 department. Reports of sale processed and recorded by
the

_6 department's agents or subagents may be subject to fees
as

_7 specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b).

_8 (2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this
section to

_9 provide an odometer disclosure statement apply to the
transfer of

10 vehicles held for lease when transferred to a lessee and
then to

11 the lessor at the end of the leasehold and to vehicles
held in a

12 fleet when transferred to a purchaser.

13 (3)(a) Except as provided in RCW 46.70.122
the transferee shall

14 within fifteen days after delivery to the transferee of
the

15 vehicle, execute the application for a new certificate
of

16 ownership in the same space provided therefor on the
certificate

17 or as the department prescribes, and cause the
certificates and

18 application to be transmitted to the department.

19 (b) If the vehicle is purchased at auction under
RCW 46.55.130,

20 the purchaser must comply with the requirements of
RCW 46.55.105

21 in lieu of this section.

22 (4) Upon request of the owner or transferee, a
secured party in

23 possession of the certificate of ownership shall, unless
the

24 transfer was a breach of its security agreement, either
deliver

25 the certificate to the transferee for transmission to
the

26 department or, when the secured party receives the
owner's

27 assignment from the transferee, it shall transmit the
transferee's

28 application for a new certificate, the existing
certificate, and

29 the required fee to the department. Compliance with
this section

30 does not affect the rights of the secured party.

31 (5) If a security interest is reserved or created at
the time

32 of the transfer, the certificate of ownership shall be
retained by

33 or delivered to the person who becomes the secured
party, and the

34 parties shall comply with the provisions of RCW
46.12.170.

35 (6) If the purchaser or transferee fails or neglects
to make

36 application to transfer the certificate of ownership and
license

37 registration within fifteen days after the date of
delivery of the

38 vehicle, he or she shall on making application for
transfer be

SB 5375 p. 8

_1 assessed a twenty-five dollar penalty on the sixteenth
day and two

_2 dollars additional for each day thereafter, but not to
exceed one

_3 hundred dollars. The director may by rule establish
conditions

_4 under which the penalty will not be assessed when an
application

_5 for transfer is delayed for reasons beyond the control
of the

_6 purchaser. Conditions for not assessing the penalty may
be

_7 established for but not limited to delays caused by:

_8 (a) The department requesting additional supporting
documents;

_9 (b) Extended hospitalization or illness of the
purchaser;

10 (c) Failure of a legal owner to release his or her
interest;

11 (d) Failure, negligence, or nonperformance of the
department,

12 auditor, or subagent.

13 Failure or neglect to make application to transfer
the

14 certificate of ownership and license registration within
forty-

15 five days after the date of delivery of the vehicle is a

16 misdemeanor.

17 (7) Upon receipt of an application for reissue or
replacement

18 of a certificate of ownership and transfer of license

19 registration, accompanied by the endorsed certificate of
ownership

20 or other documentary evidence as is deemed necessary,
the

21 department shall, if the application is in order and if
all

22 provisions relating to the certificate of ownership and
license

23 registration have been complied with, issue new
certificates of

24 title and license registration as in the case of an
original issue

25 and shall transmit the fees together with an itemized
detailed

26 report to the state treasurer, to be deposited in the
motor

27 vehicle fund.

28 (8) Once each quarter the department shall report to
the

29 department of revenue a list of those vehicles for which
a

30 seller's report has been received but no transfer of
title has

31 taken place.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 9 SB
5375