BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The superior court has
the power, upon petition of the commission, to order any entity providing
telecommunications services, including wireless telecommunications service, to
refuse or terminate a telephone number, with no call forwarding to any new telephone
number that may be provided from the terminated telephone number, when the
number is being used by a person or an entity advertising or otherwise holding
out to the public to provide household goods moving services in violation of
the laws requiring a household goods permit. The court shall issue such order,
with or without hearing, if it finds that:

(1) The person or
entity using the telephone number is advertising or holding out to the public
to perform, or is performing, household goods carrier services without having
in force a permit issued by the commission;

(2) The telephone
number is being used or is to be used as an instrumentality, directly or
indirectly, to violate or to assist in violation of the laws requiring a
household goods carrier permit; and

(3) The commission has
already obtained, or is concurrently petitioning for, pursuant to RCW
34.05.578, an order of the superior court enforcing a cease and desist order
against the party whose telephone number would be terminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. In the event the court
orders termination of the use of a telephone number by a subscriber, the
terminated number may not be reused by any entity providing telecommunications
services, including wireless telecommunications service, in this state for a
period of one year unless a lesser period of time is specified by the court or
if further order of the court releases the number for reuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The entity providing
telecommunications services that has been ordered to refuse or terminate a
telephone number shall notify the subscriber in writing within five business
days that such action was implemented and shall provide a copy of the court's
order to the subscriber. The entity providing telecommunications services
shall act in accordance with the court's order within fourteen days of the
commission serving it with a copy of the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. No action at law or in
equity shall accrue against any entity providing telecommunications services in
this state because of, or as a result of, any lawful act related to action
under sections 1 through 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 81.80 RCW.

---
END ---