BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that many factors

_6 impact the quality and availability of habitat for salmon
in their

_7 various life stages. The legislature also finds that
substantial

_8 portions of the shoreline management rules recently
adopted by the

_9 department of ecology are intended to improve shoreline
practices

10 that impact salmon. The legislature also finds that many
state and

11 federal laws direct counties and cities to take action to
protect

12 and improve salmon habitat.

13 The legislature recognizes that there are numerous
regulations

14 requiring local governments to protect the environment,
and salmon

15 in particular. The growth management act requires that
county and

16 city development regulations include best available
science when

17 designating and protecting critical areas, including fish
and

18 wildlife areas, wetlands, and frequently flooded areas.
The growth

p. 1 ESSB
5378

_1 management act also requires counties and cities to give
special

_2 consideration to conservation and protection measures
necessary to

_3 preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries. In addition,
most

_4 counties and cities must comply with the federal clean
water

_5 act. Many counties and cities must develop storm water
management

_6 plans and must require those developing property to use
best

_7 management practices to prevent storm water runoff.
Counties and

_8 cities must also comply with the state environmental
policy

_9 act. All counties and cities with threatened or
endangered salmonid

10 species must avoid take through their development
practices and

11 permitting activities, subject to enforcement by the
federal

12 government or third-party lawsuits. Many counties and
cities also

13 have in place flood hazard reduction programs, are
engaged in

14 watershed planning, and are engaged in salmon recovery
limiting

15 factors analysis.

16 It is the intent of this act to coordinate the
planning process

17 of the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, the
critical

18 areas provision of the growth management act, RCW
36.70A.130, and

19 the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW. The
planning

20 should be on the same schedule to fully integrate the
statutory

21 requirements of each.

22 Sec. 2. RCW 90.58.080
and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to

23 read as follows:

24 (1) Local governments shall develop or amend, ((within
twenty-

25 four months after)) pursuant to the adoption
of guidelines as

26 provided in RCW 90.58.060, a master program for regulation
of uses

27 of the shorelines of the state consistent with the required

28 elements of the guidelines adopted by the department.

29 (2) The department must consult with counties and
cities and

30 develop a master program amendment schedule consistent
with the

31 priority salmon recovery regions identified in the
statewide

32 strategy to recover salmon and population growth data
provided by

33 the office of financial management. Taking into account
the amount

34 of funding provided by the legislature and the ability
of the

35 department to timely review and approve the shoreline
master

36 program amendments, the schedule may not require a
county or city

37 to submit its amended master program to the department
sooner than

ESSB 5378 p. 2

_1 thirty-six months or later than seventy-two months
after that

_2 county or city has received the full amount of
funding needed to

_3 amend its shoreline master program.

_4 (3) The department, upon the request of a local
government,

_5 must grant an extension of no less than twelve months
to the

_6 deadlines established by the department under
subsection (2) of

_7 this section for amending the shoreline master
program element of

_8 comprehensive plans.

_9 (4) Amendments to the guidelines adopted by the
department

10 after January 1, 2000, do not apply to any:

11 (a) County or city with a shoreline master
program and

12 comprehensive land use plan in place;

13 (b) County, or city within a county, that has
seventy-five

14 percent or more of its land base in preservation,
natural resource

15 use, or open space. (i) "Preservation"
means land that is set aside

16 for national parks, national wildlife refuges, state
parks, local

17 parks, conservation easements, natural resource
conservation

18 areas, open space, or any similar status; (ii)
"natural resource

19 use" means national forest land, state forest
land, and

20 agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under

21 RCW 36.70A.170; and (iii) "open space" has
the same definition as

22 in RCW 84.34.020; and

23 (c) Counties that border on another state of the
United States.

24 (5) Counties or cities that are not required to
amend an

25 existing master program to conform to shoreline
master program

26 guidelines adopted by the department after January 1,
2000, must

27 either maintain and enforce a master program subject
to the

28 previous guidelines or voluntarily amend their master
program

29 subject to the amended guidelines.

30 Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.130
and 1997 c 429 s 10 are each amended to

31 read as follows:

32 (1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, each

33 comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be

34 subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county
or city

35 that adopted them. Not later than September 1, 2002, and
at least

36 every five years thereafter, a county or city shall take
action to

37 review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use
plan and

p. 3 ESSB
5378

_1 development regulations to ensure that the plan and
regulations

_2 are complying with the requirements of this chapter.
The review and

_3 evaluation required by this subsection may be combined
with the

_4 review required by subsection (3) of this section.

_5 Any amendment or revision to a comprehensive land
use plan

_6 shall conform to this chapter, and any change to
development

_7 regulations shall be consistent with and implement the

_8 comprehensive plan.

_9 (2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and
broadly

10 disseminate to the public a public participation program

11 identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments or
revisions of

12 the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing
body of the

13 county or city no more frequently than once every year
except that

14 amendments may be considered more frequently under the
following

15 circumstances:

16 (i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan;

17 (ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master
program

18 under the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and

19 (iii) The amendment of the capital facilities
element of a

20 comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the
adoption or

21 amendment of a county or city budget.

22 (b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this
subsection, all

23 proposals shall be considered by the governing body
concurrently

24 so the cumulative effect of the various proposals can be

25 ascertained. However, after appropriate public
participation a

26 county or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its

27 comprehensive plan that conform with this chapter
whenever an

28 emergency exists or to resolve an appeal of a
comprehensive plan

29 filed with a growth management hearings board or with
the court.

30 (3) Each county that designates urban growth areas
under RCW

31 36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its
designated

32 urban growth area or areas, and the densities permitted
within

33 both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of
each urban

34 growth area. In conjunction with this review by the
county, each

35 city located within an urban growth area shall review
the

36 densities permitted within its boundaries, and the
extent to which

37 the urban growth occurring within the county has located
within

38 each city and the unincorporated portions of the urban
growth

ESSB 5378 p. 4

_1 areas. The county comprehensive plan designating urban
growth

_2 areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth
areas by

_3 the comprehensive plans of the county and each city
located within

_4 the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate
the urban

_5 growth projected to occur in the county for the
succeeding twenty-

_6 year period. The review required by this subsection may
be combined

_7 with the review and evaluation required by RCW
36.70A.215.

_8 (4) It is the intent of this section to
coordinate the planning

_9 process of the growth management act, chapter 36.70A
RCW, the

10 critical areas provision of the growth management act
under this

11 section, and the shoreline management act, chapter
90.58 RCW. The

12 planning should be on the same schedule to fully
integrate the

13 statutory requirements of each.

14 (5) Revisions of critical areas must be completed
according to

15 the following schedule:

16 (a) Not later than September 1, 2004, and every
ten years

17 thereafter, for each county and city that is subject
to the

18 requirements of RCW 36.70A.215;

19 (b) Not later than September 1, 2006, and every
ten years

20 thereafter, for each county and city that adopted a
comprehensive

21 plan between January 1, 1992, and January 1, 1997,
unless it is

22 subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215;

23 (c) Not later than September 1, 2008, and every
ten years

24 thereafter, for all other counties and cities, except
that if a

25 county or city becomes required or chooses to plan
under RCW

26 36.70A.040 after July 1, 2001, it must take action to
formally

27 review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive plan
and

28 development regulations no later than ten years after
the due

29 dates required for its initial adoption of a
comprehensive plan

30 and development regulations or, if it is subject to
the

31 requirements of RCW 36.70A.215, consistent with the
schedule in

32 (a) of this subsection.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 ESSB
5378