BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
recognizes that the

_6 cougar, Puma concolor, also known as the mountain
lion, is the

_7 largest cat in Washington and the second largest in
North

_8 America. The state of Washington has designated an
official state

_9 tree, grass, flower, fruit, bird, fossil, fish, insect, song,
folk

10 song, and dance, but not an official state animal. The
cougar is an

11 integral part of the Pacific Northwest, prowling the
forests and

12 mountains of the north Cascades. Children of our state
are keenly

13 aware of the importance of the cougar as a symbol of
power,

14 beauty, and mystery. The legislature finds that the
cougar is a

15 state treasure, and deserving of recognition as the
official state

16 animal.

17

p. 1 SB
5379

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 1.20 RCW

_2 to read as follows:

_3 The cougar, Puma concolor, is designated as
the official animal

_4 of the state of Washington.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5379 p. 2