BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.36.320 and 1998 c
337 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall classify a telecommunications company as a competitive telecommunications
company if the services it offers are subject to effective competition.
Effective competition means that the company's customers have reasonably
available alternatives and that the company does not have a significant captive
customer base. In determining whether a company is competitive, factors the
commission shall consider include but are not limited to:

(a) The number and
sizes of alternative providers of service;

(b) The extent to which
services are available from alternative providers in the relevant market;

(c) The ability of
alternative providers to make functionally equivalent or substitute services
readily available at competitive rates, terms, and conditions; and

(d) Other indicators of
market power which may include market share, growth in market share, ease of
entry, and the affiliation of providers of services.

The commission shall
conduct the initial classification and any subsequent review of the
classification in accordance with such procedures as the commission may
establish by rule.

(2) ((Competitive
telecommunications companies shall be subject to minimal regulation. Minimal
regulation means that competitive telecommunications companies may file,
instead of tariffs, price lists that shall be effective after ten days' notice
to the commission and customers. The commission shall prescribe the form of
notice. The commission may also waive other regulatory requirements under this
title for competitive telecommunications companies when it determines that
competition will serve the same purposes as public interest regulation. The
commission may waive different regulatory requirements for different companies
if such different treatment is in the public interest.))

A competitive
telecommunications company shall at a minimum:

(a) Keep its accounts
according to regulations as determined by the commission;

(b) File financial
reports with the commission as required by the commission and in a form and at
times prescribed by the commission;

(c) ((Keep on file
at the commission)) Maintain such current price lists and service
standards as the commission may require; and

(d) Cooperate with
commission investigations of customer complaints.

(3) ((When a
telecommunications company has demonstrated that the equal access requirements
ordered by the federal district court in the case of U.S. v. AT&T, 552 F.
Supp. 131 (1982), or in supplemental orders, have been met, the commission
shall review the classification of telecommunications companies providing
inter-LATA interexchange services. At that time, the commission shall classify
all such companies as competitive telecommunications companies unless it finds
that effective competition, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, does
not then exist.

(4))) The commission may revoke any waivers it
grants and may reclassify any competitive telecommunications company if the
revocation or reclassification would protect the public interest.

(((5)
The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and 80.36.180 in
whole or in part for a competitive telecommunications company if it finds that
competition will serve the same purpose and protect the public interest.))

Sec. 2. RCW 80.36.330 and 1998 c
337 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
classify a telecommunications service provided by a telecommunications company
as a competitive telecommunications service if the service is subject to
effective competition. Effective competition means that customers of the
service have reasonably available alternatives and that the service is not
provided to a significant captive customer base. In determining whether a
service is competitive, factors the commission shall consider include but are
not limited to:

(a) The number and size
of alternative providers of services;

(b) The extent to which
services are available from alternative providers in the relevant market;

(c) The ability of
alternative providers to make functionally equivalent or substitute services
readily available at competitive rates, terms, and conditions; and

(d) Other indicators of
market power, which may include market share, growth in market share, ease of
entry, and the affiliation of providers of services.

(2) ((When the
commission finds that a telecommunications company has demonstrated that a
telecommunications service is competitive, the commission may permit the
service to be provided under a price list effective on ten days notice to the
commission and customers. The commission shall prescribe the form of notice.
The commission may adopt procedural rules necessary to implement this section.

(3))) Prices or rates charged for ((competitive))
telecommunications services classified as competitive under this section
shall cover their cost. The commission shall determine proper cost standards
to implement this section, provided that in making any assignment of costs or
allocating any revenue requirement, the commission shall act to preserve
affordable universal telecommunications service.

(((4))) (3)
The commission may investigate prices for ((competitive))
telecommunications services classified as competitive under this section
upon complaint. In any complaint proceeding initiated by the commission, the
telecommunications company providing the service shall bear the burden of
proving that the prices charged cover cost, and are fair, just, and reasonable.

(((5))) (4)
Telecommunications companies shall provide the commission with all data it
deems necessary to implement this section.

(((6))) (5)
No losses incurred by a telecommunications company in the provision of ((competitive))
telecommunications services classified as competitive under this
section may be recovered through rates for noncompetitive services. The
commission may order refunds or credits to any class of subscribers to a
noncompetitive telecommunications service which has paid excessive rates
because of below cost pricing of competitive telecommunications services.

(((7))) (6)
The commission may reclassify any ((competitive)) telecommunications
service classified as competitive under this section if reclassification
would protect the public interest.

(((8) The commission
may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and 80.36.180 in whole or in part
for a service classified as competitive if it finds that competition will serve
the same purpose and protect the public interest.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Competitive
telecommunications service" includes any service provided by a company
classified as competitive under RCW 80.36.320 and any service classified as
competitive under RCW 80.36.330.

(b) "Price
list" means a written offer containing the prices, terms, and conditions
under which a competitive telecommunications service is offered.

(2) Competitive
telecommunications services shall be subject to minimal regulation as provided
for in this section.

(a) The commission
shall waive the application to competitive telecommunications service of any
regulatory requirement under this title, except RCW 80.36.320 and 80.36.330 and
this section, if it determines that competition will serve the same purposes as
public interest regulation. The commission may waive different regulatory
requirements for different types of service or different types of companies if
the treatment is in the public interest and does not result in unfair
competitive advantage.

(b) The commission may
permit or require that telecommunications companies maintain publicly
accessible price lists or file price lists with the commission. However,
regardless of whether price lists are filed with the commission, no
telecommunications company may impose mandatory local measured
telecommunications service that is inconsistent with the provisions of RCW
80.04.130(3).

(c) Each
telecommunications company shall notify customers of any change in the prices,
terms, or conditions under which any competitive telecommunications service is
offered or provided. The commission may prescribe the form, manner, and timing
of the notice, except that for changes in presubscribed local exchange, local
toll, and long-distance service, telecommunications companies must provide
written notice to each affected customer at least ten days prior to the
effective date of any price increase or other change in a material term or
condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

The commission, after a
process of public participation, shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2001, on the following issues related to
implementing sections 1 through 3 of this act:

(1) An update on the
development of competitive telecommunications services in the Washington
marketplace, including differences by geographic areas, customer classes, and
types of services;

(2) A plan for
providing consumers with a meaningful way to track and compare competitive
telecommunications services, with emphasis on improving consumers' ability to
make informed choices among alternative providers; and

(3) The
standards the commission applies to determine whether different regulatory
treatment authorized under section 3(2)(a) of this act is in the public
interest and does not result in unfair competitive advantage.

---
END ---