BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.17.020 and 1995 c
397 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Agency"
includes all state agencies and all local agencies. "State agency"
includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission,
or other state agency. "Local agency" includes every county, city,
town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose
district, or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or
agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(2) "Authorized
committee" means the political committee authorized by a candidate, or by
the public official against whom recall charges have been filed, to accept
contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public
official.

(3) "Ballot
proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW 29.01.110, or
any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition proposed to be submitted to
the voters of the state or any municipal corporation, political subdivision, or
other voting constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that constituency
prior to its circulation for signatures.

(4) "Benefit"
means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary advantage, or
the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary
disadvantage.

(5) "Bona fide
political party" means:

(a) An organization
that has filed a valid certificate of nomination with the secretary of state
under chapter 29.24 RCW;

(b) The governing body
of the state organization of a major political party, as defined in RCW
29.01.090, that is the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to
exercise authority on behalf of the state party; or

(c) The county central
committee or legislative district committee of a major political party. There
may be only one legislative district committee for each party in each
legislative district.

(6)
"Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or political
committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.

(7)
"Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW 42.17.050, to
perform the duties specified in that section.

(8)
"Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for election or
election to public office. An individual seeks nomination or election when he
or she first:

(a) Receives contributions
or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities with intent to promote
his or her candidacy for office;

(b) Announces publicly
or files for office;

(c) Purchases
commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote his or her candidacy;
or

(d) Gives his or her
consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual any of the
actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.

(9) "Caucus
political committee" means a political committee organized and maintained
by the members of a major political party in the state senate or state house of
representatives.

(10) "Commercial
advertiser" means any person who sells the service of communicating
messages or producing printed material for broadcast or distribution to the
general public or segments of the general public whether through the use of
newspapers, magazines, television and radio stations, billboard companies,
direct mail advertising companies, printing companies, or otherwise.

(11)
"Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.

(12)
"Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services of any
kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17.241, the
term "compensation" shall not include per diem allowances or other
payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official business of the
governmental entity.

(13) "Continuing
political committee" means a political committee that is an organization
of continuing existence not established in anticipation of any particular
election campaign.

(14)(a)
"Contribution" includes:

(i) A loan, gift,
deposit, subscription, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge,
payment, transfer of funds between political committees, or anything of value,
including personal and professional services for less than full consideration;

(ii) An expenditure
made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate, a political committee, or their agents;

(iii) The financing by
a person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in
part, of broadcast, written, graphic, or other form of political advertising
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized agent;

(iv) Sums paid for
tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners and parties, except for the
actual cost of the consumables furnished at the event.

(b) "Contribution"
does not include:

(i) Standard interest
on money deposited in a political committee's account;

(ii) Ordinary home
hospitality;

(iii) A contribution
received by a candidate or political committee that is returned to the
contributor within five business days of the date on which it is received by
the candidate or political committee;

(iv) A news item,
feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is
of primary interest to the general public, that is in a news medium controlled
by a person whose business is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a
candidate or a political committee;

(v) An internal
political communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to
a political party organization or political committee, or to the officers,
management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to
the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;

(vi) The rendering of
personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers,
or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in
excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer
services," for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for
which the individual is not compensated by any person;

(vii) Messages in the
form of reader boards, banners, or yard or window signs displayed on a person's
own property or property occupied by a person. However, a facility used for
such political advertising for which a rental charge is normally made must be
reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution
limit of the person providing the facility;

(viii) Legal or
accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:

(A) A political party
or caucus political committee if the person paying for the services is the
regular employer of the person rendering such services; or

(B) A candidate or an
authorized committee if the person paying for the services is the regular
employer of the individual rendering the services and if the services are
solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with state election or public
disclosure laws.

(c) Contributions other
than money or its equivalent are deemed to have a monetary value equivalent to
the fair market value of the contribution. Services or property or rights
furnished at less than their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any
candidate or political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a
contribution must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market
value and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.

(15) "Elected
official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any
public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.

(16)
"Election" includes any primary, general, or special election for
public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is submitted to
the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the qualifications for voting
include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1
(Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be
considered an election for purposes of this chapter.

(17) "Election
campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition to a candidate
for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or in opposition
to, a ballot proposition.

(18) "Election
cycle" means the period beginning on the first day of December after the
date of the last previous general election for the office that the candidate
seeks and ending on November 30th after the next election for the office. In
the case of a special election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election
cycle" means the period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending
on November 30th after the special election.

(19)
"Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value,
and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally
enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for
the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or
candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For
the purposes of this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and
promises to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment
is made. The term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or
complete repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.

(20) "Final
report" means the report described as a final report in RCW 42.17.080(2).

(21) "General
election" for the purposes of the limits in RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office. It does
not include a primary.

(22) "Gift,"
is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.

(23) "Immediate
family" includes the spouse, dependent children, and other dependent
relatives, if living in the household. For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640
through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse,
and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother,
half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the spouse of any
such person and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse and the spouse of any such person.

(24) "Independent
expenditure" means an expenditure that has each of the following elements:

(a) It is made in
support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person who is not
(i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an authorized committee of that candidate
for that office, (iii) a person who has received the candidate's encouragement
or approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in
part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the
defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person
with whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other
candidate or candidates for that office;

(b) The expenditure
pays in whole or in part for political advertising that either specifically
names the candidate supported or opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt
identifies the candidate without using the candidate's name; and

(c) The expenditure,
alone or in conjunction with another expenditure or other expenditures of the
same person in support of or opposition to that candidate, has a value of five
hundred dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five
hundred dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.

(25)(a)
"Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a
candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the
individual's employer, immediate family as defined for purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an association to which the individual belongs.

(b) A treasurer or a
candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee that the
treasurer or candidate serves.

(c) A professional
fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for
fund-raising services at the usual and customary rate.

(d) A volunteer hosting
a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an intermediary for
purposes of that event.

(26)
"Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of the state
legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the subject of action by
either house or any committee of the legislature and all bills and resolutions
that, having passed both houses, are pending approval by the governor.

(27) "Lobby" and
"lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, or the adoption
or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any
state agency under the state Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or
other organization's act of communicating with the members of that association
or organization.

(28)
"Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or her own
or another's behalf.

(29) "Lobbyist's
employer" means the person or persons by whom a lobbyist is employed and
all persons by whom he or she is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.

(30) "Person"
includes an individual, partnership, joint venture, public or private
corporation, association, federal, state, or local governmental entity or
agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political committee,
political party, executive committee thereof, or any other organization or
group of persons, however organized.

(31) "Person in
interest" means the person who is the subject of a record or any
representative designated by that person, except that if that person is under a
legal disability, the term "person in interest" means and includes
the parent or duly appointed legal representative.

(32) "Political
advertising" includes any advertising displays, newspaper ads, billboards,
signs, brochures, articles, tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television
presentations, or other means of mass communication, used for the purpose of
appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support
in any election campaign.

(33) "Political
committee" means any person (except a candidate or an individual dealing
with his or her own funds or property) having the expectation of receiving
contributions or making expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any
candidate or any ballot proposition.

(34)
"Primary" for purposes of the limits in RCW 42.17.640 means
the ((procedure for nominating)) election that nominates a
candidate to state office ((under chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other
primary for an election that uses, in large measure, the procedures established
in chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW)).

(35) "Public
office" means any federal, state, county, city, town, school district,
port district, special district, or other state political subdivision elective
office.

(36) "Public
record" includes any writing containing information relating to the
conduct of government or the performance of any governmental or proprietary
function prepared, owned, used, or retained by any state or local agency
regardless of physical form or characteristics. For the office of the
secretary of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, public records means legislative records as defined in RCW
40.14.100 and also means the following: All budget and financial records;
personnel leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated a public
record by any official action of the senate or the house of representatives.

(37) "Recall
campaign" means the period of time beginning on the date of the filing of
recall charges under RCW 29.82.015 and ending thirty days after the recall
election.

(38) "State
legislative office" means the office of a member of the state house of
representatives or the office of a member of the state senate.

(39) "State
office" means state legislative office or the office of governor,
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of public instruction,
state auditor, or state treasurer.

(40) "State
official" means a person who holds a state office.

(41) "Surplus
funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or candidate, the
balance of contributions that remain in the possession or control of that
committee or candidate subsequent to the election for which the contributions
were received, and that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining
debts incurred by the committee or candidate prior to that election. In the
case of a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee that are
in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its
final report under RCW 42.17.065.

(42)
"Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating,
photographing, and every other means of recording any form of communication or
representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words, pictures,
sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof, and all papers, maps, magnetic or
paper tapes, photographic films and prints, motion picture, film and video
recordings, magnetic or punched cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound
recordings, and other documents including existing data compilations from which
information may be obtained or translated.

As used in this
chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any gender, the other, as the
context requires.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.17.090 and 1993 c
256 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each report
required under RCW 42.17.080 (1) and (2) shall disclose the following:

(a) The funds on hand
at the beginning of the period;

(b) The name and
address of each person who has made one or more contributions during the
period, together with the money value and date of such contributions and the
aggregate value of all contributions received from each such person during the
campaign or in the case of a continuing political committee, the current
calendar year: PROVIDED, That pledges in the aggregate of less than one
hundred dollars from any one person need not be reported: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the income which results from a fund-raising activity conducted in
accordance with RCW 42.17.067 may be reported as one lump sum, with the
exception of that portion of such income which was received from persons whose
names and addresses are required to be included in the report required by RCW
42.17.067: PROVIDED FURTHER, That contributions of no more than twenty-five
dollars in the aggregate from any one person during the election campaign may
be reported as one lump sum so long as the campaign treasurer maintains a
separate and private list of the name, address, and amount of each such
contributor: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the money value of contributions of
postage shall be the face value of such postage;

(c) Each loan,
promissory note, or security instrument to be used by or for the benefit of the
candidate or political committee made by any person, together with the names
and addresses of the lender and each person liable directly, indirectly or
contingently and the date and amount of each such loan, promissory note, or
security instrument;

(d) All other
contributions not otherwise listed or exempted;

(e) The name and
address of each candidate or political committee to which any transfer of funds
was made, together with the amounts and dates of such transfers;

(f) The name and
address of each person to whom an expenditure was made in the aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars during the period covered by this report, and the
amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure. A candidate for state
executive or state legislative office or the political committee of such a
candidate shall report this information for an expenditure under one of the
following categories, whichever is appropriate: (i) Expenditures for the
election of the candidate; (ii) expenditures for nonreimbursed public
office-related expenses; (iii) expenditures required to be reported under (e)
of this subsection; or (iv) expenditures of surplus funds and other
expenditures. The report of such a candidate or committee shall contain a
separate total of expenditures for each category and a total sum of all
expenditures. Other candidates and political committees need not report
information regarding expenditures under the categories listed in (i) through
(iv) of this subsection or under similar such categories unless required to do
so by the commission by rule. The report of such an other candidate or
committee shall also contain the total sum of all expenditures;

(g) ((The name and
address of each person to whom any expenditure was made directly or indirectly
to compensate the person for soliciting or procuring signatures on an initiative
or referendum petition, the amount of such compensation to each such person,
and the total of the expenditures made for this purpose. Such expenditures
shall be reported under this subsection (1)(g) whether the expenditures are or
are not also required to be reported under (f) of this subsection;

(h))) The name and address of any person and the
amount owed for any debt, obligation, note, unpaid loan, or other liability in
the amount of more than two hundred fifty dollars or in the amount of more than
fifty dollars that has been outstanding for over thirty days;

(((i))) (h)
The surplus or deficit of contributions over expenditures;

(((j))) (i)
The disposition made in accordance with RCW 42.17.095 of any surplus funds;

(((k))) (j)
Such other information as shall be required by the commission by rule in
conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter; and

(((l))) (k)
Funds received from a political committee not otherwise required to report
under this chapter (a "nonreporting committee"). Such funds shall be
forfeited to the state of Washington unless the nonreporting committee has
filed or within ten days following such receipt files with the commission a
statement disclosing: (i) Its name and address; (ii) the purposes of the
nonreporting committee; (iii) the names, addresses, and titles of its officers
or if it has no officers, the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible
leaders; (iv) the name, office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate
in the state of Washington whom the nonreporting committee is supporting, and,
if such committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the
party; (v) the ballot proposition supported or opposed in the state of
Washington, if any, and whether such committee is in favor of or opposed to
such proposition; (vi) the name and address of each person residing in the
state of Washington or corporation which has a place of business in the state
of Washington who has made one or more contributions in the aggregate of more
than twenty-five dollars to the nonreporting committee during the current
calendar year, together with the money value and date of such contributions;
(vii) the name and address of each person in the state of Washington to whom an
expenditure was made by the nonreporting committee on behalf of a candidate or
political committee in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars, the
amount, date, and purpose of such expenditure, and the total sum of such
expenditures; (viii) such other information as the commission may prescribe by
rule, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter. A
nonreporting committee incurring an obligation to file additional reports in a
calendar year may satisfy the obligation by filing with the commission a letter
providing updating or amending information.

(2) The treasurer and
the candidate shall certify the correctness of each report.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.17.380 and 1982 c
35 s 196 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) The office of
the secretary of state shall be designated as a place where the public may file
papers or correspond with the commission and receive any form or instruction
from the commission.

(2))) The attorney general, through his or her
office, shall supply such assistance as the commission may require in order to
carry out its responsibilities under this chapter. The commission may employ
attorneys who are neither the attorney general nor an assistant attorney
general to carry out any function of the attorney general prescribed in this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 42.17.700 (Contributions before
December 3, 1992) and 1993 c 2 s 10 are each repealed.

---
END ---