BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the purpose of this
chapter to promote cooperative efforts between employees and the boards of
trustees of the four-year institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington by prescribing certain rights and obligations of the employees and
by establishing orderly procedures governing the relationship between the
employees and their employers which procedures are designed to meet the special
requirements and needs of public employment in higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Collective
bargaining" and "bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligation of the representatives of the employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times to bargain in good faith, subject to
section 9 of this act, in an effort to reach agreement with respect to wages,
hours, and other terms and conditions of employment.

(2)
"Commission" means the public employment relations commission
established under RCW 41.58.010.

(3) "Confidential
employee" means: (a) A person who participates directly on behalf of an
employer in the formulation of labor relations policy, the preparation for or
conduct of collective bargaining, or the administration of collective
bargaining agreements, if the role of the person is not merely routine or
clerical in nature but calls for the consistent exercise of independent judgment;
and (b) a person who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to a person in
(a) of this subsection.

(4)
"Employee" means any full or regular part-time faculty member, not
including the chief executive or administrative officers of the institution of
higher education, confidential employees, supervisors, and employees subject to
chapter 41.06 or 41.56 RCW.

(5) "Employee
organization" means any organization, union, association, agency,
committee, council, or group of any kind in which employees participate and
that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining with
employers.

(6)
"Employer" means the board of trustees of each institution of higher
education and includes any officer, board, commission, council, or other person
or body acting on behalf of an employer.

(7) "Exclusive
bargaining representative" means any employee organization that has been
certified or recognized under this chapter as the representative of the
employees in an appropriate collective bargaining unit.

(8) "Institution
of higher education" means the regional universities as defined under RCW
28B.15.005 and The Evergreen State College.

(9) "Person"
means one or more individuals, labor organizations, partnerships, associations,
corporations, employers, or legal representatives.

(10) "Shared
governance" means the exercise of the functions of the faculty in any
shared governance mechanisms or practices, including the faculty senate,
faculty councils, and faculty codes.

(11)
"Supervisor" means any employee having authority, in the interest of
an employer, to hire, assign, promote, transfer, lay off, recall, suspend,
discipline, or discharge peers, or to recommend effectively such action, if the
exercise of the authority is not merely routine or clerical in nature but calls
for the consistent exercise of independent judgment. An employee is not
includable as a supervisor solely by reason of his or her membership on a
faculty tenure or other governance committee or body or because of being a
department chair or head. The term "supervisor" includes only those
persons who perform a preponderance of the acts of authority specified in this
subsection.

(12) "Unfair labor
practice" means an unfair labor practice listed in section 11 of this act.

(13) "Union security
provision" means a provision in a collective bargaining agreement under
which some or all employees in the bargaining unit may be required, as a
condition of continued employment on or after the thirtieth day following the
beginning of such employment or the effective date of the provision, whichever
is later, to become a member of the exclusive bargaining representative or pay
an agency fee established by the exclusive bargaining representative at an
amount not greater than the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly
required as condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive
bargaining representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The boards of trustees of
the institutions of higher education as defined in section 2 of this act may
engage in collective bargaining with the exclusive bargaining representatives
of their employees, as provided in this chapter. Provisions of collective
bargaining agreements relating to compensation are subject to the restrictions under
RCW 41.56.201(2)(c) and (3).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Employees have the right
to self-organization, to form, join, or assist employee organizations, to
bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and also
have the right to refrain from any or all of these activities except to the
extent that employees may be required to make payments to an exclusive
bargaining representative or charitable organization under a union security
provision authorized in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Upon the voluntary
written authorization of a bargaining unit employee, the employer shall deduct
from the pay of the employee the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive
bargaining representative. The employee authorization may be irrevocable for
up to one year. Such dues and fees shall be transmitted monthly by the
employer to the exclusive bargaining representative or to the depository
designated by the exclusive bargaining representative.

(2) A collective
bargaining agreement may include union security provisions, but not a closed
shop. The employer shall enforce any union security provision by monthly deductions
from the pay of all bargaining unit employees affected by the collective
bargaining agreement and shall transmit the funds to the exclusive bargaining
representative or to the depository designated by the exclusive bargaining
representative.

(3) An employee who is
covered by a union security provision and who asserts a right of nonassociation
based on bona fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body
of which the employee is a member shall, as a condition of employment, make alternative
payments to a nonreligious charity designated by agreement of the employee and
the exclusive bargaining representative. The amount of the alternative payment
shall be equal to the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative. The employee shall furnish written proof that the payments
have been made. If the employee and the exclusive bargaining representative do
not reach agreement on the matter, the dispute shall be submitted to the
commission for determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. In any dispute concerning
the unit appropriate for collective bargaining or the allocation of employees
or positions to bargaining units, the commission, after a hearing or hearings,
shall determine the dispute, taking into consideration the duties, skills, and
working conditions of the employees, the extent of organization among the
employees, the community of interest among the employees, the desire of the
employees, and the overall management structure of the employer including the
interrelationships of divisions within the institution. A faculty bargaining
unit consists of all full-time and regular part-time faculty. Unnecessary
fragmentation shall be avoided.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The employee
organization that has been designated by the majority of the employees in an
appropriate bargaining unit as their representative for the purposes of
collective bargaining shall be the exclusive bargaining representative of, and
shall be required to represent, all the employees within the bargaining unit
without regard to membership in that employee organization: PROVIDED, That any
employee may at any time present his or her complaints or concerns to the
employer and have such complaints or concerns adjusted without intervention of
the exclusive bargaining representative, as long as the exclusive bargaining
representative has been given an opportunity to be present at that adjustment
and to make its views known, and as long as the adjustment is not inconsistent
with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement then in effect.

(2) The commission
shall resolve any dispute concerning selection of a bargaining representative
in accordance with the procedures specified in this section.

(a) No question
concerning representation may be raised within one year following a
certification or attempted certification.

(b) No question
concerning representation may be raised within one year following an election
or cross-check in which the employees failed to designate an exclusive
bargaining representative.

(c) If there is a valid
collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question concerning
representation may be raised except during the period not more than ninety nor
less than sixty days before the expiration date of the agreement. If a valid
collective bargaining agreement, together with any renewals or extensions
thereof, has been or will be in existence for more than three years, then a
question concerning representation may be raised not more than ninety nor less
than sixty days before the third anniversary date or any subsequent anniversary
date of the agreement; if the exclusive bargaining representative is removed as
the result of the procedure, the collective bargaining agreement shall be
deemed to be terminated as of the date of the certification or the anniversary
date following the filing of the petition, whichever is later.

(d) An employee
organization seeking certification as exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit of employees, or bargaining unit employees seeking
decertification of an exclusive bargaining representative, shall make a
confidential showing to the commission of credible evidence demonstrating that
at least thirty percent of the employees in the bargaining unit are in support
of the petition. The petition shall indicate the name, address, and telephone
number of any employee organization known to claim an interest in the
bargaining unit.

(e) A petition filed by
an employer shall be supported by credible evidence demonstrating the basis on
which the employer claims the existence of a question concerning the
representation of its employees.

(f) Any employee
organization that makes a confidential showing to the commission of credible
evidence demonstrating that it has the support of at least ten percent of the
employees in the bargaining unit involved may intervene in proceedings under
this section and have its name listed as a choice on the ballot in an election
conducted by the commission.

(g) The commission
shall determine any question concerning representation by conducting a secret
ballot election among the employees in the bargaining unit. However, if the
commission determines that a serious unfair labor practice has been committed
that interfered with the election process and precludes the holding of a fair
election, the commission may determine the question concerning representation
by conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's membership
records or bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.

(h) The representation
election ballot shall contain a choice for each employee organization
qualifying under (d) or (f) of this subsection, together with a choice for no
representation. The representation election shall be determined by the
majority of the valid ballots cast. If there are three or more choices on the
ballot and none of the choices receives a majority of the valid ballots cast, a
run-off election shall be conducted between the two choices receiving the
highest and second highest numbers of votes.

(i) Representation that
exists on the effective date of this section shall not be disturbed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. In determining whether a
person is acting as an agent of another person so as to make such other person
responsible for his or her acts, the question of whether the specific acts
performed were actually authorized or subsequently ratified shall not be
controlling.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The commission shall
broadly construe the scope of bargaining.

(2) Tuition fees under
RCW 28B.15.020 and services and activities fees under RCW 28B.15.041 are not
subjects for bargaining.

(3) A written contract
incorporating any agreements reached shall be executed if requested by either
party.

(4) The obligation to
bargain does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or to make a
concession.

(5) In the event of a
dispute between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative over the
matters that are terms and conditions of employment, the commission shall decide
which items are mandatory subjects for bargaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The commission shall
adopt rules as necessary and appropriate to administer this chapter, consistent
with the best standards of labor-management relations.

(2) The rules,
precedents, and practices of the national labor relations board, if consistent
with this chapter, shall be considered by the commission in its interpretation
of this chapter, and before the adoption of any commission rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) It is an unfair labor
practice for an employer:

(a) To interfere with,
restrain, or coerce employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed by this
chapter;

(b) To dominate or
interfere with the formation or administration of any employee organization or
contribute financial or other support to it. An employer may permit employees
to confer with it or its representatives or agents during working hours without
loss of time or pay;

(c) To encourage or discourage
membership in any employee organization by discrimination in regard to hire,
tenure of employment, or any term or condition of employment, but this
subsection does not prevent an employer from requiring, as a condition of
continued employment, payment of the periodic dues and initiation fees
uniformly required to an exclusive bargaining representative under section 5 of
this act;

(d) To discharge or
discriminate otherwise against an employee because the employee has filed
charges or given testimony under this chapter;

(e) To refuse to
bargain collectively with the exclusive bargaining representative of its
employees; or

(f) To unilaterally
alter or abolish the shared governance system.

(2) It is an unfair
labor practice for an employee organization or its agents:

(a) To restrain or
coerce: (i) Employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed in section 4 of
this act, but this does not impair the right of an employee organization to
prescribe its own rules for the acquisition or retention of membership in the
organization; or (ii) an employer in the selection of its representatives for
the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances;

(b) To cause or attempt
to cause an employer to discriminate against an employee in violation of
subsection (1)(c) of this section or to discriminate against an employee with
respect to whom membership in such organization has been denied or terminated
on some ground other than the failure of the employee to tender the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or
retaining membership;

(c) To discriminate
against an employee because that employee has filed charges or given testimony
under this chapter; or

(d) To refuse to
bargain collectively with the employer of employees for whom it is the
exclusive bargaining representative.

(3) The expression of
any views, argument, or opinion, or the dissemination of those views, argument,
or opinion to the public, whether in written, printed, graphic, or visual form,
shall not constitute or be evidence of an unfair labor practice under this
chapter, if the expression contains no threat of reprisal or force or promise
of benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) The commission may
prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor practice. This power
shall not be affected by any other means of adjustment or prevention that has
been or may be established by agreement, law, equity, or otherwise.

(2) A complaint
charging unfair labor practices shall be filed within six months following the
act or event complained of or discovery of such act or event complained of,
whichever is later.

(3) The person or
persons named as respondent in a complaint charging unfair labor practices may
file an answer to the complaint and appear in person or otherwise give
testimony at the place and time set by the commission for hearing.

(4) If the commission
determines that a person has engaged in or is engaging in any unfair labor
practice, then the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon the
person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the unfair labor
practice and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes
and policy of this chapter, including the reinstatement of employees with back
pay.

(5) The commission may
petition the superior court of the county in which the main office of the
employer is located or where the person who has engaged or is engaging in the
unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its
order and for appropriate temporary relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. If any provision of any
collective bargaining agreement between the employer and the exclusive
bargaining representative requires legislative implementation or an
appropriation, the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
seek the appropriate legislative action actively and in good faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Whenever a collective
bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive bargaining
representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous
collective bargaining agreement between the employer and an employee
organization representing the same employees, the effective date of the
collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination date of
the previous collective bargaining agreement, and all benefits included in the
new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may
accrue beginning with the effective date as established by this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) The commission,
through the executive director, may offer its mediation services in any labor
dispute involving an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative,
either upon its own motion or upon the request of one or more of the parties to
the dispute, if in its judgment the dispute threatens to cause a substantial
disruption to the public welfare.

(2) A person designated
as a mediator in a labor dispute under this section shall meet with the
representatives of the parties, either jointly or separately, and shall take
other steps as he or she deems appropriate to persuade the parties to resolve
their differences. A mediator does not have power of compulsion.

The services of the
mediator, including any per diem expenses, shall be provided by the commission
without cost to the parties. This section shall not be construed to prohibit
an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative from agreeing to
substitute at their own expense some other mediator or mediation procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. An employer and an
exclusive bargaining representative who enter into a collective bargaining
agreement shall include in the agreement procedures for binding arbitration of
the disputes arising about the interpretation or application of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Except as otherwise expressly
provided in this chapter, nothing in this chapter may be construed to annul,
modify, or preclude the renewal or continuation of any lawful agreement entered
into before the effective date of this section between an employer and an
employee organization covering wages, hours, and terms and conditions of
employment. If there is a conflict between any collective bargaining agreement
and any resolution, rule, policy, or regulation of the employer or its agents,
the terms of the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. Except as otherwise
expressly provided in this chapter, this chapter does not deny or otherwise
abridge any rights, privileges, or benefits granted by law to employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. This chapter does not
interfere with the responsibilities and rights of the employer as specified by
federal and state law, including the employer's responsibilities to students,
the public, and other constituent elements of the institution of higher
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. Sections 1 through 19,
21, and 22 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. This act takes effect
October 1, 2001. The public employment relations commission may immediately
take such steps as are necessary to insure that this act is implemented on its
effective date.

---
END ---