BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
28A.310.200 and 1993 c 298 s 1 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 In addition to other powers and duties as provided
by law,

_7 every educational service district board shall:

_8 (1) Approve the budgets of the educational service
district in

_9 accordance with the procedures provided for in this
chapter.

10 (2) Meet regularly according to the schedule adopted
at the

11 organization meeting and in special session upon the
call of the

12 chair or a majority of the board.

13 (3) Approve the selection of educational service
district

14 personnel and clerical staff as provided in RCW
28A.310.230.

15 (4) Fix the amount of and approve the bonds for
those

16 educational service district employees designated by the
board as

17 being in need of bonding.

p. 1 SB
5385

_1 (5) Keep in the educational service district office
a full and

_2 correct transcript of the boundaries of each school
district

_3 within the educational service district.

_4 (6) Acquire by borrowing funds or by purchase,
lease, devise,

_5 bequest, and gift and otherwise contract for real and
personal

_6 property necessary for the operation of the educational
service

_7 district and to the execution of the duties of the board
and

_8 superintendent thereof and sell, lease, or otherwise
dispose of

_9 that property not necessary for district purposes. No
real property

10 shall be acquired or alienated without the prior
approval of the

11 state board of education and the acquisition or
alienation of all

12 such property shall be subject to such provisions as the
board may

13 establish. When borrowing funds for the purpose of
acquiring

14 property, the educational service district board shall
pledge as

15 collateral the property to be acquired. Borrowing shall
be

16 evidenced by a note or other instru­ment between the
district and

17 the lender. ((The authority to borrow under this
subsection shall

18 be limited to educational service districts serving a
minimum of

19 two hundred thousand students in grades kindergarten
through

20 twelve.))

21 (7) Under RCW 28A.310.010, upon the written request
of the

22 board of directors of a local school district or
districts served

23 by the educational service district, the educational
service

24 district board of directors may provide coopera­tive and

25 informational services not in conflict with other law
that provide

26 for the development and implementation of programs,
activities,

27 services, or practices that support the education of
preschool

28 through twelfth grade students in the public schools or
that

29 support the effective, efficient, or safe manage­ment
and operation

30 of the school district or districts served by the
educational

31 service district.

32 (8) Adopt such bylaws and rules and regulations for
its own

33 operation as it deems necessary or appropriate.

34 (9) Enter into contracts, including con­tracts with
common and

35 educational service districts and the school for the
deaf and the

36 school for the blind for the joint financing of
cooperative

37 service programs conducted pursuant to RCW
28A.310.180(3), and

SB 5385 p. 2

_1 employ consultants and legal counsel relating to any of
the

_2 duties, functions, and powers of the educational service

_3 districts.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5385