BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
28A.400.240 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 205 s 1 are each

_5 amended to read as follows:

_6 In addition to any other powers and duties, any
school district

_7 or educational service district may contract with
any classified

_8 or certificated employee to defer a portion of that
employee's

_9 income, which deferred portion shall in no event exceed
the

10 appropriate internal revenue service exclusion allowance
for such

11 plans, and shall subsequently with the consent of the
employee,

12 deposit or invest in a credit union, savings and loan
association,

13 bank, mutual savings bank, or purchase life insurance,
shares of

14 an investment company, or a fixed and/or variable
annuity

15 contract, for the purpose of funding a deferred
compensation

16 program for the employee, from any life underwriter or
registered

17 representative duly licensed by this state who
represents an

18 insurance company or an investment company licensed to
contract

p. 1 SB
5387

_1 business in this state. In no event shall the total
investments or

_2 payments, and the employee's nondeferred income for any
year

_3 exceed the total annual salary, or compensation under the
existing

_4 salary schedule or classification plan applicable to
such employee

_5 in such year. Any income deferred under such a plan
shall continue

_6 to be included as regular compensation, for the purpose
of

_7 computing the retirement and pension benefits earned by
any

_8 employee, but any sum so deducted shall not be included
in the

_9 computation of any taxes withheld on behalf of any such
employee.

10 Sec. 2. RCW
28A.400.350 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 18 and 1995 c 126

11 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

12 (1) The board of directors of any of the state's
school

13 districts or educational service districts may
make available

14 liability, life, health, health care, accident,
disability and

15 salary protection or insurance or any one of, or a
combination of

16 the enumerated types of insurance, or any other type of
insurance

17 or protection, for the members of the boards of
directors, the

18 students, and employees of the school district or
educational

19 service district, and their dependents. Such
coverage may be

20 provided by contracts with private carriers, with the
state health

21 care authority after July 1, 1990, pursuant to the
approval of the

22 authority administrator, or through self-insurance or
self-funding

23 pursuant to chapter 48.62 RCW, or in any other manner
authorized

24 by law.

25 (2) Whenever funds are available for these purposes
the board

26 of directors of the school district or educational
service

27 district may contribute all or a part of the cost
of such

28 protection or insurance for the employees of their
respective

29 school districts or educational service districts
and their

30 dependents. The premiums on such liability insurance
shall be borne

31 by the school district or educational service
district.

32 After October 1, 1990, school districts may not
contribute to

33 any employee protection or insurance other than
liability

34 insurance unless the district's employee benefit plan
conforms to

35 RCW 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

36 (3) For school board members, educational service
district

37 board members, and students, the premiums due on
such protection

SB 5387 p. 2

_1 or insurance shall be borne by the assenting school
board member,

_2 educational service district board member, or
student. The school

_3 district or educational service district may
contribute all or

_4 part of the costs, including the premiums, of life,
health, health

_5 care, accident or disability insurance which shall be
offered to

_6 all students participating in interschool activities on
the behalf

_7 of or as representative of their school ((or)),
school district,

_8 or educational service district. The school
district board of

_9 directors and the educational service district board
may require

10 any student participating in extracurricular interschool

11 activities to, as a condition of participation, document
evidence

12 of insurance or purchase insurance that will provide
adequate

13 coverage, as determined by the school district board of
directors

14 or the educational service district board, for
medical expenses

15 incurred as a result of injury sustained while
participating in

16 the extracurricular activity. In establishing such a
requirement,

17 the district shall adopt regulations for waiving or
reducing the

18 premiums of such coverage as may be offered through the
school

19 district or educational service district to
students participating

20 in extracurricular activities, for those students whose
families,

21 by reason of their low income, would have difficulty
paying the

22 entire amount of such insurance premiums. The district
board shall

23 adopt regulations for waiving or reducing the insurance
coverage

24 requirements for low-income students in order to assure
such

25 students are not prohibited from participating in
extracurricular

26 interschool activities.

27 (4) All contracts for insurance or protection
written to take

28 advantage of the provisions of this section shall
provide that the

29 beneficiaries of such contracts may utilize on an equal

30 participation basis the services of those practitioners
licensed

31 pursuant to chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.53, 18.57, and
18.71 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5387