BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.4121 and 1998
c 317 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who
sells or gives, or permits to be sold or given to any person any drug
paraphernalia in any form commits a class I civil infraction under chapter 7.80
RCW. For purposes of this subsection, "drug paraphernalia" means all
equipment, products, and materials of any kind which are used, intended for
use, or designed for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing,
harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing,
preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, containing,
concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the
human body a controlled substance. Drug paraphernalia includes, but is not
limited to objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing marihuana, cocaine, hashish, or hashish oil
into the human body, such as:

(a) Metal, wooden,
acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic pipes with or without screens,
permanent screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls;

(b) Water pipes;

(c) Carburetion tubes
and devices;

(d) Smoking and
carburetion masks;

(e) Roach clips:
Meaning objects used to hold burning material, such as a marihuana cigarette,
that has become too small or too short to be held in the hand;

(f) Miniature cocaine
spoons and cocaine vials;

(g) Chamber pipes;

(h) Carburetor pipes;

(i) Electric pipes;

(j) Air-driven pipes;

(k) Chillums;

(l) Bongs; and

(m) Ice pipes or
chillers.

(2) It shall be no
defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the person acted,
or was believed by the defendant to act, as agent or representative of another.

(3) Nothing in
subsection (1) of this section prohibits legal distribution of injection
syringe equipment through public health and community based HIV prevention
programs.

(4) The civil
penalty imposed for violations of subsection (1) of this section may not exceed
the following:

(a) A monetary penalty
of two hundred fifty dollars for the first violation within a two-year period.

(b) A monetary
penalty of five hundred dollars for the second violation within a two-year
period.

(c) A monetary
penalty of seven hundred fifty dollars for the third violation within a
two-year period.

(d) A monetary
penalty of one thousand dollars for the fourth and each subsequent violation
within a two-year period.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.80.120 and 1997 c
159 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to
have committed a civil infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty.

(a) The maximum penalty
and the default amount for a class 1 civil infraction shall be two hundred
fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments, except:

(i) For an
infraction of state law involving tobacco products as specified in RCW
70.93.060(4), in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is five
hundred dollars;

(ii) For an
infraction of state law involving drug paraphernalia as specified in RCW
69.50.4121(1), in which case the maximum penalty and default amount shall be as
specified in RCW 69.50.4121(4);

(b) The maximum penalty
and the default amount for a class 2 civil infraction shall be one hundred
twenty-five dollars, not including statutory assessments;

(c) The maximum penalty
and the default amount for a class 3 civil infraction shall be fifty dollars,
not including statutory assessments; and

(d) The maximum penalty
and the default amount for a class 4 civil infraction shall be twenty-five
dollars, not including statutory assessments.

(2) The supreme court
shall prescribe by rule the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines for civil infractions.

(3) Whenever a monetary
penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is immediately payable. If
the person is unable to pay at that time the court may grant an extension of
the period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or
before the time established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the
penalty in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the
prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.

(4) The
court may also order a person found to have committed a civil infraction to
make restitution.

---
END ---