BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 7.06.010 and 1991 c
363 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((In counties with a
population of seventy thousand or more,)) The superior court of the
county, by majority vote of the judges thereof, or the county legislative
authority may authorize mandatory arbitration of civil actions under this
chapter. In all other counties, the superior court of the county, by a
majority vote of the judges thereof, may authorize mandatory arbitration of
civil actions under this chapter. The district court of the county, by a
majority vote of the judges thereof, may authorize mandatory arbitration of
civil actions under this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.06.020 and 1987 c
212 s 101 and 1987 c 202 s 127 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) All civil actions,
except for appeals from municipal or district courts, which are at issue in the
superior court in counties which have authorized arbitration, where the sole
relief sought is a money judgment, and where no party asserts a claim in excess
of fifteen thousand dollars, or if approved by the superior court of a county
by two-thirds or greater vote of the judges thereof, up to ((thirty-five))
fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest and costs, are subject to
mandatory arbitration.

(2) If approved by
majority vote of the superior court judges of a county which has authorized
arbitration, all civil actions which are at issue in the superior court in
which the sole relief sought is the establishment, termination or modification
of maintenance or child support payments are subject to mandatory arbitration.
The arbitrability of any such action shall not be affected by the amount or number
of payments involved.

(3) All civil
actions which are at issue in the district court in counties which have
authorized arbitration, where the sole relief sought is a money judgment, and
where no party asserts a claim in excess of fifteen thousand dollars, or if
approved by the district court of a county by two-thirds or greater vote of the
judges thereof, up to fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest and costs,
are subject to mandatory arbitration.

Sec. 3. RCW 7.06.040 and 1987 c
212 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The appointment of
arbitrators shall be prescribed by rules adopted by the supreme court. An
arbitrator must be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted
to the bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer arbitrator. The supreme court may prescribe by
rule additional qualifications of arbitrators.

Arbitrators of cases
originating in the superior court shall be compensated in the same amount
and manner as judges pro tempore of the superior court. Arbitrators of
cases originating in the district court shall be compensated in the same amount
and manner as judges pro tempore of the superior court.

Sec. 4. RCW 7.06.050 and 1982 c
188 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Following a hearing as
prescribed by court rule, the arbitrator shall file his or her decision
and award with the clerk of the ((superior)) court, together with proof
of service thereof on the parties. Within twenty days after such filing, any
aggrieved party may file with the clerk a written notice of appeal and request
for a trial de novo in the superior court on all issues of law and fact. Such
trial de novo shall thereupon be held, including a right to jury, if demanded.

If no appeal has been
filed at the expiration of twenty days following filing of the arbitrator's
decision and award, a judgment shall be entered and may be presented to the
court by any party, on notice, which judgment when entered shall have the same
force and effect as judgments in civil actions.

Sec. 5. RCW 3.62.060 and 1992 c
62 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Clerks of the district
courts shall collect the following fees for their official services:

(1) In any civil action
commenced before or transferred to a district court, the plaintiff shall, at
the time of such commencement or transfer, pay to such court a filing fee of
thirty-one dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. No party
shall be compelled to pay to the court any other fees or charges up to and
including the rendition of judgment in the action other than those listed.

(2) For issuing a writ
of garnishment or other writ a fee of six dollars.

(3) For filing a
supplemental proceeding a fee of twelve dollars.

(4) For demanding a
jury in a civil case a fee of fifty dollars to be paid by the person demanding
a jury.

(5) For preparing a
transcript of a judgment a fee of six dollars.

(6) For certifying any
document on file or of record in the clerk's office a fee of five dollars.

(7) For preparing the
record of a case for appeal to superior court a fee of forty dollars including
any costs of tape duplication as governed by the rules of appeal for courts of
limited jurisdiction (RALJ).

(8) For duplication of
part or all of the electronic tape or tapes of a proceeding ten dollars per
tape.

(9) For filing a
request for mandatory arbitration, a fee may be assessed against the party
filing a statement of arbitrability not to exceed thirty-one dollars as
established by authority of local ordinance. This charge shall be used solely
to offset the cost of the mandatory arbitration program.

The fees
or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as court costs whenever
a judgment for costs is awarded.

---
END ---