BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
13.64.040 and 1993 c 294 s 4 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The hearing on the petition shall be before a ((judge))

_7 judicial officer, sitting without a jury. Prior
to the presentation

_8 of proof the ((judge)) judicial officer
shall determine whether: (1)

_9 The petitioning minor understands the consequences of
the petition

10 regarding his or her legal rights and responsibilities;
(2) a

11 guardian ad litem should be appointed to investigate the

12 allegations of the petition and file a report with the
court.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5392