BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.225.035 and 1999
c 319 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petition for a
civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015 shall consist of a written
notification to the court alleging that:

(a) The child has
unexcused absences during the current school year;

(b) Actions taken by
the school district have not been successful in substantially reducing the
child's absences from school; and

(c) Court intervention
and supervision are necessary to assist the school district or parent to reduce
the child's absences from school.

(2) The petition shall
set forth the name, ((age)) date of birth, school, ((and
residence)) address, sex, race, and ethnicity of the child and the
names and ((residence)) addresses of the child's parents.

(3) The petition shall
set forth facts that support the allegations in this section and shall
generally request relief available under this chapter and provide information
about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.

(4) When a petition is
filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015, the juvenile court shall schedule a
hearing at which the court shall consider the petition, or if the court
determines that a referral to an available community truancy board would
substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences, the court may refer the
case to a community truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(5) If a referral is
made to a community truancy board, the truancy board must meet with the child,
a parent, and the school district representative and enter into an agreement
with the petitioner and respondent regarding expectations and any actions
necessary to address the child's truancy within thirty days of the referral.
If the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be required to
attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the truancy
board, the school district, and the child's parent. The agreement shall be
presented to the juvenile court for its approval.

(6) The court shall
approve the agreement by order or schedule a hearing. The court may, if the
school district and community truancy board agree, permit the truancy board to
provide continued supervision over the student, or parent if the petition is
based on RCW 28A.225.015, and report on compliance with the order.

(7) If the truancy
board fails to reach an agreement, the truancy board shall return the case to
the juvenile court for a hearing.

(8) Notwithstanding the
provisions in subsection (4) of this section, a hearing shall not be required
if other actions by the court would substantially reduce the child's unexcused
absences. When a juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:

(a) Separately notify
the child, the parent of the child, and the school district of the hearing;

(b) Notify the parent
and the child of their rights to present evidence at the hearing; and

(c) Notify the parent
and the child of the options and rights available under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(9) The court may
require the attendance of the child if eight years old or older, the parents,
and the school district at any hearing on a petition filed under RCW
28A.225.030.

(10) A school district
is responsible for determining who shall represent the school district at
hearings on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.

(11) The court may
permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either party be
represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad litem for
the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district, the court
shall permit a school district representative who is not an attorney to
represent the school district at any future hearings.

(12) If the allegations
in the petition are established by a preponderance of the evidence, the court
shall grant the petition and enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene
for the period of time determined by the court, after considering the facts
alleged in the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely
cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile is
subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the end of the
school year in which it is entered.

(13) If the court
assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall regularly report to the court
any additional unexcused absences by the child.

(14) Community truancy
boards and the courts shall coordinate, to the extent possible, proceedings and
actions pertaining to children who are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk
youth petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW
13.32A.140.

(15) If after a
juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county the child relocates to
another county, the juvenile court in the receiving county shall, upon the
request of a school district or parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition
filed in the previous county.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.50.100 and 2000 c
162 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050.

(2) Records covered by
this section shall be confidential and shall be released only pursuant to this
section and RCW 13.50.010.

(3) Records retained or
produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be released to other
participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when an investigation
or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by the other
participant or when that other participant is assigned the responsibility of
supervising the juvenile. Records covered under this section and maintained by
the juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of the agency may be
entered in the statewide ((juvenile court)) judicial information
system. However, truancy records associated with a juvenile who has no
other case history, and records of a juvenile's parents who have no other case
history, shall be removed from the judicial information system when the
juvenile is no longer subject to the compulsory attendance laws in chapter
28A.225 RCW. A county clerk is not liable for unauthorized release of this
data by persons or agencies not in his or her employ or otherwise subject to
his or her control, nor is the county clerk liable for inaccurate or incomplete
information collected from litigants or other persons required to provide
identifying data pursuant to this section.

(4) A contracting
agency or service provider of the department of social and health services that
provides counseling, psychological, psychiatric, or medical services may
release to the office of the family and children's ombudsman information or
records relating to services provided to a juvenile who is dependent under
chapter 13.34 RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian of the
juvenile, or of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of thirteen
years, unless such release is otherwise specifically prohibited by law.

(5) A juvenile, his or
her parents, the juvenile's attorney and the juvenile's parent's attorney,
shall, upon request, be given access to all records and information collected
or retained by a juvenile justice or care agency which pertain to the juvenile
except:

(a) If it is determined
by the agency that release of this information is likely to cause severe
psychological or physical harm to the juvenile or his or her parents the agency
may withhold the information subject to other order of the court: PROVIDED,
That if the court determines that limited release of the information is
appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the release of the
information; or

(b) If the information
or record has been obtained by a juvenile justice or care agency in connection
with the provision of counseling, psychological, psychiatric, or medical
services to the juvenile, when the services have been sought voluntarily by the
juvenile, and the juvenile has a legal right to receive those services without
the consent of any person or agency, then the information or record may not be
disclosed to the juvenile's parents without the informed consent of the
juvenile unless otherwise authorized by law; or

(c) That the department
of social and health services may delete the name and identifying information
regarding persons or organizations who have reported alleged child abuse or
neglect.

(6) A juvenile or his
or her parent denied access to any records following an agency determination
under subsection (5) of this section may file a motion in juvenile court
requesting access to the records. The court shall grant the motion unless it
finds access may not be permitted according to the standards found in
subsections (5)(a) and (b) of this section.

(7) The person making a
motion under subsection (6) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the
motion to all parties to the original action and to any agency whose records
will be affected by the motion.

(8) Subject to the
rules of discovery in civil cases, any party to a proceeding seeking a
declaration of dependency or a termination of the parent-child relationship and
any party's counsel and the guardian ad litem of any party, shall have access
to the records of any natural or adoptive child of the parent, subject to the
limitations in subsection (5) of this section. A party denied access to
records may request judicial review of the denial. If the party prevails, he
or she shall be awarded attorneys' fees, costs, and an amount not less than
five dollars and not more than one hundred dollars for each day the records
were wrongfully denied.

(9) No
unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020(12)
may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any
other licensed provider.

---
END ---