BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.180 and 1987 c
73 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A case in the superior
court of any county may be tried by a judge pro tempore, who must be either:
(1) A member of the bar, agreed upon in writing by the parties litigant, or
their attorneys of record, approved by the court, and sworn to try the case; ((and
his)) or (2) pursuant to supreme court rule, any sitting elected judge.
Any action in the trial of such cause shall have the same effect as if ((he
were)) it was made by a judge of such court. However, if a
previously elected judge of the superior court retires leaving a pending case
in which the judge has made discretionary rulings, the judge is entitled to
hear the pending case as a judge pro tempore without any written agreement.

A judge pro tempore
shall, before entering upon his or her duties in any cause, take and
subscribe the following oath or affirmation:

"I do solemnly
swear (or affirm, as the case may be,) that I will support the Constitution of
the United States and the Constitution of the State of Washington, and that I
will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of judge pro tempore in the
cause wherein . . . . . . is plaintiff and . . . . . .
defendant, according to the best of my ability."

A judge pro tempore who
is a practicing attorney and who is not a retired justice of the supreme court
or judge of a superior court of the state of Washington, or who is not an
active judge of an inferior court of the state of Washington, shall receive a
compensation of one-two hundred and fiftieth of the annual salary of a superior
court judge for each day engaged in ((said)) a trial, to be paid
in the same manner as the salary of the superior court judge. A judge
who is an active judge of an inferior court of the state of Washington shall
receive no compensation as judge pro tempore. A justice or judge who has
retired from the supreme court, court of appeals, or superior court of the
state of Washington shall receive compensation as judge pro tempore in the
amount of sixty percent of the amount payable to a judge pro tempore under this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002, if the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 7 of the
state Constitution, relating to qualifications for judges pro tempore, is
validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this
act is void in its entirety.

---
END ---