BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 2.56.010
and 1984 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as

_5 follows:

_6 There shall be a state office to be known as the
office of

_7 administrator for the courts who shall be appointed by
the supreme

_8 court of this state from a list of five persons
submitted by the

_9 governor of the state of Washington, and shall hold office
at the

10 pleasure of the appointing power. ((He shall not be
over the age of

11 sixty years at the time of his appointment. He shall
receive a))

12 The administrator's salary ((to)) shall
be fixed by the supreme

13 court.

14 Sec. 2. RCW 2.56.020
and 1957 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read

15 as follows:

16 The administrator for the courts, with the approval
of the

17 chief justice of the supreme court of this state, shall
appoint

p. 1 SSB
5395

_1 and fix the compensation of such assistants as are
necessary to

_2 enable ((him to perform)) performance of
the power and duties

_3 vested in ((him. During his term of office or
employment, neither

_4 the administrator nor any assistant shall engage
directly or

_5 indirectly in the practice of law in this state))
the office of

_6 administrator for the courts.

_7 Sec. 3. RCW 2.56.030
and 1997 c 41 s 2 are each amended to read as

_8 follows:

_9 The administrator for the courts shall, under the
supervision

10 and direction of the chief justice:

11 (1) Examine the administrative methods and systems
employed in

12 the offices of the judges, clerks, stenographers, and
employees of

13 the courts and make recommendations, through the chief
justice,

14 for the improvement of the same;

15 (2) Examine the state of the dockets of the courts
and

16 determine the need for assistance by any court;

17 (3) Make recommendations to the chief justice
relating to the

18 assignment of judges where courts are in need of
assistance and

19 carry out the direction of the chief justice as to the
assignments

20 of judges to counties and districts where the courts are
in need

21 of assistance;

22 (4) Collect and compile statistical and other data
and make

23 reports of the business transacted by the courts and
transmit the

24 same to the chief justice to the end that proper action
may be

25 taken in respect thereto;

26 (5) Prepare and submit budget estimates of state appropriations

27 necessary for the maintenance and operation of the
judicial system

28 and make recommendations in respect thereto;

29 (6) Collect statistical and other data and make
reports

30 relating to the expenditure of public moneys, state and
local, for

31 the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and
the

32 offices connected therewith;

33 (7) Obtain reports from clerks of courts in
accordance with law

34 or rules adopted by the supreme court of this state on
cases and

35 other judicial business in which action has been delayed
beyond

36 periods of time specified by law or rules of court and
make report

37 thereof to supreme court of this state;

SSB 5395 p. 2

_1 (8) Act as secretary of the judicial conference
referred to in

_2 RCW 2.56.060;

_3 (9) Submit annually, as of February 1st, to the
chief justice,

_4 a report of the activities of the administrator's office
for the

_5 preceding calendar year including activities related to
courthouse

_6 security;

_7 (10) Administer programs and standards for the
training and

_8 education of judicial personnel;

_9 (11) Examine the need for new superior court and
district judge

10 positions under a weighted caseload analysis that takes
into

11 account the time required to hear all the cases in a
particular

12 court and the amount of time existing judges have
available to

13 hear cases in that court. The results of the weighted
caseload

14 analysis shall be reviewed by the board for judicial

15 administration which shall make recommendations to the

16 legislature. It is the intent of the legislature that
weighted

17 caseload analysis become the basis for creating
additional

18 district court positions, and recommendations should
address that

19 objective;

20 (12) Provide staff to the judicial retirement
account plan

21 under chapter 2.14 RCW;

22 (13) Attend to such other matters as may be assigned
by the

23 supreme court of this state;

24 (14) Within available funds, develop a curriculum
for a general

25 understanding of child development, placement, and
treatment

26 resources, as well as specific legal skills and
knowledge of

27 relevant statutes including chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and
13.40 RCW,

28 cases, court rules, interviewing skills, and special
needs of the

29 abused or neglected child. This curriculum shall be
completed and

30 made available to all juvenile court judges, court
personnel, and

31 service providers and be updated yearly to reflect
changes in

32 statutes, court rules, or case law;

33 (15) Develop, in consultation with the entities set
forth in

34 RCW 2.56.150(3), a comprehensive statewide curriculum
for persons

35 who act as guardians ad litem under Title 13 or 26 RCW.
The

36 curriculum shall be made available July 1, 1997, and
include

37 specialty sections on child development, child sexual
abuse, child

38 physical abuse, child neglect, clinical and forensic
investigative

p. 3 SSB
5395

_1 and interviewing techniques, family reconciliation and
mediation

_2 services, and relevant statutory and legal
requirements. The

_3 curriculum shall be made available to all superior court
judges,

_4 court personnel, and all persons who act as guardians ad
litem;

_5 (16) Develop a curriculum for a general
understanding of crimes

_6 of malicious harassment, as well as specific legal
skills and

_7 knowledge of RCW 9A.36.080, relevant cases, court rules,
and the

_8 special needs of malicious harassment victims. This
curriculum

_9 shall be made available to all superior court and court
of appeals

10 judges and to all justices of the supreme court;

11 (17) Develop, in consultation with the criminal
justice

12 training commission and the commissions established
under chapters

13 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a
general

14 understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its

15 implications for working with youth of color and their
families.

16 The curriculum shall be available to all superior court
judges and

17 court commissioners assigned to juvenile court, and
other court

18 personnel. Ethnic and cultural diversity training shall
be provided

19 annually so as to incorporate cultural sensitivity and
awareness

20 into the daily operation of juvenile courts statewide;

21 (18) Authorize the use of closed circuit television
and other

22 electronic equipment in judicial proceedings. The
administrator

23 shall promulgate necessary standards and procedures and
shall

24 provide technical assistance to courts as required;

25 (19) Provide technical support for court
coordinating councils,

26 under the direction of the board for judicial
administration.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5395 p. 4