BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
48.13.030 and 1993 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) Except as set forth in RCW 48.13.273, an
insurer shall not,

_8 except with the consent of the commissioner, have at any
time any

_9 combination of investments in or loans upon the security
of the

10 obligations, property, and securities of any one person,

11 institution, or municipal corporation aggregating an
amount

12 exceeding four percent of the insurer's assets. This
section shall

13 not apply to investments in, or loans upon the security
of general

14 obligations of the government of the United States or of
any state

15 of the United States, nor to investments in foreign
securities

16 pursuant to ((subsection (1) of)) RCW 48.13.180(1),
nor include

17 policy loans made pursuant to RCW 48.13.190.

18 (2) An insurer shall not, except with the consent
of the

p. 1 SB
5396

_1 commissioner, have at any time investments in the
voting

_2 securities of a depository institution or any company
which

_3 controls a depository institution aggregating an
amount exceeding

_4 five percent of the insurer's admitted assets.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5396 p. 2