BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 A person shall be exempt from any legal obligation
to pay all

_8 or a portion of the amount of excess and regular real
property

_9 taxes due and payable in the year following the year in
which a

10 claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the
following:

11 (1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a
residence

12 which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption
as a

13 principal place of residence as of the time of filing((:
PROVIDED,

14 That)). Any person who sells, transfers,
or is displaced from his

15 or her residence may transfer his or her exemption
status to a

16 replacement residence, but no claimant shall receive an
exemption

17 on more than one residence in any year((: PROVIDED
FURTHER,

p. 1 SB
5398

_1 That)). Confinement of the person to a
hospital or nursing home

_2 shall not disqualify the claim of exemption if:

_3 (a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

_4 (b) The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a
person

_5 financially dependent on the claimant for support; or

_6 (c) The residence is rented for the purpose of
paying nursing

_7 home or hospital costs;

_8 (2) The person claiming the exemption must have
owned, at the

_9 time of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract
purchase,

10 the residence on which the property taxes have been
imposed or if

11 the person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative
housing

12 association, corporation, or partnership, ((such))
the person must

13 own a share therein representing the unit or portion of
the

14 structure in which ((he or she)) the person
resides. For purposes

15 of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital
community or

16 owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each
spouse or

17 cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a life
estate;

18 (3) The person claiming the exemption must be
sixty-one years

19 of age or older on December 31st of the year in which
the

20 exemption claim is filed, or must have been, at the time
of

21 filing, retired from regular gainful employment by
reason of

22 physical disability((: PROVIDED, That any)).
A surviving spouse of

23 ((a)) the person who was receiving an
exemption at the time of the

24 person's death shall qualify if the surviving spouse is
fifty-

25 seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the
requirements

26 of this section;

27 (4) The amount that the person shall be exempt from
an

28 obligation to pay shall be calculated on the basis of
combined

29 disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the
person

30 claiming the exemption was retired for two months or
more of the

31 assessment year, the combined disposable income of ((such))
the

32 person shall be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly

33 combined disposable income of ((such)) the
person during the

34 months ((such)) the person was retired by
twelve. If the income of

35 the person claiming exemption is reduced for two or more
months of

36 the assessment year by reason of the death of the
person's spouse,

37 or when other substantial changes occur in disposable
income that

38 are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time,
the

SB 5398 p. 2

_1 combined disposable income of ((such)) the
person shall be

_2 calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined
disposable

_3 income of ((such)) the person after such
occurrences by twelve. If

_4 it is necessary to estimate income to comply with this
subsection,

_5 the assessor may require confirming documentation of ((such))
the

_6 income prior to May 31st of the year following
application;

_7 (5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this
section and

_8 has a combined disposable income of thirty thousand
dollars or

_9 less shall be exempt from all excess property taxes; and

10 (b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this
section and

11 has a combined disposable income of twenty-four thousand
dollars

12 or less but greater than eighteen thousand dollars shall
be exempt

13 from all regular property taxes on the greater of forty
thousand

14 dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation of ((his
or her))

15 the residence, but not to exceed sixty thousand
dollars of the

16 valuation of ((his or her)) the residence;
or

17 (ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this
section and

18 has a combined disposable income of eighteen thousand
dollars or

19 less shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on
the

20 greater of fifty thousand dollars or sixty percent of
the

21 valuation of ((his or her)) the residence;
and

22 (6) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this
section and

23 has a combined disposable income of thirty thousand
dollars or

24 less, the valuation of the residence shall be the
assessed value

25 of the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or
January 1st

26 of the assessment year the person first qualifies under
this

27 section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify
under this

28 section only for one year because of high income, this
same

29 valuation shall be used upon requalification. If the
person fails

30 to qualify for more than one year in succession because
of high

31 income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the
valuation

32 upon requalification shall be the assessed value on
January 1st of

33 the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If
the person

34 transfers the exemption under this section to a
different

35 residence, the valuation of the different residence
shall be the

36 assessed value of the different residence on January 1st
of the

37 assessment year in which the person transfers the
exemption.

p. 3 SB
5398

_1 In no event may the valuation under this subsection
be greater

_2 than the true and fair value of the residence on January
1st of

_3 the assessment year.

_4 This subsection does not apply to subsequent
improvements to

_5 the property in the year in which the improvements are
made.

_6 Subsequent improvements to the property shall be added
to the

_7 value otherwise determined under this subsection at
their true and

_8 fair value in the year in which they are made.

_9 All taxpayers who qualify for exemption under
this section

10 shall also be allowed a property tax exemption from
the state levy

11 equal to the tax imposed on the assessed value of the
owner-

12 occupied residential property for the state levy.

13 Sec. 2. RCW
84.36.387 and 1992 c 206 s 14 are each amended to read

14 as follows:

15 (1) All claims for exemption under RCW 84.36.381
shall be made

16 and signed by the person entitled to the exemption, by
((his or

17 her)) the person's attorney in fact or in
the event the residence

18 of ((such)) the person is under mortgage
or purchase contract

19 requiring accumulation of reserves out of which the
holder of the

20 mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate
taxes, by

21 ((such)) the holder or by the owner,
either before two witnesses

22 or the ((county)) assessor or ((his)) the
assessor's deputy in the

23 county where the real property is located((:
PROVIDED, That)). If

24 a claim for exemption is made by a person living in a
cooperative

25 housing association, corporation, or partnership, ((such))
the

26 claim shall be made and signed by the person entitled to
the

27 exemption and by the authorized agent of ((such))
the cooperative.

28 (2) If the taxpayer is unable to personally
submit ((his own)) a

29 claim, the claim shall be submitted by a duly authorized
agent or

30 by a guardian or other person charged with the care of
the person

31 or property of ((such)) the taxpayer.

32 (3) All claims for exemption and renewal applications
shall be

33 accompanied by ((such)) the documented
verification of income as

34 shall be prescribed by rule adopted by the department of
revenue.

35 (4) Any person signing a false claim with the intent
to defraud

36 or evade the payment of any tax shall be guilty of the
offense of

37 perjury.

SB 5398 p. 4

_1 (5) The tax liability of a cooperative housing
association,

_2 corporation, or partnership shall be reduced by the
amount of tax

_3 exemption to which a claimant residing therein is
entitled and

_4 ((such)) the cooperative shall reduce any
amount owed by the

_5 claimant to the cooperative by ((such)) the
exact amount of tax

_6 exemption or, if no amount be owed, the cooperative
shall make

_7 payment to the claimant of ((such)) the
exact amount of exemption.

_8 (6) A remainderman or other person who would have
otherwise

_9 paid the tax on real property that is the subject of an
exemption

10 granted under RCW 84.36.381 for an estate for life shall
reduce

11 the amount which would have been payable by the life
tenant to the

12 remainderman or other person to the extent of the
exemption. If no

13 amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation
between these

14 persons, the remainderman or other person shall make
payment to

15 the life tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5398