BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART 1

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES

REGIONAL ADVISORY COMMITTEES

Sec. 101. RCW 43.20A.360 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 9 s 214 and 1989 c 11 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) The secretary is
hereby authorized to appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be
required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the department. The secretary may appoint statewide committees or
councils in the following subject areas: (a) Health facilities; (b) children and
youth services; (c) blind services; (d) medical and health care; (e) drug abuse
and alcoholism; (f) social services; (g) economic services; (h) vocational
services; (i) rehabilitative services; and on such other subject matters as are
or come within the department's responsibilities. ((The secretary shall
appoint committees or councils advisory to the department in each service
delivery region to be designated by the secretary.)) The statewide ((and
the regional)) councils shall have representation from both major political
parties and shall have substantial consumer representation. Such committees or
councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the secretary in
his or her discretion may determine. The members of the committees or councils
shall hold office for three years except in the case of a vacancy, in which
event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the unexpired term for
which the vacancy occurs. No member shall serve more than two consecutive
terms.

(2) Members of such
state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter
amended. ((Members of regional advisory committees may, in the discretion
of the secretary, be paid the same travel expenses as set forth above.))

(3) The secretary,
in consultation with affected constituent groups, shall establish appropriate
public involvement and outreach mechanisms designed to ensure effective
communication relating to the programs, policies, and operations of the
department, from both a regional and statewide perspective.

PART 2

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES

STATE ADVISORY COMMITTEE

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.20A.370 (State advisory committee
to department--Created--Membership--Terms--Vacancies) and 1988 c 49 s 1, 1984 c
259 s 2, & 1971 ex.s. c 189 s 13;

(2) RCW 43.20A.375 (State advisory committee
to department--Powers and duties) and 1999 c 372 s 6, 1988 c 49 s 2, 1984 c 259
s 3, & 1971 ex.s. c 189 s 14; and

(3) RCW 43.20A.380 (State advisory committee
to department--Travel expenses) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 99 & 1971
ex.s. c 189 s 15.

PART
3

WASHINGTON STATE JOB TRAINING
COORDINATING COUNCIL

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 50.67.010 (Council created) and 1991
c 238 s 14;

(2) RCW 50.67.020 (Membership of
council--Assistance to work force training and education coordinating board)
and 1991 c 238 s 15; and

(3) RCW 50.67.030 (Washington youthbuild
program--Council to advise) and 1994 sp.s. c 3 s 8.

PART
4

REGIONAL
CITIZEN'S ADVISORY COMMITTEES

MODEL TOXICS CONTROL ACT

Sec. 401. RCW 70.105D.030 and 1997
c 406 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
exercise the following powers in addition to any other powers granted by law:

(a) Investigate,
provide for investigating, or require potentially liable persons to investigate
any releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances, including but not
limited to inspecting, sampling, or testing to determine the nature or extent
of any release or threatened release. If there is a reasonable basis to believe
that a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance may exist, the
department's authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter upon any
property and conduct investigations. The department shall give reasonable
notice before entering property unless an emergency prevents such notice. The
department may by subpoena require the attendance or testimony of witnesses and
the production of documents or other information that the department deems
necessary;

(b) Conduct, provide
for conducting, or require potentially liable persons to conduct remedial
actions (including investigations under (a) of this subsection) to remedy
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances. In carrying out such
powers, the department's authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter
upon property. The department shall give reasonable notice before entering
property unless an emergency prevents such notice. In conducting, providing
for, or requiring remedial action, the department shall give preference to
permanent solutions to the maximum extent practicable and shall provide for or
require adequate monitoring to ensure the effectiveness of the remedial action;

(c) Indemnify
contractors retained by the department for carrying out investigations and remedial
actions, but not for any contractor's reckless or wilful misconduct;

(d) Carry out all state
programs authorized under the federal cleanup law and the federal resource,
conservation, and recovery act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq., as amended;

(e) Classify substances
as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW 70.105D.020(7) and classify
substances and products as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
82.21.020(1);

(f) Issue orders or
enter into consent decrees or agreed orders that include, or issue written
opinions under (i) of this subsection that may be conditioned upon, deed
restrictions where necessary to protect human health and the environment from a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance from a facility. Prior
to establishing a deed restriction under this subsection, the department shall
notify and seek comment from a city or county department with land use planning
authority for real property subject to a deed restriction;

(g) Enforce the
application of permanent and effective institutional controls that are
necessary for a remedial action to be protective of human health and the
environment;

(h) Require holders to
conduct remedial actions necessary to abate an imminent or substantial
endangerment pursuant to RCW 70.105D.020(12)(b)(ii)(C);

(i) Provide informal
advice and assistance to persons regarding the administrative and technical
requirements of this chapter. This may include site-specific advice to persons
who are conducting or otherwise interested in independent remedial actions.
Any such advice or assistance shall be advisory only, and shall not be binding
on the department. As a part of providing this advice and assistance for
independent remedial actions, the department may prepare written opinions
regarding whether the independent remedial actions or proposals for those
actions meet the substantive requirements of this chapter or whether the
department believes further remedial action is necessary at the facility. The
department may collect, from persons requesting advice and assistance, the
costs incurred by the department in providing such advice and assistance;
however, the department shall, where appropriate, waive collection of costs in
order to provide an appropriate level of technical assistance in support of
public participation. The state, the department, and officers and employees of
the state are immune from all liability, and no cause of action of any nature
may arise from any act or omission in providing, or failing to provide,
informal advice and assistance; and

(j) Take any other
actions necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including the
power to adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The department
shall immediately implement all provisions of this chapter to the maximum extent
practicable, including investigative and remedial actions where appropriate.
The department shall adopt, and thereafter enforce, rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to:

(a) Provide for public
participation, including at least (i) ((the establishment of regional
citizen's advisory committees, (ii))) public notice of the development of
investigative plans or remedial plans for releases or threatened releases((,))
and (((iii))) (ii) concurrent public notice of all compliance
orders, agreed orders, enforcement orders, or notices of violation;

(b) Establish a hazard
ranking system for hazardous waste sites;

(c) Provide for
requiring the reporting by an owner or operator of releases of hazardous
substances to the environment that may be a threat to human health or the
environment within ninety days of discovery, including such exemptions from
reporting as the department deems appropriate, however this requirement shall
not modify any existing requirements provided for under other laws;

(d) Establish reasonable
deadlines not to exceed ninety days for initiating an investigation of a
hazardous waste site after the department receives notice or otherwise receives
information that the site may pose a threat to human health or the environment
and other reasonable deadlines for remedying releases or threatened releases at
the site;

(e) Publish and
periodically update minimum cleanup standards for remedial actions at least as
stringent as the cleanup standards under section 121 of the federal cleanup
law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9621, and at least as stringent as all applicable state and
federal laws, including health-based standards under state and federal law; and

(f) Apply industrial
clean-up standards at industrial properties. Rules adopted under this
subsection shall ensure that industrial properties cleaned up to industrial
standards cannot be converted to nonindustrial uses without approval from the
department. The department may require that a property cleaned up to
industrial standards is cleaned up to a more stringent applicable standard as a
condition of conversion to a nonindustrial use. Industrial clean-up standards
may not be applied to industrial properties where hazardous substances
remaining at the property after remedial action pose a threat to human health
or the environment in adjacent nonindustrial areas.

(3) Before November 1st
of each even-numbered year, the department shall develop, with public notice
and hearing, and submit to the ways and means and appropriate standing
environmental committees of the senate and house of representatives a ranked
list of projects and expenditures recommended for appropriation from both the
state and local toxics control accounts. The department shall also provide the
legislature and the public each year with an accounting of the department's
activities supported by appropriations from the state toxics control account,
including a list of known hazardous waste sites and their hazard rankings,
actions taken and planned at each site, how the department is meeting its top two
management priorities under RCW 70.105.150, and all funds expended under this
chapter.

(4) The department
shall establish a scientific advisory board to render advice to the department
with respect to the hazard ranking system, cleanup standards, remedial actions,
deadlines for remedial actions, monitoring, the classification of substances as
hazardous substances for purposes of RCW 70.105D.020(7) and the classification
of substances or products as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
82.21.020(1). The board shall consist of five independent members to serve
staggered three-year terms. No members may be employees of the department.
Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

(5) The department
shall establish a program to identify potential hazardous waste sites and to
encourage persons to provide information about hazardous waste sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. A new section is added
to chapter 70.105D RCW to read as follows:

In consultation with
affected constituent groups, the director shall establish appropriate public
involvement and outreach mechanisms designed to provide the department with
effective public input on programs and policies relating to the management and
control of hazardous substances.

PART
5

SEA URCHIN AND
SEA CUCUMBER ADVISORY REVIEW BOARD

COASTAL CRAB ADVISORY REVIEW
BOARD

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. RCW 77.70.030 (Advisory review boards)
and 2000 c 107 s 57, 1999 c 151 s 1601, & 1995 c 269 s 3101 are each
repealed.

PART
6

OCEAN PINK SHRIMP ADVISORY REVIEW
BOARD

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. RCW 77.70.270 (Ocean pink
shrimp--Delivery license--Reduction of landing requirement) and 2000 c 107 s 75
& 1993 c 376 s 10 are each repealed.

PART
7

SHORELINES GUIDELINES COMMISSION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
701. By July 1, 2001, the
director of the department of ecology shall abolish the shorelines guidelines
commission.

PART
8

WETLANDS MITIGATION BANKING ADVISORY
TEAM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. By July 1, 2001, the
director of the department of ecology shall abolish the wetlands mitigation
banking advisory team.

PART
9

THE
COMMISSION ON LEGISLATIVE BUILDING

PRESERVATION AND RENOVATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. By July 1, 2001, the
commission on legislative building preservation and renovation created in House
Concurrent Resolution No. 4410 is abolished.

PART
10

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1001. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1002. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---