BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.09.020 and 1995 c
216 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged
with a ((crime of sexual violence)) sexually violent offense and
who suffers from a mental abnormality or personality disorder which makes the
person likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in
a secure facility.

(2) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.

(3) "Likely to
engage in predatory acts of sexual violence" means that the person more
probably than not will engage in such acts. Such likelihood must be evidenced
by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined at the time the petition
is filed under RCW 71.09.030.

(4)
"Predatory" means acts directed towards strangers or individuals with
whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of
victimization.

(5) "Recent overt
act" means any act that has either caused harm of a sexually violent
nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm.

(6) "Sexually
violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or after July 1, 1990,
that is:

(a)(i) An act
defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree
by forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or second degree,
statutory rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen, incest
against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the first or second
degree; or

(ii) An act of
murder in the first or second degree, assault in the first or second degree,
homicide by abuse, manslaughter in the first or second degree, assault of a
child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree,
burglary in the first degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment,
which act, either at the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently
during civil commitment proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been
determined beyond a reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that
term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Any sex offense,
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, not listed in (a) of this subsection, which act,
either at the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil
commitment proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have included:

(i) Forcible
compulsion;

(ii) Torture;

(iii) Substantial
bodily harm or great bodily harm, as defined in RCW 9A.04.110; or

(iv) The use of a
deadly weapon;

(c) A felony
offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a
sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal
or out-of-state conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this
state would be a sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of this
subsection; (((c) an act of murder in the first or second degree, assault in
the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first or second degree,
kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the first degree,
residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at the time
of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in
RCW 9.94A.030;)) or

(d) An act as
described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or
criminal conspiracy to commit one of the felonies designated in (a)((, (b),))
or (c) of this subsection.

(7) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less
restrictive than total confinement.

(8) "Secretary"
means the secretary of social and health services or his or her designee.

(9) "Forcible
compulsion" has the meaning defined in RCW 9A.44.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The code reviser shall
alphabetize and renumber the definitions in section 1 of this act and correct
any cross-references.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---