BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that Washington's equine racing industry creates economic, environmental, and
recreational impacts across the state affecting agriculture, horse breeding,
the horse training industry, agricultural fairs and youth programs, and tourism
and employment opportunities. The Washington equine industry has incurred a
financial decline coinciding with increased competition from the gaming
industry in the state and from the lack of a class 1 racing facility in western
Washington from 1993 through 1995. This act is necessary to preserve, restore,
and revitalize the equine breeding and racing industries and to preserve in
Washington the economic and social impacts associated with these industries.
Preserving Washington's equine breeding and racing industries, and in
particular those sectors of the industries that are dependent upon live horse
racing, is in the public interest of the state. The purpose of this act is to
preserve Washington's equine breeding and racing industries and to protect these
industries from adverse economic impacts. This act does not establish a new
form of gaming in Washington or allow expanded gaming within the state beyond
what has been previously authorized. Simulcast wagering has been allowed in
Washington before the effective date of this act. Therefore, this act does not
allow gaming of any nature or scope that was prohibited before the effective
date of this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.16.200 and 2000 c
223 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A racing
association licensed by the commission to conduct a race meet may seek approval
from the commission to conduct parimutuel wagering on its program at a
satellite location or locations within the state of Washington. The sale of
parimutuel pools at satellite locations shall be conducted only during the
licensee's race meet and simultaneous to all parimutuel wagering activity
conducted at the licensee's live racing facility in the state of Washington.
The commission's authority to approve satellite wagering at a particular
location is subject to the following limitations:

(a) The commission may
approve only one satellite location in each county in the state; however, the
commission may grant approval for more than one licensee to conduct wagering at
each satellite location. A satellite location shall not be operated within
twenty driving miles of any class 1 racing facility. For the purposes of this
section, "driving miles" means miles measured by the most direct
route as determined by the commission; and

(b) A licensee shall
not conduct satellite wagering at any satellite location within sixty driving
miles of any other racing facility conducting a live race meet.

(2) Subject to local
zoning and other land use ordinances, the commission shall be the sole judge of
whether approval to conduct wagering at a satellite location shall be granted.

(3) The licensee shall
combine the parimutuel pools of the satellite location with those of the racing
facility for the purpose of determining odds and computing payoffs. The amount
wagered at the satellite location shall be combined with the amount wagered at
the racing facility for the application of take out formulas and distribution
as provided in RCW 67.16.102, 67.16.105, 67.16.170, and 67.16.175. A satellite
extension of the licensee's racing facility shall be subject to the same
application of the rules of racing as the licensee's racing facility.

(4) Upon written
application to the commission, a class 1 racing association may be authorized
to transmit simulcasts of live horse races conducted at its racetrack to
locations outside of the state of Washington approved by the commission and in
accordance with the interstate horse racing act of 1978 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 to
3007) or any other applicable laws. The commission may permit parimutuel pools
on the simulcast races to be combined in a common pool. A racing association
that transmits simulcasts of its races to locations outside this state shall
pay at least fifty percent of the fee that it receives for sale of the
simulcast signal to the horsemen's purse account for its live races after first
deducting the actual cost of sending the signal out of state.

(5) Upon written
application to the commission, a class 1 racing association may be authorized
to transmit simulcasts of live horse races conducted at its racetrack to
licensed racing associations located within the state of Washington and
approved by the commission for the receipt of the simulcasts. The commission
shall permit parimutuel pools on the simulcast races to be combined in a common
pool. The fee for in-state, track-to-track simulcasts shall be five and
one-half percent of the gross parimutuel receipts generated at the receiving
location and payable to the sending racing association. A racing association
that transmits simulcasts of its races to other licensed racing associations
shall pay at least fifty percent of the fee that it receives for the simulcast
signal to the horsemen's purse account for its live race meet after first
deducting the actual cost of sending the simulcast signal. A racing
association that receives races simulcast from class 1 racing associations
within the state shall pay at least fifty percent of its share of the
parimutuel receipts to the horsemen's purse account for its live race meet
after first deducting the purchase price and the actual direct costs of
importing the race.

(6) A class 1 racing
association may be allowed to import simulcasts of horse races from
out-of-state racing facilities. With the prior approval of the commission, the
class 1 racing association may participate in an interstate common pool and may
change its commission and breakage rates to achieve a common rate with other
participants in the common pool.

(a) The class 1 racing association
shall make written application with the commission for permission to import
simulcast horse races for the purpose of parimutuel wagering. Subject to the
terms of this section, the commission is the sole authority in determining
whether to grant approval for an imported simulcast race.

(b) ((During the
conduct of its race meeting, a class 1 racing association may be allowed to
import no more than one simulcast race card program during each live race day.))
A licensed racing association may also be approved to import one simulcast race
of regional or national interest on each live race day. ((A class 1 racing
association may be permitted to import two simulcast programs on two nonlive
race days per each week during its live meet. A licensee shall not operate
parimutuel wagering on more than five days per week. Parimutuel wagering on
imported simulcast programs shall only be conducted at the live racing facility
of a class 1 racing association.))

(c) The commission may
allow simulcast races of regional or national interest to be sent to satellite
locations. The simulcasts shall be limited to one per day except for Breeder's
Cup special events day.

(d) When open for
parimutuel wagering, a class 1 racing association which imports simulcast races
shall also conduct simulcast parimutuel wagering within its licensed racing
enclosure on all races simulcast from other class 1 racing associations within
the state of Washington.

(e) ((When not
conducting a live race meeting, a class 1 racing association may be approved to
conduct simulcast parimutuel wagering on imported simulcast races.)) The
conduct of ((simulcast)) parimutuel wagering on ((the)) imported
simulcast races shall be for not more than fourteen hours during any
twenty-four hour period, for not more than five days per week and only at ((its))
the live racing facility of a class 1 racing association.

(f) On any imported
simulcast race, the class 1 racing association shall pay fifty percent of its
share of the parimutuel receipts to the horsemen's purse account for its live
race meet after first deducting the purchase price of the imported race and the
actual costs of importing the race.

(7) For purposes of
this section, a class 1 racing association is defined as a licensee approved by
the commission to conduct during each twelve-month period at least forty days
of live racing. If a live race day is canceled due to reasons directly
attributable to acts of God, labor disruptions affecting live race days but not
directly involving the licensee or its employees, or other circumstances that
the commission decides are beyond the control of the class 1 racing
association, then the canceled day counts toward the forty-day requirement.
The commission may by rule increase the number of live racing days required to
maintain class 1 racing association status or make other rules necessary to
implement this section.

(8) This section does
not establish a new form of gaming in Washington or allow expanded gaming
within the state beyond what has been previously authorized. Simulcast
wagering has been allowed in Washington before April 19, 1997. Therefore, this
section does not allow gaming of any nature or scope that was prohibited before
April 19, 1997. This section is necessary to protect the Washington equine
breeding and racing industries, and in particular those sectors of these
industries that are dependent upon live horse racing. The purpose of this
section is to protect these industries from adverse economic impacts and to
promote fan attendance at class 1 racing facilities. Therefore, imported
simulcast race card programs shall not be disseminated to any location outside
the live racing facility of the class 1 racing association and a class 1 racing
association is strictly prohibited from simulcasting imported race card
programs to any location outside its live racing facility.

(9) A licensee
conducting simulcasting under this section shall place signs in the licensee's
gambling establishment under RCW 9.46.071. The informational signs concerning
problem and compulsive gambling must include a toll-free telephone number for
problem and compulsive gamblers and be developed under RCW 9.46.071.

(10) This act does
not establish a new form of gaming in Washington or allow expanded gaming
within the state beyond what has been previously authorized. Simulcast
wagering has been allowed in Washington before the effective date of this act.
Therefore, this section does not allow gaming of any nature or scope that was
prohibited before the effective date of this act. This act is necessary to
protect the Washington equine breeding and racing industries, and in particular
those sectors of these industries that are dependent upon live horse racing.
The purpose of this act is to protect these industries from adverse economic
impacts and to promote fan attendance at class 1 racing facilities. Therefore,
imported simulcast race card programs shall not be disseminated to any location
outside the live racing facility of the class 1 racing association and a class
1 racing association is strictly prohibited from simulcasting imported race
card programs to any location outside its live racing facility.

(11) If a state or
federal court makes a finding that the increase in the number of imported
simulcast races that may be authorized under this act is an expansion of gaming
beyond that which is now allowed, this act is null and void.

(12) If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of this act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is also invalid.

---
END ---