BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

The department must
annually establish service levels for the processing and monitoring of
hydraulic project applications and approvals under this chapter. The service
levels must include minimum goals as follows:

(1) Performing a field
visit for a minimum of fifty percent of the applications filed;

(2) Performing a field
visit following completion of work under the approval to ensure compliance with
conditions in the approval and performance of any required mitigation work, for
a minimum of fifty percent of the approvals for which work is completed; and

(3) Making decisions
upon all completed applications within the applicable deadlines required under
this chapter.

By December 31st of
each year, the department must report to the office of financial management and
the fish and wildlife standing committees of the senate and house of
representatives concerning its estimates of expected applications during the
succeeding calendar year and resources necessary to meet the service levels
established for the year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

The department must establish
procedures to track the status of applications and approvals under this
chapter. The procedures must facilitate the department's compliance with the
service level goals established under section 1 of this act. The department
must make available to the public information regarding the status of
applications and approvals, including a register that is accessible
electronically through the worldwide web or other electronic network.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

When an approval issued
under this chapter is conditioned upon the completion of compensatory
mitigation for unavoidable impacts to fish habitat, the department must ensure
by field inspection or other effective means that the mitigation objectives are
substantially achieved prior to commencing construction or activities under the
hydraulic project approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

The department must
adopt financial requirements that include performance bonding or other
mechanisms that are required as a condition of approval under this chapter to
ensure a source of funding for completing mitigation projects and achieving
mitigation objectives when compensatory mitigation is required under an
approval and the applicant does not timely meet such conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 77.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If any person or
government agency fails to follow the requirements of obtaining a hydraulic
project approval under this chapter or fails to carry out any of the
requirements or conditions of a hydraulic project approval issued under this
chapter, the department may issue an order to that person or government
agency. The order may require the person or government agency to stop work on
any or all of the activities subject to the hydraulic project approval, to
correct or to restore the nonconforming site, or to both stop work and to
correct or to restore the nonconforming site. Within twenty days of service of
such an order or as provided by rule of the department extending the time, the
person may file a written petition with the department appealing the order, and
this petition must be treated as an application for an adjudicative proceeding
under chapter 34.05 RCW. In the event of an appeal, a person or government
agency may seek interim relief from an order under this section as provided in
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The department may
adopt rules to designate that certain violations of the terms or conditions of
a hydraulic project approval are an infraction to be punished as provided by
RCW 77.15.160. Any punishment under chapter 77.15 RCW is supplemental to the
remedy provided by subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c
107 s 239 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities if the person:

(a) Constructs
any form of hydraulic project or performs other work on a hydraulic project
and((:

(a))) fails to have a hydraulic project
approval required under chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; ((or))

(b) Violates any requirements
or conditions of the hydraulic project approval for such construction or work;

(c) Violates any
stop work or correction order issued under section 5 of this act; or

(d) Violates any
rule governing hydraulic project activities addressed in a pamphlet that serves
as a hydraulic project approval.

(2) Unlawfully
undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. RCW 77.15.140 (Unclassified fish or
wildlife--Unlawful taking--Penalty) and 1998 c 190 s 15 are each repealed.

---
END ---