BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 57.16.010 and 1997 c
447 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Before ordering any
improvements or submitting to vote any proposition for incurring any
indebtedness, the district commissioners shall adopt a general comprehensive
plan for the type or types of facilities the district proposes to provide. A
district may prepare a separate general comprehensive plan for each of these
services and other services that districts are permitted to provide, or the
district may combine any or all of its comprehensive plans into a single
general comprehensive plan.

(1) For a general
comprehensive plan of a water supply system, the commissioners shall
investigate the several portions and sections of the district for the purpose
of determining the present and reasonably foreseeable future needs thereof;
shall examine and investigate, determine, and select a water supply or water
supplies for such district suitable and adequate for present and reasonably
foreseeable future needs thereof; and shall consider and determine a general
system or plan for acquiring such water supply or water supplies, and the
lands, waters, and water rights and easements necessary therefor, and for
retaining and storing any such waters, and erecting dams, reservoirs,
aqueducts, and pipe lines to convey the same throughout such district. There
may be included as part of the system the installation of fire hydrants at
suitable places throughout the district. The commissioners shall determine a general
comprehensive plan for distributing such water throughout such portion of the
district as may then reasonably be served by means of subsidiary aqueducts and
pipe lines, and a long-term plan for financing the planned projects and the
method of distributing the cost and expense thereof, including the creation of
local improvement districts or utility local improvement districts, and shall
determine whether the whole or part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from
revenue or general obligation bonds.

(2) For a general
comprehensive plan for a sewer system, the commissioners shall investigate all
portions and sections of the district and select a general comprehensive plan
for a sewer system for the district suitable and adequate for present and reasonably
foreseeable future needs thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall provide
for treatment plants and other methods and services, if any, for the
prevention, control, and reduction of water pollution and for the treatment and
disposal of sewage and industrial and other liquid wastes now produced or which
may reasonably be expected to be produced within the district and shall, for
such portions of the district as may then reasonably be served, provide for the
acquisition or construction and installation of laterals, trunk sewers,
intercepting sewers, syphons, pumping stations or other sewage collection
facilities, septic tanks, septic tank systems or drainfields, and systems for
the transmission and treatment of wastewater. The general comprehensive plan
shall provide a long-term plan for financing the planned projects and the
method of distributing the cost and expense of the sewer system and services,
including the creation of local improvement districts or utility local
improvement districts; and provide whether the whole or some part of the cost
and expenses shall be paid from revenue or general obligation bonds.

(3) For a general
comprehensive plan for a drainage system, the commissioners shall investigate
all portions and sections of the district and adopt a general comprehensive
plan for a drainage system for the district suitable and adequate for present
and future needs thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall provide for a
system to collect, treat, and dispose of storm water or surface waters,
including use of natural systems and the construction or provision of culverts,
storm water pipes, ponds, and other systems. The general comprehensive plan
shall provide for a long-term plan for financing the planned projects and
provide for a method of distributing the cost and expense of the drainage
system, including local improvement districts or utility local improvement
districts, and provide whether the whole or some part of the cost and expenses
shall be paid from revenue or general obligation bonds.

(4) For a general
comprehensive plan for street lighting, the commissioners shall investigate all
portions and sections of the district and adopt a general comprehensive plan
for street lighting for the district suitable and adequate for present and
future needs thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall provide for a
system or systems of street lighting, provide for a long-term plan for
financing the planned projects, and provide for a method of distributing the
cost and expense of the street lighting system, including local improvement
districts or utility local improvement districts, and provide whether the whole
or some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from revenue or general
obligation bonds.

(5) The commissioners
may employ such engineering and legal service as in their discretion is
necessary in carrying out their duties.

(6) Any general
comprehensive plan or plans shall be adopted by resolution and submitted to an
engineer designated by the legislative authority of the county in which
fifty-one percent or more of the area of the district is located, and to the
director of health of the county in which the district or any portion thereof
is located, and must be approved in writing by the engineer and director of
health, except that a comprehensive plan relating to street lighting shall not
be submitted to or approved by the director of health. The general
comprehensive plan shall be approved, conditionally approved, or rejected by
the director of health and by the designated engineer within sixty days of
their respective receipt of the plan. However, this sixty-day time limitation
may be extended by the director of health or engineer for up to an additional
sixty days if sufficient time is not available to review adequately the general
comprehensive plans.

Before becoming
effective, the general comprehensive plan shall also be submitted to, and
approved by resolution of, the legislative authority of every county within
whose boundaries all or a portion of the district lies. The general
comprehensive plan shall be approved, conditionally approved, or rejected by
each of the county legislative authorities pursuant to the criteria in RCW
57.02.040 for approving the formation, reorganization, annexation,
consolidation, or merger of districts. The resolution, ordinance, or motion of
the legislative body that rejects the comprehensive plan or a part thereof
shall specifically state in what particular the comprehensive plan or part
thereof rejected fails to meet these criteria. The general comprehensive plan
shall not provide for the extension or location of facilities that are
inconsistent with the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110. Nothing in this chapter
shall preclude a county from rejecting a proposed plan because it is in conflict
with the criteria in RCW 57.02.040. Each general comprehensive plan shall be
deemed approved if the county legislative authority fails to reject or
conditionally approve the plan within ninety days of the plan's submission to
the county legislative authority or within thirty days of a hearing on the plan
when the hearing is held within ninety days of submission to the county
legislative authority. However, a county legislative authority may extend this
ninety-day time limitation by up to an additional ninety days where a finding
is made that ninety days is insufficient to review adequately the general
comprehensive plan. In addition, the commissioners and the county legislative
authority may mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines in this section.

If the district
includes portions or all of one or more cities or towns, the general
comprehensive plan shall be submitted also to, and approved by resolution of,
the legislative authorities of the cities and towns before becoming effective.
The general comprehensive plan shall be deemed approved by the city or town
legislative authority if the city or town legislative authority fails to reject
or conditionally approve the plan within ninety days of the plan's submission
to the city or town or within thirty days of a hearing on the plan when the
hearing is held within ninety days of submission to the county legislative
authority. However, a city or town legislative authority may extend this time
limitation by up to an additional ninety days where a finding is made that
insufficient time exists to adequately review the general comprehensive plan
within these time limitations. In addition, the commissioners and the city or
town legislative authority may mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines
in this section.

Before becoming
effective, the general comprehensive plan shall be approved by any state agency
whose approval may be required by applicable law. The general comprehensive
plan shall be deemed approved by any such state agency if such state agency
fails to reject or conditionally approve the plan within sixty days of the
plan's submission to the state agency. However, a state agency may extend this
time limitation by up to an additional sixty days if insufficient time exists
to adequately review the general comprehensive plan within these time
limitations.

Before becoming
effective, any amendment to, alteration of, or addition to, a general
comprehensive plan shall also be subject to such approval as if it were a new
general comprehensive plan. However, only if the amendment, alteration, or
addition ((affects)) materially impacts a particular city or
town, shall the amendment, alteration, or addition be subject to approval by
such particular city or town governing body.

The
district shall provide a copy of the general comprehensive plan, or any
amendment, alteration, or addition thereto, to every state agency, county,
city, and town from which approval was required by applicable law, within
thirty days after such plan, amendment, alteration, or addition becomes
effective.

--- END ---