BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares that by reason of their employment, fire fighters are required to work
in the midst of and are subject to smoke, fumes, infectious diseases, and toxic
substances; that fire fighters are continually exposed to a vast and expanding
field of hazardous substances; that fire fighters are constantly entering
uncontrolled environments to save lives, provide emergency medical services,
and reduce property damage and are frequently not aware or informed of the
potential toxic and carcinogenic substances, and infectious diseases that they
may be exposed to; that fire fighters, unlike other workers, are often exposed
simultaneously to multiple carcinogens; that fire fighters so exposed can
potentially and unwittingly expose coworkers, families, and members of the
public to infectious diseases; and that exposures to fire fighters, whether
cancer, infectious diseases, and heart or respiratory disease develop very
slowly, usually manifesting themselves years after exposure. The legislature
further finds and declares that all the aforementioned conditions exist and
arise out of or in the course of such employment.

Sec. 2. RCW 51.32.185 and 1987 c
515 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the case of fire
fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(4) (a), (b), and (c) who are covered under
Title 51 RCW, there shall exist a prima facie presumption that: (a) Respiratory
disease ((is an)); (b) heart problems that are experienced within
seventy-two hours of exposure to smoke, fumes, or toxic substances; (c) cancer;
and (d) infectious diseases are occupational diseases under RCW
51.08.140. This presumption of occupational disease may be rebutted by a
preponderance of the evidence controverting the presumption. Controverting
evidence may include, but is not limited to, use of tobacco products, physical
fitness and weight, lifestyle, hereditary factors, and exposure from other
employment or nonemployment activities.

(2) The presumptions
established in subsection (1) of this section shall be extended to an
applicable member following termination of service for a period of three
calendar months for each year of requisite service, but may not extend more
than sixty months following the last date of employment.

(3) The
presumption established in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall only apply
to any active or former fire fighter who has cancer that develops or manifests
itself after the fire fighter has served at least ten years and who was given a
qualifying medical examination upon becoming a fire fighter that showed no
evidence of cancer. The presumption within subsection (1)(c) of this section
shall only apply to cancers affecting the skin, breasts, central nervous
system, or lymphatic, digestive, hematological, urinary, skeletal, oral, or
reproductive systems.

---
END ---