BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. There is in the state
a growing demand for

_7 water and a desire to reallocate water among uses and
users due to

_8 growing population and economic development. This has
resulted in

_9 growing numbers of applications for a water right,
transfer, or

10 change. As this has occurred, the time required for the
state to

11 render decisions on applications has grown longer due to

12 increasing complexity of impairment and public interest
analysis

13 and to lack of funding. Consequently, a large backlog
of pending

14 applications has accumulated, and it is estimated that,
in some

15 cases, it may take up to twenty years before a decision
can be

16 rendered. Applications that will almost certainly be
approved are

17 facing unreasonable delay. Individuals and communities
are facing

p. 1 SSB
5412

_1 avoidable economic loss. Water bodies that are
vulnerable are

_2 facing avoidable adverse effects from increasing numbers
of

_3 unpermitted uses.

_4 By this act, the legislature intends: (1) To adopt
a policy of

_5 adequately funding the rendering of decisions on
applications; (2)

_6 to establish a process, based on adoption of level of
service

_7 standards, that will help the department of ecology and
the

_8 legislature to make informed and objective choices
regarding

_9 funding; and (3) to provide for the reduction of the
current large

10 accumulation of pending applications to a reasonable
level over a

11 reasonable period of time.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 90.03

13 RCW to read as follows:

14 It is the policy of the state to assure that
rendering

15 decisions on applications for a water right, transfer,
or change

16 occurs in a manner that is timely and fair to
applicants, protects

17 existing water rights and the environment, and results
in an

18 accumulation of no more than five hundred applications,
including

19 applications submitted after the effective date of this
act for

20 which investigation cannot commence due to lack of
funding. By

21 September 1, 2001, in consultation with affected
interests, the

22 department of ecology shall: Develop level of service
standards for

23 rendering decisions on applications for a water right,
transfer,

24 or change; determine the existing levels of service in
each water

25 resource inventory area established in chapter 173-500
WAC;

26 develop strategies and funding requirements for
achieving levels

27 of service; and present alternative levels of service
for

28 rendering decisions on applications to the legislature
together

29 with funding estimates. Conditions to be addressed by
level of

30 service standards shall include, but not be limited to,
the

31 requirements of RCW 90.80.080, other statutory
requirements that

32 affect the time needed to render a decision on an
application,

33 priorities adopted by the department, agreements under
RCW

34 90.03.265, and specific requests of applicants.
Strategies for

35 achieving improved levels of service may include
expedited

36 treatment of applications that require straightforward
or minimal

37 investigation, broader classification of beneficial
uses, improved

SSB 5412 p. 2

_1 procedures, or any other methods that may or may not
require

_2 legislative action. The department shall reduce the
accumulation of

_3 applications as it exists on June 30, 2001, by a minimum
of one

_4 thousand by June 30, 2002. By September 1, 2001, the
department

_5 shall submit to the governor and the legislature a
proposal for

_6 reducing by a minimum of one thousand by June 30, 2002,
the

_7 accumulation of applications as it exists on June 30,
2001, and a

_8 plan, including estimates of biennial budget requests,
for

_9 reducing to no more than five hundred applications the

10 accumulation of applications on June 30, 2007, for which

11 investigation cannot commence due to lack of funding.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5412