BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Following shelter
care and no later than twenty-five days prior to fact-finding, the department,
upon the parent's or counsel for the parent's request, shall facilitate with
the parent, counsel for the parent, a foster parent or other out-of-home care
provider, caseworker, counselor or other relevant health care provider,
guardian ad litem, if appointed, and any other person connected to the
development and well-being of the child a conference to identify in a written
service contract the department's expectations regarding the care and placement
of the child. The expectations identified must be specific with criteria that
enables the court to measure performance. The expectations must correlate with
the court's findings at shelter care under the provisions of RCW 13.34.065.

(2) At any other stage
in a dependency proceeding, the department, upon the parent's or counsel for
the parent's request, shall facilitate a case planning conference.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.34.160 and 1997 c
58 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In an action
brought under this chapter, the court may inquire into the ability of the
parent or parents of the child to pay child support and may enter an order of
child support as set forth in chapter 26.19 RCW. The court may enforce the
same by execution, or in any way in which a court of equity may enforce its
decrees. All child support orders entered pursuant to this chapter shall be in
compliance with the provisions of RCW 26.23.050.

(2) For purposes of
this section, if a dependent child's parent is an unmarried minor parent or
pregnant minor applicant, then the parent or parents of the minor shall also be
deemed a parent or parents of the dependent child. However, liability for
child support under this subsection only exists if the parent or parents of the
unmarried minor parent or pregnant minor applicant are provided the opportunity
for a hearing on their ability to provide support. Any child support order
requiring such a parent or parents to provide support for the minor parent's
child may be effective only until the minor parent reaches eighteen years of
age.

(3) The court shall
suspend or defer its order of child support in cases where the court determines
the parent has reasonably complied with the service contract. This provision
may apply to the custodial and noncustodial parent.

Sec. 3. RCW 13.34.062 and 2000 c
122 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The written notice
of custody and rights required by RCW 13.34.060 shall be in substantially the
following form:

"NOTICE

Your child has been
placed in temporary custody under the supervision of Child Protective Services
(or other person or agency). You have important legal rights and you must take
steps to protect your interests.

1. A court hearing will
be held before a judge within 72 hours of the time your child is taken into
custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. You should call the court
at (insert
appropriate phone number here) for specific information
about the date, time, and location of the court hearing.

2. You have the right
to have a lawyer represent you at the hearing. Your right to counsel
continues beyond shelter care. You have the right to records the
department intends to rely upon. A lawyer can look at the files in your case,
talk to child protective services and other agencies, tell you about the law,
help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot
afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get a
court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain local
procedure) .

3. At the hearing, you
have the right to speak on your own behalf, to introduce evidence, to examine
witnesses, and to receive a decision based solely on the evidence presented to
the judge.

4. If your hearing
occurs before a court commissioner, you have the right to have the decision of
the court commissioner reviewed by a superior court judge. To obtain that
review, you must, within ten days after the entry of the decision of the court
commissioner, file with the court a motion for revision of the decision, as provided
in RCW 2.24.050.

You should be present
at any shelter care hearing. If you do not come, the judge will not hear what
you have to say.

You may call the Child
Protective Services' caseworker for more information about your child. The
caseworker's name and telephone number are: (insert name and telephone
number) .

5. You may request
that the department facilitate a conference to develop a service contract
following the shelter care hearing. The service contract may not conflict with
the court's order of shelter care. You may request that a multidisciplinary
team, family group conference, prognostic staffing, or case planning conference
be convened for your child's case, and you may participate in its consultation
process with your counsel present."

Upon receipt of the
written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall acknowledge such
notice by signing a receipt prepared by child protective services. If the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not sign the receipt, the reason for
lack of a signature shall be written on the receipt. The receipt shall be made
a part of the court's file in the dependency action.

If after making
reasonable efforts to provide notification, child protective services is unable
to determine the whereabouts of the parents, guardian, or legal custodian, the
notice shall be delivered or sent to the last known address of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian.

(2) If child protective
services is not required to give notice under RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsection
(1) of this section, the juvenile court counselor assigned to the matter shall
make all reasonable efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or legal custodian
of the time and place of any shelter care hearing, request that they be
present, and inform them of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090.

(3) Reasonable efforts
to advise and to give notice, as required in RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections
(1) and (2) of this section, shall include, at a minimum, investigation of the
whereabouts of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. If such reasonable
efforts are not successful, or the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does
not appear at the shelter care hearing, the petitioner shall testify at the
hearing or state in a declaration:

(a) The efforts made to
investigate the whereabouts of, and to advise, the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian; and

(b) Whether actual
advice of rights was made, to whom it was made, and how it was made, including
the substance of any oral communication or copies of written materials used.

(4) The court shall
hear evidence regarding notice given to, and efforts to notify, the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian and shall examine the need for shelter care. The
court shall hear evidence regarding the efforts made to place the child with a relative.
The court shall make an express finding as to whether the notice required under
RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this section was given to the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian. All parties have the right to present
testimony to the court regarding the need or lack of need for shelter care.
Hearsay evidence before the court regarding the need or lack of need for
shelter care must be supported by sworn testimony, affidavit, or declaration of
the person offering such evidence.

(5) A shelter care
order issued pursuant to RCW 13.34.065 may be amended at any time with notice
and hearing thereon. The shelter care decision of placement shall be modified
only upon a showing of change in circumstances. No child may be placed in shelter
care for longer than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge,
authorizing continued shelter care.

(6) Any parent,
guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is unable to attend the initial
shelter care hearing may request that a subsequent shelter care hearing be
scheduled. The request shall be made to the clerk of the court where the
petition is filed prior to the initial shelter care hearing. Upon the request
of the parent, the court shall schedule the hearing within seventy-two hours of
the request, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall
notify all other parties of the hearing by any reasonable means.

Sec. 4. RCW 13.34.180 and 2000 c
122 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petition seeking
termination of a parent and child relationship may be filed in juvenile court
by any party to the dependency proceedings concerning that child. Such
petition shall conform to the requirements of RCW 13.34.040, shall be served
upon the parties as provided in RCW 13.34.070(8), and shall allege all of the
following unless subsection (2) or (3) of this section applies:

(a) That the child has
been found to be a dependent child;

(b) That the court has
entered a dispositional order pursuant to RCW 13.34.130;

(c) That the child has
been removed or will, at the time of the hearing, have been removed from the
custody of the parent for a period of at least six months pursuant to a finding
of dependency;

(d) That the services
ordered under RCW 13.34.136 have been expressly and understandably offered or
provided and all necessary services, reasonably available, capable of
correcting the parental deficiencies within the foreseeable future have been
expressly and understandably offered or provided;

(e) That there is
little likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the child can be
returned to the parent in the near future. A parent's failure to substantially
improve parental deficiencies within twelve months following entry of the
dispositional order shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that there is
little likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the child can be
returned to the parent in the near future. The presumption shall not arise
unless the petitioner makes a showing that all necessary services reasonably
capable of correcting the parental deficiencies within the foreseeable future
have been clearly offered or provided. In determining whether the conditions
will be remedied the court may consider, but is not limited to, the following
factors:

(i) Use of intoxicating
or controlled substances so as to render the parent incapable of providing
proper care for the child for extended periods of time or for periods of
time that present a risk of imminent harm to the child, and documented
unwillingness of the parent to receive and complete treatment or documented
multiple failed treatment attempts; or

(ii) Psychological
incapacity or mental deficiency of the parent that is so severe and chronic as
to render the parent incapable of providing proper care for the child for
extended periods of time or for periods of time that present a risk of
imminent harm to the child, and documented unwillingness of the parent to
receive and complete treatment or documentation that there is no treatment that
can render the parent capable of providing proper care for the child in the
near future; and

(f) That continuation
of the parent and child relationship clearly diminishes the child's prospects
for early integration into a stable and permanent home.

(2) In lieu of the
allegations in subsection (1) of this section, the petition may allege that the
child was found under such circumstances that the whereabouts of the child's
parent are unknown and no person has acknowledged paternity or maternity and
requested custody of the child within two months after the child was found.

(3) In lieu of the
allegations in subsection (1)(b) through (f) of this section, the petition may
allege that the parent has been convicted of:

(a) Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, or homicide by abuse as defined in chapter
9A.32 RCW against another child of the parent;

(b) Manslaughter in the
first degree or manslaughter in the second degree, as defined in chapter 9A.32
RCW against another child of the parent;

(c) Attempting,
conspiring, or soliciting another to commit one or more of the crimes listed in
(a) or (b) of this subsection; or

(d) Assault in the
first or second degree, as defined in chapter 9A.36 RCW, against the surviving
child or another child of the parent.

(4) Notice of rights
shall be served upon the parent, guardian, or legal custodian with the petition
and shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

A
petition for termination of parental rights has been filed against you. You
have important legal rights and you must take steps to protect your interests.
This petition could result in permanent loss of your parental rights.

1.
You have the right to a fact-finding hearing before a judge.

2.
You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the hearing. A lawyer can
look at the files in your case, talk to the department of social and health
services and other agencies, tell you about the law, help you understand your
rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot afford a lawyer, the court
will appoint one to represent you. To get a court-appointed lawyer you must
contact: (explain
local procedure) .

3.
At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf, to introduce
evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision based solely on the
evidence presented to the judge.

You
should be present at this hearing.

You
may call (insert
agency) for more information about your child. The
agency's name and telephone number are (insert name and telephone
number) ."

Sec. 5. RCW 13.34.138 and 2000 c
122 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for children
whose cases are reviewed by a citizen review board under chapter 13.70 RCW, the
status of all children found to be dependent shall be reviewed by the court at
least every six months from the beginning date of the placement episode or the
date dependency is established, whichever is first, at a hearing in which it
shall be determined whether court supervision should continue. The initial
review hearing shall be an in-court review and shall be set six months from the
beginning date of the placement episode or no more than sixty to ninety days
from the entry of the disposition order, whichever comes first. The initial
review hearing may be a permanency planning hearing when necessary to meet the
time frames set forth in RCW 13.34.145(3) or 13.34.134. The review shall
include findings regarding the agency and parental completion of disposition
plan requirements, and if necessary, revised permanency time limits. This
review shall consider both the agency's and parent's efforts that demonstrate
consistent measurable progress over time in meeting the disposition plan
requirements. The supervising agency shall provide a foster parent,
preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and their right to an
opportunity to be heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only
if that person is currently providing care to that child at the time of the
hearing. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to any
person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.

(a) A child shall not
be returned home at the review hearing unless the court finds that a reason for
removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists. The parents, guardian,
or legal custodian shall report to the court the efforts they have made to
correct the conditions which led to removal. If a child is returned, casework
supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at which time there
shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.

(b) If the child is not
returned home, the court shall establish in writing:

(i) Whether reasonable
services have been provided to or offered to the parties to facilitate reunion,
specifying the services provided or offered;

(ii) Whether the child
has been placed in the least-restrictive setting appropriate to the child's
needs, including whether consideration and preference has been given to
placement with the child's relatives;

(iii) Whether there is
a continuing need for placement and whether the placement is appropriate;

(iv) Whether there has
been compliance with the case plan by the child, the child's parents, and the
agency supervising the placement;

(v) Whether progress
has been made toward correcting the problems that necessitated the child's
placement in out-of-home care;

(vi) Whether the
parents have visited the child and any reasons why visitation has not occurred
or has been infrequent;

(vii) Whether
additional services, including housing assistance, are needed to facilitate the
return of the child to the child's parents; if so, the court shall order that
reasonable services be offered specifying such services; and

(viii) The projected
date by which the child will be returned home or other permanent plan of care
will be implemented.

(c) The court at the
review hearing may order that a petition seeking termination of the parent and
child relationship be filed.

(2) The court's ability
to order housing assistance under RCW 13.34.130 and this section is: (a)
Limited to cases in which homelessness or the lack of adequate and safe housing
is the primary reason for an out-of-home placement; and (b) subject to the
availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

(1) All field offices
and the administrative office of the children's administration in the
department of social and health services shall be fully accredited by the
council on accreditation for children and family services. The cost of
accreditation shall be accomplished within existing agency resources. The
department shall phase in accreditation at a rate of no less than one field
office per year, achieving complete agency accreditation by January 30, 2008.

(2) By January 30,
2008, all private child-placing agencies shall be fully accredited by the
council on accreditation for children and family services prior to contracting
with the department for services to families and children.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall,
within existing resources, provide to parents requesting a multidisciplinary
team, family group conference, prognostic staffing, or case planning
conference, information that describes these processes prior to the processes
being undertaken.

Sec. 8. RCW 13.34.110 and 2000 c
122 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court
shall hold a fact-finding hearing on the petition and, unless the court
dismisses the petition, shall make written findings of fact, stating the
reasons therefor. The rules of evidence shall apply at the fact‑finding
hearing and the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child shall have
all of the rights provided in RCW 13.34.090(1). The petitioner shall have the
burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is
dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030.

(2)(a) The parent,
guardian, or legal custodian of the child may waive his or her right to a fact‑finding
hearing by stipulating or agreeing to the entry of an order of dependency
establishing that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030.
The parent, guardian, or legal custodian may also stipulate or agree to an
order of disposition pursuant to RCW 13.34.130 at the same time. Any
stipulated or agreed order of dependency or disposition must be signed by the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian and his or her attorney, unless the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian has waived his or her right to an attorney
in open court, and by the petitioner and the attorney, guardian ad litem, or
court‑appointed special advocate for the child, if any. If the
department of social and health services is not the petitioner and is required
by the order to supervise the placement of the child or provide services to any
party, the department must also agree to and sign the order.

(b) Entry of any
stipulated or agreed order of dependency or disposition is subject to approval
by the court. The court shall receive and review a social study before
entering a stipulated or agreed order and shall consider whether the order is
consistent with the allegations of the dependency petition and the problems
that necessitated the child's placement in out‑of‑home care. No
social file or social study may be considered by the court in connection with
the fact‑finding hearing or prior to factual determination, except as
otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence.

(c) Prior to the
entry of any stipulated or agreed order of dependency, the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian of the child and his or her attorney must appear before the
court and the court must inquire and establish on the record that:

(i) The parent,
guardian, or legal custodian understands the terms of the order or orders he or
she has signed, including his or her responsibility to participate in remedial
services as provided in any disposition order;

(ii) The parent,
guardian, or legal custodian understands that entry of the order starts a
process that could result in the filing of a petition to terminate his or her
relationship with the child within the time frames required by state and
federal law if he or she fails to comply with the terms of the dependency or
disposition orders or fails to substantially remedy the problems that
necessitated the child's placement in out‑of‑home care;

(iii) The parent,
guardian, or legal custodian understands that the entry of the stipulated or
agreed order of dependency is an admission that the child is dependent within
the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 and shall have the same legal effect as a finding
by the court that the child is dependent by at least a preponderance of the
evidence, and that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall not have the
right in any subsequent proceeding for termination of parental rights or
dependency guardianship pursuant to this chapter or nonparental custody
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW to challenge or dispute the fact that the child
was found to be dependent; and

(iv) The parent,
guardian, or legal custodian knowingly and willingly stipulated and agreed to
and signed the order or orders, without duress, and without misrepresentation
or fraud by any other party.

If a parent,
guardian, or legal custodian fails to appear before the court after stipulating
or agreeing to entry of an order of dependency, the court may enter the order
upon a finding that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian had actual notice
of the right to appear before the court and chose not to do so. The court may
require other parties to the order, including the attorney for the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, to appear and advise the court of the parent's,
guardian's, or legal custodian's notice of the right to appear and
understanding of the factors specified in this subsection.

(3) Immediately
after the entry of the findings of fact, the court shall hold a disposition hearing,
unless there is good cause for continuing the matter for up to fourteen days.
If good cause is shown, the case may be continued for longer than fourteen
days. Notice of the time and place of the continued hearing may be given in
open court. If notice in open court is not given to a party, that party shall
be notified by certified mail of the time and place of any continued hearing.
Unless there is reasonable cause to believe the health, safety, or welfare of
the child would be jeopardized or efforts to reunite the parent and child would
be hindered, the court shall direct the department to notify those adult
persons who: (((1))) (a) Are related by blood or marriage to the
child in the following degrees: Parent, grandparent, brother, sister, stepparent,
stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, or aunt; (((2))) (b) are known to
the department as having been in contact with the family or child within the
past twelve months; and (((3))) (c) would be an appropriate
placement for the child. Reasonable cause to dispense with notification to a
parent under this section must be proved by clear, cogent, and convincing
evidence.

The parties need not
appear at the ((fact-finding or dispositional)) disposition
hearing if the parties, their attorneys, the guardian ad litem, and
court-appointed special advocates, if any, are all in agreement. ((The
court shall receive and review a social study before entering an order based on
agreement. No social file or social study may be considered by the court in
connection with the fact-finding hearing or prior to factual determination,
except as otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act shall be known
as the Zy'Nyia Nobles accountability act.

---
END ---