BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A fatality review team
was convened following the tragic death of Zynia Nobles, a young girl who
suffered lethal physical and emotional abuse. One of the recommendations of
the review team was that caseworkers needed assistance to deal with the
burdensome clerical requirements generated by their casework. Further,
findings indicated a need for improvements in standards for delivery of services,
which can be evaluated through accreditation based upon national standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is created in
the department a standard of clerical support for social workers in the
children's administration. This standard shall ensure that every two social
workers have at least one clerical support person assigned to them. Employees
who are appointed to fill these positions shall have: (a) An employment
history that demonstrates the ability and experience in providing clerical
support to social workers who do both child protective services investigation
and child welfare services, including child sex abuse cases; (b) a demonstrated
commitment to professional improvement and advancement; and (c) the capacity to
successfully provide support and mentoring to coworkers.

(2) There is created in
the department a standard of paralegal support for supervisors in the
children's administration. This standard shall ensure that every supervisor
has at least one paralegal assigned to him or her. Employees who are appointed
to fill these positions shall have: (a) An employment history that
demonstrates the ability and experience in providing paralegal support to
supervisors who supervise social workers that do both child protective services
investigation and child welfare services, including child sex abuse cases; (b)
a demonstrated commitment to professional improvement and advancement; and (c)
the capacity to successfully provide support and mentoring to coworkers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act shall be known
and cited as the Zynia Nobles caseload reduction act.

---
END ---