BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, the department shall provide services as
follows:

(1) For minors who
request chemical dependency treatment, according to the needs indicated by the
minor's chemical dependency assessment. Determination of appropriate chemical
dependency treatment or placement shall consider the minor's chemical
dependency treatment needs in light of any existing co-occurring disorders;

(2) Involuntary
treatment;

(3) To meet federal
program requirements; and

(4) Within available
funds, to meet the other duties of the department as defined in this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.96A.010 and 1989
c 271 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of
this state that ((alcoholics and intoxicated)) chemically dependent
persons may not be subjected to criminal prosecution solely because of their
consumption of ((alcoholic beverages)) alcohol or other psychoactive
chemicals but rather should, within available funds, be afforded a
continuum of treatment, as prescribed in this chapter, in order that
they may lead normal lives as productive members of society. ((Within
available funds,)) Medically necessary treatment ((should also))
shall be provided ((for drug addicts)) to minors upon request.

Sec. 3. 1991 c 364 s 7
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the use of alcohol and illicit drugs continues to be a primary crippler of
our youth. This translates into incredible costs to individuals, families, and
society in terms of traffic fatalities, suicides, criminal activity including
homicides, sexual promiscuity, familial incorrigibility, and conduct disorders,
and educational fallout. Among children of all socioeconomic groups lower
expectations for the future, low motivation and self-esteem, alienation, and
depression are associated with alcohol and drug abuse.

Studies reveal that
deaths from alcohol and other drug-related injuries rise sharply through
adolescence, peaking in the early twenties. But second peak occurs in later
life, where it accounts for three times as many deaths from chronic diseases.
A young victim's life expectancy is likely to be reduced by an average of
twenty-six years.

Yet the cost of
treating alcohol and drug addicts can be recouped in the first three years of
abstinence in health care savings alone. Public money spent on treatment saves
not only the life of the chemical abuser, it makes us safer as individuals, and
in the long-run costs less.

The legislature further
finds that many children who abuse alcohol ((and)) or other ((drugs))
psychoactive chemicals may not require involuntary treatment, but still
are not adequately served. These children remain at risk for future chemical
dependency, and may become mentally ill or a juvenile offender or need
out-of-home placement. Children placed at risk because of ((chemical))
abuse of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals may be better served by
the creation of a comprehensive integrated system for children in crisis.

The legislature
declares that an emphasis on the treatment of youth will pay the largest
dividend in terms of preventable costs to individuals themselves, their
families, and to society. The provision of augmented involuntary alcohol
treatment services to youths, as well as involuntary treatment for youths
addicted by other ((drugs)) psychoactive chemicals, is in the
interest of the public health and safety.

Sec. 4. 1991 c 364 s 13
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The purpose of sections
7 through 12 ((of this act)), chapter 364, Laws of 1991 is solely
to provide authority for the involuntary commitment of minors addicted by drugs
within ((available funds and)) current programs and facilities. Nothing
in sections 7 through 12 ((of this act)), chapter 364, Laws of 1991
shall be construed to ((require the addition of new facilities nor))
affect the department's authority for the uses of existing programs and
facilities authorized by law. Nothing in sections 7 through 12 ((of this
act)), chapter 364, Laws of 1991 shall prevent a parent or guardian
from requesting the involuntary commitment of a minor through a county
designated chemical dependency specialist on an ability to pay basis.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.96A.095 and 1998
c 296 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person thirteen
years of age or older may give consent for himself or herself to the furnishing
of ((outpatient)) treatment by a chemical dependency treatment program
certified by the department. Parental authorization is required for any
treatment of a minor under the age of thirteen.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.96A.140 and 1995
c 312 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated
chemical dependency specialist receives information alleging that a person is
incapacitated as a result of chemical dependency, the designated chemical
dependency specialist, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts
alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the information, may file a
petition for commitment of such person with the superior court or district
court.

If a petition for
commitment is not filed in the case of a minor, the parent, guardian, or custodian
who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by the
designated chemical dependency specialist in superior or district court. The
parent, guardian, or custodian shall file notice with the court and provide a
copy of the designated chemical dependency specialist's report.

If the designated
chemical dependency specialist finds that the initial needs of such person
would be better served by placement within the mental health system, the person
shall be referred to an evaluation and treatment facility as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or 71.34.020. ((If placement in a chemical dependency program is
available and deemed appropriate,)) The petition shall allege that:
The person is chemically dependent and is incapacitated by alcohol or drug addiction,
or that the person has twice before in the preceding twelve months been
admitted for detoxification or chemical dependency treatment pursuant to RCW
70.96A.110, and is in need of a more sustained treatment program, or that the
person is chemically dependent and has threatened, attempted, or inflicted
physical harm on another and is likely to inflict physical harm on another
unless committed. A refusal to undergo treatment, by itself, does not
constitute evidence of lack of judgment as to the need for treatment. The
petition shall be accompanied by a certificate of a licensed physician who has
examined the person within five days before submission of the petition, unless
the person whose commitment is sought has refused to submit to a medical examination,
in which case the fact of refusal shall be alleged in the petition. The
certificate shall set forth the licensed physician's findings in support of the
allegations of the petition. A physician employed by the petitioning program
or the department is eligible to be the certifying physician.

(2) Upon filing the
petition, the court shall fix a date for a hearing no less than two and no more
than seven days after the date the petition was filed unless the person
petitioned against is presently being detained in a program, pursuant to RCW
70.96A.120, 71.05.210, or 71.34.050, in which case the hearing shall be held
within seventy-two hours of the filing of the petition: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the above specified seventy-two hours shall be computed by excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, the court may, upon
motion of the person whose commitment is sought, or upon motion of petitioner
with written permission of the person whose commitment is sought, or his or her
counsel and, upon good cause shown, extend the date for the hearing. A copy of
the petition and of the notice of the hearing, including the date fixed by the
court, shall be served by the designated chemical dependency specialist on the
person whose commitment is sought, his or her next of kin, a parent or his or
her legal guardian if he or she is a minor, and any other person the court
believes advisable. A copy of the petition and certificate shall be delivered
to each person notified.

(3) At the hearing the court
shall hear all relevant testimony, including, if possible, the testimony, which
may be telephonic, of at least one licensed physician who has examined the
person whose commitment is sought. Communications otherwise deemed privileged
under the laws of this state are deemed to be waived in proceedings under this
chapter when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines
that the waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the
public. The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or
testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a
proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person, or on its
own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a
petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.

The record maker shall
not be required to testify in order to introduce medical, nursing, or
psychological records of detained persons so long as the requirements of RCW
5.45.020 are met, except that portions of the record that contain opinions as
to whether the detained person is chemically dependent shall be deleted from
the records unless the person offering the opinions is available for
cross-examination. The person shall be present unless the court believes that
his or her presence is likely to be injurious to him or her; in this event the
court may deem it appropriate to appoint a guardian ad litem to represent him
or her throughout the proceeding. If deemed advisable, the court may examine
the person out of courtroom. If the person has refused to be examined by a
licensed physician, he or she shall be given an opportunity to be examined by a
court appointed licensed physician. If he or she refuses and there is
sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations of the petition are true,
or if the court believes that more medical evidence is necessary, the court may
make a temporary order committing him or her to the department for a period of
not more than five days for purposes of a diagnostic examination.

(4) If after hearing
all relevant evidence, including the results of any diagnostic examination, the
court finds that grounds for involuntary commitment have been established by
clear, cogent, and convincing proof, it shall make an order of commitment to an
approved treatment program. ((It shall not order commitment of a person
unless it determines that an approved treatment program is available and able
to provide adequate and appropriate treatment for him or her.))

(5) A person committed
under this section shall remain in the program for treatment for a period of
sixty days unless sooner discharged. At the end of the sixty-day period, he or
she shall be discharged automatically unless the program, before expiration of
the period, files a petition for his or her recommitment upon the grounds set
forth in subsection (1) of this section for a further period of ninety days
unless sooner discharged.

If a petition for
recommitment is not filed in the case of a minor, the parent, guardian, or
custodian who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by
the designated chemical dependency specialist in superior or district court.
The parent, guardian, or custodian shall file notice with the court and provide
a copy of the treatment progress report.

If a person has been
committed because he or she is chemically dependent and likely to inflict
physical harm on another, the program shall apply for recommitment if after
examination it is determined that the likelihood still exists.

(6) Upon the filing of
a petition for recommitment under subsection (5) of this section, the court
shall fix a date for hearing no less than two and no more than seven days after
the date the petition was filed: PROVIDED, That, the court may, upon motion of
the person whose commitment is sought and upon good cause shown, extend the
date for the hearing. A copy of the petition and of the notice of hearing,
including the date fixed by the court, shall be served by the treatment program
on the person whose commitment is sought, his or her next of kin, the original
petitioner under subsection (1) of this section if different from the
petitioner for recommitment, one of his or her parents or his or her legal
guardian if he or she is a minor, and his or her attorney and any other person
the court believes advisable. At the hearing the court shall proceed as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(7) The approved
treatment program shall provide for adequate and appropriate treatment of a person
committed to its custody. A person committed under this section may be
transferred from one approved public treatment program to another if transfer
is medically advisable.

(8) A person committed
to the custody of a program for treatment shall be discharged at any time
before the end of the period for which he or she has been committed and he or
she shall be discharged by order of the court if either of the following
conditions are met:

(a) In case of a
chemically dependent person committed on the grounds of likelihood of
infliction of physical harm upon himself, herself, or another, the likelihood
no longer exists; or further treatment will not be likely to bring about
significant improvement in the person's condition, or treatment is no longer adequate
or appropriate.

(b) In case of a
chemically dependent person committed on the grounds of the need of treatment
and incapacity, that the incapacity no longer exists.

(9) The court shall
inform the person whose commitment or recommitment is sought of his or her
right to contest the application, be represented by counsel at every stage of
any proceedings relating to his or her commitment and recommitment, and have
counsel appointed by the court or provided by the court, if he or she wants the
assistance of counsel and is unable to obtain counsel. If the court believes
that the person needs the assistance of counsel, the court shall require, by
appointment if necessary, counsel for him or her regardless of his or her
wishes. The person shall, if he or she is financially able, bear the costs of
such legal service; otherwise such legal service shall be at public expense.
The person whose commitment or recommitment is sought shall be informed of his
or her right to be examined by a licensed physician of his or her choice. If
the person is unable to obtain a licensed physician and requests examination by
a physician, the court shall employ a licensed physician.

(10) A person committed
under this chapter may at any time seek to be discharged from commitment by
writ of habeas corpus in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(11) The venue for
proceedings under this section is the county in which person to be committed
resides or is present.

(12) When in the
opinion of the professional person in charge of the program providing
involuntary treatment under this chapter, the committed patient can be
appropriately served by less restrictive treatment before expiration of the
period of commitment, then the less restrictive care may be required as a
condition for early release for a period which, when added to the initial
treatment period, does not exceed the period of commitment. If the program
designated to provide the less restrictive treatment is other than the program
providing the initial involuntary treatment, the program so designated must
agree in writing to assume such responsibility. A copy of the conditions for
early release shall be given to the patient, the designated chemical dependency
specialist of original commitment, and the court of original commitment. The
program designated to provide less restrictive care may modify the conditions
for continued release when the modifications are in the best interests of the
patient. If the program providing less restrictive care and the designated
chemical dependency specialist determine that a conditionally released patient
is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her release, or that
substantial deterioration in the patient's functioning has occurred, then the
designated chemical dependency specialist shall notify the court of original
commitment and request a hearing to be held no less than two and no more than
seven days after the date of the request to determine whether or not the person
should be returned to more restrictive care. The designated chemical
dependency specialist shall file a petition with the court stating the facts
substantiating the need for the hearing along with the treatment
recommendations. The patient shall have the same rights with respect to
notice, hearing, and counsel as for the original involuntary treatment
proceedings. The issues to be determined at the hearing are whether the
conditionally released patient did or did not adhere to the terms and
conditions of his or her release to less restrictive care or that substantial
deterioration of the patient's functioning has occurred and whether the
conditions of release should be modified or the person should be returned to a
more restrictive program. The hearing may be waived by the patient and his or
her counsel and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, but may not be
waived unless all such persons agree to the waiver. Upon waiver, the person
may be returned for involuntary treatment or continued on conditional release
on the same or modified conditions.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.96A.145 and 1993
c 137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The prosecuting
attorney of the county in which such action is taken ((may, at the
discretion of the prosecuting attorney,)) shall represent the
designated chemical dependency specialist or treatment program in judicial
proceedings under RCW 70.96A.140 for the involuntary commitment or recommitment
of an individual, including any judicial proceeding where the individual sought
to be committed or recommitted challenges the action. Within the discretion
of the secretary, the department may reimburse the prosecuting attorney for
costs of representation incurred under this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 70.96A.235 and 1998
c 296 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

Parental consent is not
required for inpatient chemical dependency treatment of a minor over the age
of thirteen, ((unless)) or when the child meets the
definition of a child in need of services in RCW 13.32A.030(((4)(c))) (5)(c)
as determined by the department: PROVIDED, That parental consent is required
for any treatment of a minor under the age of thirteen.

This section does not
apply to petitions filed under this chapter.

Sec. 9. RCW 70.96A.240 and 1998
c 296 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The parent of a
minor is not liable for payment of inpatient or outpatient chemical dependency
treatment unless the parent has joined in the consent to the treatment.

(2) The ability of a
parent to apply to a certified treatment program for the admission of his or
her minor child does not create a right to obtain or benefit from any funds or
resources of the state. However, the state ((may)) shall provide
appropriate services for indigent minors ((to the extent that funds
are available therefor)).

Sec. 10. RCW 70.96A.905 and 1992
c 205 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
ensure that the provisions of this chapter are applied by the counties in a
consistent and uniform manner. The department shall also ensure that((, to
the extent possible within available funds,)) the county-designated
chemical dependency specialists are specifically trained in adolescent chemical
dependency issues, the chemical dependency commitment laws, and the criteria
for commitment.

Sec. 11. RCW 70.96A.915 and 1989
c 271 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department is authorized to allocate appropriated funds in the manner that it
determines best meets the purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to entitle any ((individual)) adult to
services authorized in this chapter, or to require the department or its
contractors to reallocate funds in order to ensure that services are available
to any eligible ((person)) adult upon demand.

---
END ---