BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.83E RCW to be codified between RCW 70.83E.010 and 70.83E.020 to
read as follows:

In an effort to reduce
the harmful effects of drug-affected infants:

(1) A woman's primary
health care provider shall screen a pregnant or lactating woman for
nonprescription use of controlled substances. Screening criteria may include,
but is not limited to, the criteria developed by the department of health
pursuant to chapter 70.83E RCW.

(2) Health care
providers shall:

(a) Screen pregnant
women for nonprescription use of controlled substances if they seek medical
attention at the time of delivery and indicate that they have received little
or no prenatal health care. Screening criteria may include, but is not limited
to, the criteria developed by the department of health pursuant to chapter
70.83E RCW; and

(b) Convey to the
infant's primary health care provider screening findings that would suggest the
need for testing of the infant, or conduct the testing.

(3) This section does
not apply to drug-affected infants born before the effective date of this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.83E.020 and 1998
c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of health, in consultation with appropriate medical professionals,
shall develop screening criteria for use in identifying pregnant or lactating
women addicted to drugs or alcohol who are at risk of producing a drug-affected
((baby)) infant. The department shall also develop training
protocols for medical professionals related to the identification and screening
of women at risk of producing a drug-affected ((baby)) infant.

---
END ---