BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.96A.400 and 1995
c 321 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The state of Washington
declares that there is no fundamental right to opiate substitution treatment.
The state of Washington further declares that while ((methadone and other
like pharmacological)) opiate substitution drugs((,)) used in
the treatment of opiate dependency are addictive substances, that they
nevertheless have several legal, important, and justified uses and that one of
their appropriate and legal uses is, in conjunction with other required
therapeutic procedures, in the treatment of persons addicted to or habituated
to opioids.

Because ((methadone
and other like pharmacological)) opiate substitution drugs, used in
the treatment of opiate dependency are addictive and are listed as a schedule
II controlled substance in chapter 69.50 RCW, the state of Washington ((and
authorizing counties on behalf of their citizens have)) has the
legal obligation and right to regulate the use of opiate substitution
treatment. The state of Washington declares its authority to control and
regulate carefully, in ((cooperation)) consultation with ((the
authorizing)) counties and cities, all clinical uses of ((methadone
and other pharmacological)) opiate substitution drugs used in the
treatment of opiate addiction.

Further, the state
declares that the primary goal of opiate substitution treatment is total
abstinence from chemical dependency for the individuals who participate in the
treatment program. The state recognizes that a small percentage of persons who
participate in opiate ((substitute [substitution])) substitution
treatment programs require treatment for an extended period of time. Opiate
substitution treatment programs shall provide a comprehensive transition
program to eliminate chemical dependency((;)), including opiate
and opiate substitute addiction of program participants.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.96A.410 and 1995
c 321 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((A county
legislative authority may prohibit opiate substitution treatment in that
county. The department shall not certify an opiate substitution treatment
program in a county where the county legislative authority has prohibited
opiate substitution treatment. If a county legislative authority authorizes
opiate substitution treatment programs, it shall limit by ordinance the number
of opiate substitution treatment programs operating in that county by limiting
the number of licenses granted in that county. If a county has authorized
opiate substitution treatment programs in that county, it shall only license
opiate substitution treatment programs that comply with the department's
operating and treatment standards under this section and RCW 70.96A.420. A
county that authorizes opiate substitution treatment may operate the programs
directly or through a local health department or health district or it may
authorize certified opiate substitution treatment programs that the county
licenses to provide the services within the county. Counties shall monitor
opiate substitution treatment programs for compliance with the department's
operating and treatment regulations under this section and RCW 70.96A.420.

(2) A county that
authorizes opiate substitution treatment programs shall develop and enact by
ordinance licensing standards, consistent with this chapter and the operating
and treatment standards adopted under this chapter, that govern the application
for, issuance of, renewal of, and revocation of the licenses. Certified programs
existing before May 18, 1987, applying for renewal of licensure in subsequent
years, that maintain certification and meet all other requirements for
licensure, shall be given preference.

(3) In certifying
programs, the department shall not discriminate against an opiate substitution
treatment program on the basis of its corporate structure. In licensing
programs, the county shall not discriminate against an opiate substitution
treatment program on the basis of its corporate structure.

(4))) For purposes of this section,
"area" means the county in which an applicant proposes to locate a
certified program and counties adjacent, or near to, the county in which the
program is proposed to be located.

When making a
decision on an application for certification of a program, the department
shall:

(a) Consult with the
county legislative authorities in the area in which an applicant proposes to
locate a program and the city legislative authority in any city in which an
applicant proposes to locate a program;

(b) Certify only
programs that will be sited in accordance with the appropriate county or city
land use ordinances;

(c) Not discriminate
in its certification decision on the basis of the corporate structure of the
applicant;

(d) Consider the
size of the population in need of treatment in the area in which the program
would be located and certify only applicants whose programs meet the necessary
treatment needs of that population;

(e) Consider the
availability of other certified programs near the area in which the applicant
proposes to locate the program;

(f) Consider the
transportation systems that would provide service to the program and whether
the systems will provide reasonable opportunities to access the program for
persons in need of treatment;

(g) Consider whether
the applicant has, or has demonstrated in the past, the capability to provide
the appropriate services to assist the persons who utilize the program in
meeting goals established by the legislature, including abstinence from opiates
and opiate substitutes, obtaining mental health treatment, improving economic
independence, and reducing adverse consequences associated with illegal use of
controlled substances. The department shall prioritize certification to
applicants who have demonstrated such capability;

(h) Hold at least
one public hearing in the county in which the facility is proposed to be
located and one hearing in the area in which the facility is proposed to be
located. The hearing shall be held at a time and location that are most likely
to permit the largest number of interested persons to attend and present
testimony. The department shall notify all appropriate media outlets of the
time, date, and location of the hearing at least three weeks in advance of the
hearing.

(2) A program
applying for certification from the department and a program applying for a
contract from a state agency that has been denied the certification or contract
shall be provided with a written notice specifying the rationale and reasons
for the denial. ((A program applying for a license or a contract from a
county that has been denied the license or contract shall be provided with a
written notice specifying the rationale and reasons for the denial.

(5) A license is
effective for one calendar year from the date of issuance. The license shall
be renewed in accordance with the provisions of this section for initial
approval; the goals for treatment programs under RCW 70.96A.400; the standards
set forth in RCW 70.96A.420; and the rules adopted by the secretary.

(6))) (3) For the purpose of this chapter,
opiate substitution treatment means:

(a) Dispensing
an opiate substitution drug approved by the federal drug administration for the
treatment of opiate addiction; and

(b) Providing a
comprehensive range of medical and rehabilitative services.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.96A.420 and 1998
c 245 s 135 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, in
consultation with opiate substitution treatment service providers and counties
((authorizing opiate substitution treatment programs)) and cities,
shall establish statewide treatment standards for certified opiate
substitution treatment programs. The department ((and counties that
authorize opiate substitution treatment programs)) shall enforce these
treatment standards. The treatment standards shall include, but not be limited
to, reasonable provisions for all appropriate and necessary medical procedures,
counseling requirements, urinalysis, and other suitable tests as needed to
ensure compliance with this chapter. ((A opiate substitution treatment
program shall not have a caseload in excess of three hundred fifty persons.))

(2) The department, in
consultation with opiate substitution treatment programs and counties ((authorizing
opiate substitution treatment programs)), shall establish statewide
operating standards for certified opiate substitution treatment
programs. The department ((and counties that authorize opiate substitution
treatment programs)) shall enforce these operating standards. The
operating standards shall include, but not be limited to, reasonable provisions
necessary to enable the department and ((authorizing)) counties to
monitor certified and licensed opiate substitution treatment programs for
compliance with this chapter and the treatment standards authorized by this
chapter and to minimize the impact of the opiate substitution treatment
programs upon the business and residential neighborhoods in which the program
is located.

(3) The department
shall establish criteria for evaluating the compliance of opiate substitution
treatment programs with the goals and standards established under this
chapter. As a condition of certification, opiate substitution programs shall
submit an annual report to the department and county legislative authority,
including data as specified by the department necessary for outcome analysis.
The department shall analyze and evaluate the data submitted by each treatment
program and take corrective action where necessary to ensure compliance with
the goals and standards enumerated under this chapter.

(4)
Before January 1st of each year, the secretary shall submit a report to the
legislature and governor. The report shall include the number of persons
enrolled in each treatment program during the period covered by the report, the
number of persons who leave each treatment program voluntarily and
involuntarily, and an outcome analysis of each treatment program. For purposes
of this subsection, "outcome analysis" shall include but not be
limited to: The number of people who, as a result of participation in the
program, are able to abstain from opiates; reduction in use of opiates; reduction
in criminal conduct; achievement of economic independence; and reduction in
utilization of health care. The report shall include information on an annual
and cumulative basis beginning on the effective date of this section.

---
END ---