BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, the department shall provide services as
follows:

(1) For persons whose
income is less than two hundred percent of the federal poverty level and for
minors who request chemical dependency treatment, according to the needs
indicated by the person's chemical dependency assessment. Determination of
appropriate chemical dependency treatment or placement shall consider the
person's chemical dependency treatment needs in light of any existing
co-occurring disorders;

(2) Involuntary
treatment;

(3) To meet federal
program requirements; and

(4) Within available
funds, to meet the other duties of the department as defined in this chapter
and in chapter 74.50 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.96A.010 and 1989
c 271 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of
this state that ((alcoholics and intoxicated)) chemically dependent
persons may not be subjected to criminal prosecution solely because of their
consumption of ((alcoholic beverages)) alcohol or other psychoactive
chemicals but rather should((, within available funds,)) be afforded
a continuum of treatment, as prescribed in this chapter, in order that
they may lead normal lives as productive members of society. ((Within
available funds, treatment should also be provided for drug addicts.))

Sec. 3. RCW 70.96A.020 and 1998
c 296 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Alcoholic" means a person who suffers from the disease of
alcoholism.

(2)
"Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on
alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use,
symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if
use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of
social or economic functioning.

(3) "Approved
treatment program" means a discrete program of chemical dependency
treatment provided by a treatment program certified by the department of social
and health services as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.

(4) "Chemical
dependency" means:

(a) Alcoholism
((or)); (b) drug addiction((,)); or (c)
dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the
context requires.

(5) "Chemical
dependency program" means expenditures and activities of the department
designed and conducted to prevent or treat alcoholism and other drug addiction,
including reasonable administration and overhead.

(6)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(7) "Designated
chemical dependency specialist" or "specialist" means a
person designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment duties
described in RCW 70.96A.140 and qualified to do so by meeting standards adopted
by the department.

(8) "Director"
means the person administering the chemical dependency program within the
department.

(9) "Drug
addict" means a person who suffers from the disease of drug addiction.

(10) "Drug
addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive
chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms
of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is
reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or
economic functioning.

(11) "Emergency
service patrol" means a patrol established under RCW 70.96A.170.

(12) "Gravely
disabled by alcohol or other ((drugs)) psychoactive chemicals"
or "gravely disabled" means that a person, as a result of the
use of alcohol or other ((drugs)) psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is
in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his
or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe
deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by a repeated and escalating
loss of cognition or volitional control over his or her actions and is not
receiving care as essential for his or her health or safety.

(13) "History
of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior
to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but
not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, or a long-term
alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement.

(14)
"Incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals" means that
a person, as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, ((has
his or her judgment so impaired that he or she is incapable of realizing and
making a rational decision with respect to his or her need for treatment and))
is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself
or herself, to any other person, or to property.

(((14))) (15)
"Incompetent person" means a person who has been adjudged incompetent
by the superior court.

(((15))) (16)
"Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical
functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or
other psychoactive chemicals.

(((16))) (17)
"Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or
osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(((17))) (18)
"Likelihood of serious harm" means ((either)):

(a) A substantial risk
that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or
her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or
inflict physical harm on one's self; (((b) a substantial risk that)) (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as evidenced by
behavior that has caused the harm or that places another person or persons in
reasonable fear of sustaining the harm; or (((c) a substantial risk that))
(iii) physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property
of others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss or damage
to the property of others; or

(b) The individual
has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more
violent acts.

(((18))) (19)
"Medical necessity" for inpatient care of a minor means a requested
certified inpatient service that is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose,
arrest, or alleviate a chemical dependency; or (b) prevent the worsening of
chemical dependency conditions that endanger life or cause suffering and pain, or
result in illness or infirmity or threaten to cause or aggravate a handicap, or
cause physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less
restrictive alternative available.

(((19))) (20)
"Minor" means a person less than eighteen years of age.

(((20))) (21)
"Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right to
custody of the child. Parent includes custodian or guardian.

(((21))) (22)
"Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency
or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer
powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.

(((22))) (23)
"Person" means an individual, including a minor.

(((23))) (24)
"Professional person in charge" or "professional person"
means a physician or chemical dependency counselor as defined in rule by the
department, who is empowered by a certified treatment program with authority to
make assessment, admission, continuing care, and discharge decisions on behalf
of the certified program.

(((24))) (25)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(((25))) (26)
"Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, detoxification,
residential, and outpatient services and care, including diagnostic evaluation,
chemical dependency education and counseling, medical, psychiatric,
psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation and career
counseling, which may be extended to alcoholics and other drug addicts and
their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive
chemicals, and intoxicated persons.

(((26))) (27)
"Treatment program" means an organization, institution, or
corporation, public or private, engaged in the care, treatment, or
rehabilitation of alcoholics or other drug addicts.

(28) "Violent
act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal
injuries, or substantial damage to property.

Sec. 4. 1991 c 364 s 13 (uncodified)
is amended to read as follows:

The purpose of sections
7 through 12 ((of this act)), chapter 364, Laws of 1991 is solely
to provide authority for the involuntary commitment of minors addicted by drugs
within ((available funds and)) current programs and facilities. Nothing
in sections 7 through 12 ((of this act)), chapter 364, Laws of 1991
shall be construed to ((require the addition of new facilities nor))
affect the department's authority for the uses of existing programs and
facilities authorized by law. Nothing in sections 7 through 12 ((of this
act)), chapter 364, Laws of 1991 shall prevent a parent or guardian
from requesting the involuntary commitment of a minor through a county
designated chemical dependency specialist on an ability to pay basis.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.96A.050 and 1989
c 270 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Develop, encourage,
and foster statewide, regional, and local plans and programs for the prevention
of alcoholism and other drug addiction, treatment of alcoholics and other drug
addicts and their families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other
psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons in cooperation with public and
private agencies, organizations, and individuals and provide technical
assistance and consultation services for these purposes;

(2) Coordinate the
efforts and enlist the assistance of all public and private agencies,
organizations, and individuals interested in prevention of alcoholism and drug
addiction, and treatment of alcoholics and other drug addicts and their
families, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and
intoxicated persons;

(3) Cooperate with
public and private agencies in establishing and conducting programs to provide
treatment for alcoholics and other drug addicts and their families, persons
incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated
persons who are clients of the correctional system;

(4) Cooperate with the
superintendent of public instruction, state board of education, schools, police
departments, courts, and other public and private agencies, organizations and
individuals in establishing programs for the prevention of alcoholism and other
drug addiction, treatment of alcoholics or other drug addicts and their
families, persons incapacitated by alcohol ((and)) or other
psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons, and preparing curriculum
materials thereon for use at all levels of school education;

(5) Prepare, publish, evaluate,
and disseminate educational material dealing with the nature and effects of
alcohol and other psychoactive chemicals and the consequences of their use;

(6) Develop and
implement, as an integral part of treatment programs, an educational program
for use in the treatment of alcoholics or other drug addicts, persons
incapacitated by alcohol ((and)) or other psychoactive chemicals,
and intoxicated persons, which program shall include the dissemination of
information concerning the nature and effects of alcohol and other psychoactive
chemicals, the consequences of their use, the principles of recovery, and HIV
and AIDS;

(7) Organize and foster
training programs for persons engaged in treatment of alcoholics or other drug
addicts, persons incapacitated by alcohol ((and)) or other
psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(8) Sponsor and
encourage research into the causes and nature of alcoholism and other drug
addiction, treatment of alcoholics and other drug addicts, persons
incapacitated by alcohol ((and)) or other psychoactive chemicals,
and intoxicated persons, and serve as a clearing house for information relating
to alcoholism or other drug addiction;

(9) Specify uniform
methods for keeping statistical information by public and private agencies,
organizations, and individuals, and collect and make available relevant
statistical information, including number of persons treated, frequency of
admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment;

(10) Advise the
governor in the preparation of a comprehensive plan for treatment of alcoholics
and other drug addicts, persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive
chemicals, and intoxicated persons for inclusion in the state's comprehensive
health plan;

(11) Review all state
health, welfare, and treatment plans to be submitted for federal funding under
federal legislation, and advise the governor on provisions to be included
relating to alcoholism and other drug addiction, persons incapacitated by
alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons;

(12) Assist in the
development of, and cooperate with, programs for alcohol and other psychoactive
chemical education and treatment for employees of state and local governments
and businesses and industries in the state;

(13) Use the support
and assistance of interested persons in the community to encourage alcoholics
and other drug addicts voluntarily to undergo treatment;

(14) Cooperate with
public and private agencies in establishing and conducting programs designed to
deal with the problem of persons operating motor vehicles while intoxicated;

(15) Encourage general
hospitals and other appropriate health facilities to admit without
discrimination alcoholics and other drug addicts, persons incapacitated by
alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and intoxicated persons and to provide
them with adequate and appropriate treatment;

(16) Encourage all
health and disability insurance programs to include alcoholism and other drug
addiction as a covered illness; and

(17) Organize and
sponsor a statewide program to help court personnel, including judges, better
understand the disease of alcoholism and other drug addiction and the uses of
chemical dependency treatment programs.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.96A.120 and 1991
c 290 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An intoxicated
person may come voluntarily to an approved treatment program for treatment. A person
who appears to be intoxicated in a public place and to be in need of help, if
((he or she)) the person consents to the proffered help, may be
assisted to his or her home, an approved treatment program, or other
health facility.

(2) ((Except for a
person who may be apprehended for possible violation of laws not relating to
alcoholism, drug addiction, or intoxication and except for a person who may be
apprehended for possible violation of laws relating to driving or being in
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug and except for a person who may wish to avail himself or herself of
the provisions of RCW 46.20.308, a person who appears to be incapacitated or
gravely disabled by alcohol or other drugs and who is in a public place or who
has threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm on himself, herself, or
another, shall be taken into protective custody by a peace officer or staff
designated by the county and as soon as practicable, but in no event beyond
eight hours brought to an approved treatment program for treatment. If no
approved treatment program is readily available he or she shall be taken to an
emergency medical service customarily used for incapacitated persons. The peace
officer or staff designated by the county, in detaining the person and in
taking him or her to an approved treatment program, is taking him or her into
protective custody and shall make every reasonable effort to protect his or her
health and safety. In taking the person into protective custody, the detaining
peace officer or staff designated by the county may take reasonable steps
including reasonable force if necessary to protect himself or herself or effect
the custody. A taking into protective custody under this section is not an
arrest. No entry or other record shall be made to indicate that the person has
been arrested or charged with a crime.))

(a) A peace officer
or staff designated by the county shall take into protective custody a person
who appears to present a likelihood of serious harm or be gravely disabled by
alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals and who:

(i) Is in a public
place; or

(ii) Has threatened,
attempted, or inflicted physical harm on himself, herself, or another; or

(iii) Is not in a
public place, if directed by the designated chemical dependency specialist
pursuant to (b) of this subsection.

(b) A designated
chemical dependency specialist may take into protective custody, or may cause a
peace officer or staff designated by the county to take into protective
custody, a person who is at imminent risk of harm and appears to present a
likelihood of serious harm or be gravely disabled by alcohol or other
psychoactive chemicals and who is not in a public place.

(c) This subsection
does not apply to a person who:

(i) May be
apprehended for possible violation of laws not relating to chemical dependency
or intoxication;

(ii) May be
apprehended for possible violation of laws relating to driving or being in
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any psychoactive chemical; or

(iii) May wish to
avail himself or herself of the provisions of RCW 46.20.308.

(d) A person taken
into protective custody must be taken to an approved treatment program as soon
as practicable, but in any event within eight hours. If no approved treatment
program is available, the person shall be taken to an emergency medical service
customarily used for incapacitated persons.

(e) In taking a
person into protective custody, the detaining police officer or staff
designated by the county shall make every reasonable effort to protect the
person's health and safety and may take reasonable steps, including reasonable
force, if necessary, to protect himself or herself or to effect the custody.

(f) Taking a person
into protective custody under this subsection is not an arrest. No entry or
other record shall be made to indicate that the person has been arrested or
charged with a crime.

(3) A person who comes
voluntarily or is brought to an approved treatment program shall be examined by
a qualified person. ((He or she)) The person may then be
admitted as a patient or referred to another health facility, which provides
emergency medical treatment, where it appears that such treatment may be
necessary. The referring approved treatment program shall arrange for ((his
or her)) the person's transportation.

(4) A person who is
found to ((be incapacitated)) present a likelihood of serious harm
or be gravely disabled by alcohol or other ((drugs)) psychoactive
chemicals at the time of ((his or her)) the person's
admission or to have ((become incapacitated)) presented a likelihood
of serious harm or be gravely disabled at any time after his or her
admission, may not be detained at the program for more than seventy-two hours
after admission as a patient, unless a petition is filed under RCW 70.96A.140((,
as now or hereafter amended)): PROVIDED, That the treatment personnel at
an approved treatment program are authorized to use such reasonable physical
restraint as may be necessary to retain ((an incapacitated)) a person
who presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled ((person))
for up to seventy-two hours from the time of admission. The seventy-two hour
periods specified in this section shall be computed by excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays. A person may consent to remain in the program as long
as the physician in charge believes appropriate.

(5) A person who:
(a) Is not admitted to an approved treatment program, (b) is not
referred to another health facility, and (c) has no funds, may be taken
to his or her home((, if any)). If ((he or she)) the person
has no home, the approved treatment program shall provide him or her with
information and assistance to access available community shelter resources.

(6) If a ((patient))
person is admitted to an approved treatment program, ((his or her))
the person's family or next of kin shall be notified as promptly as possible
by the treatment program. If an adult patient who ((is)) does
not ((incapacitated)) present a likelihood of serious harm or is not
gravely disabled requests that there be no notification, his or her request
shall be respected.

(7) The peace officer,
staff designated by the county, or treatment facility personnel, who act in
compliance with this chapter and are performing in the course of their official
duty are not criminally or civilly liable therefor.

(8) If the
person in charge of the approved treatment program determines that appropriate
treatment is available, the patient shall be encouraged to agree to further
diagnosis and appropriate voluntary treatment.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.96A.140 and 1995
c 312 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated
chemical dependency specialist receives information alleging that a person ((is
incapacitated)) presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely
disabled as a result of chemical dependency, the designated chemical
dependency specialist, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts
alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the information, may file a
petition for commitment of such person with the superior court ((or)),
district court, or in another court permitted by court rule.

If a petition for
commitment is not filed in the case of a minor, the parent, guardian, or
custodian who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by
the designated chemical dependency specialist in superior or district court.
The parent, guardian, or custodian shall file notice with the court and provide
a copy of the designated chemical dependency specialist's report.

If the designated
chemical dependency specialist finds that the initial needs of such person
would be better served by placement within the mental health system, the person
shall be referred to either a county designated mental health professional
or an evaluation and treatment facility as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or
71.34.020. ((If placement in a chemical dependency program is available and
deemed appropriate,)) The petition shall allege that: The person is
chemically dependent and ((is incapacitated)) presents a likelihood
of serious harm or is gravely disabled by alcohol or drug addiction, or
that the person has twice before in the preceding twelve months been admitted
for detoxification, sobering services, or chemical dependency treatment
pursuant to RCW 70.96A.110 or 70.96A.120, and is in need of a more sustained
treatment program, or that the person is chemically dependent and has
threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm on another and is likely to
inflict physical harm on another unless committed. A refusal to undergo
treatment, by itself, does not constitute evidence of lack of judgment as to
the need for treatment. The petition shall be accompanied by a certificate of
a licensed physician who has examined the person within five days before
submission of the petition, unless the person whose commitment is sought has
refused to submit to a medical examination, in which case the fact of refusal
shall be alleged in the petition. The certificate shall set forth the licensed
physician's findings in support of the allegations of the petition. A physician
employed by the petitioning program or the department is eligible to be the
certifying physician.

(2) Upon filing the
petition, the court shall fix a date for a hearing no less than two and no more
than seven days after the date the petition was filed unless the person
petitioned against is presently being detained in a program, pursuant to RCW
70.96A.120, 71.05.210, or 71.34.050, in which case the hearing shall be held
within seventy-two hours of the filing of the petition: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
the above specified seventy-two hours shall be computed by excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, the court may, upon motion of
the person whose commitment is sought, or upon motion of petitioner with
written permission of the person whose commitment is sought, or his or her
counsel and, upon good cause shown, extend the date for the hearing. A copy of
the petition and of the notice of the hearing, including the date fixed by the
court, shall be served by the designated chemical dependency specialist on the
person whose commitment is sought, his or her next of kin, a parent or his or
her legal guardian if he or she is a minor, and any other person the court
believes advisable. A copy of the petition and certificate shall be delivered
to each person notified.

(3) At the hearing the
court shall hear all relevant testimony, including, if possible, the testimony,
which may be telephonic, of at least one licensed physician who has examined
the person whose commitment is sought. Communications otherwise deemed
privileged under the laws of this state are deemed to be waived in proceedings
under this chapter when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion
determines that the waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person
or the public. The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to
records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes
of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person, or on
its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a
petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.

The record maker shall
not be required to testify in order to introduce medical, nursing, or
psychological records of detained persons so long as the requirements of RCW
5.45.020 are met, except that portions of the record that contain opinions as
to whether the detained person is chemically dependent shall be deleted from
the records unless the person offering the opinions is available for
cross-examination. The person shall be present unless the court believes that
his or her presence is likely to be injurious to him or her; in this event the
court may deem it appropriate to appoint a guardian ad litem to represent him
or her throughout the proceeding. If deemed advisable, the court may examine
the person out of courtroom. If the person has refused to be examined by a
licensed physician, he or she shall be given an opportunity to be examined by a
court appointed licensed physician. If he or she refuses and there is
sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations of the petition are true,
or if the court believes that more medical evidence is necessary, the court may
make a temporary order committing him or her to the department for a period of
not more than five days for purposes of a diagnostic examination.

(4) If after hearing
all relevant evidence, including the results of any diagnostic examination, the
court finds that grounds for involuntary commitment have been established by
clear, cogent, and convincing proof, it shall make an order of commitment to an
approved treatment program. ((It shall not order commitment of a person
unless it determines that an approved treatment program is available and able
to provide adequate and appropriate treatment for him or her.))

(5) A person committed
under this section shall remain in the program for treatment for a period of
sixty days unless sooner discharged. At the end of the sixty-day period, he or
she shall be discharged automatically unless the program, before expiration of
the period, files a petition for his or her recommitment upon the grounds set
forth in subsection (1) of this section for a further period of ninety days
unless sooner discharged.

If a petition for
recommitment is not filed in the case of a minor, the parent, guardian, or
custodian who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by
the designated chemical dependency specialist in superior or district court.
The parent, guardian, or custodian shall file notice with the court and provide
a copy of the treatment progress report.

If a person has been
committed because he or she is chemically dependent and likely to inflict
physical harm on another, the program shall apply for recommitment if after
examination it is determined that the likelihood still exists.

(6) Upon the filing of
a petition for recommitment under subsection (5) of this section, the court
shall fix a date for hearing no less than two and no more than seven days after
the date the petition was filed: PROVIDED, That, the court may, upon motion of
the person whose commitment is sought and upon good cause shown, extend the
date for the hearing. A copy of the petition and of the notice of hearing,
including the date fixed by the court, shall be served by the treatment program
on the person whose commitment is sought, his or her next of kin, the original
petitioner under subsection (1) of this section if different from the
petitioner for recommitment, one of his or her parents or his or her legal
guardian if he or she is a minor, and his or her attorney and any other person
the court believes advisable. At the hearing the court shall proceed as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(7) The approved
treatment program shall provide for adequate and appropriate treatment of a
person committed to its custody. A person committed under this section may be
transferred from one approved public treatment program to another if transfer
is medically advisable.

(8) A person committed
to the custody of a program for treatment shall be discharged at any time
before the end of the period for which he or she has been committed and he or
she shall be discharged by order of the court if either of the following
conditions are met:

(a) In case of a
chemically dependent person committed on the grounds of likelihood of
infliction of physical harm upon himself, herself, or another, the likelihood
no longer exists; or further treatment will not be likely to bring about
significant improvement in the person's condition, or treatment is no longer
adequate or appropriate.

(b) In case of a
chemically dependent person committed on the grounds of the need of treatment
and incapacity, that the incapacity no longer exists.

(9) The court shall
inform the person whose commitment or recommitment is sought of his or her
right to contest the application, be represented by counsel at every stage of
any proceedings relating to his or her commitment and recommitment, and have
counsel appointed by the court or provided by the court, if he or she wants the
assistance of counsel and is unable to obtain counsel. If the court believes
that the person needs the assistance of counsel, the court shall require, by
appointment if necessary, counsel for him or her regardless of his or her
wishes. The person shall, if he or she is financially able, bear the costs of
such legal service; otherwise such legal service shall be at public expense.
The person whose commitment or recommitment is sought shall be informed of his
or her right to be examined by a licensed physician of his or her choice. If
the person is unable to obtain a licensed physician and requests examination by
a physician, the court shall employ a licensed physician.

(10) A person committed
under this chapter may at any time seek to be discharged from commitment by
writ of habeas corpus in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(11) The venue for
proceedings under this section is the county in which person to be committed
resides or is present.

(12) When in the
opinion of the professional person in charge of the program providing
involuntary treatment under this chapter, the committed patient can be
appropriately served by less restrictive treatment before expiration of the
period of commitment, then the less restrictive care may be required as a
condition for early release for a period which, when added to the initial
treatment period, does not exceed the period of commitment. If the program
designated to provide the less restrictive treatment is other than the program
providing the initial involuntary treatment, the program so designated must
agree in writing to assume such responsibility. A copy of the conditions for
early release shall be given to the patient, the designated chemical dependency
specialist of original commitment, and the court of original commitment. The
program designated to provide less restrictive care may modify the conditions
for continued release when the modifications are in the best interests of the
patient. If the program providing less restrictive care and the designated
chemical dependency specialist determine that a conditionally released patient
is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her release, or that
substantial deterioration in the patient's functioning has occurred, then the
designated chemical dependency specialist shall notify the court of original
commitment and request a hearing to be held no less than two and no more than
seven days after the date of the request to determine whether or not the person
should be returned to more restrictive care. The designated chemical
dependency specialist shall file a petition with the court stating the facts
substantiating the need for the hearing along with the treatment
recommendations. The patient shall have the same rights with respect to
notice, hearing, and counsel as for the original involuntary treatment
proceedings. The issues to be determined at the hearing are whether the
conditionally released patient did or did not adhere to the terms and
conditions of his or her release to less restrictive care or that substantial
deterioration of the patient's functioning has occurred and whether the
conditions of release should be modified or the person should be returned to a
more restrictive program. The hearing may be waived by the patient and his or
her counsel and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, but may not be
waived unless all such persons agree to the waiver. Upon waiver, the person
may be returned for involuntary treatment or continued on conditional release
on the same or modified conditions.

Sec. 8. 1993 c 362 s 2
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The purpose of ((this
act)) chapter 362, Laws of 1993 is solely to provide authority for
the involuntary commitment of persons suffering from chemical dependency within
((available funds and)) current programs and facilities. Nothing in ((this
act)) chapter 362, Laws of 1993 shall be construed to ((require
the addition of new facilities nor)) affect the department of social and
health services' authority for the uses of existing programs and facilities
authorized by law.

Sec. 9. RCW 70.96A.145 and 1993
c 137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The prosecuting
attorney of the county in which such action is taken ((may, at the
discretion of the prosecuting attorney,)) shall represent the
designated chemical dependency specialist or treatment program in judicial
proceedings under RCW 70.96A.140 for the involuntary commitment or recommitment
of an individual, including any judicial proceeding where the individual sought
to be committed or recommitted challenges the action. Within the discretion
of the secretary, the department may reimburse the prosecuting attorney for
costs of representation incurred under this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 70.96A.235 and 1998
c 296 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

Parental consent is
required for inpatient chemical dependency treatment of a minor, unless the
child meets the definition of a child in need of services in RCW 13.32A.030(((4)(c)))
(5)(c) as determined by the department: PROVIDED, That parental consent
is required for any treatment of a minor under the age of thirteen.

If a minor thirteen
years of age or older requests inpatient treatment or an evaluation of the
appropriateness of inpatient treatment from a certified treatment program and
his or her parent refuses to consent, the minor or parent may file a petition
under chapter 13.32A RCW.

This section does not
apply to petitions filed under this chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 70.96A.240 and 1998
c 296 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The parent of a
minor is not liable for payment of inpatient or outpatient chemical dependency
treatment unless the parent has joined in the consent to the treatment.

(2) The ability of a
parent to apply to a certified treatment program for the admission of his or
her minor child does not create a right to obtain or benefit from any funds or
resources of the state. However, the state ((may)) shall provide
appropriate services for indigent minors ((to the extent that funds
are available therefor)).

Sec. 12. RCW 70.96A.430 and 1989
c 271 s 308 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The department shall
not refuse admission for diagnosis, evaluation, guidance or treatment to any
applicant because it is determined that the applicant is financially unable to
contribute fully or in part to the cost of any services or facilities available
under the program on ((alcoholism)) chemical dependency.

The department may
limit admissions ((of such applicants or)), modify its programs
((in order to ensure that expenditures for services or programs do not
exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and are allocated by the
department for such services or programs. The department may)), or
establish admission priorities ((in the event that the number of eligible
applicants exceeds the limits set by the department)) to appropriately
manage its programs.

Sec. 13. RCW 70.96A.905 and 1992
c 205 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
ensure that the provisions of this chapter are applied by the counties in a
consistent and uniform manner. The department shall also ensure that((, to
the extent possible within available funds,)) the county-designated
chemical dependency specialists are specifically trained in adolescent chemical
dependency issues, the chemical dependency commitment laws, and the criteria
for commitment.

Sec. 14. RCW 70.96A.915 and 1989
c 271 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department is authorized to allocate appropriated funds in the manner that it
determines best meets the purposes of this chapter. ((Nothing in this
chapter shall be construed to entitle any individual to services authorized in
this chapter, or to require the department or its contractors to reallocate
funds in order to ensure that services are available to any eligible person
upon demand.))

Sec. 15. RCW 74.50.050 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 18 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish a treatment program to provide((, within available funds,))
alcohol and drug treatment services for indigent persons eligible under this
chapter. The treatment services may include but are not limited to:

(a) Intensive inpatient
treatment services;

(b) Recovery house
treatment;

(c) Outpatient
treatment and counseling, including assistance in obtaining employment, and
including a living allowance while undergoing outpatient treatment. The living
allowance may not be used to provide shelter to clients in a dormitory setting
that does not require sobriety as a condition of residence. The living
allowance shall be administered on the clients' behalf by the outpatient
treatment facility or other social service agency designated by the
department. The department is authorized to pay the facility a fee for administering
this allowance.

(2) ((No individual
may receive treatment services under this section for more than six months in
any two-year period: PROVIDED, That the department may approve additional
treatment and/or living allowance as an exception.

(3))) The department may require an applicant or
recipient selecting treatment to complete inpatient and recovery house
treatment when, in the judgment of a designated assessment center, such
treatment is necessary prior to providing the outpatient program.

Sec. 16. RCW 74.50.060 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 18 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish a shelter assistance program to provide((, within available
funds,)) shelter for persons eligible under this chapter.
"Shelter," "shelter support," or "shelter
assistance" means a facility under contract to the department providing
room and board in a supervised living arrangement, normally in a group or
dormitory setting, to eligible recipients under this chapter. This may include
supervised domiciliary facilities operated under the auspices of public or
private agencies. No facility under contract to the department shall allow the
consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises. The department may contract
with counties and cities for such shelter services. To the extent possible,
the department shall not displace existing emergency shelter beds for use as
shelter under this chapter. In areas of the state in which it is not feasible
to develop shelters, due to low numbers of people needing shelter services, or
in which sufficient numbers of shelter beds are not available, the department
may provide shelter through an intensive protective payee program, unless the
department grants an exception on an individual basis for less intense
supervision.

(2) Persons
continuously eligible for the general assistance‑-unemployable program
since July 25, 1987, who transfer to the program established by this chapter,
have the option to continue their present living situation, but only through a
protective payee.

Sec. 17. RCW 74.50.080 and 1989
1st ex.s. c 18 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department by rule
may establish procedures for the administration of the services provided by
this chapter. Any rules shall be consistent with any conditions or limitations
on appropriations provided for these services. ((If funds provided for any
service under this chapter have been fully expended, the department shall
immediately discontinue that service.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

The county alcoholism
and other drug addiction program coordinator may designate the county
designated mental health professional to perform the detention and commitment
duties described in RCW 70.96A.120 and 70.96A.140.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. RCW 70.96.150 is
decodified.

---
END ---