BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that community safety and health are promoted and tax dollars are saved when
offenders who abuse drugs are provided with effective treatment programs. The
legislature further finds that appropriate substance abuse treatment is
effective, but that adult offenders with substance abuse problems often do not
have access to the treatment needed to help them live healthier, more stable,
and productive lives.

The legislature intends
to increase the capacity of the criminal justice system to provide access to
appropriate substance abuse treatment, at the local level, for all types of
offenders who are diagnosed with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that
if not treated would result in addiction. The legislature intends to fund the
increased access by sentencing drug offenders commensurate to the seriousness
of their offenses while continuing to punish offenders who manufacture
methamphetamine or sell drugs for profit at current levels.

It is the intent of the
legislature to ensure, as much as possible, that the treatment is effective by
requiring the use of research proven and approved treatment programs under
chapter 70.96A RCW. At the same time, through a distribution formula and
grants, the legislature intends to provide counties with the flexibility to
tailor their approach and seek local solutions to treatment issues while
providing adequate oversight to make sure that funds are effectively used.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2000 c
225 s 5, 2000 c 119 s 17, and 2000 c 66 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

((Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.360 and 2000 c
28 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The offender score is
measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The offender score
rules are as follows:

The offender score is
the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to the nearest whole
number.

(1) A prior conviction
is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing for the offense for
which the offender score is being computed. Convictions entered or sentenced
on the same date as the conviction for which the offender score is being
computed shall be deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning
of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2) Class A and sex
prior felony convictions shall always be included in the offender score. Class
B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score, if since the last date of release from confinement (including
full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or
entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in
the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a
conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not
be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
five consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Serious traffic convictions shall not be
included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender spent five
years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results
in a conviction. This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.

(3) Out-of-state
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no
clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall
be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant
federal statute.

(4) Score prior
convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal solicitations,
and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions for completed
offenses.

(5)(a) In the case of
multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the offender score,
count all convictions separately, except:

(i) Prior offenses
which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the same criminal
conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields the highest
offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with respect to
other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or
prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether
those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a),
and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The current
sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses were not the same
criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or in separate counties
or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments, or informations;

(ii) In the case of
multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1, 1986, for the
purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult convictions served
concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the
same date as one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.

(b) As used in this
subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that: (i) The latter
sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii) the concurrent
relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent
timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or parole revocation
on the former offense.

(6) If the present
conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the present conviction
were for a completed offense. When these convictions are used as criminal
history, score them the same as a completed crime.

(7) If the present
conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by subsection (11) or
(12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior felony conviction
and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point
for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8) If the present
conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in subsection (9), (10),
(11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each prior adult and
juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent
felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.

(9) If the present
conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points for prior adult
and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two points for each prior
adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each
prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(10) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in subsection (8) of
this section; however count two points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11) If the present
conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for each adult or juvenile
prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony
offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for an
enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12) If the present
conviction is for ((a drug offense)) manufacture of methamphetamine
count three points for each adult prior ((felony drug offense)) manufacture
of methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile ((drug))
manufacture of methamphetamine offense. All other adult and juvenile
felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this section if the current drug
offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug
offense is nonviolent.

(13) If the present
conviction is for Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW 72.66.060,
Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or Escape from
Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and juvenile
prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14) If the present
conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count
adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2
point.

(15) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count priors as in
subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each adult and
juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16) If the present conviction
is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections (7) through (15) of this
section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior sex
offense conviction.

(17) If the present
conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was under community
placement, add one point.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 70.96A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The criminal
justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
account may be expended solely for substance abuse treatment for offenders with
an addiction or a substance abuse problem that if not treated would result in
addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in
Washington state as well as for the provision of drug and alcohol services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation.

(2) Revenues to the
criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Savings to the state
general fund resulting from reductions in drug offender sentencing as a result
of sections 2 and 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (sections 2 and 3 of
this act), as calculated pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues
appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(3)(a) The department
of corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, the office of financial
management, and the caseload forecast council shall develop a methodology for
calculating the projected biennial savings under this section. Savings shall
be projected for the fiscal biennium beginning on July 1, 2003, and for each
biennium thereafter. By December 1, 2001, the proposed methodology shall be
submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The
methodology is deemed approved unless the legislature enacts legislation during
the 2002 session to modify or reject the methodology.

(b) When the department
of corrections submits its biennial budget request to the governor in 2002, the
department of corrections shall use the methodology approved in (a) of this
subsection to calculate savings to the state general fund for the ensuing
fiscal biennium resulting from reductions in drug offender sentencing as a
result of sections 2 and 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (sections 2
and 3 this act). The department shall report the dollar amount of the savings
to the state treasurer, the office of financial management, and the fiscal
committees of the legislature.

(c) For the fiscal
biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the state
treasurer shall transfer seventy-five percent of the amount reported in (b) of
this subsection from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments.

(d) For the fiscal
biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and each biennium thereafter, the state
treasurer shall transfer twenty-five percent of the amount reported in (b) of
this subsection from the general fund into the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account, divided into eight quarterly payments. The amounts
transferred pursuant to this section shall be used solely for providing drug
and alcohol treatment services to offenders receiving a reduced sentence as a
result of sections 2 and 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (sections 2
and 3 of this act) and who are assessed with an addiction or a substance abuse
problem that if not treated would result in addiction. Any excess funds
remaining after providing drug and alcohol treatment services to offenders
receiving a reduced sentence as a result of sections 2 and 3, chapter
. . ., Laws of 2001 (sections 2 and 3 of this act), may be expended
to provide treatment for sex or violent offenders assessed with an addiction or
a substance abuse problem that contributed to the crime.

(e) In each
odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to
the criminal justice treatment account in (c) of this subsection to the
division of alcohol and substance abuse for the purposes of subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Moneys appropriated
to the division of alcohol and substance abuse from the criminal justice
treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The
department shall serve as the fiscal agent for purposes of distribution.

(a) Seventy percent of
amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed to
counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The
division of alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, the Washington state
association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court
professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense
bar, and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary, shall
establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of
moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County plans submitted for
the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in
(b) of this subsection.

(b) Thirty percent of
the amounts appropriated to the division from the account shall be distributed
as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by
a county prosecuting attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of
representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court
judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal
defense lawyers, the department of corrections, and the division. The panel
shall award the grants to eligible counties that have submitted plans pursuant
to (a) of this subsection and shall approve expenditure plans for grant funds.
The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is
available to offenders statewide.

(5) The county chemical
dependency specialist, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior
court, and a member of the criminal defense bar shall jointly submit a plan for
disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account
within that county. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol
and substance abuse treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090.

(6) Counties are
encouraged to consider regional agreements for the efficient delivery of
treatment under this section.

(7) Moneys allocated
under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal,
state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

The sentencing
guidelines commission, as part of the comprehensive review and evaluation of
state sentencing policy, shall address the appropriate sentencing and treatment
of drug offenders and other offenders with substance abuse problems, with
specific reference to the length of sentences, the needs and provision for
inpatient and outpatient treatment that is proven and economically feasible,
and the appropriate degree of offender supervision during substance abuse
treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The Washington state
institute for public policy shall evaluate the effectiveness and financial
impact of this act in meeting its stated purpose and intent. The evaluation
shall include, but is not limited to: (1) A comparison of the reoffense rate
of persons receiving a reduced sentence as a result of the sentencing changes
included in this act with that of persons sentenced under prior law; and (2) a
review of the effect on other outcome measures besides recidivism, such as
treatment completion, employment, and housing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 43.135.035(4) does
not apply to the transfers established in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The department of
social and health services shall annually review and monitor the expenditures
made by any county which is funded, in whole or in part, with funds provided by
this act. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with
the requirements of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. This act applies to
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of
the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---