BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.400.205 and 2001
c 4 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 732) are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School district
employees shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section.

(a) ((The
cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the rate of the yearly
increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in
state funding formulas for teachers and other school district employees.))
Beginning with the 2001-02 school year, and for each subsequent school year,
each school district shall be provided with a state-funded
cost-of-living allocation sufficient to ((grant this cost-of-living increase
for the)) increase all school district employees' salaries,
including mandatory salary-related benefits, ((of all employees of the
district)) by the rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living
index.

(b) A school district
shall distribute its cost-of-living allocation for salaries and salary-related
benefits in accordance with the district's salary schedules, collective
bargaining agreements, and compensation policies. No later than the end of the
school year, each school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on
salaries and salary-related benefits.

(c) Any funded
cost-of-living increase shall be included in the salary base used to determine
cost-of-living increases for all school employees in subsequent years. ((For
teachers and other certificated instructional staff, the rate of the annual
cost-of-living increase funded for certificated instructional staff shall be
applied to the base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used to
recognize school district personnel costs.))

(d) Beginning with the
2001-02 school year, the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase in
this section as part of its obligation to meet the basic education requirements
under Article IX of the Washington Constitution.

(2) For
the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means, for any
school year, the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index,
using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics,
United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau
of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas
within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering
areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

--- END ---