BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that individuals with disabilities face many barriers and disincentives to
employment. Individuals with disabilities are often unable to obtain health
insurance that provides the services and supports necessary to allow them to live
independently and enter or rejoin the work force. The legislature finds that
there is a compelling public interest in eliminating barriers to work by
continuing needed health care coverage for individuals with disabilities who
enter and maintain employment.

The legislature intends
to strengthen the state's policy of supporting individuals with disabilities in
leading fully productive lives by supporting the implementation of the federal
ticket to work and work incentives improvement act of 1999, Public Law
106-170. This shall include improving incentives to work by continuing
coverage for health care and support services, by seeking federal funding for
innovative programs, and by exploring options which provide individuals with
disabilities a choice in receiving services needed to obtain and maintain
employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature to remove barriers to employment for individuals with
disabilities by providing medical assistance to the working disabled through a
buy-in program in accordance with section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social
security act and eligibility and cost-sharing requirements established by the
department.

(2) The department
shall establish income, resource, and cost-sharing requirements for the buy-in
program in accordance with federal law. The department is authorized to establish
and modify eligibility and cost-sharing requirements in order to administer the
program within available funds. The department shall make every effort to
coordinate benefits with employer-sponsored coverage available to the working
disabled receiving benefits under this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.09.510 and 1997 c
58 s 201 and 1997 c 59 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Medical assistance may
be provided in accordance with eligibility requirements established by the
department, as defined in the social security Title XIX state plan for
mandatory categorically needy persons and: (1) Individuals who would be
eligible for cash assistance except for their institutional status; (2)
individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who would be eligible for
temporary assistance for needy families, but do not qualify as dependent
children and who are in (a) foster care, (b) subsidized adoption, (c) a nursing
facility or an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded, or (d)
inpatient psychiatric facilities; (3) the aged, blind, and disabled who: (a)
Receive only a state supplement, or (b) would not be eligible for cash
assistance if they were not institutionalized; (4) categorically eligible individuals
who meet the income and resource requirements of the cash assistance programs;
(5) individuals who are enrolled in managed health care systems, who have
otherwise lost eligibility for medical assistance, but who have not completed a
current six-month enrollment in a managed health care system, and who are
eligible for federal financial participation under Title XIX of the social
security act; (6) children and pregnant women allowed by federal statute for
whom funding is appropriated; (7) working individuals with disabilities
authorized under section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act for whom
funding is appropriated; (8) other individuals eligible for medical
services under RCW 74.09.035 and 74.09.700 for whom federal financial
participation is available under Title XIX of the social security act; and (((8)))
(9) persons allowed by section 1931 of the social security act for whom
funding is appropriated.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.09.035 and 1987 c
406 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent of
available funds, medical care services may be provided to recipients of general
assistance, and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction services provided
under chapter 74.50 RCW, in accordance with medical eligibility requirements
established by the department.

(2) Determination of
the amount, scope, and duration of medical care services shall be limited to
coverage as defined by the department, except that adult dental, and routine
foot care shall not be included unless there is a specific appropriation for
these services.

(3) The department
shall establish standards of assistance and resource and income exemptions,
which may include ((deductibles and co-insurance)) premium and
point-of-service cost-sharing provisions. In addition, the department may
include a prohibition against the voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for assistance.

(4) Residents of
skilled nursing homes, intermediate care facilities, and intermediate care facilities
for the mentally retarded who are eligible for medical care services shall be
provided medical services to the same extent as provided to those persons
eligible under the medical assistance program.

(5) Payments made by
the department under this program shall be the limit of expenditures for
medical care services solely from state funds.

(6) Eligibility for
medical care services shall commence with the date of certification for general
assistance or the date of eligibility for alcohol and drug addiction services
provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.

(7) The
department may extend medical care services for up to twelve months to a person
whose eligibility for cash assistance under general assistance or alcohol and
drug addiction services ends due to employment. The department is authorized
to establish and modify eligibility and cost-sharing requirements in order to
administer the program within available funds. The department shall make every
effort to coordinate benefits with employer-sponsored coverage available to the
working disabled receiving benefits under this chapter.

---
END ---