BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The meaning
attributed in chapter 82.24 RCW to the words "cigarette,"
"sale," "wholesaler," and "retailer" apply
equally in this chapter.

(2)
"Director" means the director of fire protection appointed under RCW
43.43.938.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. By January 1, 2003, the
director of fire protection shall adopt by rule fire safe standards for
cigarettes sold or offered for sale. The standards must ensure that:

(1) Cigarettes once
ignited will stop burning within a reasonable period of time as determined by
the director; or

(2) Cigarettes will
have a limited risk of igniting upholstered furniture, mattresses, or other
household furnishings as determined by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. After June 30, 2003, no
cigarettes may be sold or offered for sale unless the manufacturer certifies in
writing to the director that the cigarettes meet the fire safe standards
adopted by the director.

The certifying
manufacturer shall provide copies of the written certification to all
wholesalers and agents.

The director shall
adopt by rule procedures for notifying retailers about which cigarettes the
director has certified as meeting the standards adopted by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Nothing in this chapter
prohibits a person or entity from selling cigarettes that have not been
certified by the manufacturer if the cigarettes are or will be stamped as being
for sale only in another state or nation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. An agent, wholesaler, or
other person who knowingly sells cigarettes at wholesale in violation of this
chapter is subject to a civil penalty of not to exceed ten thousand dollars for
each sale of noncomplying cigarettes.

A retailer who
knowingly sells or offers to sell cigarettes in violation of this chapter is
subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars for each sale of
or offer to sell noncomplying cigarettes if the total number of cigarettes sold
or offered for sale exceeds one thousand cigarettes.

In addition to other
penalties provided by law, a manufacturer of cigarettes that knowingly makes a
false certification of compliance to the director is subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each false certification.

The director shall
deposit penalties collected under this section into the fire service trust fund
created by RCW 43.43.946, and used for the purposes set forth in that section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The director shall adopt
rules to enforce this chapter and to recover civil penalties authorized under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The director shall
report to the senate and house labor and commerce committees by September 1,
2003, regarding the status of rule making.

(2) The director shall
consult with the director of health to consider whether cigarettes manufactured
in accordance with section 2 of this act may result in increased health risks
to consumers.

(3) By January 1, 2004,
the director shall report to the senate and house labor and commerce committees
about whether cigarettes manufactured in accordance with section 2 of this act
result in increased health risks to consumers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---