BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 17.24.007 and 2000 c
100 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the state department of agriculture.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the state department of agriculture
or the director's designee.

(3)
"Quarantine" means a rule issued by the department that prohibits or
regulates the movement of articles, bees, plants, or plant products from
designated quarantine areas within or outside the state to prevent the spread
of disease, plant pathogens, or pests to nonquarantine areas.

(4) "Plant
pest" means a living stage of an insect, mite, nematode, slug, snail, or
protozoa, or other invertebrate animal, bacteria, fungus, or parasitic plant,
or their reproductive parts, or viruses, or an organism similar to or allied
with any of the foregoing plant pests, including a genetically engineered
organism, or an infectious substance that can directly or indirectly injure or
cause disease or damage in plants or parts of plants or in processed, manufactured,
or other products of plants.

(5) "Plants and
plant products" means trees, shrubs, vines, forage, and cereal plants, and
all other plants and plant parts, including cuttings, grafts, scions, buds,
fruit, vegetables, roots, bulbs, seeds, wood, lumber, and all products made
from the plants and plant products.

(6)
"Certificate" or "certificate of inspection" means an
official document certifying compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
The term "certificate" includes labels, rubber stamp imprints, tags,
permits, written statements, or a form of inspection and certification document
that accompanies the movement of inspected and certified plant material and
plant products, or bees, bee hives, or beekeeping equipment.

(7) "Compliance
agreement" means a written agreement between the department and a person
engaged in growing, handling, or moving articles, plants, plant products, or
bees, bee hives, or beekeeping equipment regulated under this chapter, in which
the person agrees to comply with stipulated requirements.

(8)
"Distribution" means the movement of a regulated article from the
property where it is grown or kept, to property that is not contiguous to the
property, regardless of the ownership of the properties.

(9) "Genetically
engineered organism" means an organism altered or produced through genetic
modification from a donor, vector, or recipient organism using recombinant DNA
techniques, excluding those organisms covered by the food, drug and cosmetic
act (21 U.S.C. Secs. 301‑392).

(10) "Person"
means a natural person, individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company,
society, or association, and every officer, agent, or employee of any of these
entities.

(11) "Sell"
means to sell, to hold for sale, offer for sale, handle, or to use as
inducement for the sale of another article or product.

(12) "Noxious
weed" means a living stage, including, but not limited to, seeds and
reproductive parts, of a parasitic or other plant of a kind that presents a
threat to Washington agriculture or environment.

(13) "Regulated
article" means a plant or plant product, bees or beekeeping equipment,
noxious weed or other articles or equipment capable of harboring or
transporting plant or bee pests or noxious weeds that is specifically addressed
in rules or quarantines adopted under this chapter.

(14) "Owner"
means the person having legal ownership, possession, or control over a
regulated article covered by this chapter including, but not limited to, the
owner, shipper, consignee, or their agent.

(15)
"Nuisance" means a plant, or plant part, apiary, or property found in
a commercial area on which is found a pest, pathogen, or disease that is a
source of infestation to other properties.

(16) "Bees"
means adult insects, eggs, larvae, pupae, or other immature stages of the
species Apis mellifera.

(17) "Bee
pests" means a mite, other parasite, or disease that causes injury to bees
and those honey bees generally recognized to have undesirable behavioral
characteristics such as or as found in Africanized honey bees.

(18) "Biological
control" means the use by humans of living organisms to control or
suppress undesirable animals and plants; the action of parasites, predators, or
pathogens on a host or prey population to produce a lower general equilibrium
than would prevail in the absence of these agents.

(19) "Biological
control agent" means a parasite, predator, or pathogen intentionally
released, by humans, into a target host or prey population with the intent of
causing population reduction of that host or prey.

(20)
"Emergency" means a situation where there is an imminent danger of an
infestation of plant pests or disease that seriously threatens the state's
agricultural or horticultural industries or environment and that cannot be
adequately addressed with normal procedures or existing resources.

(21) "Large
urban residential area" means that area lying within the incorporated
boundaries of a city with a population of greater than one hundred thousand and
the urban growth area contiguous to the city, and in which residential uses are
a permitted or a conditional use.

(22) "Asian gypsy
moth" means the Asian strain of the gypsy moth Lymantria dispar.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.58.065 and 1989 c
380 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In submitting data
required by this chapter, the applicant may:

(a) Mark clearly any
portions which in the applicant's opinion are trade secrets or commercial or
financial information; and

(b) Submit such marked
material separately from other material required to be submitted under this
chapter.

(2) Except under
section 3 of this act and notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter or other law, the director shall not make public information which in
the director's judgment should be privileged or confidential because it
contains or relates to trade secrets or commercial or financial information
except that, when necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter,
information relating to unpublished formulas of products acquired by
authorization of this chapter may be revealed to any state or federal agency
consulted and may be revealed at a public hearing or in findings of fact issued
by the director when necessary under this chapter.

(3) Except under
section 3 of this act, if the director proposes to release for inspection
information which the applicant or registrant believes to be protected from
disclosure under subsection (2) of this section, the director shall notify the
applicant or registrant in writing, by certified mail. The director shall not
thereafter make available for inspection such data until thirty days after
receipt of the notice by the applicant or registrant. During this period, the
applicant or registrant may institute an action in the superior court of
Thurston county for a declaratory judgment as to whether such information is
subject to protection under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 15.58 RCW, to be codified between RCW 15.58.065 and 15.58.070, to
read as follows:

(1) When the director
proposes to eradicate the Asian gypsy moth through the aerial application of
pesticides within a large urban residential area as defined in RCW 17.24.007,
the director shall consult with appropriate public university personnel and
federal, state, and local health agencies concerning unpublished formulas of
products acquired by authorization of this chapter for the purpose of obtaining
an independent assessment of the possible human health risks associated with
the proposed use.

(2) The director shall
reveal to consulted individuals the confidential statement of formula for the
purpose of assessing the possible human health risks associated with the
proposed pesticide use by the department.

(3) Consulted
individuals shall consider the confidential statement of formula, the proposed
pesticide use, the impact on affected populations, and any other considerations
that may bear on public health in making an assessment of the possible human
health risks.

(4) The director shall
make any independent assessment available to the public except that the names,
chemical abstract service numbers, or other identifying characteristics or
percentages of inert ingredients in a pesticide, and any other information that
in the director's judgment should be confidential, shall not be disclosed. Additionally,
any information or documents used in preparation of an independent assessment
that pertain to the confidential statement of formula and any protected trade
secret information shall not be disclosed to the public by any person.

(5) This section shall
be in addition to and shall not limit the authority of the director under any
other provision of law to release to the public information relating to
pesticide formula, ingredients, or other information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 17.24 RCW to read as follows:

When surveys and other
measures detect the presence of the Asian gypsy moth within a large urban
residential area, and when the aerial application of pesticides may be
considered as a measure to eradicate the pest, the director shall provide
public notice of the survey results and the alternatives for eradication
measures. The director shall hold a public meeting within the area to provide
information and to receive comments from the public on the survey results, and
the alternatives for eradication measures. The director shall accept such
comments for a period of thirty days from the date the public meeting is held,
or a lesser period as the director determines if immediate action is required
to implement eradication measures.

Sec. 5. RCW 17.24.171 and 1991 c
257 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the director
determines that there exists an imminent danger of an infestation of plant
pests or plant diseases that seriously endangers the agricultural or
horticultural industries of the state, or that seriously threatens life,
health, or economic well-being, the director shall request the governor to
order emergency measures to control the pests or plant diseases under RCW
43.06.010(((14))) (13). The director's findings shall contain an
evaluation of the affect of the emergency measures on public health. When
the requested measures include the aerial application of pesticides in a large
urban residential area for the eradication of Asian gypsy moths, the findings
shall also include a summary of the information relied upon in determining the
extent of the danger, the alternative measures considered, and, when
applicable, the director's response to the public comments received under
section 4 of this act.

(2) If an emergency is
declared pursuant to RCW 43.06.010(((14))) (13), the director may
appoint a committee to advise the governor through the director and to review
emergency measures necessary under the authority of RCW 43.06.010(((14)))
(13) and this section and make subsequent recommendations to the
governor. The committee shall include representatives of the agricultural and
silvicultural industries, state and local government, public health
interests, technical service providers, and environmental organizations.

(3) Upon the order of
the governor of the use of emergency measures, the director is authorized to
implement the emergency measures to prevent, control, or eradicate plant pests
or plant diseases that are the subject of the emergency order. Such measures,
after thorough evaluation of all other alternatives, may include the aerial
application of pesticides.

(4) Upon the order of
the governor of the use of emergency measures, the director is authorized to
enter into agreements with individuals or companies, or both, to accomplish the
prevention, control, or eradication of plant pests or plant diseases,
notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 15.58 or 17.21 RCW, or any other
statute.

(5) When emergency
measures taken include the aerial application of pesticides in a large urban
residential area for the eradication of Asian gypsy moths:

(a) The director
shall implement procedures for notifying the community in the application area
before each aerial application. The procedures shall include notifying
individuals who request individual notice, and include notice to major
employers and institutional facilities, including but not limited to schools,
child care facilities, senior residential and day care facilities, health care
facilities, and community centers; and

(b) The local health
jurisdiction, with support from the department of health, shall monitor public
health effects following the implementation of the measures in such areas.

(6) The director
shall continually evaluate the emergency measures taken and report to the
governor at intervals of not less than ten days. The director shall
immediately advise the governor if he or she finds that the emergency no longer
exists or if certain emergency measures should be discontinued.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.06.010 and 1994 c
223 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to those
prescribed by the Constitution, the governor may exercise the powers and
perform the duties prescribed in this and the following sections:

(1) The governor shall
supervise the conduct of all executive and ministerial offices;

(2) The governor shall
see that all offices are filled, including as provided in RCW 42.12.070, and
the duties thereof performed, or in default thereof, apply such remedy as the
law allows; and if the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the legislature therewith
at its next session;

(3) The governor shall
make the appointments and supply the vacancies mentioned in this title;

(4) The governor is the
sole official organ of communication between the government of this state and
the government of any other state or territory, or of the United States;

(5) Whenever any suit
or legal proceeding is pending against this state, or which may affect the
title of this state to any property, or which may result in any claim against
the state, the governor may direct the attorney general to appear on behalf of
the state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury designated
by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;

(6) The governor may
require the attorney general or any prosecuting attorney to inquire into the
affairs or management of any corporation existing under the laws of this state,
or doing business in this state, and report the same to the governor, or to any
grand jury designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in
session;

(7) The governor may
require the attorney general to aid any prosecuting attorney in the discharge
of the prosecutor's duties;

(8) The governor may
offer rewards, not exceeding one thousand dollars in each case, payable out of
the state treasury, for information leading to the apprehension of any person
convicted of a felony who has escaped from a state correctional institution or
for information leading to the arrest of any person who has committed or is
charged with the commission of a felony;

(9) The governor shall
perform such duties respecting fugitives from justice as are prescribed by law;

(10) The governor shall
issue and transmit election proclamations as prescribed by law;

(11) The governor may
require any officer or board to make, upon demand, special reports to the
governor, in writing;

(12) The governor may,
after finding that a public disorder, disaster, energy emergency, or riot
exists within this state or any part thereof which affects life, health,
property, or the public peace, proclaim a state of emergency in the area
affected, and the powers granted the governor during a state of emergency shall
be effective only within the area described in the proclamation;

(13) The governor may,
after finding that there exists within this state an imminent danger of
infestation of plant pests as defined in RCW 17.24.007 or plant diseases which
seriously endangers the agricultural, silvicultural, or horticultural
industries of the state of Washington, or which seriously threatens life,
health, or economic well-being, order emergency measures to prevent or abate
the infestation or disease situation, which measures, after thorough evaluation
of all other alternatives, may include the aerial application of pesticides.
The governor shall not approve a proposed emergency measure that includes the
aerial application of pesticides in a large urban residential area for Asian
gypsy moth eradication unless the governor determines that all other
alternatives are not feasible or likely to eradicate the pest;

(14) On
all compacts forwarded to the governor pursuant to RCW 9.46.360(6), the
governor is authorized and empowered to execute on behalf of the state compacts
with federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington pursuant to
the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., for
conducting class III gaming, as defined in the Act, on Indian lands.

---
END ---