BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
9.94A.190 and 2000 c 28 s 4 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) A sentence that includes a term or terms of
confinement

_8 totaling more than one year shall be served in a
facility or

_9 institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the
state.

10 The costs of incarceration for the portion of the
sentence or

11 sentences served in the county jail, including credit
given to the

12 offender for pretrial time served prior to an
offender's transfer

13 to a state facility shall be the financial
responsibility of the

14 state. Reimbursement to the county for those costs
shall not exceed

15 the highest rate charged by the county under its
contract with a

16 municipal government during the year in which the
costs were

17 incurred. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, a

18 sentence of not more than one year of confinement shall
be served

p. 1 SB
5427

_1 in a facility operated, licensed, or utilized under
contract, by

_2 the county, or if home detention or work crew has been
ordered by

_3 the court, in the residence of either the offender or a
member of

_4 the offender's immediate family.

_5 (2) If a county uses a state partial confinement
facility for

_6 the partial confinement of a person sentenced to
confinement for

_7 not more than one year, the county shall reimburse the
state for

_8 the use of the facility as provided in this subsection.
The office

_9 of financial management shall set the rate of
reimbursement based

10 upon the average per diem cost per offender in the
facility. The

11 office of financial management shall determine to what
extent, if

12 any, reimbursement shall be reduced or eliminated
because of funds

13 provided by the legislature to the department for the
purpose of

14 covering the cost of county use of state partial
confinement

15 facilities. The office of financial management shall
reestablish

16 reimbursement rates each even-numbered year.

17 (3) A person who is sentenced for a felony to a term
of not

18 more than one year, and who is committed or returned to

19 incarceration in a state facility on another felony
conviction,

20 either under the indeterminate sentencing laws, chapter
9.95 RCW,

21 or under this chapter shall serve all terms of
confinement,

22 including a sentence of not more than one year, in a facility
or

23 institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the
state,

24 consistent with the provisions of RCW 9.94A.400.

25 (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section, a

26 sentence imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660 which has a
standard

27 sentence range of over one year, regardless of length,
shall be

28 served in a facility or institution operated, or
utilized under

29 contract, by the state.

30 (5) All revenues derived from this section shall
be considered

31 in contract negotiations under RCW 39.34.180(2).

32 Sec. 2. RCW
70.48.410 and 1984 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read

33 as follows:

34 Persons convicted of a felony as defined by chapter
9A.20 RCW

35 and committed to the care and custody of the department
of

36 corrections shall be the financial responsibility of the

37 department of corrections ((not later than the eighth
day,

SB 5427 p. 2

_1 excluding weekends and holidays, following sentencing
for the

_2 felony and notification that the prisoner is
available for

_3 movement to a state correctional institution.
However, if good

_4 cause is shown, a superior court judge may order the
prisoner

_5 detained in the jail beyond the eight-day period for
an additional

_6 period not to exceed ten days. If a superior court
orders a

_7 convicted felon to be detained beyond the eighth day
following

_8 sentencing, the county or city shall retain financial

_9 responsibility for that ten-day period or portion
thereof ordered

10 by the court)).

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act
is necessary for the

12 immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or

13 support of the state government and its existing public

14 institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5427