BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.0205 and 1987 c
4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

"Bingo," as
used in this chapter, means a game conducted only in the county within which
the organization is principally located in which prizes are awarded on the
basis of designated numbers or symbols on a card conforming to numbers or
symbols selected at random and in which no cards are sold except at the time
and place of said game, when said game is conducted by a bona fide charitable
or nonprofit organization ((which does not conduct or allow its premises to
be used for conducting bingo on more than three occasions per week and which
does not conduct bingo in any location which is used for conducting bingo on
more than three occasions per week)), or if an agricultural fair authorized
under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, which does not conduct bingo on more than
twelve consecutive days in any calendar year, and except in the case of any
agricultural fair as authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, no person
other than a bona fide member or an employee of said organization takes any
part in the management or operation of said game, and no person who takes any
part in the management or operation of said game takes any part in the
management or operation of any game conducted by any other organization or any
other branch of the same organization, unless approved by the commission, and
no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the benefit of any person other than
the organization conducting said game. For the purposes of this section, the
organization shall be deemed to be principally located in the county within
which it has its primary business office. If the organization has no business
office, the organization shall be deemed to be located in the county of
principal residence of its chief executive officer: PROVIDED, That any
organization which is conducting any licensed and established bingo game in any
locale as of January 1, 1981, shall be exempt from the requirement that such
game be conducted in the county in which the organization is principally
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding RCW
9.46.070, the commission may not issue any new licenses for bingo under RCW 9.46.070(1)
until July 1, 2007.

(2) The
commission may allow existing bingo licensees under RCW 9.46.070(1) to share
facilities at one location.

---
END ---