BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
the following:

(a) Alopecia areata and
its variants, alopecia totalis and alopecia universalis, are common,
noncontagious diseases that affect an estimated two million Americans. They
are diseases of the hair follicle with results ranging from large patches of
baldness to the total loss of all body hair. This hair loss can be acute and
short-lived, occurring in just days or weeks, or chronic with years of regrowth
in some sites and progression to new sites.

(b) Alopecia areata and
its variants are associated with an alteration in the immunological system, but
their cause is unknown.

(c) Treatments for
alopecia areata, totalis, and universalis using immunomodulating agents can
stimulate new hair growth, but none prevent new patches from developing. These
treatments must be continued to maintain their effect, but treatment for
alopecia areata may stop when the disease goes into spontaneous remission.
There are concerns surrounding the long-term use and side effects of some of
the treatments.

(d) Children with
alopecia areata, totalis, and universalis may suffer a profound alteration in
their functional status. Children with alopecia areata, totalis, or
universalis have been removed from mainstream classes and placed in special
education classes and ostracized by their peers.

(e) Alopecia areata,
totalis, and universalis are recognized medical disease processes, which cause
severe hair loss that can alter a patient's functional status. The use of
cranial hair prostheses returns patients to their previous functional status.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to clarify that policies that provide benefits for prostheses
must provide benefits for cranial hair prostheses for alopecia areata, totalis,
or universalis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

All state-purchased
health care that provides coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for
cranial hair prostheses for patients under eighteen years of age suffering from
alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, to the extent that benefits are
provided for alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, provided that such
services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or
advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing care
quality assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician
assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This section shall not
be construed to prevent the application of standard health plan provisions
applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment provisions. This
section does not limit the authority of the state health care authority to
negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of
prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or
supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 48.20 RCW to read as follows:

An insurer that offers
to any individual a health benefit plan that provides coverage for prostheses
shall include coverage for cranial hair prostheses for patients under eighteen
years of age suffering from alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, to the
extent that benefits are provided for alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis,
provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the
patient's physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the
nursing care quality assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or
physician assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This section shall not
be construed to prevent the application of standard health plan provisions
applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment provisions. This
section does not limit the authority of the state health care authority to
negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of
prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or
supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

A group insurance
contract or blanket disability insurance contract that provides coverage for
prostheses shall include coverage for cranial hair prostheses for patients
under eighteen years of age suffering from alopecia areata, totalis, or
universalis, to the extent that benefits are provided for alopecia areata,
totalis, or universalis, provided that such services are delivered upon the
recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced registered nurse
practitioner as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission
pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A
RCW.

This section shall not
be construed to prevent the application of standard health plan provisions
applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment provisions. This
section does not limit the authority of the state health care authority to
negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of
prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or
supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

A health service
contractor that provides coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for cranial
hair prostheses for patients under eighteen years of age suffering from
alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, to the extent that benefits are
provided for alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, provided that such
services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or
advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing care
quality assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician
assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This section shall not
be construed to prevent the application of standard health plan provisions
applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment provisions. This
section does not limit the authority of the state health care authority to negotiate
rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostheses.
This section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

A health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for
cranial hair prostheses for patients under eighteen years of age suffering from
alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, to the extent that benefits are
provided for alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, provided that such
services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or
advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing care
quality assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician
assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This
section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment
provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other
limited benefits.

---
END ---