BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
46.01.140 and 1996 c 315 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director
of

_8 licensing shall carry out the provisions of this title
relating to

_9 the licensing of vehicles and the issuance of vehicle
license

10 number plates under the direction and supervision of the
director

11 and may with the approval of the director appoint
assistants as

12 special deputies and recommend subagents to accept
applications

13 and collect fees for vehicle licenses and transfers and
to deliver

14 vehicle license number plates.

15 (2) A county auditor appointed by the director may
request that

16 the director appoint subagencies within the county.

17 (a) Upon authorization of the director, the
auditor shall

p. 1 SB
5432

_1 advertise a request for proposals and use the process for

_2 soliciting vendors under RCW 39.04.190(2), except that:

_3 (i) The provision requiring the contract to
be awarded to the

_4 lowest responsible bidder shall not apply; and

_5 (ii) A subagent may nominate a successor who is
either the

_6 subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency
employee. The

_7 auditor shall recommend the appointment of the
nominated successor

_8 unless the auditor finds that the nominee does not
meet the

_9 eligibility requirements established in the policies
and

10 procedures manual of the department of licensing.
The department

11 shall adopt eligibility requirements in cooperation
with the title

12 registration advisory committee.

13 (A) If a subagency is held by a partnership or
corporate

14 entity, the nomination must be submitted on behalf
of, and agreed

15 to by, all partners or corporate officers.

16 (B) No subagent may receive any direct or
indirect compensation

17 or remuneration from any party or entity in
recognition of a

18 successor nomination. A subagent may not receive any
financial

19 benefit from the transfer or termination of an
appointment.

20 (C) This subsection (2)(a)(ii) is intended to
assist in the

21 efficient transfer of appointments in order to
minimize public

22 inconvenience. It does not create any proprietary or
property

23 interest in the appointment.

24 (b) The auditor shall submit all proposals to
the director, and

25 shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents
who have

26 applied through the request for proposal process. The
director has

27 final appointment authority.

28 (3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent
by the

29 department shall enter into a standard contract provided
by the

30 director, developed with the advice of the title and
registration

31 advisory committee.

32 (b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of
this section

33 shall enter into a standard contract with the county
auditor,

34 developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory

35 committee. The director shall provide the standard
contract to

36 county auditors.

37 (c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of
this

38 subsection must contain at a minimum provisions that:

SB 5432 p. 2

_1 (i) Describe the responsibilities, and where
applicable, the

_2 liability, of each party relating to the service
expectations and

_3 levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and
equipment

_4 maintenance;

_5 (ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds
so that

_6 the state is protected against any loss of collected
motor vehicle

_7 tax revenues or loss of equipment;

_8 (iii) Specify the amount of training that will be
provided by

_9 the state, the county auditor, or subagents;

10 (iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to
vehicle

11 licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this
subsection;

12 (v) Describe the causes and procedures for
termination of the

13 contract, which may include mediation and binding
arbitration.

14 (d) The department shall develop procedures that
will

15 standardize and prescribe allowable costs that may be
assigned to

16 vehicle licensing and vessel registration and title
activities

17 performed by county auditors.

18 (e) The contracts may include any provision that the
director

19 deems necessary to ensure acceptable service and the
full

20 collection of vehicle and vessel tax revenues.

21 (f) The director may waive any provisions of the
contract

22 deemed necessary in order to ensure that readily
accessible

23 service is provided to the citizens of the state.

24 (4)(a) At any time any application is made to the
director, the

25 county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law
dealing with

26 licenses, registration, or the right to operate any
vehicle or

27 vessel upon the public highways or waters of this state,
excluding

28 applicants already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070
or

29 46.16.085, the applicant shall pay to the director,
county

30 auditor, or other agent a fee of three dollars for each

31 application in addition to any other fees required by
law.

32 (b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of
vehicle

33 licensing and vessel registration and title activities
may submit

34 to the department a request for cost-coverage moneys.
The request

35 must be submitted on a form developed by the
department. The

36 department shall develop procedures to verify whether a
request is

37 reasonable. Payment shall be made on requests found to
be allowable

38 from the licensing services account.

p. 3 SB
5432

_1 (c) Applicants for certificates of ownership,
including

_2 applicants paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085,
shall pay

_3 to the director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of
four

_4 dollars in addition to any other fees required by law.

_5 (d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection,
if paid to

_6 the county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid
to a

_7 subagent of the county auditor, shall be paid to the
county

_8 treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by
the county

_9 auditor and credited to the county current expense
fund. If the fee

10 is paid to another agent of the director, the fee shall
be used by

11 the agent to defray his or her expenses in handling the

12 application.

13 (5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a)
seven dollars

14 and fifty cents for changes in a certificate of
ownership, with or

15 without registration renewal, or verification of record
and

16 preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at
the time

17 of the title application or transfer and (b) three
dollars for

18 registration renewal only, issuing a transit permit, or
any other

19 service under this section.

20 (6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as
agent for

21 the director, the fee so collected shall be certified to
the state

22 treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state
patrol highway

23 account. If the fee is collected by the department of

24 transportation as agent for the director, the fee shall
be

25 certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the
credit of

26 the motor vehicle fund. All such fees collected by the
director or

27 branches of his office shall be certified to the state
treasurer

28 and deposited to the credit of the highway safety fund.

29 (7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of
providing

30 vehicle licensing and vessel registration and title
activities in

31 a county, calculated in accordance with the procedures
in

32 subsection (3)(d) of this section, shall be expended as
determined

33 by the county legislative authority during the process
established

34 by law for adoption of county budgets.

35 (8) The director may adopt rules to implement this
section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5432 p. 4