BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
26.26.030 and 1985 c 7 s 86 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The parent and child relationship between a child
and

_8 (1) the natural mother may be established by proof
of her

_9 having given birth to the child, or under this chapter;

10 (2) the natural father may be established under this
chapter;

11 (3) an adoptive parent may be established by proof
of adoption

12 or under the provisions of chapter 26.33 RCW;

13 (4) a mother or father may be established under
this chapter by

14 an affidavit and physician's certificate in a form
prescribed by

15 the department of health wherein the sperm donor,
donor of ovum,

16 or surrogate gestation carrier sets forth his or her
intent to be

17 legally bound as the parent of a child or children
born through

18 alternative reproductive medical technology by filing
the

p. 1 SSB
5433

_1 affidavit and physician's certificate with the
registrar of vital

_2 statistics within ten days after the date of the
child's birth

_3 pursuant to RCW 26.26.050.

_4 Sec. 2. RCW
26.26.050 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 42 s 6 are each

_5 amended to read as follows:

_6 (1) If, under the supervision of a licensed
physician and with

_7 the consent of her husband, a wife is inseminated
artificially

_8 with semen donated by a man not her husband, the husband
is

_9 treated in law as if he were the natural father of a
child thereby

10 conceived. The husband's consent must be in writing and
signed by

11 him and his wife. The physician shall certify their
signatures and

12 the date of the insemination, and file the husband's
consent with

13 the registrar of vital statistics, where it shall be
kept

14 confidential and in a sealed file.

15 (2) The donor of semen provided to a licensed
physician for use

16 in artificial insemination of a woman other than the
donor's wife

17 is treated in law as if he were not the natural father
of a child

18 thereby conceived unless the donor and the woman agree
in writing

19 that said donor shall be the father. The agreement must
be in

20 writing and signed by the donor and the woman. The
physician shall

21 certify their signatures and the date of the
insemination and file

22 the agreement, including the affidavit and
certification

23 referenced in RCW 26.26.030, with the registrar
of vital

24 statistics, where it shall be kept confidential and in a
sealed

25 file.

26 (3) The donor of ovum provided to a licensed
physician for use

27 in the alternative reproductive medical technology
process of

28 attempting to achieve a pregnancy in a woman other
than the donor

29 is treated in law as if she were not the natural
mother of a child

30 thereafter conceived and born unless the donor and
the woman who

31 gives birth to a child as a result of the alternative
reproductive

32 medical technology procedures agree in writing that
the donor is

33 to be a parent. A woman who gives birth to a child
conceived

34 through alternative reproductive medical technology
procedures

35 under the supervision and with the assistance of a
licensed

36 physician is treated in law as if she were the
natural mother of

37 the child unless an agreement in writing signed by an
ovum donor

SSB 5433 p. 2

_1 and the woman giving birth to the child states
otherwise. An

_2 agreement pursuant to this section must be in writing
and signed

_3 by the ovum donor and the woman who gives birth to
the child and

_4 any other intended parent of the child. The
physician shall certify

_5 the parties' signatures and the date of the ovum
harvest, identify

_6 the subsequent medical procedures undertaken, and
identify the

_7 intended parents. The agreement, including the
affidavit and

_8 certification referenced in RCW 26.26.030, must be
filed with the

_9 registrar of vital statistics, where it must be kept
confidential

10 and in a sealed file.

11 (4) The department of health shall, upon request,
issue a birth

12 certificate for any child born as a result of an
alternative

13 reproductive medical technology procedure indicating
the legal

14 parentage of such child as intended by any agreement
filed with

15 the registrar of vital statistics pursuant to
subsection (1), (2),

16 or (3) of this section.

17 (5) The failure of the licensed physician to
perform any

18 administrative act required by this section shall not
affect the

19 father and child or mother and child
relationship. All papers and

20 records pertaining to the ((insemination)) alternative

21 reproductive medical technology procedures,
whether part of the

22 permanent record of a court or of a file held by the
supervising

23 physician or elsewhere, are subject to inspection only
in

24 exceptional cases upon an order of the court for good
cause shown.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5433