BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.380 and 2000 c
107 s 271 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Persons who enter
upon or use clearly identified department improved access facilities with a
motor vehicle may be required to display a current annual fish and wildlife
lands vehicle use permit on the motor vehicle while within or while using an
improved access facility. An "improved access facility" is a clearly
identified area specifically created for motor vehicle parking, and includes
any boat launch or boat ramp associated with the parking area, but does not
include the department parking facilities at the Gorge Concert Center near
George, Washington. ((The vehicle use permit is issued in the form of a
decal.)) One ((decal)) vehicle use permit shall be issued at
no charge with ((each)) an initial purchase of one of either an
annual saltwater, freshwater, combination, small game hunting, big game
hunting, ((and)) or trapping license issued by the department.
The annual fee for a fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit, if purchased
separately, is ten dollars. A person to whom the department has issued a ((decal))
vehicle use permit or who has purchased a vehicle use permit separately
may purchase ((a decal)) additional vehicle use permits from the
department ((for each additional vehicle owned by the person)) at a cost
of five dollars per ((decal upon a showing of proof to the department that
the person owns the additional vehicle or vehicles)) vehicle use permit.
Revenue derived from the sale of fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permits
shall be used solely for the stewardship and maintenance of department improved
access facilities.

Youth groups may use
department improved access facilities without possessing a vehicle use permit
when accompanied by a vehicle use permit holder.

The department may
accept contributions into the state wildlife fund for the sound stewardship of
fish and wildlife. Contributors shall be known as "conservation
patrons" and, for contributions of twenty dollars or more, shall receive a
fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit free of charge.

(2) ((The decal must
be affixed in a permanent manner to the motor vehicle before entering upon or
using the motor vehicle on a department improved access facility, and must be
displayed on the rear window of the motor vehicle, or, if the motor vehicle
does not have a rear window, on the rear of the motor vehicle.

(3))) Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use permit if required by this section is an infraction under chapter
7.84 RCW, and department employees are authorized to issue a notice of
infraction to the registered owner of any motor vehicle entering upon or using
a department improved access facility without such a ((decal)) permit.
The penalty for failure to display or improper display of the ((decal)) permit
is sixty-six dollars.

(3) The
commission may adopt those rules that are necessary to implement, administer,
and enforce the fish and wildlife vehicle use permit program. The rules are
limited to those methods necessary for issuing vehicle use permits and for
ensuring that vehicle use permits are properly displayed or affixed.

--- END ---