BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.65.010 and 1998 c
190 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided by this title, a person may not engage in any of the following
activities without a license or permit issued by the director:

(a) Commercially fish for
or take food fish or shellfish;

(b) Deliver food fish
or shellfish taken in offshore waters;

(c) Operate a charter
boat or commercial fishing vessel engaged in a fishery;

(d) Engage in
processing or wholesaling food fish or shellfish; or

(e) Act as a fishing
guide ((for salmon for personal use)) in freshwater rivers and streams,
other than that part of the Columbia river below the bridge at Longview.

(2) No person may
engage in the activities described in subsection (1) of this section unless the
licenses or permits required by this title are in the person's possession, and
the person is the named license holder or an alternate operator designated on
the license and the person's license is not suspended.

(3) A valid Oregon
license that is equivalent to a license under this title is valid in the
concurrent waters of the Columbia river if the state of Oregon recognizes as
valid the equivalent Washington license. The director may identify by rule
what Oregon licenses are equivalent.

(4) No license or
permit is required for the production or harvesting of private sector cultured
aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020 or for the delivery, processing,
or wholesaling of such aquatic products. However, if a means of identifying
such products is required by rules adopted under RCW 15.85.060, the exemption
from licensing or permit requirements established by this subsection applies
only if the aquatic products are identified in conformance with those rules.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.65.150 and 2000 c
107 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
issue the charter licenses and angler permits listed in this section according
to the requirements of this title. The licenses and permits and their annual
fees and surcharges are:

License or Permit Annual Fee Governing

(RCW 77.95.090
Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(a) Nonsalmon charter $225 $375

(b) Salmon charter $380 $685 RCW 77.70.050

(plus $100) (plus $100)

(c) Salmon angler $ 0 $ 0 RCW 77.70.060

(d) Salmon roe $ 95 $ 95 RCW 77.65.350

(2) A salmon charter
license designating a vessel is required to operate a charter boat to take
salmon, other food fish, and shellfish. The director may issue a salmon
charter license only to a person who meets the qualifications of RCW 77.70.050.

(3) A nonsalmon charter
license designating a vessel is required to operate a charter boat to take food
fish other than salmon and shellfish. As used in this subsection, "food
fish" does not include salmon.

(4) "Charter
boat" means a vessel from which persons may, for a fee, fish for food fish,
game fish, or shellfish for personal use, and that brings food fish or
shellfish into state ports or brings food fish or shellfish taken from state
waters into United States ports. The director may specify by rule when a
vessel is a "charter boat" within this definition. "Charter
boat" does not mean a vessel used by a guide for clients fishing for food
fish or game fish for personal use in freshwater rivers, streams, and
lakes, other than Lake Washington or that part of the Columbia River below the
bridge at Longview.

(5) A charter boat
licensed in Oregon may fish without a Washington charter license under the same
rules as Washington charter boat operators in ocean waters within the
jurisdiction of Washington state from the southern border of the state of
Washington to Leadbetter Point, as long as the Oregon vessel does not land at
any Washington port with the purpose of taking on or discharging passengers.
The provisions of this subsection shall be in effect as long as the state of
Oregon has reciprocal laws and regulations.

(6) A salmon charter
license under subsection (1)(b) of this section may be renewed if the license
holder notifies the department by May 1st of that year that he or she will not
participate in the fishery during that calendar year. The license holder must
pay the one hundred-dollar enhancement surcharge, plus a fifteen-dollar
handling charge, in order to be considered a valid renewal and eligible to
renew the license the following year.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.65.370 and 1998 c
190 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A natural
person shall not offer or perform the services of a professional ((salmon))
fishing guide in the taking of ((salmon)) game fish and food
fish for personal use in freshwater rivers and streams, other than in that
part of the Columbia river below the bridge at Longview, without a professional
((salmon)) fishing guide license.

(2) Only an individual
at least sixteen years of age may hold a professional ((salmon)) fishing
guide license. No individual may hold more than one professional ((salmon))
fishing guide license.

(3) The director may
specify by rule the requirements for identifying boats engaged in guiding and
other requirements considered necessary for public safety.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.65.440 and 2000 c
107 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
issue the personal licenses listed in this section according to the
requirements of this title. The licenses and their annual fees are:

Personal License Annual Fee Governing

(RCW 77.95.090 Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(1) Alternate Operator $ 35 $ 35 RCW 77.65.130

(2) Geoduck Diver $185 $295 RCW 77.65.410

(3) ((Salmon Guide)) (($130)) (($630)) RCW
77.65.370

Fishing Guide $175 $620

(plus $20) (plus $100)

Sec. 5. RCW 77.65.480 and 1991
sp.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A taxidermy license
allows the holder to practice taxidermy for profit. The fee for this license
is one hundred eighty dollars.

(2) A fur dealer's
license allows the holder to purchase, receive, or resell raw furs for profit.
The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars.

(3) ((A fishing
guide license allows the holder to offer or perform the services of a
professional guide in the taking of game fish. The fee for this license is one
hundred eighty dollars for a resident and six hundred dollars for a
nonresident.

(4))) A game farm license allows the holder to
operate a game farm to acquire, breed, grow, keep, and sell wildlife under
conditions prescribed by the rules adopted pursuant to this title. The fee for
this license is seventy-two dollars for the first year and forty-eight dollars
for each following year.

(((5))) (4)
A game fish stocking permit allows the holder to release game fish into the
waters of the state as prescribed by rule of the commission. The fee for this
permit is twenty-four dollars.

(((6))) (5)
A fishing or field trial permit allows the holder to promote, conduct, hold, or
sponsor a fishing or field trial contest in accordance with rules of the
commission. The fee for a fishing contest permit is twenty-four dollars. The
fee for a field trial contest permit is twenty-four dollars.

(((7)))
(6) An anadromous game fish buyer's license allows the holder to
purchase or sell steelhead trout and other anadromous game fish harvested by
Indian ((fishermen)) fishers lawfully exercising fishing rights
reserved by federal statute, treaty, or executive order, under conditions
prescribed by rule of the director. The fee for this license is one hundred
eighty dollars.

---
END ---