BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.04.030 and 2000 c
107 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

The fish
and wildlife commission consists of nine registered voters of the state. In
January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall appoint with the advice
and consent of the senate ((two)) three registered voters to the
commission to serve for terms of six years from that January or until their
successors are appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs on the commission
prior to the expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a registered
voter within sixty days to complete the term. Three members shall be residents
of that portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade mountains,
and three shall be residents of that portion of the state lying west of the
summit of the Cascade mountains. Three additional members shall be appointed
at-large. No two members may be residents of the same county. The legal office
of the commission is at the administrative office of the department in Olympia.

--- END ---