BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.65.160 and 2000 c
107 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following
commercial salmon fishery licenses are required for the license holder to use
the specified gear to fish for salmon in state waters. Only a person who meets
the qualifications of RCW 77.70.090 may hold a license listed in this
subsection. The licenses and their annual fees and surcharges under RCW
77.95.090 are:

Fishery Resident Nonresident Surcharge

License Fee Fee

(a) Salmon Gill Net‑-Grays $380 $685 plus
$100

Harbor-Columbia river

(b) Salmon Gill Net‑-Puget $380 $685 plus $100

Sound

(c) Salmon Gill Net‑-Willapa $380 $685 plus $100

Bay-Columbia river

(d) Salmon purse seine $530 $985 plus $100

(e) Salmon reef net $380 $685 plus $100

(f) Salmon troll $380 $685 plus $100

(2) A license issued
under this section authorizes no taking or delivery of salmon or other food
fish unless a vessel is designated under RCW 77.65.100.

(3) Holders of
commercial salmon fishery licenses may retain incidentally caught food fish
other than salmon, subject to rules of the department.

(4) A salmon troll
license includes a salmon delivery license.

(5) A salmon gill net
license authorizes the taking of salmon only in the geographical area for which
the license is issued. The geographical designations in subsection (1) of this
section have the following meanings:

(a) "Puget
Sound" includes waters of the Strait of Juan de Fuca, Georgia Strait,
Puget Sound and all bays, inlets, canals, coves, sounds, and estuaries lying
easterly and southerly of the international boundary line and a line at the
entrance to the Strait of Juan de Fuca projected northerly from Cape Flattery
to the lighthouse on Tatoosh Island and then to Bonilla Point on Vancouver
Island.

(b) "Grays
Harbor-Columbia river" includes waters of Grays Harbor and tributary
estuaries lying easterly of a line projected northerly from Point Chehalis
Light to Point Brown and those waters of the Columbia river and tributary
sloughs and estuaries easterly of a line at the entrance to the Columbia river
projected southerly from the most westerly point of the North jetty to the most
westerly point of the South jetty.

(c) "Willapa
Bay-Columbia river" includes waters of Willapa Bay and tributary estuaries
and easterly of a line projected northerly from Leadbetter Point to the Cape
Shoalwater tower and those waters of the Columbia river and tributary sloughs described
in (b) of this subsection.

(6) A
commercial salmon troll fishery license may be renewed under this section if
the license holder notifies the department by May 1st of that year that he or
she will not participate in the fishery during that calendar year. A commercial
salmon gill net, reef net, or seine fishery license may be renewed under this
section if the license holder notifies the department ((by August 1st)) before
the third Monday in September of that year that he or she will not
participate in the fishery during that calendar year. The license holder must
pay the one hundred-dollar enhancement surcharge, plus a fifteen-dollar
handling charge before the third Monday in September, in order to be
considered a valid renewal and eligible to renew the license the following
year.

--- END ---