BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.08

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply
to sales of

_8 materials required for courses at institutions of higher

_9 education, subject to the requirements of this section.
The seller

10 shall obtain from the instructor or the institution of
higher

11 education, in good faith, documentation showing that the
materials

12 are required for the course. The seller shall maintain
this

13 documentation as part of the records required under RCW
82.32.070.

14 (2) As used in this section:

15 (a) "Institution of higher education"
means a college or

16 university which is accredited by an accrediting
association

17 recognized as such by rule of the higher education
coordinating

18 board.

p. 1 SB
5448

_1 (b) "Required" means required by the instructor
of a course.

_2 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.12

_3 RCW to read as follows:

_4 The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in
respect to

_5 the use of materials required for courses at
institutions of

_6 higher education. The definitions in section 1 of this
act apply to

_7 this section.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5448 p. 2