BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.35 RCW to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Financial
information" means any of the following information identifiable to the
individual that concerns the amount and conditions of an individual's assets,
liabilities, or credit:

(a) Account numbers and
balances;

(b) Transactional
information concerning an account; and

(c) Codes, passwords,
social security numbers, tax identification numbers, driver's license or permit
numbers, state identicard numbers issued by the department of licensing, and
other information held for the purpose of account access or transaction
initiation.

(2) "Financial
information repository" means a person engaged in the business of
providing services to customers who have a credit, deposit, trust, stock, or
other financial account or relationship with the person.

(3) "Means of
identification" means information or an item that is not describing
finances or credit but is personal to or identifiable with an individual or
other person, including: A current or former name of the person, telephone
number, an electronic address, or identifier of the individual or a member of
his or her family, including the ancestor of the person; information relating
to a change in name, address, telephone number, or electronic address or
identifier of the individual or his or her family; a social security, driver's
license, or tax identification number of the individual or a member of his or
her family; and other information that could be used to identify the person,
including unique biometric data.

(4) "Person"
means a person as defined in RCW 9A.04.110.

(5) "Victim"
means a person whose means of identification or financial information has been
used or transferred with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, any unlawful
activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.35 RCW to read as follows:

INFORMATION AVAILABLE
TO VICTIM. (1) A person, financial information repository, financial service
provider, merchant, corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated
association possessing information relating to an actual or potential violation
of this chapter, and who may have entered into a transaction, provided credit,
products, goods, or services, accepted payment, or otherwise done business with
a person who has used the victim's means of identification, must, upon written
request of the victim, provide copies of all relevant application and
transaction information related to the transaction being alleged as a potential
or actual violation of this chapter. Nothing in this section requires the
information provider to disclose information that it is otherwise prohibited
from disclosing by law, except that a law that prohibits disclosing a person's
information to third parties shall not be used to deny disclosure of such
information to the victim under this section.

(2) Unless the
information provider is otherwise willing to verify the victim's
identification, the victim shall provide the following as proof of positive
identification:

(a) The showing of a
government issued photo identification card or, if providing proof by mail, a
copy of a government issued photo identification card;

(b) A copy of a filed
police report evidencing the victim's claim; and

(c) The written
statement from the state patrol showing that the state patrol has on file
documentation of the victim's identity pursuant to the personal identification
procedures in RCW 43.43.760.

(3) The provider may
require compensation for the reasonable cost of providing the information requested.

(4) No person,
financial information repository, financial service provider, merchant,
corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated association may be held
liable for an action taken in good faith to provide information regarding
potential or actual violations of this chapter to other financial information
repositories, financial service providers, merchants, law enforcement
authorities, victims, or any persons alleging to be a victim who comply with
subsection (2) of this section which evidences the alleged victim's claim for
the purpose of identification and prosecution of violators of this chapter, or
to assist a victim in recovery of fines, restitution, rehabilitation of the
victim's credit, or such other relief as may be appropriate.

(5) A person, financial
information repository, financial service provider, merchant, corporation,
trust, partnership, or unincorporated association may decline to provide
information pursuant to this section when, in the exercise of good faith and
reasonable judgment it believes this section does not require disclosure of the
information.

(6) Nothing in this
section creates an obligation on the part of a person, financial information
repository, financial services provider, merchant, corporation, trust, partnership,
or unincorporated association to retain or maintain information or records that
they are not otherwise required to retain or maintain in the ordinary course of
its business.

(7) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally affecting
the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this section are not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business. It is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. The burden of proof
in an action alleging a violation of this section shall be by a preponderance
of the evidence, and the applicable statute of limitation shall be as set forth
in RCW 19.182.120. For purposes of a judgment awarded pursuant to an action by
a consumer under chapter 19.86 RCW, the consumer shall be awarded actual
damages. However, where there has been willful failure to comply with any
requirement imposed under this section, the consumer shall be awarded actual
damages, a monetary penalty of one thousand dollars, and the costs of the
action together with reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.43.760 and 1985 c
201 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a resident
of this state appears before any law enforcement agency and requests an
impression of his or her fingerprints to be made, such agency may comply
with his or her request and make the required copies of the impressions
on forms marked "Personal Identification". The required copies shall
be forwarded to the section and marked "for personal identification
only".

The section shall
accept and file such fingerprints submitted voluntarily by such resident, for
the purpose of securing a more certain and easy identification in case of
death, injury, loss of memory, or other similar circumstances. Upon the request
of such person, the section shall return his or her identification data.

(2) Whenever a
person claiming to be a victim of identity theft appears before any law
enforcement agency and requests an impression of his or her fingerprints to be
made, such agency may comply with this request and make the required copies of
the impressions on forms marked "Personal Identification." The
required copies shall be forwarded to the section and marked "for personal
identification only."

The section shall
accept and file such fingerprints submitted by such resident, for the purpose
of securing a more certain and easy identification in cases of identity theft.
The section shall provide a statement showing that the victim's impression of
fingerprints has been accepted and filed with the section.

The statement
provided to the victim shall state clearly in twelve-point print:

"The person
holding this statement has claimed to be a victim of identity theft. Pursuant
to chapter 9.35 RCW, a business is required by law to provide this victim with
copies of all relevant application and transaction information related to the
transaction being alleged as a potential or actual identity theft. A business
must provide this information once the victim makes a request in writing, shows
this statement, any government issued photo identification card, and a copy of
a police report."

Upon the request of
such person, the section shall return his or her identification data.

(3) Whenever any
person is an applicant for appointment to any position or is an applicant for
employment or is an applicant for a license to be issued by any governmental
agency, and the law or a regulation of such governmental agency requires that
the applicant be of good moral character or not have been convicted of a crime,
or is an applicant for appointment to or employment with a criminal justice
agency, or the department, the applicant may request any law enforcement agency
to make an impression of his or her fingerprints to be submitted to the
section. The law enforcement agency may comply with such request and make
copies of the impressions on forms marked "applicant", and submit
such copies to the section.

The section shall
accept such fingerprints and shall cause its files to be examined and shall promptly
send to the appointing authority, employer, or licensing authority indicated on
the form of application, a transcript of the record of previous crimes
committed by the person described on the data submitted, or a transcript of the
dependency record information regarding the person described on the data
submitted, or if there is no record of his or her commission of any
crimes, or if there is no dependency record information, a statement to that
effect.

(((3))) (4)
The Washington state patrol shall charge fees for processing of noncriminal
justice system requests for criminal history record information pursuant to
this section which will cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct and
indirect costs to the patrol of processing such requests.

Any law enforcement
agency may charge a fee not to exceed five dollars for the purpose of taking
fingerprint impressions or searching its files of identification for
noncriminal purposes.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.16.250 and 1983 c
107 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No licensee or employee
of a licensee shall:

(1) Directly or
indirectly aid or abet any unlicensed person to engage in business as a
collection agency in this state or receive compensation from such unlicensed
person: PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter shall prevent a licensee from
accepting, as forwardee, claims for collection from a collection agency or
attorney whose place of business is outside the state.

(2) Collect or attempt
to collect a claim by the use of any means contrary to the postal laws and
regulations of the United States postal department.

(3) Publish or post or
cause to be published or posted, any list of debtors commonly known as
"bad debt lists" or threaten to do so. For purposes of this chapter,
a "bad debt list" means any list of natural persons alleged to fail
to honor their lawful debts. However, nothing herein shall be construed to
prohibit a licensee from communicating to its customers or clients by means of
a coded list, the existence of a check dishonored because of insufficient
funds, not sufficient funds or closed account by the financial institution
servicing the debtor's checking account: PROVIDED, That the debtor's identity
is not readily apparent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the licensee complies with the
requirements of subsection (9)(e) of this section.

(4) Have in his
possession or make use of any badge, use a uniform of any law enforcement
agency or any simulation thereof, or make any statements which might be
construed as indicating an official connection with any federal, state, county,
or city law enforcement agency, or any other governmental agency, while engaged
in collection agency business.

(5) Perform any act or
acts, either directly or indirectly, constituting the practice of law.

(6) Advertise for sale
or threaten to advertise for sale any claim as a means of endeavoring to
enforce payment thereof or agreeing to do so for the purpose of soliciting
claims, except where the licensee has acquired claims as an assignee for the
benefit of creditors or where the licensee is acting under court order.

(7) Use any name while
engaged in the making of a demand for any claim other than the name set forth
on his or its current license issued hereunder.

(8) Give or send to any
debtor or cause to be given or sent to any debtor, any notice, letter, message,
or form which represents or implies that a claim exists unless it shall
indicate in clear and legible type:

(a) The name of the
licensee and the city, street, and number at which he is licensed to do
business;

(b) The name of the
original creditor to whom the debtor owed the claim if such name is known to
the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the debtor,
the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the name of such person
and provide this name to the debtor;

(c) If the notice, letter,
message, or form is the first notice to the debtor or if the licensee is
attempting to collect a different amount than indicated in his or its first
notice to the debtor, an itemization of the claim asserted must be made
including:

(i) Amount owing on the
original obligation at the time it was received by the licensee for collection
or by assignment;

(ii) Interest or
service charge, collection costs, or late payment charges, if any, added to the
original obligation by the original creditor, customer or assignor before it
was received by the licensee for collection, if such information is known by
the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the debtor,
the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain information on such items
and provide this information to the debtor;

(iii) Interest or
service charge, if any, added by the licensee or customer or assignor after the
obligation was received by the licensee for collection;

(iv) Collection costs,
if any, that the licensee is attempting to collect;

(v) Attorneys' fees, if
any, that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or its behalf or on the
behalf of a customer or assignor;

(vi) Any other charge
or fee that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or its own behalf or
on the behalf of a customer or assignor.

(9) Communicate or
threaten to communicate, the existence of a claim to a person other than one
who might be reasonably expected to be liable on the claim in any manner other
than through proper legal action, process, or proceedings except under the
following conditions:

(a) A licensee or
employee of a licensee may inform a credit reporting bureau of the existence of
a claim: PROVIDED, That if the licensee or employee of a licensee reports a
claim to a credit reporting bureau, the licensee shall upon receipt of written
notice from the debtor that any part of the claim is disputed, forward a copy
of such written notice to the credit reporting bureau;

(b) A licensee or
employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim may communicate the
existence of a claim to a debtor's employer if the claim has been reduced to a
judgment;

(c) A licensee or
employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim that has not been
reduced to judgment, may communicate the existence of a claim to a debtor's
employer if:

(i) The licensee or
employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his last
known address or place of employment concerning the claim and the debtor after
a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make
payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii) The debtor has not
in writing to the licensee disputed any part of the claim: PROVIDED, That the
licensee or employee may only communicate the existence of a claim which has
not been reduced to judgment to the debtor's employer once unless the debtor's
employer has agreed to additional communications.

(d) A licensee may for
the purpose of locating the debtor or locating assets of the debtor communicate
the existence of a claim to any person who might reasonably be expected to have
knowledge of the whereabouts of a debtor or the location of assets of the
debtor if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment,
when:

(i) The licensee or
employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his last
known address or last known place of employment concerning the claim and the
debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree
to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii) The debtor has not
in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(e) A licensee may
communicate the existence of a claim to its customers or clients if the claim
is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment, when:

(i) The licensee has
notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his last known address
or last known place of employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a
reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make
payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii) The debtor has not
in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(10) Threaten the
debtor with impairment of his credit rating if a claim is not paid.

(11) Communicate with
the debtor after notification in writing from an attorney representing such
debtor that all further communications relative to a claim should be addressed
to the attorney: PROVIDED, That if a licensee requests in writing information
from an attorney regarding such claim and the attorney does not respond within
a reasonable time, the licensee may communicate directly with the debtor until
he or it again receives notification in writing that an attorney is
representing the debtor.

(12) Communicate with a
debtor or anyone else in such a manner as to harass, intimidate, threaten, or
embarrass a debtor, including but not limited to communication at an
unreasonable hour, with unreasonable frequency, by threats of force or violence,
by threats of criminal prosecution, and by use of offensive language. A
communication shall be presumed to have been made for the purposes of
harassment if:

(a) It is made with a
debtor or spouse in any form, manner, or place, more than three times in a
single week;

(b) It is made with a
debtor at his or her place of employment more than one time in a single week;

(c) It is made with the
debtor or spouse at his or her place of residence between the hours of 9:00
p.m. and 7:30 a.m.

(13) Communicate with
the debtor through use of forms or instruments that simulate the form or
appearance of judicial process, the form or appearance of government documents,
or the simulation of a form or appearance of a telegraphic or emergency
message.

(14) Communicate with
the debtor and represent or imply that the existing obligation of the debtor
may be or has been increased by the addition of attorney fees, investigation
fees, service fees, or any other fees or charges when in fact such fees or
charges may not legally be added to the existing obligation of such debtor.

(15) Threaten to take
any action against the debtor which the licensee cannot legally take at the
time the threat is made.

(16) Send any telegram
or make any telephone calls to a debtor or concerning a debt or for the purpose
of demanding payment of a claim or seeking information about a debtor, for
which the charges are payable by the addressee or by the person to whom the
call is made.

(17) In any manner
convey the impression that the licensee is vouched for, bonded to or by, or is
an instrumentality of the state of Washington or any agency or department
thereof.

(18) Collect or attempt
to collect in addition to the principal amount of a claim any sum other than
allowable interest, collection costs or handling fees expressly authorized by
statute, and, in the case of suit, attorney's fees and taxable court costs.

(19) Procure from a
debtor or collect or attempt to collect on any written note, contract,
stipulation, promise or acknowledgment under which a debtor may be required to
pay any sum other than principal, allowable interest, and, in the case of suit,
attorney's fees and taxable court costs.

(20) Upon
notification by a debtor that the debtor disputes all debts arising from a
series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a demand
deposit account, or other preprinted written instruments, initiate oral contact
with a debtor more than one time in an attempt to collect from the debtor debts
arising from the identified series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted
written instruments when: (a) Within the previous one hundred eighty days, in
response to the licensee's attempt to collect the initial debt assigned to the
licensee and arising from the identified series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted
written instruments, the debtor in writing notified the licensee that the
debtor's checkbook or other series of preprinted written instruments was stolen
or fraudulently created; (b) the licensee has received from the debtor a
certified copy of a police report referencing the theft or fraudulent creation
of the checkbook, automated clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit
account, or series of preprinted written instruments; (c) in the written
notification to the licensee or in the police report, the debtor identified the
financial institution where the account was maintained, the account number, the
magnetic ink character recognition number, the full bank routing and transit
number, and the check numbers of the stolen checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, which check numbers included the number of the check that is the
subject of the licensee's collection efforts; (d) the debtor provides, or
within the previous one hundred eighty days provided, to the licensee a legible
copy of a government-issued photo identification which contains the debtor's
signature and which was issued prior to the date of the theft or fraud
identified in the police report; (e) the debtor advised the licensee that the
subject debt is disputed because the identified check, automated clearinghouse
transaction on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written instrument
underlying the debt is a stolen or fraudulently created check or instrument;
and (f) information on the checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a
demand deposit account, or other preprinted written instruments are currently
in the licensee's files that identically match the information provided by the
debtor in (c) of this subsection.

The licensee is not
in violation of this subsection if the licensee initiates oral contact with the
debtor more than one time in an attempt to collect debts arising from the
identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on
a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written instruments when: (i)
The licensee acted in good faith and relied on their established practices and
procedures for batching or packeting debtor accounts, and the licensee
inadvertently initiates oral contact with the debtor in an attempt to collect
debts in the identified series subsequent to the initial debt assigned to the
licensee; (ii) the licensee is following up on collection of a debt assigned to
the licensee, and the debtor has previously requested more information from the
licensee regarding the subject debt; (iii) the debtor has notified the licensee
that the debtor disputes only some, but not all the debts arising from the
identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on
a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written instruments, in which
case the licensee shall be allowed to initiate oral contact with the debtor one
time for each debt arising from the series of identified checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or written instruments
and initiate additional oral contact for those debts that the debtor
acknowledges do not arise from stolen or fraudulently created checks or written
instruments; or (iv) the oral contact is in the context of a judicial,
administrative, arbitration, mediation, or similar proceeding.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.16.250 and 1983 c
107 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No licensee or employee
of a licensee shall:

(1) Directly or
indirectly aid or abet any unlicensed person to engage in business as a collection
agency in this state or receive compensation from such unlicensed person:
PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter shall prevent a licensee from accepting,
as forwardee, claims for collection from a collection agency or attorney whose
place of business is outside the state.

(2) Collect or attempt
to collect a claim by the use of any means contrary to the postal laws and
regulations of the United States postal department.

(3) Publish or post or
cause to be published or posted, any list of debtors commonly known as
"bad debt lists" or threaten to do so. For purposes of this chapter,
a "bad debt list" means any list of natural persons alleged to fail
to honor their lawful debts. However, nothing herein shall be construed to
prohibit a licensee from communicating to its customers or clients by means of
a coded list, the existence of a check dishonored because of insufficient
funds, not sufficient funds or closed account by the financial institution
servicing the debtor's checking account: PROVIDED, That the debtor's identity
is not readily apparent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the licensee complies with the
requirements of subsection (9)(e) of this section.

(4) Have in his possession
or make use of any badge, use a uniform of any law enforcement agency or any
simulation thereof, or make any statements which might be construed as
indicating an official connection with any federal, state, county, or city law
enforcement agency, or any other governmental agency, while engaged in
collection agency business.

(5) Perform any act or
acts, either directly or indirectly, constituting the practice of law.

(6) Advertise for sale
or threaten to advertise for sale any claim as a means of endeavoring to
enforce payment thereof or agreeing to do so for the purpose of soliciting
claims, except where the licensee has acquired claims as an assignee for the
benefit of creditors or where the licensee is acting under court order.

(7) Use any name while
engaged in the making of a demand for any claim other than the name set forth
on his or its current license issued hereunder.

(8) Give or send to any
debtor or cause to be given or sent to any debtor, any notice, letter, message,
or form which represents or implies that a claim exists unless it shall
indicate in clear and legible type:

(a) The name of the
licensee and the city, street, and number at which he is licensed to do
business;

(b) The name of the
original creditor to whom the debtor owed the claim if such name is known to
the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the debtor,
the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the name of such person
and provide this name to the debtor;

(c) If the notice,
letter, message, or form is the first notice to the debtor or if the licensee
is attempting to collect a different amount than indicated in his or its first
notice to the debtor, an itemization of the claim asserted must be made
including:

(i) Amount owing on the
original obligation at the time it was received by the licensee for collection
or by assignment;

(ii) Interest or
service charge, collection costs, or late payment charges, if any, added to the
original obligation by the original creditor, customer or assignor before it
was received by the licensee for collection, if such information is known by
the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the debtor,
the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain information on such items
and provide this information to the debtor;

(iii) Interest or
service charge, if any, added by the licensee or customer or assignor after the
obligation was received by the licensee for collection;

(iv) Collection costs,
if any, that the licensee is attempting to collect;

(v) Attorneys' fees, if
any, that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or its behalf or on the
behalf of a customer or assignor;

(vi) Any other charge
or fee that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or its own behalf or
on the behalf of a customer or assignor.

(9) Communicate or
threaten to communicate, the existence of a claim to a person other than one
who might be reasonably expected to be liable on the claim in any manner other
than through proper legal action, process, or proceedings except under the
following conditions:

(a) A licensee or
employee of a licensee may inform a credit reporting bureau of the existence of
a claim: PROVIDED, That if the licensee or employee of a licensee reports a
claim to a credit reporting bureau, the licensee shall upon receipt of written
notice from the debtor that any part of the claim is disputed, forward a copy
of such written notice to the credit reporting bureau;

(b) A licensee or
employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim may communicate the
existence of a claim to a debtor's employer if the claim has been reduced to a
judgment;

(c) A licensee or
employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim that has not been
reduced to judgment, may communicate the existence of a claim to a debtor's
employer if:

(i) The licensee or
employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his last
known address or place of employment concerning the claim and the debtor after
a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make
payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii) The debtor has not
in writing to the licensee disputed any part of the claim: PROVIDED, That the
licensee or employee may only communicate the existence of a claim which has
not been reduced to judgment to the debtor's employer once unless the debtor's
employer has agreed to additional communications.

(d) A licensee may for
the purpose of locating the debtor or locating assets of the debtor communicate
the existence of a claim to any person who might reasonably be expected to have
knowledge of the whereabouts of a debtor or the location of assets of the
debtor if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment,
when:

(i) The licensee or
employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his last
known address or last known place of employment concerning the claim and the
debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to
agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii) The debtor has not
in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(e) A licensee may
communicate the existence of a claim to its customers or clients if the claim
is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment, when:

(i) The licensee has
notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his last known address
or last known place of employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a
reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make payments
on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii) The debtor has not
in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(10) Threaten the
debtor with impairment of his credit rating if a claim is not paid.

(11) Communicate with
the debtor after notification in writing from an attorney representing such
debtor that all further communications relative to a claim should be addressed
to the attorney: PROVIDED, That if a licensee requests in writing information
from an attorney regarding such claim and the attorney does not respond within
a reasonable time, the licensee may communicate directly with the debtor until
he or it again receives notification in writing that an attorney is
representing the debtor.

(12) Communicate with a
debtor or anyone else in such a manner as to harass, intimidate, threaten, or
embarrass a debtor, including but not limited to communication at an
unreasonable hour, with unreasonable frequency, by threats of force or
violence, by threats of criminal prosecution, and by use of offensive
language. A communication shall be presumed to have been made for the purposes
of harassment if:

(a) It is made with a
debtor or spouse in any form, manner, or place, more than three times in a
single week;

(b) It is made with a
debtor at his or her place of employment more than one time in a single week;

(c) It is made with the
debtor or spouse at his or her place of residence between the hours of 9:00
p.m. and 7:30 a.m.

(13) Communicate with
the debtor through use of forms or instruments that simulate the form or
appearance of judicial process, the form or appearance of government documents,
or the simulation of a form or appearance of a telegraphic or emergency
message.

(14) Communicate with
the debtor and represent or imply that the existing obligation of the debtor
may be or has been increased by the addition of attorney fees, investigation
fees, service fees, or any other fees or charges when in fact such fees or
charges may not legally be added to the existing obligation of such debtor.

(15) Threaten to take
any action against the debtor which the licensee cannot legally take at the
time the threat is made.

(16) Send any telegram
or make any telephone calls to a debtor or concerning a debt or for the purpose
of demanding payment of a claim or seeking information about a debtor, for
which the charges are payable by the addressee or by the person to whom the
call is made.

(17) In any manner
convey the impression that the licensee is vouched for, bonded to or by, or is
an instrumentality of the state of Washington or any agency or department
thereof.

(18) Collect or attempt
to collect in addition to the principal amount of a claim any sum other than
allowable interest, collection costs or handling fees expressly authorized by
statute, and, in the case of suit, attorney's fees and taxable court costs.

(19) Procure from a
debtor or collect or attempt to collect on any written note, contract,
stipulation, promise or acknowledgment under which a debtor may be required to
pay any sum other than principal, allowable interest, and, in the case of suit,
attorney's fees and taxable court costs.

(20) Upon
notification by a debtor that the debtor disputes all debts arising from a
series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a demand
deposit account, or other preprinted written instruments, initiate oral contact
with a debtor more than one time in an attempt to collect from the debtor debts
arising from the identified series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted
written instruments when: (a) Within the previous one hundred eighty days, in
response to the licensee's attempt to collect the initial debt assigned to the
licensee and arising from the identified series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted
written instruments, the debtor in writing notified the licensee that the
debtor's checkbook or other series of preprinted written instruments was stolen
or fraudulently created; (b) the licensee has received from the debtor a
certified copy of a police report referencing the theft or fraudulent creation
of the checkbook, automated clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit
account, or series of preprinted written instruments; (c) in the written
notification to the licensee or in the police report, the debtor identified the
financial institution where the account was maintained, the account number, the
magnetic ink character recognition number, the full bank routing and transit
number, and the check numbers of the stolen checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, which check numbers included the number of the check that is the
subject of the licensee's collection efforts; (d) the debtor provides, or
within the previous one hundred eighty days provided, to the licensee a legible
copy of a government-issued photo identification which contains the debtor's
signature and which was issued prior to the date of the theft or fraud
identified in the police report; and (e) the debtor advised the licensee that
the subject debt is disputed because the identified check, automated
clearinghouse transaction on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted
written instrument underlying the debt is a stolen or fraudulently created
check or instrument.

The licensee is not
in violation of this subsection if the licensee initiates oral contact with the
debtor more than one time in an attempt to collect debts arising from the
identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on
a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written instruments when: (i)
The licensee acted in good faith and relied on their established practices and
procedures for batching or packeting debtor accounts, and the licensee
inadvertently initiates oral contact with the debtor in an attempt to collect
debts in the identified series subsequent to the initial debt assigned to the
licensee; (ii) the licensee is following up on collection of a debt assigned to
the licensee, and the debtor has previously requested more information from the
licensee regarding the subject debt; (iii) the debtor has notified the licensee
that the debtor disputes only some, but not all the debts arising from the
identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on
a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written instruments, in which
case the licensee shall be allowed to initiate oral contact with the debtor one
time for each debt arising from the series of identified checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or written instruments
and initiate additional oral contact for those debts that the debtor acknowledges
do not arise from stolen or fraudulently created checks or written instruments;
or (iv) the oral contact is in the context of a judicial, administrative,
arbitration, mediation, or similar proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 19.182 RCW to read as follows:

BLOCK OF INFORMATION
APPEARING AS A RESULT OF IDENTITY THEFT. (1) Within thirty days of receipt of
proof of the consumer's identification and a copy of a filed police report
evidencing the consumer's claim to be a victim of a violation of RCW 9.35.020,
a consumer reporting agency shall permanently block reporting any information
the consumer identifies on his or her consumer report is a result of a
violation of RCW 9.35.020, so that the information cannot be reported, except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The consumer reporting agency
shall promptly notify the furnisher of the information that a police report has
been filed, that a block has been requested, and the effective date of the
block.

(2) A consumer
reporting agency may decline to block or may rescind any block of consumer
information if, in the exercise of good faith and reasonable judgment, the
consumer reporting agency believes:

(a) The information was
blocked due to a misrepresentation of fact by the consumer relevant to the
request to block under this section;

(b) The consumer agrees
that the blocked information or portions of the blocked information were
blocked in error; or

(c) The consumer
knowingly obtained possession of goods, services, or moneys as a result of the
blocked transaction or transactions or the consumer should have known that he
or she obtained possession of goods, services, or moneys as a result of the
blocked transaction or transactions.

(3) If the block of
information is declined or rescinded under this section, the consumer shall be
notified promptly in the same manner as consumers are notified of the
reinsertion of information pursuant to section 611 of the fair credit reporting
act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681I, as amended. The prior presence of the blocked
information in the consumer reporting agency's file on the consumer is not
evidence of whether the consumer knew or should have known that he or she
obtained possession of any goods, services, or moneys.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 9.35 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the practices covered by RCW 19.16.250, 9.35.010, and 9.35.020 are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of RCW 19.16.250, 9.35.010, and
9.35.020 are not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of
business. A violation of RCW 19.16.250, 9.35.010, and 9.35.020 is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Nothing in RCW
19.16.250, 9.35.010, and 9.35.020 limits a victim's ability to receive treble
damages under RCW 19.86.090.

Sec. 8. RCW 9.35.010 and 1999 c
368 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
obtain or attempt to obtain, or cause to be disclosed or attempt to cause to be
disclosed to any person, financial information from a financial information
repository, financial services provider, merchant, corporation, trust,
partnership, or unincorporated association:

(a) By knowingly making
a false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or representation to an officer,
employee, or agent of a financial information repository with the intent to
deceive the officer, employee, or agent into relying on that statement or
representation for purposes of releasing the financial information;

(b) By knowingly making
a false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or representation to a customer of
a financial information repository, financial services provider, merchant,
corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated association with the
intent to deceive the customer into releasing financial information or
authorizing the release of such information;

(c) By knowingly
providing any document to an officer, employee, or agent of a financial
information repository, financial services provider, merchant, corporation,
trust, partnership, or unincorporated association, knowing that the
document is forged, counterfeit, lost, or stolen; was fraudulently obtained; or
contains a false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or representation, if the
document is provided with the intent to deceive the officer, employee, or agent
to release the financial information.

(2) No person may
request another person to obtain financial information from a financial
information repository, financial services provider, merchant, corporation,
trust, partnership, or unincorporated association and knows or should have
known that the person will obtain or attempt to obtain the information from the
financial institution repository, financial services provider, merchant,
corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated association in any
manner described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) ((As used in
this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Financial
information" means, to the extent it is nonpublic, any of the following
information identifiable to the individual that concerns the amount and
conditions of an individual's assets, liabilities, or credit:

(i) Account numbers
and balances;

(ii) Transactional
information concerning any account; and

(iii) Codes,
passwords, social security numbers, tax identification numbers, driver's
license or permit numbers, state identicard numbers issued by the department of
licensing, and other information held for the purpose of account access or
transaction initiation.

(b) "Financial
information repository" means any person engaged in the business of
providing services to customers who have a credit, deposit, trust, stock, or
other financial account or relationship with the person.

(c)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, or
association.

(4))) No provision of this section shall be
construed so as to prevent any action by a law enforcement agency, or any
officer, employee, or agent of such agency, or any action of an agent of the
financial information repository, financial services provider, merchant,
corporation, trust, partnership, or unincorporated association when working
in conjunction with a law enforcement agency.

(((5))) (4)
This section does not apply to:

(a) Efforts by the
financial information repository to test security procedures or systems of the
financial institution repository for maintaining the confidentiality of
customer information;

(b) Investigation of
alleged employee misconduct or negligence; or

(c) Efforts to recover
financial or personal information of the financial institution obtained or
received by another person in any manner described in subsection (1) or (2) of
this section.

(((6))) (5)
Violation of this section is a class C felony.

(((7))) (6)
A person ((that [who])) who violates this section is liable for
five hundred dollars or actual damages, whichever is greater, and reasonable
attorneys' fees. ((If the person violating this section is a business that
repeatedly violates this section, that person also violates the Consumer
Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW.))

Sec. 9. RCW 9.35.020 and 1999 c
368 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
knowingly obtain, possess, use, or ((knowingly)) transfer
a means of identification or financial information of another person,
living or dead, with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, any ((unlawful
activity harming or intending to harm the person whose identity is used, or for
committing any felony.

(2) For purposes of
this section, "means of identification" means any information or item
that is not describing finances or credit but is personal to or identifiable
with any individual or other person, including any current or former name of
the person, telephone number, and electronic address or identifier of the
individual or any member of his or her family, including the ancestor of such
person; any information relating to a change in name, address, telephone
number, or electronic address or identifier of the individual or his or her
family; any social security, driver's license, or tax identification number of
the individual or any member of his or her family; and other information which
could be used to identify the person, including unique biometric data)) crime.

(((3))) (2)(a)
Violation of this section when the accused or an accomplice uses the
victim's means of identification or financial information and obtains an
aggregate total of credit, money, goods, services, or anything else of value in
excess of one thousand five hundred dollars in value shall constitute identity
theft in the first degree. Identity theft in the first degree is a class B
felony.

(b) Violation of
this section when the accused or an accomplice uses the victim's means of
identification or financial information and obtains an aggregate total of
credit, money, goods, services, or anything else of value that is less than one
thousand five hundred dollars in value, or when no credit, money, goods,
services, or anything of value is obtained shall constitute identity theft in
the second degree. Identity theft in the second degree is a class C
felony.

(((4))) (3)
A person ((that [who])) who violates this section is liable for civil
damages of five hundred dollars or actual damages, whichever is greater,
including costs to repair the ((person's)) victim's credit
record, ((whichever is greater,)) and reasonable attorneys' fees((.
If the person violating this section is a business that repeatedly violates
this section, that person also violates the Consumer Protection Act, chapter
19.86 RCW)) as determined by the court.

(4) In a proceeding
under this section, the crime will be considered to have been committed in any
locality where the person whose means of identification or financial
information was appropriated resides, or in which any part of the offense took
place, regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.

(5) The provisions
of this section do not apply to any person who obtains another person's
driver's license or other form of identification for the sole purpose of
misrepresenting his or her age.

(6) In a proceeding
under this section in which a person's means of identification or financial
information was used without that person's authorization, and when there has
been a conviction, the sentencing court may issue such orders as are necessary
to correct a public record that contains false information resulting from a
violation of this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 9.35.030 and 2000 c
77 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
any person to knowingly use a means of identification or financial
information of another person to solicit undesired mail with the intent to
annoy, harass, intimidate, torment, or embarrass that person.

(2) ((For purposes
of this section, "means of identification" has the meaning provided
in RCW 9.35.020.

(3))) Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(((4))) (3)
Additionally, a person who violates this section is liable for civil damages of
five hundred dollars or actual damages, including costs to repair the person's
credit record, whichever is greater, and reasonable attorneys' fees as
determined by the court.

Sec. 11. RCW 9A.82.010 and 1999 c
143 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1)(a) "Beneficial
interest" means:

(i) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which
the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) The interest of a
person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement under which a trustee
holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
beneficiary; or

(iii) The interest of a
person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement under which one
person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the
other person.

(b) "Beneficial
interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation
or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or limited partnership.

(c) A beneficial
interest is considered to be located where the real property owned by the
trustee is located.

(2) "Control"
means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit substantial direction
over the affairs of an enterprise.

(3)
"Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a person
claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of credit.

(4) "Criminal
profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or completed
offense, committed for financial gain, that is chargeable or indictable under
the laws of the state in which the act occurred and, if the act occurred in a state
other than this state, would be chargeable or indictable under the laws of this
state had the act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and by
imprisonment for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is charged
or indicted, as any of the following:

(a) Murder, as defined
in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b) Robbery, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;

(c) Kidnapping, as
defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d) Forgery, as defined
in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e) Theft, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, and 9A.56.080;

(f) Unlawful sale of
subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g) Theft of
telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication
device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h) Child selling or
child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i) Bribery, as defined
in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j) Gambling, as
defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k) Extortion, as
defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l) Extortionate
extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;

(m) Advancing money for
use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.030;

(n) Collection of an
extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;

(o) Collection of an
unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;

(p) Delivery or
manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or
manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(q) Trafficking in
stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;

(r) Leading organized
crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;

(s) Money laundering,
as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(t) Obstructing
criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(u) Fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(v) Promoting
pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(w) Sexual exploitation
of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;

(x) Promoting
prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(y) Arson, as defined
in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(z) Assault, as defined
in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(aa) Assault of a
child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(bb) A pattern of
equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(cc) Commercial
telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(dd) Trafficking in
insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ee) Unlawful practice
of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(ff) Commercial
bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(gg) Health care false
claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030; ((or))

(hh) Unlicensed
practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW 18.130.190(7);

(ii) Improperly
obtaining financial information, as defined in RCW 9.35.010; or

(jj) Identity theft,
as defined in RCW 9.35.020.

(5) "Dealer in
property" means a person who buys and sells property as a business.

(6) "Debtor"
means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a person who
guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner undertakes
to indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of a person
to whom an extension is made to repay the same.

(7) "Documentary
material" means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing, graph, chart,
photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data
compilation from which information can be obtained or from which information
can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.

(8)
"Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal
entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated
in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and
governmental and nongovernmental entities.

(9) "Extortionate
extension of credit" means an extension of credit with respect to which it
is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time the extension
is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could
result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person,
reputation, or property of any person.

(10) "Extortionate
means" means the use, or an express or implicit threat of use, of violence
or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of
any person.

(11) "Financial
institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association,
savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the
jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.

(12) "Pattern of
criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at least three acts of
criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1, 1985, and the last
of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of imprisonment,
after the commission of the earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to
constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent,
results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be
otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a nexus to
the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events. However, in any civil
proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any person other than the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which one or more acts of
fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability under RCW 9A.82.100
that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of another
state or of the United States requiring the same elements of proof, but such
conviction need not relate to any act or acts asserted as acts of criminal
profiteering activity in such civil action under RCW 9A.82.100.

(13) "Real
property" means any real property or interest in real property, including
but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real property.

(14)
"Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program,
or other material.

(15) "Repayment of
an extension of credit" means the repayment, satisfaction, or discharge in
whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged or disputed, valid or
invalid, resulting from or in connection with that extension of credit.

(16) "Stolen
property" means property that has been obtained by theft, robbery, or
extortion.

(17) "To collect
an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a person to make
repayment thereof.

(18) "To extend
credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter into an agreement, tacit
or express, whereby the repayment or satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether
acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, and however arising, may or shall
be deferred.

(19)
"Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise
dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or
obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute,
dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.

(20)(a) "Trustee"
means:

(i) A person acting as
a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee
holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) A person who holds
legal or record title to real property in which another person has a beneficial
interest; or

(iii) A successor
trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

(b) "Trustee"
does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i) A personal
representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii) A trustee of any
testamentary trust;

(iii) A trustee of any
indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv) A trustee under a
deed of trust.

(21) "Unlawful
debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting principal or
interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in full or in
part because the debt was incurred or contracted:

(a) In violation of any
one of the following:

(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW
relating to horse racing;

(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW
relating to gambling;

(b) In a gambling activity
in violation of federal law; or

(c) In connection with
the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate that is at least
twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal law relating to
usury.

Sec. 12. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2000 c
225 s 5, 2000 c 119 s 17, and 2000 c 66 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity
Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity
Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly
Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 13. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2000
c 66 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION
AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile disposition

disposition category for attempt,

offense bailjump, conspiracy,

category description
(rcw citation) or solicitation

........................................

Arson
and Malicious Mischief

A Arson
1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson
2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless
Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless
Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious
Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious
Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3
(<$50 is

E
class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm

Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary
Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and Other Crimes

Involving Physical Harm

A Assault
1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault
2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault
3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault
4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion
(9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial
Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary
and Trespass

B+ Burglary
1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary
2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession
of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal
Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2
(9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1
(9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle
Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of
Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend
Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession
of Legend

Drug with Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam

Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic
Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of Marihuana
<40 grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining
Controlled

Substance
(69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance

for
Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful
Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms
and Weapons

B Theft
of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol
Without

Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by
Minor (<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous
Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person
by use

of
Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder
1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder
2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter
1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter
2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular
Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap
1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap
2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing Governmental
Operation

D Obstructing a Law
Enforcement

Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting
Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public
Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot
with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse
(9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly
Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape
1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape
2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape
3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape
of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape
of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest
1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest
2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure

(Victim
<14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent
Exposure

(Victim
14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting
Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O
& A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent
Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child
Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child
Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion,
and Forgery

B Theft
1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft
2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft
3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft
of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery
(9A.60.020) D

A Robbery
1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery
2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion
1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion
2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity
Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)(a)) D

D Identity
Theft 2 (9.35.020(2)(b)) E

D Improperly
Obtaining Financial

Information E

B Possession of Stolen
Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen
Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen
Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without

Owner's
Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License

(46.20.005) E

B+ Hit
and Run - Death

(46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury

(46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular
Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing

Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless
Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the
Influence

(46.61.502
and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb
Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape
11
(9A.76.110) C

C Escape
21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape
3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone
Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation
of Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C
offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If
the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose
a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE
SENTENCING STANDARDS

This
schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing
option A, B, or C.

OPTION
A

JUVENILE
OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD
RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the
grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1) The vertical axis
of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is
determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis
of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's
criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point.
Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall
count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range
disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column
defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense
category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies
if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense
that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a
disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court
determines that a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest
injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range
under RCW 13.40.160(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. Section 4 of this act
expires April 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. Section 5 of this act
takes effect April 1, 2004.

---
END ---