BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) All persons in
this state have the

_5 right to be free from crimes of violence motivated by
gender.

_6 (2) In any action, a person who commits a crime of
violence

_7 motivated by gender is liable to the injured party for

_8 compensatory damages, injunctive relief and declaratory
relief,

_9 and any other relief the court deems appropriate.

10 (3) This section does not:

11 (a) Establish a cause of action for random acts of
violence

12 that are unrelated to gender or for acts that cannot be

13 demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence to be
motivated by

14 gender; or

15 (b) Require a prior criminal complaint,
prosecution, or

16 conviction to establish the elements of a cause of
action under

17 subsection (2) of this section.

p. 1 SB
5451

_1 (4) A party who prevails in an action to enforce
this section

_2 shall recover reasonable attorney fees and costs.

_3 (5) For the purposes of this section:

_4 (a) "Crime of violence" means an act or
acts that would

_5 constitute a felony against the person or property if
the act

_6 presents a serious risk of physical injury to another
person,

_7 whether or not the act or acts resulted in criminal
charges,

_8 prosecution, or conviction, and includes any offense
involving

_9 domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020.

10 (b) "Crime of violence motivated by
gender" means a crime of

11 violence that is committed because of gender or on the
basis of

12 gender and that is due at least in part to an animus
based on the

13 victim's gender.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
constitutes a new

15 chapter in Title 7 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5451 p. 2