BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.100 and 1992
c 101 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An authority
shall have and exercise all rights with respect to the construction,
acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension, alteration, repair, control and
management of high capacity transportation system facilities that are
identified in the system plan developed pursuant to RCW 81.104.100 that any
city, county, county transportation authority, metropolitan municipal
corporation, or public transportation benefit area within the authority
boundary has been previously empowered to exercise and such powers shall not
thereafter be exercised by such agencies without the consent of the authority.
Nothing in this chapter shall restrict development, construction, or operation
of a personal rapid transit system by a city or county.

(2) If utility
facilities must be removed or relocated as a result of the construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement of a system, the costs of the removal or
relocation must be included in the costs of the system and paid by the
authority. In no case is the owner, lessee, or occupant of the utility
facilities responsible for the costs. For purposes of this subsection,
"utility facilities" include, but are not limited to, cable
television, gas, electric, and telecommunications facilities.

(3)
An authority may adopt, in whole or in part, and may complete, modify, or
terminate any planning, environmental review, or procurement processes related
to the high capacity transportation system that had been commenced by a joint
regional policy committee or a city, county, county transportation authority,
metropolitan municipality, or public transportation benefit area prior to the
formation of the authority.

--- END ---