BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
department and the commission are prohibited from adopting any rule that
requires a hunter to wear a specific type of clothing or apparel.

--- END ---