BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.86A.030 and 1993
c 512 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Funds held in
public depositaries not as demand deposits as provided in RCW 43.86A.020 and
43.86A.030, shall be available for a time certificate of deposit investment
program according to the following formula: The state treasurer shall
apportion to all participating depositaries an amount equal to five percent of
the three year average mean of general state revenues as certified in
accordance with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or fifty
percent of the total surplus treasury investment availability, whichever is
less. Within thirty days after certification, those funds determined to be
available according to this formula for the time certificate of deposit
investment program shall be deposited in qualified public depositaries. These
deposits shall be allocated among the participating depositaries on a basis to
be determined by the state treasurer.

(2) The state treasurer
may use up to ((fifty)) seventy-five million dollars per year of
all funds available under this section for the purposes of RCW 43.86A.060. The
amounts made available to these public depositaries shall be equal to the
amounts of outstanding loans made under RCW 43.86A.060.

(3) The formula so
devised shall be a matter of public record giving consideration to, but not
limited to deposits, assets, loans, capital structure, investments or some
combination of these factors. However, if in the judgment of the state
treasurer the amount of allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by
this section will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.131.381 (Linked deposit
program--Termination) and 1994 c 126 s 2 & 1993 c 512 s 35; and

(2) RCW 43.131.382 (Linked deposit
program--Repeal) and 1994 c 126 s 3 & 1993 c 512 s 36.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---