BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28C.10.050 and 1990
c 188 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The agency shall
adopt by rule minimum standards for entities operating private
vocational schools. The minimum standards shall include, but not be limited
to, requirements for each school to:

(a) Disclose to the
agency information about its ownership and financial position and to
demonstrate that it has sufficient financial resources to fulfill its
commitments to students. Financial disclosures provided to the agency shall
not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW;

(b) Follow a uniform
state-wide cancellation and refund policy as specified by the agency;

(c) Disclose through
use of a school catalog, brochure, or other written material, necessary
information to students so that students may make informed enrollment
decisions. The agency shall specify what information is required;

(d) Use an enrollment
contract or agreement that includes: (i) The cancellation and refund policy,
(ii) a brief statement that the school is licensed under this chapter and that
inquiries may be made to the agency, and (iii) other necessary information as
determined by the agency;

(e) Describe accurately
and completely in writing to students before their enrollment prerequisites and
requirements for (i) completing successfully the programs of study in which
they are interested and (ii) qualifying for the fields of employment for which
their education is designed;

(f) Comply with the
requirements of RCW 28C.10.084;

(g) Assess the basic
skills and relevant aptitudes of each potential student to determine that a
potential student has the basic skills and relevant aptitudes necessary to
complete and benefit from the program in which the student plans to enroll.
Guidelines for such assessments shall be developed by the agency, in
consultation with the schools. The method of assessment shall be reported to
the agency. Assessment records shall be maintained in the student's file;

(h) Discuss with each
potential student the potential student's obligations in signing any enrollment
contract and/or incurring any debt for educational purposes. The discussion
shall include the inadvisability of acquiring an excessive educational debt
burden that will be difficult to repay given employment opportunities and
average starting salaries in the potential student's chosen occupation.

(2) Any enrollment
contract shall have an attachment in a format provided by the agency. The
attachment shall be signed by both the school and the student. The attachment
shall stipulate that the school has complied with subsection (1)(h) of this
section and that the student understands and accepts his or her
responsibilities in signing any enrollment contract or debt application. The
attachment shall also stipulate that the enrollment contract shall not be
binding for at least five days, excluding Sundays and holidays, following
signature of the enrollment contract by both parties.

(3) The agency shall deny,
revoke, or suspend the license of any school that does not meet or maintain the
minimum standards.

Sec. 2. RCW 28C.10.084 and 1999
c 321 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The agency shall
establish, maintain, and administer a tuition recovery trust fund. All funds
collected for the tuition recovery trust fund are payable to the state for the
benefit and protection of any student or enrollee of a private vocational
school licensed under this chapter, or, in the case of a minor, his or her
parents or guardian, for purposes including but not limited to the settlement
of claims related to school closures under subsection (10) of this section and
the settlement of claims under RCW 28C.10.120. The fund shall be liable for
settlement of claims and costs of administration but shall not be liable to pay
out or recover penalties assessed under RCW 28C.10.130 or 28C.10.140. No
liability accrues to the state of Washington from claims made against the fund.

(2) By June 30, 1998, a
minimum operating balance of one million dollars shall be achieved in the fund
and maintained thereafter. If disbursements reduce the operating balance below
two hundred thousand dollars at any time before June 30, 1998, or below one
million dollars thereafter, each participating ((entity)) owner
shall be assessed a pro rata share of the deficiency created, based upon the
incremental scale created under subsection (6) of this section for each
private vocational school. The agency shall adopt schedules of times and
amounts for effecting payments of assessment.

(3) In order for a
private vocational school to be and remain licensed under this chapter each
((entity)) owner shall, in addition to other requirements under this
chapter, make cash deposits on behalf of the school into a tuition
recovery trust fund as a means to assure payment of claims brought under this
chapter.

(4) The amount of
liability that can be satisfied by this fund on behalf of each ((individual
entity)) private vocational school licensed under this chapter shall
be ((established by the agency, based on an incremental scale that
recognizes the average)) the amount of unearned prepaid tuition in
possession of the ((entity. However, the minimum amount of liability for
any entity shall not be less than five thousand dollars. The upper limit of
liability is reestablished after any disbursements are made to settle an
individual claim or class of claims)) owner.

(5) The fund's
liability with respect to each participating ((entity)) private
vocational school commences on the date of ((its)) the
initial deposit into the fund made on its behalf and ceases one year
from the date ((it)) the school is no longer licensed under this
chapter.

(6) The agency shall
adopt by rule a matrix for calculating the deposits into the fund ((required
of each entity)) on behalf of each vocational school. Proration
shall be determined by factoring the ((entity's)) school's share
of liability in proportion to the aggregated liability of all participants
under the fund by grouping such prorations under the incremental scale created
by subsection (4) of this section. Expressed as a percentage of the total
liability, that figure determines the amount to be contributed when factored
into a fund containing one million dollars. The total amount of its prorated
share, minus the amount paid for initial capitalization, shall be payable in up
to twenty increments over a ten-year period, commencing with the sixth month
after the ((entity makes its)) initial capitalization deposit has
been made on behalf of the school. Additionally, the agency shall require
deposits for initial capitalization, under which the amount each ((entity))
owner deposits is proportionate to ((its)) the school's share
of two hundred thousand dollars, employing the matrix developed under this
subsection. ((The amount thus established shall be deposited by each
applicant for initial licensing before the issuance of such license.))

(7) No vested right or
interests in deposited funds is created or implied for the depositor, either at
any time during the operation of the fund or at any such future time that the
fund may be dissolved. All funds deposited are payable to the state for the
purposes described under this section. The agency shall maintain the fund,
serve appropriate notices to affected ((entities)) owners when
scheduled deposits are due, collect deposits, and make disbursements to settle
claims against the fund. When the aggregated deposits total five million
dollars and the history of disbursements justifies such modifications, the
agency may at its own option reduce the schedule of deposits whether as to
time, amount, or both and the agency may also entertain proposals from among
the licensees with regard to disbursing surplus funds for such purposes as
vocational scholarships.

(8) Based on annual
financial data supplied by the ((entity)) owner, the agency shall
determine whether the increment assigned to that ((entity)) private
vocational school on the incremental scale established under subsection (6)
of this section has changed. If an increase or decrease in gross annual
tuition income has occurred, a corresponding change in ((its)) the
school's incremental position and contribution schedule shall be made
before the date of ((its)) the owner's next scheduled deposit
into the fund. Such adjustments shall only be calculated and applied annually.

(9) ((No deposits
made into the fund by an entity are transferable.)) If the majority
ownership interest in ((an entity)) a private vocational school
is conveyed through sale or other means into different ownership, all
contributions made to the date of transfer ((accrue to)) remain in
the fund. The new owner ((commences contributions under provisions applying
to a new applicant, except that if ownership of an entity is transferred to an
immediate family member,)) shall continue to make contributions to the
fund until the original ten-year cycle is completed. All tuition recovery
trust fund contributions shall remain with the ((entity)) private
vocational school transferred, and no additional cash deposits may be
required beyond the original ten-year contribution cycle.

(10) To settle claims
adjudicated under RCW 28C.10.120 and claims resulting when a private vocational
school ceases to provide educational services, the agency may make
disbursements from the fund. Students enrolled under a training contract
executed between a school and a public or private agency or business are not
eligible to make a claim against the fund. In addition to the processes
described for making reimbursements related to claims under RCW 28C.10.120, the
following procedures are established to deal with reimbursements related to school
closures:

(a) The agency shall
attempt to notify all potential claimants. The unavailability of records and
other circumstances surrounding a school closure may make it impossible or
unreasonable for the agency to ascertain the names and whereabouts of each
potential claimant but the agency shall make reasonable inquiries to secure
that information from all likely sources. The agency shall then proceed to
settle the claims on the basis of information in its possession. The agency is
not responsible or liable for claims or for handling claims that may
subsequently appear or be discovered.

(b) Thirty days after
identified potential claimants have been notified, if a claimant refuses or
neglects to file a claim verification as requested in such notice, the agency
shall be relieved of further duty or action on behalf of the claimant under
this chapter.

(c) After verification
and review, the agency may disburse funds from the tuition recovery trust fund
to settle or compromise the claims. However, the liability of the fund for
claims against the closed ((entity)) school shall not exceed the
((maximum amount of liability assigned to that entity under subsection (6)
of this section)) amount of unearned prepaid tuition in the possession
of the owner.

(d) In the instance of
claims against a closed school, the agency shall seek to recover such disbursed
funds from the assets of the defaulted ((entity)) owner,
including but not limited to asserting claims as a creditor in bankruptcy
proceedings.

(11) When funds are
disbursed to settle claims against a ((current licensee)) licensed
private vocational school, the agency shall make demand upon the ((licensee))
owner for recovery. The agency shall adopt schedules of times and
amounts for effecting recoveries. An ((entity's)) owner's
failure to perform subjects ((its)) the school's license to
suspension or revocation under RCW 28C.10.050 in addition to any other
available remedies.

(12)
For purposes of this section, "owner" includes, but is not limited
to, a person, company, firm, society, association, partnership, corporation, or
trust having a controlling ownership interest in a private vocational school.

Sec. 3. RCW 28C.10.110 and 1990
c 188 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair
business practice for an entity operating a private vocational school or
an agent employed by a private vocational school to:

(1) Fail to comply with
the terms of a student enrollment contract or agreement;

(2) Use an enrollment
contract form, catalog, brochure, or similar written material affecting the
terms and conditions of student enrollment other than that previously submitted
to the agency and authorized for use;

(3) Advertise in the
help wanted section of a newspaper or otherwise represent falsely, directly or
by implication, that the school is an employment agency, is making an offer of
employment or otherwise is attempting to conceal the fact that what is being
represented are course offerings of a school;

(4) Represent falsely,
directly or by implication, that an educational program is approved by a
particular industry or that successful completion of the program qualifies a
student for admission to a labor union or similar organization or for the
receipt of a state license in any business, occupation, or profession;

(5) Represent falsely,
directly or by implication, that a student who successfully completes a course
or program of instruction may transfer credit for the course or program to any
institution of higher education;

(6) Represent falsely,
directly or by implication, in advertising or in any other manner, the school's
size, location, facilities, equipment, faculty qualifications, or the extent or
nature of any approval received from an accrediting association;

(7) Represent that the
school is approved, recommended, or endorsed by the state of Washington or by
the agency, except the fact that the school is authorized to operate under this
chapter may be stated;

(8) Provide prospective
students with any testimonial, endorsement, or other information which has the
tendency to mislead or deceive prospective students or the public regarding
current practices of the school, current conditions for employment
opportunities, or probable earnings in the occupation for which the education
was designed;

(9) Designate or refer
to sales representatives as "counselors," "advisors," or
similar terms which have the tendency to mislead or deceive prospective students
or the public regarding the authority or qualifications of the sales
representatives;

(10) Make or cause to
be made any statement or representation in connection with the offering of
education if the school or agent knows or reasonably should have known the
statement or representation to be false, substantially inaccurate, or
misleading;

(11) Engage in methods
of advertising, sales, collection, credit, or other business practices which
are false, deceptive, misleading, or unfair, as determined by the agency by
rule; or

(12) Attempt to recruit
students in or within forty feet of a building that contains a welfare or
unemployment office. Recruiting includes, but is not limited to canvassing and
surveying. Recruiting does not include leaving materials at or near an office
for a person to pick up of his or her own accord, or handing a brochure or
leaflet to a person provided that no attempt is made to obtain a name, address,
telephone number, or other data, or to otherwise actively pursue the enrollment
of the individual.

It is a
violation of this chapter for an entity operating a private vocational
school to engage in an unfair business practice. The agency may deny,
revoke, or suspend the license of any entity that is found to have engaged in a
substantial number of unfair business practices or that has engaged in
significant unfair business practices.

---
END ---