BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that the educational needs of citizens differ in different regions
of the state. The legislature finds that granting local community and
technical colleges' boards of trustees the authority to set tuition, offer
programs, and build facilities will give community and technical colleges'
boards of trustees the necessary ability to make decisions at the local level
to best serve the educational needs of the citizens in local communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state board for
community and technical colleges shall grant, at the request of a community and
technical college board of trustees, the authority for the board to locally set
the tuition fees charged to full-time students at the community and technical
colleges in the community and technical colleges within that community and
technical college district. The amounts set by the board of trustees may be
above or below the tuition charged in the 2000-01 academic year. Fees may be
adjusted for factors that may include time of day and day of week, as well as
delivery method and campus, to encourage full use of the state's educational facilities
and resources. The tuition rates need not apply uniformly for different
programs or courses. The tuition rates need not apply uniformly across student
categories as defined in this chapter.

(2) To ensure that
students receiving state need grants do not have the value of those grants
diminished as a result of a board of trustees' action under this section, the
board shall provide from tuition revenue collected under this section financial
aid grants to state need grant recipients in an amount that is equal to the
amount of the increase in full-time tuition. The board may not reduce the
proportion of state need grant recipients relative to the total number of
community and technical college students in the prior year as determined by the
higher education coordinating board.

(3) The community and
technical colleges choosing to locally set tuition shall report each biennium
to the office of financial management, the higher education coordinating board,
the state board for community and technical colleges, and the appropriate
committees of the senate and the house of representatives as to how they have
used any funds generated through the tuition increase authorized under this
section.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.50.090 and 1991
c 238 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The college board shall
have general supervision and control over the state system of community and
technical colleges. In addition to the other powers and duties imposed upon
the college board by this chapter, the college board shall be charged with the
following powers, duties and responsibilities:

(1) Review the budgets
prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare a single budget for the support of
the state system of community and technical colleges and adult education, and
submit this budget to the governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;

(2) Establish
guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive and disburse such funds
for adult education and maintenance and operation and capital support of the
college districts in conformance with the state and district budgets, and in
conformance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(3) Ensure, through the
full use of its authority:

(a) That each college
district shall offer thoroughly comprehensive educational, training and service
programs to meet the needs of both the communities and students served by
combining high standards of excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic
and practical courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational nature; and
adult education, including basic skills and general, family, and work force
literacy programs and services. However, technical colleges, and college
districts containing only technical colleges, shall maintain programs solely
for occupational education, basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long
as a need exists, technical colleges may continue those programs, activities,
and services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding May 17,
1991;

(b) That each college
district shall maintain an open-door policy, to the end that no student will be
denied admission because of the location of the student's residence or because
of the student's educational background or ability; that, insofar as is
practical in the judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be
provided to meet the educational and training needs of the community generally
and the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their differing
courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized equally as members
of the student body: PROVIDED, That the administrative officers of a community
or technical college may deny admission to a prospective student or attendance
to an enrolled student if, in their judgment, the student would not be
competent to profit from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by
his or her presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the
college not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection (3)(b)
shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated with a
disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger attending a technical
college;

(4) Prepare a
comprehensive master plan for the development of community and technical
college education and training in the state; and assist the office of financial
management in the preparation of enrollment projections to support plans for
providing adequate college facilities in all areas of the state;

(5) Define and
administer criteria and guidelines for the establishment of new community and
technical colleges or campuses within the existing districts;

(6) Establish criteria
and procedures for modifying district boundary lines consistent with the
purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended and in
accordance therewith make such changes as it deems advisable;

(7) Establish minimum
standards to govern the operation of the community and technical colleges with
respect to:

(a) Qualifications and
credentials of instructional and key administrative personnel, except as
otherwise provided in the state plan for vocational education,

(b) Internal budgeting,
accounting, auditing, and financial procedures as necessary to supplement the
general requirements prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW,

(c) ((The content of
the curriculums and other educational and training programs, and the
requirement for degrees and certificates awarded by the colleges,

(d))) Standard admission policies,

(((e))) (d)
Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;

(8) Establish and
administer criteria and procedures for all capital construction including the
establishment, installation, and expansion of facilities within the various
college districts;

(9) Encourage
innovation in the development of new educational and training programs and
instructional methods; coordinate research efforts to this end; and disseminate
the findings thereof;

(10) Exercise any other
powers, duties and responsibilities necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;

(11) ((Authorize the
various community and technical colleges to offer programs and courses in other
districts when it determines that such action is consistent with the purposes
set forth in RCW 28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended;

(12))) Notwithstanding any other law or statute
regarding the sale of state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all
interest in any community and technical college real and personal property,
except such property as is received by a college district in accordance with
RCW 28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that
such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and technical
college system;

(((13))) (12)
In order that the treasurer for the state board for community and technical
colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may make vendor payments,
the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by the state board providing for
an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of the current biennium and on July 1st
of each succeeding biennium from the state general fund in an amount equal to
twenty-four percent of the average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium
expenditures for the state board for community and technical colleges as
certified by the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by the
state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW: PROVIDED, That the
reimbursement to the state board for actual expenditures incurred in the final
month of each biennium shall be less the initial advance made in such biennium;

(((14))) (13)
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (((12))) (11) of
this section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions thereof
will aid in carrying out the community and technical college programs and may
sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents,
profits and income thereof according to the terms and conditions thereof; and
adopt ((regulations)) rules to govern the receipt and expenditure
of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof;

(((15))) (14)
The college board shall have the power of eminent domain;

(((16))) (15)
Provide general supervision over the state's technical colleges. The president
of each technical college shall report directly to the director of the state
board for community and technical colleges, or the director's designee, until
local control is assumed by a new or existing board of trustees as appropriate,
except that a college president shall have authority over program decisions of
his or her college until the establishment of a board of trustees for that
college. The directors of the vocational-technical institutes on March 1,
1991, shall be designated as the presidents of the new technical colleges.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.50.140 and 1997
c 281 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each board of trustees:

(1) Shall operate all
existing community and technical colleges in its district;

(2) Shall create
comprehensive programs of community and technical college education and
training and maintain an open-door policy in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 28B.50.090(3). However, technical colleges, and college districts
containing only technical colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational
education, basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and services they
offered during the twelve-month period preceding September 1, 1991;

(3) Shall employ for a
period to be fixed by the board a college president for each community and
technical college and, may appoint a president for the district, and fix their
duties and compensation, which may include elements other than salary.
Compensation under this subsection shall not affect but may supplement
retirement, health care, and other benefits that are otherwise applicable to
the presidents as state employees. The board shall also employ for a period to
be fixed by the board members of the faculty and such other administrative
officers and other employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix their
salaries and duties. Compensation and salary increases under this subsection
shall not exceed the amount or percentage established for those purposes in the
state appropriations act by the legislature as allocated to the board of
trustees by the state board for community and technical colleges. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules defining the
permissible elements of compensation under this subsection;

(4) May establish((,
under the approval and direction of the college board,)) new facilities as
community needs and interests demand((. However, the authority of boards of
trustees to purchase or lease major off-campus facilities shall be subject to
the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to RCW
28B.80.340(5)));

(5) May establish or
lease, operate, equip and maintain dormitories, food service facilities,
bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation of
the community and technical college;

(6) May((, with the
approval of the college board,)) borrow money and issue and sell revenue
bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the construction, reconstruction,
erection, equipping with permanent fixtures, demolition and major alteration of
buildings or other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way,
easements, improvements or appurtenances, for dormitories, food service
facilities, and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation
of the community and technical college in accordance with the provisions of RCW
28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where applicable;

(7) May establish fees
and charges for the facilities authorized hereunder, including reasonable rules
((and regulations)) for the government thereof((, not inconsistent
with the rules and regulations of the college board)); each board of
trustees operating a community and technical college may enter into
agreements((, subject to rules and regulations of the college board,))
with owners of facilities to be used for housing regarding the management,
operation, and government of such facilities, and any board entering into such
an agreement may:

(a) Make rules ((and
regulations)) for the government, management and operation of such housing
facilities deemed necessary or advisable; and

(b) Employ necessary
employees to govern, manage and operate the same;

(8) May receive such
gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and bequests of real or personal property
from private sources, as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
whenever the terms and conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the
community and technical college programs as specified by law and the ((regulations))
rules of the state college board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or
expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt ((regulations)) rules
to govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and
income thereof;

(9) May establish and
maintain night schools whenever in the discretion of the board of trustees it
is deemed advisable, and authorize classrooms and other facilities to be used
for summer or night schools, or for public meetings and for any other uses
consistent with the use of such classrooms or facilities for community and
technical college purposes;

(10) May make rules ((and
regulations)) for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned,
operated, or maintained by the district;

(11) Shall prescribe,
with the assistance of the faculty, the course of study in the various
departments of the community and technical college or colleges under its
control, and publish such catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;

(12) May grant to every
student, upon graduation or completion of a course of study, a suitable
diploma, nonbaccalaureate degree or certificate. Technical colleges shall
offer only nonbaccalaureate technical degrees under the rules of the state
board for community and technical colleges that are appropriate to their work
force education and training mission. The primary purpose of this degree is to
lead the individual directly to employment in a specific occupation. Technical
colleges may not offer transfer degrees. The board, upon recommendation of the
faculty, may also confer honorary associate of arts degrees upon persons other
than graduates of the community college, in recognition of their learning or
devotion to education, literature, art, or science. No degree may be conferred
in consideration of the payment of money or the donation of any kind of
property;

(13) Shall enforce the
rules ((and regulations)) prescribed by the state board for community
and technical colleges for the government of community and technical colleges,
students and teachers, and promulgate such rules ((and regulations)) and
perform all other acts not inconsistent with law or rules ((and regulations))
of the state board for community and technical colleges as the board of
trustees may in its discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the
administration of college districts: PROVIDED, That such rules ((and
regulations)) shall include, but not be limited to, rules ((and
regulations)) relating to housing, scholarships, conduct at the various
community and technical college facilities, and discipline: PROVIDED, FURTHER,
That the board of trustees may suspend or expel from community and technical
colleges students who refuse to obey any of the duly promulgated rules ((and
regulations));

(14) May, by written
order filed in its office, delegate to the president or district president any
of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such
delegated powers and duties may be exercised in the name of the district board;

(15) May perform such
other activities consistent with this chapter and not in conflict with the
directives of the college board;

(16) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, may offer educational services on a contractual
basis other than the tuition and fee basis set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW for
a special fee to private or governmental entities, consistent with rules ((and
regulations)) adopted by the state board for community and technical
colleges: PROVIDED, That the whole of such special fee shall go to the college
district and be not less than the full instructional costs of such services
including any salary increases authorized by the legislature for community and
technical college employees during the term of the agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That enrollments generated hereunder shall not be counted toward the official
enrollment level of the college district for state funding purposes;

(17) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, may offer educational services on a contractual
basis, charging tuition and fees as set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW, counting
such enrollments for state funding purposes, and may additionally charge a
special supplemental fee when necessary to cover the full instructional costs
of such services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be subject to review by
the state board for community and technical colleges and to such rules as the
state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure that the sum of the
supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not exceed the projected
total cost of offering the educational service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
enrollments generated by courses offered on the basis of contracts requiring
payment of a share of the normal costs of the course will be discounted to the
percentage provided by the college;

(18) Shall set
tuition fees in accordance with section 2 of this act;

(19) Shall be
authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees that may be formed by the
various boards of trustees; such association may expend any or all of such
funds to submit biennially, or more often if necessary, to the governor and to
the legislature, the recommendations of the association regarding changes which
would affect the efficiency of such association;

(((19))) (20)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340(4), may participate in higher education centers and consortia
that involve any four-year public or independent college or university; and

(((20)))
(21) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities imposed by law
or rule ((and regulation)) of the state board.

---
END ---