BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that many school district employees, including teachers, other certificated
staff, and classified employees, cannot afford to live within reasonable
distances of the areas in which they work making it more difficult for those
employees to maintain vital links with the school community including
participation in after school activities. Housing assistance for school
district employees would help school districts recruit and retain qualified
employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
community, trade, and economic development, in cooperation with the housing
finance commission, shall develop a statewide pilot program to provide down
payment assistance loans to eligible employees of school districts. To be
eligible, the employee's median family income shall be less than one hundred
percent of the area median family income or the state median family income,
whichever is higher, and the loan shall be to purchase the employee's primary
residence.

(2) The department and
the commission shall report to the legislature by December 15, 2001, regarding
the results of the program including information about the number of borrowers
assisted, the average amount of the down payment assistance, and the number of
loans in each school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The sum of two
hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the department of community, trade, and
economic development for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, to be used by
the department of community, trade, and economic development to work in
cooperation with the housing finance commission to develop a statewide pilot
program to provide down payment assistance loans to eligible employees of
school districts.

(2) The
sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2003, to be used by the department of community, trade, and economic
development to work in cooperation with the housing finance commission to
develop a statewide pilot program to provide down payment assistance loans to
eligible employees of school districts.

---
END ---