BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall prepare an annual surplus salmon report. This report shall include the
disposition of adult salmonids that have returned to salmonid hatchery
facilities operated under the jurisdiction of the state that:

(a) Have not been
harvested; and

(b) Were not allowed to
escape for natural spawning.

(2) The report shall
include by species, the number and estimated weight of surplus salmon and
steelhead and a description of the disposition of the adult carcasses
including, but not limited to, the following categories:

(a) Disposed in
landfills;

(b) Transferred to
another government agency for reproductive purposes;

(c) Sold to contract
buyers in the round;

(d) Sold to contract
buyers after spawning;

(e) Transferred to
Native American tribes;

(f) Donated to food
banks; and

(g) Used in stream
nutrient enrichment programs.

(3) The report shall be
compiled by January 1st of each year. Reports for ensuing years shall have a
consistent format to allow for comparisons. The report shall be transmitted to
the governor, the secretary of the senate, and to the chief clerk of the house
of representatives. Copies of the report shall be available to the public upon
request at no charge.

(4) The
report shall also be included in the biennial state of the salmon report
required by RCW 77.85.020 and other similar state reports on salmon.

--- END ---