BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the state needs an increasing number of certified sex offender treatment
providers to treat sexually violent predators and meet the state's commitment
to long-term treatment, help reduce recidivism, and more adequately provide for
the community. The legislature recognizes that these treatment providers offer
a valuable service to the people of Washington and may experience difficulty
maintaining adequate liability protection given the inherent uncertainties of
providing treatment to sexually violent predators. The legislature intends to
provide very limited immunity, for instances of simple negligence only, to
certified sex offender treatment providers for their treatment decisions
involving sexually violent predators released to a less restrictive alternative
under chapter 71.09 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.155.020 and 2000
c 171 s 33 and 2000 c 28 s 38 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter:

(1) "Certified sex
offender treatment provider" means a licensed, certified, or registered
health professional who is certified to examine and treat sex offenders
pursuant to chapters 9.94A and 13.40 RCW ((9.94A.670 and 13.40.160))
and sexually violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(4) "Sex offender
treatment provider" means a person who counsels or treats sex offenders
accused of or convicted of a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.155.030 and 2000
c 171 s 34 and 2000 c 28 s 39 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) No person shall
represent himself or herself as a certified sex offender treatment provider
without first applying for and receiving a certificate pursuant to this
chapter.

(2) Only a certified
sex offender treatment provider may perform or provide the following services:

(a) Evaluations
conducted for the purposes of and pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670 and 13.40.160;

(b) Treatment of
convicted sex offenders who are sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant
to ((RCW 9.94A.670)) chapter 9.94A RCW and adjudicated juvenile
sex offenders who are ordered into treatment pursuant to ((RCW 13.40.160))
chapter 13.40 RCW;

(c) Except as
provided under subsection (3) of this section, treatment of sexually violent
predators who are conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative
pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW.

(3) A certified sex
offender treatment provider may not perform or provide treatment of sexually
violent predators under subsection (2)(c) of this section if the certified sex
offender treatment provider has been:

(a) Convicted of a
sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Convicted in any
other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws of this state would be
classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(c) Suspended or
otherwise restricted from practicing any health care profession by competent
authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A certified sex
offender treatment provider, acting in the course of his or her duties,
providing treatment to a person who has been released to a less restrictive
alternative under chapter 71.09 RCW or to a level III sex offender on community
custody as a court or department ordered condition of sentence is not negligent
because he or she treats a high risk offender; sex offenders are known to have
a risk of reoffense. The treatment provider is not liable for civil damages
resulting from the reoffense of a client unless the treatment provider's acts
or omissions constituted gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
This limited liability provision does not eliminate the treatment provider's
duty to warn of and protect from a client's threatened violent behavior if the
client communicates a serious threat of physical violence against a reasonably
ascertainable victim or victims. This limited liability provision applies only
to the conduct of certified sex offender treatment providers and not the
conduct of the state.

(2) Sex offender
treatment providers who provide services to the department of corrections by
identifying risk factors and notifying the department of risks for the subset
of high risk offenders who are not amenable to treatment and who are under
court order for treatment or supervision are practicing within the scope of
their profession.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Examinations and
treatment of sexually violent predators who are conditionally released to a
less restrictive alternative under this chapter shall be conducted only by sex
offender treatment providers certified by the department of health under
chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court or the department of social and health
services finds that: (a) The court-ordered less restrictive alternative
placement is located in another state; (b) the treatment provider is employed
by the department; or (c)(i) all certified treatment providers become
unavailable to provide treatment within a reasonable geographic distance of the
person's home, as determined in rules adopted by the department of social and
health services; and (ii) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with the
rules adopted by the department of social and health services.

A treatment provider
approved by the department of social and health services under (c) of this
subsection, who is not certified by the department of health, shall consult
with a certified provider during the person's period of treatment to ensure
compliance with the rules adopted by the department of health. The frequency
and content of the consultation shall be based on the recommendation of the
certified provider.

(2) A treatment
provider, whether or not he or she is employed or approved by the department of
social and health services under subsection (1) of this section or otherwise
certified, may not perform or provide treatment of sexually violent predators
under this section if the treatment provider has been:

(a) Convicted of a sex
offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Convicted in any
other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws of this state would be
classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(c) Suspended or
otherwise restricted from practicing any health care profession by competent
authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction.

(3)
Nothing in this section prohibits a qualified expert from examining or
evaluating a sexually violent predator who has been conditionally released for
purposes of presenting an opinion in court proceedings.

---
END ---