BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.106.010 and 1997
c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as
hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meaning:

(1) "Advisory
board" means the state advisory board of plumbers;

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries;

(3)
"Director" means the director of department of labor and industries;

(4) "Fuel gas
piping" means the craft involved in installing, altering, and repairing
natural gas, manufactured gas, liquefied petroleum, or a mixture of these gas
piping systems. "Fuel gas piping" does not include the sealing and
wrapping of the pipe. "Fuel gas piping" is not restricted to
activities occurring only within a building;

(5)
"Installation" means the connecting and the setting in place of all
pipes, fittings, valves, equipment, and any other components of a piping
system. It does not include the routine or random delivery or distribution of
those components or any other materials that make up a piping system;

(6) "Journeyman
fuel gas fitter" means any person who has been issued a certificate of
competency by the department as a journeyman fuel gas fitter;

(7) "Journeyman
pipefitter" means any person who has been issued a certificate of
competency as a journeyman pipefitter by the department;

(8)
"Journeyman plumber" means any person who has been issued a
certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber by the department of
labor and industries as provided in this chapter;

(((5))) (9)
"Medical gas piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high pressure
nitrogen, medical compressed air, and medical vacuum systems;

(((6))) (10)
"Medical gas piping installer" means a journeyman plumber who has
been issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement;

(((7))) (11)
"Pipefitting" means the craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing, and renovating all hydronic heating, steam piping systems, and fuel
gas piping systems. "Pipefitting" does not include the sealing and
wrapping of the pipe. "Pipefitting" is not restricted to activities
occurring only within a building;

(12)
"Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste systems, and
medical gas piping systems within a building. The installation, repair, or
alteration of fuel gas piping systems is not restricted to activities occurring
only within a building. Installation in a water system of water softening
or water treatment equipment is not within the meaning of plumbing as used in
this chapter;

(((8))) (13)
"Specialty plumber" means anyone who has been issued a specialty
certificate of competency limited to installation, maintenance, and repair of
the plumbing or pipefitting of single-family dwellings, duplexes, and
apartment buildings that do not exceed three stories.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.106.020 and 1997
c 326 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
engage in or offer to engage in the trade of plumbing without having a
journeyman plumbing certificate, specialty certificate, temporary
permit, or trainee certificate. A trainee must be supervised by a person who
has a journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, or temporary permit, as
specified in RCW 18.106.070. No contractor may employ a person to engage in or
offer to engage in the trade of plumbing unless the person employed has a
journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, temporary permit, or trainee
certificate. For the purposes of this section, "contractor" means any
person or body of persons, corporate or otherwise, engaged in any work covered
by the provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.27 RCW, or chapter 19.28 RCW, by
way of trade or business. However, in no case shall this section apply to a
contractor who is contracting for work on his or her own residence.

(2) No person may
engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation without having
a certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber and a medical gas piping
installer endorsement. A trainee may engage in medical gas piping installation
if he or she has a training certificate and is supervised by a person with a
medical gas piping installer endorsement. No contractor may employ a person to
engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation unless the
person employed has a certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber and a
medical gas piping installer endorsement.

(3) No person may
engage in or offer to engage in the trade of pipefitting without having a
certificate of competency as a journeyman pipefitter. A trainee may engage in
pipefitting if he or she is supervised as specified in RCW 18.106.070. No
contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in the trade of
pipefitting unless the person employed has a certificate of competency as a
journeyman pipefitter.

(4) No person may
engage in or offer to engage in fuel gas fitting without having a certificate
of competency as a journeyman plumber, specialty plumber, journeyman
pipefitter, or journeyman fuel gas fitter. A trainee may engage in fuel gas
fitting if he or she is supervised as specified in RCW 18.106.070. No
contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in fuel gas
fitting unless the person employed has a certificate of competency as a journeyman
plumber, specialty plumber, journeyman pipefitter, or journeyman fuel gas
fitter.

(5) Violation of
subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of this section is
an infraction. Each day in which a person engages in the trade of plumbing,
pipefitting, or fuel gas piping, in violation of subsection (1) ((or)),
(2), (3), or (4) of this section or employs a person in violation of
subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of this section is
a separate infraction. Each worksite at which a person engages in the trade of
plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas piping, in violation of subsection
(1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of this section or at which a
person is employed in violation of subsection (1) ((or)), (2),
(3), or (4) of this section is a separate infraction.

(((4))) (6)
Notices of infractions for violations of subsection (1) ((or)),
(2), (3), or (4) of this section may be issued to:

(a) The person engaging
in or offering to engage in the trade of plumbing in violation of subsection
(1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of this section;

(b) The contractor in
violation of subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of
this section; and

(c) The contractor's
employee who authorized the work assignment of the person employed in violation
of subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of this
section.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.106.030 and 1997
c 326 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person desiring to
be issued a certificate of competency as provided in this chapter shall deliver
evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that ((said)) the
person has had sufficient experience in as well as demonstrated general
competency in the trade of plumbing or specialty plumbing so as to qualify him or
her to make an application for a certificate of competency as a journeyman
plumber or specialty plumber. Completion of a course of study in the plumbing
trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school accredited by
the work force training and education coordinating board shall constitute
sufficient evidence of experience and competency to enable such person to make
application for a certificate of competency.

Any person desiring to
be issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement shall deliver evidence in
a form prescribed by the department affirming that the person has met the
requirements established by the department for a medical gas piping installer
endorsement.

Any person desiring
to be issued a certificate of competency as a journeyman pipefitter or as a
journeyman fuel gas fitter shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that the person has met the requirements established by
the department for a certificate of competency as a journeyman pipefitter or as
a journeyman fuel gas fitter.

In addition to
supplying the evidence as prescribed in this section, each applicant for a
certificate of competency shall submit an application for such certificate on
such form and in such manner as shall be prescribed by the director of the
department.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.106.050 and 1997
c 326 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department,
with the advice of the advisory board, shall prepare a written examination to
be administered to applicants for certificates of competency for journeyman
plumber ((and)), specialty plumber, journeyman pipefitter, and
journeyman fuel gas fitter. The examination shall be constructed to
determine:

(a) Whether the
applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the technical information and
practical procedures that are identified with the trade of journeyman plumber
((or)), specialty plumber, journeyman pipefitter, or
journeyman fuel gas fitter; and

(b) Whether the
applicant is familiar with the applicable ((plumbing)) codes and the
administrative rules of the department pertaining to ((plumbing and))
plumbers, pipefitters, and fuel gas fitters.

The department shall
administer the examination to eligible persons. All applicants shall, before
taking the examination, pay to the department a fee.

(2) For purposes of the
medical gas piping installer endorsement, the department may enter into a
contract with a nationally recognized testing agency to develop, administer,
and score medical gas piping installer examinations. All applicants shall,
before taking an examination for a medical gas piping installer endorsement,
pay the required examination fee. The department shall set the examination fee
by contract with a nationally recognized testing agency. The fee shall cover
but not exceed the costs of preparing and administering the examination and the
materials necessary to conduct the practical elements of the examination. The
department shall approve training courses and set the fees for training courses
for the medical gas piping installer endorsement.

The department shall
certify the results of the examination, and shall notify the applicant in
writing whether he or she has passed or failed. Any applicant who has failed
the examination may retake the examination, upon the terms and after a period
of time that the director shall set by rule. The director may not limit the
number of times that a person may take the examination.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.106.070 and 1997
c 326 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall issue a certificate of competency to all applicants who have passed the
examination and have paid the fee for the certificate. The certificate shall
bear the date of issuance, and shall expire on the birthdate of the holder
immediately following the date of issuance. The certificate shall be renewable
every other year, upon application, on or before the birthdate of the holder.
A renewal fee shall be assessed for each certificate. If a person fails to
renew the certificate by the renewal date, he or she must pay a doubled fee.
If the person does not renew the certificate within ninety days of the renewal
date, he or she must retake the examination and pay the examination fee.

The journeyman plumber
((and)), specialty plumber, journeyman pipefitter, and
journeyman fuel gas fitter certificates of competency, the medical gas
piping installer endorsement, and the temporary permits provided for in
this chapter grant the holder the right to engage in the work of plumbing,
pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting, as a journeyman plumber, specialty
plumber, journeyman pipefitter, journeyman fuel gas fitter, or medical
gas piping installer, in accordance with their provisions throughout the state
and within any of its political subdivisions on any job or any employment
without additional proof of competency or any other license or permit or fee to
engage in the work. This section does not preclude employees from adhering to
a union security clause in any employment where such a requirement exists.

(2) A person who is
indentured in an apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for
the plumbing ((construction)), pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting
trade or who is learning the plumbing ((construction)), pipefitting,
or fuel gas fitting trade may work in the plumbing ((construction)),
pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting trade if supervised by ((a)) an
appropriate certified journeyman plumber, journeyman pipefitter,
journeyman fuel gas fitter, or ((a)) certified specialty plumber in
that plumber's specialty. All apprentices and individuals learning the
plumbing ((construction)) trade shall obtain a plumbing training
certificate from the department. The certificate shall authorize the holder to
learn the plumbing ((construction)) trade while under the direct
supervision of a journeyman plumber or a specialty plumber working in his or
her specialty. All apprentices and individuals learning the pipefitting
trade shall obtain a pipefitting training certificate from the department. The
certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the pipefitting trade while
under the direct supervision of a journeyman pipefitter. All apprentices and
individuals learning the fuel gas fitting trade shall obtain a fuel gas fitter
installation training certificate from the department. The certificate shall
authorize the holder to learn the fuel gas fitting trade while under the direct
supervision of a journeyman fuel gas fitter, journeyman pipefitter, or
journeyman plumber. The holder of the ((plumbing)) training
certificate shall renew the certificate annually. At the time of renewal, the
holder shall provide the department with an accurate list of the holder's
employers in the ((plumbing construction)) industry for the previous
year and the number of hours worked for each employer. An annual fee shall be
charged for the issuance or renewal of the certificate. The department shall
set the fee by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of
administering and enforcing the trainee certification and supervision
requirements of this chapter. Apprentices and individuals learning the plumbing
((construction)), pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting trade shall
have their ((plumbing)) training certificates in their possession at all
times that they are performing plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting
work. They shall show their certificates to an authorized representative of
the department at the representative's request.

(3) Any person who has
been issued a ((plumbing)) training certificate under this chapter may
work if that person is under supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person
being on the same job site and under the control of ((either a)) an
appropriate journeyman ((plumber)) or an appropriate specialty
plumber who has an applicable certificate of competency issued under this
chapter. ((Either a)) An appropriate journeyman ((plumber))
or an appropriate specialty plumber shall be on the same job site as the
noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working
day unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The ratio of noncertified
individuals to certified journeymen or specialty plumbers working on a job site
shall be: (a) ((From July 28, 1985, through June 30, 1988, not more than
three noncertified plumbers working on any one job site for every certified
journeyman or specialty plumber; (b))) Effective July 1, 1988, not
more than two noncertified plumbers working on any one job site for every
certified specialty plumber or journeyman plumber working as a specialty
plumber; ((and (c))) (b) effective July 1, 1988, not more than
one noncertified plumber working on any one job site for every certified
journeyman plumber working as a journeyman plumber; and (c) effective the
effective date of this section, not more than one noncertified pipefitter for
every journeyman pipefitter, and not more than one noncertified fuel gas fitter
for each fuel gas fitter, journeyman pipefitter, or journeyman plumber.

An individual who has a
current training certificate and who has successfully completed or is currently
enrolled in an approved apprenticeship program or in a technical school program
in the plumbing ((construction)), pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting
trade in a school approved by the work force training and education
coordinating board, may work without direct on-site supervision during the last
six months of meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.

(4) An individual who
has a current training certificate and who has successfully completed or is
currently enrolled in a medical gas piping installer training course approved
by the department may work on medical gas piping systems if the individual is
under the direct supervision of a certified medical gas piping installer who
holds a medical gas piping installer endorsement one hundred percent of a
working day on a one-to-one ratio.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.106.090 and 1985
c 7 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits in lieu of
certificates of competency whenever: (a) A plumber coming into the
state of Washington from another state requests the department for a temporary
permit to engage in the trade of plumbing as a journeyman plumber or as a
specialty plumber; (b) a journeyman pipefitter coming into the state of
Washington from another state requests the department for a temporary permit to
engage in the trade of pipefitting as a journeyman pipefitter; or (c) a fuel
gas fitter coming into the state of Washington from another state requests the
department for a temporary permit to engage in fuel gas fitting, during the
period of time between filing of an application for a certificate as provided
in RCW 18.106.030 ((as now or hereafter amended)) and taking the
examination provided for in RCW 18.106.050((: PROVIDED, That)).

(2) No temporary
permit shall be issued to:

(((1))) (a)
Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a certificate of
competency;

(((2))) (b)
Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the department with such
evidence required under RCW 18.106.030;

(((3))) (c)
To any apprentice plumber or pipefitter.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.106.155 and 1977
ex.s. c 149 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may, upon
payment of the appropriate fees, grant a certificate of competency without
examination to any applicant who is a registered journeyman plumber,
journeyman pipefitter, journeyman fuel gas fitter, or specialty plumber in
any other state whose requirements for registration are at least substantially
equivalent to the requirements of this state, and which extends the same
privileges of reciprocity to journeymen plumbers, journeymen pipefitters,
journeyman fuel gas fitters, or specialty plumbers registered in this
state.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.106.170 and 1983
c 124 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

An authorized
representative of the department may investigate alleged or apparent violations
of this chapter. An authorized representative of the department upon
presentation of credentials may inspect sites at which a person is doing
plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting work for the purpose of
determining whether that person has ((a)) an appropriate certificate
or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter or has an
appropriate training certificate and is supervised by a person who has such
a certificate or permit. Upon request of the authorized representative of the
department, a person doing plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting
work shall produce evidence that the person has ((a)) an appropriate
certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter
or has an appropriate training certificate and is supervised by a person
who has such a certificate or permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. No examination is
required of an applicant for a certificate of competency as a journeyman
pipefitter or as a journeyman fuel gas fitter if the applicant was engaged in a
bona fide business or trade of pipefitting or fuel gas fitting and has
accumulated a minimum of ten thousand hours of experience as a pipefitter or
fuel gas fitter prior to July 1, 2002. Applicants qualifying under this
section shall be issued a certificate by the department of labor and industries
upon making an application as provided in RCW 18.106.030 and paying the fee
required under RCW 18.106.050.

This section expires
one year after the effective date of this act.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.106.180 and 2000
c 171 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

An authorized
representative of the department may issue a notice of infraction as specified
in RCW 18.106.020(((4))) (6) if a person who is doing plumbing,
pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting work or who is offering to do plumbing,
pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting work fails to produce evidence of having a
certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter
or of being supervised by a person who has such a certificate or permit. A
notice of infraction issued under this section shall be personally served on
the person named in the notice by an authorized representative of the
department or sent by certified mail to the last known address provided to the
department of the person named in the notice.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.106.250 and 2000
c 171 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative
law judge shall conduct notice of infraction cases under this chapter pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The burden of proof
is on the department to establish the commission of the infraction by a
preponderance of the evidence. The notice of infraction shall be dismissed if
the defendant establishes that, at the time the notice was issued:

(a) The defendant who
was issued a notice of infraction authorized by RCW 18.106.020(((4)(a)))
(6)(a) had a certificate or permit issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a person who has such a
certificate or permit, or was exempt from this chapter under RCW 18.106.150; or

(b) For the defendant
who was issued a notice of infraction authorized by RCW 18.106.020(((4) (b)
or (c))) (6) (b) or (c), the person employed or supervised by the
defendant has a certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance
with this chapter, was supervised by a person who had such a certificate or
permit, or was exempt from this chapter under RCW 18.106.150.

(3) After consideration
of the evidence and argument, the administrative law judge shall determine
whether the infraction was committed. If it has not been established that the
infraction was committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in
the record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the infraction
was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue findings of fact and
conclusions of law in its decision and order determining whether the infraction
was committed.

(4) An
appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or order shall be to
the superior court. The decision of the superior court is subject only to
discretionary review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

---
END ---