BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
12.40.105 and 1998 c 52 s 5 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 If the losing party fails to pay the judgment within
thirty

_7 days or within the period otherwise ordered by the
court, the

_8 judgment shall be increased by: (1) An amount
sufficient to cover

_9 costs of certification of the judgment under RCW
12.40.110;

10 ((and)) (2) the amount specified in RCW
36.18.012(2); and (3)

11 reasonable collection fees awarded by the court for
work performed

12 to enforce the judgment of up to three hundred
dollars, all of

13 which are without regard to the jurisdictional
limits on the small

14 claims department.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5471