BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that an increasing number of individuals with developmental
disabilities receive services in home and community-based settings and are not
served by the long-term care ombudsman program. The legislature intends to
promote the quality of services and increase consumer protections for
individuals with developmental disabilities by investigating the best method of
providing ombudsman services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall, by December 31, 2001, prepare
and present to the legislature and the governor, directly or by contract, a
report of the feasibility, and advantages and disadvantages, of combining a
developmental disabilities ombudsman program with the long-term care ombudsman
program in chapter 43.190 RCW and the family and children's ombudsman program
in chapter 43.06A RCW. The report shall also incorporate recommendations on
having a single state ombudsman program, serving persons in long-term care,
persons with developmental disabilities, consumers of mental health services,
and persons receiving families and children's services. The report shall
provide recommendations on serving persons with developmental disabilities not
currently being served by any ombudsman program, avoiding duplication of
services, and providing comprehensive services, while respecting the unique
needs of individuals.

---
END ---