BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that dealers located outside Washington sell motor vehicles to
Washington customers and use in-state dealers to facilitate the sales by
preparing the vehicles for delivery and delivering them to the buyers in this
state. The legislature further recognizes that when a selling dealer has a
physical presence or "nexus" in this state it requires payment of the
tax imposed by chapter 82.04 RCW. Selling dealers have nexus in Washington
when the vehicles are located in this state at the time of the sale and are
received by the customer or the customer's agent in this state. The
legislature further finds that businesses with nexus are entitled to an easy,
simple, and efficient method to account for and pay the tax imposed by chapter
82.04 RCW on these sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply to sections 3 and 4 of this act.

(1) "Used
vehicle" or "used motor vehicles" has the meaning ascribed in
RCW 46.04.660.

(2) "New
vehicle" or "new motor vehicle" has the meaning ascribed in RCW
46.70.011(19).

(3) "Courtesy
dealer" means any licensed motor vehicle dealer authorized to prepare or
deliver a new motor vehicle to a customer in this state.

(4)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does
not apply to amounts derived from wholesale sales of used motor vehicles.

(2) This chapter does
not apply to the amount derived from a retail sale of a used vehicle that is
purchased by the lessee of the vehicle at the conclusion of the lease agreement
under an option to purchase provision in that agreement.

(3) This chapter does
not apply to amounts derived by a new car dealer from wholesale sales of new motor
vehicles of the same make to other new car dealers where the sales enable the
dealers to adjust their inventory levels as long as the amount paid by the
purchasing dealer does not exceed the amount paid by the selling dealer in the
acquisition of the vehicle, however, the selling dealer may add reasonable
expenses for the preparation of the vehicle for sale or transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In the payment of
the tax imposed by this chapter on new motor vehicles sold to Washington
customers that are delivered to the customer through courtesy dealers located
in this state, the selling dealer may designate the courtesy dealer as the
agent for the selling dealer in reporting and paying the tax imposed by this
chapter. Upon this designation, it is the duty of each courtesy dealer to pay
the tax imposed by this chapter to the department when the courtesy dealer
files its tax return, except where the selling dealer advises the courtesy
dealer in writing that it will pay the tax directly to the department. Each
courtesy dealer who acts as the agent for the selling dealer in reporting,
paying, and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter must at the time of paying
and remitting its own taxes imposed by this chapter pay the tax due on the
transaction under this section. The courtesy dealer is authorized to withhold
payment to the selling dealer out of the proceeds of the sale an amount equal
to the tax imposed by this chapter. Amounts withheld by the courtesy dealer
are deemed to be held in trust by the courtesy dealer until paid to the
department, and any courtesy dealer who appropriates or converts the amount
withheld to the courtesy dealer's own use or to any use other than the payment
of the tax to the extent that the money withheld is not available for payment
on the due date is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. Any selling dealer who fails
to designate a courtesy dealer as its agent for payment of the tax imposed by
this chapter must register with the department and report and pay tax in the
same manner as other registered businesses. Selling dealers who designate
courtesy dealers as their agents for payment of the tax imposed by this chapter
and whose only taxable activity in Washington is selling through designated
courtesy dealers are relieved of the duty to register with the department.

(2) This section is
construed as cumulative of other methods prescribed in chapter 82.04 through
82.32 RCW, inclusive, for the collection of the tax imposed by this chapter.
The department has power to adopt rules necessary to administer this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

Every courtesy dealer,
as defined in section 2 of this act, under section 4 of this act is deemed the
seller within the meaning of this chapter and subject to all its provisions
with respect to those sales made by selling dealers for which the courtesy dealer
reports and pays the tax imposed by chapter 82.04 RCW. Every courtesy dealer
must collect and remit the amount of tax due under this chapter with respect to
those sales made by selling dealers for which the courtesy dealer reports and
pays the tax imposed by chapter 82.04 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---