BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. For the purposes of this
chapter:

(1) "Credit
card" means a card or device issued under an agreement by which the issuer
gives to a cardholder residing in this state the privilege of obtaining credit
from the issuer or other persons in purchasing or leasing property or services,
obtaining loans, or otherwise.

(2) "Credit card
issuer" means a financial institution, a lender other than a financial
institution, or a merchant that receives applications and issues credit cards
to individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A credit card issuer may
not issue a credit card to a person who is a resident of this state and who is
under twenty-one years of age at the time of application unless:

(1) A written
application is obtained in which an applicant indicates a list of all approved
but unused credit available to the applicant, by amount and source, and a
statement by the applicant indicating the applicant's age; and

(2) The applicant
qualifies for credit under reasonable and prudent standards used in the
industry for extensions of similar credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Except where the
applicant has misrepresented information required under section 2(1) of this
act, failure of the credit card issuer to comply with section 2 of this act
constitutes an affirmative defense to the collection of debt incurred by using
the card or credit issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Credit card issuers may
not offer gifts in exchange for the completion of a credit card application as
part of a marketing program conducted on any campus of a college or university
located in this state. This section does not preclude a credit card issuer
from providing educational information regarding personal financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

The sale or other
transfer of lists of student names and addresses or other identifiers by any
college or university in this state to credit card issuers or affiliates of
credit card issuers is prohibited.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---