BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.57A.110 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 270 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public
transportation benefit area shall have and exercise all rights with respect to
the construction, acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension, alteration,
repair, control and management of passenger transportation which any component
city ((shall have)) has been previously empowered to exercise,
and such powers shall not thereafter be exercised by such component cities
without the consent of the public transportation benefit area((: PROVIDED,
That any)). A city owning and operating a public transportation
system on July 1, 1975, may continue to operate such system within such
city until such system ((shall have)) has been acquired by the
public transportation benefit area, and a public transportation benefit
area may not acquire such system without the consent of the city council of
such city except as provided by subsection (2) of this section.

(2) In a county with
a population over one hundred fifty thousand where a public transportation
benefit area and a city both operate a public transportation system, the county
shall submit a ballot proposition to the voters of the city on the question of
whether the public transportation benefit area shall acquire the public
transportation system owned by the city. The ballot proposition must state
that approval of the ballot proposition constitutes agreement that the city is
subject to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations of the public
transportation benefit area. The vote must take place before January 1, 2002,
and a simple majority authorizes acquisition. Upon a favorable vote, the city
is included within the boundaries of the transportation benefit area and is
subject to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations of the public
transportation benefit area. Public transportation facilities and properties
that are owned by the city become the property of the public transportation
benefit area. The public transportation benefit area shall compensate the city
for the fair market value of the facilities and properties acquired by the
public transportation benefit area.

(3) Upon a favorable
vote in the election required by subsection (2) of this section, the
representatives of the public transportation benefit area's component cities
and counties shall meet within ninety days to review and change the composition
of the governing body, if the change is deemed appropriate.

(4) The requirements
of RCW 36.57A.140 do not apply to the acquisition of a public transportation
system under subsection (2) of this section.

(5) If the ballot
proposition fails, the city shall pay the public transportation benefit area
for services rendered as provided for in RCW 36.57A.130.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.57A.130 and 1983
c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
treasurer of the county in which a public transportation benefit area authority
is located shall be ex officio treasurer of the authority. In the case of a
multicounty public transportation benefit area the county treasurer of the
largest component county, by population, shall be the treasurer of the
authority. However, the authority, by resolution, and upon the approval of the
county treasurer, may designate some other person having experience in
financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the authority. Such a treasurer
shall possess all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties the county
treasurer possesses for a public transportation benefit area authority related
to investing surplus authority funds. The authority may (and if the treasurer
is not a county treasurer, it shall) require a bond with a surety company
authorized to do business in the state of Washington in an amount and under the
terms and conditions the authority, by resolution, from time to time finds will
protect the authority against loss. The premium on any such bond shall be paid
by the authority.

(2) All
authority funds shall be paid to the treasurer and shall be disbursed by the
treasurer only on warrants issued by the county auditor, upon orders or
vouchers approved by the authority. However, the authority may, by resolution,
designate some person having experience in financial or fiscal matters, other
than the county auditor, as the auditor of the authority. Such an auditor
shall possess all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties that the county
auditor possesses for a public transportation benefit area authority related to
creating and maintaining funds, issuing warrants, and maintaining a record of
receipts and disbursements.

((The treasurer
shall establish a "transportation fund," into which shall be paid))
(3) All authority funds must be paid into the multimodal fund,
and the treasurer shall maintain such special accounts as may be created by the
authority into which shall be placed all money as the authority may, by
resolution, direct.

(4) If the
treasurer of the authority is a treasurer of the county, all authority funds
shall be deposited with the county depositary under the same restrictions,
contracts, and security as provided for county depositaries. If the treasurer
of the authority is some other person, all funds shall be deposited in such
bank or banks authorized to do business in this state that have qualified for
insured deposits under any federal deposit insurance act as the authority, by
resolution, shall designate.

(5) An authority
may provide and require a reasonable bond of any other person handling moneys
or securities of the authority, but the authority shall pay the premium on the
bond.

(6) The county
or counties and each city or town which is included in the authority shall
contribute such sums towards the expense for maintaining and operating the
public transportation system as shall be agreed upon between them. After
January 1, 2002, in a county where a public transportation benefit area and a
city both operate a public transportation system, the city shall annually pay
the public transportation benefit area:

(a) The average
subsidy per passenger of the public transportation benefit area multiplied by
the number of unlinked passenger trips made by that city's residents on the
public transportation benefit area transportation system; plus

(b) The depreciation
expenses of the public transportation benefit area, divided by the combined
population of the public transportation benefit area and the city, multiplied
by the population of the city.

(7) The
public transportation benefit area shall determine the amount of the subsidy in
subsection (6) of this section, by adding the total operating expenses for all
modes of transportation in the public transportation benefit area minus the
fare revenues, divided by the total number of unlinked trips for all modes, as
determined by the most recent National Database figures for that system. The
number of unlinked passenger trips made by that city's residents will be
determined by the most recent on-board rider surveys performed biennially by an
independent consultant. The public transportation benefit area and the city
shall equally share the cost of the survey.

---
END ---