BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that public health hazards associated with environmental lead exposure
represent a significant and preventable public health problem. Lead negatively
affects every system of the body. It is harmful to individuals of all ages and
is especially harmful to children, fetuses, and adults of child-bearing age.
The effects of lead on a child's cognitive, behavioral, and developmental
abilities may necessitate large expenditures of public funds for health care
and special education. The irreversible damage to children and subsequent
expenditures could be avoided if exposure to lead is reduced.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The department of health
is directed to implement a public health education program aimed at reducing
childhood exposure to lead in residential settings. The program will continue
the current efforts of the department to identify areas around the state where
lead exposure poses a threat to children and families, and will provide
information, education, and training to areas of concern. The program will
especially focus on older housing stock, and the residential hazards of
lead-based paint. The department is directed to seek federal funding for the
lead hazards education project and to operate it using these funds.

---
END ---