BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited
as the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. In this
chapter:

(1) "Agency
contract" means an agreement in which a student-athlete authorizes a
person to negotiate or solicit on behalf of the student-athlete a
professional-sports-services contract or an endorsement contract.

(2) "Athlete
agent" means an individual who enters into an agency contract with a
student-athlete or, directly or indirectly, recruits or solicits a
student-athlete to enter into an agency contract. The term does not include a
spouse, parent, sibling, grandparent, or guardian of the student-athlete or an
individual acting solely on behalf of a professional sports team or
professional sports organization. The term includes an individual who
represents to the public that the individual is an athlete agent.

(3) "Athletic
director" means an individual responsible for administering the overall
athletic program of an educational institution or, if an educational
institution has separately administered athletic programs for male students and
female students, the athletic program for males or the athletic program for
females, as appropriate.

(4) "Contact"
means a communication, direct or indirect, between an athlete agent and a
student-athlete, to recruit or solicit the student-athlete to enter into an
agency contract.

(5)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(6) "Endorsement
contract" means an agreement under which a student-athlete is employed or
receives consideration to use on behalf of the other party any value that the
student-athlete may have because of publicity, reputation, following, or fame
obtained because of athletic ability or performance.

(7)
"Intercollegiate sport" means a sport played at the collegiate level
for which eligibility requirements for participation by a student-athlete are
established by a national association for the promotion or regulation of
collegiate athletics.

(8) "Licensure"
means licensure as an athlete agent pursuant to this chapter.

(9) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint venture, or government;
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or
any other legal or commercial entity.

(10)
"Professional-sports-services contract" means an agreement under
which an individual is employed or agrees to render services as a player on a
professional sports team, with a professional sports organization, or as a
professional athlete.

(11) "Record"
means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in
an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(12) "State"
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States.

(13)
"Student-athlete" means an individual who engages in, is eligible to
engage in, or may be eligible in the future to engage in, any intercollegiate
sport. If an individual is permanently ineligible to participate in a
particular intercollegiate sport, the individual is not a student-athlete for
purposes of that sport.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. ADMINISTRATION‑‑SERVICE
OF PROCESS‑‑ SUBPOENAS. (1) The department shall administer this
chapter.

(2) By engaging in the
business of an athlete agent in this state, a nonresident individual appoints
the director of the department as the individual's agent to accept service of
process in any civil action related to the individual's business as an athlete
agent in this state.

(3) The department may
issue subpoenas for any relevant material under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. ATHLETE AGENTS‑‑LICENSURE
REQUIRED. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
an individual may not act as an athlete agent in this state before being issued
a certificate of licensure under section 6 or 8 of this act.

(2) An individual may
act as an athlete agent before being issued a certificate of licensure for all
purposes except signing an agency contract if:

(a) A student-athlete
or another acting on behalf of the student-athlete initiates communication with
the individual; and

(b) Within seven days
after an initial act as an athlete agent, the individual submits an application
for licensure as an athlete agent in this state.

(3) An agency contract
resulting from conduct in violation of this section is void. The athlete agent
shall return any consideration received under the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. LICENSURE AS ATHLETE AGENT‑‑FORM‑‑
REQUIREMENTS. (1) An applicant for licensure shall submit an application for
licensure to the department in a form prescribed by the department. An
application filed under this section is a public record. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the application must be in the name
of an individual and signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury and must
state or contain:

(a) The name of the
applicant and the address of the applicant's principal place of business;

(b) The name of the
applicant's business or employer, if applicable;

(c) Any business or
occupation engaged in by the applicant for the five years next preceding the
date of submission of the application;

(d) A description of
the applicant's:

(i) Formal training as
an athlete agent;

(ii) Practical
experience as an athlete agent; and

(iii) Educational
background relating to the applicant's activities as an athlete agent;

(e) The names and
addresses of three individuals not related to the applicant who are willing to
serve as references;

(f) The name, sport,
and last known team for each individual for whom the applicant provided
services as an athlete agent during the five years next preceding the date of
submission of the application;

(g) The names and
addresses of all persons who are:

(i) With respect to the
athlete agent's business if it is not a corporation, the partners, officers,
associates, or profit-sharers; and

(ii) With respect to a
corporation employing the athlete agent, the officers, directors, and any
shareholder of the corporation with a five percent or greater interest;

(h) Whether the
applicant or any other person named pursuant to (g) of this subsection has been
convicted of a crime that, if committed in this state, would be a felony or
other crime involving moral turpitude, and identify the crime;

(i) Whether there has
been any administrative or judicial determination that the applicant or any
other person named pursuant to (g) of this subsection has made a false,
misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent representation;

(j) Any instance in
which the conduct of the applicant or any other person named pursuant to (g) of
this subsection resulted in the imposition of a sanction, suspension, or
declaration of ineligibility to participate in an interscholastic or
intercollegiate athletic event on a student-athlete or educational institution;

(k) Any sanction,
suspension, or disciplinary action taken against the applicant or any other
person named pursuant to (g) of this subsection arising out of occupational or
professional conduct; and

(l) Whether there has
been any denial of an application for, suspension or revocation of, or refusal
to renew, the registration or licensure of the applicant or any other person
named pursuant to (g) of this subsection as an athlete agent in any state.

(2) An individual who
has submitted an application for, and received a certificate of, registration
or licensure as an athlete agent in another state may submit a copy of the
application and a valid certificate of registration or licensure from the other
state in lieu of submitting an application in the form prescribed pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section. The department shall accept the application
and the certificate from the other state as an application for licensure in
this state if the application to the other state:

(a) Was submitted in
the other state within the six months next preceding the submission of the
application in this state and the applicant certifies the information contained
in the application is current;

(b) Contains
information substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required
in an application submitted in this state; and

(c) Was signed by the
applicant under penalty of perjury.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. CERTIFICATE OF LICENSURE‑‑ISSUANCE
OR DENIAL‑‑RENEWAL. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(3) of this section, the department shall issue a certificate of licensure to
an individual who complies with section 5(1) of this act.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department shall issue a
certificate of licensure to an individual whose application has been accepted
under section 5(2) of this act.

(3) The department may
refuse to issue a certificate of licensure if the department determines that
the applicant has engaged in conduct that has a significant adverse effect on
the applicant's fitness to serve as an athlete agent. In making the
determination, the department may consider whether the applicant has:

(a) Been convicted of a
crime that, if committed in this state, would be a felony or other crime
involving moral turpitude;

(b) Made a materially
false, misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent representation as an athlete agent
or in the application;

(c) Engaged in conduct
that would disqualify the applicant from serving in a fiduciary capacity;

(d) Engaged in conduct
prohibited by section 14 of this act;

(e) Had a registration
or licensure as an athlete agent suspended, revoked, or denied or been refused
renewal of registration or licensure in any state;

(f) Engaged in conduct
or failed to engage in conduct the consequence of which was that a sanction,
suspension, or declaration of ineligibility to participate in an
interscholastic or intercollegiate athletic event was imposed on a
student-athlete or educational institution; or

(g) Engaged in conduct
that significantly adversely reflects on the applicant's credibility, honesty,
or integrity.

(4) In making a
determination under subsection (3) of this section, the department shall
consider:

(a) How recently the
conduct occurred;

(b) The nature of the
conduct and the context in which it occurred; and

(c) Any other relevant
conduct of the applicant.

(5) An athlete agent
may apply to renew licensure by submitting an application for renewal in a form
prescribed by the department. An application filed under this section is a
public record. The application for renewal must be signed by the applicant
under penalty of perjury and must contain current information on all matters
required in an original application for licensure.

(6) An individual who
has submitted an application for renewal of registration or licensure in
another state, in lieu of submitting an application for renewal in the form
prescribed pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, may file a copy of the
application for renewal and a valid certificate of registration or licensure
from the other state. The department shall accept the application for renewal
from the other state as an application for renewal in this state if the
application to the other state:

(a) Was submitted in
the other state within the last six months and the applicant certifies the
information contained in the application for renewal is current;

(b) Contains
information substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required
in an application for renewal submitted in this state; and

(c) Was signed by the
applicant under penalty of perjury.

(7) A certificate of
licensure or a renewal of licensure is valid for two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. SUSPENSION, REVOCATION,
OR REFUSAL TO RENEW LICENSURE. (1) The department may suspend, revoke, or
refuse to renew licensure for conduct that would have justified denial of licensure
under section 6(3) of this act.

(2) The department may
deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew licensure only after proper notice
and an opportunity for a hearing. Chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act, applies to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. TEMPORARY LICENSURE. The
department may issue a temporary certificate of licensure while an application
for licensure or renewal is pending. A temporary license is valid for no more
than sixty days from the date of application for licensure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. LICENSURE AND RENEWAL
FEE. (1) An application for licensure or renewal of licensure must be
accompanied by a fee in the following amount:

(a) Three hundred
dollars for an initial application for licensure;

(b) Three hundred
dollars for an application for licensure based upon a certificate of
registration or licensure issued by another state;

(c) Three hundred
dollars for an application for renewal of licensure; or

(d) Three hundred
dollars for an application for renewal of licensure based upon an application
for renewal of registration or licensure submitted in another state.

(2) The amount of fees
specified in this section are exempt from the requirements of RCW 43.24.086 and
shall expire on December 31, 2003. After December 31, 2003, the amount of the
fees shall be established by the department by rule pursuant to RCW 43.24.086.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. FORM OF CONTRACT. (1) An
agency contract must be in a record signed by the parties.

(2) An agency contract
must state or contain:

(a) The amount and
method of calculating the consideration to be paid by the student-athlete for
services to be provided by the athlete agent under the contract and any other
consideration the athlete agent has received or will receive from any other
source for entering into the contract or for providing the services;

(b) The name of any
person not listed in the application for licensure or renewal who will be
compensated because the student athlete signed the agency contract;

(c) A description of
any expenses that the student-athlete agrees to reimburse;

(d) A description of
the services to be provided to the student-athlete;

(e) The duration of the
contract; and

(f) The date of
execution.

(3) An agency contract
must contain, in close proximity to the signature of the student-athlete, a
conspicuous notice in boldface type in capital letters stating:

WARNING
TO STUDENT-ATHLETE

IF YOU SIGN THIS
CONTRACT:

(1) YOU MAY LOSE
YOUR ELIGIBILITY TO COMPETE AS A STUDENT-ATHLETE IN YOUR SPORT;

(2) BOTH YOU AND
YOUR ATHLETE AGENT ARE REQUIRED TO TELL YOUR ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, IF YOU HAVE AN
ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO HOURS PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO AN AGENCY
CONTRACT AND AGAIN WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO HOURS AFTER ENTERING INTO AN AGENCY
CONTRACT; AND

(3) YOU MAY CANCEL
THIS CONTRACT WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS AFTER SIGNING IT. CANCELLATION OF THE
CONTRACT MAY NOT REINSTATE YOUR ELIGIBILITY.

(4) An agency contract
that does not conform to this section is voidable by the student-athlete.

(5) The athlete agent
shall give a copy of the signed agency contract to the student-athlete at the
time of signing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. NOTICE TO EDUCATIONAL
INSTITUTION. (1) Within seventy-two hours prior to entering into an agency
contract, the athlete agent shall give notice in a record of the existence of
the contract to the athletic director of the educational institution at which
the student-athlete is enrolled or the athlete agent has reasonable grounds to
believe the student-athlete intends to enroll.

(2) Within seventy-two
hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next scheduled
athletic event in which the student-athlete may participate, whichever occurs
first, the athlete agent shall give notice in a record of the existence of the
contract to the athletic director of the educational institution at which the
student-athlete is enrolled or the athlete agent has reasonable grounds to
believe the student-athlete intends to enroll.

(3) Within seventy-two
hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next athletic event
in which the student-athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the student-athlete
shall inform the athletic director of the educational institution at which the
student-athlete is enrolled that he or she has entered into an agency contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. STUDENT-ATHLETE'S RIGHT
TO CANCEL. (1) A student-athlete may cancel an agency contract by giving
notice in a record to the athlete agent of the cancellation within fourteen
days after the contract is signed.

(2) A student-athlete
may not waive the right to cancel an agency contract.

(3) If a
student-athlete cancels an agency contract, the student-athlete is not required
to pay any consideration under the contract or to return any consideration
received from the agent to induce the student-athlete to enter into the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. REQUIRED RECORDS. (1) An
athlete agent shall retain the following records for a period of five years:

(a) The name and
address of each individual represented by the athlete agent;

(b) Any agency contract
entered into by the athlete agent; and

(c) Any direct costs
incurred by the athlete agent in the recruitment or solicitation of a
student-athlete.

(2) Records required by
subsection (1) of this section to be retained are open to inspection by the
department during normal business hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. PROHIBITED ACTS. (1) An
athlete agent may not do any of the following with the intent to induce a
student-athlete to enter into an agency contract:

(a) Give any materially
false or misleading information or make a materially false promise or
representation;

(b) Furnish anything of
value to a student-athlete before the student-athlete enters into the agency
contract; or

(c) Furnish anything of
value to any individual other than the student-athlete or another licensed
athlete agent.

(2) An athlete agent
may not intentionally:

(a) Initiate contact
with a student-athlete unless licensed under this chapter;

(b) Refuse or willfully
fail to retain or permit inspection of the records required by section 13 of
this act;

(c) Violate section 4
of this act by failing to be licensed;

(d) Provide materially
false or misleading information in an application for licensure or renewal of
licensure;

(e) Predate or postdate
an agency contract; or

(f) Fail to notify a
student-athlete prior to the student-athlete's signing an agency contract for a
particular sport that the signing by the student-athlete may make the
student-athlete ineligible to participate as a student-athlete in that sport.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. CRIMINAL PENALTIES. The
commission of any act prohibited by section 14 of this act by an athlete agent
is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW. In addition to
any criminal penalties, the court may assess a civil penalty of up to ten
thousand dollars for a violation of section 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. CIVIL REMEDIES. (1) An
educational institution has a right of action against an athlete agent or a
former student-athlete for damages caused by a violation of this chapter. In
an action under this section, the court may award to the prevailing party costs
and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(2) Damages of an
educational institution under subsection (1) of this section include losses and
expenses incurred because, as a result of the activities of an athlete agent or
former student-athlete, the educational institution was injured by a violation
of this chapter or was penalized, disqualified, or suspended from participation
in athletics by a national association for the promotion and regulation of
athletics, by an athletic conference, or by reasonable self-imposed
disciplinary action taken to mitigate sanctions.

(3) A right of action
under this section does not accrue until the educational institution discovers
or by the exercise of reasonable diligence would have discovered the violation
by the athlete agent or former student-athlete.

(4) Any liability of
the athlete agent or the former student-athlete under this section is several
and not joint.

(5) This chapter does
not restrict rights, remedies, or defenses of any person under law or equity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY.
The department may assess a civil penalty against an athlete agent not to
exceed twenty-five thousand dollars for a violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. DEPARTMENT POWERS AND
DUTIES. In addition to any other duties imposed by statute, the department
shall have the following powers and duties: To adopt rules necessary to
implement this chapter; to investigate alleged violations of this chapter and
consumer complaints involving the practice of athlete-agents; to issue
subpoenas, orders, and agreements necessary to enforce this chapter; to issue
cease and desist orders for violations of this chapter; to conduct disciplinary
proceedings in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW; to impose sanctions and
assess fines for violations of this chapter or any rules adopted under the
director's authority; to delegate in writing to a designee the authority to
issue subpoenas, statements of charges, and any other documents necessary to
enforce this chapter; and to employ such administrative, investigative, and
clerical staff needed to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. APPLICATION AND
CONSTRUCTION. In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must
be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter of this chapter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. CAPTIONS NOT LAW.
Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. Sections 1 through 21 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002, but the department of licensing may immediately take such
steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is fully implemented on its
effective date.

---
END ---