BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that relatives increasingly are assuming the responsibility for
raising the children of their loved ones. The parents of these children are
unable to fulfill this responsibility themselves because of various and complex
reasons.

The legislature
recognizes that these kinship caregivers perform a vital function in our
society by providing homes for children who would otherwise be at risk of
foster care placement. These homes offer stability to children in crisis and
enhance family reunification. Outcome data shows that children in the care of
relatives are less likely to enter state custody, and most of these
arrangements do not require intensive supervision of the placement by the
courts or by the department of social and health services. The legislature
recognizes that kinship care is a legitimate and important component in the
spectrum of out-of-home placements available to children in need.

The legislature recognizes
that these kinship caregivers face many difficulties and need assistance to
support the health and well-being of the children they care for. These needs
include, but are not limited to, legal assistance, respite care services,
financial assistance, counseling, and other supportive services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) Within existing
resources, the department of social and health services shall convene a kinship
caregivers working group subsequent to the release in June 2002 of the kinship
caregivers study being conducted by the Washington state institute for public
policy. The working group shall comprise:

(a) The children's
administration;

(b) The aging and adult
services administration;

(c) The economic
services administration;

(d) Kinship caregivers;
and

(e) Other stakeholders,
such as the grandparents' coalition.

(2) The kinship
caregivers working group shall:

(a) Review the
Washington state institute for public policy kinship caregivers study;

(b) Develop a briefing
for the legislature that identifies and prioritizes:

(i) The policy issues
to be considered in making kinship care a robust component of the out-of-home
placements spectrum including consideration of a financial means test;

(ii) The federal and
state statutes associated with these policy issues; and

(iii) Options for
addressing these policy issues; and

(c) Submit
the briefing to the appropriate committees in the senate and house of
representatives by November 1, 2002.

---
END ---