BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 6.26.060 and 1997 c
59 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When application is
made for a prejudgment writ of garnishment, the court shall issue the writ in
substantially the form prescribed in RCW 6.27.070 and 6.27.100 directing that
the garnishee withhold an amount as prescribed in RCW 6.27.090, but, except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the court shall issue the writ only
after prior notice to the defendant, given in the manner prescribed in
subsections (4) and (5) of this section, with an opportunity for a prior
hearing at which the plaintiff shall establish the probable validity of the
plaintiff's claim and that there is probable cause to believe that the alleged
ground for garnishment exists.

(2) Subject to
subsection (3) of this section, the court shall issue the writ without prior
notice to the defendant and without an opportunity for a prior hearing only if:

(a) A ground alleged in
the plaintiff's affidavit is: (i) A ground appearing in RCW 6.26.010(2)(c) if
the writ is to be directed to an employer for the purpose of garnishing the
defendant's earnings; or (ii) a ground appearing in RCW 6.25.030 (5) through
(7) or in RCW 6.25.040(1) of the attachment chapter; or (iii) if garnishment is
necessary to permit the court to acquire jurisdiction over the action, the
ground alleged is one appearing in RCW 6.25.030 (1) through (4) or in RCW
6.26.010(2) (a) or (b); and

(b) The court finds on
the basis of specific facts, after an ex parte hearing, that there is probable
cause to believe the allegations of the plaintiff's affidavit.

(3) If a writ is issued
under subsection (2) of this section without prior notice to the defendant,
after service of the writ on the garnishee, the defendant shall be entitled to
prompt notice of the garnishment and a right to an early hearing, if requested,
at which the plaintiff shall establish the probable validity of the claim sued
on and that there is probable cause to believe that the alleged ground for
garnishment exists.

(4) When notice and a
hearing are required under this section, notice may be given by a show cause
order stating the date, time, and place of the hearing. Notice required under
this section shall be jurisdictional and, except as provided for published
notice in subsection (5) of this section, notice required under this section
shall be served in the same manner as a summons in a civil action and shall be
served together with (a) a copy of plaintiff's affidavit and a copy of the writ
if already issued, and (b) a copy of the following "Notice of Right to a
Hearing" in substantially the following form or, if defendant is an
individual, a copy of the claim form and the "Notice of Garnishment and of
Your Rights" prescribed by RCW 6.27.140, in which the following notice is
substituted for the first paragraph of said Notice:

NOTICE
OF RIGHT TO HEARING

A
writ of garnishment has been or will be issued by a Washington court and has
been or will be served on the garnishee defendant. It will require the
garnishee defendant to withhold payment of money that may be due to you and to
withhold other property of yours that the garnishee may hold or control until a
lawsuit in which you are a defendant has been decided by the court. Service of
this notice of your rights is required by law.

YOU
HAVE A RIGHT TO A PROMPT HEARING. If notice of a hearing date and time is not
served with this notice, you have the right to request the hearing. At the
hearing, the plaintiff must give evidence that there is probable cause to
believe that the statements in the enclosed affidavit are true and also that
the claim stated in the lawsuit is probably valid, or else the garnishment will
be released.

(5) If
service of notice on the defendant must be effected by publication, only the
following notice need be published under the caption of the case:

To, Defendant:

A
writ of prejudgment garnishment has been issued in the above captioned case,
directed to . . . . . . as Garnishee Defendant,
commanding the Garnishee to withhold amounts due you or to withhold any of your
property in the Garnishee's possession or control for application to any
judgment that may be entered for plaintiff in the case.

YOU
HAVE A RIGHT TO ASK FOR A HEARING. At the hearing, the plaintiff must give
evidence that there is probable cause to believe that the ground for
garnishment alleged in an affidavit filed with the court exists and also that
the claim stated in the lawsuit is probably valid, or else the garnishment will
be released.

If the
defendant is an individual, the following paragraph shall be added to the
published notice:

YOU
MAY ALSO HAVE A RIGHT TO HAVE THE GARNISHMENT RELEASED if amounts or property
withheld are exempt under federal or state statutes, for example, bank accounts
in which benefits such as ((Temporary Assistance for Needy Families)) cash
assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act, Supplemental Security
Income (SSI), Social Security, United States pension, Unemployment
Compensation, or Veterans' benefits have been deposited or certain personal
property described in section 6.15.010 of the Revised Code of Washington.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.101.010 and 1998
c 79 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following
definitions shall be applied in connection with this chapter:

(1)
"Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court proceeding,
is:

(a) Receiving one of
the following types of public assistance: ((Temporary assistance for needy
families)) Cash assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act,
general assistance, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food
stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits,
medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Involuntarily
committed to a public mental health facility; or

(c) Receiving an annual
income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the current
federally established poverty level; or

(d) Unable to pay the
anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court because his or her
available funds are insufficient to pay any amount for the retention of counsel.

(2) "Indigent and
able to contribute" means a person who, at any stage of a court
proceeding, is unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter
before the court because his or her available funds are less than the
anticipated cost of counsel but sufficient for the person to pay a portion of
that cost.

(3) "Anticipated
cost of counsel" means the cost of retaining private counsel for
representation on the matter before the court.

(4) "Available
funds" means liquid assets and disposable net monthly income calculated
after provision is made for bail obligations. For the purpose of determining
available funds, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) "Liquid
assets" means cash, savings accounts, bank accounts, stocks, bonds,
certificates of deposit, equity in real estate, and equity in motor vehicles.
A motor vehicle necessary to maintain employment and having a market value not
greater than three thousand dollars shall not be considered a liquid asset.

(b) "Income"
means salary, wages, interest, dividends, and other earnings which are
reportable for federal income tax purposes, and cash payments such as
reimbursements received from pensions, annuities, social security, and public
assistance programs. It includes any contribution received from any family
member or other person who is domiciled in the same residence as the defendant
and who is helping to defray the defendant's basic living costs.

(c) "Disposable
net monthly income" means the income remaining each month after deducting
federal, state, or local income taxes, social security taxes, contributory
retirement, union dues, and basic living costs.

(d) "Basic living
costs" means the average monthly amount spent by the defendant for
reasonable payments toward living costs, such as shelter, food, utilities,
health care, transportation, clothing, loan payments, support payments, and
court-imposed obligations.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.19.071 and 1997 c
59 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consideration of
all income. All income and resources of each parent's household shall be
disclosed and considered by the court when the court determines the child
support obligation of each parent. Only the income of the parents of the
children whose support is at issue shall be calculated for purposes of
calculating the basic support obligation. Income and resources of any other
person shall not be included in calculating the basic support obligation.

(2) Verification of
income. Tax returns for the preceding two years and current paystubs shall
be provided to verify income and deductions. Other sufficient verification
shall be required for income and deductions which do not appear on tax returns
or paystubs.

(3) Income sources
included in gross monthly income. Except as specifically excluded in
subsection (4) of this section, monthly gross income shall include income from
any source, including:

(a) Salaries;

(b) Wages;

(c) Commissions;

(d) Deferred
compensation;

(e) Overtime;

(f) Contract-related
benefits;

(g) Income from second
jobs;

(h) Dividends;

(i) Interest;

(j) Trust income;

(k) Severance pay;

(l) Annuities;

(m) Capital gains;

(n) Pension retirement
benefits;

(o) Workers'
compensation;

(p) Unemployment
benefits;

(q) Spousal maintenance
actually received;

(r) Bonuses;

(s) Social security
benefits; and

(t) Disability
insurance benefits.

(4) Income sources
excluded from gross monthly income. The following income and resources
shall be disclosed but shall not be included in gross income:

(a) Income of a new
spouse or income of other adults in the household;

(b) Child support
received from other relationships;

(c) Gifts and prizes;

(d) Temporary
assistance for needy families, as defined in section 12 of this act;

(e) Supplemental
security income;

(f) General assistance;
and

(g) Food stamps.

Receipt of income and
resources from temporary assistance for needy families, as defined in
section 12 of this act, supplemental security income, general assistance,
and food stamps shall not be a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.

(5) Determination of
net income. The following expenses shall be disclosed and deducted from
gross monthly income to calculate net monthly income:

(a) Federal and state
income taxes;

(b) Federal insurance
contributions act deductions;

(c) Mandatory pension
plan payments;

(d) Mandatory union or
professional dues;

(e) State industrial
insurance premiums;

(f) Court-ordered
spousal maintenance to the extent actually paid;

(g) Up to two thousand
dollars per year in voluntary pension payments actually made if the contributions
were made for the two tax years preceding the earlier of the (i) tax year in
which the parties separated with intent to live separate and apart or (ii) tax
year in which the parties filed for dissolution; and

(h) Normal business
expenses and self-employment taxes for self-employed persons. Justification
shall be required for any business expense deduction about which there is
disagreement.

Items deducted from
gross income under this subsection shall not be a reason to deviate from the
standard calculation.

(6) Imputation of
income. The court shall impute income to a parent when the parent is
voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily underemployed. The court shall determine
whether the parent is voluntarily underemployed or voluntarily unemployed based
upon that parent's work history, education, health, and age, or any other
relevant factors. A court shall not impute income to a parent who is gainfully
employed on a full-time basis, unless the court finds that the parent is
voluntarily underemployed and finds that the parent is purposely underemployed
to reduce the parent's child support obligation. Income shall not be imputed
for an unemployable parent. Income shall not be imputed to a parent to the
extent the parent is unemployed or significantly underemployed due to the
parent's efforts to comply with court-ordered reunification efforts under
chapter 13.34 RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency
supervising the child. In the absence of information to the contrary, a
parent's imputed income shall be based on the median income of year-round
full-time workers as derived from the United States bureau of census, current
populations reports, or such replacement report as published by the bureau of
census.

Sec. 4. RCW 26.19.075 and 1997 c
59 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Reasons for
deviation from the standard calculation include but are not limited to the
following:

(a) Sources of
income and tax planning. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation after consideration of the following:

(i) Income of a new
spouse if the parent who is married to the new spouse is asking for a deviation
based on any other reason. Income of a new spouse is not, by itself, a
sufficient reason for deviation;

(ii) Income of other
adults in the household if the parent who is living with the other adult is
asking for a deviation based on any other reason. Income of the other adults
in the household is not, by itself, a sufficient reason for deviation;

(iii) Child support
actually received from other relationships;

(iv) Gifts;

(v) Prizes;

(vi) Possession of
wealth, including but not limited to savings, investments, real estate holdings
and business interests, vehicles, boats, pensions, bank accounts, insurance
plans, or other assets;

(vii) Extraordinary
income of a child; or

(viii) Tax planning
considerations. A deviation for tax planning may be granted only if the child
would not receive a lesser economic benefit due to the tax planning.

(b) Nonrecurring
income. The court may deviate from the standard calculation based on a
finding that a particular source of income included in the calculation of the
basic support obligation is not a recurring source of income. Depending on the
circumstances, nonrecurring income may include overtime, contract-related
benefits, bonuses, or income from second jobs. Deviations for nonrecurring
income shall be based on a review of the nonrecurring income received in the
previous two calendar years.

(c) Debt and high
expenses. The court may deviate from the standard calculation after
consideration of the following expenses:

(i) Extraordinary debt
not voluntarily incurred;

(ii) A significant
disparity in the living costs of the parents due to conditions beyond their
control;

(iii) Special needs of
disabled children;

(iv) Special medical,
educational, or psychological needs of the children; or

(v) Costs incurred or
anticipated to be incurred by the parents in compliance with court-ordered
reunification efforts under chapter 13.34 RCW or under a voluntary placement
agreement with an agency supervising the child.

(d) Residential
schedule. The court may deviate from the standard calculation if the child
spends a significant amount of time with the parent who is obligated to make a
support transfer payment. The court may not deviate on that basis if the
deviation will result in insufficient funds in the household receiving the
support to meet the basic needs of the child or if the child is receiving ((temporary
assistance for needy families)) cash assistance, as defined in section
12 of this act. When determining the amount of the deviation, the court
shall consider evidence concerning the increased expenses to a parent making
support transfer payments resulting from the significant amount of time spent
with that parent and shall consider the decreased expenses, if any, to the
party receiving the support resulting from the significant amount of time the
child spends with the parent making the support transfer payment.

(e) Children from
other relationships. The court may deviate from the standard calculation
when either or both of the parents before the court have children from other
relationships to whom the parent owes a duty of support.

(i) The child support
schedule shall be applied to the mother, father, and children of the family
before the court to determine the presumptive amount of support.

(ii) Children from
other relationships shall not be counted in the number of children for purposes
of determining the basic support obligation and the standard calculation.

(iii) When considering
a deviation from the standard calculation for children from other
relationships, the court may consider only other children to whom the parent
owes a duty of support. The court may consider court-ordered payments of child
support for children from other relationships only to the extent that the
support is actually paid.

(iv) When the court has
determined that either or both parents have children from other relationships,
deviations under this section shall be based on consideration of the total
circumstances of both households. All child support obligations paid,
received, and owed for all children shall be disclosed and considered.

(2) All income and
resources of the parties before the court, new spouses, and other adults in the
households shall be disclosed and considered as provided in this section. The
presumptive amount of support shall be determined according to the child
support schedule. Unless specific reasons for deviation are set forth in the
written findings of fact and are supported by the evidence, the court shall
order each parent to pay the amount of support determined by using the standard
calculation.

(3) The court shall
enter findings that specify reasons for any deviation or any denial of a
party's request for any deviation from the standard calculation made by the
court. The court shall not consider reasons for deviation until the court
determines the standard calculation for each parent.

(4) When reasons exist
for deviation, the court shall exercise discretion in considering the extent to
which the factors would affect the support obligation.

(5) Agreement of the
parties is not by itself adequate reason for any deviations from the standard
calculation.

Sec. 5. RCW 26.23.035 and 1997 c
58 s 933 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
social and health services shall adopt rules for the distribution of support
money collected by the division of child support. These rules shall:

(a) Comply with Title
IV-D of the federal social security act as amended by the personal
responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996;

(b) Direct the division
of child support to distribute support money within eight days of receipt,
unless one of the following circumstances, or similar circumstances specified
in the rules, prevents prompt distribution:

(i) The location of the
custodial parent is unknown;

(ii) The support debt
is in litigation;

(iii) The division of
child support cannot identify the responsible parent or the custodian;

(c) Provide for
proportionate distribution of support payments if the responsible parent owes a
support obligation or a support debt for two or more Title IV-D cases; and

(d) Authorize the
distribution of support money, except money collected under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 664,
to satisfy a support debt owed to the IV-D custodian before the debt owed to
the state when the custodian stops receiving ((a public assistance grant))
cash assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act.

(2) The division of
child support may distribute support payments to the payee under the support
order or to another person who has lawful physical custody of the child or
custody with the payee's consent. The payee may file an application for an
adjudicative proceeding to challenge distribution to such other person. Prior
to distributing support payments to any person other than the payee, the
registry shall:

(a) Obtain a written
statement from the child's physical custodian, under penalty of perjury, that
the custodian has lawful custody of the child or custody with the payee's
consent;

(b) Mail to the
responsible parent and to the payee at the payee's last known address a copy of
the physical custodian's statement and a notice which states that support
payments will be sent to the physical custodian; and

(c) File a copy of the
notice with the clerk of the court that entered the original support order.

(3) If the Washington
state support registry distributes a support payment to a person in error, the
registry may obtain restitution by means of a set-off against future payments
received on behalf of the person receiving the erroneous payment, or may act
according to RCW 74.20A.270 as deemed appropriate. Any set-off against future
support payments shall be limited to amounts collected on the support debt and
ten percent of amounts collected as current support.

(4) The division of
child support shall ensure that the fifty dollar pass through payment, as
required by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 657 before the adoption of P.L. 104-193, is
terminated immediately upon July 27, 1997, and all rules to the contrary
adopted before July 27, 1997, are without force and effect.

Sec. 6. RCW 28C.04.420 and 1999
c 121 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The college board may,
subject to appropriation from the legislature or from funds made available from
any other public or private source and pursuant to rules adopted by the college
board with the advice of the work force training customer advisory committee
established in RCW 28C.04.390, provide job skills grants to educational
institutions. The job skills grants shall be used exclusively for programs
which are consistent with the job skills program. The college board shall work
in collaboration with the work force training customer advisory committee
established in RCW 28C.04.390 to assure that:

(1) The program is
within the scope of the job skills program under this chapter and may
reasonably be expected to succeed and thereby increase employment within the
state;

(2) Provision has been
made to use any available alternative funding from local, state, and federal
sources;

(3) The job skills
grant will only be used to cover the costs associated with the program;

(4) The program will
not unnecessarily duplicate existing programs and could not be provided by
another educational institution more effectively or efficiently;

(5) The program
involves an area of skills training and education for which there is a
demonstrable need;

(6) The applicant has
made provisions for the use of existing federal and state resources for student
financial assistance;

(7) The job skills
grant is essential to the success of the program as the resources of the
applicant are inadequate to attract the technical assistance and financial
support necessary for the program from business and industry;

(8) The program
represents a collaborative partnership between business, industry, labor,
educational institutions, and other partners, as appropriate;

(9) The commitment of
financial support from business and industry shall be equal to or greater than
the amount of the requested job skills grant;

(10) Binding
commitments have been made to the commission by the applicant for adequate
reporting of information and data regarding the program to the commission,
particularly information concerning the recruitment and employment of trainees
and students, and including a requirement for an annual or other periodic audit
of the books of the applicant directly related to the program, and for such
control on the part of the commission as it considers prudent over the
management of the program, so as to protect the use of public funds, including,
in the discretion of the commission and without limitation, right of access to
financial and other records of the applicant directly related to the programs;
and

(11) A provision has
been made by the applicant to work, in cooperation with the employment security
department, to identify and screen potential trainees, and that provision has
been made by the applicant for the participation as trainees of low-income
persons including ((temporary assistance for needy families)) recipients
of temporary assistance for needy families, as defined in section 12 of this
act, dislocated workers, and persons from minority and economically
disadvantaged groups to participate in the program.

Beginning October 1, 1999,
and every two years thereafter, the college board shall provide the legislature
and the governor with a report describing the activities and outcomes of the
state job skills program.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.20B.310 and 1997
c 59 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

No payment may be
collected by the department for residential care if the collection will reduce
the income as defined in RCW 74.04.005 of the head of household and remaining
dependents below one hundred percent of the need standard for ((temporary
assistance for needy families)) cash assistance, as defined in section
12 of this act.

Sec. 8. RCW 74.04.770 and 1997 c
59 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
establish consolidated standards of need each fiscal year which may vary by
geographical areas, program, and family size, for ((temporary assistance for
needy families)) cash assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act,
refugee assistance, supplemental security income, and general assistance.
Standards for ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash
assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act, refugee assistance, and
general assistance shall be based on studies of actual living costs and
generally recognized inflation indices and shall include reasonable allowances
for shelter, fuel, food, transportation, clothing, household maintenance and
operations, personal maintenance, and necessary incidentals. The standard of
need may take into account the economies of joint living arrangements, but
unless explicitly required by federal statute, there shall not be proration of
any portion of assistance grants unless the amount of the grant standard is
equal to the standard of need.

The department is
authorized to establish rateable reductions and grant maximums consistent with
federal law.

Payment level will be
equal to need or a lesser amount if rateable reductions or grant maximums are
imposed. In no case shall a recipient of supplemental security income receive
a state supplement less than the minimum required by federal law.

The department may
establish a separate standard for shelter provided at no cost.

Sec. 9. RCW 74.08.025 and 1997 c
58 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public assistance
may be awarded to any applicant:

(a) Who is in need and
otherwise meets the eligibility requirements of department assistance programs;
and

(b) Who has not made a
voluntary assignment of property or cash for the purpose of qualifying for an
assistance grant; and

(c) Who is not an
inmate of a public institution except as a patient in a medical institution or
except as an inmate in a public institution who could qualify for federal aid
assistance: PROVIDED, That the assistance paid by the department to recipients
in nursing homes, or receiving nursing home care, may cover the cost of
clothing and incidentals and general maintenance exclusive of medical care and
health services. The department may pay a grant to cover the cost of clothing
and personal incidentals in public or private medical institutions and
institutions for tuberculosis. The department shall allow recipients in
nursing homes to retain, in addition to the grant to cover the cost of clothing
and incidentals, wages received for work as a part of a training or
rehabilitative program designed to prepare the recipient for less restrictive
placement to the extent permitted under Title XIX of the federal social
security act.

(2) Any person
otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for needy families under this
title who has resided in the state of Washington for fewer than twelve
consecutive months immediately preceding application for assistance is limited
to the benefit level in the state in which the person resided immediately
before Washington, using the eligibility rules and other definitions
established under this chapter, that was obtainable on the date of application
in Washington state, if the benefit level of the prior state is lower than the
level provided to similarly situated applicants in Washington state. The
benefit level under this subsection shall be in effect for the first twelve
months a recipient is on temporary assistance for needy families in Washington
state.

(3) Any person
otherwise qualified for ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash
assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act, who is assessed through
the state alcohol and substance abuse program as drug or alcohol-dependent and
requiring treatment to become employable shall be required by the department to
participate in a drug or alcohol treatment program as a condition of benefit
receipt.

(4) In order to be
eligible for ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash
assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act, and food stamp program
benefits, any applicant with a felony conviction after August 21, 1996,
involving drug use or possession, must: (a) Have been assessed as chemically
dependent by a chemical dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A RCW
and be participating in or have completed a coordinated rehabilitation plan
consisting of chemical dependency treatment and vocational services; and (b)
have not been convicted of a felony involving drug use or possession in the
three years prior to the most current conviction.

Sec. 10. RCW 74.08.080 and 1998 c
79 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A public
assistance applicant or recipient who is aggrieved by a decision of the
department or an authorized agency of the department has the right to an
adjudicative proceeding. A current or former recipient who is aggrieved by a
department claim that he or she owes a debt for an overpayment of assistance or
food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, or both, has the
right to an adjudicative proceeding.

(b) An applicant or
recipient has no right to an adjudicative proceeding when the sole basis for
the department's decision is a state or federal law that requires an assistance
adjustment for a class of recipients.

(2) The adjudicative
proceeding is governed by the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW,
and this subsection.

(a) The applicant or
recipient must file the application for an adjudicative proceeding with the
secretary within ninety days after receiving notice of the aggrieving decision.

(b) The hearing shall
be conducted at the local community services office or other location in
Washington convenient to the appellant.

(c) The appellant or
his or her representative has the right to inspect his or her department file
and, upon request, to receive copies of department documents relevant to the
proceedings free of charge.

(d) The appellant has
the right to a copy of the tape recording of the hearing free of charge.

(e) The department is
limited to recovering an overpayment arising from assistance being continued
pending the adjudicative proceeding to the amount recoverable up to the
sixtieth day after the secretary's receipt of the application for an
adjudicative proceeding.

(f) If the final
adjudicative order is made in favor of the appellant, assistance shall be paid
from the date of denial of the application for assistance or thirty days
following the date of application for ((temporary assistance for needy
families)) cash assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act, or
forty-five days after date of application for all other programs, whichever is
sooner; or in the case of a recipient, from the effective date of the local
community services office decision.

(g) This subsection
applies only to an adjudicative proceeding in which the appellant is an
applicant for or recipient of medical assistance or the limited casualty
program for the medically needy and the issue is his or her eligibility or
ineligibility due to the assignment or transfer of a resource. The burden is
on the department to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the person
knowingly and willingly assigned or transferred the resource at less than
market value for the purpose of qualifying or continuing to qualify for medical
assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically needy. If the
prevailing party in the adjudicative proceeding is the applicant or recipient,
he or she is entitled to reasonable attorney's fees.

(3) When a
person files a petition for judicial review as provided in RCW 34.05.514 of an
adjudicative order entered in a public assistance program, no filing fee shall
be collected from the person and no bond shall be required on any appeal. In
the event that the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court
renders a decision in favor of the appellant, said appellant shall be entitled
to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. If a decision of the court is made in
favor of the appellant, assistance shall be paid from date of the denial of the
application for assistance or thirty days after the application for ((temporary
assistance for needy families)) cash assistance, as defined in section
12 of this act, or forty-five days following the date of application,
whichever is sooner; or in the case of a recipient, from the effective date of
the local community services office decision.

Sec. 11. RCW 74.08.335 and 1997 c
59 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

((Temporary
assistance for needy families)) Cash assistance, as defined in section
12 of this act, and general assistance shall not be granted to any person
who has made an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering
himself or herself eligible for the assistance. There is a rebuttable
presumption that a person who has transferred or transfers any real or personal
property or any interest in property within two years of the date of
application for the assistance without receiving adequate monetary
consideration therefor, did so for the purpose of rendering himself or herself
eligible for the assistance. Any person who transfers property for the purpose
of rendering himself or herself eligible for assistance, or any person who
after becoming a recipient transfers any property or any interest in property
without the consent of the secretary, shall be ineligible for assistance for a
period of time during which the reasonable value of the property so transferred
would have been adequate to meet the person's needs under normal conditions of
living: PROVIDED, That the secretary is hereby authorized to allow exceptions
in cases where undue hardship would result from a denial of assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of
chapters 74.08 and 74.12 RCW and this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) "Temporary
assistance for needy families" means money payments, services, remedial
care, and other benefits with respect to a dependent child or dependent
children and the needy parent or relative with whom the child lives. Temporary
assistance for needy families includes cash assistance and support services.

(2) "Cash
assistance" means cash, payments, vouchers, and other forms of benefits
designed to meet a family's ongoing basic needs including food, clothing,
shelter, utilities, household goods, personal care items, and general
incidental expenses. It includes these benefits even when they are conditioned
on participation in work experience, community service, or other work activity.

(3) "Support
services" means services and benefits which are not considered cash
assistance, for current and former recipients of cash assistance, and other
low-income families. "Support services" include, but are not limited
to:

(a) Nonrecurrent,
short-term benefits designed to deal with a specific crisis situation, that are
not intended to meet recurrent or ongoing needs, and do not extend beyond four
months;

(b) Work subsidies;

(c) Supportive services
such as child care and transportation provided to families who are employed;

(d) Refundable earned
income tax credits;

(e) Contributions to,
and distributions from, individual development accounts;

(f) Services such as
counseling, case management, peer support, child care information and referral,
transitional services, job retention, job advancement, and other
employment-related services that do not provide basic income support; and

(g) Transportation
benefits provided under a job access or reverse commute project, to an individual
who is not otherwise receiving cash assistance, as defined in subsection (2) of
this section.

Sec. 13. RCW 74.08A.010 and 1997
c 58 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A family that
includes an adult who has received ((temporary assistance for needy families))
cash assistance for sixty months after July 27, 1997, shall be
ineligible for further ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash
assistance.

(2) For the purposes of
applying the rules of this section, the department shall count any month in
which an adult family member received ((a temporary assistance for needy
families)) cash assistance ((grant)) unless the assistance was
provided when the family member was a minor child and not the head of the household
or married to the head of the household.

(3) The department
shall refer cash assistance recipients who require specialized
assistance to appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs through
the department of community, trade, and economic development, or the crime
victims' compensation program of the department of labor and industries.

(4) The department may
exempt a cash assistance recipient and the recipient's family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section by reason of hardship or if the
recipient meets the family violence options of section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA
of the federal social security act as amended by P.L. 104-193. The number of cash
assistance recipients and their families exempted from subsection (1) of
this section for a fiscal year shall not exceed twenty percent of the average
monthly number of cash assistance recipients and their families ((to
which assistance is provided under the temporary assistance for needy families
program)).

(5) The department shall
not exempt a cash assistance recipient and his or her family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section until after the cash
assistance recipient has received fifty-two months of assistance under this
chapter.

Sec. 14. RCW 74.08A.210 and 1997
c 58 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to prevent
some families from developing dependency on ((temporary assistance for needy
families)) cash assistance, the department shall make available to
qualifying applicants a diversion program designed to provide brief, emergency
assistance for families in crisis whose income and assets would otherwise
qualify them for ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash
assistance.

(2) Diversion
assistance may include cash or vouchers in payment for the following needs:

(a) Child care;

(b) Housing assistance;

(c)
Transportation-related expenses;

(d) Food;

(e) Medical costs for
the recipient's immediate family;

(f) Employment-related
expenses which are necessary to keep or obtain paid unsubsidized employment.

(3) Diversion
assistance is available once in each twelve-month period for each adult
applicant. Recipients of diversion assistance are not ((included in the
temporary assistance for needy families program)) considered recipients
of cash assistance.

(4) Diversion
assistance may not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars for each instance.

(5) To be eligible for
diversion assistance, a family must otherwise be eligible for ((temporary
assistance for needy families)) cash assistance.

(6) Families ineligible
for ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash assistance
or general assistance due to sanction, noncompliance, the lump sum income rule,
or any other reason are not eligible for diversion assistance.

(7) Families must
provide evidence showing that a bona fide need exists according to subsection
(2) of this section in order to be eligible for diversion assistance.

An adult applicant may
receive diversion assistance of any type no more than once per twelve-month
period. If the recipient of diversion assistance is placed on ((the
temporary assistance for needy families program)) cash assistance
within twelve months of receiving diversion assistance, the prorated dollar
value of the assistance shall be treated as a loan from the state, and
recovered by deduction from the recipient's cash grant.

Sec. 15. RCW 74.08A.220 and 1997
c 58 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
carry out a program to fund individual development accounts established by ((recipients))
individuals eligible for ((assistance under the)) temporary
assistance for needy families ((program)).

(1) An individual
development account may be established by or on behalf of ((a recipient))
an individual eligible for ((assistance provided under the))
temporary assistance for needy families ((program operated under this title))
for the purpose of enabling the ((recipient)) individual to
accumulate funds for a qualified purpose described in subsection (2) of this
section.

(2) A qualified purpose
as described in this subsection is one or more of the following, as provided by
the qualified entity providing assistance to the individual:

(a) Postsecondary
expenses paid from an individual development account directly to an eligible
educational institution;

(b) Qualified
acquisition costs with respect to a qualified principal residence for a
qualified first-time home buyer, if paid from an individual development account
directly to the persons to whom the amounts are due;

(c) Amounts paid from
an individual development account directly to a business capitalization account
which is established in a federally insured financial institution and is restricted
to use solely for qualified business capitalization expenses.

(3) ((A recipient))
An individual eligible for temporary assistance for needy families may
only contribute to an individual development account such amounts as are
derived from earned income, as defined in section 911(d)(2) of the internal
revenue code of 1986.

(4) The department
shall establish rules to ensure funds held in an individual development account
are only withdrawn for a qualified purpose as provided in this section.

(5) An individual
development account established under this section shall be a trust created or
organized in the United States and funded through periodic contributions by the
establishing ((recipient)) individual eligible for temporary
assistance for needy families and matched by or through a qualified entity
for a qualified purpose as provided in this section.

(6) For the purpose of
determining eligibility for any assistance provided under this title, all funds
in an individual development account under this section shall be disregarded
for such purpose with respect to any period during which such individual
maintains or makes contributions into such an account.

(7) The department
shall adopt rules authorizing the use of organizations using microcredit and
microenterprise approaches to assisting low-income families to become
financially self-sufficient.

(8) The department
shall adopt rules implementing the use of individual development accounts by ((recipients
of temporary assistance for needy families)) individuals eligible for
temporary assistance for needy families.

(9) For the purposes of
this section, "eligible educational institution," "postsecondary
educational expenses," "qualified acquisition costs,"
"qualified business," "qualified business capitalization
expenses," "qualified expenditures," "qualified first‑time
home buyer," "date of acquisition," "qualified plan,"
and "qualified principal residence" include the meanings provided for
them in P.L. 104‑193.

Sec. 16. RCW 74.08A.230 and 1997
c 58 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to
their monthly benefit payment, a family may earn and keep one-half of its
earnings during every month it is eligible to receive cash assistance ((under
this section)).

(2) In no event may a
family be eligible for ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash
assistance if its monthly gross earned income exceeds the maximum earned
income level as set by the department. In calculating a household's gross
earnings, the department shall disregard the earnings of a minor child who is:

(a) A full-time
student; or

(b) A part-time student
carrying at least half the normal school load and working fewer than
thirty-five hours per week.

Sec. 17. RCW 74.08A.260 and 1997
c 58 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

Cash assistance recipients
who have not obtained paid, unsubsidized employment by the end of the job
search component authorized in section 312 of this act shall be referred to a
work activity.

(1) Each cash
assistance recipient shall be assessed immediately upon completion of the
job search component. Assessments shall be based upon factors that are
critical to obtaining employment, including but not limited to education, employment
strengths, and employment history. Assessments may be performed by the
department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be based on a
uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be accepted by all agencies
and organizations serving the recipient. Based on the assessment, an
individual responsibility plan shall be prepared that: (a) Sets forth an
employment goal and a plan for moving the recipient immediately into
employment; (b) contains the obligation of the recipient to become and remain
employed; (c) moves the recipient into whatever employment the recipient is
capable of handling as quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services
available to the recipient to enable the recipient to obtain and keep
employment.

(2) Cash assistance
recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and do not
qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall engage in self‑directed
service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.

(3) If a cash
assistance recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities required
by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the recipient's
share, and may, if the department determines it appropriate, be terminated.

(4) The department may
waive the penalties required under subsection (3) of this section, subject to a
finding that the cash assistance recipient refused to engage in work for
good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.

(5) In implementing
this section, the department shall assign the highest priority to the most
employable clients, including adults in two-parent families and parents in
single-parent families that include older preschool or school-age children to
be engaged in work activities.

(6) In consultation
with the cash assistance recipient, the department or contractor shall
place the recipient into a work activity that is available in the local area
where the cash assistance recipient resides.

Sec. 18. RCW 74.08A.270 and 1997
c 58 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

Good cause reasons for
failure to participate in WorkFirst program components include: (1) Situations
where the cash assistance recipient is a parent or other relative
personally providing care for a child under the age of six years, and formal or
informal child care, or day care for an incapacitated individual living in the
same home as a dependent child, is necessary for an individual to participate
or continue participation in the program or accept employment, and such care is
not available, and the department fails to provide such care; or (2) until June
30, 1999, if the cash assistance recipient is a parent with a child
under the age of one year. A parent may only receive this exemption for a
total of twelve months, which may be consecutive or nonconsecutive; or (3)
after June 30, 1999, if the cash assistance recipient is a parent with a
child under three months of age.

Sec. 19. RCW 74.08A.275 and 1999
c 340 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each ((recipient))
individual approved to receive ((temporary assistance for needy
families)) cash assistance shall be subject to an employability
screening after determination of program eligibility and before referral to job
search. If the employability screening determines the recipient is not
employable, or meets the criteria specified in RCW 74.08A.270 for a good cause
exemption to work requirements, the department shall defer the job search
requirement under RCW 74.08A.285 and refer the recipient immediately to the
assessment procedure required under RCW 74.08A.260.

Sec. 20. RCW 74.08A.285 and 1998
c 89 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The WorkFirst program
operated by the department to meet the federal work requirements specified in
P.L. 104-193 shall contain a job search component. The component shall consist
of instruction on how to secure a job and assisted job search activities to
locate and retain employment. Nonexempt recipients of ((temporary
assistance for needy families)) cash assistance shall participate in
an initial job search for no more than twelve consecutive weeks. The cash
assistance recipient's ability to obtain employment will be reviewed within
the first four weeks of job search and periodically thereafter and, if it is
clear at any time that further participation in a job search will not be
productive, the department shall assess the cash assistance recipient
pursuant to RCW 74.08A.260. The department shall refer cash assistance
recipients unable to find employment through the initial job search period to
work activities that will develop their skills or knowledge to make them more
employable, including additional job search and job readiness assistance.

Sec. 21. RCW 74.08A.310 and 1997
c 58 s 324 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall:

(1) Notify recipients
of ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash assistance
that self-employment is one method of leaving state assistance. The department
shall provide its regional offices, recipients of ((temporary assistance for
needy families)) cash assistance, and any contractors providing job
search, training, or placement services notification of programs available in
the state for entrepreneurial training, technical assistance, and loans
available for start-up businesses;

(2) Provide recipients
of ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash assistance
and service providers assisting such recipients through training and placement
programs with information it receives about the skills and training required by
firms locating in the state;

(3) Encourage
recipients of ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash
assistance that are in need of basic skills to seek out programs that
integrate basic skills training with occupational training and workplace
experience.

Sec. 22. RCW 74.08A.320 and 1997
c 58 s 325 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
establish a wage subsidy program for ((recipients of temporary assistance for
needy families)) individuals eligible to receive cash assistance.
The department shall give preference in job placements to private sector
employers that have agreed to participate in the wage subsidy program. The
department shall identify characteristics of employers who can meet the
employment goals stated in RCW 74.08A.410. The department shall use these
characteristics in identifying which employers may participate in the program.
The department shall adopt rules for the participation of recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families in the wage subsidy program.
Participants in the program established under this section may not be employed
if: (1) The employer has terminated the employment of any current employee or
otherwise caused an involuntary reduction of its work force in order to fill
the vacancy so created with the participant; or (2) the participant displaces
or partially displaces current employees. Employers providing positions
created under this section shall meet the requirements of chapter 49.46 RCW.
This section shall not diminish or result in the infringement of obligations or
rights under chapters 41.06, 41.56, and 49.36 RCW and the national labor
relations act, 29 U.S.C. Ch. 7. The department shall establish such local and
statewide advisory boards, including business and labor representatives, as it
deems appropriate to assist in the implementation of the wage subsidy program.
Once the recipient is hired, the wage subsidy shall be authorized for up to
nine months. This section does not limit the duration of work subsidies the
department is authorized to provide under section 25 of this act.

Sec. 23. RCW 74.08A.330 and 1997
c 58 s 326 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
establish the community service program to provide the experience of work for cash
assistance recipients ((of public assistance)). The program is
intended to promote a strong work ethic for participating ((public)) cash
assistance recipients. Under this program, ((public)) cash
assistance recipients are required to volunteer to work for charitable
nonprofit organizations and public agencies, or engage in another activity
designed to benefit the recipient, the recipient's family, or the recipient's
community, as determined by the department on a case-by-case basis.
Participants in a community service or work experience program established by
this chapter are deemed employees for the purpose of chapter 49.17 RCW. The
cost of premiums under Title 51 RCW shall be paid for by the department for
participants in a community service or work experience program. Participants
in a community service or work experience program may not be placed if: (1) An
employer has terminated the employment of any current employee or otherwise
caused an involuntary reduction of its work force in order to fill the vacancy
so created with the participant; or (2) the participant displaces or partially
displaces current employees.

Sec. 24. RCW 74.08A.340 and 1997
c 58 s 321 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
social and health services shall operate the Washington WorkFirst program
authorized under RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330, 43.330.145, 74.13.0903 and
74.25.040, and chapter 74.12 RCW within the following constraints:

(1) The full amount of
the temporary assistance for needy families block grant, plus qualifying state
expenditures as appropriated in the biennial operating budget, shall be
appropriated to the department each year in the biennial appropriations act to
carry out the provisions of the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through
74.08A.330, section 25 of this act, 43.330.145, 74.13.0903 and
74.25.040, and chapter 74.12 RCW.

(2) The department may
expend funds defined in subsection (1) of this section in any manner that will
effectively accomplish the outcome measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410. No more
than fifteen percent of the amount provided in subsection (1) of this section
may be spent for administrative purposes. For the purpose of this subsection,
"administrative purposes" does not include expenditures for
information technology and computerization needed for tracking and monitoring
required by P.L. 104-193. The department shall not increase grant levels to
recipients of the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330 and
43.330.145 and chapter 74.12 RCW.

(3) The department
shall implement strategies that accomplish the outcome measures identified in
RCW 74.08A.410 that are within the funding constraints in this section.
Specifically, the department shall implement strategies that will cause the
number of cases in the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330
and 43.330.145 and chapter 74.12 RCW to decrease by at least fifteen percent
during the 1997-99 biennium and by at least five percent in the subsequent
biennium. The department may transfer appropriation authority between funding
categories within the economic services program in order to carry out the
requirements of this subsection.

(4) The department
shall monitor expenditures against the appropriation levels provided for in
subsection (1) of this section. The department shall quarterly make a
determination as to whether expenditure levels will exceed available funding
and communicate its finding to the legislature. If the determination indicates
that expenditures will exceed funding at the end of the fiscal year, the
department shall take all necessary actions to ensure that all services
provided under this chapter shall be made available only to the extent of the
availability and level of appropriation made by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. A new section is added
to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

The department may
establish eligibility standards for support services, and may provide such
services, as defined in section 12 of this act, to the extent funds are
available.

Sec. 26. RCW 74.08A.380 and 1997
c 58 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

All applicants under
the age of eighteen years who are approved for cash assistance and,
within one hundred eighty days after the date of federal certification of the
Washington temporary assistance for needy families program, all unmarried minor
parents or pregnant minor applicants shall, as a condition of receiving ((benefits))
cash assistance, actively progress toward the completion of a high
school diploma or a GED.

Sec. 27. RCW 74.08A.400 and 1997
c 58 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the
intent of the legislature that the Washington WorkFirst program focus on work
and on personal responsibility for cash assistance recipients. The
program shall be evaluated among other evaluations, through a limited number of
outcome measures designed to hold each community service office and economic
services region accountable for program success.

Sec. 28. RCW 74.08A.410 and 1997
c 58 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The WorkFirst
program shall develop outcome measures for use in evaluating the WorkFirst
program authorized in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, which may include but are not
limited to:

(a) Caseload reduction;

(b) Recidivism to cash
assistance caseload after two years;

(c) Job retention;

(d) Earnings;

(e) Reduction in
average cash assistance grant through increased recipient earnings; and

(f) Placement of cash
assistance recipients into private sector, unsubsidized jobs.

(2) The department
shall require that contractors for WorkFirst services collect outcome measure
information and report outcome measures to the department regularly. The
department shall develop benchmarks that compare outcome measure information
from all contractors to provide a clear indication of the most effective
contractors. Benchmark information shall be published quarterly and provided
to the legislature, the governor, and all contractors for WorkFirst services.

Sec. 29. RCW 74.09.522 and 1997 c
59 s 15 and 1997 c 34 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section, "managed health care system" means any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring organizations,
or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care
services covered under RCW 74.09.520 and rendered by licensed providers, on a
prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section
1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal
social security act.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall enter into agreements with managed health care
systems to provide health care services to recipients of ((temporary
assistance for needy families)) cash assistance, as defined in section
12 of this act, under the following conditions:

(a) Agreements shall be
made for at least thirty thousand recipients statewide;

(b) Agreements in at
least one county shall include enrollment of all recipients of ((temporary
assistance for needy families)) cash assistance, as defined in section
12 of this act;

(c) To the extent that
this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act, recipients shall have a
choice of systems in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate
their enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the department may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of a
period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department shall not restrict a recipient's right to
terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as established by the
department by rule;

(d) To the extent that
this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act, participating managed health care systems shall not enroll
a disproportionate number of medical assistance recipients within the total
numbers of persons served by the managed health care systems, except as
authorized by the department under federal demonstration waivers granted under
section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;

(e) In negotiating with
managed health care systems the department shall adopt a uniform procedure to
negotiate and enter into contractual arrangements, including standards
regarding the quality of services to be provided; and financial integrity of
the responding system;

(f) The department
shall seek waivers from federal requirements as necessary to implement this
chapter;

(g) The department
shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid capitation contracts that include
inpatient care. However, if this is not possible or feasible, the department
may enter into prepaid capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;

(h) The department
shall define those circumstances under which a managed health care system is
responsible for out-of-plan services and assure that recipients shall not be
charged for such services; and

(i) Nothing in this
section prevents the department from entering into similar agreements for other
groups of people eligible to receive services under this chapter.

(3) The department
shall ensure that publicly supported community health centers and providers in
rural areas, who show serious intent and apparent capability to participate as
managed health care systems are seriously considered as contractors. The
department shall coordinate its managed care activities with activities under
chapter 70.47 RCW.

(4) The department
shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and other states in this
geographical region in order to develop recommendations to be presented to the
appropriate federal agencies and the United States congress for improving health
care of the poor, while controlling related costs.

(5) The legislature
finds that competition in the managed health care marketplace is enhanced, in
the long term, by the existence of a large number of managed health care system
options for medicaid clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is
to focus on prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status,
continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and disruption
to clients and health care providers should be minimized. To help ensure these
goals are met, the following principles shall guide the department in its
healthy options managed health care purchasing efforts:

(a) All managed health
care systems should have an opportunity to contract with the department to the
extent that minimum contracting requirements defined by the department are met,
at payment rates that enable the department to operate as far below
appropriated spending levels as possible, consistent with the principles
established in this section.

(b) Managed health care
systems should compete for the award of contracts and assignment of medicaid
beneficiaries who do not voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:

(i) Demonstrated
commitment to or experience in serving low-income populations;

(ii) Quality of
services provided to enrollees;

(iii) Accessibility,
including appropriate utilization, of services offered to enrollees;

(iv) Demonstrated
capability to perform contracted services, including ability to supply an
adequate provider network;

(v) Payment rates; and

(vi) The ability to
meet other specifically defined contract requirements established by the
department, including consideration of past and current performance and
participation in other state or federal health programs as a contractor.

(c) Consideration
should be given to using multiple year contracting periods.

(d) Quality,
accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving low-income populations
shall be given significant weight in the contracting, evaluation, and
assignment process.

(e) All contractors
that are regulated health carriers must meet state minimum net worth
requirements as defined in applicable state laws. The department shall adopt
rules establishing the minimum net worth requirements for contractors that are
not regulated health carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of
the department to take action under a contract upon finding that a contractor's
financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's ability to meet its
contract obligations.

(f) Procedures for
resolution of disputes between the department and contract bidders or the
department and contracting carriers related to the award of, or failure to
award, a managed care contract must be clearly set out in the procurement
document. In designing such procedures, the department shall give strong
consideration to the negotiation and dispute resolution processes used by the
Washington state health care authority in its managed health care contracting
activities.

(6) The department may
apply the principles set forth in subsection (5) of this section to its managed
health care purchasing efforts on behalf of clients receiving supplemental
security income benefits to the extent appropriate.

Sec. 30. RCW 74.12.010 and 1999 c
120 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of the
administration of temporary assistance for needy families, the term
"dependent child" means any child in need under the age of eighteen
years who is living with a relative as specified under federal temporary
assistance for needy families program requirements, in a place of residence
maintained by one or more of such relatives as his or their homes. The term a
"dependent child" shall, notwithstanding the foregoing, also include
a child who would meet such requirements except for his removal from the home
of a relative specified above as a result of a judicial determination that
continuation therein would be contrary to the welfare of such child, for whose
placement and care the state department of social and health services or the
county office is responsible, and who has been placed in a licensed or approved
child care institution or foster home as a result of such determination and
who: (1) Was receiving an aid to families with dependent children grant for
the month in which court proceedings leading to such determination were
initiated; or (2) would have received aid to families with dependent children
for such month if application had been made therefor; or (3) in the case of a
child who had been living with a specified relative within six months prior to
the month in which such proceedings were initiated, would have received aid to
families with dependent children for such month if in such month he had been living
with such a relative and application had been made therefor, as authorized by
the Social Security Act.

(("Temporary
assistance for needy families" means money payments, services, and
remedial care with respect to a dependent child or dependent children and the
needy parent or relative with whom the child lives.))

Sec. 31. RCW 74.12.030 and 1997 c
59 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to meeting
the eligibility requirements of RCW 74.08.025, as now or hereafter amended, an
applicant for temporary assistance for needy families, as defined in section
12 of this act, must be a needy child who is a resident of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 32. RCW 74.12.035 and 1999 c
120 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Children over
eighteen years of age and under nineteen years of age who are full-time
students reasonably expected to complete a program of secondary school, or the
equivalent level of vocational or technical training, before reaching nineteen
years of age are eligible to receive temporary assistance for needy families,
as defined in section 12 of this act: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That if such
students do not successfully complete such program before reaching nineteen years
of age, the assistance rendered under this subsection during such period shall
not be a debt due the state.

(2) Children with
disabilities who are eighteen years of age and under twenty-one years of age
and who are full-time students whose education is being provided in accordance
with RCW 28A.155.020 are eligible to receive temporary assistance for needy
families ((benefits)), as defined in section 12 of this act.

(3) The
department is authorized to grant exceptions to the eligibility restrictions
for children eighteen years of age and under twenty-one years of age under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section only when it determines by reasonable,
objective criteria that such exceptions are likely to enable the children to
complete their high school education, general equivalency diploma or vocational
education.

Sec. 33. RCW 74.12.250 and 1997 c
58 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

If the department,
after investigation, finds that any applicant for cash assistance, as
defined in section 12 of this act, under this chapter or any recipient of
funds under this chapter would not use, or is not utilizing, ((the grant))
cash assistance adequately for the needs of his or her child or children
or would dissipate the ((grant)) assistance or is dissipating
such ((grant)) assistance, or would be or is unable to manage
adequately the funds paid on behalf of said child and that to provide or
continue payments to the applicant or recipient would be contrary to the welfare
of the child, the department may make such payments to another individual who
is interested in or concerned with the welfare of such child and relative:
PROVIDED, That the department shall provide such counseling and other services
as are available and necessary to develop greater ability on the part of the
relative to manage funds in such manner as to protect the welfare of the
family. Periodic review of each case shall be made by the department to
determine if said relative is able to resume management of the cash
assistance ((grant)) payments. If after a reasonable period of
time the payments to the relative cannot be resumed, the department may request
the attorney general to file a petition in the superior court for the
appointment of a guardian for the child or children. Such petition shall set
forth the facts warranting such appointment. Notice of the hearing on such
petition shall be served upon the cash assistance recipient and the
department not less than ten days before the date set for such hearing. Such
petition may be filed with the clerk of superior court and all process issued
and served without payment of costs. If upon the hearing of such petition the
court is satisfied that it is for the best interest of the child or children, and
all parties concerned, that a guardian be appointed, he shall order the
appointment, and may require the guardian to render to the court a detailed
itemized account of expenditures of such cash assistance payments at
such time as the court may deem advisable.

It is the intention of
this section that the guardianship herein provided for shall be a special and
limited guardianship solely for the purpose of safeguarding the cash
assistance ((grants)) payments made to dependent children. Such
guardianship shall terminate upon the termination of such cash
assistance ((grant)) payment, or sooner on order of the court,
upon good cause shown.

Sec. 34. RCW 74.12.255 and 1997 c
58 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall determine, after consideration of all relevant factors and in
consultation with the applicant, the most appropriate living situation for
applicants under eighteen years of age, unmarried, and either pregnant or
having a dependent child or children in the applicant's care. An appropriate
living situation shall include a place of residence that is maintained by the
applicant's parents, parent, legal guardian, or other adult relative as their
or his or her own home and that the department finds would provide an
appropriate supportive living arrangement. It also includes a living situation
maintained by an agency that is licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW that the
department finds would provide an appropriate supportive living arrangement.
((Grant)) Cash assistance, as defined in section 12 of this
act, shall not be provided under this chapter if the applicant does not
reside in the most appropriate living situation, as determined by the
department.

(2) An unmarried minor
parent or pregnant minor applicant residing in the most appropriate living
situation, as provided under subsection (1) of this section, is presumed to be
unable to manage adequately the funds paid to the minor or on behalf of the
dependent child or children and, unless the minor provides sufficient evidence
to rebut the presumption, shall be subject to the protective payee requirements
provided for under RCW 74.12.250 and 74.08.280.

(3) The department
shall consider any statements or opinions by either parent of the unmarried
minor parent or pregnant minor applicant as to an appropriate living situation
for the minor and his or her children, whether in the parental home or other
situation. If the parents or a parent of the minor request, they or he or she
shall be entitled to a hearing in juvenile court regarding designation of the
parental home or other relative placement as the most appropriate living
situation for the pregnant or parenting minor.

The department shall
provide the parents or parent with the opportunity to make a showing that the
parental home, or home of the other relative placement, is the most appropriate
living situation. It shall be presumed in any administrative or judicial
proceeding conducted under this subsection that the parental home or other
relative placement requested by the parents or parent is the most appropriate
living situation. This presumption is rebuttable.

(4) In cases in which
the minor is unmarried and unemployed, the department shall, as part of the
determination of the appropriate living situation, make an affirmative effort
to provide current and positive information about adoption including referral
to community-based organizations for counseling and provide information about
the manner in which adoption works, its benefits for unmarried, unemployed
minor parents and their children, and the meaning and availability of open
adoption.

(5) For the purposes of
this section, "most appropriate living situation" shall not include a
living situation including an adult male who fathered the qualifying child and
is found to meet the elements of rape of a child as set forth in RCW 9A.44.079.

Sec. 35. RCW 74.12.260 and 1997 c
59 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

((Temporary
assistance for needy families grants)) Cash assistance, as defined in
section 12 of this act, shall be ((made)) provided to persons
specified in RCW 74.12.010 as amended or such others as the federal department
of health, education and welfare shall recognize for the sole purposes of
giving benefits to the children whose needs are included in the ((grant))
cash assistance paid to such persons. The recipient of ((each
temporary assistance for needy families grant)) cash assistance
shall be and hereby is required to present reasonable proof to the department
of social and health services as often as may be required by the department
that all cash assistance funds received ((in the form of a temporary
assistance for needy families grant)) for the children ((represented in
the grant)) are being spent for the benefit of the children.

Sec. 36. RCW 74.12.300 and 1979 c
141 s 353 are each amended to read as follows:

If the home in which
the child lives is found to be unsuitable, but there is reason to believe that
elimination of the undesirable conditions can be effected, and the child is
otherwise eligible for aid, ((a grant)) cash assistance, as defined
in section 12 of this act, shall be initiated or continued for such time as
the state department of social and health services and the family require to
remedy the conditions.

Sec. 37. RCW 74.12.330 and 1963 c
228 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the
provisions of this chapter a child otherwise eligible for aid shall not be
denied such cash assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act,
where a relative as specified in the social security act is unavailable or
refuses to accept custody and the juvenile court fails to enter an order
removing the child from the custody of the parent, relative or guardian then
having custody.

Sec. 38. RCW 74.12.361 and 1997 c
59 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
actively develop mechanisms for the income assistance program, the medical
assistance program, and the community services administration to facilitate the
enrollment in the federal supplemental security income program of disabled persons
currently part of assistance units receiving ((temporary assistance for
needy families benefits)) cash assistance, as defined in section 12 of
this act.

Sec. 39. RCW 74.12.400 and 1997 c
59 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
train financial services and social work staff who provide direct service to
recipients of ((temporary assistance for needy families)) cash
assistance, as defined in section 12 of this act, to:

(1) Effectively
communicate the transitional nature of ((temporary assistance for needy
families)) cash assistance and the expectation that recipients will
enter employment;

(2) Actively refer
clients to the job opportunities and basic skills program;

(3) Provide social
services needed to overcome obstacles to employability; and

(4) Provide family
planning information and assistance, including alternatives to abortion, which
shall be conducted in consultation with the department of health.

Sec. 40. RCW 74.12.410 and 1997 c
58 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At time of
application or reassessment under this chapter the department shall offer or
contract for family planning information and assistance, including alternatives
to abortion, and any other available locally based teen pregnancy prevention
programs, to prospective and current recipients of ((aid to families with
dependent children)) temporary assistance for needy families, as defined
in section 12 of this act.

(2) The department shall
work in cooperation with the superintendent of public instruction to reduce the
rate of illegitimate births and abortions in Washington state.

(3) The department of
health shall maximize federal funding by timely application for federal funds
available under P.L. 104-193 and Title V of the federal social security act, 42
U.S.C. 701 net seq., as amended, for the establishment of qualifying abstinence
education and motivation programs. The department of health shall contract, by
competitive bid, with entities qualified to provide abstinence education and
motivation programs in the state.

(4) The department of
health shall seek and accept local matching funds to the maximum extent
allowable from qualified abstinence education and motivation programs.

(5)(a) For purposes of
this section, "qualifying abstinence education and motivation
programs" are those bidders with experience in the conduct of the types of
abstinence education and motivation programs set forth in Title V of the
federal social security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 701 net seq., as amended.

(b) The application for
federal funds, contracting for abstinence education and motivation programs and
performance of contracts under this section are subject to review and oversight
by a joint committee of the legislature, composed of four legislative members,
appointed by each of the two caucuses in each house.

Sec. 41. RCW 74.12.450 and 1995 c
401 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the
department receives an application for cash assistance, as defined in
section 12 of this act, on behalf of a child under this chapter and an
employee of the department has reason to believe that the child has suffered
abuse or neglect, the employee shall cause a report to be made as provided
under chapter 26.44 RCW.

(2) Whenever the
department approves an application for cash assistance on behalf of a
child under this chapter, the department shall make a reasonable effort to
determine whether the child is living with a parent of the child. Whenever the
child is living in the home of a relative other than a parent of the child, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to notify the parent with whom the
child has most recently resided that an application for cash assistance
on behalf of the child has been approved by the department and shall advise the
parent of his or her rights under this section, RCW 74.12.460, and sections 4
and 5 of this act, unless good cause exists not to do so based on a
substantiated claim that the parent has abused or neglected the child.

(3) Upon written
request of the parent, the department shall notify the parent of the address
and location of the child, unless there is a current investigation or pending
case involving abuse or neglect by the parent under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(4) The department
shall notify and advise the parent of the provisions of the family
reconciliation act under chapter 13.32A RCW.

Sec. 42. RCW 74.13.0903 and 1997
c 58 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of child
care policy is established to operate under the authority of the department of
social and health services. The duties and responsibilities of the office
include, but are not limited to, the following, within appropriated funds:

(1) Staff and assist
the child care coordinating committee in the implementation of its duties under
RCW 74.13.090;

(2) Work in conjunction
with the statewide child care resource and referral network as well as local
governments, nonprofit organizations, businesses, and community child care
advocates to create local child care resource and referral organizations.
These organizations may carry out needs assessments, resource development,
provider training, technical assistance, and parent information and training;

(3) Actively seek
public and private money for distribution as grants to the statewide child care
resource and referral network and to existing or potential local child care
resource and referral organizations;

(4) Adopt rules
regarding the application for and distribution of grants to local child care
resource and referral organizations. The rules shall, at a minimum, require an
applicant to submit a plan for achieving the following objectives:

(a) Provide parents
with information about child care resources, including location of services and
subsidies;

(b) Carry out child
care provider recruitment and training programs, including training under RCW
74.25.040;

(c) Offer support
services, such as parent and provider seminars, toy-lending libraries, and
substitute banks;

(d) Provide information
for businesses regarding child care supply and demand;

(e) Advocate for
increased public and private sector resources devoted to child care;

(f) Provide technical
assistance to employers regarding employee child care services; and

(g) Serve recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families, as defined in section 12 of this
act, and working parents with incomes at or below household incomes of one
hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty line;

(5) Provide staff
support and technical assistance to the statewide child care resource and
referral network and local child care resource and referral organizations;

(6) Maintain a
statewide child care licensing data bank and work with department of social and
health services licensors to provide information to local child care resource
and referral organizations about licensed child care providers in the state;

(7) Through the
statewide child care resource and referral network and local resource and
referral organizations, compile data about local child care needs and
availability for future planning and development;

(8) Coordinate with the
statewide child care resource and referral network and local child care
resource and referral organizations for the provision of training and technical
assistance to child care providers; and

(9) Collect and
assemble information regarding the availability of insurance and of federal and
other child care funding to assist state and local agencies, businesses, and
other child care providers in offering child care services.

Sec. 43. RCW 74.25.040 and 1997 c
59 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families, as defined in section 12 of this
act, who are employed or participating in a work activity under section 312
of this act may volunteer or work in a licensed child care facility. Licensed
child care facilities participating in this effort shall provide care for the
recipient's children and provide for the development of positive child care
skills.

(2) The department
shall train two hundred fifty recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families, as defined in section 12 of this act, to become family child
care providers or child care center teachers. The department shall offer the
training in rural and urban communities. The department shall adopt rules to
implement the child care training program in this section.

(3)
Recipients trained under this section shall provide child care services to
clients of the department for two years following the completion of their child
care training.

---
END ---