BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that senior citizens have a wealth of experience and knowledge that can be of
value to the children of Washington state. The legislature further finds that
senior citizens are bright, enthusiastic, and passionate citizens who care
deeply about the future of Washington's citizenry. To encourage the exchange
of knowledge and experience between senior citizens and Washington children,
senior citizens should be notified regarding current opportunities available to
them to volunteer in Washington schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

School
districts must provide notice to the community, specifically targeted to senior
citizens, providing information on volunteer opportunities available at schools
located within the district. For the purposes of this section, notice may
include, but is not limited to, the use of local media outlets.

---
END ---