BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that in-state sellers of conifer seed and persons growing customer-owned
conifer seed into seedlings are placed at a marketplace disadvantage compared
to persons doing the same activity out of state because of the unique storage
and growing requirements of conifer seed. It is the intent of the legislature
to eliminate this disadvantage by providing a limited sales tax exemption for
the sale of conifer seed to be used to grow timber outside Washington, or sold
to an Indian tribe or member to grow timber in Indian country, if upon sale the
seed is immediately placed into freezer storage operated by the seller.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of conifer seed that is immediately
placed into freezer storage operated by the seller and is: (a) Used for
growing timber outside Washington; or (b) sold to an Indian tribe or member and
is to be used for growing timber in Indian country. This section applies only
if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files. For the purposes of this section,
"Indian country" has the meaning given in RCW 82.24.010.

(2) If a buyer of
conifer seed is normally engaged in growing timber both within and outside
Washington and is not able to determine at the time of purchase whether the
seed acquired, or the seedlings germinated from the seed acquired, will be used
for growing timber within or outside Washington, the buyer may defer payment of
the sales tax until it is determined that the seed, or seedlings germinated
from the seed, will be planted for growing timber in Washington. A buyer that
does not pay sales tax on the purchase of conifer seed and subsequently
determines that the sale did not qualify for the tax exemption must remit to
the department the amount of sales tax that would have been paid at the time of
purchase.

(3) A buyer who pays
retail sales tax on the purchase of conifer seed and subsequently determines that
the sale qualifies for the tax exemption provided in this section is entitled
to a deduction on the buyer's tax return equal to the cost to the buyer of the
purchased seed. The deduction is allowed only if the buyer keeps and preserves
records that show from whom the seed was purchased, the date of the purchase,
the amount of the purchase, and the tax that was paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter do not apply in respect to the use of conifer seed to grow seedlings if
the seedlings are grown by a person other than the owner of the seed. This
section applies only if the seedlings will be used for growing timber outside
Washington, or if the owner of the conifer seed is an Indian tribe or member
and the seedlings will be used for growing timber in Indian country.

If the owner of conifer
seed is not able to determine at the time the seed is used in a growing process
whether the use of the seed is exempt from tax under this section, the owner
may defer payment of the use tax until it is determined that the seedlings will
be planted for growing timber in Washington. For the purposes of this section,
"Indian country" has the meaning given in RCW 82.24.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies
retroactively.

---
END ---