BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 16.52.185 and 1994 c
261 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in
this chapter applies to accepted husbandry practices used in the commercial
raising or slaughtering of livestock or poultry, or products thereof ((or to));
the use of animals in the normal and usual course of rodeo events; the
normal, humane, and usual use of equine for logging, riding, showing, driving,
or drafting purposes; or to the customary use or exhibiting of animals in
normal and usual events at fairs as defined in RCW 15.76.120.

--- END ---