BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.160.020 and 1985
c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Smoke"
or "smoking" means the carrying or smoking of any kind of lighted
pipe, cigar, cigarette, or any other lighted smoking equipment.

(2) "Public
place" means that portion of any building or vehicle used by and open to
the public, regardless of whether the building or vehicle is owned in whole or
in part by private persons or entities, the state of Washington, or other
public entity, and regardless of whether a fee is charged for admission.

Public places include,
but are not limited to: Elevators, public conveyances or transportation
facilities, museums, concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls,
indoor sports arenas, hospitals, nursing homes, health care facilities or
clinics, enclosed shopping centers, retail stores, retail service
establishments, financial institutions, educational facilities, ticket areas,
public hearing facilities, state legislative chambers and immediately adjacent
hallways, public restrooms, libraries, restaurants, waiting areas, lobbies, ((and))
reception areas, and facilities licensed by the gambling commission to
operate house-banked cardrooms. A public place does not include a private
residence. This chapter is not intended to restrict smoking in private
facilities which are occasionally open to the public except upon the occasions
when the facility is open to the public.

(3)
"Restaurant" means any building, structure, or area used, maintained,
or advertised as, or held out to the public to be, an enclosure where meals are
made available to be consumed on the premises, for consideration of payment.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.160.040 and 1985
c 236 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A smoking area may
be designated in a public place by the owner or, in the case of a leased or
rented space, by the lessee or other person in charge except in:

(a) Elevators; buses,
except for private hire; streetcars; taxis, except those clearly and visibly
designated by the owner to permit smoking; public areas of retail stores and
lobbies of financial institutions; office reception areas and waiting rooms of
any building owned or leased by the state of Washington or by any city, county,
or other municipality in the state of Washington; museums; public meetings or
hearings; classrooms and lecture halls of schools, colleges, and universities;
and the seating areas and aisle ways which are contiguous to seating areas of
concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, and indoor sports
arenas; and

(b) Hallways of health
care facilities, with the exception of nursing homes, and lobbies of concert
halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, and indoor sports arenas, if
the area is not physically separated. Owners or other persons in charge are
not required to incur any expense to make structural or other physical
modifications in providing these areas.

Except as provided in
other provisions of this chapter, no public place, other than a bar, tavern,
bowling alley, tobacco shop, or restaurant, may be designated as a smoking area
in its entirety. However, if a bar, tavern, bowling alley, or restaurant is
licensed by the gambling commission to operate a house-banked cardroom, it may
not be designated as a smoking area in its entirety. If a bar, tobacco
shop, or restaurant is designated as a smoking area in its entirety, this
designation shall be posted conspicuously on all entrances normally used by the
public.

(2) Where smoking areas
are designated, existing physical barriers and ventilation systems shall be
used to minimize the toxic effect of smoke in adjacent nonsmoking areas.

(3) Managers of
restaurants who choose to provide smoking areas shall designate an adequate
amount of seating to meet the demands of restaurant patrons who wish to smoke.
Owners of restaurants are not required to incur any expense to make structural
or other physical modifications in providing these areas. Restaurant patrons
shall be informed that separate smoking and nonsmoking sections are available.

(4) Except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, a facility or area may be designated in
its entirety as a nonsmoking area by the owner or other person in charge.

---
END ---