BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that good language skills are essential for productive adults and
that public schools in the state of Washington provide trained speech
pathologists to assist children who lack adequate verbal communication skills
to compete successfully in the challenges of securing an education. It
recognizes that the task of teaching students to speak well is a formidable one
and sees shrinking public funding as an obstacle in providing sufficient
professional staff to realize that goal. It further recognizes that
professionally trained and nationally certified speech pathologists are
provided at no cost by nonprofit charitable organizations to preschool and
school-age children. To aid the public schools in teaching essential speech
skills, a "Help Kids Speak" license plate is established.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Help Kids Speak
license plates" means license plates that display a symbol of a nonprofit,
charitable organization that provides no-fee nationally certified speech
pathologists to teach youngsters to speak.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

In cooperation with the
Washington state patrol and the department of licensing, the sponsors of the
"Help Kids Speak" program shall create and design, and the department
shall issue, a special license plate displaying a symbol of a nonprofit
charitable organization and the words "Help Kids Speak" that may be
used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates for motor vehicles
required to display two motor vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by
the department. The special plates will commemorate the "Help Kids
Speak" organization.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c
291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
establish a fee for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section 5,
chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the cost of
production of the special license plates and the administration of this
program. ((Until December 31, 1997,)) The fee shall not exceed
((thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more
than)) forty dollars. This fee is in addition to all other fees required
to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been requested.
All such additional special license plate fees collected by the department
shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle
fund.

(2) ((Until December
31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the
custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The
state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4))) (3)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee
of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5))) (4)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW
82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the
taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(((6))) (5)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate
shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(6) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2003, in addition to
all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration of a
motor vehicle, the holder of a "Help Kids Speak" license plate shall
pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the "Help Kids Speak" license plate account established under section
5 of this act.

(7) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2004, in addition to all
fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle
registration, the holder of a "Help Kids Speak" license plate shall,
upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an
amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection
for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
"Help Kids Speak" license plate account established under section 5
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The "Help Kids
Speak" program is created. The purpose of the program is to provide
grants to nonprofit, charitable organizations, incorporated under the laws of
the state of Washington that do not discriminate in any way, and that provide
nationally certified speech pathologists on a no-fee basis to youngsters,
regardless of their economic status, whether enrolled in a public, private, or
home school, of preschool or school age, and who have displayed a lack of
verbal communication skills; including in the grant application a finding that
there is, on staff of the nonprofit, charitable organization, nationally
certified speech pathologists trained in the techniques of teaching youngsters
essential communication skills. The superintendent of public instruction shall
administer the grant program.

(2) The "Help Kids
Speak" license plate account is established in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts, except as provided in RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from
"Help Kids Speak" license plates must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to fund the grant program under
subsection (1) of this section. Only the superintendent of public instruction
or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and
no appropriation is required for expenditures.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.16.305 and 1997 c
291 s 6 and 1997 c 241 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The department shall
continue to issue the categories of special plates issued by the department
under the sections repealed under section 12 (1) through (7), chapter 250, Laws
of 1990. Special license plates issued under those repealed sections before
January 1, 1991, are valid to the extent and under the conditions provided in
those repealed sections. The following conditions, limitations, or requirements
apply to certain special license plates issued after January 1, 1991:

(1) A horseless
carriage plate and a plate or plates issued for collectors' vehicles more than
thirty years old, upon payment of the initial fees required by law and the
additional special license plate fee established by the department, are valid
for the life of the vehicle for which application is approved by the
department. When a single plate is issued, it shall be displayed on the rear
of the vehicle.

(2) The department may
issue special license plates denoting amateur radio operator status only to
persons having a valid official radio operator license issued by the federal
communications commission.

(3) The department
shall issue one set of special license plates to each resident of this state
who has been awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor for use on a passenger
vehicle registered to that person. The department shall issue the plate
without the payment of licensing fees and motor vehicle excise tax.

(4) The department may
issue for use on only one motor vehicle owned by the qualified applicant
special license plates denoting that the recipient of the plate is a survivor
of the attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, to persons meeting all of
the following criteria:

(a) Is a resident of
this state;

(b) Was a member of the
United States Armed Forces on December 7, 1941;

(c) Was on station on
December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at
Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three
miles;

(d) Received an
honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces; and

(e) Is certified by a
Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor survivors association as
satisfying the qualifications in (c) of this subsection.

The department may
issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any deceased Pearl Harbor survivor
who met the requirements of this subsection. If the surviving spouse
remarries, he or she shall return the special plates to the department within
fifteen days and apply for regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a
resident of this state.

The department shall
issue these plates upon payment by the applicant of all other license fees, but
the department may not set or charge an additional fee for these special
license plates.

(5)(a) The
department shall issue one set of special license plates to each resident of
this state who has been awarded the law enforcement medal of honor under
chapter 41.72 RCW for use on a passenger vehicle registered to that person.

(b) The department
may issue these plates to the surviving spouse of any person awarded the law
enforcement medal of honor posthumously. If the surviving spouse remarries, he
or she shall return the special plates to the department within fifteen days
and apply for regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a resident of this
state.

(6)
The department shall replace, free of charge, special license plates issued
under subsections (3) and (4) of this section if they are lost, stolen,
damaged, defaced, or destroyed. Such plates shall remain with the persons upon
transfer or other disposition of the vehicle for which they were initially
issued, and may be used on another vehicle registered to the recipient in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 46.16.316(1).

---
END ---