BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 12.36.050 and 1998 c
52 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within fourteen
days after a small claims appeal has been filed in superior court by the clerk
of the district court pursuant to RCW 12.36.020(3), the complete record as
defined in subsection (2) of this section shall be made and certified by the
clerk of the district court to be correct. The clerk shall then immediately
transmit the complete record to superior court. The superior court shall then
become possessed of the cause. All further proceedings shall be in the
superior court, including enforcement of any judgment rendered. Any ((mandatory))
superior court procedures such as arbitration or other methods of
dispute resolution ((will apply as if the cause was originally filed in))
may be utilized by the superior court in its discretion. ((The
statute governing the trial de novo shall only apply to those cases set for
trial after compliance with superior court procedures.))

(2) The complete record
shall consist of a transcript of all entries made in the district court docket
relating to the case, together with all the process and other papers relating
to the case filed with the district court and ((any)) a
contemporaneous recording made of the proceeding.

Sec. 2. RCW 12.36.055 and 1997 c
352 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The appeal from a
small claims judgment or decision shall be ((a trial)) de novo ((in
superior court. A trial de novo pursuant to this chapter shall be tried as
nearly as possible in the manner of the original small claims trial. No jury
may be allowed, or attorney or legal paraprofessional involved, without written
order of the superior court, unless allowed in the original trial. No new
pleadings other than the notice of appeal may be allowed without written
permission of the superior court. Each party shall be allowed equal time, but
no more than thirty minutes each without permission of the superior court. No
new or other evidence, nor new or other testimony may be presented other than
at the trial in small claims court, without permission of the superior)) upon
the record of the case, as entered by the district court.

(2) Any cases
heard in superior court pursuant to this section may be heard by a duly
appointed commissioner. As used in this chapter "judge" includes any
duly appointed commissioner.

---
END ---