BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that Washington state faces threats to its economic vitality, public health,
and environment from the ongoing and increasing use of gasoline and diesel
fuels in motor vehicles. Motor vehicle emissions from petroleum fuels account
for more than half of all air pollutants and almost sixty percent of total
carbon dioxide emissions in Washington. The legislature finds it is important
to begin addressing the negative impacts of continued gasoline and diesel fuel
use. Addressing motor vehicle emissions is further needed because of the
expected increases in population and vehicle miles traveled, which threaten to
erode air quality gains made over the last decade. To make net progress in
improving air quality, reducing the threat of climate change, and protecting
public health and the environment, the legislature finds it is necessary to
encourage the use of clean alternative fuel vehicles.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.94.030 and 1993 c
252 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as
hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1) "Air
contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other particulate matter,
vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination thereof.

(2) "Air
pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air
contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such characteristics and duration
as is, or is likely to be, injurious to human health, plant or animal life, or
property, or which unreasonably interfere with enjoyment of life and property.
For the purpose of this chapter, air pollution shall not include air
contaminants emitted in compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.

(3) "Air quality
standard" means an established concentration, exposure time, and frequency
of occurrence of an air contaminant or multiple contaminants in the ambient air
which shall not be exceeded.

(4) "Ambient
air" means the surrounding outside air.

(5)
"Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or more
counties.

(6) "Best available
control technology" (BACT) means an emission limitation based on the
maximum degree of reduction for each air pollutant subject to regulation under
this chapter emitted from or that results from any new or modified stationary
source, that the permitting authority, on a case-by-case basis, taking into
account energy, environmental, and economic impacts and other costs, determines
is achievable for such a source or modification through application of
production processes and available methods, systems, and techniques, including
fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative fuel combustion
techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In no event shall application
of "best available control technology" result in emissions of any pollutants
that will exceed the emissions allowed by any applicable standard under 40
C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they exist on July 25, 1993, or their later
enactments as adopted by reference by the director by rule. Emissions from any
source utilizing clean fuels, or any other means, to comply with this
subsection shall not be allowed to increase above levels that would have been
required under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to enactment of the
(([federal])) federal clean air act amendments of 1990.

(7) "Best
available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission limitation based
on the degree of reduction achievable through the application of the best
system of continuous emission reduction for each pollutant that is emitted by
an existing stationary facility. The emission limitation must be established,
on a case-by-case basis, taking into consideration the technology available,
the costs of compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental impacts of
compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence at the
source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of improvement
in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to result from the use of
the technology.

(8) "Board"
means the board of directors of an authority.

(9) "Clean
alternative fuel vehicle" means a motor vehicle, as defined in RCW
46.04.320, originally designed and equipped by the manufacturer to operate:
(a) Exclusively on alternative fuels; (b) as a hybrid vehicle powered by a
combination of an electric motor and an engine powered by gasoline, diesel, or
an alternative fuel, that has an average estimated fuel economy rating, as
determined by the environmental protection agency's national vehicle and fuel
emissions laboratory, of at least forty miles per gallon; or (c) as a fuel cell
vehicle powered by gasoline or an alternative fuel. Vehicles less than twelve
thousand pounds gross vehicle weight must also meet or exceed the federal
emission standards for ultralow emission vehicles. For purposes of this
subsection, "alternative fuels" are defined as natural gas, propane,
hydrogen, and electricity.

(10)
"Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of any
authority.

(((10))) (11)
"Department" or "ecology" means the department of ecology.

(((11))) (12)
"Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the ambient air.

(((12))) (13)
"Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter that
limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air contaminants on
a continuous basis, including any requirement relating to the operation or
maintenance of a source to assure continuous emission reduction, and any
design, equipment, work practice, or operational standard adopted under the
federal clean air act or this chapter.

(((13))) (14)
"Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source that
rate of emissions that reflects:

(a) The most stringent
emission limitation that is contained in the implementation plan of any state
for such class or category of source, unless the owner or operator of the
proposed source demonstrates that such limitations are not achievable; or

(b) The most stringent
emission limitation that is achieved in practice by such class or category of
source, whichever is more stringent.

In no event shall the
application of this term permit a proposed new or modified source to emit any
pollutant in excess of the amount allowable under applicable new source
performance standards.

(((14))) (15)
"Modification" means any physical change in, or change in the method
of operation of, a stationary source that increases the amount of any air
contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission of any air
contaminant not previously emitted. The term modification shall be construed
consistent with the definition of modification in Section 7411, Title 42,
United States Code, and with rules implementing that section.

(((15))) (16)
"Multicounty authority" means an authority which consists of two or
more counties.

(((16))) (17)
"New source" means (a) the construction or modification of a
stationary source that increases the amount of any air contaminant emitted by
such source or that results in the emission of any air contaminant not
previously emitted, and (b) any other project that constitutes a new source
under the federal clean air act.

(((17))) (18)
"Permit program source" means a source required to apply for or to
maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.

(((18))) (19)
"Person" means an individual, firm, public or private corporation,
association, partnership, political subdivision of the state, municipality, or
governmental agency.

(((19))) (20)
"Reasonably available control technology" (RACT) means the lowest
emission limit that a particular source or source category is capable of
meeting by the application of control technology that is reasonably available
considering technological and economic feasibility. RACT is determined on a
case-by-case basis for an individual source or source category taking into
account the impact of the source upon air quality, the availability of
additional controls, the emission reduction to be achieved by additional
controls, the impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a source or
source category shall be adopted only after notice and opportunity for comment
are afforded.

(((20))) (21)
"Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber on forest land
consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.

(((21))) (22)
"Source" means all of the emissions units including quantifiable
fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more contiguous or adjacent
properties, and are under the control of the same person, or persons under
common control, whose activities are ancillary to the production of a single
product or functionally related group of products.

(((22))) (23)
"Stationary source" means any building, structure, facility, or
installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons who are
taxable under this chapter may take a credit for the purchase, or the lease for
a period of at least three years, of new clean alternative fuel vehicles as
defined in RCW 70.94.030(9)(a), (b), or (c), if the vehicles are exclusively
used in business operations. The credit shall be based upon the following
schedule:

VEHICLE TONNAGE CREDIT

Less than 12,000 pounds
gross 25 percent of the base cost

vehicle weight or
$5,000, whichever is less

Over 12,000 pounds
gross 25 percent of the base cost

vehicle weight
or $20,000, whichever is less

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The
credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be
granted in place of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section
that may be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars.

(3) Tax credit may not
be claimed for expenditures that occurred before the effective date of this
section or expenditures that occur after the date specified in section 6 of
this act.

(4) The tax credit for
vehicles defined under RCW 70.94.030(9)(b) expires June 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons who are
taxable under this chapter and provide financial assistance for the purchase,
or the lease for a period of at least three years, of new clean alternative
fuel vehicles as defined in RCW 70.94.030 to school districts, transit
agencies, and local governments may take a credit for amounts paid, if the
vehicles are used for public transit. School buses are considered public
transit for purposes of this section.

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The
credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be
granted in place of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section
that may be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars.

(3) Tax credit may not
be claimed for financial assistance that occurred before the effective date of
this section or financial assistance that occur after the date specified in
section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Persons who are
taxable under this chapter may take a credit for the costs expended for
acquiring and installing alternative fuel and electric vehicle recharging
equipment, including alternative fuel storage tanks. Alternative fuel means
natural gas, propane, hydrogen, fuel containing a minimum of eighty-five
percent ethanol, and fuel containing a minimum of twenty percent biodiesel.
The credit shall be based upon the following schedule:

(a) Fifty percent of
the costs incurred at facilities open to the public not to exceed two hundred
thousand dollars; and

(b) Twenty-five percent
of the costs incurred at facilities not open to the public not to exceed one
hundred thousand dollars.

(2) The credit may not
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The
credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be
granted in place of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section
that may be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed one
million dollars.

(3) Tax credit may not
be claimed for expenditures that occurred before the effective date of this
section or expenditures that occur after the date specified in section 6 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

Tax credits under
sections 3, 4, and 5 of this act shall not be allowed for expenditures that
occur after December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by
this chapter shall not apply to the sale or lease of a new motor vehicle that
meets the definition of a "clean alternative fuel vehicle" as provided
in RCW 70.94.030(9) (a) or (c) or a hybrid vehicle as defined under RCW
70.94.030(9)(b) that operates solely on an alternative fuel.

(2) Until June 30,
2003, the tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to the sale, or the lease
of a period of at least three years, of a new motor vehicle that meets the
definition of a "clean alternative fuel vehicle" as provided in RCW
70.94.030(9)(b), except for hybrid vehicles operating solely on alternative
fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by
this chapter shall not apply to the sale or lease of a new motor vehicle that
meets the definition of a "clean alternative fuel vehicle" as
provided in RCW 70.94.030(9) (a) or (c) or a hybrid vehicle as defined under
RCW 70.94.030(9)(b) that operates solely on an alternative fuel.

(2) Until June 30,
2003, the tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to the sale, or the lease
of a period of at least three years, of a new motor vehicle that meets the
definition of a "clean alternative fuel vehicle" as provided in RCW
70.94.030(9)(b), except for hybrid vehicles operating solely on alternative
fuels.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.38.020 and 1998 c
176 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "B2O"
means a fuel blend containing not less than nineteen percent or more than
twenty-one percent biodiesel.

(2)
"Biodiesel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty acids
derived from vegetable oils or animal fats, that is produced domestically, for
use in compression-ignition engines.

(3)
"Blended special fuel" means a mixture of undyed diesel fuel and
another liquid, other than a de minimus amount of the liquid, that can be used
as a fuel to propel a motor vehicle.

(((2))) (4)
"Blender" means a person who produces blended special fuel outside
the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(((3))) (5)
"Bond" means a bond duly executed with a corporate surety qualified
under chapter 48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the state of Washington
conditioned upon faithful performance of all requirements of this chapter,
including the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations arising
out of this chapter.

(((4))) (6)
"Bulk transfer-terminal system" means the special fuel distribution
system consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and terminals. Special
fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal is in the bulk
transfer-terminal system. Special fuel in the fuel tank of an engine, motor
vehicle, or in a railcar, trailer, truck, or other equipment suitable for
ground transportation is not in the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(((5))) (7)
"Bulk transfer" means a transfer of special fuel by pipeline or
vessel.

(((6))) (8)
"Bulk storage" means the placing of special fuel into a receptacle
other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.

(((7))) (9)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(((8))) (10)
"Dyed special fuel user" means a person authorized by the internal
revenue code to operate a motor vehicle on the highway using dyed special fuel,
in which the use is not exempt from the special fuel tax.

(((9))) (11)
"Evasion" or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the
computation, assessment, or payment of authorized taxes or fees through:

(a) A knowing: False
statement; misrepresentation of fact; or other act of deception; or

(b) An intentional:
Omission; failure to file a return or report; or other act of deception.

(((10))) (12)
"Export" means to obtain special fuel in this state for sales or
distribution outside the state.

(((11))) (13)
"Highway" means every way or place open to the use of the public, as
a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.

(((12))) (14)
"Import" means to bring special fuel into this state by a means of
conveyance other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.

(((13))) (15)
"International fuel tax agreement licensee" means a special fuel user
operating qualified motor vehicles in interstate commerce and licensed by the
department under the international fuel tax agreement.

(((14))) (16)
"Lessor" means a person: (a) Whose principal business is the bona
fide leasing or renting of motor vehicles without drivers for compensation to
the general public; and (b) who maintains established places of business and
whose lease or rental contracts require the motor vehicles to be returned to the
established places of business.

(((15))) (17)
"Licensee" means a person holding a license issued under this
chapter.

(((16))) (18)
"Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed for operation
upon land utilizing special fuel as the means of propulsion.

(((17))) (19)
"Natural gas" means naturally occurring mixtures of hydrocarbon gases
and vapors consisting principally of methane, whether in gaseous or liquid
form.

(((18))) (20)
"Person" means a natural person, fiduciary, association, or corporation.
The term "person" as applied to an association means and includes the
partners or members thereof, and as applied to corporations, the officers
thereof.

(((19))) (21)
"Position holder" means a person who holds the inventory position in
special fuel, as reflected by the records of the terminal operator. A person
holds the inventory position in special fuel if the person has a contractual
agreement with the terminal for the use of storage facilities and terminating
services at a terminal with respect to special fuel. "Position
holder" includes a terminal operator that owns special fuel in their
terminal.

(((20))) (22)
"Rack" means a mechanism for delivering special fuel from a refinery
or terminal into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other means of nonbulk transfer.

(((21))) (23)
"Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise controls a
refinery.

(((22))) (24)
"Removal" means a physical transfer of special fuel other than by
evaporation, loss, or destruction.

(((23))) (25)
"Special fuel" means and includes all combustible gases and liquids
suitable for the generation of power for propulsion of motor vehicles, except
that it does not include motor vehicle fuel as defined in chapter 82.36 RCW,
nor does it include dyed special fuel as defined by federal regulations.
However, if the federal regulations authorize dyed special fuel to be used in
highway vehicles, that usage is considered taxable under this chapter, unless
otherwise exempted.

(((24))) (26)
"Special fuel distributor" means a person who acquires special fuel
from a supplier, distributor, or licensee for subsequent sale and distribution.

(((25))) (27)
"Special fuel exporter" means a person who purchases special fuel in
this state and directly exports the fuel by a means other than the bulk
transfer-terminal system to a destination outside of the state.

(((26))) (28)
"Special fuel importer" means a person who imports special fuel into
the state by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal system. If the
importer of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is
acting is the importer. If there is no importer of record, the owner of the
special fuel at the time of importation is the importer.

(((27))) (29)
"Special fuel supplier" means a person who owns and stores special
fuel in a terminal facility or who refines and stores special fuel at a
refinery.

(((28))) (30)
"Special fuel user" means a person engaged in uses of special fuel
that are not specifically exempted from the special fuel tax imposed under this
chapter.

(((29))) (31)
"Terminal" means a special fuel storage and distribution facility
that has been assigned a terminal control number by the internal revenue
service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which reportable special
fuel is removed at a rack.

(((30))) (32)
"Terminal operator" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise
controls a terminal.

(((31))) (33)
"Two-party exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a
transaction in which taxable special fuel is transferred from one licensed
supplier to another licensed supplier under an exchange or buy-sell agreement
whereby the supplier that is the position holder agrees to deliver taxable
special fuel to the other supplier or the other supplier's customer at the rack
of the terminal at which the delivering supplier is the position holder.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.38.030 and 1998 c
176 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and imposed upon special fuel users a tax at the rate computed in the
manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of special fuel, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature, except a tax rate of eleven and one-half cents per gallon shall
apply to users of B2O or fuel containing a minimum of eighty-five percent
ethanol.

(2) The tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section is imposed when:

(a) Special fuel is
removed in this state from a terminal if the special fuel is removed at the
rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a
destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a special fuel
distributor for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee
under RCW 82.38.320;

(b) Special fuel is
removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:

(i) The removal is by
bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the special fuel immediately before
the removal is not a licensee; or

(ii) The removal is at
the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct
delivery to a destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a special
fuel distributor for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320;

(c) Special fuel enters
into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage if either of the
following applies:

(i) The entry is by
bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensee; or

(ii) The entry is not
by bulk transfer;

(d) Special fuel is
removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there was a prior taxable
removal, entry, or sale of the special fuel;

(e) Blended special
fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The number
of gallons of blended special fuel subject to tax is the difference between the
total number of gallons of blended special fuel removed or sold and the number
of gallons of previously taxed special fuel used to ((produced [produce]))
produce the blended special fuel;

(f) Dyed special fuel
is used on a highway, as authorized by the internal revenue code, unless the
use is exempt from the special fuel tax; and

(g) Special fuel
purchased by an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320
is used on a highway.

(3) The tax imposed by
this chapter, if required to be collected by the licensee, is held in trust by
the licensee until paid to the department, and a licensee who appropriates or
converts the tax collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the
payment of the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty
of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft and anticipatory
provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership, corporation, or corporate
officer who fails to collect the tax imposed by this section, or who has
collected the tax and fails to pay it to the department in the manner prescribed
by this chapter, is personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.38.075 and 1983 c
212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to encourage
the use of nonpolluting fuels, an annual license fee in lieu of the tax imposed
by RCW 82.38.030 shall be imposed upon the use of natural gas as defined in
this chapter ((or)), on liquified petroleum gas, commonly called
propane, or hydrogen, which is used in any motor vehicle, as defined in RCW
46.04.320, which shall be based upon the following schedule as adjusted by the
formula set out below:

VEHICLE
TONNAGE (GVW) FEE

0
- 6,000 $ 45

6,001 -
10,000 $ 45

10,001 -
18,000 $ 80

18,001 -
28,000 $110

28,001
- 36,000 $150

36,001 and
above $250

To determine the actual
annual license fee imposed by this section for a registration year, the
appropriate dollar amount set out in the above schedule shall be multiplied by
((the motor vehicle fuel tax rate in cents per gallon as established by RCW
82.36.025 effective on July 1st of the preceding calendar year)) eleven
and one-half cents per gallon and the product thereof shall be divided by
12 cents.

The department of
licensing, in addition to the foregoing fee, shall charge a further fee of five
dollars as a handling charge for each license issued.

The director of
licensing shall be authorized to prorate the vehicle tonnage fee so that the
annual license required by this section will correspond with the staggered
vehicle licensing system.

A decal or other
identifying device issued upon payment of these annual fees shall be displayed
as prescribed by the department as authority to purchase this fuel.

Persons selling or
dispensing natural gas or propane may not sell or dispense this fuel for their
own use or the use of others into tanks of vehicles powered by this fuel which
do not display a valid decal or other identifying device as provided in this section.

Vehicles registered in
jurisdictions outside the state of Washington are exempt from this section.

Any person selling or
dispensing natural gas or propane into the tank of a motor vehicle powered by
this fuel, except as prescribed in this chapter, is subject to the penalty
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington State
University energy program, in consultation with the departments of ecology,
revenue, and licensing; local governments; vehicle manufacturers and suppliers;
and other interested parties shall collect and review the relevant data
associated with the provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (this
act) and evaluate the effectiveness of these incentives in improving air
quality and increasing the use of clean alternative fuel vehicles. The
Washington State University energy program shall present its findings and make
recommendations as appropriate to the legislature biennially on or before
November 30th, beginning in 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. RCW 43.19.637 (Clean-fuel
vehicles--Purchasing requirements) and 1991 c 199 s 213 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act take effect August 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. Sections 9 through 12 of
this act take effect January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. Sections 7 through 12 of
this act expire December 31, 2009.

---
END ---