BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
43.99N.060 and 2000 c 137 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) The stadium and exhibition center account is
created in the

_7 custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
taxes imposed

_8 under RCW 82.14.0494 and distributions under RCW
67.70.240(5)

_9 shall be deposited into the account. Only the director
of the

10 office of financial management or the director's
designee may

11 authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to

12 allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An
appropriation is

13 not required for expenditures from this account.

14 (2) Until bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, up
to five

15 million dollars per year beginning January 1, 1999,
shall be used

16 for the purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section,
all

17 remaining moneys in the account shall be transferred to
the public

p. 1 SB
5493

_1 stadium authority, created under RCW 36.102.020, to be
used for

_2 public stadium authority operations and development of
the stadium

_3 and exhibition center.

_4 (3) After bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all
moneys in

_5 the stadium and exhibition center account shall be used

_6 exclusively for the following purposes in the following
priority:

_7 (a) On or before June 30th of each year, the office
of

_8 financial management shall accumulate in the stadium and

_9 exhibition center account an amount at least equal to
the amount

10 required in the next succeeding twelve months for the
payment of

11 principal of and interest on the bonds issued under RCW

12 43.99N.020;

13 (b) An additional reserve amount not in excess of
the expected

14 average annual principal and interest requirements of
bonds issued

15 under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be accumulated and maintained
in the

16 account, subject to withdrawal by the state treasurer at
any time

17 if necessary to meet the requirements of (a) of this
subsection,

18 and, following any withdrawal, reaccumulated from the
first tax

19 revenues and other amounts deposited in the account
after meeting

20 the requirements of (a) of this subsection; and

21 (c) The balance, if any, shall be transferred to the
youth

22 athletic facility account under subsection (4) of this
section.

23 Any revenues derived from the taxes authorized by
RCW

24 36.38.010(5) and 36.38.040 or other amounts that if used
as

25 provided under (a) and (b) of this subsection would
cause the loss

26 of any tax exemption under federal law for interest on
bonds

27 issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be deposited in and
used

28 exclusively for the purposes of the youth athletic
facility

29 account and shall not be used, directly or indirectly,
as a source

30 of payment of principal of or interest on bonds issued
under RCW

31 43.99N.020, or to replace or reimburse other funds used
for that

32 purpose.

33 (4) Any moneys in the stadium and exhibition center
account not

34 required or permitted to be used for the purposes
described in

35 subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section shall be
deposited in

36 the youth athletic facility account hereby created in
the state

37 treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for

SB 5493 p. 2

_1 purposes of grants or loans to cities, counties, and
qualified

_2 nonprofit organizations for community outdoor athletic
facilities.

_3 Only the director of the interagency committee for
outdoor

_4 recreation or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures

_5 from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures

_6 under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for

_7 expenditures. The athletic facility grants or loans may
be used for

_8 acquiring, developing, equipping, maintaining, and
improving

_9 community outdoor athletic facilities. Funds shall be
divided

10 ((equally)) between the development of new
community outdoor

11 athletic facilities, the improvement of existing
community outdoor

12 athletic facilities, and the maintenance of existing
community

13 outdoor athletic facilities. Cities, counties, and
qualified

14 nonprofit organizations must submit proposals for grants
or loans

15 from the account. To the extent that funds are
available, cities,

16 counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must
meet

17 eligibility criteria as established by the director of
the

18 interagency committee for outdoor recreation. The
grants and loans

19 shall be awarded on a competitive application process
and the

20 amount of the grant or loan shall be in proportion to
the

21 population of the city or county for where the community
outdoor

22 athletic facility is located. Grants or loans awarded
in any one

23 year need not be distributed in that year. The director
of the

24 interagency committee for outdoor recreation may expend
up to one

25 and one-half percent of the moneys deposited in the
account

26 created in this subsection for administrative purposes.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5493