BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.37.390 and 1977
ex.s. c 355 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every motor vehicle
shall at all times be equipped with a muffler in good working order and in
constant operation to prevent excessive or unusual noise, and no person shall
use a muffler cut-out, bypass, or similar device upon a motor vehicle on a
highway.

(2)(a) No motor vehicle
first sold and registered as a new motor vehicle on or after January 1, 1971,
shall discharge into the atmosphere at elevations of less than three thousand
feet any air contaminant for a period of more than ten seconds which is:

(i) As dark as or
darker than the shade designated as No. 1 on the Ringelmann chart, as published
by the United States bureau of mines; or

(ii) Of such opacity as
to obscure an observer's view to a degree equal to or greater than does smoke
described in subsection (a)(i) above.

(b) No motor vehicle
first sold and registered prior to January 1, 1971, shall discharge into the
atmosphere at elevations of less than three thousand feet any air contaminant
for a period of more than ten seconds which is:

(i) As dark as or
darker than the shade designated as No. 2 on the Ringelmann chart, as published
by the United States bureau of mines; or

(ii) Of such opacity as
to obscure an observer's view to a degree equal to or greater than does smoke
described in subsection (b)(i) above.

(c) For the purposes of
this subsection the following definitions shall apply:

(i) "Opacity"
means the degree to which an emission reduces the transmission of light and
obscures the view of an object in the background;

(ii) "Ringelmann
chart" means the Ringelmann smoke chart with instructions for use as
published by the United States bureau of mines in May 1967 and as thereafter
amended, information circular 7718.

(3) No person shall
modify the exhaust system of a motor vehicle in a manner ((which will
amplify or increase the noise emitted by the engine of such vehicle above that
emitted by the muffler originally installed on the vehicle, and it shall be
unlawful for any person to operate a motor vehicle not equipped as required by
this subsection, or which has been amplified as prohibited by this subsection))
so that the vehicle's noise exceeds eighty-six decibels on the "A"
scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive Engineers (SAE)
test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise level of one hundred five
decibels on the "A" scale at a distance of twenty inches from the
exhaust outlet is an acceptable substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive
Engineers test procedure J 331a when measured:

(a) At a forty-five
degree angle at a distance of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet;

(b) With the vehicle
stationary and the engine running at a steady speed equal to one-half of the
manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red line") engine speed or where
the manufacturer's maximum allowable engine speed is not known the test speed
in revolutions per minute calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which
maximum horsepower is developed; and

(c) With the
microphone placed ten inches from the side of the vehicle, one-half way between
the lowest part of the vehicle body and the ground plane, and in the same
lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust outlet where the outlet of the exhaust
pipe is under the vehicle.

This
subsection (3) does not apply to passenger vehicles being operated off the
highways in an organized racing or competitive event conducted by a recognized
sanctioning body.

--- END ---