BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 79A.25.810
and 1998 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) A community outdoor athletic fields advisory
council is

_7 established within the interagency committee for outdoor

_8 recreation. The advisory council shall consist of nine
members,

_9 from the public at large, appointed as follows: (a) ((Four))
Eight

10 members appointed by the chairperson of the interagency committee

11 for outdoor recreation; and (b) ((two members
appointed by the

12 house of representatives, one each appointed by the
speaker of the

13 house of representatives and the minority leader of the
house of

14 representatives; (c) two members appointed by the
senate, one each

15 appointed by the majority leader of the senate and the
minority

16 leader of the senate; and (d))) one member appointed
by the

17 governor, who shall serve as chairperson of the advisory
council.

18 The appointments must reflect an effort to achieve a
balance among

p. 1 ESB
5495

_1 the appointed members based upon factors of geographic, population

_2 density, racial, ethnic, and gender diversity,
and with a sense

_3 and awareness of community outdoor athletic fields needs,

_4 including the complete variety of outdoor athletic
activities.

_5 (2) The community outdoor athletic fields
advisory council

_6 shall annually advise, provide information to,
and make

_7 recommendations to the interagency committee for outdoor

_8 recreation on how to allocate all of the funds
deposited in the

_9 youth athletic facility account created in RCW
43.99N.060(4). These

10 recommendations must include, at a minimum,
recommendations

11 concerning the distribution of funds deposited in the
youth

12 athletic facility account between the maintenance of
existing

13 athletic facilities, the development of new athletic
facilities,

14 the improvement of existing athletic facilities, and
the award of

15 funds from the youth athletic facility ((grant))
account ((created

16 in RCW 43.99N.060(4),)) to cities, counties, and
qualified

17 nonprofit organizations for acquiring, developing,
equipping,

18 maintaining, and improving youth or community athletic
facilities,

19 including but not limited to community outdoor athletic
fields.

20 (3) The members shall serve three-year terms. Of
the initial

21 members, two shall be appointed for a one-year term, three
shall

22 be appointed for a two-year term, and the remainder
shall be

23 appointed for three-year terms. Thereafter, members
shall be

24 appointed for three-year terms. The member appointed by
the

25 governor shall serve as chairperson of the advisory
council for

26 the duration of the member's term.

27 (4) Members of the advisory council shall serve
without

28 compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as

29 provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

ESB 5495 p. 2