BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.04.610 and 1993 c
36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If any owner of
forest land within a forest protection zone neglects or fails to provide
adequate fire protection as required by RCW 76.04.600, the department shall
provide such protection and shall annually impose the following assessments on
each parcel of such land: (a) A flat fee assessment of fourteen dollars and
fifty cents; and (b) ((twenty-two)) twenty-five cents on each
acre exceeding fifty acres. Assessors may, at their option, collect the
assessment on tax exempt lands. If the assessor elects not to collect the
assessment, the department may bill the landowner directly.

(2) ((An owner who
has paid assessments on two or more parcels, each containing fewer than fifty
acres and each within the same county, may obtain the following refund:

(a) If all the
parcels together contain less than fifty acres, then the refund is equal to the
flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the total of (i) fourteen dollars and
(ii) the total of the amounts retained by the county from such assessments
under subsection (5) of this section.

(b) If all the
parcels together contain fifty or more acres, then the refund is equal to the
flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the total of (i) fourteen dollars, (ii)
twenty-two cents for each acre exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the total of
the amounts retained by the county from such assessments under subsection (5)
of this section.

Applications for
refunds shall be submitted to the department on a form prescribed by the
department and in the same year in which the assessments were paid. The
department may not provide refunds to applicants who do not provide
verification that all assessments and property taxes on the property have been
paid. Applications may be made by mail.

(3))) Beginning January 1, 1991, under the
administration and at the discretion of the department up to two hundred
thousand dollars per year of this assessment shall be used in support of those
rural fire districts assisting the department in fire protection services on
forest lands.

(((4))) (3)
For the purpose of this chapter, the department may divide the forest lands of
the state, or any part thereof, into districts, for fire protection and
assessment purposes, may classify lands according to the character of timber
prevailing, and the fire hazard existing, and place unprotected lands under the
administration of the proper district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid
by the department for protection of forest lands from funds at its disposal
shall be a lien upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the owner
within ten days after October 1st of the year in which they were incurred. The
department shall be prepared to make statement thereof, upon request, to a forest
owner whose own protection has not been previously approved as to its adequacy,
the department shall report the same to the assessor of the county in which the
property is situated. The assessor shall extend the amounts upon the tax rolls
covering the property, and upon authorization from the department shall levy
the forest protection assessment against the amounts of unimproved land as
shown in each ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor may
then segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the rural fire
protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.

(((5))) (4)
The amounts assessed shall be collected at the time, in the same manner, by the
same procedure, and with the same penalties attached that general state and
county taxes on the same property are collected, except that errors in
assessments may be corrected at any time by the department certifying them to
the treasurer of the county in which the land involved is situated.
Assessments shall be known and designated as assessments of the year in which
the amounts became reimbursable. Upon the collection of assessments the county
treasurer shall place fifty cents of the total assessments paid on a parcel for
fire protection into the county current expense fund to defray the costs of
listing, billing, and collecting these assessments. The treasurer shall then
transmit the balance to the department. Collections shall be applied against
expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section, including
necessary and reasonable administrative costs incurred by the department in the
enforcement of these provisions. The department may also expend sums collected
from owners of forest lands or received from any other source for necessary
administrative costs in connection with the enforcement of RCW 76.04.660.

(((6))) (5)
When land against which forest protection assessments are outstanding is
acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at public auction, the state shall have
a prior lien on the proceeds of sale over and above the amount necessary to
satisfy the county's delinquent tax judgment. The county treasurer, in case
the proceeds of sale exceed the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, shall
immediately remit to the department the amount of the outstanding forest
protection assessments.

(((7))) (6)
All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering forest land included in a
forest protection zone shall pay the forest protection assessments provided in
this section and the special forest fire suppression account assessments under
RCW 76.04.630. The forest protection assessments and special forest fire
suppression account assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies
from available funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice
from the department which is given after October 1st of the year in which the
protection was provided. Unpaid assessments shall not be a lien against the
nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the nonfederal
public body to the department and shall be subject to interest charges at the
legal rate.

(((8))) (7)
A public body, having failed to previously pay the forest protection
assessments required of it by this section, which fails to suppress a fire on
or originating from forest lands owned or administered by it, shall be liable
for the costs of suppression incurred by the department or its agent and shall
not be entitled to reimbursement of costs incurred by the public body in the
suppression activities.

(((9)))
(8) The department may adopt rules to implement this section, including,
but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting forest protection
assessments.

--- END ---