BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:

In cases
when a truancy petition has been filed and the child is sixteen years of age or
older, the court is not compelled under RCW 28A.225.010(1)(e)(iii) to dismiss
the truancy petition. The court may in its discretion proceed with the truancy
matter despite the child receiving a certificate of educational competence.

--- END ---