BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.08.100 and 1999 c
282 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department upon
receipt of a properly completed application and payment of a nonrefundable fee,
may grant an annual license to an applicant for the following: (a) Promoter;
(b) manager; (c) boxer; (d) second; (e) wrestling participant; (f) inspector;
(g) judge; (h) timekeeper; (i) announcer; (j) event physician; (k) referee; (l)
matchmaker; (m) kickboxer; and (n) martial arts participant.

(2) The application for
the following types of licenses shall include a physical performed by a
physician, as defined in RCW 67.08.002, which was performed by the physician
with a time period preceding the application as specified by rule: (a) Boxer;
(b) wrestling participant; (c) kickboxer; (d) martial arts participant; and (e)
referee.

(3) An applicant for
the following types of licenses for the sports of boxing, kickboxing, and
martial arts shall provide annual proof of certification as having adequate
experience, skill, and training from an organization approved by the
department, including, but not limited to, the association of boxing
commissions, the international boxing federation, the international boxing
organization, the Washington state association of professional ring officials,
the world boxing association, the world boxing council, or the world boxing
organization for boxing officials, and the united full contact federation for
kickboxing and martial arts officials: (a) Judge; (b) referee; (c) inspector;
(d) timekeeper; or (e) other officials deemed necessary by the department.

(4) Any license
may be revoked, suspended, or denied by the director for a violation of this
chapter or a rule adopted by the director.

(((4))) (5)
No person shall participate or serve in any of the above capacities unless
licensed as provided in this chapter.

(((5))) (6)
The referees, judges, timekeepers, event physicians, and inspectors for any
boxing event shall be designated by the department from among licensed
officials.

(((6))) (7)
The referee for any wrestling event shall be provided by the promoter and shall
be licensed as a wrestling participant.

(((7))) (8)
The department shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person
who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order.
If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement
during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be
automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department
of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with
the order.

(((8))) (9)
A person may not be issued a license if the person has an unpaid fine
outstanding to the department.

(((9))) (10)
A person may not be issued a license unless they are at least eighteen years of
age.

(((10)))
(11) This section shall not apply to contestants or participants in
events at which only amateurs are engaged in contests and/or fraternal
organizations and/or veterans' organizations chartered by congress or the
defense department or any recognized amateur sanctioning body recognized by the
department, holding and promoting athletic events and where all funds are used
primarily for the benefit of their members. Upon request of the department, a
promoter, contestant, or participant shall provide sufficient information to
reasonably determine whether this chapter applies.

--- END ---