BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that access to preventive oral health services for low-income children and
functionally disabled persons, which are provided by licensed dental
hygienists, is restricted by current practice settings.

It is the intent of the
legislature to expand access to and reduce the cost of preventive oral health
services to children, elderly individuals, and functionally disabled persons
who currently have unmet oral health needs. The legislature intends to broaden
the allowable practice settings in which licensed dental hygienists may provide
preventive services that are within their scope of unsupervised practice.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.29.056 and 1997 c
37 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Dental hygienists
licensed under this chapter with two years' practical clinical experience with
a licensed dentist within the preceding five years may be employed or retained
by health care facilities and programs to perform authorized dental
hygiene operations and services without dental supervision, limited to removal
of deposits and stains from the surfaces of the teeth, application of topical
preventive or prophylactic agents, polishing and smoothing restorations, and
performance of root planing and soft-tissue curettage, but shall not perform
injections of anesthetic agents, administration of nitrous oxide, or diagnosis
for dental treatment. The performance of dental hygiene operations and
services in health care facilities and programs shall be limited to
patients, students, and residents of the facilities and programs. For
dental planning and dental treatment, dental hygienists shall refer patients to
licensed dentists.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "health care facilities and programs" are
limited to hospitals; nursing homes; home health agencies; group homes serving
the elderly, handicapped, and juveniles; state-operated institutions under the
jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department
of corrections; home and community services that provide services for
functionally disabled persons receiving long-term care, as those terms are
defined in chapter 74.39A RCW; any sites used to carry out health care programs
authorized by federal, state, or local governments or tribal agencies; and
federal, state, and local public health facilities, state or federally funded
community and migrant health centers, and tribal clinics.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---