BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.38.010 and 1998 c
284 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commissioner may
grant a certificate of exemption to any insurer or educational, religious,
charitable, or scientific institution conducting a charitable gift annuity
business:

(1) Which is organized
and operated exclusively as, or for the purpose of aiding, an educational,
religious, charitable, or scientific institution which is organized as a
nonprofit organization without profit to any person, firm, partnership,
association, corporation, or other entity;

(2) Which possesses a
current tax exempt status under the laws of the United States;

(3) Which serves such
purpose by issuing charitable gift annuity contracts only for the benefit of
such educational, religious, charitable, or scientific institution;

(4) Which appoints the
insurance commissioner as its true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served
lawful process in any action, suit, or proceeding in any court, which
appointment shall be irrevocable, shall bind the insurer or institution or any
successor in interest, shall remain in effect as long as there is in force in
this state any contract made or issued by the insurer or institution, or any
obligation arising therefrom, and shall be processed in accordance with RCW
48.05.210;

(5) Which is fully and
legally organized and qualified to do business and has been actively doing
business under the laws of the state of its domicile for a period of at least
three years prior to its application for a certificate of exemption;

(6) Which has and
maintains minimum unrestricted net assets of five hundred thousand dollars.
"Unrestricted net assets" means the excess of total assets over total
liabilities that are neither permanently restricted nor temporarily restricted
by donor-imposed stipulations;

(7) Which files with
the insurance commissioner its application for a certificate of exemption
showing:

(a) Its name, location,
and organization date;

(b) The kinds of
charitable annuities it proposes to offer;

(c) A statement of the
financial condition, management, and affairs of the organization and any
affiliate thereof, as that term is defined in RCW 48.31B.005, on a form
satisfactory to, or furnished by the insurance commissioner;

(d) Such other
documents, stipulations, or information as the insurance commissioner may
reasonably require to evidence compliance with the provisions of this chapter;

(8) Which subjects
itself and any affiliate thereof, as that term is defined in RCW 48.31B.005, to
periodic examinations conducted under chapter 48.03 RCW as may be deemed
necessary by the insurance commissioner;

(9) Which files with
the insurance commissioner for the commissioner's advance approval a copy of
any policy or contract form to be offered or issued to residents of this
state. The grounds for disapproval of the policy or contract form shall be
those set forth in RCW 48.18.110; ((and))

(10) Which:

(a) Files with the
insurance commissioner on or before March 1 of each year a copy of its annual
statement prepared pursuant to the laws of its state of domicile, as well as
such other financial material as may be requested, including the annual
statement or other such financial materials as may be requested relating to any
affiliate, as that term is defined in RCW 48.31B.005; and

(b) Coincident with the
filing of its annual statement, pays an annual filing fee of twenty-five
dollars plus five dollars for each charitable gift annuity contract written for
residents of this state during the previous calendar year; and

(c) Which includes on
or attaches to the first page of the annual statement the statement of a
qualified actuary setting forth the actuary's opinion relating to annuity
reserves and other actuarial items. "Qualified actuary" as used in
this subsection means a member in good standing of the American academy of
actuaries or a person who has otherwise demonstrated actuarial competence to
the satisfaction of the insurance regulatory official of the domiciliary state;
and

(11) Which agrees to
pay no commission or compensation of any kind from any source to any person or
organization that is in any manner based or contingent upon the solicitation,
sale, issuance, or value of a particular gift annuity.

Sec. 2. RCW 48.38.020 and 1998 c
284 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon granting to
such insurer or institution under RCW 48.38.010 a certificate of exemption to
conduct a charitable gift annuity business, the insurance commissioner shall
require it to establish and maintain a separate reserve fund adequate to meet the
future payments under its charitable gift annuity contracts.

(2) The assets of the
separate reserve fund:

(a) Shall be held
legally and physically segregated from the other assets of the certificate of
exemption holder;

(b) Shall be invested
in the same manner that persons of reasonable prudence, discretion, and
intelligence exercise in the management of a like enterprise, not in regard to
speculating but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds,
considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their
capital. Investments shall be of sufficient value, liquidity, and diversity to
assure the insurer or institution's ability to meet its outstanding
obligations; and

(c) Shall not be liable
for any debts of the insurer or institution holding a certificate of exemption
under this chapter, other than those incurred pursuant to the issuance of
charitable gift annuities.

(3) The amount of the
separate reserve fund shall be:

(a) For contracts
issued prior to July 1, 1998, not less than an amount computed in accordance
with the standard of valuation based on the 1971 individual annuity mortality
table with six percent interest for single premium immediate annuity contracts
and four percent interest for all other individual annuity contracts;

(b) For contracts
issued on or after July 1, 1998, in an amount not less than the aggregate
reserves calculated according to the standards set forth in RCW 48.74.030 for
other annuities with no cash settlement options;

(c) Plus a surplus of
ten percent of the combined amounts under (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(4) The general assets
of the insurer or institution holding a certificate of exemption under this
chapter shall be liable for the payment of annuities to the extent that the
separate reserve fund is inadequate.

(5) For any failure on
its part to establish and maintain the separate reserve fund, the insurance
commissioner shall revoke its certificate of exemption.

(6) If an
institution holding a certificate of exemption under RCW 48.38.010 has
purchased a single premium life annuity that pays the entire amount stipulated
in the gift annuity agreement or agreements from an insurer (a) holding a
certificate of authority under chapter 48.05 RCW, (b) licensed in the state in
which the institution has its principle office, and (c) licensed in the state
in which the single premium life annuity is issued, then in determining the
minimum reserve fund that must be maintained under this section, a deduction
shall be allowed from the minimum reserve fund in an amount not exceeding the
reserve fund amount required for the annuity or annuities for which the single
premium life annuity is purchased, subject to the following conditions:

(i) The institution
has filed with the commissioner a copy of the single premium life annuity
purchased and specifying which charitable gift annuity or annuities are being
insured; and

(ii) The institution
has entered into a written agreement with the annuitant and the insurer issuing
the single premium life annuity providing that if for any reason the
institution is unable to continue making the annuity payments required by its
annuity agreements, the annuitants shall receive payments directly from the
insurer and the insurer shall be credited with all of these direct payments in
the accounts between the insurer and the institution.

Sec. 3. RCW 48.38.050 and 1998 c
284 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The insurance
commissioner may refuse to grant, or may revoke or suspend, a certificate of
exemption if the insurance commissioner finds that the insurer or institution:

(a) Has violated any
provision of this title prior to obtaining a certificate of exemption from the
commissioner;

(b) Does not
meet the requirements of this chapter ((or if the insurance commissioner
finds that the insurer or institution));

(c) Has violated
RCW 48.01.030 or any provisions of chapter 48.30 RCW ((or is found by the
insurance commissioner to be));

(d) Has paid a
commission or compensation of any kind from any source to any person or
organization that is in any manner based or contingent upon the solicitation,
sale, issuance, or value of a particular gift annuity; or

(e) Is in such
condition that its further issuance of charitable gift annuities would be
hazardous to annuity contract holders and the people of this state.

(2) After
hearing or with the consent of the insurer or institution and in addition to or
in lieu of the suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew any certificate of
exemption, the commissioner may levy a fine upon the insurer or institution in
an amount not more than ten thousand dollars. The order levying such a fine
shall specify the period within which the fine shall be fully paid and which
period shall not be less than fifteen nor more than thirty days from the date
of the order. Upon failure to pay such a fine when due the commissioner shall
revoke the certificate of exemption of the insurer or institution if not
already revoked, and the fine shall be recovered in a civil action brought in
behalf of the commissioner by the attorney general. Any fine so collected
shall be paid by the commissioner to the state treasurer for the account of the
general fund.

---
END ---