BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 26.26 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Without appointing
a guardian ad litem on the issue of parentage, after the period for rescission
of an acknowledgment of paternity in RCW 26.26.040(1)(e) has passed, a parent
executing an acknowledgment of paternity of the child named therein may commence
an adjudicative proceeding for:

(a) Making residential
provisions or a parenting plan with regard to the minor child on the same basis
as provided in chapter 26.09 RCW and subject to subsection (3) of this section;
or

(b) Establishing a
child support obligation under chapter 26.19 RCW and maintaining health
insurance coverage under RCW 26.09.105.

(2) Pursuant to RCW
26.09.010(3), a proceeding authorized by this section shall be entitled
"In re the parenting and support of...."

(3) The
petitioner must specifically allege under oath, to the best of the petitioner's
knowledge, that: (a) No man other than the man who executed the acknowledgment
of paternity is presumed to be the natural father of the child under RCW
26.26.040; (b) there is not currently pending a parentage action involving the
child or a court order naming another man as the child's father; and (c) the
petitioner has provided notice of the proceeding to any other men who have
claimed parentage of the child. Should the respondent or any other person
appearing in the action deny the allegations, a permanent parenting plan or
residential schedule may not be entered for the child without the matter being
converted to a parentage action and a guardian ad litem being appointed for the
child. A copy of the acknowledgment of paternity must be filed with the
petition or response. The court may convert the matter to a parentage action
on its own motion.

--- END ---