BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.25.070 and 2000
c 11 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon expiration of the
time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming of refunds of tax on marine fuel,
the state of Washington shall succeed to the right to such refunds. The
director of licensing, after taking into account past and anticipated claims
for refunds from and deposits to the marine fuel tax refund account and the
costs of carrying out the provisions of RCW 79A.25.030, shall request the state
treasurer to transfer monthly from the marine fuel tax refund account ((an
amount equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account representing the
motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 in effect on January 1, 1990,
to the recreation resource account and the remainder to the motor vehicle fund))
to the recreation resource account the moneys in the marine fuel tax refund
account that are not required for payment of the refund claims or costs.

Sec. 2. RCW 79A.25.080 and 2000
c 11 s 74 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Moneys
transferred to the recreation resource account from the marine fuel tax refund
account, as well as any federal or other funds now or hereafter available,
may be used when appropriated by the legislature((, as well as any federal
or other funds now or hereafter available,)) to pay the necessary
administrative and coordinative costs of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation established by RCW 79A.25.110. ((All moneys so transferred, except
those appropriated as aforesaid,))

(2) All moneys
transferred to the recreation resource account, except those appropriated under
subsection (1) of this section, shall be distributed as follows:

(a) Five
twenty-thirds shall be divided and used as follows:

(i) One-quarter to
the state parks and recreation commission for public education about the
identification and prevention of the spread of aquatic nuisance species, as
defined in RCW 77.60.130; and

(ii) Three-quarters
to the department of fish and wildlife for the enforcement and control of
aquatic nuisance species;

(b) Eighteen
twenty-thirds shall be divided into two equal shares and shall be used to
benefit watercraft recreation in this state as follows:

(((1))) (i)
One share as grants to state agencies for (((a))) (A) acquisition
of title to, or any interests or rights in, marine recreation land, (((b)))
(B) capital improvement and renovation of marine recreation land,
including periodic dredging in accordance with subsection (3) of this section,
if needed, to maintain or make the facility more useful, or (((c))) (C)
matching funds in any case where federal or other funds are made available on a
matching basis for purposes described in (((a) or)) (b)(i)(A) or (B)
of this subsection;

(((2))) (ii)
One share as grants to public bodies to help finance (((a))) (A)
acquisition of title to, or any interests or rights in, marine recreation land,
or (((b))) (B) capital improvement and renovation of marine
recreation land, including periodic dredging in accordance with subsection (3)
of this section, if needed, to maintain or make the facility more useful. A
public body is authorized to use a grant, together with its own contribution,
as matching funds in any case where federal or other funds are made available
for purposes described in (((a) or)) (b)(ii)(A) or (B) of this
subsection. The committee may prescribe further terms and conditions for the
making of grants in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(3) For
the purposes of this section "periodic dredging" is limited to
dredging of materials that have been deposited in a channel due to unforeseen
events. This dredging should extend the expected usefulness of the facility
for at least five years.

---
END ---