BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the occurrences of identity theft are increasing. The legislature also
finds that widespread use of the federally issued social security numbers has
made identity theft more likely to occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Institutions of
higher education shall not use the social security number of any student,
staff, or faculty for identification except for the purposes of employment, financial
aid, research, assessment, accountability, transcripts, or as otherwise
required by state or federal law.

(2) Each institution of
higher education shall develop a system of personal identifiers for students to
be used for grading and other administrative purposes. The personal
identifiers may not be social security numbers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The institutions of
higher education, in conjunction with the higher education coordinating board
and the state board for community and technical colleges, shall submit a report
to the legislature by December 1, 2001, outlining the institution's personal
identifier system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Each institution of
higher education shall use its own existing budgetary funds to develop the
system for personal identifiers. No new state funds shall be allocated for
this purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 2 of this act
takes effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---