BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
41.06.150 and 1999 c 297 s 3 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The board shall adopt rules, consistent with the
purposes and

_7 provisions of this chapter, as now or hereafter amended,
and with

_8 the best standards of personnel administration,
regarding the

_9 basis and procedures to be followed for:

10 (1) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or
demotion of an

11 employee;

12 (2) Certification of names for vacancies, including

13 departmental promotions, with the number of names equal
to six

14 more names than there are vacancies to be filled, such
names

15 representing applicants rated highest on eligibility
lists:

16 PROVIDED, That when other applicants have scores equal
to the

17 lowest score among the names certified, their names
shall also be

18 certified;

p. 1 SB
5512

_1 (3) Examinations for all positions in the
competitive and

_2 noncompetitive service;

_3 (4) Appointments;

_4 (5) Training and career development;

_5 (6) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and
rejections

_6 of probationary employees, depending on the job
requirements of

_7 the class, except that entry level state park rangers
shall serve

_8 a probationary period of twelve months;

_9 (7) Transfers;

10 (8)(a) Sick leaves and vacations; and

11 (b) Bereavement leave of five working days, not
to be deducted

12 from vacation or sick leave, for a death in the
family;

13 (9) Hours of work;

14 (10) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent
reemployment, both

15 according to seniority;

16 (11) Determination of appropriate bargaining units
within any

17 agency: PROVIDED, That in making such determination the
board

18 shall consider the duties, skills, and working
conditions of the

19 employees, the history of collective bargaining by the
employees

20 and their bargaining representatives, the extent of
organization

21 among the employees, and the desires of the employees;

22 (12) Certification and decertification of exclusive
bargaining

23 representatives: PROVIDED, That after certification of
an

24 exclusive bargaining representative and upon the
representative's

25 request, the director shall hold an election among
employees in a

26 bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to
require as a

27 condition of employment membership in the certified
exclusive

28 bargaining representative on or after the thirtieth day
following

29 the beginning of employment or the date of such
election,

30 whichever is the later, and the failure of an employee
to comply

31 with such a condition of employment constitutes cause
for

32 dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than
once in each

33 twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months
following

34 the date of the original election in a bargaining unit
and upon

35 petition of thirty percent of the members of a
bargaining unit the

36 director shall hold an election to determine whether a
majority

37 wish to rescind such condition of employment: PROVIDED
FURTHER,

38 That for purposes of this clause, membership in the
certified

SB 5512 p. 2

_1 exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the
payment of

_2 monthly or other periodic dues and does not require
payment of

_3 initiation, reinstatement, or any other fees or fines
and includes

_4 full and complete membership rights: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That

_5 in order to safeguard the right of nonassociation of public

_6 employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a

_7 church or religious body of which such public employee
is a

_8 member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for
purposes

_9 within the program of the union as designated by such
employee

10 that would be in harmony with his or her individual
conscience, an

11 amount of money equivalent to regular union dues minus
any

12 included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance
programs,

13 and such employee shall not be a member of the union but
is

14 entitled to all the representation rights of a union
member;

15 (13) Agreements between agencies and certified
exclusive

16 bargaining representatives providing for grievance
procedures and

17 collective negotiations on all personnel matters over
which the

18 appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit
of such

19 agency may lawfully exercise discretion;

20 (14) Written agreements may contain provisions for
payroll

21 deductions of employee organization dues upon
authorization by the

22 employee member and for the cancellation of such payroll
deduction

23 by the filing of a proper prior notice by the employee
with the

24 appointing authority and the employee organization:
PROVIDED,

25 That nothing contained herein permits or grants to any
employee

26 the right to strike or refuse to perform his or her
official

27 duties;

28 (15) Adoption and revision of a comprehensive
classification

29 plan for all positions in the classified service, based
on

30 investigation and analysis of the duties and
responsibilities of

31 each such position.

32 (a) The board shall not adopt job classification
revisions or

33 class studies unless implementation of the proposed
revision or

34 study will result in net cost savings, increased
efficiencies, or

35 improved management of personnel or services, and the
proposed

36 revision or study has been approved by the director of
financial

37 management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

p. 3 SB
5512

_1 (b) Beginning July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
in addition

_2 to the requirements of (a) of this subsection:

_3 (i) The board may approve the implementation of
salary

_4 increases resulting from adjustments to the
classification plan

_5 during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only if:

_6 (A) The implementation will not result in additional
net costs

_7 and the proposed implementation has been approved by the
director

_8 of financial management in accordance with chapter 43.88
RCW;

_9 (B) The implementation will take effect on July 1,
1996, and

10 the total net cost of all such actions approved by the
board for

11 implementation during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium does
not exceed

12 the amounts specified by the legislature specifically
for this

13 purpose; or

14 (C) The implementation is a result of emergent
conditions.

15 Emergent conditions are defined as emergency situations
requiring

16 the establishment of positions necessary for the
preservation of

17 the public health, safety, or general welfare, which do
not exceed

18 $250,000 of the moneys identified in section 718(2),
chapter 18,

19 Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess.

20 (ii) The board shall approve only those salary
increases

21 resulting from adjustments to the classification plan if
they are

22 due to documented recruitment and retention
difficulties, salary

23 compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities,

24 or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are
defined as

25 similar work assigned to different job classes with a
salary

26 disparity greater than 7.5 percent.

27 (iii) Adjustments made to the higher education
hospital special

28 pay plan are exempt from (b)(i) through (ii) of this
subsection.

29 (c) Reclassifications, class studies, and salary
adjustments to

30 be implemented during the 1997-99 and subsequent fiscal
biennia

31 are governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW
41.06.152;

32 (16) Allocation and reallocation of positions within
the

33 classification plan;

34 (17) Adoption and revision of a state salary
schedule to

35 reflect the prevailing rates in Washington state private

36 industries and other governmental units but the rates in
the

37 salary schedules or plans shall be increased if
necessary to

38 attain comparable worth under an implementation plan
under RCW

SB 5512 p. 4

_1 41.06.155 and that, for institutions of higher education
and

_2 related boards, shall be competitive for positions of a
similar

_3 nature in the state or the locality in which an
institution of

_4 higher education or related board is located, such
adoption and

_5 revision subject to approval by the director of
financial

_6 management in accordance with the provisions of chapter
43.88 RCW;

_7 (18) Increment increases within the series of steps
for each

_8 pay grade based on length of service for all employees
whose

_9 standards of performance are such as to permit them to
retain job

10 status in the classified service;

11 (19) Optional lump sum relocation compensation
approved by the

12 agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary
that a person

13 make a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other

14 employment with the state. An agency must provide lump
sum

15 compensation within existing resources. If the person
receiving the

16 relocation payment terminates or causes termination with
the

17 state, for reasons other than layoff, disability
separation, or

18 other good cause as determined by an agency director,
within one

19 year of the date of the employment, the state is
entitled to

20 reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the
person;

21 (20) Providing for veteran's preference as required
by existing

22 statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to
layoffs and

23 subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving
spouses

24 by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving
spouses

25 additional credit in computing their seniority by adding
to their

26 unbroken state service, as defined by the board, the
veteran's

27 service in the military not to exceed five years. For
the purposes

28 of this section, "veteran" means any person
who has one or more

29 years of active military service in any branch of the
armed forces

30 of the United States or who has less than one year's
service and

31 is discharged with a disability incurred in the line of
duty or is

32 discharged at the convenience of the government and who,
upon

33 termination of such service has received an honorable
discharge, a

34 discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record,
or a

35 release from active military service with evidence of
service

36 other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct,
or

37 dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That

38 the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the
benefits of

p. 5 SB
5512

_1 this section regardless of the veteran's length of
active military

_2 service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of
this section

_3 "veteran" does not include any person who has
voluntarily retired

_4 with twenty or more years of active military service and
whose

_5 military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred
dollars per

_6 month;

_7 (21) Permitting agency heads to delegate the
authority to

_8 appoint, reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees
within

_9 their agencies if such agency heads do not have specific
statutory

10 authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may
not

11 authorize such delegation to any position lower than the
head of a

12 major subdivision of the agency;

13 (22) Assuring persons who are or have been employed
in

14 classified positions before July 1, 1993, will be
eligible for

15 employment, reemployment, transfer, and promotion in
respect to

16 classified positions covered by this chapter;

17 (23) Affirmative action in appointment, promotion,
transfer,

18 recruitment, training, and career development;
development and

19 implementation of affirmative action goals and
timetables; and

20 monitoring of progress against those goals and
timetables.

21 The board shall consult with the human rights
commission in the

22 development of rules pertaining to affirmative action.
The

23 department of personnel shall transmit a report annually
to the

24 human rights commission which states the progress each
state

25 agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and

26 timetables.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5512 p. 6