BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section only, "assault" means an act by a motorist that results
in physical injury to an employee of the department while engaged in highway
construction or maintenance activities along a roadway right-of-way (fence line
to fence line, landscaped areas) or in the loading and unloading of passenger
vehicles in service of the vessel as a maritime employee not covered under
chapter 51.32 RCW or engaged in those work activities as a Washington State
Ferries terminal employee covered under chapter 51.32 RCW.

(2) In recognition of
the nature of employment in departmental highway construction or maintenance
activities and by the Washington State Ferries, this section provides a
supplementary program to reimburse employees of the department for some of
their costs attributable to their being the victims of assault by motorists.
This program is limited to the reimbursement provided in this section.

(3) An employee is entitled
to receive the reimbursement provided in this section only if the secretary
finds that each of the following has occurred:

(a) A motorist has
assaulted the employee who is engaged in highway construction or maintenance
along a roadway right-of-way (fence line to fence line, landscaped areas) or
service of the vessel as a maritime employee or terminal employee engaged in
the loading or unloading of passenger vehicles and as a result the employee has
sustained demonstrated physical injuries that have required the employee to
miss one or more days of work;

(b) The assault is not
attributable to any extent to the employee's negligence, misconduct, or failure
to comply with any rules or conditions of employment; and

(c) The department of
labor and industries has approved the employee's workers' compensation
application under chapter 51.32 RCW, or for maritime employees the department
of transportation risk management office has approved maintenance and cure
benefits under 46 U.S.C. Sec. 688 et seq.

(4) The reimbursement
authorized under this section is as follows:

(a) The employee's
accumulated sick leave days will not be reduced for the workdays missed. The
injured worker who qualifies for and receives assault benefits will also
receive full standard benefits (vacation leave, sick leave, health insurance,
etc.) as if uninjured;

(b) For an employee
covered by chapter 51.32 RCW, for each workday missed for which the employee is
not eligible to receive compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee will
receive the full amount of the injured worker's net pay at the time of injury;
and

(c) In respect to
workdays missed for which the employee will receive or has received
compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, or under federal maritime law benefits,
including the Jones Act, for an employee deemed a maritime employee assigned to
work in service of the vessel or a nonmaritime terminal employee covered under
chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee will be reimbursed in an amount that, when
added to that compensation, will result in the employee receiving no more than
full net pay (gross pay less mandatory and voluntary deductions) for the
workdays missed.

(5) Reimbursement under
this section may not last longer than three hundred sixty-five consecutive days
after the date of the injury. No application for assault benefits is valid nor
may a claim be enforced unless it was made within one year after the day upon
which the injury occurred.

(6) The employee is not
entitled to the reimbursement provided in subsection (4) of this section for a
workday for which the secretary or an applicable designee finds that the
employee has not diligently pursued his or her compensation remedies under
chapter 51.32 RCW or federal maritime law, including the Jones Act.

(7) The reimbursement
may be made only for absences that the secretary or an applicable designee
believes are justified.

(8) While the employee
is receiving reimbursement under this section, he or she will continue to be
classified as a state employee, and the reimbursement amount is considered as
salary or wages.

(9) The department
shall make all reimbursement payments required to be made to employees under
this section. The payments are considered as a salary or wage expense and must
be paid by the department in the same manner and from the same appropriations
as other salary and wage expenses for the department.

(10) Nothing in this
section precludes the department from recovering the supplemental payments
authorized by this section from the assaulting motorist, and that recovery is
considered exclusive of recovery under chapter 51.24 RCW.

(11) If
the legislature revokes the reimbursement authorized under this section or
repeals this section, no affected employee is entitled after that to receive
the reimbursement as a matter of contractual right.

--- END ---