BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.57.010 and 1999 c
165 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
legislative authority of any town or city located in a county with a population
of less than one million may create a public facilities district.

(b) The
legislative authorities of any contiguous group of towns or cities located in a
county or counties each with a population of less than one million may enter an
agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation of a
public facilities district.

(c) The legislative
authority of any town or city, or any contiguous group of towns or cities,
located in a county with a population of less than one million and the legislative
authority of a contiguous county, or the legislative authority of the county or
counties in which the towns or cities are located, may enter into an agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation of a public
facilities district.

(2)(a) A public
facilities district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the city or
town or contiguous group of cities or towns that created the district.

(b) A public
facilities district created by an agreement between a town or city, or a
contiguous group of towns or cities, and a contiguous county or the county in
which they are located, shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the towns
or cities, and the boundaries of the county or counties as to the
unincorporated areas of the county or counties. The boundaries shall not
include incorporated towns or cities that are not parties to the agreement for
the creation and joint operation of the district.

(3)(a) A public
facilities district created by a single city or town shall be governed by a
board of directors consisting of five members selected as follows: (i) Two
members appointed by the legislative authority of the city or town; and (ii)
three members appointed by legislative authority based on recommendations from
local organizations. The members appointed under (a)(i) of this subsection,
shall not be members of the legislative authority of the city or town. The
members appointed under (a)(ii) of this subsection, shall be based on
recommendations received from local organizations that may include, but are not
limited to the local chamber of commerce, local economic development council,
and local labor council. The members shall serve four-year terms. Of the
initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year term, one must be
appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and
the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

(b) A public facilities
district created by (([a])) a contiguous group of cities and
towns shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of seven members
selected as follows: (i) Three members appointed by the legislative
authorities of the cities and towns; and (ii) four members appointed by the legislative
authority based on recommendations from local organizations. The members
appointed under (b)(i) of this subsection shall not be members of the
legislative authorities of the cities and towns. The members appointed under
(b)(ii) of this subsection, shall be based on recommendations received from
local organizations that include, but are not limited to the local chamber of
commerce, local economic development council, local labor council, and a
neighborhood organization that is directly affected by the location of the
regional center in their area. The members of the board of directors shall be
appointed in accordance with the terms of the agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW
for the joint operation of the district and shall serve four-year terms. Of
the initial members, one must be appointed for a one-year term, one must be
appointed for a two-year term, one must be appointed for a three-year term, and
the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.

(c) A public
facilities district created by a town or city, or a contiguous group of towns
or cities, and a contiguous county or the county or counties in which they are
located, shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of seven members
selected as follows: (i) Three members appointed by the legislative
authorities of the cities, towns, and county; and (ii) four members appointed
by the legislative authority based on recommendations from local
organizations. The members appointed under (c)(i) of this subsection shall not
be members of the legislative authorities of the cities, towns, or county. The
members appointed under (c)(ii) of this subsection shall be based on
recommendations received from local organizations that include, but are not
limited to, the local chamber of commerce, the local economic development
council, the local labor council, and a neighborhood organization that is
directly affected by the location of the regional center in their area. The
members of the board of directors shall be appointed in accordance with the terms
of the agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint operation of the
district and shall serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be
appointed for a one-year term, one must be appointed for a two‑year term,
one must be appointed for a three-year term, and the remainder must be
appointed for four-year terms.

(4) A public facilities
district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(5) A public facilities
district shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual
powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that
may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not
limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into
contracts, and to sue and be sued.

(6) A public facilities
district may acquire and transfer real and personal property by lease,
sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or collateral attack on any ((metropolitan
[public])) public facilities district purported to be authorized or
created in conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days
after creation by the city and/or county legislative authority.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.57.020 and 1999 c
165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip,
reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more regional centers. For
purposes of this chapter, "regional center" means a convention,
conference, or special events center, or any combination of facilities, and related
parking facilities, serving a regional population constructed, improved, or
rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, at a cost of at least ten million dollars,
including debt service. "Regional center" also includes an existing
convention, conference, or special events center, and related parking
facilities, serving a regional population, that is improved or rehabilitated
after July 25, 1999, where the costs of improvement or rehabilitation are at
least ten million dollars, including debt service. A "special events center"
is a facility, available to the public, used for community events, sporting
events, trade shows, and artistic, musical, theatrical, or other cultural
exhibitions, presentations, or performances. A regional center is
conclusively presumed to serve a regional population if state and local
government investment in the construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of
the regional center is equal to or greater than ten million dollars.

(2) A public facilities
district may impose charges and fees for the use of its facilities, and may
accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of a
regional center.

(3) A public facilities
district may impose charges, fees, and taxes authorized in RCW 35.57.040, and
use revenues derived therefrom for the purpose of paying principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the public facilities district to construct a
regional center.

(4) Notwithstanding the
establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system, a public facilities
district may contract with a public or private entity for the operation or
management of its public facilities.

(5) A public facilities
district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative public works
contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the
design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any regional
center.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 35.57 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A public facilities
district that has constructed a regional center after the effective date of
this section is eligible for a refund of the taxes paid under chapters 82.08,
82.12, and 82.14 RCW on site preparation and construction of buildings or other
structures, and the acquisition of related machinery and equipment, for the
regional center, including labor and services rendered in the planning,
installation, and construction of the center and installation of machinery and
equipment. A public facilities district is not eligible for the refund under
this section unless an economic benefits analysis has been completed for the
regional center project.

(2)(a)(i) The public
facilities district shall notify the department in writing that the regional
center is operationally complete. The regional center is deemed operationally
complete if it has an occupancy permit and it is generating revenues from use
of the center. The taxes shall be refunded to the public facilities district
in four equal annual payments. Subject to (a)(ii) of this subsection, the
first payment shall occur no later than one hundred twenty days after the
department verifies that the regional center is operationally complete. The
three subsequent annual payments shall occur twelve months later, respectively.

(ii) In no event may
any taxes be refunded before January 1, 2006.

(b) The public
facilities district shall provide the department of revenue with invoice
details and other information as required by the department in order to
determine the amount of tax to be refunded. The refund includes any interest
on taxes. The department of revenue shall be compensated for the
administration of this section out of the interest amount, such compensation
not to exceed one percent of the interest. The refund amounts shall be
distributed from the funds and accounts into which the taxes were deposited.
The department of revenue shall notify the state treasurer of the amounts to be
distributed from each specific state and local fund or account.

(3) Applications and
any other information received by the department of revenue under this section
are not confidential and are subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies
to the administration of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.14.390 and 1999 c
165 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, the governing body of a public facilities
district created before July 31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW
that commences construction of a new regional center, or improvement or
rehabilitation of an existing new regional center, before January 1, ((2003))
2004, may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent
of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in
the case of a use tax.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public
facilities district.

(3) No tax may be
collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this
section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the regional
center and related parking facilities are retired, but not more than
twenty-five years after the tax is first collected.

(4) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purposes set forth in RCW
35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from other public or private
sources equal to thirty-three percent of the amount collected under this
section, provided that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes
authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under
chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for the
siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or
private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part
of a public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public
facilities district.

(5) The combined total
tax levied under this section shall not be greater than 0.033 percent. If both
a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter
35.57 RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.

(6) A
public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW is not eligible to
impose the tax under this section if the legislative authority of the county
where the public facilities district is located has imposed a sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

---
END ---