BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.07 RCW to read as follows:

Every registrar, deputy
registrar, registration assistant, or other individual providing voter
registration assistance shall ask the following questions of all applicants:

First: "Do you
want to register to vote or transfer your voter registration?"

Second: "Are you
a United States citizen?"

Third: "Are you
at least eighteen years old?"

Fourth: "Will you
have lived in the state at your current address for at least thirty days before
the next election?"

Fifth: "Do you
confirm that your civil rights have not been denied as the result of being
convicted of a felony?"

If an applicant responds
to all questions in the affirmative, the individual shall provide the applicant
with a voter registration form and instructions.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.155 and 1990 c
143 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Before issuing an
original license or identification card or renewing a license or identification
card under this chapter, the licensing agent shall determine if the applicant
wants to register to vote or transfer his or her voter registration((.))
by asking the following questions:

First: "Do you
want to register to vote or transfer your voter registration?"

Second: "Are
you a United States citizen?"

Third: "Are
you at least eighteen years old?"

Fourth: "Will
you have lived in the state at your current address for at least thirty days
before the next election?"

Fifth: "Do you
confirm that your civil rights have not been denied as the result of being
convicted of a felony?"

If the
applicant ((chooses to register or transfer a registration)) responds
in the affirmative to all questions, the agent shall provide the applicant
with a voter registration form and instructions and shall record that the
applicant has requested to register to vote or transfer a voter registration.

---
END ---