BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.505 and 1999 c
308 s 5 and 1999 c 274 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Every person applying
for a special endorsement of a driver's license authorizing such person to
drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle shall pay ((an examination)) a
fee of two dollars, which is not refundable. In addition, the
endorsement fee for the initial motorcycle endorsement shall not exceed ten
dollars, and the subsequent renewal endorsement fee shall not exceed
twenty-five dollars, unless the endorsement is renewed or extended for a period
other than five years, in which case the subsequent renewal endorsement fee
shall not exceed five dollars for each year that the endorsement is renewed or
extended. The initial and renewal endorsement fees shall be deposited in the
motorcycle safety education account of the highway safety fund.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.515 and 1999 c
274 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
motorcycle endorsement examination must emphasize maneuvers necessary for
on-street operation, including emergency braking and turning as may be required
to avoid an impending collision. The department may waive all or part of
the examination for persons who satisfactorily complete the voluntary
motorcycle operator training and education program authorized under RCW
46.20.520.

---
END ---