BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to the use of motorcycles that are loaned to the department
of licensing exclusively for the provision of motorcycle training under RCW
46.20.520, or to persons contracting with the department to provide this
training.

--- END ---