BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 29.79

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 The office of financial management, in consultation
with the

_7 secretary of state, the attorney general, and any other

_8 appropriate state or local agency, shall prepare a
fiscal impact

_9 statement for each of the following state ballot
measures: (1) An

10 initiative to the people that is certified to the
ballot; (2) an

11 initiative to the legislature that will appear on the
ballot; (3)

12 an alternative measure appearing on the ballot that the

13 legislature proposes to an initiative to the
legislature; (4) a

14 referendum bill referred to voters by the legislature;
and (5) a

15 referendum measure appearing on the ballot. Fiscal
impact

16 statements must be written in clear and concise language
and avoid

17 legal and technical terms when possible, and may include
easily

18 understood graphics.

p. 1 SSB
5520

_1 A fiscal impact statement must describe any
projected increase

_2 or decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or
indebtedness that

_3 the state or local governments will experience if the
ballot

_4 measure were approved by state voters. Where
appropriate, a fiscal

_5 impact statement may include both estimated dollar
amounts and a

_6 description placing the estimated dollar amounts into
context. A

_7 fiscal impact statement must include both a summary of
not to

_8 exceed one hundred words and a more detailed statement
that

_9 includes the assumptions that were made to develop the
fiscal

10 impacts.

11 Fiscal impact statements must be available online
from the

12 secretary of state's web site and included in the state
voters'

13 pamphlet.

14 Sec. 2. RCW
29.81.250 and 1999 c 260 s 5 are each amended to read

15 as follows:

16 The secretary of state shall determine the format
and layout of

17 the voters' pamphlet. The secretary of state shall
print the

18 pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality, and
weight of

19 paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state
best serves

20 the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of
contents. Federal

21 and state offices must appear in the pamphlet in the
same sequence

22 as they appear on the ballot. Measures and arguments
must be

23 printed in the order specified by RCW 29.79.300.

24 The voters' pamphlet must provide the following
information for

25 each statewide issue on the ballot:

26 (1) The legal identification of the measure by
serial

27 designation or number;

28 (2) The official ballot title of the measure;

29 (3) A statement prepared by the attorney general
explaining the

30 law as it presently exists;

31 (4) A statement prepared by the attorney general
explaining the

32 effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;

33 (5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under
section 1 of

34 this act;

35 (6) The total number of votes cast for and
against the measure

36 in the senate and house of representatives, if the
measure has

37 been passed by the legislature;

SSB 5520 p. 2

_1 (((6))) (7) An argument advocating the
voters' approval of the

_2 measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the
opposing

_3 argument;

_4 (((7))) (8) An argument advocating the
voters' rejection of the

_5 measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the
opposing

_6 argument;

_7 (((8))) (9) Each argument or rebuttal
statement must be

_8 followed by the names of the committee members who
submitted them,

_9 and may be followed by a telephone number that citizens
may call

10 to obtain information on the ballot measure;

11 (((9))) (10) The full text of each
measure.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SSB
5520