BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
develop a temporary management program utilizing community providers licensed
under this chapter. This program is established to mitigate dislocation of
residents of adult family homes while the department and the licensee, who is subject
to departmental sanctions that would result in license revocation and/or a stop
placement order, proceed with due process and dispute resolution proceedings as
authorized by law.

In implementing this
section the department shall consult with consumers, advocates, the adult
family home advisory committee established under chapter 18.48 RCW, and
organizations representing adult family homes.

The department shall
report back to the legislature on the implementation of this program by
December 31, 2002.

The department shall
retain fees and fines from licensing violations for the purpose of funding this
temporary management program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

A provider licensed
under this chapter may choose to have a dispute resolution center established
under chapter 7.75 RCW resolve licensing disputes, sanctions, citations, and
departmental actions. Family members, residents, surrogates, and resident
managers of adult family homes may also have disputes with the department
resolved by a dispute resolution center utilized through agreement of the
parties, or by the request or order of an administrative law judge.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

A provider shall honor
a written and properly executed advance directive of a resident or a resident's
surrogate as set out in RCW 7.70.065, including a do not resuscitate directive
of the resident or surrogate. The department shall not intervene with a
written directive of a resident or a surrogate nor hold a provider liable for
executing such a directive. The provider shall immediately report the incident
to the appropriate first responder, emergency medical provider, fire
department, coroner, sheriff's department, or hospice nurse pursuant to a
hospice care plan.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.52C.020 and 1997
c 392 s 527 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(2) "Health care
facility" means a nursing home, hospital, hospice care facility, home
health care agency, hospice agency, boarding home, ((adult family home,))
group home, or other entity for the delivery of health care or long-term care
services, including chore services provided under chapter 74.39A RCW.

(3) "Nursing
home" means any nursing home facility licensed pursuant to chapter 18.52
RCW.

(4) "Nursing
pool" means any person engaged in the business of providing, procuring, or
referring health care or long-term care personnel for temporary employment in
health care facilities, such as licensed nurses or practical nurses, nursing
assistants, and chore service providers. "Nursing pool" does not
include an individual who only engages in providing his or her own services.

(5) "Person"
includes an individual, firm, corporation, partnership, or association.

(6) "Adult
family home" means a residential home licensed pursuant to chapter 70.128
RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.24.017 and 1991 c
3 s 322 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter:

(1) "Acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome" or "AIDS" means the clinical syndrome
of HIV-related illness as defined by the board of health by rule.

(2) "Board"
means the state board of health.

(3)
"Department" means the department of health, or any successor
department with jurisdiction over public health matters.

(4) "Health care
provider" means any person who is a member of a profession under RCW
18.130.040 or other person providing medical, nursing, psychological, or other
health care services regulated by the department of health.

(5) "Health care
facility" means a hospital, nursing home, neuropsychiatric or mental
health facility, home health agency, hospice, child care agency, ((adult
family home,)) group care facility, family foster home, clinic, blood bank,
blood center, sperm bank, laboratory, or other social service or health care
institution regulated or operated by the department of health.

(6) "HIV-related
condition" means any medical condition resulting from infection with HIV
including, but not limited to, seropositivity for HIV.

(7) "Human
immunodeficiency virus" or "HIV" means all HIV and HIV-related
viruses which damage the cellular branch of the human immune or neurological
systems and leave the infected person immunodeficient or neurologically
impaired.

(8) "Test for a
sexually transmitted disease" means a test approved by the board by rule.

(9) "Legal
guardian" means a person appointed by a court to assume legal authority
for another who has been found incompetent or, in the case of a minor, a person
who has legal custody of the child.

(10) "Local public
health officer" means the officer directing the county health department or
his or her designee who has been given the responsibility and authority to
protect the health of the public within his or her jurisdiction.

(11) "Person"
includes any natural person, partnership, association, joint venture, trust,
public or private corporation, or health facility.

(12) "Release of
test results" means a written authorization for disclosure of any sexually
transmitted disease test result which is signed, dated, and which specifies to
whom disclosure is authorized and the time period during which the release is
to be effective.

(13) "Sexually
transmitted disease" means a bacterial, viral, fungal, or parasitic
disease, determined by the board by rule to be sexually transmitted, to be a
threat to the public health and welfare, and to be a disease for which a
legitimate public interest will be served by providing for regulation and
treatment. The board shall designate chancroid, gonorrhea, granuloma
inguinale, lymphogranuloma venereum, genital herpes simplex, chlamydia,
nongonococcal urethritis (NGU), trachomitis, genital human papilloma virus
infection, syphilis, acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS), and human
immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection as sexually transmitted diseases, and
shall consider the recommendations and classifications of the centers for
disease control and other nationally recognized medical authorities in
designating other diseases as sexually transmitted.

(14) "State public
health officer" means the secretary of health or an officer appointed by
the secretary.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.128.007 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 18 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The purposes of this
chapter are to:

(1) Encourage the
establishment and maintenance of adult family homes that provide a humane,
safe, and ((homelike)) residential home environment for persons
with functional limitations who need personal and special care and who
choose to have their care provided in an adult family home;

(2) Establish standards
for regulating adult family homes that adequately protect residents and
allow residents the right to choose the residential placement and care in an
adult family home;

(3) Encourage
consumers, families, providers, and the public to become active in assuring
their full participation in development of adult family homes that provide high
quality and cost-effective care;

(4) Provide for
appropriate care of residents in adult family homes by requiring that each
resident have a care plan that promotes the most appropriate level of physical,
mental, and psychosocial well-being consistent with client choice; and

(5) Accord each
resident the right to participate in the development of the care plan and in
other major decisions involving the resident and their care.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.128.010 and 1995
c 260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adult family
home" means a ((regular family abode)) residential home in
which a person or persons provide personal care, special care, room, and board
to more than one but not more than six adults who are not related by blood or
marriage to the person or persons providing the services.

(2)
"Provider" means any person who is licensed under this chapter to
operate an adult family home. For the purposes of this section,
"person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association,
or limited liability company.

(3)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(4)
"Resident" means an adult in need of personal or special care in an
adult family home who is not related to the provider.

(5) "Adults"
means persons who have attained the age of eighteen years.

(6) "Home"
means an adult family home.

(7) "Imminent
danger" means serious physical harm to or death of a resident has
occurred, or there is a serious threat to resident life, health, or safety or
bodily harm as defined in RCW 9A.04.110(4).

(8) "Special
care" means care beyond personal care as defined by the department, in
rule.

(9)
"Capacity" means the maximum number of persons in need of personal or
special care permitted in an adult family home at a given time. This number
shall include related children or adults in the home and who received special
care.

Sec. 8. RCW 70.128.090 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 18 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During inspections
of an adult family home, the department shall have access and authority to
examine areas and articles in the home used to provide care or support to
residents, including residents' records, accounts, and the physical premises,
including the buildings, grounds, and equipment. However, the personal
records of the provider are not subject to department inspection nor is the
separate bedroom of the provider, not used in direct care of a client, subject
to review. The department may inspect all rooms during the initial licensing
of the home. The department also shall have the authority to interview the
provider and residents of an adult family home.

(2) Whenever an
inspection is conducted, the department shall prepare a written report that
summarizes all information obtained during the inspection, and if the home is
in violation of this chapter, serve a copy of the inspection report upon the
provider at the same time as a notice of violation. This notice shall be
mailed to the provider within ten working days of the inspection. If the
home is not in violation of this chapter, a copy of the inspection report shall
be mailed to the provider within ten calendar days of the inspection of
the home. All inspection reports shall be made available to the public at the
department during business hours. The department is prohibited from
releasing any information regarding alleged violations until the provider has
been notified of the alleged violations and has been provided due process under
this chapter.

(3) The provider shall
develop corrective measures for any violations found by the department's
inspection. The department ((may)) shall provide consultation
and technical assistance to assist the provider in developing effective
corrective measures. The department shall include a statement of the
provider's corrective measures in the department's inspection report.

(4) The provider may
submit a statement for the record on any plans of correction or violation. The
statement shall be made available to the public in the inspection report and in
any press release initiated by the department.

Sec. 9. RCW 70.128.100 and 1989
c 427 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The department has the
authority to immediately suspend a license if it finds that conditions there
constitute an imminent danger to residents or bodily harm as defined in RCW
9A.04.110(4).

Sec. 10. RCW 70.128.120 and 2000
c 121 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Each adult family home
provider and each resident manager shall have the following minimum
qualifications:

(1) Twenty-one years of
age or older;

(2) Effective
September 1, 2001, a high school diploma or certificate of educational
competence for successful completion of general educational development test;

(3) Good moral
and responsible character and reputation;

(((3))) (4)
Literacy in English language, however a person not literate in the English
language may meet the requirements of this subsection by assuring that there is
a person on staff and available who is literate in English;

(((4))) (5)
Management and administrative ability to carry out the requirements of this
chapter;

(((5))) (6)
Satisfactory completion of department-approved basic training and continuing
education training as specified by the department in rule, based on
recommendations of the community long-term care training and education steering
committee and working in collaboration with providers, consumers, caregivers,
advocates, family members, educators, and other interested parties in the
rule-making process;

(((6))) (7)
Satisfactory completion of department-approved, or equivalent, special care
training before a provider may provide special care services to a resident;

(((7))) (8)
Not been convicted of any crime listed in RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842;((and

(8) Effective July
1, 1996,)) (9) Registered
with the department of health;

(10) Effective
September 1, 2001, at least three hundred twenty hours of successful direct
caregiving experience to vulnerable adults prior to operating or managing an
adult family home; and

(11) Effective
September 2001, department licensors and complaint investigators charged with
enforcement, inspection, investigation, and licensure of adult family homes
pursuant to this chapter must have one hundred sixty hours of successful direct
caregiving experience in an adult family home within the first year of
employment. Within the first year of employment, wages paid by the adult
family home for this purpose may be reverted to the state to offset cost.

Sec. 11. RCW 70.128.125 and 1994
c 214 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) RCW
70.129.005 through 70.129.030, 70.129.040(1), and 70.129.050 through 70.129.170
apply to this chapter and persons regulated under this chapter. The
department shall allow each resident to exercise his or her option to stay in
an adult family home and to exercise his or her judgment as to activities the
resident chooses.

(2) No resident of
an adult family home shall be removed from an adult family home for any reason
by the department without the informed written consent of a resident competent
to make such a decision; or without the informed written consent of a
resident's legal guardian if the resident has been determined incompetent; or
after the provision by the department of adequate written notice to the
resident, legal guardian, and the responsible family member or attorney-in-fact
and after a meaningful opportunity for an adjudicative hearing pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW; or after notice and hearing consistent with RCW 71A.10.050
for residents with developmental disabilities. The department shall continue
all payments, services, and benefits necessary for residential care for
medicaid recipients in their current placement pending the final administrative
decision on the merits; except that if the department determines with factual
findings that a resident is subjected to conditions of imminent danger in the
home, the department shall immediately obtain a court order pursuant to RCW
70.128.105 authorizing removal of the specific resident of an adult family home
it believes in good faith to be subjected to imminent danger, subject to final
resolution of the matter in an adjudicative hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 12. RCW 70.128.160 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 18 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is
authorized to take one or more of the actions listed in subsection (2) of this
section in any case in which the department finds that an adult family home
provider has:

(a) Failed or refused
to comply with the requirements of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(b) Operated an adult
family home without a license or under a revoked license;

(c) Knowingly or with
reason to know made a false statement of material fact on his or her
application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under
investigation by the department; or

(d) Willfully prevented
or interfered with any inspection or investigation by the department.

(2) When authorized by
subsection (1) of this section, the department may take one or more of the
following actions:

(a) Refuse to issue a
license;

(b) Impose reasonable
conditions on a license, such as correction within a specified time, training,
and limits on the type of clients the provider may admit or serve;

(c) Impose civil
penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per day per violation;

(d) Suspend, revoke, or
refuse to renew a license; or

(e) Suspend admissions
to the adult family home by imposing stop placement.

(3) The department
shall promulgate specific remedies and sanctions for deficiencies and
violations of this chapter by adult family home licensees similar to other
long-term care providers. The remedies and sanctions must be appropriate for
the home-like, noninstitutional environment of an adult family home and must be
the same as or less than the criteria listed in subsection (5) of this section
and consistent with subsections (2)(g) and (5) of WAC 388-98-003, as it exists
on January 1, 2001. The department shall ensure that sanctions and remedies in
subsection (2)(a) through (e) of this section do not impose summary suspension,
stop placement, or revocation if there are no factual findings of serious
abuse, serious neglect, serious financial exploitation, or other serious harm
by the licensee. No adult family home license shall be revoked for
deficiencies or violations of documentation or paperwork compliance
requirements. If the department has not implemented the revised regulations
required by this subsection by January 1, 2001, the criteria listed in WAC
388-98-003(3) shall be the standard for imposition of sanctions and remedies in
adult family home licensing cases until such new regulations are effective.

(4) In the event of
a citation for a deficiency or violation of the long-term care regulations, if
the department establishes that a violation or deficiency occurred, the
licensee has the burden of proving that the licensee did what might reasonably
be expected of a long-term health care facility licensee, acting under similar
circumstances, to comply with the regulation. If the licensee sustains this
burden, the citation must be dismissed.

(5) When the
department orders stop placement, the facility shall not admit any person until
the stop placement order is terminated. The department may approve readmission
of a resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the stop
placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement when: (a) The
violations necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the
provider exhibits the capacity to maintain adequate care and service.

(((4))) (6)
Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this section, except that
orders of the department imposing license suspension, stop placement, or
conditions for continuation of a license are effective immediately upon notice
and shall continue in effect pending any hearing. However, the temporary
management program created in section 1 of this act allows the continuation of
the license in accordance with the provisions of the program. The department
shall explain in writing to the provider, residents, and residents' families
any reasons for not implementing a temporary management program.

(7) If the
department determines that imminent danger to the residents of an adult family
home is present, imposition of summary suspension and stop placement orders
pending a hearing shall be implemented by the department only through an order
of the superior court in compliance with RCW 70.128.100 and 70.128.105.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
ensure that state-paid client care plans are funded to the actual cost of
services provided, including hours of supervision required for a state-paid
client. The hours of required services to be provided by the provider shall be
included in the care plan, including hours of required supervision. A provider
shall not be required to provide services for which they are not being paid or
services not in the care plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

Adult family homes
shall comply with the provisions of chapter 70.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

Any residential home
currently licensed as an adult family home shall be deemed acceptable and
licensable by the department as an adult family home, even when rented, leased,
or sold to a different provider. The department may develop a provisional
license to facilitate the timely transfer of a license under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

In any administrative
or adjudicative proceeding between the department and a licensee conducted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the appellant shall be awarded reasonable
attorney fees and expenses consistent with RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 69.06 RCW to read as follows:

Food handler permits
are not required for providers, resident managers, employees, volunteers, or
residents of adult family homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

An employer providing
home and community services, including facilities licensed under chapters 18.51,
18.20, and 70.128 RCW, an employer of a program authorized under RCW
71A.12.040(10), or an in-home services agency employer licensed under chapter
70.127 RCW, who discloses information about a former or current employee to a
prospective home and community services employer, nursing home employer, or
home health, hospice, or home care agency employer, is presumed to be acting in
good faith and is immune from civil and criminal liability for such disclosure
or its consequences if the disclosed information relates to: (1) The
employee's ability to perform his or her job; (2) the diligence, skill, or
reliability with which the employee carried out the duties of his or her job;
or (3) any illegal or wrongful act committed by the employee when related to
his or her ability to care for a vulnerable adult. For purposes of this
section, the presumption of good faith may only be rebutted upon a showing by
clear and convincing evidence that the information disclosed by the employer
was knowingly false or made with reckless disregard for the truth of the
information disclosed. Should the employee successfully rebut the presumption
of good faith standard in a court of competent jurisdiction, and therefore be
the prevailing party, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover
reasonable attorneys' fees against the employer. Nothing in this section shall
affect or limit any other state, federal, or constitutional right otherwise
available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. The following acts or parts
of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 70.128.061 (Moratorium on
authorization of adult family home licenses) and 1997 c 392 s 402; and

(2) RCW 70.128.062 (Rule-making authority to
implement RCW 70.128.061) and 1997 c 392 s 403.

---
END ---