BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the procedure set forth in RCW 82.32.060 and as an exception to the
four-year period explicitly set forth in RCW 82.32.060, an offset for a tax
that has been paid in excess of that properly due may be taken under the
following conditions: (1) The tax paid in excess of that properly due was
sales tax paid on the purchase of property acquired for leasing; (2) the
taxpayer was at the time of purchase entitled to purchase the property at
wholesale under RCW 82.04.060; and (3) the taxpayer substantiates that sales
tax was paid at the time of purchase and that there was no intervening use of
the equipment by the taxpayer. The offset is applied to and reduced by the
amount of retail sales tax otherwise due from the beginning of lease of the
property until the offset is extinguished.

--- END ---