BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department will
determine the amount of revenue collected under RCW 82.16.020(1) (b) and (c)
beginning January 1, 2002, and every year thereafter.

(2) Beginning January
1, 2003, and every year thereafter, moneys collected under RCW 82.16.020(1) (b)
and (c) that exceed one hundred five percent of the prior calendar year's
collections will be deposited on or before the first day of the second calendar
quarter into the energy assistance account created under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.12.022 and 1994 c
124 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and there shall be collected from every person in this state a use tax
for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas within this state as
a consumer.

(2) The tax shall be
levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used by the
taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas
distribution businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article
used" does not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a
gas distribution business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(7) in transporting the
gas subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax
under that chapter.

(3) The tax levied in
this section shall not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas
delivered to the consumer by other means than through a pipeline.

(4) The tax levied in
this section shall not apply to the use of natural or manufactured gas if the
person who sold the gas to the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with
respect to the gas for which exemption is sought under this subsection.

(5) There shall be a credit
against the tax levied under this section in an amount equal to any tax paid
by:

(a) The person who sold
the gas to the consumer when that tax is a gross receipts tax similar to that
imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by another state with respect to the gas for
which a credit is sought under this subsection; or

(b) The person
consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to the tax imposed by this
section was paid to another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is
sought under this subsection.

(6) The use tax hereby
imposed shall be paid by the consumer to the department.

(7) There is imposed a
reporting requirement on the person who delivered the gas to the consumer to
make a quarterly report to the department. Such report shall contain the
volume of gas delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other
information as the department shall require by rule.

(8)(a) The
department will determine the amount of revenue collected under this section
beginning January 1, 2002, and every year thereafter.

(b) Beginning
January 1, 2003, and every year thereafter, moneys collected under this section
that exceed one hundred five percent of the prior calendar year's collections
will be deposited on or before the first day of the second calendar quarter
into the energy assistance account created under section 3 of this act.

(9) The
department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and
enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384, Laws of 1989.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The energy
assistance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from section 1 of this act and RCW 82.12.022(8) must be deposited into
the account. Only the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) The
director of the department of community, trade, and economic development will
distribute the money to the grantees or charitable organizations of the
department of community, trade, and economic development which administer
federally funded energy assistance programs for the state. Expenditures from
the account must be used only for the elderly on fixed incomes or low-income
individuals. The department of community, trade, and economic development may
adopt rules necessary to administer this section, including reasonable
guidelines for determining which elderly on fixed incomes or low-income
individuals qualify for assistance.

---
END ---