BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.330 and 1987 c
109 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon a
showing satisfactory to the department that any appropriation has been
perfected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the
duty of the department to issue to the applicant a certificate stating such
facts in a form to be prescribed by him or her, and such certificate
shall thereupon be recorded with the department. Any original water right
certificate issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded with the
department and thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the same, be
by the department transmitted to the county auditor of the county or counties
where the distributing system or any part thereof is located, and be recorded
in the office of such county auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to the
owner thereof.

(2) A certificate
issued by the department under the provisions of this chapter may not be
revoked or diminished without specific legislative or judicial direction,
provided that the water right represented by the certificate has not been
relinquished under the provisions of chapter 90.14 RCW, issued with ministerial
errors, or obtained through the misrepresentation of the completion of the
project or the quantity appropriated. The department may revoke or adjust a
certificate if ministerial errors are discovered or if a certificate has been
obtained through misrepresentation.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c
316 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After an
application to, and upon the issuance by the department of an amendment to the
appropriate permit or certificate of ground water right, the holder of a valid
right to withdraw public ground waters may, without losing the holder's
priority of right, construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location
in substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or the
holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.

(2) An amendment to
construct replacement or a new additional well or wells at a location outside
of the location of the original well or wells or to change the manner or place
of use of the water shall be issued only after publication of notice of the
application and findings as prescribed in the case of an original application.
Such amendment shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that:
(a) The additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) where a replacement well
or wells is approved, the use of the original well or wells shall be
discontinued and the original well or wells shall be properly decommissioned as
required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where an additional well or wells is
constructed, the original well or wells may continue to be used, but the
combined total withdrawal from the original and additional well or wells shall
not enlarge the right conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d)
other existing rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an
approved manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an
original permit.

(3) The construction of
a replacement or new additional well or wells at the location of the original
well or wells shall be allowed without application to the department for an
amendment. However, the following apply to such a replacement or new
additional well: (a) The well shall tap the same body of public ground water
as the original well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the
use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well
or wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW;
(c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or wells may
continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and
additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right conveyed by the original
water use permit or certificate; (d) the construction and use of the well shall
not interfere with or impair water rights with an earlier date of priority than
the water right or rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement
or additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a well
it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an approved manner of
construction of the well; and (g) the department shall require a showing of
compliance with the conditions of this subsection (3).

(4) A certificate
issued by the department under the provisions of this chapter may not be
revoked or diminished without specific legislative or judicial direction,
provided that the water right represented by the certificate has not been
relinquished under the provisions of chapter 90.14 RCW, issued with ministerial
errors, or obtained through the misrepresentation of the completion of the
project or the quantity appropriated. The department may revoke or adjust a
certificate if ministerial errors are discovered or if a certificate has been
obtained through misrepresentation.

(5)
As used in this section, the "location of the original well or wells"
is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original public notice
published for the application for the water right for the well.

---
END ---