BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that a safe and civil environment in school is necessary for students to learn
and achieve high academic standards. The legislature finds that harassment,
intimidation, or bullying, like other disruptive or violent behavior, is
conduct that disrupts both a student's ability to learn and a school's ability
to educate its students in a safe environment.

Furthermore, the
legislature finds that students learn by example. The legislature commends
school administrators, faculty, staff, and volunteers for demonstrating
appropriate behavior, treating others with civility and respect, and refusing
to tolerate harassment, intimidation, or bullying.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. As used in sections 3
through 5 of this act, "harassment, intimidation, or bullying" means
any intentional gesture or written, verbal, or physical act that:

(1) A reasonable person
under the circumstances should know will have the effect of harming a student
or damaging his or her property, or placing a student in reasonable fear of
harm to his or her person or damage to his or her property; or

(2) Is sufficiently
severe, persistent, or pervasive that it creates what a reasonable person under
the circumstances would find an intimidating, threatening, or abusive
educational environment for a student.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Each school district
shall adopt or amend if necessary its policy prohibiting harassment,
intimidation, or bullying. Each school district shall have local control over
the content of the policy as long as the policy contains, at a minimum, the
components in subsection (2) of this section. It is recommended that the
policy be adopted through a process that includes representation of parents or
guardians, school employees, volunteers, students, administrators, and
community representatives.

(2) Each school
district's policy shall, at a minimum, include each of the following
components:

(a) A statement
prohibiting harassment, intimidation, or bullying of a student;

(b) A definition of
harassment, intimidation, or bullying no less inclusive than that in section 2
of this act;

(c) A requirement that
if an allegation is determined to be unfounded, a record of the allegation
shall not be kept in the student's file; and

(d) A requirement that
parents and guardians of those involved in incidents prohibited under (a) of
this subsection be notified.

(3) Each school
district shall adopt or readopt such a policy and transmit a copy of its policy
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by September 1, 2002.

(4) To assist school
districts in developing policies for the prevention of harassment,
intimidation, or bullying, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop a model policy applicable to grades K-12. This model
policy shall be issued no later than December 1, 2001.

(5) Notice of the
school district's policy shall appear in any publication of the school district
that sets forth the comprehensive rules, procedures, and standards of conduct
for the school, and in any student handbook.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A school employee,
student, or volunteer, who in good faith promptly reports an incident of
harassment, intimidation, or bullying to the appropriate school official
designated by the school district's policy, and who makes this report in
compliance with the procedures in the district's policy prohibiting bullying,
harassment, or intimidation, is immune from a cause of action for damages
arising from any failure to remedy the reported incident.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Schools and school
districts are encouraged, but not required, to form bullying prevention task
forces, programs, and other initiatives involving school staff, students,
administrators, volunteers, parents, law enforcement, and community members.

(2) To the extent funds
are appropriated for these purposes, each school district shall (a) provide
training on the school district's harassment, intimidation, or bullying
policies to school employees and volunteers who have significant contact with
students, and (b) develop a process for discussing the district's harassment,
intimidation, or bullying policy with students.

(3) Information
regarding the school district policy against harassment, intimidation, or
bullying shall be incorporated into each school's current employee training
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Sections 2 through 5 of
this act shall not be interpreted to prevent a victim from seeking redress
under any other available law either civil or criminal. Sections 2 through 6
of this act do not create or alter any tort liability.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 2 through 6 of
this act are each added to chapter 28A.635 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder
of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---