BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that as demands on water resources increase, water must be used in a manner
that is most beneficial to the natural resources of the state, while avoiding
unnecessary capital costs and public infrastructure expenditures. The
legislature also finds that in appropriate circumstances, use of water from
lakes and reservoirs by shoreland owners will allow more water to remain in
rivers and streams for stockwater, fish, wildlife, municipal drinking water,
and recreation. The legislature also finds that use of municipally treated
drinking water for garden and landscape irrigation may in some cases be an
unnecessary use of the public infrastructure, creating the need for additional
public facilities to meet the demands of growing populations.

(2) The legislature
finds that while there may be numerous benefits to using lake water in urban
settings to water lawns and noncommercial gardens, the legislature also finds
that great caution must be exercised when establishing a new exemption from the
standard permit processing system for appropriating increasingly scarce water resources.
The legislature therefore declares that any appropriations made under this act
shall be limited to lakes and reservoirs in Washington that are equal to or
greater than twenty thousand surface acres.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall determine whether there is sufficient water in a lake or reservoir with a
surface area of twenty thousand acres or more to allow owners of single-family
residences that abut the lake or reservoir to use water for noncommercial garden
and landscape irrigation.

(2) In making the
determination provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the department
shall consider at least the following factors:

(a) Whether there is
water available to be appropriated;

(b) Whether allowing
additional appropriation from the lake or reservoir will have an adverse impact
on existing water right holders;

(c) The existing uses
and applications for uses of water from the lake or reservoir;

(d) The effect on
stockwater, fish, wildlife, and other instream resources of allowing or not
allowing withdrawal from the lake or reservoir; and

(e) The lake's or
reservoir's physical characteristics, including depth, volume, surface area,
inflows, outflows, and surface level control features.

(3) If the department
determines that there may be sufficient water in the lake or reservoir to allow
use of water for single-family residential noncommercial garden and landscape
irrigation, it shall hold one or more public hearings in the area affected by
the proposal. At the public hearing, the department shall report on the
factors described in subsection (2) of this section, any additional factors it
has used to evaluate the proposal, and options for use of the available water
that will satisfy requirements for efficiency.

(4) After reviewing
comments received at the public hearing, the department shall make a final
determination whether there is sufficient water available for single-family
residential noncommercial garden and landscape irrigation purposes. If the department
determines there is sufficient water it shall, by rule:

(a) Establish the
maximum quantity of water that may be withdrawn from the lake or reservoir on a
yearly basis for single-family noncommercial garden and landscape irrigation
under this section;

(b) Establish
conditions and limitations on withdrawal by individual property owners. The
conditions and limitations may include, but are not limited to: Time of day
and year, maximum area that may be watered, maximum flow and annual water usage
allowed, protection for existing water right holders who may be affected by
the withdrawal, and conservation and efficiency measures to be used. In
adopting the terms and conditions, the department shall encourage water use
efficiency and conservation; and

(c) Establish screening
requirements to protect fish life.

(5) A person
withdrawing water under a rule adopted under subsection (4) of this section
may, but shall not be required to, apply for a water right permit as otherwise
provided by this chapter. The right to withdraw water under this section shall
have a priority date of the effective date of the rule adopted pursuant to this
section.

(6) The department may
suspend temporarily the authority to withdraw water granted under this section
if the department determines:

(a) Under chapter
43.83B RCW that drought conditions exist in the geographical area including a
lake or reservoir for which the department has established water withdrawal
standards under subsection (4) of this section; or

(b) By rule that
continued withdrawal of water under this section will have an adverse impact on
flows or lake levels below essential minimums necessary to assure the
maintenance of existing water rights, fisheries requirements, or to protect
federal or state interests including, but not limited to, power generation,
navigation, and shoreline facilities.

(7) The department may
temporarily suspend or impose conditions on the withdrawal of water authorized
under this section if there is a water shortage in the geographical area
including the lake or reservoir and a public water system with a water right
affected by the withdrawal authorized under this section has imposed use
restrictions and has requested similar restrictions for water withdrawn under
this section.

(8) The department
shall conduct the analysis required by subsection (1) of this section and, if
it determines water is available, adopt the rule required by subsection (4) of
this section not later than June 1, 2002.

(9) If requested by a
public water system that may be affected by the withdrawal of water authorized
under subsection (4) of this section, the department shall notify the system of
use restrictions that the department has established and shall consult with the
system on methods to enforce the restrictions imposed under subsection (4) of
this section.

(10) Any person
withdrawing water under the provisions of this section who uses an irrigation
system that has connections to both the supply from the lake or reservoir and a
potable drinking water supply system shall assure that the irrigation system
complies with all health, safety, and building code requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) If water is
appropriated as authorized in this act, the department of ecology shall
evaluate the advantages and disadvantages of allowing similar appropriations in
other urban lakes and reservoirs and report its findings to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature by June 1, 2004.

(2) This
section expires June 30, 2004.

---
END ---