BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.70.410 and 2000 c
107 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The shrimp pot-Puget
Sound ((shrimp emerging)) fishery ((management regime)) is ((converted
from an emerging fishery status to)) a limited entry fishery ((status
effective January 1, 2000.

(2) Effective
January 1, 2000,)) and a
person shall not fish for shrimp taken from Puget Sound for commercial purposes
with shrimp pot gear except under the provisions of a shrimp pot-Puget Sound
fishery license issued under RCW 77.65.220.

(((3) Effective
January 1, 2000, a shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery license shall only be issued
to a natural person who held an emerging commercial fishery license and Puget
Sound shrimp pot experimental fishery permit during 1999. Beginning January 1,
2001,))

(2) A shrimp
pot-Puget Sound fishery license shall only be issued to a natural person who
held a shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery license during the previous year,
except upon the death of the licensee the license shall be treated as analogous
to personal property for purposes of inheritance and intestacy.

(3) No more than two
shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery licenses may be owned by a licensee. The
licensee must transfer the second license into the licensee's name, and
designate on the second license the same vessel as is designated on the first
license at the time of the transfer. Licensees who hold two shrimp pot-Puget
Sound fishery licenses may not transfer one of the two licenses for a
twelve-month period beginning on the date the second license is transferred to
the licensee, but the licensee may transfer both licenses to another natural
person. The nontransferability provisions of this subsection start anew for
the receiver of the two licenses. Licensees who hold two shrimp pot-Puget
sound fishery licenses may fish one and one-half times the maximum number of
pots allowed for Puget Sound shrimp, and may retain and land one and one-half
times the maximum catch limits established for Puget Sound shrimp taken with
shellfish pot gear.

(4) Through December
31, 2001, shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery licenses are ((nontransferable.

(5) The department,
by rule, may set licensee participation requirements for Puget Sound shellfish
pot shrimp harvest)) transferable
only to a current shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery licensee, or upon death of the
licensee. Beginning January 1, 2002, shrimp pot-Puget Sound commercial fishery
licenses are transferable, except holders of two shrimp pot-Puget Sound
licenses are subject to nontransferability provisions as provided for in this
section.

(5) Through December
31, 2001, a shrimp pot-Puget Sound licensee may designate any natural person as
the alternate operator for the license. Beginning January 1, 2002, a shrimp
pot-Puget Sound licensee may designate only an immediate family member, as
defined in RCW 77.12.047, as the alternate operator. A licensee with a bona
fide medical emergency may designate a person other than an immediate family
member as the alternate operator for a period not to exceed two years, provided
the licensee documents the medical emergency with letters from two medical
doctors describing the illness or condition that prevents the licensee from
participating in the fishery. The two-year period may be extended by the
director upon recommendation of a department-appointed Puget Sound shrimp
advisory board. If the licensee has no immediate family member who is capable
of operating the license, the licensee may make a request to the Puget Sound
shrimp advisory board to designate an alternate operator who is not an
immediate family member, and upon recommendation of the Puget Sound shrimp
advisory board, the director may allow designation of an alternate operator who
is not an immediate family member.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.70.420 and 2000 c
107 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The shrimp
trawl-Puget Sound ((shrimp emerging)) fishery ((management regime))
is ((converted from an emerging fishery status to)) a limited entry
fishery ((status effective January 1, 2000.

(2) Effective
January 1, 2000,)) and a
person shall not fish for shrimp taken from Puget Sound for commercial purposes
with shrimp trawl gear except under the provisions of a shrimp trawl-Puget
Sound fishery license issued under RCW 77.65.220.

(((3) Effective January
1, 2000, a shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery license shall only be issued to a
natural person who held an emerging commercial fishery license and Puget Sound
shrimp trawl experimental fishery permit during 1999. Beginning January 1,
2001,))

(2) A shrimp
trawl-Puget Sound fishery license shall only be issued to a natural person who
held a shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery license during the previous licensing
year((.

(4) The department,
by rule, may set licensee participation requirements for Puget Sound shellfish
trawl shrimp harvest.

(5) Shrimp
trawl-Puget Sound fishery licenses are nontransferable)), except upon the death of the licensee the
license shall be treated as analogous to personal property for purposes of
inheritance and intestacy.

(3) No more than one
shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery license may be owned by a licensee.

(4) Through December
31, 2001, shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery licenses are nontransferable, except
upon death of the licensee. Beginning January 1, 2002, shrimp trawl-Puget
Sound licenses are transferable.

(5) Through December
31, 2001, a shrimp trawl-Puget Sound licensee may designate any natural person
as the alternate operator for the license. Beginning January 1, 2002, a shrimp
trawl-Puget Sound licensee may designate only an immediate family member, as
defined in RCW 77.12.047, as the alternate operator. A licensee with a bona
fide medical emergency may designate a person other than an immediate family
member as the alternate operator for a period not to exceed two years, provided
the licensee documents the medical emergency with letters from two medical doctors
describing the illness or condition that prevents the immediate family member
from participating in the fishery. The two-year period may be extended by the
director upon recommendation of a department-appointed Puget Sound shrimp
advisory board. If the licensee has no immediate family member who is capable
of operating the license, the licensee may make a request to the Puget Sound
shrimp advisory board to designate an alternate operator who is not an
immediate family member, and upon recommendation of the Puget Sound shrimp
advisory board, the director may allow designation of an alternate operator who
is not an immediate family member.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.65.100 and 1998 c
190 s 94 are each amended to read as follows:

This section applies to
all commercial fishery licenses, delivery licenses, and charter licenses.

(1) An applicant for a
license subject to this section may designate a vessel to be used with the
license. Except for emergency salmon delivery licenses, the director may issue
a license regardless of whether the applicant designates a vessel. An
applicant may designate no more than one vessel on a license subject to this
section.

(2) A license for a
fishery that requires a vessel authorizes no taking or delivery of food fish or
shellfish unless a vessel is designated on the license. A delivery license
authorizes no delivery of food fish or shellfish unless a vessel is designated
on the license.

(3) No vessel may be
designated on more than one commercial fishery license unless the licenses are
for different fisheries, except the same vessel may be designated on two of
the following licenses, provided the licenses are owned by the same licensee:

(a) Puget Sound
Dungeness crab fishery license;

(b) Shrimp pot-Puget
Sound fishery license;

(c) Sea cucumber
dive fishery license; and

(d) Sea urchin dive
fishery license.

(4) No vessel
may be designated on more than one delivery license, on more than one salmon
charter license, or on more than one nonsalmon charter license.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.65.110 and 2000 c
107 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

This section applies to
all commercial fishery licenses, charter boat license, and delivery
licenses((, except for whiting‑-Puget Sound fishery licenses and
emergency salmon delivery licenses.

(1) The license
holder may engage in the activity authorized by a license subject to this
section. With the exception of Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery class B
licensees licensed under RCW 77.70.280(4), the holder of a license subject to
this section may also designate up to two alternate operators for the license.
Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery class B licensees may not designate
alternate operators)).

(1) A person
designated as an alternate operator must possess an alternate operator license
issued under RCW 77.65.130, and be designated on the license prior to
engaging in the activities authorized by the license. The holder of the
commercial fishery license, charter boat license, or delivery license may
designate up to two alternate operators for the license, except:

(a) Whiting--Puget
Sound fishery licensees may not designate alternate operators;

(b) Emergency salmon
delivery licensees may not designate alternate operators;

(c) Shrimp pot-Puget
Sound fishery licensees may designate no more than one alternate operator at a
time; and

(d) Shrimp
trawl-Puget Sound fishery licensees may designate no more than one alternate
operator at a time.

(2) The
fee to change the alternate operator designation is twenty-two dollars.

---
END ---