BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 58.22.010 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to establish a coordinated ((system)) framework of
state base ((maps)) geographic data to assist all levels of
government to more effectively provide the information to meet their
responsibilities for resource planning and management.

It is further the
legislature's intent to eliminate duplication, to ((insure)) ensure
compatibility, and to create ((coordination through a uniform)) standard
state base geographic data which all agencies will use and build
upon in consonance with their missions. The framework of state base geographic
data is intended to continually improve as a shared data resource to which all
agencies will contribute.

It is in the interest
of all citizens in the state of Washington that ((a)) state base ((mapping
system be)) geographic data are established ((to make essential
base maps)) and made widely available at no more than the
cost of access and dissemination to all users, both public and private.
The cost of collecting, updating, or creating new state base geographic data
is intended to be shared among cooperating agencies and other organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 58.22 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "State base
geographic data" means a framework of commonly used digital map data for
Washington state, which is created and maintained through coordination and
partnerships with other organizations.

(2) "Cost of
access and dissemination" means costs specifically associated with
preparing and distributing state base geographic data to other organizations
and the general public. These are limited to costs associated with:
Modification of the data to make it suitable for dissemination; hardware or software
enhancements necessary for dissemination; media required for dissemination; and
customer service necessary for dissemination.

Sec. 3. RCW 58.22.020 and 1984 c
7 s 367 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
natural resources, in consultation with other agencies, shall establish
and ((maintain a state base mapping system. The standards for the state
base mapping system shall be)) coordinate appropriate maintenance of:

(1) ((A series of
fifteen minute United States geological survey quadrangle map separates at a
scale of one to 48,000 (one inch equals 4,000 feet) covering the entire state;

(2) A series of
seven and one-half minute United States geological survey quadrangle map
separates at a scale of one to 24,000 (one inch equals 2,000 feet) for urban
areas; including but not limited to those identified as urban by the state
department of transportation for the United States department of
transportation.

All features and
symbols added to the quadrangle separates shall meet as nearly as is practical
national map accuracy standards and specifications as defined by the United
States geological survey for their fifteen minute and seven and one-half minute
quadrangle map separates.

Each quadrangle
shall be revised by the department of natural resources as necessary to reflect
current conditions.)) State
base geographic data standards;

(2) State base
geographic data themes, including geodetic and photogrammetric control, public
land survey, public land ownership, government administrative boundaries,
surface water, transportation, elevation, georeferenced imagery, and geographic
names;

(3) Maintenance
operations for state base geographic data; and

(4) Access to the
state base geographic data.

The framework of state
base geographic data shall be established and maintained cooperatively and in
partnership with other organizations. The department of natural resources
shall coordinate the state base geographic data activities with the Washington
geographic information council, the Washington state board on geographic names,
and other organizations with principal responsibilities for creating or
updating state base geographic data. The department of natural resources shall
work collaboratively with the Washington geographic information council's
framework management group to identify new state base geographic data themes,
designate lead organizations for state base geographic data themes, and develop
state base geographic data standards and policies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 58.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
natural resources shall coordinate access to the framework of state base
geographic data and standards.

(2) The department of
natural resources shall provide outreach and guidance to public and private
organizations interested in using, or contributing to, the framework of state
base geographic data.

(3) The department of
natural resources may establish and administer a grant program to assist
organizations in contributing data or other resources to the framework of state
base geographic data.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The sum of eighty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department
of natural resources for the purposes of providing one full-time equivalent for
incorporating and integrating geodetic control, public land survey, and public
land ownership data from partner organizations in the framework of state base
geographic data.

(2) The sum of seventy
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department
of natural resources for the purposes of providing one full-time equivalent for
incorporating and integrating geodetic control, public land survey, and public
land ownership data from partner organizations into the framework of state base
geographic data.

(3) The sum of eighty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department
of natural resources for the purposes of providing one full-time equivalent for
coordination and outreach to other organizations regarding the framework of
state base geographic data.

(4) The sum of eighty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department
of natural resources for the purposes of providing one full-time equivalent for
coordination and outreach to other organizations regarding the framework of
state base geographic data.

(5) The sum of one
hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to
the department of natural resources for the purposes of the initial funding of
the grant program created under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. This act does not repeal,
amend, or modify any existing rights or obligations incurred under chapter
58.24 or 43.126 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 58.22.030 (United States geological
survey quadrangle map separates--Acquisition by state agencies) and 1973 1st
ex.s. c 159 s 3;

(2) RCW 58.22.040 (United States geological
survey quadrangle map separates--State depository) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 159 s
4; and

(3) RCW 58.22.050 (Availability of map
separates--Powers and duties of department) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 159 s 5.

---
END ---