BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to amounts received by a nonprofit organization, as
defined by section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)(3)), for foreign language educational programs in the public
schools that are cosponsored by a public school.

--- END ---