BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that: (1) Homeless families with young children are at significant risk of
being unable to develop long-term economic independence; (2) children in such
situations are likely to experience immediate and future adverse consequences
due to potential instability in their living arrangements and lack of access to
services; and (3) homeless families with young children are inadequately served
in terms of access to child care and that such inadequacy acts to impair the
abilities of these families to locate housing, employment, and other basic
family needs. The legislature intends to require the department of social and
health services to dedicate an effort to the development of a comprehensive,
research-based, integrated plan to expand the availability and delivery of
child care services to homeless families with children. The goals of the plan
shall be to increase the stability in the lives of families, offer safe and
nurturing places for children, and provide expanded opportunities for economic
independence.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
this section:

(a) "Homeless
family" means a family with children lacking a fixed and regular nighttime
residence or a family whose primary nighttime residence is a:

(i) Supervised shelter
designed to provide temporary accommodations;

(ii) Halfway house or
similar institution providing temporary residence for persons needing or coming
out of institutionalization;

(iii) Temporary
accommodation in the residence of another person for not more than ninety days;
or

(iv) Place not designed
for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for humans; and

(b) "Child"
or "children" means a child or children who have not reached their
fourteenth birthday.

(2) Not later than June
1, 2002, the secretary shall develop, and present to the legislature and
governor, a plan for determining the need for child care services for children
in homeless families and a method for providing the child care services.

(3) The plan shall
include the following, at a minimum:

(a) A determination, by
age, of the number of children who are in homeless families;

(b) A determination of
the number of child care slots which are dedicated to the children identified
in this subsection;

(c) A determination of
how many child care slots in addition to those identified in (b) of this
subsection are necessary to be dedicated to children in homeless families to
reasonably assure that any homeless family which seeks child care slots and
lacks the resources to obtain the slots can obtain state-supported child care
while they are homeless. The dedication of such slots shall not result in the
loss of any child care slots for which state support is available;

(d) A cost estimate for
providing the slots identified in (c) of this subsection;

(e) An assumed
implementation date of July 1, 2003.

(4) The plan shall
assume that children in homeless families are not eligible to continue in child
care slots dedicated for children in homeless families longer than thirty
calendar days following the date the family is no longer homeless.

(5) The plan shall
assume that children in homeless families are not eligible to continue in child
care slots dedicated for children in homeless families longer than twelve
consecutive months.

(6) The plan shall be
developed in consultation with a representative group of persons from those
entities which provide child care to homeless children.

(7) The department is
required to make certain that services delivered to persons receiving temporary
assistance for needy families under chapter 74.08A RCW, and to persons who are
receiving child care support under the plan developed under this section, are
coordinated. The plan shall have a goal of delivering child care support in a
manner that persons enrolled under chapter 74.08A RCW and are receiving child
care support remain, to the greatest extent possible, eligible for support under
both programs as they attempt to obtain economic independence and stabilized
housing.

(8) Under
no circumstances shall this plan create an entitlement to these services, nor
shall it be construed to create such an entitlement.

---
END ---