BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.33.400 and 1991 c
136 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, "advertisement" means communication by
newspaper, radio, television, handbills, placards, electronic mail, web
sites, or other print, broadcast, or ((the)) electronic medium.
This definition applies throughout this section.

(2) No person or entity
shall cause to be published for circulation, or broadcast on a radio or
television station, within the geographic borders of this state, an
advertisement of a child or children offered or wanted for adoption, or shall
hold himself or herself out through such advertisement as having the ability to
place, locate, dispose, or receive a child or children for adoption unless such
person or entity is:

(a) A duly authorized
agent, contractee, or employee of the department or a children's agency or
institution licensed by the department to care for and place children;

(b) A person who has a
completed preplacement report as set forth in RCW 26.33.190 (1) and (2) or
chapter 26.34 RCW with a favorable recommendation as to the fitness of the
person to be an adoptive parent, or such person's duly authorized uncompensated
agent, or such person's attorney who is licensed to practice in the state.
Verification of compliance with the requirements of this section shall consist
of a written declaration by the person or entity who prepared the preplacement
report.

Nothing in this section
prohibits an attorney licensed to practice in Washington state from advertising
his or her availability to practice or provide services related to the adoption
of children.

(3) A
violation of subsection (2) of this section is a matter affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of
subsection (2) of this section is not reasonable in relation to the development
and preservation of business. A violation of subsection (2) of this section constitutes
an unfair or deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce for the purpose of
applying chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---