BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that since 1989 a trust land transfer program has been maintained through
successive biennial budget legislation. This program has provided an
innovative means to protect state trust lands that have significant natural,
park, and recreational benefits, and provide important aquifer recharge and
other environmental benefits. At the same time this program both provides
immediate revenue for school construction and acquires other lands to place
into trust status to improve revenues to the trust in the future.
Specifically, this program has three components:

(1) It provides revenue
for the trusts by depositing the timber value of the transfer properties into
the trust accounts;

(2) It provides funding
to replace the transferred lands with land of equal value that has better
income-producing potential for trust beneficiaries; and

(3) It transfers the
protected lands to more appropriate management and ownership to emphasize
natural, park, water supply protection, and other purposes. Since 1989 the
legislature has provided a total of three hundred seventy-two million dollars
to fund trust land transfers, of which two hundred thirty-seven million dollars
has been allocated to school construction funding and the balance to the
purchase of replacement lands for the school trusts.

The legislature further
finds that this program may be strengthened by providing guidance for
developing priority parcels for trust land transfers, providing criteria to
guide development of priority proposals, for providing greater public
involvement in the program, and by authorizing the program in statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 79.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The trust land
transfer program is established within the department of natural resources.
Consistent with the requirements of section 3 of this act, the board of natural
resources must adopt procedures for the department of natural resources to
identify, evaluate, and submit to the board a priority list of trust lands
appropriate for funding under the program. The board of natural resources must
adopt criteria for evaluating trust lands appropriate for funding, which should
include consideration of:

(a) Increasing the
ability of the trust to produce revenue for its beneficiaries;

(b) Lands on which
revenue generating capacity is constrained by local, state, or federal law; and

(c) Lands that provide
significant value for purposes other than maximizing revenue from timber
harvest, such as uses for parks and recreation, natural areas conservation,
fish and wildlife habitat conservation, scenic enjoyment, and protection of
water supplies and water quality.

The board of natural
resources' evaluation criteria must place a high priority upon lands on islands
that provide a significant recharge function to sole source aquifers relied
upon for drinking water purposes.

(2) By July 1st of each
even-numbered year, the department of natural resources must develop a
prioritized list of properties eligible for trust land transfer. The list
shall rank the projects in order of priority, and clearly identify the reasons
each property is being recommended for transfer, the proposed use of each
property, and the proposed receiving agency. The list must be submitted to the
board of natural resources for its review and consideration, and be provided to
members of the public requesting such information, as well as each city or
county in which listed trust lands are located.

(3) The board of
natural resources must schedule one or more public meetings in which citizens
may provide their comments on the ranked list and upon other trust lands that
may be recommended for consideration.

(4) By September 15th
of each even-numbered year, the board of natural resources must recommend to
the governor a prioritized list of properties eligible for trust land
transfer. The board's recommendations must also be submitted to the standing
capital budget committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 79.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Property
transferred under the trust land transfer program created in section 2 of this
act must be appraised and transferred at fair market value. The proceeds of
the sale or transfer attributed to timber value must be deposited by the
department of natural resources in the same manner as timber revenues from
other trust lands, except that no deductions may be made for the resource
management cost account under RCW 79.64.040 unless the transfer is of a lease
or easement interest. The proceeds of the sales attributed to land value must
be deposited into the natural resources real property replacement account under
RCW 43.30.265. These funds must be expended by the department of natural
resources to acquire replacement real property of equal value to be managed as
trust land for the trust under which the transferred land was managed.

(2) Trust land
transfers may be accomplished either by a transfer of the fee interest in the
land or by conveying a lease, easement, or other interest that restricts timber
harvest on transferred properties for a minimum of thirty years.

(3) Prior to the
transfer of lands, the receiving agency must demonstrate the ability to manage
the transfer lands according to state and local laws regarding public safety,
weed and fire control, and other applicable public land management
requirements. Trust land transfers must be accomplished in cooperation with
receiving agencies.

(4) The
department of natural resources may not expend funds or otherwise financially
obligate funds for trust land transfers until the legislature has appropriated
funds for a specific list of projects.

---
END ---