BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a) "Direct
service industrial customer" means a person who is an industrial customer
that contracts for the purchase of power from the Bonneville power
administration for direct consumption as of the effective date of this
section. "Direct service industrial customer" includes a person who
is a subsidiary that is more than fifty percent owned by a direct service
industrial customer and who receives power from the Bonneville power
administration pursuant to the parent's contract for power.

(b)
"Facility" means a gas turbine electrical generation facility that
does not exist on the effective date of this section and is owned by a direct
service industrial customer for the purpose of producing electricity to be
consumed by the direct service industrial customer.

(c) "Average
annual employment" means the total employment in this state for a calendar
year at the direct service industrial customer's location where electricity
from the facility will be consumed.

(2) Effective July 1,
2004, a credit is allowed against the tax due under this chapter to a direct
service industrial customer who purchases natural or manufactured gas from a
gas distribution business subject to the public utility tax under chapter 82.16
RCW. The credit is equal to the value of natural or manufactured gas purchased
from a gas distribution business and used to generate electricity at the
facility multiplied by the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas
distribution businesses under RCW 82.16.020. This credit may be used each
reporting period for sixty months following the first month natural or manufactured
gas was purchased from a gas distribution business by a direct service
industrial customer who constructs a facility.

(3) This credit is
available only to a person who meets the requirements for diversification of
resources, as required in a legislative act enacted in the 2001 legislative
session. If such a requirement is not enacted, this subsection (3) has no
effect.

(4) For any direct
service industrial customer electing between January 1, 2000, and October 1,
2001, to have the Bonneville power administration repurchase or remarket power
not delivered to the company for use in its operations, this credit is
available only to a person who uses resale proceeds or agrees with the
Bonneville power administration to use net remarketing proceeds for the
following purposes:

(a) Expenditures or
costs related to curtailing production, including at a minimum compensation,
benefits, other expenditures related to employee layoffs, maintaining
additional employees not required for operations at the reduced level, or job
reassignments as a result of reduced operations; and

(b) Expenditures or
costs incurred related to plans for securing a future power supply and
enhancement of operations at facilities located in Washington, including
expenses related to new nonfederal power sources and expenses to upgrade
facilities to achieve energy conservation, operating efficiencies,
environmental benefits, or preserving jobs.

(5) Subsection (4) of
this section may not be construed to disqualify a direct service industrial
customer that uses resale proceeds or that agrees with the Bonneville power
administration to use net remarketing proceeds for additional purposes beyond
those specified in subsection (4) of this section.

(6) Application for
credit shall be made by the direct service industrial consumer before the first
purchase of natural or manufactured gas. The application shall be in a form
and manner prescribed by the department and shall include but is not limited to
information regarding the location of the facility, the projected date of first
purchase of natural or manufactured gas to generate electricity at the
facility, the date construction is projected to begin or did begin, the
applicant's average annual employment in the state for the six calendar years
immediately preceding the year in which the application is made, and affirm the
applicant's status as a direct service industrial customer. The department
shall rule on the application within thirty days of receipt.

(7) Credit under this
section is limited to the amount of tax imposed under this chapter. Refunds
shall not be given in place of credits and credits may not be carried over to
subsequent calendar years.

(8) All or part of the
credit shall be disallowed and must be paid if the average of the direct
service industrial customer's average annual employment for the five calendar
years subsequent to the calendar year containing the first month of purchase of
natural or manufactured gas to generate electricity at a facility is less than
the six-year average annual employment stated on the application for credit
under this section. The direct service industrial customer will certify to the
department by June 1st of the sixth calendar year following the calendar year
in which the month of first purchase of gas occurs the average annual
employment for each of the five prior calendar years. All or part of the
credit that shall be disallowed and must be paid is commensurate with the
decrease in the five-year average of average annual employment as follows:

Decrease in Average Annual

Employment Over

Five-Year Period % of
Credit to be Paid

Less than 10% 10%

10% or more but less
than 25% 25%

25% or more but less
than 50% 50%

50% or more but less
than 75% 75%

75% or more 100%

(9)(a) The direct
service industrial customer shall begin paying the credit that is disallowed
and is to be paid in the sixth calendar year following the calendar year in
which the month following the month of first purchase of natural or
manufactured gas to generate electricity at the facility occurs. The first
payment will be due on or before December 31st with subsequent annual payments
due on or before December 31st of the following four years according to the
following schedule:

Payment Year % of Credit to be Paid

1 10%

2 15%

3 20%

4 25%

5 30%

(b) The department may
authorize an accelerated payment schedule upon request of the taxpayer.

(c) Interest shall not
be charged on the credit that is disallowed for the sixty-month period the
credit may be taken, although all other penalties and interest applicable to
delinquent excise taxes may be assessed and imposed. The debt for credit that is
disallowed and must be paid will not be extinguished by insolvency or other
failure of the direct service industrial customer. Transfer of ownership of
the facility does not affect eligibility for this credit. However, the credit
is available to the successor only if the eligibility conditions of this
section are met.

(10) The employment
security department shall make, and certify to the department of revenue, all
determinations of employment under this section as requested by the department.

(11) A person claiming
this credit shall supply to the department quarterly reports containing
information necessary to document the total volume of natural or manufactured
gas purchased in the quarter, the value of that total volume, and the
percentage of the total volume used to generate electricity at the facility.

(12) A direct service
industrial customer claiming credit under this section may not claim a deferral
under section 2 of this act nor be the beneficiary of a credit allowed under
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a) "Direct
service industrial customer" means a person who is an industrial customer
that contracts for the purchase of power from the Bonneville power
administration for direct consumption as of the effective date of this
section. "Direct service industrial customer" includes a person who
is a subsidiary that is more than fifty percent owned by a direct service
industrial customer and who receives power from the Bonneville power
administration pursuant to the parent's contract for power.

(b)
"Facility" means a gas turbine electrical generation facility that
does not exist on the effective date of this section and is owned by a direct
service industrial customer for the purpose of producing electricity to be
consumed by the direct service industrial customer.

(c) "Average annual
employment" means the total employment in this state for a calendar year
at the direct service industrial customer's location where electricity from the
facility will be consumed.

(2) Effective July 1,
2004, the tax levied in RCW 82.12.022 on the first sixty months' use of natural
or manufactured gas by a direct service industrial customer that owns a
facility shall be deferred. This deferral is limited to the tax on natural or
manufactured gas used or consumed to generate electricity at the facility.

(3) This deferral is
available only to a person who meets the requirements for diversification of
resources, as required in a legislative act enacted in the 2001 legislative
session. If such a requirement is not enacted, this subsection (3) has no effect.

(4) For any direct
service industrial customer electing between January 1, 2000, and October 1,
2001, to have the Bonneville power administration repurchase or remarket power
not delivered to the company for use in its operations, this deferral is available
only to a person who uses resale proceeds or agrees with the Bonneville power
administration to use net remarketing proceeds for the following purposes:

(a) Expenditures or
costs related to curtailing production, including at a minimum compensation,
benefits, other expenditures related to employee layoffs, maintaining
additional employees not required for operations at the reduced level, or job
reassignments as a result of reduced operations; and

(b) Expenditures or
costs incurred related to plans for securing a future power supply and
enhancement of operations at facilities located in Washington, including
expenses related to new nonfederal power sources and expenses to upgrade
facilities to achieve energy conservation, operating efficiencies, environmental
benefits, or preserving jobs.

(5) Subsection (4) of
this section may not be construed to disqualify a direct service industrial
customer that uses resale proceeds or that agrees with the Bonneville power
administration to use net remarketing proceeds for additional purposes beyond
those specified in subsection (4) of this section.

(6) Application for
deferral shall be made by the direct service industrial customer before the
first use of natural or manufactured gas. The application shall be in a form
and manner prescribed by the department and shall include but is not limited to
information regarding the location of the facility, the projected date of first
use of natural or manufactured gas to generate electricity at the facility, the
date construction is projected to begin or did begin, the applicant's average
annual employment in the state for the six calendar years immediately preceding
the year in which the application is made, and shall affirm the applicant's
status as a direct service industrial customer. The department shall rule on
the application within thirty days of receipt.

(7)(a) The direct
service industrial customer shall begin paying the deferred tax in the sixth
calendar year following the calendar year in which the month of first use of
natural or manufactured gas to generate electricity at the facility occurs.
The first payment will be due on or before December 31st with subsequent annual
payments due on or before December 31st of the following four years according
to the following schedule:

Payment Year % of Deferred Tax to be Paid

1 10%

2 15%

3 20%

4 25%

5 30%

(b) The department may
authorize an accelerated payment schedule upon request of the taxpayer.

(c) Interest shall not
be charged on the tax deferred under this section for the period of deferral,
although all other penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes
may be assessed and imposed. The debt for deferred tax will not be extinguished
by insolvency or other failure of the direct service industrial customer.
Transfer of ownership of the facility does not affect deferral eligibility.
However, the deferral is available to the successor only if the eligibility
conditions of this section are met.

(8)(a) If the average
of the direct service industrial customer's average annual employment for the
five calendar years subsequent to the calendar year containing the first month
of use of natural or manufactured gas to generate electricity at a facility is
equal to or exceeds the six-year average annual employment stated on the
application for deferral under this section, the tax deferred need not be
paid. The direct service industrial customer shall certify to the department
by June 1st of the sixth calendar year following the calendar year in which the
month of first use of gas occurs the average annual employment for each of the
five prior calendar years.

(b) If the five-year
average calculated in (a) of this subsection is less than the average annual
employment stated on the application for deferral under this section, the tax
deferred under this section shall be paid in the amount as follows:

Decrease in Average Annual

Employment Over % of Deferred

Five-Year Period Tax
to be Paid

Less than 10% 10%

10% or more but less
than 25% 25%

25% or more but less
than 50% 50%

50% or more but less
than 75% 75%

75% or more 100%

(c) Tax paid under this
subsection shall be paid according to the schedule in subsection (7)(a) of this
section and under the terms and conditions of subsection (7)(b) and (c) of this
section.

(9) The employment
security department shall make, and certify to the department of revenue, all
determinations of employment under this section as requested by the department.

(10) A person claiming
this deferral shall supply to the department quarterly reports containing
information necessary to document the total volume of natural or manufactured
gas purchased in the quarter, the value of that total volume, and the percentage
of the total volume used to generate electricity at the facility.

(11) A direct service
industrial customer claiming a deferral under this section may not claim a
credit under section 1 of this act nor be the beneficiary of a credit allowed
under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a) "Direct
service industrial customer" means a person who is an industrial customer
that contracts for the purchase of power from the Bonneville power
administration for direct consumption as of the effective date of this
section. "Direct service industrial customer" includes a person who
is a subsidiary that is more than fifty percent owned by a direct service
industrial customer and who receives power from the Bonneville power
administration pursuant to the parent's contract for power.

(b)
"Facility" means a gas turbine electrical generation facility that
does not exist on the effective date of this section.

(c) "Average
annual employment" means the total employment in this state for a calendar
year at the direct service industrial customer's location where electricity
from the facility will be consumed.

(2) Effective July 1,
2004, a credit is allowed against the tax due under this chapter on sales of
electricity made from a facility to a direct service industrial customer if the
contract for sale of electricity to a direct service industrial customer
contains the following terms:

(a) Sales of
electricity from the facility to the direct service industrial customer will be
made for ten consecutive years or more;

(b) The price charged
for the electricity will be reduced by an amount equal to the tax credit; and

(c) Disallowance of all
or part of the credit under subsection (8) of this section is a breach of
contract and the damages to be paid by the direct service industrial customer
to the facility are the amount of tax credit disallowed.

(3) The credit is equal
to the gross proceeds from the sale of the electricity to a direct service
industrial customer multiplied by the rate in effect at the time of the sale
for the public utility tax on light and power businesses under RCW 82.16.020.
The credit may be used each reporting period for sixty months following the
first month electricity is sold from a facility to a direct service industrial
customer. Credit under this section is limited to the amount of tax imposed
under this chapter. Refunds shall not be given in place of credits and credits
may not be carried over to subsequent calendar years.

(4) This credit is
available only to a person who meets the requirements for diversification of
resources, as required in a legislative act enacted in the 2001 legislative
session. If such a requirement is not enacted, this subsection (4) has no
effect.

(5) For any direct
service industrial customer electing between January 1, 2000, and October 1,
2001, to have the Bonneville power administration repurchase or remarket power
not delivered to the company for use in its operations, this exemption is
available only to a person who uses resale proceeds or agrees with the
Bonneville power administration to use net remarketing proceeds for the
following purposes:

(a) Expenditures or
costs related to curtailing production, including at a minimum compensation,
benefits, other expenditures related to employee layoffs, maintaining
additional employees not required for operations at the reduced level, or job
reassignments as a result of reduced operations; and

(b) Expenditures or
costs incurred related to plans for securing a future power supply and
enhancement of operations at facilities located in Washington, including
expenses related to new nonfederal power sources and expenses to upgrade
facilities to achieve energy conservation, operating efficiencies,
environmental benefits, or preserving jobs.

(6) Subsection (5) of
this section may not be construed to disqualify a direct service industrial
customer that uses resale proceeds or that agrees with the Bonneville power
administration to use net remarketing proceeds for additional purposes beyond
those specified in subsection (5) of this section.

(7) Application for credit
shall be made before the first sale of electricity from a facility to a direct
service industrial customer. The application shall be in a form and manner
prescribed by the department and shall include but is not limited to
information regarding the location of the facility, identification of the
direct service industrial customer who will receive electricity from the
facility, the projected date of the first sale of electricity to a direct
service industrial customer, the date construction is projected to begin or did
begin, and the average annual employment in the state of the direct service
industrial customer who will receive electricity from the facility for the six
calendar years immediately preceding the year in which the application is
made. A copy of the contract for sale of electricity must be attached to the
application. The department shall rule on the application within thirty days
of receipt.

(8) All or part of the
credit shall be disallowed and must be paid if the average of the direct
service industrial customer's average annual employment for the five calendar
years subsequent to the calendar year containing the first month of sale of
electricity from a facility to a direct service industrial customer is less
than the six-year average annual employment stated on the application for
credit under this section. The direct service industrial customer shall
certify to the department and to the facility by June 1st of the sixth calendar
year following the calendar year in which the month of first sale occurs the
average annual employment for each of the five prior calendar years. All or
part of the credit that shall be disallowed and must be paid is commensurate
with the decrease in the five-year average of average annual employment as follows:

Decrease in Average
Annual

Employment Over

Five-Year Period % of Credit to be Paid

Less than 10% 10%

10% or more but less
than 25% 25%

25% or more but less
than 50% 50%

50% or more but less
than 75% 75%

75% or more 100%

(9)(a) Payments on
credit that is disallowed shall begin in the sixth calendar year following the
calendar year in which the month following the first month of sale of
electricity from a facility to a direct service industrial customer occurs.
The first payment will be due on or before December 31st with subsequent annual
payments due on or before December 31st of the following four years according
to the schedule in this subsection.

Payment Year % of Credit to be Paid

1 10%

2 15%

3 20%

4 25%

5 30%

(b) The department may
authorize an accelerated payment schedule upon request of the taxpayer.

(c) Interest shall not
be charged on the credit that is disallowed for the sixty-month period the
credit may be taken, although all other penalties and interest applicable to
delinquent excise taxes may be assessed and imposed. The debt for credit that
is disallowed and must be paid will not be extinguished by insolvency or other
failure of the taxpayer. Transfer of ownership of the facility does not affect
eligibility for this credit. However, the credit is available to the successor
only if the eligibility conditions of this section are met.

(10) The employment
security department shall make, and certify to the department of revenue, all
determinations of employment under this section as requested by the department.

(11) A
direct service industrial customer benefiting from a credit allowed under this
section may not claim a credit under section 1 of this act nor a deferral under
section 2 of this act.

---
END ---