BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.16

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
the

_8 definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.

_9 (a) "Base credit" means the maximum amount
of credit against

10 the tax imposed by this chapter that each light and
power business

11 or gas distribution business may take each fiscal year
as

12 calculated by the department. The base credit is equal
to the

13 proportionate share that the total grants received by
each light

14 and power business or gas distribution business in the
prior

15 fiscal year bears to the total grants received by all
light and

16 power businesses and gas distribution businesses in the
prior

17 fiscal year multiplied by two million five hundred
thousand

18 dollars.

p. 1 2SSB
5540

_1 (b) "Billing discount" means a reduction
in the amount charged

_2 for providing service to qualifying persons in
Washington made by

_3 a light and power business or a gas distribution
business. Billing

_4 discount does not include grants received by the light
and power

_5 business or a gas distribution business.

_6 (c) "Grant" means funds provided to a
light and power business

_7 or gas distribution business by the department of
community,

_8 trade, and economic development or by a qualifying
organization.

_9 (d) "Low-income home energy assistance
program" means energy

10 assistance programs for low-income households as defined
on

11 December 31, 2000, in the low-income home energy
assistance act of

12 1981 as amended August 1, 1999, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8623 et
seq.

13 (e) "Qualifying person" means a Washington
resident who applies

14 for assistance and qualifies for a grant regardless of
whether

15 that person receives a grant.

16 (f) "Qualifying contribution" means money
given by a light and

17 power business or a gas distribution business to a
qualifying

18 organization, exclusive of money received in the prior
fiscal year

19 from its customers for the purpose of assisting other
customers.

20 (g) "Qualifying organization" means an
entity that has a

21 contractual agreement with the department of community,
trade, and

22 economic development to administer in a specified
service area low-

23 income home energy assistance funds received from the
federal

24 government and such other funds that may be received by
the

25 entity.

26 (2) Subject to the limitations in this section, a
light and

27 power business or a gas distribution business may take a
credit

28 each fiscal year against the tax imposed under this
chapter for

29 qualifying contributions that are equal to or greater
than one

30 hundred twenty-five percent of the qualifying
contributions given

31 in fiscal year 2000 and for billing discounts that are
equal to or

32 greater than one hundred twenty-five percent of the
billing

33 discounts given in fiscal year 2000. If no billing
discounts were

34 given in fiscal year 2000 a credit shall be allowed on
any billing

35 discounts given in any subsequent fiscal year.
Thereafter, credit

36 shall be allowed on billing discounts given that are
equal to or

37 greater than one hundred twenty-five percent of the
billing

38 discounts given in the first fiscal year such billing
discounts

2SSB 5540 p. 2

_1 are given. The amount of credit shall be fifty percent
of the total

_2 billing discounts and qualifying contributions, limited
to the

_3 base credit for the same fiscal year.

_4 (3) The total amount of credit, statewide, that may
be taken in

_5 any fiscal year shall not exceed one million five
hundred thousand

_6 dollars. By May 1st of each year starting in 2002, the
department

_7 of community, trade, and economic development shall
notify the

_8 department of revenue in writing of the grants received
in the

_9 current fiscal year by each light and power business and
gas

10 distribution business.

11 (4)(a) Not later than June 1st of each year
beginning in 2002,

12 the department shall publish the base credit for each light
and

13 power business and gas distribution business for the
next fiscal

14 year.

15 (b) Not later than July 1st of each year beginning
in 2002,

16 application for credit must by made to the department
including

17 but not limited to the following information: Billing
discounts

18 given by the applicant in fiscal year 2000; qualifying

19 contributions given by the applicant in the prior fiscal
year; the

20 amount of money received in the prior fiscal year from
customers

21 for the purpose of assisting other customers; the base
credit for

22 the next fiscal year for the applicant; the qualifying

23 contributions anticipated to be given in the next fiscal
year; and

24 billing discounts anticipated to be given in the next
fiscal

25 year. No credit under this section will be allowed to a
light and

26 power business or gas distribution business that does
not file the

27 application by July 1st.

28 (c) Not later than August 1st of each year beginning
in 2002,

29 the department shall notify each applicant of the amount
of credit

30 that may be taken in that fiscal year.

31 (d) The balance of base credits not used by other
light and

32 power businesses and gas distribution businesses shall
be ratably

33 distributed to applicants under the formula in
subsection (1)(a)

34 of this section. The total amount of credit that may be
taken by an

35 applicant is the base credit plus any ratable portion of
unused

36 base credit.

37 (5) The credit taken under this section is limited
to the

38 amount of tax imposed under this chapter for the fiscal
year. The

p. 3 2SSB
5540

_1 credit must be claimed in the fiscal year in which the
billing

_2 reduction is made. Any unused credit expires. Refunds
shall not be

_3 given in place of credits.

_4 (6) No credit may be taken for billing discounts
made before

_5 July 1, 2001. Within two weeks of the effective date of
this

_6 section, the department of community, trade, and
economic

_7 development shall notify the department of revenue in
writing of

_8 the grants received in fiscal year 2001 by each light
and power

_9 business and gas distribution business. Within four
weeks of the

10 effective date of this section, the department of revenue
shall

11 publish the base credit for each light and power
business and gas

12 distribution business for fiscal year 2002. Within
eight weeks of

13 the effective date of this section, application to the
department

14 must be made showing the information required in
subsection (4)(b)

15 of this section. Within twelve weeks of the effective
date of this

16 section, the department shall notify each applicant of
the amount

17 of credit that may be taken in fiscal year 2002.

18 Sec. 2. RCW
74.38.070 and 1998 c 300 s 8 are each amended to read

19 as follows:

20 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
county,

21 city, town, municipal corporation, or quasi municipal
corporation

22 providing utility services may provide such services at
reduced

23 rates for low income senior citizens or other low-income

24 citizens: PROVIDED, That, for the purposes of this
section, "low-

25 income senior citizen" or "other low-income
citizen" shall be

26 defined by appropriate ordinance or resolution adopted
by the

27 governing body of the county, city, town, municipal
corporation,

28 or quasi municipal corporation providing the utility
services

29 except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
Any

30 reduction in rates granted in whatever manner to
low-income senior

31 citizens or other low-income citizens in one part of a
service

32 area shall be uniformly extended to low-income senior
citizens or

33 other low-income citizens in all other parts of the
service area.

34 (2) For purposes of implementing this section by any
public

35 utility district, (a) "low-income senior
citizen" means a person

36 who is sixty-two years of age or older and whose total
income,

37 including that of his or her spouse or cotenant, does
not exceed

2SSB 5540 p. 4

_1 the amount specified in RCW 84.36.381(5)(b), ((as now
or hereafter

_2 amended)) and (b) "other low-income
citizen" means a person within

_3 the defined group established by appropriate
ordinance or

_4 resolution as provided in subsection (1) of this
section whose

_5 household income does not exceed the amount specified in
RCW

_6 70.164.020(4).

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 2SSB
5540