BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.02567 and 1999
c 358 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of machinery and equipment used directly
in generating electricity using wind, fuel cells, biomass waste, sun, or
landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of or charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment, but only if the purchaser develops with such machinery, equipment,
and labor a facility capable of generating not less than two hundred ((kilowatts))
watts of electricity and provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department ((by rule)).
The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2) For purposes of
this section and RCW 82.12.02567:

(a) "Landfill
gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for federal tax credits
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill. "Landfill" means
a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;

(b) "Machinery and
equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices, and support facilities that
are integral and necessary to the generation of electricity using wind, fuel
cells, biomass waste, sun, or landfill gas as the principal source of
power;

(c) "Machinery and
equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered tools; (ii) property with a
useful life of less than one year; (iii) repair parts required to restore
machinery and equipment to normal working order; (iv) replacement parts that do
not increase productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that are not
integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are permanently
affixed to and become a physical part of a building;

(d) Machinery and
equipment is "used directly" in generating electricity with fuel
cells or by wind energy, solar energy, or landfill gas power or
biomass waste power, if it provides any part of the process that captures
the energy of the wind, biomass waste, sun, or landfill gas, converts
that energy to electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits
that electricity for entry into or operation in parallel with electric
transmission and distribution systems;

(e) "Fuel
cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates electricity by
combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence of a catalyst;

(f) "Biomass
waste" means organic materials such as animal waste, food processing
waste, wood and agricultural residues, sewage, and municipal solid waste.

(3) This section
expires June 30, ((2005)) 2009.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.12.02567 and 1999
c 358 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply with respect to machinery and equipment used
directly in generating not less than two hundred ((kilowatts)) watts
of electricity using wind, fuel cells, biomass waste, sun, or landfill
gas as the principal source of power.

(2) The definitions in
RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.

(3) This section
expires June 30, ((2005)) 2009.

Sec. 3. RCW 44.39.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 328 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

There is
hereby created the joint committee on energy ((and utilities)) shortages
of the legislature of the state of Washington.

Sec. 4. RCW 44.39.015 and 1977
ex.s. c 328 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The committee shall
consist of four senators and four representatives who shall be selected biennially
as follows:

(1) The president of
the senate shall ((nominate)) appoint four members from the ((energy
and utilities)) senate to serve on the committee, including the ((chairman,))
chairperson of the committee responsible for energy issues. Two members
((being)) from each major political party((, to serve on the
committee, and shall submit the list of nominees to the senate for
confirmation. Upon confirmation, the senators shall be deemed installed as
members)) must be appointed.

(2) The speaker or
co-speakers of the house of representatives shall nominate four
members from the ((energy and utilities)) house of representatives to
serve on the committee, including the ((chairman,)) chairperson
or cochairs of the committee responsible for energy issues. Two members ((being))
from each major political party((, to serve on the committee, and shall
submit the list of nominees to the house of representatives for confirmation.
Upon confirmation, the representatives shall be deemed installed as members.
The chairmen of the senate and house energy and utilities committees shall
alternately serve as chairman for one year terms. The chairman of the house
committee shall serve as the initial chairman. The chairman may designate
another committee member to serve as chairman in his or her absence)) must
be appointed.

(3) The committee
shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson. The chairperson shall be a
member of the house of representatives in even-numbered years and a member of
the senate in odd-numbered years. In the case of a tie in the membership of
the house of representatives in an even-numbered year, the committee shall
elect cochairs from the house of representatives in that year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---