BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 82.34

_8 RCW to read as follows:

_9 (1) The following definitions apply throughout this
section:

10 (a) "Qualifying facility" means an air
pollution control

11 facility as that term is defined in RCW 82.34.010(1)(a)
to be

12 installed or acquired for a thermal electric peaking
plant and

13 which is approved pursuant to the Washington clean air
act,

14 chapter 70.94 RCW.

15 (b) "Thermal electric peaking plant" means
a natural gas-fired

16 thermal electric generating facility operated by a light
and power

17 business and placed into service between January 1,
1978, and

p. 1 SSB
5542

_1 December 31, 1984, and that is registered for the
calendar year

_2 2000 pursuant to RCW 70.94.151.

_3 (c) "Light and power business" has the
same meaning as in RCW

_4 82.16.010.

_5 (2) The department shall, upon written request of a
light and

_6 power business to which the approval issued under
chapter 70.94

_7 RCW is attached, make a determination as to whether a
plant is a

_8 thermal electric peaking plant acquiring or installing a

_9 qualifying facility eligible under this section. The
department

10 shall consult with the department of community, trade,
and

11 economic development and the department of ecology in
making the

12 determination. If the determination is in the
affirmative, the

13 department shall issue the light and power business a sales
and

14 use tax exemption certificate in a form and manner as
deemed

15 appropriate by the department.

16 (3) The charges for installation or acquisition of a
qualifying

17 facility by the holder of the certificate are exempt
from sales

18 tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW and use tax imposed
under

19 chapter 82.12 RCW. The purchaser must provide the
seller with a

20 copy of the sales and use tax exemption certificate.
The seller

21 shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's
files.

22 (4) The exemption in this section is limited to the

23 installation or acquisition of a qualifying facility and
does not

24 apply to servicing, maintenance, operation, or repairs
of a

25 thermal electric peaking plant or of an air pollution
control

26 facility.

27 (5) This section expires June 30, 2011.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5542 p. 2