BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.305.130 and 1997
c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:

(1) Approve or
disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school administrator, and
school specialized personnel certification offered by all institutions of
higher education within the state which may be accredited and whose graduates
may become entitled to receive such certification.

(2) Conduct every five
years a review of the program approval standards, including the minimum
standards for teachers, administrators, and educational staff associates, to
reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of preparation
programs for teachers, administrators, and educational staff associates.

(3) Investigate the
character of the work required to be performed as a condition of entrance to
and graduation from any institution of higher education in this state relative
to such certification as provided for in subsection (1) above, and prepare a
list of accredited institutions of higher education of this and other states
whose graduates may be awarded such certificates.

(4)(a) The state board
of education shall adopt rules to allow a teacher certification candidate to
fulfill, in part, teacher preparation program requirements through work
experience as a classified teacher's aide in a public school or private school
meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are
not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher preparation
candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations based on the amount
of work experience that may apply toward teacher preparation program
requirements under this chapter.

(b) The state board of
education shall require that at the time of the individual's enrollment in a
teacher preparation program, the supervising teacher and the building principal
shall jointly provide to the teacher preparation program of the higher
education institution at which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a written
assessment of the performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment shall
contain such information as determined by the state board of education and
shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's work as
a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional activities with
children under the supervision of a certificated teacher and that the candidate
worked a minimum of six hundred thirty hours for one school year; the type of
work performed by the candidate; and a recommendation of whether the
candidate's work experience as a classified teacher's aide should be
substituted for teacher preparation program requirements. In compliance with
such rules as may be established by the state board of education under this
section, the teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution
where the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher aide work
experience.

(5) Supervise the
issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (1) above and
specify the types and kinds of certificates necessary for the several
departments of the common schools by rule ((or regulation)) in
accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.

(6) Accredit, subject
to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be established by the
state board of education, all schools that apply for accreditation, and
approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying
out a program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten
program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or private schools shall be
placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are
knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require all or certain classifications
of the public schools to conduct and participate in such preaccreditation
examination and evaluation processes as may now or hereafter be established by
the board.

(7) Make rules ((and
regulations)) governing the establishment in any existing nonhigh school
district of any secondary program or any new grades in grades nine through
twelve. Before any such program or any new grades are established the district
must obtain prior approval of the state board.

(8) Prepare such
outline of study for the common schools as the board shall deem necessary, and
prescribe such rules for the general government of the common schools, as shall
seek to secure regularity of attendance, prevent truancy, secure efficiency,
and promote the true interest of the common schools.

(9) Continuously
reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce ((regulations)) rules
within the common schools so as to meet the educational needs of students and
articulate with the institutions of higher education and unify the work of the
public school system.

(10) Carry out board
powers and duties relating to the organization and reorganization of school
districts under chapters 28A.315, 28A.323, and 28A.343 RCW ((28A.315.010
through 28A.315.680 and 28A.315.900)).

(11) By rule ((or
regulation promulgated)) adopted upon the advice of the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, provide for
instruction of pupils in the ((public and)) private schools carrying out
a K through 12 program, or any part thereof, so that in case of sudden
emergency they shall be able to leave their particular school building in the
shortest possible time or take such other steps as the particular emergency
demands, and without confusion or panic; such rules ((and regulations))
shall be published and distributed to certificated personnel throughout the
state whose duties shall include a familiarization therewith as well as the
means of implementation thereof at their particular school.

(12) By rule,
following consultation with at least the emergency management division of the
state military department and the superintendent of public instruction, provide
for instruction of staff and pupils in the public schools carrying out a K
through 12 program, or any part thereof, so that in case of a sudden all-hazard
emergency they shall be able to leave their particular school building in the
shortest possible time or take such other steps as the particular all-hazard
emergency demands, without confusion or panic. The rules shall provide
guidance on the development and implementation of all-hazard emergency
management plans. The rules shall specify when school districts shall complete
their plans. The rules shall be published and distributed to school district
officials who shall in turn distribute information about the plans to all
employed staff in the district.

(13) Hear and
decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.

The state board of
education is given the authority to promulgate information and rules dealing
with the prevention of child abuse for purposes of curriculum use in the common
schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

To the
extent funds are appropriated, school districts shall require that schools
develop a comprehensive safe school plan. A comprehensive safe school plan is
a school-based plan that includes prevention, intervention, all-hazards and
crisis response including the all-hazards emergency plan under RCW 28A.305.130,
and postcrisis recovery components developed to ensure the maintenance of a
safe learning environment for students and adults. Upon completion of the
comprehensive safe school plans, and by December 1st of every year thereafter,
school districts shall report to the superintendent of public instruction
whether schools in its district have developed comprehensive safe school
plans. The superintendent of public instruction shall annually report to the
state board of education and the education committees of the house of
representatives and senate on school districts' comprehensive safe school
planning.

---
END ---