BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.280 and 1999 c
167 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
a person to carry onto, or to possess on, public or private elementary or
secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of
facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools:

(a) Any firearm;

(b) Any other dangerous
weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;

(c) Any device commonly
known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of two or more lengths of
wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance connected with wire, rope, or other
means;

(d) Any device, commonly
known as "throwing stars", which are multi-pointed, metal objects
designed to embed upon impact from any aspect; or

(e) Any air gun,
including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB, pellet, or
other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other
gas.

(2) Any such person
violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If
any person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section,
the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked for a
period of three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited
from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years. The
court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of licensing, and
the city, town, or county which issued the license.

Any violation of
subsection (1) of this section by elementary or secondary school students
constitutes grounds for expulsion from the state's public schools in accordance
with RCW 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall promptly notify
law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding any allegation
or indication of such violation.

Upon the arrest of a
person at least ((twelve)) thirteen years of age and not more
than twenty-one years of age for violating subsection (1)(a) of this section,
the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for up
to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be released within the seventy-two
hours until after the person has been examined and evaluated by the ((county-designated
mental health professional)) person or agency designated by the local
regional support network unless the court in its discretion releases the
person sooner after a determination regarding probable cause or on probation
bond or bail.

Within twenty-four
hours of the arrest, the arresting law enforcement agency shall refer the
person to the ((county-designated mental health professional for examination
and evaluation under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW)) person or agency
designated by the local regional support network to conduct a mental health
examination and evaluation and inform a parent or guardian of the person of
the arrest, detention, and examination. ((The county-designated mental
health professional shall examine and evaluate the person subject to the
provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.)) Notification to the parent
or guardian shall occur prior to any examination or evaluation by the person or
agency designated by the local regional support network. The examination and
evaluation shall occur within twenty-four hours of receiving the referral.
The examination shall occur at the facility in which the person is detained or
confined. If the person has been released on probation((,)) bond((,))
or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

The ((county-designated
mental health professional)) person or agency designated by the local
regional support network may, when appropriate, determine whether to
refer the person to the county-designated mental health professional or the
county-designated chemical dependency specialist for examination and evaluation
for commitment proceedings in accordance with chapter 71.05, 71.34,
or 70.96A RCW. When a referral is made by the person or agency
designated by the local regional support network, the county-designated mental
health professional or the county-designated chemical dependency specialist
shall examine the person subject to the provisions of chapter 71.05, 71.34,
or 70.96A RCW within twenty-four hours of receiving the referral.
The examination shall occur at the facility in which the person is detained or
confined. If the person has been released on probation((,)) bond((,))
or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

Upon completion of any
examination by the person or agency designated by the local regional support
network, the county-designated mental health professional, or the
county-designated chemical dependency specialist, the results of the
examination shall be sent to the court with jurisdiction, the school, the
parents, and to the person if eighteen years of age or older, and the court
shall consider those results in making any determination about the person. However,
any reference in the examination report or reports to facts or circumstances of
the alleged acts which resulted in the arrest of the person shall not be
admissible in any criminal or juvenile proceeding if the person was
unrepresented by counsel at the time of the examination, or had not been
arraigned prior to the examination.

The person or agency
designated by the local regional support network, the county-designated
mental health professional, and the county-designated chemical
dependency specialist shall((, to the extent permitted by law,)) notify
a parent or guardian of the person, if the person is under the age of
eighteen, that an examination and evaluation has taken place and the
results of the examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery
of additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while the
person is detained or confined.

If the ((county-designated
mental health professional)) person or agency designated by the local
regional support network determines it is appropriate, the ((county-designated
mental health professional)) person or agency designated by the local
regional support network may refer the person to the local regional support
network for follow-up services or the department of social and health services
or other community providers for other services to the family and individual.

(3) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to:

(a) Any student or
employee of a private military academy when on the property of the academy;

(b) Any person engaged
in military, law enforcement, or school district security activities;

(c) Any person who is
involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety
course authorized by school authorities in which the firearms of collectors or
instructors are handled or displayed;

(d) Any person while
the person is participating in a firearms or air gun competition approved by
the school or school district;

(e) Any person in
possession of a pistol who has been issued a license under RCW 9.41.070, or is
exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or
dropping off a student;

(f) Any nonstudent at
least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a firearm or dangerous
weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or concealed from view within
a locked unattended vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school;

(g) Any nonstudent at
least eighteen years of age who is in lawful possession of an unloaded firearm,
secured in a vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school; or

(h) Any law enforcement
officer of the federal, state, or local government agency.

(4) Subsections (1)(c)
and (d) of this section do not apply to any person who possesses nun-chu-ka
sticks, throwing stars, or other dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts
classes authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

(5) Except as provided
in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of this section, firearms are not
permitted in a public or private school building.

(6) "GUN-FREE
ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities giving warning of the
prohibition of the possession of firearms on school grounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.61 RCW to read as follows:

Upon the arrest of a
person at least thirteen years of age and not more than twenty-one years of age
for violating RCW 9.61.160 by making a threat to bomb, on public or private
elementary or secondary school premises, school provided transportation, or
areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools,
the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for up
to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be released within the seventy-two
hours until after the person has been examined and evaluated by the person or
agency designated by the local regional support network unless the court in its
discretion releases the person sooner after a determination regarding probable
cause or on probation bond or bail.

Within twenty-four
hours of the arrest, the arresting law enforcement agency shall refer the
person to the person or agency designated by the local regional support network
to conduct a mental health examination and evaluation and inform a parent or
guardian of the person of the arrest, detention, and examination. Notification
to the parent or guardian shall occur prior to any examination or evaluation by
the person or agency designated by the local regional support network. The
examination and evaluation shall occur within twenty-four hours of receiving
the referral. The examination shall occur at the facility in which the person
is detained or confined. If the person has been released on probation bond or
bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

The person or agency
designated by the local regional support network may, when appropriate, determine
whether to refer the person to the county-designated mental health professional
or the county-designated chemical dependency specialist for examination and
evaluation for commitment proceedings in accordance with chapter 71.05, 71.34,
or 70.96A RCW. When a referral is made by the person or agency designated by
the local regional support network, the county-designated mental health
professional or the county-designated chemical dependency specialist shall
examine the person subject to the provisions of chapter 71.05, 71.34, or 70.96A
RCW within twenty-four hours of receiving the referral. The examination shall
occur at the facility in which the person is detained or confined. If the
person has been released on probation bond or bail, the examination shall occur
wherever is appropriate.

Upon completion of any
examination by the person or agency designated by the local regional support
network, the county-designated mental health professional, or the
county-designated chemical dependency specialist, the results of the
examination shall be sent to the court with jurisdiction, the school, the
parents, and to the person if eighteen years of age or older, and the court
shall consider those results in making any determination about the person.
However, any reference in the examination report or reports to facts or
circumstances of the alleged acts which resulted in the arrest of the person
shall not be admissible in any criminal or juvenile proceeding if the person
was unrepresented by counsel at the time of the examination, or had not been
arraigned prior to the examination.

The person or agency
designated by the local regional support network, the county-designated mental
health professional, and the county-designated chemical dependency specialist
shall notify a parent or guardian of the person, if the person is under the age
of eighteen, that an examination and evaluation has taken place and the results
of the examination. Nothing in this section prohibits the delivery of
additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while the
person is detained or confined.

If the person or agency
designated by the local regional support network determines it is appropriate,
the person or agency designated by the local regional support network may refer
the person to the local regional support network for follow-up services or the
department of social and health services or other community providers for other
services to the family and individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 9A.48 RCW to read as follows:

Upon the arrest of a
person at least thirteen years of age and not more than twenty-one years of age
for violating RCW 9A.48.020 relating to arson in the first degree or RCW
9A.48.030 relating to arson in the second degree, on public or private
elementary or secondary school premises, school provided transportation, or
areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools,
the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for up
to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be released within the seventy-two
hours until after the person has been examined and evaluated by the person or
agency designated by the local regional support network unless the court in its
discretion releases the person sooner after a determination regarding probable
cause or on probation bond or bail.

Within twenty-four
hours of the arrest, the arresting law enforcement agency shall refer the
person to the person or agency designated by the local regional support network
to conduct a mental health examination and evaluation and inform a parent or
guardian of the person of the arrest, detention, and examination. Notification
to the parent or guardian shall occur prior to any examination or evaluation by
the person or agency designated by the local regional support network. The
examination and evaluation shall occur within twenty-four hours of receiving
the referral. The examination shall occur at the facility in which the person is
detained or confined. If the person has been released on probation bond or
bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

The person or agency
designated by the local regional support network may, when appropriate,
determine whether to refer the person to the county-designated mental health
professional or the county-designated chemical dependency specialist for
examination and evaluation for commitment proceedings in accordance with
chapter 71.05, 71.34, or 70.96A RCW. When a referral is made by the person or
agency designated by the local regional support network, the county-designated
mental health professional or the county-designated chemical dependency
specialist shall examine the person subject to the provisions of chapter 71.05,
71.34, or 70.96A RCW within twenty-four hours of receiving the referral. The
examination shall occur at the facility in which the person is detained or
confined. If the person has been released on probation bond or bail, the
examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

Upon completion of any
examination by the person or agency designated by the local regional support
network, the county-designated mental health professional, or the
county-designated chemical dependency specialist, the results of the examination
shall be sent to the court with jurisdiction, the school, the parents, and to
the person if eighteen years of age or older, and the court shall consider
those results in making any determination about the person. However, any
reference in the examination report or reports to facts or circumstances of the
alleged acts which resulted in the arrest of the person shall not be admissible
in any criminal or juvenile proceeding if the person was unrepresented by
counsel at the time of the examination, or had not been arraigned prior to the
examination.

The person or agency
designated by the local regional support network, the county-designated mental
health professional, and the county-designated chemical dependency specialist
shall notify a parent or guardian of the person, if the person is under the age
of eighteen, that an examination and evaluation has taken place and the results
of the examination. Nothing in this section prohibits the delivery of
additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while the
person is detained or confined.

If the
person or agency designated by the local regional support network determines it
is appropriate, the person or agency designated by the local regional support
network may refer the person to the local regional support network for
follow-up services or the department of social and health services or other
community providers for other services to the family and individual.

---
END ---