BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.600.310 and 1994
c 205 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Eleventh and
twelfth grade students or students who have not yet received a high school
diploma or its equivalent and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth
grades may apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll
in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education.
However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in
participating universities only if the board of directors of the student's
school district has decided to participate in the program. Participating
institutions of higher education, in consultation with school districts, may
establish admission standards for these students. If the institution of higher
education accepts a secondary school pupil for enrollment under this section,
the institution of higher education shall send written notice to the pupil and
the pupil's school district within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall
indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that pupil. If a pupil
under this section does not maintain a minimum of a 2.0 grade point average, or
the equivalent, in a course or program offered by an institution of higher
education, the high school principal may revoke the pupil's eligibility to
participate in the program under this section.

(2) The
pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution of higher education
an amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide uniform
rates for vocational and nonvocational students. The superintendent of public
instruction shall separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for
basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of
making such payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall be based
upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time equivalent high
school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school
enhancements, and applicable rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The
superintendent of public instruction, the higher education coordinating board, and
the state board for community and technical colleges shall consult on the
calculation and distribution of the funds. The institution of higher education
shall not require the pupil to pay any other fees. The funds received by the
institution of higher education from the school district shall not be deemed
tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher
education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall not be counted for
the purpose of determining any enrollment restrictions imposed by the state on
the institution of higher education.

--- END ---