BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 28B.15

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 The governing boards of the state universities,
regional

_8 universities, and The Evergreen State College may not
set or

_9 adjust tuition fees for full-time students, except
during the

10 summer term.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5547