BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.50.020 and 1995 c
69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Applicant"
means any person who makes application for a site certification pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter;

(2)
"Application" means any request for approval of a particular site or
sites filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires;

(3) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation,
association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal
corporation, government agency, public utility district, or any other entity,
public or private, however organized;

(4) "Site"
means any proposed or approved location of an energy facility;

(5)
"Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant and
the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines, in effect as
of the date of certification, which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040
as now or hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or concurrent with
the construction or operation of any energy facility;

(6) "Associated
facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or other related and
supporting facilities connecting an energy plant with the existing energy
supply, processing, or distribution system, including, but not limited to,
communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment, instrumentation,
and other types of ancillary transmission equipment, off-line storage or
venting required for efficient operation or safety of the transmission system
and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the
inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and
new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages in excess of
200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest power grid:
PROVIDED, That common carrier railroads or motor vehicles shall not be
included;

(7) "Transmission
facility" means any of the following together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Crude or refined
petroleum or liquid petroleum product transmission pipeline of the following
dimensions: A pipeline larger than six inches minimum inside diameter between
valves for the transmission of these products with a total length of at least
fifteen miles;

(b) Natural gas,
synthetic fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas transmission pipeline of the
following dimensions: A pipeline larger than fourteen inches minimum inside
diameter between valves, for the transmission of these products, with a total
length of at least fifteen miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a
distribution facility, except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by
the United States federal power commission;

(8) "Independent
consultants" means those persons who have no financial interest in the
applicant's proposals and who are retained by the council to evaluate the
applicant's proposals, supporting studies, or to conduct additional studies;

(9) "Thermal power
plant" means, for the purpose of certification, any electrical generating
facility using any fuel, including nuclear materials, for distribution of
electricity by electric utilities;

(10) "Energy
facility" means an energy plant or transmission facilities: PROVIDED,
That the following are excluded from the provisions of this chapter:

(a) Facilities for the
extraction, conversion, transmission or storage of water, other than water
specifically consumed or discharged by energy production or conversion for
energy purposes; and

(b) Facilities operated
by and for the armed services for military purposes or by other federal
authority for the national defense;

(11)
"Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council created
by RCW 80.50.030;

(12) "Counsel for
the environment" means an assistant attorney general or a special
assistant attorney general who shall represent the public in accordance with
RCW 80.50.080;

(13)
"Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding exploratory
work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars;

(14) "Energy
plant" means the following facilities together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Any stationary
thermal power plant with generating capacity of ((two)) six
hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum continuous
electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and pressure, and floating thermal power plants of fifty thousand
kilowatts or more, including associated facilities;

(b) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive liquified natural gas in the equivalent of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per day, which
has been transported over marine waters;

(c) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive more than an average of fifty thousand
barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum or liquified petroleum gas which
has been or will be transported over marine waters, except that the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such
new facility construction;

(d) Any underground
reservoir for receipt and storage of natural gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010
capable of delivering an average of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day; and

(e) Facilities capable
of processing more than twenty-five thousand barrels per day of petroleum into
refined products;

(15) "Land use
plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element thereof adopted by a
unit of local government pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW;

(16) "Zoning ordinance"
means an ordinance of a unit of local government regulating the use of land and
adopted pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW or Article XI of the
state Constitution.

Sec. 2. RCW 80.50.060 and 1977
ex.s. c 371 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall apply to the construction of energy facilities which
includes the new construction of energy facilities and the reconstruction or
enlargement of existing energy facilities where the net increase in physical
capacity or dimensions resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets
or exceeds those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (((17)))
(14), as now or hereafter amended. No construction of such energy
facilities may be undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
after July 15, 1977, without first obtaining certification in the manner
provided in this chapter.

(2) The provisions
of this chapter apply to the construction of any new energy facility or the
reconstruction or enlargement of any existing energy facility if the person
responsible for the project chooses to utilize the process established in this
chapter, regardless of the generating capacity of the project.

(3) The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal maintenance and repairs
which do not increase the capacity or dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW
80.50.020 (7) and (((17))) (14), as now or hereafter amended.

(((3))) (4)
Applications for certification of energy facilities made prior to July 15, 1977,
shall continue to be governed by the applicable provisions of law in effect on
the day immediately preceding July 15, 1977, with the exceptions of RCW
80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which shall apply to such prior applications and to
site certifications prospectively from July 15, 1977.

(((4))) (5)
Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed by the council
and shall be supported by such information and technical studies as the council
may require.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

The council may only
develop rules, policies, procedures, guidelines, or operating protocols that
are based directly on state statutory or administrative code authority. A site
certification agreement may not require compliance with air quality, water
quality, or health protection measures unless the compliance is based on
standards required by state statute or the Washington Administrative Code.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---