BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.80.030 and 1989 c
133 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the local
governing body of a municipality finds that one or more conditions of the
character described in RCW 35.80.010 exist within its territorial limits, said
governing body may adopt ordinances relating to such dwellings, buildings,
structures, or premises. Such ordinances may provide for the following:

(a) That an
"improvement board" or officer be designated or appointed to exercise
the powers assigned to such board or officer by the ordinance as specified
herein. Said board or officer may be an existing municipal board or officer in
the municipality, or may be a separate board or officer appointed solely for
the purpose of exercising the powers assigned by said ordinance.

If a board is created,
the ordinance shall specify the terms, method of appointment, and type of
membership of said board, which may be limited, if the local governing body
chooses, to public officers as herein defined.

(b) If a board is
created, a public officer, other than a member of the improvement board, may be
designated to work with the board and carry out the duties and exercise the
powers assigned to said public officer by the ordinance.

(c) That if, after a
preliminary investigation of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises,
the board or officer finds that it is unfit for human habitation or other use,
((he)) it shall cause to be served either personally or by
certified mail, with return receipt requested, upon all persons having any
interest therein, as shown upon the records of the auditor's office of the
county in which such property is located, and shall post in a conspicuous place
on such property, a complaint stating in what respects such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises is unfit for human habitation or other use. If the
whereabouts of any of such persons is unknown and the same cannot be
ascertained by the board or officer in the exercise of reasonable diligence,
and the board or officer makes an affidavit to that effect, then the serving of
such complaint or order upon such persons may be made either by personal
service or by mailing a copy of the complaint and order by certified mail,
postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to each such person at the address
of the building involved in the proceedings, and mailing a copy of the
complaint and order by first class mail to any address of each such person in
the records of the county assessor or the county auditor for the county where
the property is located. Such complaint shall contain a notice that a hearing
will be held before the board or officer, at a place therein fixed, not less
than ten days nor more than thirty days after the serving of said complaint;
and that all parties in interest shall be given the right to file an answer to
the complaint, to appear in person, or otherwise, and to give testimony at the
time and place in the complaint. The rules of evidence prevailing in courts of
law or equity shall not be controlling in hearings before the board or
officer. A copy of such complaint shall also be filed with the auditor of the
county in which the dwelling, building, structure, or ((premise [premises]))
premises is located, and such filing of the complaint or order shall
have the same force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law.

(d) That the board or
officer may determine that a dwelling, building, structure, or premises is
unfit for human habitation or other use if it finds that conditions exist in
such dwelling, building, structure, or premises which are dangerous or
injurious to the health or safety of the occupants of such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises, the occupants of neighboring dwellings, or other
residents of such municipality. Such conditions may include the following,
without limitations: Defects therein increasing the hazards of fire or
accident; inadequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities, dilapidation,
disrepair, structural defects, uncleanliness, overcrowding, or inadequate drainage.
The ordinance shall state reasonable and minimum standards covering such
conditions, including those contained in ordinances adopted in accordance with
subdivision (7)(a) herein, to guide the board or the public officer and the
agents and employees of either, in determining the fitness of a dwelling for
human habitation, or building, structure, or premises for other use.

(e) That the
determination of whether a dwelling, building, structure, or premises should be
repaired or demolished, shall be based on specific stated standards on (i) the
degree of structural deterioration of the dwelling, building, structure, or
premises, or (ii) the relationship that the estimated cost of repair bears to
the value of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, with the method of
determining this value to be specified in the ordinance.

(f) That if, after the
required hearing, the board or officer determines that the dwelling is unfit
for human habitation, or building or structure or premises is unfit for other
use, it shall state in writing its findings of fact in support of such
determination, and shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner or party
in interest thereof, as is provided in subdivision (1)(c), and shall post in a
conspicuous place on said property, an order which (i) requires the owner or
party in interest, within the time specified in the order, to repair, alter, or
improve such dwelling, building, structure, or premises to render it fit for
human habitation, or for other use, or to vacate and close the dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, if such course of action is deemed proper on
the basis of the standards set forth as required in subdivision (1)(e); or (ii)
requires the owner or party in interest, within the time specified in the order,
to remove or demolish such dwelling, building, structure, or premises, if this
course of action is deemed proper on the basis of said standards. If no appeal
is filed, a copy of such order shall be filed with the auditor of the county in
which the dwelling, building, structure, or premises is located.

(g) The owner or any
party in interest, within thirty days from the date of service upon the owner
and posting of an order issued by the board under the provisions of subdivision
(c) of this subsection, may file an appeal with the appeals commission.

The local governing
body of the municipality shall designate or establish a municipal agency to
serve as the appeals commission. The local governing body shall also establish
rules of procedure adequate to assure a prompt and thorough review of matters
submitted to the appeals commission, and such rules of procedure shall include
the following, without being limited thereto: (i) All matters submitted to the
appeals commission must be resolved by the commission within sixty days from
the date of filing therewith and (ii) a transcript of the findings of fact of
the appeals commission shall be made available to the owner or other party in
interest upon demand.

The findings and orders
of the appeals commission shall be reported in the same manner and shall bear
the same legal consequences as if issued by the board, and shall be subject to
review only in the manner and to the extent provided in subdivision (2) of this
section.

If the owner or party
in interest, following exhaustion of his or her rights to appeal, fails
to comply with the final order to repair, alter, improve, vacate, close,
remove, or demolish the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, the board
or officer may direct or cause such dwelling, building, structure, or premises
to be repaired, altered, improved, vacated, and closed, removed, or demolished.

(h) That the amount of
the cost of such repairs, alterations or improvements; or vacating and closing;
or removal or demolition by the board or officer, shall be assessed against the
real property upon which such cost was incurred unless such amount is
previously paid. Upon certification to him or her by the treasurer of
the municipality in cases arising out of the city or town or by the county
improvement board or officer, in cases arising out of the county, of the
assessment amount being due and owing, the county treasurer shall enter the
amount of such assessment upon the tax rolls against the property for the
current year and the same shall become a part of the general taxes for that
year to be collected at the same time and with interest at such rates and in
such manner as provided for in RCW 84.56.020, as now or hereafter amended, for
delinquent taxes, and when collected to be deposited to the credit of the
general fund of the municipality. If the dwelling, building, structure, or
premises is removed or demolished by the board or officer, the board or officer
shall, if possible, sell the materials of such dwelling, building, structure,
(([or])) or premises in accordance with procedures set forth in
said ordinance, and shall credit the proceeds of such sale against the cost of
the removal or demolition and if there be any balance remaining, it shall be
paid to the parties entitled thereto, as determined by the board or officer,
after deducting the costs incident thereto.

The assessment shall
constitute a lien against the property which shall be of equal rank with state,
county and municipal taxes.

(2) Any person affected
by an order issued by the appeals commission pursuant to subdivision (1)(f)
hereof may, within thirty days after the posting and service of the order,
petition to the superior court for an injunction restraining the public officer
or members of the board from carrying out the provisions of the order. In all
such proceedings the court is authorized to affirm, reverse, or modify the
order and such trial shall be heard de novo.

(3) An ordinance
adopted by the local governing body of the municipality may authorize the board
or officer to exercise such powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry
out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this section. These powers
shall include the following in addition to others herein granted: (a)(i) To
determine which dwellings within the municipality are unfit for human
habitation; (ii) to determine which buildings, structures, or premises are
unfit for other use; (b) to administer oaths and affirmations, examine
witnesses and receive evidence; and (c) to investigate the dwelling and other
property conditions in the municipality or county and to enter upon premises
for the purpose of making examinations when the board or officer has reasonable
ground for believing they are unfit for human habitation, or for other use:
PROVIDED, That such entries shall be made in such manner as to cause the least
possible inconvenience to the persons in possession, and to obtain an order for
this purpose after submitting evidence in support of an application which is
adequate to justify such an order from a court of competent jurisdiction in the
event entry is denied or resisted. The superior court and courts of limited
jurisdiction organized under Title 3, 35, or 35A RCW have jurisdiction to issue
such orders.

Upon application,
the court may issue an order to show cause, which, except as provided in this
section, must be served upon the owner or owner's agent and any person in
lawful possession of the premises to be inspected. The order to show cause must
set a date, not less than ten and not more than thirty court days after the
date of the order, for a hearing to determine whether an order should issue
authorizing entry onto and examinations of the property. The order to show
cause must be personally served on the owner or owner's agent and, if
applicable, upon any person in lawful possession of the premises no later than
ten days before the scheduled hearing. If the owner or owner's agent, or the
persons lawfully in possession of the property, cannot be personally served,
service may be effected by posting a copy of the order on the building,
structure, or dwelling and sending a copy of the order certified mail to the
last known address of the owner or owner's agent, if any.

At the hearing, the
agency, the owner or owner's agent, and any occupant may present evidence,
through testimony or declarations. The court shall issue an order authorizing
entry and examinations if it finds reason to believe that the particular
building, structure, or dwelling is unfit for human habitation, according to
the definitions described in subsection (1)(d) of this section.

An order for entry
and examination may be granted without prior hearing or written or oral notice
to the owner, owner's agent, or any lawful occupant of the property if it
clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit that immediate and
irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result before the owner, owner's
agent, or lawful occupant can be heard in opposition, or that there is a
serious probability that compromise of the evidence of violation will result if
the owner, owner's agent, or lawful occupant is notified prior to inspection,
and the applicant for the order certifies to the court in writing the efforts,
if any, which have been made to give the notice and the reasons supporting the
claim that prior hearing and notice should not be required. Every such order
granted without prior hearing and notice must be endorsed with the date and
hour of issuance; must be filed forthwith in the court clerk's office and
entered of record; must define the injury and state why it is irreparable and
why the order was granted without prior hearing and notice; and must expire by
its terms within such time after entry, not to exceed fourteen days, as the court
fixes, unless within the time so fixed the order, for good cause shown, is
extended for a like period or unless the owner, owner's agent, or lawful
occupant of the property against which the order is directed consents that it
may be extended for a longer period.

(4) The local governing
body of any municipality adopting an ordinance pursuant to this chapter may
appropriate the necessary funds to administer such ordinance.

(5) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers of the courts or of
any department of any municipality to enforce any provisions of its charter or
its ordinances or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and
the powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental to the
powers conferred by any other law.

(6) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to impair or limit in any way the power of the
municipality to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or
abatement, by summary proceedings or otherwise.

(7) Any municipality
may (by ordinance adopted by its governing body) (a) prescribe minimum
standards for the use and occupancy of dwellings throughout the municipality,
or county, (b) prescribe minimum standards for the use or occupancy of any
building, structure, or premises used for any other purpose, (c) prevent the
use or occupancy of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises, which is
injurious to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare, and (d) prescribe
punishment for the violation of any provision of such ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever necessary to
make an inspection to enforce any provision of the fire code, or whenever the
chief has reasonable cause to believe that there exists in any building or upon
any premises any condition that violates a state or local fire code, the chief
is authorized to enter such building or premises at all reasonable times to
inspect the same or to perform any duty authorized by the fire code. However,
if such building or premises is occupied, the chief fire official, or his or
her designee, shall first present proper credentials and request entry; and if
such building or premises is unoccupied, the chief shall first make a
reasonable effort to locate the owner or other persons having charge or control
of the building or premises and demand entry.

If the owner or
occupant denies entry, the chief is authorized to obtain a civil or criminal
inspection warrant or other remedy provided by law to secure entry. A judge of
the superior court or of a court of limited jurisdiction organized under Title
3, 35, or 35A RCW has authority to issue a civil or criminal inspection
warrant.

If the chief reasonably
believes that the fire code violation does not constitute a crime but is a
civil infraction, the chief shall apply to the court for an order to enter and
make examination under RCW 35.80.030(3) or section 3 of this act. The court
shall issue an order authorizing entry if, after the hearing, the court finds
reason to believe a condition exists that violates a state or local fire code.

For the purposes of
this section, "chief" includes the chief officer of the fire
department serving the jurisdiction and his or her designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 2.28 RCW to read as follows:

If probable cause
exists to believe that conditions on a property or in a particular building or
premises pose a serious threat to life or safety of the occupants or neighbors,
public health or safety, or the environment, in violation of a state or local
law, the government officer or agency with authority to enforce the state or
local law may apply to the superior court or a court of limited jurisdiction
organized under Title 3, 35, or 35A RCW within the jurisdiction in which the
property, building, or premises is located for an order to show cause why the
government or officer agency should not be authorized to enter and inspect the
property, building, or premises.

Upon application, the
court may issue an order to show cause, which must be served upon the owner,
owner's agent, and any occupant of the property, building, or premises. The
order to show cause must set a date, not less than ten and not more than thirty
court days after the date of the order, for a hearing to determine whether an
order should issue authorizing entry and inspection of the property. The order
to show cause must be served on the owner, owner's agent, and, if applicable,
any person having lawful possession of the property, no later than ten court
days before the scheduled hearing. If the owner or owner's agent or the person
having lawful possession of the property cannot be personally served, service may
be effected by posting a copy of the order on the building, structure, or
premises and sending a copy of the order by certified mail to the owner's last
known address.

For purposes of this
section, "court day" means any day on which a court is open for the
transaction of administrative business, including but not limited to the
acceptance of papers for filing.

For purposes of this
section, "owner" means the owner of record of real property, except
that if real property is being purchased under a real estate contract, the
purchaser is to be considered the owner of the real property if the contract is
recorded.

At the show cause
hearing, the government officer or agency, the owner or owner's agent, and any
person to whom the order to show cause was directed may present evidence
through testimony or affidavit. The court shall issue an order authorizing
entry and inspection if the court finds that there is reason to believe that
the particular property, building, or premises harbors conditions that pose a serious
threat to life or safety of the occupants, neighbors, public health or safety,
or the environment.

An order for entry and
inspection may be granted without a show cause hearing or notice to the owner,
owner's agent, or any lawful occupant of the property if (1) it clearly appears
from specific facts shown by affidavit that immediate and irreparable injury,
loss, or damage will result before the owner, owner's agent, or lawful occupant
can be heard in opposition, and (2) the applicant for the order certifies to
the court in writing the efforts, if any, which have been made to give the
notice and the reasons supporting the claim that prior hearing and notice
should not be required. Every order granted without prior hearing and notice
must be endorsed with the date and hour of issuance; must be filed forthwith in
the court clerk's office and entered of record; must define the injury and
state why it is irreparable and why the order was granted without prior hearing
and notice; and must expire by its terms within such time after entry, not to
exceed fourteen days, as the court fixes, unless within the time so fixed, the
order, for good cause shown, is extended for a like period or unless the owner,
owner's agent, or lawful occupant of the property against which the order is
directed consents that it may be extended for a longer period.

Nothing in
this section affects any power that any other statute or court rule may grant
to a judicial officer to authorize nonconsensual inspections or searches.

---
END ---