BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.80.805 and 1999
c 320 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
finds that certain tuition policies in Oregon state are more responsive to the
needs of students living in economic regions that cross the state border than
the Washington state policies. Under Oregon policy, students who are Washington
residents may enroll at Portland State University for eight credits or less and
pay the same tuition as Oregon residents. Further, the state of Oregon passed
legislation in 1997 to begin providing to its community colleges the same level
of state funding for students residing in bordering states as students residing
in Oregon.

(2) The legislature
intends to build on the recent Oregon initiatives regarding tuition policy for
students in bordering states and to facilitate regional planning for higher
education delivery by creating a ((pilot)) project on resident tuition
rates in ((four)) Washington counties that border Oregon state.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.80.806 and 2000
c 160 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The border county
higher education opportunity ((pilot)) project is created. The purpose
of the ((pilot)) project is to allow ((four)) Washington
institutions of higher education that are located in ((four)) counties
on the Oregon border to implement((, on a trial basis,)) tuition
policies that correspond to Oregon policies. Under the border county ((pilot))
project, Columbia Basin Community College, Clark College, Lower Columbia
Community College, Grays Harbor Community College, and ((Clark)) Walla
Walla Community College may enroll students who reside in the bordering
Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop,
Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, and
Washington at resident tuition rates. The Tri-Cities and Vancouver ((branch))
branches of Washington State University may enroll students who reside
in the bordering Oregon counties of Columbia, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow,
Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, and Washington for eight credits or less at resident
tuition rates.

(2) Washington
institutions of higher education participating in the ((pilot)) project
shall give priority program enrollment to Washington residents.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.15.0139 and 2000
c 160 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
determining resident tuition rates, "resident student" includes a
resident of Oregon, residing in Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River,
Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa,
Wasco, or Washington county, who meets the following conditions:

(1) The student is
eligible to pay resident tuition rates under Oregon laws and has been domiciled
in Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow,
Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington county for at least
ninety consecutive days immediately before enrollment at a community college
located in Asotin, Benton, Clark, Columbia, Cowlitz, Franklin,
Garfield, Klickitat, Pacific, Skamania, Wahkiakum, or ((Pacific)) Walla
Walla county, Washington; or

(2) The student is
enrolled in courses located at the Tri-Cities or Vancouver branch of
Washington State University for eight credits or less.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) 1999 c 320 s 6 (uncodified)
is repealed.

(2) 2000 c
160 s 4 (uncodified) is repealed.

---
END ---