BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The public policy of the
state of Washington with regard to gambling activities is to keep the criminal
element out of these activities and to promote the social welfare of the people
by limiting the nature and scope of gambling activities by strict regulation
and control. The legislature finds that while the gambling commission, the
lottery commission, and the horse racing commission currently perform those
functions independently of each other, there are many issues common to all that
are handled differently by each. This may affect both the public safety and
welfare, and the potential for industry participants to be subject to multiple
regulation. Each year, industry participants seek the authority to offer a
broader range of gambling activities, and consolidating and simplifying
regulatory processes may benefit the industries as well as the public.

With the growth of
gambling industries and the potential for violations of laws and rules
resulting in harm to people and local communities, strong state regulation and
oversight is necessary to protect all interests involved. Therefore, the
legislature intends to study the feasibility and benefits of a state-level
single regulatory scheme.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A task force shall be
convened to conduct a study of whether to combine the gambling commission, the
lottery commission, and the horse racing commission into a single commission
charged with regulating all gambling in Washington.

(2) The task force
shall consist of the following members:

(a) The chair of the
senate committee on labor, commerce and financial institutions, who shall chair
the task force;

(b) Two legislators
from the senate committee on labor, commerce and financial institutions, one
each selected by the ranking member from each major party on that committee;

(c) Two legislators
from the house of representatives committee on commerce and labor, one selected
by each co-chair;

(d) The chairs of the
gambling commission, the lottery commission, and the horse racing commission;

(e) The executive
director of the Washington Indian gaming association;

(f) One representative
from nonprofit gaming industry, selected by the chair of the gambling
commission;

(g) One representative
of the cardroom industry, selected by the chair of the gambling commission;

(h) One representative
of for-profit establishments authorized to have punchboards and pull-tabs,
selected by the gambling commission;

(i) A representative of
the council on problem gambling, selected by the chair of the gambling
commission;

(j) One representative
of lottery retailers, selected by the chair of the lottery commission;

(k) One representative
of lottery vendors, selected by the chair of the lottery commission;

(l) One representative
from each of the class 1 racing associations in Washington;

(m) A representative of
the attorney general's office; and

(n) A representative of
the governor's office.

(3) The task force
shall consider:

(a) The feasibility of
one regulatory body governing all gambling activities;

(b) Any economic
benefits, including cost-efficiency;

(c) The likelihood of
improved protection of the public;

(d) Whether there would
be benefits to consolidating background investigation and business practices;

(e) The potential
effects of centralizing decision-making processes and enforcement; and

(f) Whether there would
be benefits to consistency in regulatory practices and administration.

(4) The task force
shall report its findings and recommendations to the senate committee on labor,
commerce and financial institutions and the house of representatives committee
on commerce and labor by December 1, 2001.

(5) This
section expires March 31, 2002.

---
END ---