BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that economic development, work force training, international trade, tourism
development, housing assistance, assistance to local governments, and other
programs and services provided by the department of community, trade, and economic
development are vital to all regions of the state. The legislature further
finds that program development and service delivery to the eastern region of
the state could be significantly enhanced by a continuous, full-time physical
staff presence in that region.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. For the purposes of this
act:

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development, or its successor agency or agencies.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. In order to more
effectively respond to the needs of eastern Washington communities, the
department shall, as soon as practicable, establish a field office and a
full-time staff presence in eastern Washington. If practicable, the office
shall be colocated with one or more existing state agencies in the Tri-Cities
area to facilitate the urgent economic development needs of southeastern
Washington. This office shall be staffed by the director in the most
efficient manner that is likely to provide improved service to eastern
Washington communities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Program activities and
priorities for this office serving eastern Washington shall be determined by
the director, in consultation with local government officials, business, labor,
and educational advisors from the region.

---
END ---