BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
42.17.128 and 1993 c 2 s 24 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Public funds, whether derived through taxes, fees,
penalties,

_7 or any other sources, shall not be used to finance
political

_8 campaigns for state or local office or for the
promotion of or

_9 opposition to any ballot proposition.

10 Sec. 2. RCW
42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended

11 to read as follows:

12 (1) No elective official nor any employee of
his or her office

13 nor any person appointed to or employed by any public
office or

14 agency may use or authorize the use of any of the
facilities of a

15 public office or agency, directly or indirectly, for the
purpose

16 of assisting a campaign for election of any person to
any office

17 or for the promotion of or opposition to any ballot
proposition.

p. 1 SSB
5556

_1 Facilities of public office or agency include, but are
not limited

_2 to, funds, use of stationery, postage, machines,
and equipment,

_3 use of employees of the office or agency during working
hours,

_4 vehicles, office space, publications of the office or
agency, and

_5 clientele lists of persons served by the office or

_6 agency: PROVIDED, That the foregoing provisions of this
section

_7 shall not apply to the following activities:

_8 (((1))) (a) Action taken at an open
public meeting by members

_9 of an elected legislative body to express a collective
decision,

10 or to actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution,
order, or

11 ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition
so long as

12 (((a))) (i) any required notice of the
meeting includes the title

13 and number of the ballot proposition, and (((b)))
(ii) members of

14 the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an

15 approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing

16 view;

17 (((2))) (b) A statement by an elected
official in support of or

18 in opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press

19 conference or in response to a specific inquiry;

20 (((3))) (c) Activities which are part
of the normal and regular

21 conduct of the office or agency.

22 (2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this
subsection an

23 association or nonprofit corporation that has a
majority of

24 officers or members who are public officials and that
derives more

25 than twenty-five percent of its income from dues,
assessments, or

26 membership fees paid with public funds may not
provide any

27 financial support or use of their facilities to a
political

28 committee, to a candidate for public office, or to
promote or

29 oppose a ballot proposition.

30 (b) The prohibitions in (a) of this subsection do
not apply to

31 an action at an open public meeting to express a
collective

32 decision or position or to prepare and disseminate
factual

33 information relating to specific ballot propositions.

34 (3) The entities described in subsection (2) of
this section

35 are subject to the public disclosure requirements of
chapter 42.17

36 RCW.

37

SSB 5556 p. 2

_1 Sec. 3. RCW
42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to

_2 read as follows:

_3 (1) No state officer or state employee may use or
authorize the

_4 use of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly,
for the

_5 purpose of assisting a campaign for election of a person
to an

_6 office or for the promotion of or opposition to a ballot

_7 proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a person with
authority to

_8 direct, control, or influence the actions of the state
officer or

_9 state employee using public resources in violation of
this section

10 constitutes a violation of this section. Facilities of
an agency

11 include, but are not limited to, use of stationery,
postage,

12 machines, and equipment, use of state employees of the agency

13 during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the

14 agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the
agency.

15 (2) This section shall not apply to the following
activities:

16 (a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members
of an

17 elected legislative body to express a collective
decision, or to

18 actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution,
order, or

19 ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition
as long as

20 (i) required notice of the meeting includes the title
and number

21 of the ballot proposition, and (ii) members of the
legislative

22 body or members of the public are afforded an
approximately equal

23 opportunity for the expression of an opposing view;

24 (b) A statement by an elected official in support of
or in

25 opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press
conference

26 or in response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes
of this

27 subsection, it is not a violation of this section for an
elected

28 official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot
proposition,

29 to make incidental remarks concerning a ballot
proposition in an

30 official communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot

31 proposition without an actual, measurable expenditure of
public

32 funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule a
definition of

33 measurable expenditure;

34 (c) Activities that are part of the normal and
regular conduct

35 of the office or agency; and

36 (d) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide
elected

37 officials and legislators incidental to the preparation
or

38 delivery of permissible communications, including
written and

p. 3 SSB
5556

_1 verbal communications initiated by them of their views
on ballot

_2 propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that
falls

_3 within their constitutional or statutory
responsibilities.

_4 (3) As to state officers and employees, this section
operates

_5 to the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

_6 (4) For the purposes of this section,
"facilities" includes

_7 local government facilities.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SSB 5556 p. 4