BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
46.61.517 and 1987 c 373 s 5 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The refusal of a person to submit to a test of the
((alcoholic

_8 content of)) alcohol concentration and/or the
presence of any drug

_9 in the person's blood or breath under RCW 46.20.308
is admissible

10 into evidence at a subsequent criminal trial.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

12 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

13 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

14 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SSB
5557