BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Local governments are
subject to increasing mandates to reduce costs and operate more efficiently
with reduced revenues. Audits of local governments are necessary and protect
the public from waste and fraud, but the expense of audits borne by local
governments have continued to increase. Current law does not allow for
competition and innovation from the private sector as a tool to streamline
governmental audits.

The legislature finds
that in order to reduce expenditures by local governments as well as by state
government, private contractors should be allowed to provide auditing services
to local governments when they are able to provide such services at a lower
cost while meeting or exceeding state-mandated performance standards.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.09.260 and 1995 c
301 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The examination of the
financial affairs of all local governments shall be made at such reasonable,
periodic intervals as the state auditor shall determine and pursuant to
standards and guidelines established by the state auditor. However, an
examination of the financial affairs of all local governments shall be made at
least once in every three years, and an examination of individual local
government health and welfare benefit plans and local government self-insurance
programs shall be made at least once every two years. The term local
governments for purposes of this chapter includes but is not limited to all
counties, cities, and other political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and
quasi-municipal corporations, however denominated.

The state auditor shall
establish a schedule to govern the auditing of local governments which shall
include: A designation of the various classifications of local governments; a
designation of the frequency for auditing each type of local government; and a
description of events which cause a more frequent audit to be conducted.

On every such
examination, inquiry shall be made as to the financial condition and resources
of the local government; whether the Constitution and laws of the state, the
ordinances and orders of the local government, and the requirements of the
state auditor have been properly complied with; and into the methods and
accuracy of the accounts and reports.

A report of such
examination shall be made and filed in the office of state auditor, and one
copy shall be transmitted to the local government. A copy of any report
containing findings of noncompliance with state law shall be transmitted to the
attorney general. If any such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or
nonfeasance in office on the part of any public officer or employee, within
thirty days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report, the attorney
general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal action as is proper
in the premises by civil process and prosecute the same to final determination
to carry into effect the findings of the examination.

It shall be unlawful
for any local government or the responsible head thereof, to make a settlement
or compromise of any claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or
nonfeasance, or any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon
any compromise or settlement of such action, without the written approval and
consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.09.280 and 1995 c
301 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The expense of auditing
public accounts shall be borne by each entity subject to such audit for the
auditing of all accounts under its jurisdiction ((and)). The
state auditor shall ((certify)) provide an estimate of the
expense of such audit to the fiscal or warrant-issuing officer of such entity at
least four months in advance of the audit. If the cost of the audit exceeds
the cost of the previous audit of that entity by a percentage that exceeds the
fiscal growth factor as determined under chapter 43.135 RCW, the entity may
contract with a private contractor to perform the audit. The private
contractor must perform the audit and make reports pursuant to the standards
and guidelines established by the state auditor and the requirements of RCW
43.09.260 and 43.09.265. For any audit performed by the state auditor, the
expense of such audit may not exceed the estimate provided pursuant to this
section. If the state auditor conducts the audit, the state auditor shall
certify the expense of such audit to the fiscal or warrant-issuing officer of
such entity, who shall immediately make payment to the state auditor. If
the expense as certified is not paid by any local government within thirty days
from the date of certification, the state auditor may certify the expense to
the auditor of the county in which the local government is situated, who shall
promptly issue his or her warrant on the county treasurer payable out of the
current expense fund of the county, which fund, except as to auditing the
financial affairs and making inspection and examination of the county, shall be
reimbursed by the county auditor or chief financial officer out of the money
due the local government at the next monthly settlement of the collection of
taxes and shall be transferred to the current expense fund.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.09.281 and 1982 c
206 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The state
auditor shall adopt appropriate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, to provide a procedure whereby a ((taxing
district)) local government may appeal charges estimated or
levied under RCW 43.09.280. Such procedure shall provide for an administrative
review process and an external review process which shall be advisory to the
state auditor's office. The number of appeals and their disposition shall be
included in the auditor's annual report.

---
END ---