BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The department of
transportation, in consultation with local officials and residents of the area,
shall conduct a study to determine the feasibility of creating a new
north-south corridor as an alternative to state route 5 and state route 405,
which would run from approximately the Canadian Border in the northern portion
of the state to approximately Lewis county in the southern portion of the
state. The study will be known as the middle Washington corridor study, and
the department shall report to the legislature, no later than December 31,
2002, on the feasibility of financing and constructing such a corridor, taking
into consideration:

(1) Anticipated present
and future freight demand, including freight traffic relief that may be
afforded existing state highway and rail routes by the creation of such an
alternative north-south corridor;

(2) Anticipated present
and future general purpose traffic demand, including general purpose traffic
relief that may be afforded existing state highway routes by the creation of
such an alternative north-south corridor;

(3) A cost-benefit
analysis detailing various funding possibilities, including but not limited to
construction and operation of the corridor as a toll facility;

(4) A cost-benefit
analysis detailing possible right-of-way locations, including but not limited
to property donations, trades, or credits between or among the public and
private sector; and

(5) Possible private
sector, local, or other partnerships that may be used to fund the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The sum of two hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the motor vehicle fund to the
department of transportation for the middle Washington corridor study.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---