BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The board of trustees of
a rural intercounty library district prepares the budget upon which the
property tax levy rate is determined, and the amount of this rate could cause a
fire protection district or a cemetery district to be unfunded. To enhance the
trustees' accountability to the people they serve, the legislature intends for
trustees to be directly elected by the voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

On January 1, 2002,
intercounty rural library districts in counties having a population over one
million persons shall dissolve their boards of trustees on the date of the next
municipal general election and shall hold an election at that municipal general
election to elect seven nonpartisan library directors to serve four-year
staggered terms. Candidates shall run for specific positions. A primary shall
not be held to nominate candidates for intercounty rural library district
directors. The staggering of terms of members of the intercounty rural library
district directors shall be established at this election, where the four
persons elected as library directors receiving the greatest numbers of votes
shall be elected to four-year terms of office and the remainder of the persons
elected as library directors shall be elected to two-year terms of office.
Newly elected library directors shall serve until their successors are elected
and qualified. Library directors who are elected subsequently shall be elected
to four-year terms of office and shall serve until their successors are elected
and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170. Vacancies
shall be filled in accordance with RCW 42.12.070.

Sec. 3. RCW 27.12.130 and 1959 c
133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Immediately
following the establishment of an intercounty rural library district the boards
of county commissioners of the counties affected shall jointly appoint a board
of five or seven trustees for the district in accordance with RCW 27.12.190.))
The board of trustees shall appoint a librarian for the district.

Sec. 4. RCW 27.12.190 and 1982 c
123 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The management and
control of a library shall be vested in a board of either five or seven
trustees as hereinafter in this section provided. In cities and towns five
trustees shall be appointed by the mayor with the consent of the legislative
body. In counties, rural county library districts, and island library
districts, five trustees shall be appointed by the board of county
commissioners. In a regional library district a board of either five or seven
trustees shall be appointed by the joint action of the legislative bodies
concerned. ((In intercounty rural library districts a board of either five
or seven trustees shall be appointed by the joint action of the boards of county
commissioners of each of the counties included in a district. The first
appointments for boards comprised of but five trustees shall be for terms of
one, two, three, four, and five years respectively, and thereafter a trustee
shall be appointed annually to serve for five years. The first appointments
for boards comprised of seven trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three,
four, five, six, and seven years respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall
be appointed annually to serve for seven years. No person shall be appointed
to any board of trustees for more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies shall
be filled for unexpired terms as soon as possible in the manner in which
members of the board are regularly chosen.))

A library trustee shall
not receive a salary or other compensation for services as trustee, but
necessary expenses actually incurred shall be paid from the library funds.

A library
trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed only by vote of the
legislative body. A trustee of a county library, a rural county library
district library, or an island library district library may be removed for just
cause by the county commissioners after a public hearing upon a written
complaint stating the ground for removal, which complaint, with a notice of the
time and place of hearing, shall have been served upon the trustee at least
fifteen days before the hearing. ((A trustee of an intercounty rural
library district may be removed by the joint action of the board of county
commissioners of the counties involved in the same manner as provided herein
for the removal of a trustee of a county library.))

---
END ---