BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.308 and 1993 c
187 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(a) A controlled
substance may be dispensed only as provided in this section.

(b) Except when
dispensed directly by a practitioner authorized to prescribe or administer a
controlled substance, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, a substance
included in Schedule II may not be dispensed without the written prescription
of a practitioner.

(1) Schedule II
narcotic substances may be dispensed by a pharmacy pursuant to a facsimile
prescription under the following circumstances:

(i) The facsimile
prescription is transmitted by a practitioner to the pharmacy; and

(ii) The facsimile
prescription is for a patient in a long-term care facility. "Long-term
care facility" means nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW,
boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, and adult family homes
licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; or

(iii) The facsimile
prescription is for a patient of a hospice care program certified or paid for
by medicare under Title XVIII; or

(iv) The facsimile
prescription is for a patient of a hospice program licensed by the state; and

(v) The practitioner
or the practitioner's agent notes on the facsimile prescription that the
patient is a long-term care or hospice patient.

(2) Injectable
Schedule II narcotic substances that are to be compounded for patient use may
be dispensed by a pharmacy pursuant to a facsimile prescription if the
facsimile prescription is transmitted by a practitioner to the pharmacy.

(3) Under (1) and
(2) of this subsection the facsimile prescription shall serve as the original
prescription and shall be maintained as other Schedule II narcotic substances
prescriptions.

(c) In emergency
situations, as defined by rule of the state board of pharmacy, a substance included
in Schedule II may be dispensed upon oral prescription of a practitioner,
reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacy. Prescriptions shall be
retained in conformity with the requirements of RCW 69.50.306. A prescription
for a substance included in Schedule II may not be refilled.

(d) Except when
dispensed directly by a practitioner authorized to prescribe or administer a
controlled substance, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, a substance
included in Schedule III or IV, which is a prescription drug as determined
under RCW 69.04.560, may not be dispensed without a written or oral
prescription of a practitioner. Any oral prescription must be promptly reduced
to writing. The prescription shall not be filled or refilled more than six
months after the date thereof or be refilled more than five times, unless
renewed by the practitioner.

(e) A valid
prescription or lawful order of a practitioner, in order to be effective in
legalizing the possession of controlled substances, must be issued in good
faith for a legitimate medical purpose by one authorized to prescribe the use
of such controlled substance. An order purporting to be a prescription not in
the course of professional treatment is not a valid prescription or lawful
order of a practitioner within the meaning and intent of this chapter; and the
person who knows or should know that the person is filling such an order, as
well as the person issuing it, can be charged with a violation of this chapter.

(f) A substance
included in Schedule V must be distributed or dispensed only for a medical
purpose.

(g) A practitioner may
dispense or deliver a controlled substance to or for an individual or animal
only for medical treatment or authorized research in the ordinary course of
that practitioner's profession. Medical treatment includes dispensing or
administering a narcotic drug for pain, including intractable pain.

(h) No administrative
sanction, or civil or criminal liability, authorized or created by this chapter
may be imposed on a pharmacist for action taken in reliance on a reasonable
belief that an order purporting to be a prescription was issued by a
practitioner in the usual course of professional treatment or in authorized
research.

(i) An individual
practitioner may not dispense a substance included in Schedule II, III, or IV
for that individual practitioner's personal use.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.307 (Order forms) and 1971
ex.s. c 308 s 69.50.307 are each repealed.

---
END ---