BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Marine aquaculture net
pen facilities in Washington state have accidentally released Atlantic salmon
into Puget Sound. Similar accidents in Canada have resulted in the successful
spawning of Atlantic salmon in indigenous habitat. These events raise concern
about the effect of escaped nonnative species on native fish stocks. It is
necessary to minimize escapes through the implementation of statewide
prevention measures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. For the purposes of this
chapter, "marine aquatic farming location" means a complete complex
that may be composed of various marine enclosures, net pens, or other rearing
vessels, food handling facilities, or other facilities related to the rearing
of Atlantic salmon or other fin fish in marine waters. A marine aquatic
farming location is distinguished from the individual facilities that
collectively compose the location.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The director, in
cooperation with the marine fin fish aquatic farmers, shall develop, implement,
administer, and enforce rules to include the following elements:

(1) Provisions for the
prevention of escapes of cultured marine fin fish aquaculture products from
enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels;

(2) Provisions for the
development and implementation of management plans to facilitate the most rapid
recapture of live marine fin fish aquaculture products that have escaped from
enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels, and to prevent the spread or
permanent escape of these products;

(3) Provisions for the
development of management practices based on the latest available science, to
include:

(a) Procedures for
inspections of marine aquatic farming locations on a regular basis to determine
conformity with law and the rules of the department relating to the operation
of marine aquatic farming locations; and

(b) Operating
procedures at marine aquatic farming locations to prevent the escape of marine
fin fish, to include the use of net antifoulants;

(4) Provisions for the
eradication of those cultured marine fin fish aquaculture products that have
escaped from enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels found spawning in
state waters;

(5) Provisions for the
determination of appropriate species, stocks, and races of marine fin fish
aquaculture products allowed to be cultured at specific locations and sites;

(6) Provisions for the
development of an Atlantic salmon watch program similar to the one in operation
in British Columbia, Canada. The program must provide for the monitoring of
escapes of Atlantic salmon from marine aquatic farming locations, monitor the
occurrence of naturally produced Atlantic salmon, determine the impact of
Atlantic salmon on naturally produced and cultured fin fish stocks, provide a
focal point for consolidation of scientific information, and provide a forum
for interaction and education of the public; and

(7) Provisions for the
development of an education program to assist marine aquatic farmers so that
they operate in an environmentally sound manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Rules to implement this
act shall be adopted by March 1, 2002. The director shall provide a written
report to the legislature by January 1, 2002, on the progress of rule development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

---
END ---