BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.55.075 and 1999 c
398 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
patrol shall provide by rule for a uniform impound authorization and inventory
form. All law enforcement agencies must use this form for all vehicle impounds
after June 30, 2001.

The Washington state
patrol, in consultation with the administrator for the courts, shall provide by
rule a uniform release form to be used by courts or agencies authorizing
release of property from suspended license impounds under RCW 46.55.120(1)(e).
This form must be used to order the release of all vehicles held in suspended
license impounds after October 1, 2002.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.55.110 and 1999 c
398 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When an
unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding towing operator shall notify
the legal and registered owners of the impoundment of the unauthorized vehicle
and the owners of any other items of personal property registered or titled
with the department. The notification shall be sent by first-class mail within
twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and legal
owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department, as provided by the law enforcement
agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of the person or agency
authorizing the impound. The notification shall include the name of the
impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice shall also
include the location, time of the impound, and by whose authority the vehicle
was impounded. The notice shall also include the written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of the impoundment
pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.

(2) In addition, if a
suspended license impound has been ordered, the notice must state the length of
the impound, the requirement of the posting of a security deposit to ensure
payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage, notification that if the
security deposit is not posted the vehicle will immediately be processed and
sold at auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the requirements set out in RCW
46.55.120(1)(((b))) (e) regarding the payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage as well as providing proof of satisfaction of any
penalties, fines, or forfeitures before redemption. The notice must also state
that the registered owner is ineligible to purchase the vehicle at the
abandoned vehicle auction, if held.

(3) In the case of an
abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, within twenty-four hours after receiving information on the
owners from the department through the abandoned vehicle report, the tow truck
operator shall send by certified mail, with return receipt requested, a notice
of custody and sale to the legal and registered owners.

(4) If the date on
which a notice required by subsection (3) of this section is to be mailed falls
upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal holiday, the notice may be mailed on the
next day that is neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal holiday.

(5) No
notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an impounded vehicle
or other item of personal property registered or titled with the department, if
the vehicle or personal property has been redeemed.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.55.120 and 2000 c
193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Vehicles or other
items of personal property registered or titled with the department that are
impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080,
46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140 may be redeemed only under the following
circumstances:

(a) Only the legal
owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by the registered
owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and verified by the
operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department, or one who
has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department from the registered owner who produces proof of ownership or
written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may redeem an impounded
vehicle or items of personal property registered or titled with the
department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is in
violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be released until a person eligible
to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of
this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and storage fees,
notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If
the department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past five
years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction
of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because the
operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be released only
pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded
or from the court having jurisdiction. An agency may issue a written order to
release pursuant to a provision of an applicable state agency rule or local
ordinance authorizing release on the basis of economic or personal hardship to
the spouse of the operator, taking into consideration public safety factors, including
the operator's criminal history and driving record.

If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b),
the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction of the
agency ordering the vehicle impounded. However, if the department's records
show that the operator has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b) or a similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle
may be held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the operator has
two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is impounded because the
operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, the vehicle may not be released
until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the
requirements of (e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal,
and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency.

(b) If the vehicle is
directed to be held for a suspended license impound, a person who desires to
redeem the vehicle at the end of the period of impound shall within five days
of the impound at the request of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit
to the tow truck operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound
storage rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for removal,
towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator may accept other
sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit. If the person desiring to
redeem the vehicle does not pay the security deposit or provide other security
acceptable to the tow truck operator, the tow truck operator may process and
sell at auction the vehicle as an abandoned vehicle within the normal time
limits set out in RCW 46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this
section may be paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours
before the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the auction, and
the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the highest bidder who is not
the registered owner.

(c) Notwithstanding (b)
of this subsection, a rental car business may immediately redeem a rental
vehicle it owns by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license impound.

(d) Notwithstanding (b)
of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security
interest in the vehicle may redeem or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately
by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle
will not be held for a suspended license impound. A motor vehicle dealer or
lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may not knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to repossess and then
return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an attempt to avoid a
suspended license impound. However, this provision does not preclude a vehicle
dealer or a lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle from
repossessing the vehicle and then selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of
it in accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, including providing redemption
rights to the debtor under RCW ((62A.9-506)) 62A.9A-623. If the
debtor is the registered owner of the vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the
vehicle under chapter 62A.9A RCW is conditioned upon the debtor
obtaining and providing proof from the impounding authority or court having
jurisdiction that any fines, penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered
owner, as a result of the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof
of the payment must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the
debtor tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an
order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound.

(e) The vehicle or
other item of personal property registered or titled with the department shall
be released upon the presentation to any person having custody of the vehicle
of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs of towing,
storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing, removing,
impounding, or storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for the amount
of any security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In addition, if a
vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342 or 46.20.345 and was being operated by the registered owner when it
was impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it must not be released to
any person until the registered owner establishes with the agency that ordered
the vehicle impounded or the court having jurisdiction that any penalties,
fines, or forfeitures owed by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow
truck operators are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an
order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall include,
without limitation, cash, major bank credit cards issued by financial
institutions, or personal checks drawn on Washington state branches of
financial institutions if accompanied by two pieces of valid identification,
one of which may be required by the operator to have a photograph. If the
towing firm cannot determine through the customer's bank or a check
verification service that the presented check would be paid by the bank or
guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may refuse to accept the check. Any
person who stops payment on a personal check or credit card, or does not make
restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes insufficient due to
lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service pursuant to this
section or in any other manner defrauds the towing firm in connection with
services rendered pursuant to this section shall be liable for damages in the
amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus costs and reasonable
attorney's fees.

(2)(a) The registered
tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem an impounded
vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with the department,
written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which
notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the
name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain a record
evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such notification was
provided.

(b) Any person seeking
to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a right to a hearing in
the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was
impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or the amount of towing
and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction to determine the
issues involving all impoundments including those authorized by the state or
its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality. Any request
for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for that purpose
and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of the date the
opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section and more than
five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the filing of the
hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in
the same amount required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the
hearing request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this chapter. Upon
receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to hear and
determine the validity of the impoundment.

(3)(a) The court,
within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the registered
tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the owner, the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency authorizing
the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b) At the hearing, the
person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any relevant evidence to
show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged were not proper.
The court may consider a written report made under oath by the officer who
authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.

(c) At the conclusion
of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the impoundment was proper,
whether the towing or storage fees charged were in compliance with the posted
rates, and who is responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not
adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted
rates.

(d) If the impoundment
is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees as permitted under
this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed against the person or
persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and
valid impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an authorized
agent.

(e) If the impoundment
is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the registered and legal
owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled
with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any
security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing, storage,
or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The court shall enter
judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator against the person or
agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered
and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of personal property registered
or titled with the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law
for the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of the
use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded, for not less than
fifty dollars per day, against the person or agency authorizing the impound.
However, if an impoundment arising from an alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342
or 46.20.345 is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the law
enforcement officer directing the impoundment and the government employing the
officer are not liable for damages if the officer relied in good faith and
without gross negligence on the records of the department in ascertaining that
the operator of the vehicle had a suspended or revoked driver's license. If
any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of
its entry, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against
the defendant in any action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of
judgment may be made by registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may
be made by affidavit of the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of
the judgment shall read essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU
ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you
under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the
date of this notice.

DATED
this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year)
. . .

Signature
..................

Typed
name and address

of
party mailing notice

(f) If the court
determines that the impoundment is in violation of law and the person or agency
authorizing the impound appeals the decision, the person or agency authorizing
the impound shall still pay all towing, storage, or other impoundment fees
permitted under this chapter to the registered tow truck operator within
fifteen days of notice of judgment or be required to pay reasonable attorneys'
fees and costs. However, the registered tow truck operator shall execute an
assignment of any interest in the claim against the registered owner to the
person or agency authorizing the impound in exchange for the payment.

(4) Any impounded
abandoned vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with the
department that is not redeemed within fifteen days of mailing of the notice of
custody and sale as required by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public
auction in accordance with all the provisions and subject to all the conditions
of RCW 46.55.130. A vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled
with the department may be redeemed at any time before the start of the auction
upon payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.570 and 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except when
necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic, or in compliance with law or
the directions of a police officer or official traffic control device, no
person shall:

(a) Stop, stand, or
park a vehicle:

(i) On the roadway side
of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street;

(ii) On a sidewalk or
street planting strip;

(iii) Within an
intersection;

(iv) On a crosswalk;

(v) Between a safety
zone and the adjacent curb or within thirty feet of points on the curb immediately
opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless official signs or markings indicate
a different no-parking area opposite the ends of a safety zone;

(vi) Alongside or
opposite any street excavation or obstruction when stopping, standing, or
parking would obstruct traffic;

(vii) Upon any bridge
or other elevated structure upon a highway or within a highway tunnel;

(viii) On any railroad
tracks;

(ix) In the area
between roadways of a divided highway including crossovers; or

(x) At any place where
official signs prohibit stopping.

(b) Stand or park a
vehicle, whether occupied or not, except momentarily to pick up or discharge a
passenger or passengers:

(i) In front of a
public or private driveway or within five feet of the end of the curb radius
leading thereto;

(ii) Within fifteen
feet of a fire hydrant;

(iii) Within twenty
feet of a crosswalk;

(iv) Within thirty feet
upon the approach to any flashing signal, stop sign, yield sign, or traffic
control signal located at the side of a roadway;

(v) Within twenty feet
of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on the side of a street
opposite the entrance to any fire station within seventy-five feet of said
entrance when properly signposted; or

(vi) At any place where
official signs prohibit standing.

(c) Park a vehicle,
whether occupied or not, except temporarily for the purpose of and while
actually engaged in loading or unloading property or passengers:

(i) Within fifty feet
of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing; or

(ii) At any place where
official signs prohibit parking.

(2) Parking or standing
shall be permitted in the manner provided by law at all other places except a
time limit may be imposed or parking restricted at other places but such
limitation and restriction shall be by city ordinance or county resolution or
order of the secretary of transportation upon highways under their respective
jurisdictions.

(3) No person shall
move a vehicle not lawfully under his or her control into any such prohibited
area or away from a curb such a distance as is unlawful.

(4) It shall be
unlawful for any person to reserve or attempt to reserve any portion of a
highway for the purpose of stopping, standing, or parking to the exclusion of
any other like person, nor shall any person be granted such right.

(5)
This section does not apply to a registered tow truck operator engaged in the
impoundment of a vehicle, the recovery or removal of an abandoned or disabled
vehicle, or performing emergency service on a vehicle, when the stopping,
standing, or parking is reasonably necessary and for only a time as is
reasonably necessary.

---
END ---