BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added
to chapter 31.12

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 (1) Except for persons who are employees of the credit
union

_7 and acting within the scope of their employment, directors
and

_8 committee members at a credit union or federal credit union
have

_9 no personal liability for harm caused by acts or omissions

10 performed on behalf of the credit union if: The director
or

11 committee member was acting within the scope of his or her
duties

12 at the time of the act or omission; the harm was not caused
by an

13 act in violation of RCW 31.12.267; the harm was not caused
by

14 willful or criminal misconduct, gross negligence, reckless

15 misconduct, or a conscious, flagrant indifference to the
rights or

16 safety of the individual harmed; and the harm was not
caused by

17 the director or committee member's operation of a motor
vehicle,

p. 1 ESB
5570

_1 vessel, aircraft, or other vehicle for which the state
requires

_2 the operator or the owner of the vehicle, craft, or
vessel to

_3 either possess an operator's license or maintain
insurance.

_4 (2) This section does not affect a director's or
committee

_5 member's liability to the credit union or to a
governmental entity

_6 for harm to the credit union or governmental entity
caused by the

_7 director or committee member.

_8 (3) This section does not affect the vicarious
liability of the

_9 credit union with respect to harm caused to any person,
including

10 harm caused by the negligence of a director or committee
member.

11 (4) This section does not affect the liability of
employees of

12 the credit union for acts or omissions done within the
scope of

13 their employment.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

ESB 5570 p. 2