BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

The department, the
Washington state patrol, and the Washington state association of Future Farmers
of America shall jointly create and design, and the department shall issue a
special Future Farmers of America license plate that may be used in lieu of regular
or personalized license plates for motor vehicles required to display two motor
vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW,
upon terms and conditions established by the department. The special plates
will observe the importance of farming to Washington state and help fund
programs and scholarships within the Washington state association of Future
Farmers of America and its chapters. The Washington state association of
Future Farmers of America may hold a contest among its membership to select the
initial design.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington state
association of Future Farmers of America license plate fees account is created
in the state treasury. All receipts from Washington state association of
Future Farmers of America license plate fees, less the administration and
collection costs incurred by the department under RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7),
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
programs and scholarships within the Washington state association of Future
Farmers of America and its chapters.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) On an annual basis,
the Washington state association of Future Farmers of America shall select
programs and scholarships to be funded from the Washington state association of
Future Farmers of America license plate fees account proceeds. In selecting
programs and scholarship recipients, the Washington state association of Future
Farmers of America shall attempt to assure a geographical balance throughout
the state and its chapters.

(2) The Washington
state association of Future Farmers of America may adopt rules necessary to
implement this section. Adoption of rules does not make the organization a
state agency under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c
291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
establish a fee for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section 5,
chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the cost of
production of the special license plates and the administration of this
program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five
dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) The department may adjust the fee to no more than
forty dollars. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to register
and license the vehicle for which the plates have been requested. All such
additional special license plate fees collected by the department shall be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle fund.

(2) ((Until December
31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the
holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the
custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The
state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (3) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee
of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5))) (4)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW
82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the
taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(((6) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999,)) (5) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate
shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction
costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this
date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(6) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2003, in addition to
all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration of a
motor vehicle, the holder of a Washington state association of Future Farmers
of America license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The department shall remit the remaining proceeds to the
custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The
state treasurer shall credit the funds to the Washington state association of
Future Farmers of America license plate fees account under section 2 of this
act.

(7) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2004, in addition to all
fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle
registration, the holder of a Washington state association of Future Farmers of
America license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
department shall remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall
credit the funds to the Washington state association of Future Farmers of
America license plate fees account.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.16.233 and 2000 c
37 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for those
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1) before January 1, 1987, under RCW
46.16.305(3), under section 1 of this act, and to commercial vehicles
with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds, effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2001, all vehicle
license plates must be issued on a standard background, as designated by the
department. Additionally, to ensure maximum legibility and reflectivity, the
department shall periodically provide for the replacement of license plates,
except for commercial vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six
thousand pounds. Frequency of replacement shall be established in accordance
with empirical studies documenting the longevity of the reflective materials
used to make license plates.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c
291 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In any
case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any vehicle, the right to
the certificates properly transferable therewith, except as provided in RCW
46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates passes to the purchaser or
transferee. It is unlawful for the holder of such certificates, except as
provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle license plates to fail, neglect, or
refuse to endorse the certificates and deliver the vehicle license plates to
the purchaser or transferee. If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed
by the state or any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is licensed with
personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates, medal of honor plates,
disabled person plates, disabled veteran plates, prisoner of war plates, Washington
state association of Future Farmers of America plates, or other special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by
section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle license plates therefor shall
be retained and may be displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the
vehicle so sold or transferred.

---
END ---