BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.42.040 and 1991 c
94 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is declared to be
the policy of the state that no signs which are visible from the main traveled
way of the interstate system, primary system, or scenic system shall be erected
or maintained except the following types:

(1) Directional or
other official signs or notices that are required or authorized by law including
signs with the Crime Stoppers name, logo, and telephone number;

(2) Signs advertising
the sale or lease of the property upon which they are located;

(3) Signs advertising
activities conducted on the property on which they are located;

(4) Signs, not
inconsistent with the policy of this chapter and the national policy set forth
in section 131 of title 23, United States Code as codified and enacted by
Public Law 85‑767 and amended only by section 106, Public Law 86‑342,
and the national standards promulgated thereunder by the secretary of commerce
or the secretary of transportation, advertising activities being conducted at a
location within twelve miles of the point at which such signs are located:
PROVIDED, That no sign lawfully erected pursuant to this subsection adjacent to
the interstate system and outside commercial and industrial areas shall be
maintained by any person after three years from May 10, 1971;

(5) Signs, not
inconsistent with the policy of this chapter and the national policy set forth
in section 131 of title 23, United States Code as codified and enacted by
Public Law 85‑767 and amended only by section 106, Public Law 86‑342,
and the regulations promulgated thereunder by the secretary of commerce or the
secretary of transportation, designed to give information in the specific
interest of the traveling public: PROVIDED, That no sign lawfully erected
pursuant to this subsection adjacent to the interstate system and outside commercial
and industrial areas shall be maintained by any person after three years from
May 10, 1971;

(6) Signs lawfully in
existence on October 22, 1965, determined by the commission, subject to the
approval of the United States secretary of transportation, to be landmark
signs, including signs on farm structures or natural surfaces, of historic or
artistic significance the preservation of which would be consistent with the
purposes of chapter 47.42 RCW;

(7) Public service
signs, located on school bus stop shelters, which:

(a) Identify the donor,
sponsor, or contributor of said shelters;

(b) Contain safety
slogans or messages which occupy not less than sixty percent of the area of the
sign;

(c) Contain no other
message;

(d) Are located on
school bus shelters which are authorized or approved by city, county, or state
law, regulation, or ordinance, and at places approved by the city, county, or
state agency controlling the highway involved; and

(e) Do not exceed
thirty-two square feet in area. Not more than one sign on each shelter may
face in any one direction.

Subsection (7) of this
section notwithstanding, the department of transportation shall adopt
regulations relating to the appearance of school bus shelters, the placement,
size, and public service content of public service signs located thereon, and
the prominence of the identification of the donors, sponsors, or contributors
of the shelters((.));

(8) Temporary
agricultural directional signs, with the following restrictions:

(a) Signs shall be
posted only during the period of time the seasonal agricultural product is
being sold;

(b) Signs shall not be
placed adjacent to the interstate highway system unless the sign qualifies as
an on-premise sign;

(c) Signs shall not be
placed within an incorporated city or town;

(d) Premises on which
the seasonal agricultural products are sold must be within fifteen miles of the
state highway, and necessary supplemental signing on local roads must be
provided before the installation of the signs on the state highway;

(e) Signs must be
located so as not to restrict sight distances on approaches to intersections;

(f) The department
shall establish a permit system and fee schedule and rules for the
manufacturing, installation, and maintenance of these signs in accordance with
the policy of this chapter;

(g) Signs in violation
of these provisions shall be removed in accordance with the procedures in RCW
47.42.080;

Only signs
of types 1, 2, 3, 7, and 8 may be erected or maintained within view of the
scenic system. Signs of types 7 and 8 may also be erected or maintained within
view of the federal aid primary system.

--- END ---