BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Associated student
bodies as defined by RCW 28A.325.020 and student groups organized pursuant to a
local school board's policy regulating associated student bodies are considered
bona fide or nonprofit organizations under this chapter for the purpose of
conducting a raffle and may conduct raffles without obtaining a license from
the gambling commission when:

(1) The raffles are
held in accordance with all other requirements of this chapter, other
applicable laws, rules of the gambling commission, and applicable policies of
the local school district;

(2) Gross revenues from
all the raffles, conducted by an associated student body or student group does
not exceed fifteen thousand dollars per calendar year or five thousand dollars
per raffle;

(3) Gross revenues from
raffles are devoted solely for the use of the associated student body or
student group. The funds must be deposited in the associated student body fund
program and may not be used for a private purpose as referred to in chapter
28A.325 RCW;

(4) The associated
student body or student group conducting the raffle maintains for one year from
the date of the raffle, records that accurately show at a minimum the gross
revenue from the raffle, details of the expenses of conducting the raffle, and
details of the uses of the gross revenues.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.46.110 and 1999 c
221 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county, city-county, city, or town, by local law and
ordinance, and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and rules
adopted under this chapter, may provide for the taxing of any gambling activity
authorized by this chapter within its jurisdiction, the tax receipts to go to
the county, city-county, city, or town so taxing the activity. Any such tax
imposed by a county alone shall not apply to any gambling activity within a
city or town located in the county but the tax rate established by a county, if
any, shall constitute the tax rate throughout the unincorporated areas of such
county.

(2) The operation of
punch boards and pull-tabs are subject to the following conditions:

(a) Chances may only be
sold to adults;

(b) The price of a
single chance may not exceed one dollar;

(c) No punch board or
pull-tab license may award as a prize upon a winning number or symbol being
drawn the opportunity of taking a chance upon any other punch board or
pull-tab;

(d) All prizes
available to be won must be described on an information flare. All merchandise
prizes must be on display within the immediate area of the premises in which
any such punch board or pull-tab is located. Upon a winning number or symbol
being drawn, a merchandise prize must be immediately removed from the display
and awarded to the winner. All references to cash or merchandise prizes, with
a value over twenty dollars, must be removed immediately from the information
flare when won, or such omission shall be deemed a fraud for the purposes of
this chapter; and

(e) When any person
wins money or merchandise from any punch board or pull-tab over an amount
determined by the commission, every licensee shall keep a public record of the
award for at least ninety days containing such information as the commission
shall deem necessary.

(3)(a) Taxation of
bingo and raffles shall never be in an amount greater than five percent of the
gross receipts from a bingo game or raffle less the amount awarded as cash or
merchandise prizes.

(b) Taxation of
amusement games shall only be in an amount sufficient to pay the actual costs
of enforcement of the provisions of this chapter by the county, city or town
law enforcement agency and in no event shall such taxation exceed two percent
of the gross receipts from the amusement game less the amount awarded as
prizes.

(c) No tax shall be
imposed under the authority of this chapter on bingo or amusement games when
such activities or any combination thereof are conducted by any bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter, which
organization has no paid operating or management personnel and has gross
receipts from bingo or amusement games, or a combination thereof, not exceeding
five thousand dollars per year, less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise
prizes.

(d) No tax shall be
imposed on the first ten thousand dollars of gross receipts less the amount
awarded as cash or merchandise prizes from raffles conducted by any bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter.

(e) Revenue from
raffles conducted by associated student bodies or student groups under section
1 of this act is exempt from taxation under this chapter.

(f) Taxation of
punch boards and pull-tabs for bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations
is based on gross receipts from the operation of the games less the amount
awarded as cash or merchandise prizes, and shall not exceed a rate of ten
percent. At the option of the county, city-county, city, or town, the taxation
of punch boards and pull-tabs for commercial stimulant operators may be based
on gross receipts from the operation of the games, and may not exceed a rate of
five percent, or may be based on gross receipts from the operation of the games
less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes, and may not exceed a
rate of ten percent.

(((f))) (g)
Taxation of social card games may not exceed twenty percent of the gross
revenue from such games.

(4) Taxes imposed under
this chapter become a lien upon personal and real property used in the gambling
activity in the same manner as provided for under RCW 84.60.010. The lien
shall attach on the date the tax becomes due and shall relate back and have priority
against real and personal property to the same extent as ad valorem taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.325 RCW to read as follows:

Associated
student bodies and student groups organized pursuant to a local school board's
policy regulating associated student bodies may conduct raffles as permitted by
section 1 of this act.

---
END ---