BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1.
RCW 28A.150.410 and 1997 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
shall establish for each school year in the appropriations act a statewide
salary allocation schedule, for allocation purposes only, to be used to
distribute funds for basic education certificated instructional staff salaries
under RCW 28A.150.260.

(2) The superintendent
of public instruction shall calculate salary allocations for state funded basic
education certificated instructional staff by determining the district average
salary for basic education and special education instructional staff using the
salary allocation schedule established pursuant to this section.

(3) Beginning January
1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any
employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation
allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents
referenced in the biennial appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a
masters degree; or

(b) The credits were
used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(4)
Beginning in the 2001-2002 school year, the determination of years of service
for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, and psychologists regulated
under Title 18 RCW may include experience in schools and other nonschool
positions as occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language
pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or
psychologists. The calculation of years of service for experience in nonschool
positions shall be as follows: Until the 2003-2004 school year, every two
years of service in nonschool positions shall be counted as one year of service
for purposes of this chapter. Beginning in the 2004-2005 school year and
thereafter, every one year of service in nonschool positions shall be counted
as one year of service for purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---