BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.04.005 and 2000 c
218 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this title, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following definitions
shall apply:

(1) "Public
assistance" or "assistance"‑-Public aid to persons in need
thereof for any cause, including services, medical care, assistance grants,
disbursing orders, work relief, general assistance and federal-aid assistance.

(2)
"Department"‑-The department of social and health services.

(3) "County or
local office"‑-The administrative office for one or more counties or
designated service areas.

(4)
"Director" or "secretary" means the secretary of social and
health services.

(5) "Federal-aid
assistance"‑-The specific categories of assistance for which
provision is made in any federal law existing or hereafter passed by which
payments are made from the federal government to the state in aid or in respect
to payment by the state for public assistance rendered to any category of needy
persons for which provision for federal funds or aid may from time to time be
made, or a federally administered needs-based program.

(6)(a) "General
assistance"‑-Aid to persons in need who:

(i) Are not eligible to
receive federal-aid assistance, other than food stamps or food stamp benefits
transferred electronically and medical assistance; however, an individual who
refuses or fails to cooperate in obtaining federal-aid assistance, without good
cause, is not eligible for general assistance;

(ii) Meet one of the
following conditions:

(A) Pregnant:
PROVIDED, That need is based on the current income and resource requirements of
the federal temporary assistance for needy families program; or

(B) Subject to chapter
165, Laws of 1992, incapacitated from gainful employment by reason of bodily or
mental infirmity that will likely continue for a minimum of ninety days as
determined by the department.

(C) Persons who are
unemployable due to alcohol or drug addiction are not eligible for general
assistance. Persons receiving general assistance on July 26, 1987, or becoming
eligible for such assistance thereafter, due to an alcohol or drug-related
incapacity, shall be referred to appropriate assessment, treatment, shelter, or
supplemental security income referral services as authorized under chapter
74.50 RCW. Referrals shall be made at the time of application or at the time
of eligibility review. Alcoholic and drug addicted clients who are receiving
general assistance on July 26, 1987, may remain on general assistance if they
otherwise retain their eligibility until they are assessed for services under chapter
74.50 RCW. Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(B) of this section shall not be construed to
prohibit the department from granting general assistance benefits to alcoholics
and drug addicts who are incapacitated due to other physical or mental
conditions that meet the eligibility criteria for the general assistance
program;

(iii) Are citizens or
aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence or otherwise residing in the
United States under color of law; and

(iv) Have furnished the
department their social security account number. If the social security
account number cannot be furnished because it has not been issued or is not
known, an application for a number shall be made prior to authorization of
assistance, and the social security number shall be provided to the department
upon receipt.

(b) Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection (6)(a)(i), (ii), and (c) of this section, general
assistance shall be provided to the following recipients of federal-aid
assistance:

(i) Recipients of
supplemental security income whose need, as defined in this section, is not met
by such supplemental security income grant because of separation from a spouse;
or

(ii) To the extent
authorized by the legislature in the biennial appropriations act, to recipients
of temporary assistance for needy families whose needs are not being met
because of a temporary reduction in monthly income below the entitled benefit
payment level caused by loss or reduction of wages or unemployment compensation
benefits or some other unforeseen circumstances. The amount of general
assistance authorized shall not exceed the difference between the entitled
benefit payment level and the amount of income actually received.

(c) General assistance
shall be provided only to persons who are not members of assistance units
receiving federal aid assistance, except as provided in subsection
(6)(a)(ii)(A) and (b) of this section, and will accept available services which
can reasonably be expected to enable the person to work or reduce the need for
assistance unless there is good cause to refuse. Failure to accept such
services shall result in termination until the person agrees to cooperate in
accepting such services and subject to the following maximum periods of
ineligibility after reapplication:

(i) First failure: One
week;

(ii) Second failure
within six months: One month;

(iii) Third and
subsequent failure within one year: Two months.

(d) Persons found
eligible for general assistance based on incapacity from gainful employment
may, if otherwise eligible, receive general assistance pending application for
federal supplemental security income benefits. Any general assistance that is
subsequently duplicated by the person's receipt of supplemental security income
for the same period shall be considered a debt due the state and shall by
operation of law be subject to recovery through all available legal remedies.

(e) The department
shall adopt by rule medical criteria for general assistance eligibility to
ensure that eligibility decisions are consistent with statutory requirements
and are based on clear, objective medical information.

(f) The process
implementing the medical criteria shall involve consideration of opinions of
the treating or consulting physicians or health care professionals regarding
incapacity, and any eligibility decision which rejects uncontroverted medical
opinion must set forth clear and convincing reasons for doing so.

(g) Recipients of
general assistance based upon a finding of incapacity from gainful employment
who remain otherwise eligible shall not have their benefits terminated absent a
clear showing of material improvement in their medical or mental condition or
specific error in the prior determination that found the recipient eligible by
reason of incapacitation. Recipients of general assistance based upon
pregnancy who relinquish their child for adoption, remain otherwise eligible,
and are not eligible to receive benefits under the federal temporary assistance
for needy families program shall not have their benefits terminated until the
end of the month in which the period of six weeks following the birth of the
recipient's child falls. Recipients of the federal temporary assistance for needy
families program who lose their eligibility solely because of the birth and
relinquishment of the qualifying child may receive general assistance through
the end of the month in which the period of six weeks following the birth of
the child falls.

(h) No person may be
considered an eligible individual for general assistance with respect to any
month if during that month the person:

(i) Is fleeing to avoid
prosecution of, or to avoid custody or confinement for conviction of, a felony,
or an attempt to commit a felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or
the place from which the person flees; or

(ii) Is violating a
condition of probation, community supervision, or parole imposed under federal
or state law for a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction.

(7)
"Applicant"‑-Any person who has made a request, or on behalf of
whom a request has been made, to any county or local office for assistance.

(8)
"Recipient"‑-Any person receiving assistance and in addition
those dependents whose needs are included in the recipient's assistance.

(9) "Standards of
assistance"‑-The level of income required by an applicant or
recipient to maintain a level of living specified by the department.

(10)
"Resource"‑-Any asset, tangible or intangible, owned by or
available to ((the)) an applicant ((at the time of application))
for, or recipient of, public assistance, which can be applied toward
meeting the applicant's or recipient's need, either directly or by
conversion into money or its equivalent. The department may by rule designate
resources that an applicant or recipient may retain and not be
ineligible for public assistance because of such resources. Exempt resources
shall include, but are not limited to:

(a) A home that an
applicant, recipient, or their dependents is living in, including the
surrounding property;

(b) Household
furnishings and personal effects;

(c) A motor vehicle,
other than a motor home((, used and useful having an equity value not to
exceed five thousand dollars));

(d) A motor vehicle
necessary to transport a physically disabled household member. This exclusion
is limited to one vehicle per physically disabled person;

(e) All other
resources, including any excess of values exempted, not to exceed ((one))
four thousand dollars or other limit as set by the department, for
applicants and recipients of assistance to be consistent with limitations
on resources and exemptions necessary for federal aid assistance((. The
department shall also allow recipients of temporary assistance for needy families
to exempt savings accounts with combined balances of up to an additional three
thousand dollars));

(f) Applicants for or
recipients of general assistance shall have their eligibility based on resource
limitations consistent with the temporary assistance for needy families program
rules adopted by the department; and

(g) If an applicant for
or recipient of public assistance possesses property and belongings in excess
of the ceiling value, such value shall be used in determining the need of the
applicant or recipient, except that: (i) The department may exempt resources
or income when the income and resources are determined necessary to the
applicant's or recipient's restoration to independence, to decrease the need
for public assistance, or to aid in rehabilitating the applicant or recipient
or a dependent of the applicant or recipient; and (ii) the department may
provide grant assistance for a period not to exceed nine months from the date
the agreement is signed pursuant to this section to persons who are otherwise
ineligible because of excess real property owned by such persons when they are
making a good faith effort to dispose of that property: PROVIDED, That:

(A) The applicant or
recipient signs an agreement to repay the lesser of the amount of aid received
or the net proceeds of such sale;

(B) If the owner of the
excess property ceases to make good faith efforts to sell the property, the
entire amount of assistance may become an overpayment and a debt due the state
and may be recovered pursuant to RCW 43.20B.630;

(C) Applicants and
recipients are advised of their right to a fair hearing and afforded the
opportunity to challenge a decision that good faith efforts to sell have
ceased, prior to assessment of an overpayment under this section; and

(D) At the time
assistance is authorized, the department files a lien without a sum certain on
the specific property.

(11) "Income"‑-(a)
((All appreciable gains in real or personal property (cash or kind) or other
assets)) Salary, wages, interest, dividends, and other earnings, and
unearned income as defined for the purposes of federal assistance programs,
which are received by ((or become available for use and enjoyment by))
an applicant or recipient during the month of application or after applying for
or receiving public assistance. The department may by rule ((and regulation))
exempt income received by an applicant for or recipient of public assistance
which can be used by him or her to decrease his or her need for public
assistance or to aid in rehabilitating him or her or his or her dependents((,
but such exemption shall not, unless otherwise provided in this title, exceed
the exemptions of resources granted under this chapter to an applicant for
public assistance)). In addition, for cash assistance the department may
disregard income pursuant to RCW 74.08A.230 and 74.12.350.

(b) If, under
applicable federal requirements, the state has the option of considering
property in the form of lump sum compensatory awards or related settlements
received by an applicant or recipient as income or as a resource, the
department shall consider such property to be a resource.

(12) "Need"‑-The
difference between the applicant's or recipient's standards of assistance for
himself or herself and the dependent members of his or her family, as measured
by the standards of the department, and value of all nonexempt resources and
nonexempt income received by or available to the applicant or recipient and the
dependent members of his or her family.

(13) For purposes of
determining eligibility for public assistance and participation levels in the
cost of medical care, the department shall exempt restitution payments made to
people of Japanese and Aleut ancestry pursuant to the Civil Liberties Act of
1988 and the Aleutian and Pribilof Island Restitution Act passed by congress,
P.L. 100‑383, including all income and resources derived therefrom.

(14) In
the construction of words and phrases used in this title, the singular number
shall include the plural, the masculine gender shall include both the feminine
and neuter genders and the present tense shall include the past and future
tenses, unless the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary.

--- END ---