BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the policy of the
state of Washington to encourage every eligible person to register to vote and
to participate fully in all elections, and to protect the integrity of the
electoral process by providing equal access to the process while guarding
against discrimination and fraud. The election registration laws and the
voting laws of the state of Washington, and the requirements of this act, must
be administered without discrimination based upon race, creed, color, national
origin, sex, or political affiliation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.07 RCW to read as follows:

An election officer or
voter registrar who intentionally disenfranchises an eligible citizen or discriminates
against a person eligible to vote by denying voter registration is guilty of a
class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.04 RCW to read as follows:

In order to encourage
the broadest possible voting participation by all eligible citizens, the
secretary of state shall produce voter registration information in the foreign
languages required of state agencies. This information must be available no
later than January 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 29.04 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall cause to be produced a "voter guide" detailing what constitutes
voter fraud and discrimination under state election laws. This voter guide
must be provided to every county election officer and voter registrar, and any
other person upon request, no later than January 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 29.04 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall provide a toll-free media and web page designed to allow voter
communication with the office of the secretary of state. The secretary of state
shall forward every complaint of violations of voter registration laws or
violations of election laws or election discrimination received to the county
auditor or election officer within whose jurisdiction the incident is alleged
to have occurred. The county auditor or election officer shall notify the
secretary of state of the findings and actions regarding each complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 29.07 RCW to read as follows:

When a person who has
previously registered to vote in any jurisdiction applies for voter
registration in a new jurisdiction, the person shall provide on the
registration form, all information needed to cancel any previous registration.

Sec. 7. RCW 29.07.092 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 184 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor
shall acknowledge each new voter registration or transfer by providing or
sending the voter a card identifying his current precinct and containing such other
information as may be prescribed by the secretary of state. The county
auditor shall forward any information pertaining to the voter's prior voter
registration to the county where the voter was previously registered, so that
registration may be canceled. If the prior voter registration is in another
state, the notification must be made to the state elections office of that
state. A county auditor receiving official information that a voter has
registered to vote in another jurisdiction shall immediately cancel that
voter's registration.

Sec. 8. RCW 29.07.260 and 1999 c
298 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An ((person))
eligible United States citizen may apply to register to vote,
transfer a voter registration, or change his or her name for voter registration
purposes when he or she applies for or renews a driver's license or
identification card under chapter 46.20 RCW.

(2) To register to
vote, transfer his or her voter registration, or change his or her name for
voter registration purposes under this section, the applicant shall provide the
following:

(a) His or her full
name;

(b) Whether the address
in the driver's license file is the same as his or her residence for voting
purposes;

(c) The address of the
residence for voting purposes if it is different from the address in the
driver's license file;

(d) His or her mailing
address if it is not the same as the address in (c) of this subsection;

(e) Additional
information on the geographic location of that voting residence if it is only
identified by route or box;

(f) The last address at
which he or she was registered to vote in this state;

(g) A declaration that
he or she is a citizen of the United States; and

(h) Any other information
that the secretary of state determines is necessary to establish the identity
of the applicant and to prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.

(3) The following
warning shall appear in a conspicuous place on the voter registration form:

"If you knowingly
provide false information on this voter registration form or knowingly make a
false declaration about your qualifications for voter registration you will
have committed a class C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five
years, or by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment and
fine."

(4) The applicant shall
sign a portion of the form that can be used as an initiative signature card for
the verification of petition signatures by the secretary of state and shall
sign and attest to the following oath:

"I declare that
the facts on this voter registration form are true. I am a citizen of the
United States, I am not presently denied my civil rights as a result of being
convicted of a felony, I will have lived in Washington at this address for
thirty days before the next election at which I vote, and I will be at least
eighteen years old when I vote."

(5) The driver
licensing agent shall record that the applicant has requested to register to
vote or transfer a voter registration.

Sec. 9. RCW 29.07.440 and 1994 c
57 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of
state shall prescribe the method of voter registration for each designated
agency. The agency shall use either the state voter registration by mail form
with a separate declination form for the applicant to indicate that he or she declines
to register at this time, or the agency may use a separate form approved for
use by the secretary of state.

(2) The person
providing service at the agency shall offer voter registration services to
every client whenever he or she applies for service or assistance and with each
renewal, recertification, or change of address. The person providing service
shall give the applicant the same level of assistance with the voter
registration application as is offered to fill out the agency's forms and documents,
including information about age and citizenship requirements for voter
registration.

(3) If an agency uses a
computerized application process, it may, in consultation with the secretary of
state, develop methods to capture simultaneously the information required for
voter registration during a person's computerized application process.

(4) Each designated
agency shall provide for the voter registration application forms to be
collected from each agency office at least once each week. The agency shall
then forward the application forms to the secretary of state each week. The
secretary of state shall forward the forms to the county in which the applicant
has registered to vote no later than ten days after the date on which the forms
were received by the secretary of state.

Sec. 10. RCW 29.08.080 and 1999 c
298 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall furnish registration forms necessary to carry out the registration of
voters as provided by this chapter without cost to the respective counties. All
voter registration forms printed after January 1, 2002, must include clear and
conspicuous language, designed to draw an applicant's attention, stating that
the applicant must be a United States citizen in order to register to vote.

Sec. 11. RCW 29.10.125 and 1987 c
288 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Registration of a
person as a voter is presumptive evidence of his or her right to vote at any
primary or election, general or special. A person's right to vote may be
challenged at the polls only by a precinct election officer. A challenge may
be made only upon the belief or knowledge of the challenging officer that the
voter is unqualified. The challenge must be supported by evidence or testimony
given to the county canvassing board under RCW 29.10.127 and may not be based
on unsupported allegations or allegations by anonymous third parties. The
identity of the challenger, and any third person involved in the challenge,
shall be public record and shall be announced at the time the challenge is
made.

Challenges initiated by
a registered voter must be filed not later than the day before any primary or
election, general or special, at the office of the appropriate county auditor.
A challenged voter may properly transfer or reregister until three days before
the primary or election, general or special, by applying personally to the
county auditor. Challenges may also be initiated by the office of the county
prosecuting attorney and must be filed in the same manner as challenges
initiated by a registered voter.

Sec. 12. RCW 29.10.185 and 1999 c
100 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
case-by-case cancellation procedure required in RCW 29.10.040, the county
auditor, in conjunction with the office of the secretary of state, shall
participate in an annual list maintenance program designed to detect persons
registered in more than one county or voting more than once in an election.
This program must be applied uniformly throughout the county and must be
nondiscriminatory in its application. The program must be completed not later
than thirty days before the date of a primary or general election.

The office of the
secretary of state shall cause to be created a list of registered voters with
the same date of birth and similar names who appear on two or more county lists
of registered voters. The office of the secretary of state shall forward this
list to each county auditor so that they may properly cancel the previous
registration of voters who have subsequently registered in a different county.
The county auditor of the county where the previous registration was made shall
cancel the registration of the voter if it appears that the signatures in the
registration and the signature provided to the new county on the voter's new
registration were made by the same person. The office of the secretary of
state shall adopt rules to facilitate this process.

If a voter is
suspected of voting in two or more counties in an election, the county auditors
in each county shall cooperate with their respective county prosecutors to
determine the voter's county of residence. The prosecuting attorney of the
county of residence shall pursue a complaint.

Sec. 13. RCW 29.60.030 and 1992 c
163 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall:

(1) Establish and
operate, or provide by contract, training and certification programs for state
and county elections administration officials and personnel, including but
not limited to training on the various types of election law violations and
discrimination, and training programs for political party observers which
conform to the rules for such programs established under RCW 29.60.020;

(2) Administer tests
for state and county officials and personnel who have received such training
and issue certificates to those who have successfully completed the training and
passed such tests;

(3) Maintain a record
of those individuals who have received such training and certificates; and

(4) Provide the
staffing and support services required by the board created under RCW
29.60.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 29.85 RCW to read as follows:

When a complaint
providing information concerning fraudulent voter registration, vote tampering,
or irregularities in absentee voting are presented to the office of the prosecuting
attorney, that office shall aggressively investigate, and shall file charges in
all cases where warranted.

Sec. 15. RCW 29.85.240 and 1991 c
81 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who knows
that he or she does not possess the legal qualifications of a voter ((and))
who applies for voter registration or who votes at any primary or
special or general election authorized by law to be held in this state for any
office whatever ((shall be)) is guilty of a class C felony
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 16. RCW 36.27.020 and 1995 c
194 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The prosecuting
attorney shall:

(1) Be legal adviser of
the legislative authority, giving ((them [it])) it his or her
written opinion when required by the legislative authority or the chairperson
thereof touching any subject which the legislative authority may be called or
required to act upon relating to the management of county affairs;

(2) Be legal adviser to
all county and precinct officers and school directors in all matters relating
to their official business, and when required draw up all instruments of an
official nature for the use of said officers;

(3) Appear for and
represent the state, county, and all school districts subject to the
supervisory control and direction of the attorney general in all criminal and
civil proceedings in which the state or the county or any school district in
the county may be a party;

(4) Prosecute all
criminal and civil actions in which the state or the county may be a party,
defend all suits brought against the state or the county, and prosecute actions
upon forfeited recognizances and bonds and actions for the recovery of debts,
fines, penalties, and forfeitures accruing to the state or the county;

(5) Attend and appear
before and give advice to the grand jury when cases are presented to it for
consideration and draw all indictments when required by the grand jury;

(6) Institute and
prosecute proceedings before magistrates for the arrest of persons charged with
or reasonably suspected of felonies when the prosecuting attorney has
information that any such offense has been committed and the prosecuting
attorney shall for that purpose attend when required by them if the prosecuting
attorney is not then in attendance upon the superior court;

(7) Carefully tax all
cost bills in criminal cases and take care that no useless witness fees are
taxed as part of the costs and that the officers authorized to execute process
tax no other or greater fees than the fees allowed by law;

(8) Receive all cost
bills in criminal cases before district judges at the trial of which the
prosecuting attorney was not present, before they are lodged with the
legislative authority for payment, whereupon the prosecuting attorney may retax
the same and the prosecuting attorney must do so if the legislative authority
deems any bill exorbitant or improperly taxed;

(9) Aggressively and
without exception present all violations of the election laws ((which
may)) that come to the prosecuting attorney's knowledge to the
special consideration of the proper jury;

(10) Examine once in
each year the official bonds of all county and precinct officers and report to
the legislative authority any defect in the bonds of any such officer;

(11) Make an annual
report to the governor as of the 31st of December of each year setting forth
the amount and nature of business transacted by the prosecuting attorney in
that year with such other statements and suggestions as the prosecuting
attorney may deem useful;

(12) Send to the state
liquor control board at the end of each year a written report of all
prosecutions brought under the state liquor laws in the county during the
preceding year, showing in each case, the date of trial, name of accused,
nature of charges, disposition of case, and the name of the judge presiding;

(13) Seek
to reform and improve the administration of criminal justice and stimulate
efforts to remedy inadequacies or injustice in substantive or procedural law.

Sec. 17. RCW 46.20.155 and 1990 c
143 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Before issuing an
original license or identification card or renewing a license or identification
card under this chapter, the licensing agent shall determine if the applicant
wants to register to vote or transfer his or her voter registration((.))
by asking the following question:

"Do you want to
register to vote or transfer your voter registration?"

If the applicant
chooses to register or transfer a registration, the agent shall ask the
following:

"Are you a
United States citizen and at least eighteen years of age?"

If the applicant
answers in the affirmative the agent shall then provide the applicant with
a voter registration form and instructions and shall record that the applicant
has requested to register to vote or transfer a voter registration. The
agent shall provide information concerning qualifications for voter
registration to any applicant who asks for the information, and to any
applicant for voter registration who has provided identification documents from
any country other than the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall post signs at each driver licensing facility advertising the
availability of voter registration services and advising of the qualifications
to register to vote and the penalties for false voter registration.

---
END ---