BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
82.04.280 and 1998 c 343 s 3 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business

_8 of: (1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers,
periodicals, or

_9 magazines; (2) building, repairing or improving any
street, place,

10 road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation

11 terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is

12 owned by a municipal corporation or political
subdivision of the

13 state or by the United States and which is used or to be
used,

14 primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass

15 transportation vehicles of any kind and including any

16 readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of

17 any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in

18 the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of

p. 1 SB
5580

_1 which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is
the

_2 responsibility of the public authority whose street,
place, road,

_3 highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation

_4 terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
is being

_5 built, repaired or improved; (3) extracting for hire or
processing

_6 for hire; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or
storage

_7 warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage
lockers;

_8 (5) representing and performing services for fire or
casualty

_9 insurance companies as an independent resident managing
general

10 agent licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310;
(6) radio

11 and television broadcasting, excluding network, national
and

12 regional advertising computed as a standard deduction
based on the

13 national average thereof as annually reported by the
Federal

14 Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof by
itemization by

15 the individual broadcasting station, and excluding that
portion of

16 revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a

17 ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-

18 volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7)
engaging

19 in activities which bring a person within the definition
of

20 consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); (8) brokering
residential

21 real estate loans and required to be licensed under
RCW

22 19.146.200; as to such persons, the amount of tax
on such business

23 shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by

24 the rate of 0.484 percent.

25 As used in this section, "cold storage
warehouse" means a

26 storage warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen
perishable

27 fruits or vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or
fowl, or

28 any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to
maintain the

29 quality of the product for orderly marketing.

30 As used in this section, "storage
warehouse" means a building

31 or structure, or any part thereof, in which goods,
wares, or

32 merchandise are received for storage for compensation,
except

33 field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit packing
plants,

34 warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public
garages

35 storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and
wharves,

36 and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers

37 have direct access to individual storage areas by
separate

SB 5580 p. 2

_1 entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not
include a building or

_2 structure, or that part of such building or structure,
in which an

_3 activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.

_4 As used in this section, "periodical or
magazine" means a

_5 printed publication, other than a newspaper, issued
regularly at

_6 stated intervals at least once every three months,
including any

_7 supplement or special edition of the publication.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

_9 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

10 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

11 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5580