BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.36A.010 and 1987
c 447 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that it is necessary to regulate the practice of ((naturopaths)) naturopathic
physicians in order to protect the public health, safety, and welfare. It
is the legislature's intent that only individuals who meet and maintain minimum
standards of competence and conduct may provide service to the public.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.36A.020 and 1991
c 3 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of health.

(2)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(3) "((Naturopath))
Naturopathic physician" means an individual licensed under this
chapter.

(4)
"Committee" means the Washington state naturopathic practice advisory
committee.

(5) "Educational
program" means ((a)) an accredited program preparing persons
for the practice of ((naturopathy)) naturopathic medicine.

(6) "Nutrition and
food science" means the prevention and treatment of disease or other human
conditions through the use of foods, water, herbs, roots, bark, or natural food
elements.

(7) "Manual
manipulation" or "mechanotherapy" means manipulation of a part
or the whole of the body by hand or by mechanical means.

(8) "Physical
modalities" means use of physical, chemical, electrical, and other
noninvasive modalities including, but not limited to heat, cold, air, light,
water in any of its forms, sound, massage, and therapeutic exercise.

(9)
"Homeopathy" means a system of medicine based on the use of
infinitesimal doses of medicines capable of producing symptoms similar to those
of the disease treated, as listed in the homeopathic pharmacopeia of the United
States.

(10) (("Medicines
of mineral, animal, and botanical origin" means medicines derived from
animal organs, tissues, and oils, minerals, and plants administered orally and
topically, excluding legend drugs with the following exceptions: Vitamins,
minerals, whole gland thyroid, and substances as exemplified in traditional
botanical and herbal pharmacopoeia, and nondrug contraceptive devices excluding
interuterine devices. The use of intermuscular injections are limited to
vitamin B‑12 preparations and combinations when clinical and/or
laboratory evaluation has indicated vitamin B‑12 deficiency. The use of
controlled substances is prohibited.)) "Naturopathic
medicines" include legend antibiotics, limited to penicillins,
cephalosporins and related antibiotics, antifungal agents, anthelmintics,
bacitracin, sulfonamides, nitrofurans, methenamines, oxalodinones,
lincosamides, macrolides, erythromycin, tetracyclines, and quinolones, as set
forth in Drug Facts and Comparisons 2001 Edition (Published by Facts and
Comparisons, St. Louis, MO.) and codeine, hydrocone, and testosterone in
schedules III-V of the uniform controlled substances act consistent with
naturopathic medical practice and in accordance with rules adopted by the
secretary; vitamins; minerals; botanical medicines; homeopathic medicines;
hormones; and other physiologic substances as exemplified in standard
naturopathic medical texts, journals, and pharmacopeia, including nondrug
contraceptive devices. Naturopathic physicians may administer intermuscular,
intramuscular, intravenous, subcutaneous, and intradermal injections of
substances appropriate to naturopathic medicine, including providing saline
infusion for dehydrated patients. The secretary shall determine, by rule,
which other substances are appropriate.

(11) "Hygiene and
immunization" means the use of such preventative techniques as personal
hygiene, asepsis, public health, and immunizations, to the extent allowed by
rule.

(12) "Minor office
procedures" means care and procedures incident thereto of
superficial lacerations, lesions, and abrasions, and the removal of
foreign bodies located in superficial structures, not to include the eye; trigger
point therapy, dermal stimulation, and allergy testing and treatment; and
the use of antiseptics and topical or local anesthetics in connection
therewith.

(13) "Common
diagnostic procedures" means the use of venipuncture ((to withdraw
blood)) consistent with naturopathic medical practice, commonly used
diagnostic modalities consistent with naturopathic practice, health history taking,
physical examination, radiography, examination of body orifices excluding
endoscopy, ((and)) laboratory medicine ((which obtains)), and
obtaining samples of human tissues ((products)), ((including
superficial scrapings)) but excluding ((procedures which would require))
surgical incision or excision beyond that which is authorized as minor
office procedure.

(14)
"Suggestion" means techniques including but not limited to
counseling, biofeedback, and hypnosis.

(15)
"Radiography" means the ordering, but not the interpretation,
of radiographic diagnostic and other imaging studies and the taking and
interpretation of standard radiographs. Radiography includes the ordering,
but not the interpretation, of ultrasonic images.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.36A.030 and 1991
c 3 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
practice naturopathy or naturopathic medicine or represent himself or
herself as a ((naturopath)) naturopathic physician without first
applying for and receiving a license from the secretary to practice naturopathy
or naturopathic medicine.

(2) A person represents
himself or herself as a ((naturopath)) naturopathic physician
when that person adopts or uses any title or any description of services that
incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations: Naturopath,
naturopathic physician, natural medicine practitioner, or doctor of
naturopathic medicine.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.36A.040 and 1991
c 3 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

Naturopathic medicine
or naturopathy is the practice by ((naturopaths)) naturopathic
physicians of the art and science of the diagnosis, prevention, and
treatment of disorders of the body by stimulation or support, or both, of the
natural processes of the human body. A ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician is responsible and accountable to the consumer for the quality of
naturopathic care rendered.

The practice of
naturopathy or naturopathic medicine includes manual manipulation
(mechanotherapy), the prescription, administration, dispensing, and use, except
for the treatment of malignancies ((or neoplastic disease)), of
nutrition and food science, physical modalities, minor office procedures,
homeopathy, certain medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin, hygiene
and immunization, common diagnostic procedures, and suggestion; however,
nothing in this chapter shall prohibit consultation and treatment of a patient
in concert with a practitioner licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. No
person licensed under this chapter may employ the term "chiropractic"
to describe any services provided by a ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician under this chapter. No person licensed under this chapter may
employ the term "acupuncture" to describe any services provided by a
naturopathic physician under this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.36A.050 and 1991
c 3 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice of a
profession by individuals who are licensed, certified, or registered under
other laws of this state who are performing services within their authorized
scope of practice;

(2) The practice of
naturopathic medicine by an individual employed by the government of the United
States while the individual is engaged in the performance of duties prescribed
for him or her by the laws and regulations of the United States;

(3) The practice of
naturopathic medicine by students enrolled in a school approved by the
secretary. The performance of services shall be pursuant to a course of
instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the supervision of the
instructor. The instructor shall be a ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician licensed pursuant to this chapter; or

(4) The practice of
oriental medicine or oriental herbology, or the rendering of other dietary or
nutritional advice.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.36A.070 and 1991
c 3 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created the Washington state naturopathic advisory committee consisting of five
members appointed by the secretary who shall advise the secretary concerning
the administration of this chapter. Three members of the initial committee
shall be persons who would qualify for licensing under this chapter. Their
successors shall be ((naturopaths)) naturopathic physicians who
are licensed under this chapter. Two members of the committee shall be
individuals who are unaffiliated with the profession. For the initial
committee, one unaffiliated member and one ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician shall serve four-year terms, one unaffiliated member and one ((naturopath))
naturopathic physician shall serve three-year terms, and one ((naturopath))
naturopathic physician shall serve a two-year term. The term of office
for committee members after the initial committee is four years. Any committee
member may be removed for just cause including a finding of fact of unprofessional
conduct, impaired practice, or more than three unexcused absences. The
secretary may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the committee for the
remainder of the unexpired term.

No committee member may
serve more than two consecutive terms, whether full or partial.

(2) Committee members
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The committee may
elect annually a chair and vice-chair to direct the meetings of the committee.
The committee shall meet at least once each year, and may hold additional
meetings as called by the secretary or the chair.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.06.050 and 1991 c
3 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person seeking to
be examined shall present to the secretary at least forty-five days before the
commencement of the examination:

(1) A written
application on a form or forms provided by the secretary setting forth under
affidavit such information as the secretary may require; and

(2) Proof that the
candidate has:

(a) Successfully
completed a course, approved by the secretary, of didactic training in basic
sciences and acupuncture over a minimum period of two academic years. The
training shall include such subjects as anatomy, physiology, bacteriology,
biochemistry, pathology, hygiene, and a survey of western clinical sciences.
The basic science classes must be equivalent to those offered at the collegiate
level. However, if the applicant is a licensed chiropractor under chapter
18.25 RCW or a ((naturopath)) naturopathic physician licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, the requirements of this subsection relating to basic
sciences may be reduced by up to one year depending upon the extent of the
candidate's qualifications as determined under rules adopted by the secretary;

(b) Successfully
completed a course, approved by the secretary, of clinical training in
acupuncture over a minimum period of one academic year. The training shall
include a minimum of: (i) Twenty-nine quarter credits of supervised practice,
consisting of at least four hundred separate patient treatments involving a
minimum of one hundred different patients, and (ii) one hundred hours or nine
quarter credits of observation which shall include case presentation and
discussion.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 18.36A RCW to read as follows:

A naturopathic
physician may employ persons to assist in the preparation and monitoring of
equipment and procedures involved in colonic therapy. The secretary shall
adopt rules establishing protocols for the delegation and supervision of
colonic therapy, including the qualifications of unlicensed persons performing
colonic therapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 18.36A RCW to read as follows:

From his or her office,
a naturopathic physician may compound, dispense, or sell naturopathic medicines
not commonly available by prescription to meet the needs of individual patients
on a case-by-case basis, excluding controlled substances or legend drugs.
Injectable medications shall not be compounded unless provided for by the
secretary in rule under the authority granted in RCW 18.36A.020(10).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 19.68 RCW to read as follows:

A naturopathic
physician, licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, is exempt from this chapter when
dispensing or selling naturopathic medicines or products from his or her own
office in accordance with the limitations and exclusions in section 9 of this
act.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.74.010 and 1997 c
275 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the board of physical therapy created by RCW 18.74.020.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Physical
therapy" means the treatment of any bodily or mental condition of any
person by the use of the physical, chemical, and other properties of heat,
cold, air, light, water, electricity, sound, massage, and therapeutic exercise,
which includes posture and rehabilitation procedures; the performance of tests
and measurements of neuromuscular function as an aid to the diagnosis or
treatment of any human condition; performance of treatments on the basis of
test findings after consultation with and periodic review by an authorized
health care practitioner except as provided in RCW 18.74.012; supervision of
selective forms of treatment by trained supportive personnel; and provision of
consultative services for health, education, and community agencies. The use
of Roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes, the use of
electricity for surgical purposes, including cauterization, and the use of
spinal manipulation or manipulative mobilization of the spine and its immediate
articulations, are not included under the term "physical therapy" as
used in this chapter.

(4) "Physical
therapist" means a person who practices physical therapy as defined in
this chapter but does not include massage operators as defined in RCW
18.108.010.

(5)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(6) Words importing the
masculine gender may be applied to females.

(7) "Authorized
health care practitioner" means and includes licensed physicians,
osteopathic physicians, chiropractors, ((naturopaths)) naturopathic
physicians, podiatric physicians and surgeons, dentists, and advanced
registered nurse practitioners: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall
be construed as altering the scope of practice of such practitioners as defined
in their respective licensure laws.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.120.020 and 2000
c 93 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Applicant
group" includes any health professional group or organization, any
individual, or any other interested party which proposes that any health professional
group not presently regulated be regulated or which proposes to substantially
increase the scope of practice of the profession.

(2)
"Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process
by which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual who
(a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that regulatory
entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title or
designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.

(3) "Grandfather
clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute applicable to
practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health profession prior to the
effective date of the regulatory statute which exempts the practitioners from
meeting the prerequisite qualifications set forth in the regulatory statute to
perform prescribed occupational tasks.

(4) "Health
professions" means and includes the following health and health-related
licensed or regulated professions and occupations: Podiatric medicine and
surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental
hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW; dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism
under chapter 18.30 RCW; dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing
instruments under chapter 18.35 RCW; ((naturopaths)) naturopathic
physicians under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and funeral directing under
chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter 18.50 RCW; nursing home
administration under chapter 18.52 RCW; optometry under chapters 18.53 and
18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter 18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery
under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A
RCW; medicine under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under
chapter 18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW; registered
nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists licensed under chapter
18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;
veterinarians and veterinary technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care
assistants under chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108
RCW; acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW; persons registered or
certified under chapter 18.19 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by
chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW; and nursing
assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW.

(5)
"Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by a
state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners' occupation is
being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public health, safety, and
welfare.

(6) "Legislative
committees of reference" means the standing legislative committees
designated by the respective rules committees of the senate and house of
representatives to consider proposed legislation to regulate health professions
not previously regulated.

(7)
"License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean
permission to engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful
in the state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed health
professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.

(8) "Professional
license" means an individual, nontransferable authorization to carry on a
health activity based on qualifications which include: (a) Graduation from an
accredited or approved program, and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying
examination or series of examinations.

(9)
"Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved knowledge and
skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a specified health
profession.

(10) "Public member"
means an individual who is not, and never was, a member of the health
profession being regulated or the spouse of a member, or an individual who does
not have and never has had a material financial interest in either the
rendering of the health professional service being regulated or an activity
directly related to the profession being regulated.

(11)
"Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency setting forth
the name and address of the practitioner; the location, nature and operation of
the health activity to be practiced; and, if required by the regulatory entity,
a description of the service to be provided.

(12) "Regulatory
entity" means any board, commission, agency, division, or other unit or
subunit of state government which regulates one or more professions,
occupations, industries, businesses, or other endeavors in this state.

(13) "State
agency" includes every state office, department, board, commission, regulatory
entity, and agency of the state, and, where provided by law, programs and
activities involving less than the full responsibility of a state agency.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.130.040 and 1999
c 335 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter
applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having
jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary
has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing
opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) ((Naturopaths))
Naturopathic physicians licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) Midwives licensed
under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv) Ocularists
licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v) Massage operators
and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi) Dental hygienists
licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii) Acupuncturists
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii) Radiologic
technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84
RCW;

(ix) Respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x) Persons registered
or certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered
as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing
assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Health care
assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv) Dietitians and
nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv) Chemical
dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi) Sex offender
treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii) Persons licensed
and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii) Persons
registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under RCW
18.48.020;

(xix) Denturists
licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;

(xx) Orthotists and
prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; and

(xxi) Surgical
technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW.

(b) The boards and
commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric medical
board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv) The board of
hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of
examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry
board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing
licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The board of
pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The medical
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing
licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of
physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of
occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing
licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining
board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter
18.83 RCW; and

(xiv) The veterinary
board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3) In addition to the
authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the
authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria
established in this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of
this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license
conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW
18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4) All
disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially
consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the
disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 14. RCW 43.70.470 and 1993 c
492 s 277 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may
establish by rule the conditions of participation in the liability insurance
program by retired primary care providers at clinics utilizing retired ((physicians
[primary care providers])) primary care providers for the purposes
of this section and RCW 43.70.460. These conditions shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:

(1) The participating
primary care provider associated with the clinic shall hold a valid license to
practice as a physician under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a ((naturopath))
naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW, an advanced registered nurse practitioner
under chapter 18.88 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, or other health
professionals as may be deemed in short supply in the health personnel resource
plan under chapter 28B.125 RCW. All primary care providers must be in
conformity with current requirements for licensure as a retired primary care
provider, including continuing education requirements;

(2) The participating
primary care provider shall limit the scope of practice in the clinic to
primary care. Primary care shall be limited to noninvasive procedures and
shall not include obstetrical care, or any specialized care and treatment.
Noninvasive procedures include injections, suturing of minor lacerations, and
incisions of boils or superficial abscesses. Primary dental care shall be
limited to diagnosis, oral hygiene, restoration, and extractions and shall not
include orthodontia, or other specialized care and treatment;

(3) The provision of
liability insurance coverage shall not extend to acts outside the scope of
rendering medical services pursuant to this section and RCW 43.70.460;

(4) The participating
primary care provider shall limit the provision of health care services to
primarily low-income persons provided that clinics may, but are not required
to, provide means tests for eligibility as a condition for obtaining health
care services;

(5) The participating
primary care provider shall not accept compensation for providing health care
services from patients served pursuant to this section and RCW 43.70.460, nor
from clinics serving these patients. "Compensation" shall mean any
remuneration of value to the participating primary care provider for services
provided by the primary care provider, but shall not be construed to include
any nominal copayments charged by the clinic, nor reimbursement of related
expenses of a participating primary care provider authorized by the clinic in
advance of being incurred; and

(6) The use of
mediation or arbitration for resolving questions of potential liability may be
used, however any mediation or arbitration agreement format shall be expressed
in terms clear enough for a person with a sixth grade level of education to
understand, and on a form no longer than one page in length.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. The department of health
shall conduct an analysis of the appropriateness of naturopathic physicians
using naturopathic techniques including, but not limited to, auricular, hand
therapy, and other practices that may overlap with the acupuncture scope of practice.
The secretary of health shall appoint a work group of affected parties which
shall identify areas that should require an endorsement to the naturopathic
license and what the requirements for such an endorsement should be. The
secretary shall report to the legislature on any needed legislative changes.
In addition, this report shall include an evaluation of the following:

(1) Establishing an
endorsement process to allow naturopaths to perform specific
acupuncture-related practices if they can demonstrate competency;

(2) Increasing the
naturopathic scope of practice to include these acupuncture-related practices
consistent with naturopathic medicine; and

(3) The appropriate
level of education, training, and experience needed to support any increase in
the scope of practice and any endorsement.

The report and proposed
legislation shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by January 14, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. The naturopathic advisory
committee in consultation with the Washington state board of pharmacy shall
develop parameters, including education and training requirements, for the use
of controlled substances authorized in this act. The parameters must be met by
the naturopathic physician prior to being authorized to prescribe controlled
substances under this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. Sections 1 through 14 of
this act take effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---