BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.410.010 and 1992
c 159 s 3 and 1992 c 60 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The state board of
education shall establish, publish, and enforce rules and regulations
determining eligibility for and certification of personnel employed in the
common schools of this state, including certification for emergency or
temporary, substitute or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits
as the board shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules
shall require that the initial application for certification shall require a
record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation at the
applicant's expense. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using
a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. The
superintendent of public instruction may waive the record check for any
applicant who has had a record check within the two years before application. The
rules shall permit a holder of a lapsed certificate but not a revoked or
suspended certificate to be employed on a conditional basis by a school district
with the requirement that the holder must complete any certificate renewal
requirements established by the state board of education within two years of
initial reemployment.

In establishing rules
pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American sign language the
state board shall consult with the national association of the deaf, "sign
instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state
association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.

The
superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such
rules and regulations and have the power to issue any certificates or permits
and revoke the same in accordance with board rules and regulations.

--- END ---