BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature affirms
its support for those recommendations of the performance audit of the public
mental health system conducted by the joint legislative audit and review
committee relating to: Improving the coordination of services for clients with
multiple needs; improving the consistency of client, service, and fiscal data
collected by the mental health division; replacing process-oriented
accountability activities with a uniform statewide outcome measurement system;
and using outcome information to identify and provide incentives for best
practices in the provision of public mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature supports
recommendations 1 through 10 and 12 through 14 of the mental health system
performance audit conducted by the joint legislative audit and review
committee. The legislature expects the department of social and health
services to work diligently within available funds to implement these recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. In addition to any
follow-up requirements prescribed by the joint legislative audit and review
committee, the department of social and health services shall submit reports to
the legislature on the status of the implementation of recommendations 1
through 10 and 12 through 14 of the performance audit report. The
implementation status reports must be submitted to appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by June 1, 2001, and each year thereafter
through 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The initial
implementation status reports must discuss the status of implementing
recommendations 1 through 8, which are due to be implemented by June 2001, and
must also include a plan for implementing recommendations 9, 10, and 12 through
14, which are due to be implemented subsequent to June 2001. The initial
implementation status report must also discuss what actions the department of
social and health services has taken and will take in the future in response to
recommendation 11 of the performance audit report.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The department of social
and health services shall conduct a longitudinal study of long-term client
outcomes to assess any changes in client status at two, five, and ten years.
The measures tracked shall include client change as a result of services,
employment and/or education, housing stability, criminal justice involvement,
and level of services needed. The department shall report these long-term
outcomes to the appropriate policy and fiscal committee of the legislature
annually beginning not later than December 31, 2004.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.24.015 and 1999 c
214 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to establish a community mental health program which shall help
people experiencing mental illness to retain a respected and productive
position in the community. This will be accomplished through programs which
provide for:

(1) Access to mental
health services for adults of the state who are acutely mentally ill,
chronically mentally ill, or seriously disturbed and children of the state who
are acutely mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed, or seriously
disturbed, which services recognize the special needs of underserved
populations, including minorities, children, the elderly, disabled, and
low-income persons. Access to mental health services shall not be limited by a
person's history of confinement in a state, federal, or local correctional
facility. It is also the purpose of this chapter to promote the early
identification of mentally ill children and to ensure that they receive the
mental health care and treatment which is appropriate to their developmental
level. This care should improve home, school, and community functioning,
maintain children in a safe and nurturing home environment, and should enable
treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs in accordance with
sound professional judgment while also recognizing parents' rights to
participate in treatment decisions for their children;

(2) Accountability of efficient
and effective services through statewide standards for monitoring and
reporting of client and system outcome information;

(3) Minimum service
delivery standards;

(4) Priorities for the
use of available resources for the care of the mentally ill;

(5) Coordination of
services within the department, including those divisions within the department
that provide services to children, between the department and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and among state mental hospitals, county
authorities, community mental health services, and other support services,
which shall to the maximum extent feasible also include the families of the
mentally ill, and other service providers; and

(6) Coordination of
services aimed at reducing duplication in service delivery and promoting
complementary services among all entities that provide mental health services
to adults and children.

It is the policy of the
state to encourage the provision of a full range of treatment and
rehabilitation services in the state for mental disorders. The legislature
intends to encourage the development of county-based and county-managed mental
health services with adequate local flexibility to assure eligible people in
need of care access to the least-restrictive treatment alternative appropriate
to their needs, and the availability of treatment components to assure continuity
of care. To this end, counties are encouraged to enter into joint operating
agreements with other counties to form regional systems of care which integrate
planning, administration, and service delivery duties assigned to counties
under chapters 71.05 and 71.24 RCW to consolidate administration, reduce
administrative layering, and reduce administrative costs.

It is further the
intent of the legislature to integrate the provision of services to provide
continuity of care through all phases of treatment. To this end the
legislature intends to promote active engagement with mentally ill persons and
collaboration between families and service providers.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.24.035 and 1999 c
10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is
designated as the state mental health authority.

(2) The secretary may
provide for public, client, and licensed service provider participation in
developing the state mental health program.

(3) The secretary shall
provide for participation in developing the state mental health program for
children and other underserved populations, by including representatives on any
committee established to provide oversight to the state mental health program.

(4) The secretary shall
be designated as the county authority if a county fails to meet state minimum
standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.

(5) The secretary
shall:

(a) Develop a biennial
state mental health program that incorporates county biennial needs assessments
and county mental health service plans and state services for mentally ill
adults and children. The secretary may also develop a six-year state mental health
plan;

(b) Assure that any
county community mental health program provides access to treatment for the
county's residents in the following order of priority: (i) The acutely
mentally ill; (ii) chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally
disturbed children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs shall
provide:

(A) Outpatient
services;

(B) Emergency care
services for twenty-four hours per day;

(C) Day treatment for
mentally ill persons which includes training in basic living and social skills,
supported work, vocational rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services
may include therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment
includes age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;

(D) Screening for
patients being considered for admission to state mental health facilities to
determine the appropriateness of admission;

(E) Employment
services, which may include supported employment, transitional work, placement
in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in
mentally ill persons becoming engaged in meaningful and gainful full or
part-time work. Other sources of funding such as the division of vocational
rehabilitation may be utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and
provide for integration of services;

(F) Consultation and
education services; and

(G) Community support
services;

(c) Develop and adopt
rules establishing state minimum standards for the delivery of mental health
services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037 including, but not limited to:

(i) Licensed service
providers;

(ii) Regional support
networks; and

(iii) Residential and
inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and facilities under
chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and community support
services;

(d) Assure that the
special needs of minorities, the elderly, disabled, children, and low-income
persons are met within the priorities established in this section;

(e) Establish a
standard contract or contracts, consistent with state minimum standards, which
shall be used by the counties;

(f) Establish, to the
extent possible, a standardized auditing procedure which minimizes paperwork
requirements of county authorities and licensed service providers;

(g) Develop and
maintain an information system to be used by the state, counties, and regional
support networks that includes a tracking method which allows the department
and regional support networks to identify mental health clients' participation
in any mental health service or public program on an immediate basis. The
information system shall not include individual patient's case history files.
Confidentiality of client information and records shall be maintained as
provided in this chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.400, 71.05.410, 71.05.420,
71.05.430, and 71.05.440;

(h) License service
providers who meet state minimum standards;

(i) Certify regional
support networks that meet state minimum standards;

(j) Periodically
inspect certified regional support networks and licensed service providers at
reasonable times and in a reasonable manner;

(k) Fix fees to be paid
by evaluation and treatment centers to the secretary for the required
inspections;

(l) Monitor and audit
counties, regional support networks, and licensed service providers as needed
to assure compliance with contractual agreements authorized by this chapter;
and

(m) Adopt such rules as
are necessary to implement the department's responsibilities under this
chapter.

(6) The secretary shall
use available resources only for regional support networks.

(7) Each certified
regional support network and licensed service provider shall file with the
secretary, on request, such data, statistics, schedules, and information as the
secretary reasonably requires. A certified regional support network or
licensed service provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent reports
thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or suspended.

(8) The secretary may
suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a certification or license, or refuse to
grant a certification or license for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b)
applicable rules and regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state
minimum standards.

(9) The superior court
may restrain any regional support network or service provider from operating
without certification or a license or any other violation of this section. The
court may also review, pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW,
any denial, suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification
or license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of this
chapter.

(10) Upon petition by
the secretary, and after hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility,
the superior court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the
secretary authorizing him or her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the
records, books, and accounts of any regional support network or service
provider refusing to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.

(11) Notwithstanding
the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the secretary may file an action
for an injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to
restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional
support network or service provider without certification or a license under
this chapter.

(12) The standards for
certification of evaluation and treatment facilities shall include standards
relating to maintenance of good physical and mental health and other services
to be afforded persons pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34
RCW, and shall otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these
chapters.

(13)(a) The department,
in consultation with affected parties, shall establish a distribution formula
that reflects county needs assessments based on the number of persons who are
acutely mentally ill, chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed
children, and seriously disturbed. The formula shall take into consideration
the impact on counties of demographic factors in counties which result in
concentrations of priority populations as set forth in subsection (5)(b) of
this section. These factors shall include the population concentrations
resulting from commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW to state
psychiatric hospitals, as well as concentration in urban areas, at border
crossings at state boundaries, and other significant demographic and workload
factors.

(b) The formula shall also
include a projection of the funding allocations that will result for each
county, which specifies allocations according to priority populations,
including the allocation for services to children and other underserved
populations.

(c) The department may
allocate up to two percent of total funds to be distributed to the regional
support networks for incentive payments to reward the achievement of superior
outcomes, or significantly improved outcomes, as measured by a statewide
performance measurement system consistent with the framework recommended in the
joint legislative audit and review committee's performance audit of the mental
health system. The department shall annually report to the legislature on its
criteria and allocation of the incentives provided under this subsection.

(14) The secretary
shall assume all duties assigned to the nonparticipating counties under
chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW. Such responsibilities shall include
those which would have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties under
regional support networks.

The regional support
networks, or the secretary's assumption of all responsibilities under chapters
71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be included in all state and federal plans
affecting the state mental health program including at least those required by
this chapter, the medicaid program, and P.L. 99‑660. Nothing in these
plans shall be inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.

(15) The secretary
shall:

(a) Disburse funds for
the regional support networks within sixty days of approval of the biennial
contract. The department must either approve or reject the biennial contract
within sixty days of receipt.

(b) Enter into biennial
contracts with regional support networks. The contracts shall be consistent
with available resources. No contract shall be approved that does not include
progress toward meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility
for: (i) Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.

(c) Allocate one
hundred percent of available resources to the regional support networks in
accordance with subsection (13) of this section. Incentive payments
authorized under subsection (13) of this section may be allocated separately
from other available resources.

(d) Notify regional
support networks of their allocation of available resources at least sixty days
prior to the start of a new biennial contract period.

(e) Deny funding
allocations to regional support networks based solely upon formal findings of
noncompliance with the terms of the regional support network's contract with
the department. Written notice and at least thirty days for corrective action
must precede any such action. In such cases, regional support networks shall
have full rights to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(f) Identify in its
departmental biennial operating and capital budget requests the funds requested
by regional support networks to implement their responsibilities under this
chapter.

(g) Establish a maximum
percentage for the reasonable administrative costs, not including direct
service support, of licensed service providers.

(16) The department, in
cooperation with the state congressional delegation, shall actively seek
waivers of federal requirements and such modifications of federal regulations
as are necessary to allow federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided
by free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter
71.05 RCW. The department shall periodically report its efforts to the health
care and corrections committee of the senate and the human services committee
of the house of representatives.

(17) The secretary
shall establish a task force to examine the recruitment, training, and
compensation of qualified mental health professionals in the community, which
shall include the advantages and disadvantages of establishing a training
academy, loan forgiveness program, or educational stipends offered in exchange
for commitments of employment in mental health.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---