BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that airports are critical to the statewide transportation infrastructure. The
2000 Washington Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation reported that the
state has no plans in place today that, if implemented, would yield results
that would meet the long-term transportation needs of the state. The
long-standing lack of consensus on how to solve Washington's transportation
problems should be resolved through a reasonable process. The legislature
intends the airport siting council to site airports that will ensure the
long-term air transportation needs of Washington state are met and are in
compliance with applicable public health, environmental and land use laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) If the transportation
commission declares an impasse under section 3 or 4 of this act, the governor
shall appoint an airport siting council. The council will consist of the
following members: (a) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, or a designee; (b) a member of the transportation
commission appointed by the governor, who shall be the chair of the council;
(c) two members of the general public with special knowledge or background in
airport issues, appointed by the governor; and (d) a member of a growth
management hearings board, selected by the governor.

The member of a growth
management hearings board must be a member of the growth management hearings
board that hears appeals from actions taken under the Growth Management Act by
counties not located in the region in which the proposed airport project under
consideration is located or that is subject to the proposed transportation plan
under consideration.

(2) The chair of the
council may designate another councilmember to serve as the acting chair in the
absence of the chair. The department of transportation shall provide all
administrative and staff support for the council.

(3) The airport siting
council appointed in response to a specific finding of an impasse under section
3 or 4 of this act must be disbanded once the governor has informed the council
of his decision under section 6 of this act regarding the council's airport
siting recommendations concerning the impasse. If, at a later date, the
transportation commission declares another impasse the governor shall appoint
another airport siting council consistent with subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If the transportation
commission finds that all of the following have occurred, it shall declare an
impasse and refer the issue to the airport siting council: (1) A regional
transportation plan does not satisfactorily address the state's interest as
defined in RCW 47.06.040 with respect to planning for transportation needs
through siting of an airport; (2) there has been ample time to address siting
of an airport in the regional transportation plan and local comprehensive
plans, but either no decision has been reached or the process has resulted in a
decision that will not address the state's transportation needs as set forth in
RCW 47.06.040; (3) the department of transportation has sought by all
reasonable means to encourage local governments and regional bodies to
cooperate in a planning and decision-making process that addresses in a timely
manner statewide airport siting needs; (4) the transportation commission has
notified the local governments and regional bodies responsible for the regional
transportation plan of its intent to declare an impasse; and (5) the local
governments and regional bodies responsible for the regional transportation
plan have failed to show cause within thirty days of such notification that an
impasse should not be declared.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The transportation
commission must declare an impasse by August 1, 2001, regarding the search for
a supplemental airport in the Puget Sound region or replacement for
Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The airport siting
council shall convene to make recommendations to the governor whenever the
transportation commission passes a resolution declaring that an impasse exists
in the siting of an airport of statewide significance, as provided in section 3
of this act. The council has eighteen months after the date on which the
transportation commission resolution is passed to make a recommendation
regarding the siting of the airport of statewide significance and to
communicate its recommendation in writing to the governor.

(2) The responsibility
of the council is to make airport siting recommendations that reflect the
interest of the entire state. Accordingly, the council is not limited to the
options examined by the regional or local authority, and may also consider
alternative sites outside the region. In forming its recommendation the
council shall review existing information and analyses regarding the siting
issue, including both technical data and the decision-making process that
failed to produce a resolution. The council may also hire staff for technical
evaluation, analysis, and research associated with the preparation of its
siting recommendation. The council may also consider relationships between the
proposed facility and other existing or planned transportation facilities of
statewide interest such as airports, rail services, ferry systems, or highways.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The governor must
accept or reject the siting council's recommendation within sixty days. If the
governor rejects the siting council's recommendation, he or she may request the
siting council to provide an alternative recommendation within thirty days.
The governor has another sixty days to accept or reject the siting council's
alternative recommendation. Once the governor has made a decision, the
governor must inform in writing the members of the airport siting council, the
transportation commission, the chair(s) of the legislative transportation
committee, the county or city affected, and the regional transportation
planning organization located in the region in which the transportation project
will be sited.

(2) Subject to the
conditions set forth in section 8(2) of this act, a decision by the governor
binds the state and each of its political subdivisions, such as departments,
agencies, divisions, bureaus, commissions, boards, counties, cities, towns,
ports, and special districts, whether a political subdivision is a member of
the council or not, regarding approval of a site and the construction and
operation of a proposed airport.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The legislature may
invalidate the governor's decision if two-thirds of each house votes to object
to his or her choice of sites. The legislature must vote by the end of the
legislative session convened after the governor's decision. This will ensure
that the legislature has at least one full legislative session for
deliberation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) This chapter
supersedes other laws for establishing the location of airports of statewide
significance or rules adopted under state law for establishing the location of
airports of statewide significance.

(2) However, the
requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under it do not supersede the
State Environmental Policy Act, the State Clean Air Act, the State Clean Water
Act, the Shoreline Management Act, the laws relating to solid and hazardous
waste management, and all the related portions of the Washington Administrative
Code that implement these environmental laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 47.06 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
declares to be of statewide significance any airports designated by the
department as included in its plan as determined by its own functional
classification system and criteria. The department shall assert leadership and
cooperate with regional transportation planning organizations, counties,
cities, transit agencies, public ports, and the private sector, by including in
the state's multimodal transportation plan improvements to transportation
facilities and services of statewide significance. Improvements to facilities
and services of statewide significance identified in the statewide multimodal
transportation plan developed under RCW 47.01.071(3) are considered essential public
facilities under RCW 36.70A.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 47.80 RCW to read as follows:

The regional
transportation planning organization must adopt a regional transportation plan
that adequately implements the decision of the governor to site an airport of
statewide significance, as provided in section 6 of this act.

Sec. 11. RCW 36.70A.200 and 1998
c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The comprehensive
plan of each county and city that is planning under this chapter shall include
a process for identifying and siting essential public facilities. Essential
public facilities include those facilities that are typically difficult to site,
such as airports, state education facilities and state or regional
transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local
correctional facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient
facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, and
group homes. If the process of siting an airport fails, the airport shall
be sited by the process set forth in chapter 47.-- RCW (sections 1 through 8 of
this act).

(2) The office of
financial management shall maintain a list of those essential state public
facilities that are required or likely to be built within the next six years.
The office of financial management may at any time add facilities to the list.
No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may preclude the siting
of essential public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The sum of five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the multimodal fund to the department
of transportation for the purposes of section 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

---
END ---