BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.82.040 and 1998 c
247 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Once a WRIA
planning unit has been initiated under RCW 90.82.060 and a lead agency has been
designated, it shall notify the department and may apply to the department for
funding assistance for conducting the planning. Funds shall be provided from
and to the extent of appropriations made by the legislature to the department
expressly for this purpose.

(2)(a) Each
planning unit that has complied with subsection (1) of this section is eligible
to receive watershed planning grants in the following amounts for three phases
of watershed planning:

(((a))) (i)
Initiating governments may apply for an initial organizing grant of up to fifty
thousand dollars for a single WRIA or up to seventy-five thousand dollars for a
multi-WRIA management area in accordance with RCW 90.82.060(4);

(((b))) (ii)
A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred thousand dollars for each WRIA
in the management area for conducting watershed assessments in accordance with
RCW 90.82.070, except that a planning unit whose initiating governments
choose to include an instream flow, water quality, or habitat component in
accordance with RCW 90.82.080 through 90.82.100 may apply for additional funds
of up to one hundred thousand dollars for each component included to conduct
assessments directly related to that component; and

(((c))) (iii)
A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars for each
WRIA in the management area for developing a watershed plan and making
recommendations for actions by local, state, and federal agencies, tribes,
private property owners, private organizations, and individual citizens,
including a recommended list of strategies and projects that would further the
purpose of the plan in accordance with RCW 90.82.060 through 90.82.100.

(b) A planning unit
may request a different amount for phase two or phase three of watershed
planning than is specified in (a) of this subsection, provided that the total
amount of funds awarded do not exceed the maximum amount the planning unit is
eligible for under (a) of this subsection. The department shall not approve an
alternate allocation of funds unless the planning unit demonstrates that an
alternate allocation will not impair the unit's ability to complete a plan in
accordance with this chapter.

(3)(a) The department
shall use the eligibility criteria in this subsection (3) instead of rules,
policies, or guidelines when evaluating grant applications at each stage of the
grants program.

(b) In reviewing grant
applications under this subsection (3), the department shall evaluate whether:

(i) The planning unit
meets all of the requirements of this chapter;

(ii) The application
demonstrates a need for state planning funds to accomplish the objectives of
the planning process; and

(iii) The application
and supporting information evidences a readiness to proceed.

(c) In ranking grant
applications submitted at each stage of the grants program, the department
shall give preference to applications in the following order of priority:

(i) Applications from
existing planning groups that have been in existence for at least one year;

(ii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds that have
aquatic fish species listed or proposed to be listed as endangered or
threatened under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et
seq. and for which there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water
for population and economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning;

(iii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds or for which
there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water for population and
economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning.

(d) The department may
not impose any local matching fund requirement as a condition for grant
eligibility or as a preference for receiving a grant.

(4) The department may
retain up to one percent of funds allocated under this section to defray
administrative costs.

(5) Planning under this
chapter should be completed as expeditiously as possible, with the focus being
on local stakeholders cooperating to meet local needs.

(6) Funding provided
under this section shall be considered a contractual obligation against the moneys
appropriated for this purpose.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.82.130 and 1998 c
247 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon completing
its proposed watershed plan, the planning unit may approve the proposal by
consensus of all of the members of the planning unit or by consensus among the
members of the planning unit appointed to represent units of government and a
majority vote of the nongovernmental members of the planning unit.

(b) If the proposal is
approved by the planning unit, the unit shall submit the proposal to the
counties with territory within the management area. If the planning unit has
received funding beyond the initial fifty thousand dollars under RCW 90.82.040,
such a proposal approved by the planning unit shall be submitted to the
counties within four years of the date ((the)) that funds beyond the
initial funding ((was)) are first ((received)) drawn
upon by the planning unit.

(c) If the watershed
plan is not approved by the planning unit, the planning unit may submit the
components of the plan for which agreement is achieved using the procedure
under (a) of this subsection, or the planning unit may terminate the planning
process.

(2)(a) The legislative
authority of each of the counties with territory in the management area shall
provide public notice of and conduct at least one public hearing on the
proposed watershed plan submitted under this section. After the public
hearings, the legislative authorities of these counties shall convene in joint
session to consider the proposal. The counties may approve or reject the
proposed watershed plan for the management area, but may not amend it.
Approval of such a proposal shall be made by a majority vote of the members of
each of the counties with territory in the management area.

(b) If a proposed
watershed plan is not approved, it shall be returned to the planning unit with
recommendations for revisions. Approval of such a revised proposal by the
planning unit and the counties shall be made in the same manner provided for
the original watershed plan. If approval of the revised plan is not achieved,
the process shall terminate.

(3) The planning unit
shall not add an element to its watershed plan that creates an obligation
unless each of the governments to be obligated has at least one representative
on the planning unit and the respective members appointed to represent those
governments agree to adding the element that creates the obligation. A
member's agreeing to add an element shall be evidenced by a recorded vote of
all members of the planning unit in which the members record support for adding
the element. If the watershed plan is approved under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section and the plan creates obligations: (a) For agencies of state
government, the agencies shall adopt by rule the obligations of both state and
county governments and rules implementing the state obligations, the
obligations on state agencies are binding upon adoption of the obligations into
rule, and the agencies shall take other actions to fulfill their obligations as
soon as possible; or (b) for counties, the obligations are binding on the
counties and the counties shall adopt any necessary implementing ordinances and
take other actions to fulfill their obligations as soon as possible.

(4) As used in this
section, "obligation" means any action required as a result of this
chapter that imposes upon a tribal government, county government, or state
government, either: A fiscal impact; a redeployment of resources; or a change of
existing policy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---