BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of private sector cultured aquatic products
as defined in RCW 15.85.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of amusement and recreation services that
consist primarily of the opportunity to fish in waters on the seller's own land
or on land in which the seller has a present right of possession, regardless of
whether charges for the services are based on entry or on the number, size, or
weight of the fish caught, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter do not apply with respect to the use of private sector cultured aquatic
products as defined in RCW 15.85.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---