BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 23B.16.220 and 1993
c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each domestic
corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in
this state, shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing initial and
annual reports that set forth:

(a) The name of the
corporation and the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

(b) The street address
of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at that office in
this state;

(c) In the case of a
foreign corporation, the address of its principal office in the state or
country under the laws of which it is incorporated;

(d) The address of the
principal place of business of the corporation in this state;

(e) The names and
addresses of its directors, if the corporation has dispensed with or limited
the authority of its board of directors pursuant to RCW 23B.08.010, in an
agreement authorized under RCW 23B.07.320, or analogous authority, the names
and addresses of persons who will perform some or all of the duties of the
board of directors;

(f) A brief description
of the nature of its business; and

(g) The names and
addresses of its chairperson of the board of directors, if any, president,
secretary, and treasurer, or of individuals, however designated, performing the
functions of such officers.

(2) Information in an
initial report or an annual report must be current as of the date the report is
executed on behalf of the corporation.

(3) A corporation's
initial report must be delivered to the secretary of state within one hundred
twenty days of the date on which the articles of incorporation for a domestic
corporation were filed, or on which a foreign corporation's certificate of
authority was filed. Subsequent annual reports must be delivered to the
secretary of state on, or prior to, the date on which the domestic or foreign
corporation is required to pay its annual corporate license fee, and at such
additional times as the corporation elects.

(4)(a) The secretary
of state may allow a corporation to file an annual report through electronic
means. If allowed, the secretary of state shall adopt rules detailing the
circumstances under which the electronic filing of such reports shall be
permitted and how such reports may be filed.

(b) For purposes of
this section only, a person executing an electronically filed annual report may
deliver the report to the office of the secretary of state without a signature
and without an exact or conformed copy, but the person's name must appear in
the electronic filing as the person executing the filing, and the filing must
state the capacity in which the person is executing the filing.

Sec. 2. RCW 25.15.105 and 1994 c
211 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each domestic
limited liability company, and each foreign limited liability company
authorized to transact business in this state, shall deliver to the secretary
of state for filing, both initial and annual reports that set forth:

(a) The name of the
company and the state or country under whose law it is organized;

(b) The street address
of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at that office in
this state;

(c) In the case of a
foreign company, the address of its principal office in the state or country
under the laws of which it is organized;

(d) The address of the
principal place of business of the company in this state;

(e) The names and
addresses of the company's members, or if the management of the company is
vested in a manager or managers, then the name and address of its manager or
managers; and

(f) A brief description
of the nature of its business.

(2) Information in an
initial report or an annual report must be current as of the date the report is
executed on behalf of the company.

(3) A company's initial
report must be delivered to the secretary of state within one hundred twenty
days of the date on which a domestic company's certificate of formation was
filed, or on which a foreign company's application for registration was
submitted. Subsequent annual reports must be delivered to the secretary of
state on a date determined by the secretary of state, and at such additional
times as the company elects.

(4)(a) The secretary
of state may allow a company to file an annual report through electronic
means. If allowed, the secretary of state shall adopt rules detailing the
circumstances under which the electronic filing of such reports shall be
permitted and how such reports may be filed.

(b) For purposes of
this section only, a person executing an electronically filed annual report may
deliver the report to the office of the secretary of state without a signature
and without an exact or conformed copy, but the person's name must appear in
the electronic filing as the person executing the filing, and the filing must
state the capacity in which the person is executing the filing.

Sec. 3. RCW 25.15.085 and 1995 c
337 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each document
required by this chapter to be filed in the office of the secretary of state
shall be executed in the following manner, except as set forth in RCW
25.15.105(4)(b):

(a) Each original
certificate of formation must be signed by the person or persons forming the
limited liability company;

(b) A reservation of
name may be signed by any person;

(c) A transfer of
reservation of name must be signed by, or on behalf of, the applicant for the
reserved name;

(d) A registration of
name must be signed by any member or manager of the foreign limited liability
company;

(e) A certificate of
amendment or restatement must be signed by at least one manager, or by a member
if management of the limited liability company is reserved to the members;

(f) A certificate of
cancellation must be signed by the person or persons authorized to wind up the
limited liability company's affairs pursuant to RCW 25.15.295(1);

(g) If a surviving
domestic limited liability company is filing articles of merger, the articles
of merger must be signed by at least one manager, or by a member if management
of the limited liability company is reserved to the members, or if the articles
of merger are being filed by a surviving foreign limited liability company,
limited partnership, or corporation, the articles of merger must be signed by a
person authorized by such foreign limited liability company, limited
partnership, or corporation; and

(h) A foreign limited
liability company's application for registration as a foreign limited liability
company doing business within the state must be signed by any member or manager
of the foreign limited liability company.

(2) Any person may sign
a certificate, articles of merger, limited liability company agreement, or
other document by an attorney-in-fact or other person acting in a valid
representative capacity, so long as each document signed in such manner
identifies the capacity in which the signator signed.

(3) The person
executing the document shall sign it and state beneath or opposite the
signature the name of the person and capacity in which the person signs. The
document must be typewritten or printed, and must meet such legibility or other
standards as may be prescribed by the secretary of state.

(4) The
execution of a certificate or articles of merger by any person constitutes an
affirmation under the penalties of perjury that the facts stated therein are
true.

Sec. 4. RCW 25.15.095 and 1994 c
211 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The original signed
copy, together with a duplicate copy that may be either a signed, photocopied,
or conformed copy, of the certificate of formation or any other document
required to be filed pursuant to this chapter, except as set forth under RCW
25.15.105, shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary
of state determines that the documents conform to the filing provisions of this
chapter, he or she shall, when all required filing fees have been paid:

(a) Endorse on each
signed original and duplicate copy the word "filed" and the date of
its acceptance for filing;

(b) Retain the signed
original in the secretary of state's files; and

(c) Return the
duplicate copy to the person who filed it or the person's representative.

(2) If the secretary of
state is unable to make the determination required for filing by subsection (1)
of this section at the time any documents are delivered for filing, the
documents are deemed to have been filed at the time of delivery if the
secretary of state subsequently determines that:

(a) The documents as
delivered conform to the filing provisions of this chapter; or

(b) Within twenty days
after notification of nonconformance is given by the secretary of state to the
person who delivered the documents for filing or the person's representative,
the documents are brought into conformance.

(3) If the filing and
determination requirements of this chapter are not satisfied completely within
the time prescribed in subsection (2)(b) of this section, the documents shall
not be filed.

(4) Upon the filing of
a certificate of amendment (or judicial decree of amendment) or restated
certificate in the office of the secretary of state, or upon the future
effective date or time of a certificate of amendment (or judicial decree
thereof) or restated certificate, as provided for therein, the certificate of
formation shall be amended or restated as set forth therein. Upon the filing
of a certificate of cancellation (or a judicial decree thereof), or articles of
merger which act as a certificate of cancellation, or upon the future effective
date or time of a certificate of cancellation (or a judicial decree thereof) or
of articles of merger which act as a certificate of cancellation, as provided
for therein, or as specified in RCW 25.15.290, the certificate of formation is
canceled.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2001.

---
END ---