BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.0201 and 1992
c 194 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Before January 1, 1994,
and January 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter:

The
department of licensing, with the assistance of the department of revenue,
shall provide the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of
the legislature with an updated estimate of the amount of revenue attributable
to the taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.020(2)((, and the amount of revenue not
collected as a result of RCW 82.44.023)).

--- END ---