BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.04.015 and 1992 c
103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of
this state and the purpose of this chapter:

(a) To promote the
dependability of information which is used for guidance in financial
transactions or for accounting for or assessing the status or performance of
commercial and noncommercial enterprises, whether public, private or
governmental; and

(b) To protect the
public interest by requiring that:

(i) Persons who hold
themselves out ((to the public)) as ((certified public accountants who
offer to perform, or perform for clients, professional services, including but
not limited to one or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or
auditing skills, including the issuance of "audit reports,"
"review reports," or "compilation reports" on financial
statements, or one or more kinds of management advisory, or consulting
services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax
matters, perform such services)) licensees or certificate holders
conduct themselves in a competent, ethical, and professional manner;

(ii) A public authority
be established that is competent to prescribe and assess the qualifications of
certified public accountants, including certificate holders who are not
licensed for the practice of public accounting;

(iii) Persons other
than ((certified public accountants)) licensees refrain from
using the words "audit," "review," and
"compilation" when designating a report customarily prepared by
someone knowledgeable in accounting; ((and))

(iv) A public
authority be established to provide for consumer alerts and public protection
information to be published regarding persons or firms who violate the
provisions of this act or board rule and to provide general consumer protection
information to the public; and

(v) The use of
accounting titles likely to confuse the public be prohibited.

(2) The purpose of
this act is to make revisions to chapter 234, Laws of 1983 and chapter 103,
Laws of 1992 to: Fortify the public protection provisions of this act;
establish one set of qualifications to be a licensee; revise the regulations of
certified public accountants; make revisions in the ownership of certified
public accounting firms; assure to the greatest extent possible that certified
public accountants from Washington state are substantially equivalent with
certified public accountants in other states and can therefore perform the
duties of certified public accountants in as many states and countries as
possible; assure certified public accountants from other states and countries
have met qualifications that are substantially equivalent to the certified
public accountant qualifications of this state; and clarify the authority of
the board of accountancy with respect to the activities of persons holding
licenses and certificates under this chapter. It is not the intent of this act
to in any way restrict or limit the activities of persons not holding licenses
or certificates under this chapter except as otherwise specifically restricted
or limited by chapter 234, Laws of 1983 and chapter 103, Laws of 1992.

(3) A purpose of
chapter 103, Laws of 1992, revising provisions of chapter 234, Laws of 1983, is
to clarify the authority of the board of accountancy with respect to the
activities of persons holding certificates under this chapter. Furthermore, it
is not the intent of chapter 103, Laws of 1992 to in any way restrict or limit
the activities of persons not holding certificates under this chapter except as
otherwise specifically restricted or limited by chapter 234, Laws of 1983.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.04.025 and 1999 c
378 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the board of accountancy created by RCW 18.04.035.

(2) "Certificate
holder" means the holder of a certificate as a certified public accountant
who has not become a licensee, has maintained CPE requirements, and who does
not practice public accounting.

(3)
"Certified public accountant" or "CPA" means a person
holding a certified public accountant license or certificate.

(((3))) (4)
"State" includes the states of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam, and the United States Virgin Islands.

(((4))) (5)
"Reports on financial statements" means any reports or opinions
prepared by ((certified public accountants)) licensees, based on
services performed in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards,
standards for attestation engagements, or standards for accounting and review
services as to whether the presentation of information used for guidance in
financial transactions or for accounting for or assessing the status or
performance of commercial and noncommercial enterprises, whether public, private,
or governmental, conforms with generally accepted accounting principles or
other comprehensive bases of accounting. "Reports on financial
statements" does not include services referenced in RCW 18.04.350(6)
provided by persons not holding a license under this chapter.

(((5))) (6)
The "practice of public accounting" means performing or offering to
perform by a person or firm holding itself out to the public as a licensee, for
a client or potential client, one or more kinds of services involving the use of
accounting or auditing skills, including the issuance of "audit
reports," "review reports," or "compilation reports"
on financial statements, or one or more kinds of management advisory, or
consulting services, or the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of
advice on tax matters. The "practice of public accounting" shall not
include practices that are permitted under the provisions of RCW 18.04.350(6)
by persons or firms not required to be licensed under this chapter.

(((6))) (7)
"Firm" means a sole proprietorship, a corporation, or a partnership.
"Firm" also means a limited liability company formed under chapter
25.15 RCW.

(((7))) (8)
"CPE" means continuing professional education.

(((8))) (9)
"Certificate" means a certificate as a certified public accountant
issued prior to July 1, 2001, as authorized under the provisions of
this chapter((, or a corresponding certificate issued by another state or
foreign jurisdiction that is recognized in accordance with the reciprocity
provisions of RCW 18.04.180 and 18.04.183)).

(((9))) (10)
"Licensee" means the holder of a ((valid)) license to
practice public accountancy issued under this chapter.

(((10))) (11)
"License" means a license to practice public accountancy issued to an
individual under this chapter, or a license issued to a firm
under this chapter.

(((11))) (12)
"Manager" means a manager of a limited liability company licensed as
a firm under this chapter.

(13)
"NASBA" means the national association of state boards of
accountancy.

(14) "Quality
assurance review" means a process established by and conducted at the
direction of the board of study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of
the ((professional)) attest work of a ((person)) licensee
or licensed firm in the practice of public accountancy, by a person or
persons who hold ((certificates)) licenses and who are not
affiliated with the person or firm being reviewed.

(((12) "Quality
review")) (15) "Peer review" means a study,
appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the ((professional)) attest
work of a ((person)) licensee or licensed firm in the
practice of public accountancy, by a person or persons who hold ((certificates))
licenses and who are not affiliated with the person or firm being reviewed,
including a peer review, or any internal review or inspection intended to
comply with quality control policies and procedures, but not including the
"quality assurance review" under subsection (((11))) (14)
of this section.

(((13))) (16)
"Review committee" means any person carrying out, administering or
overseeing a ((quality)) peer review authorized by the reviewee.

(((14))) (17)
"Rule" means any rule adopted by the board under authority of this
chapter.

(((15))) (18)
"Holding out" means any representation to the public by the use of
restricted titles as set forth in RCW 18.04.345 by a person or firm that the
person or firm ((is a certified public accountant)) holds a license
under this chapter and that the person or firm offers to perform any professional
services to the public as a ((certified public accountant)) licensee.
"Holding out" shall not affect or limit ((a person not required to
hold a certificate under this chapter or)) a person or firm not required to
hold a license under this chapter from engaging in practices identified in RCW
18.04.350(((6))).

(19) "Natural
person" means a living, human being.

(20)
"Inactive" means the certificate is in an inactive status because a
person who held a valid certificate before July 1, 2001, has not met the
current requirements of licensure and has been granted inactive certificate
holder status through an approval process established by the board.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.04.035 and 1992 c
103 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created a
board of accountancy for the state of Washington to be known as the Washington
state board of accountancy. Effective June 30, 2001, the board shall
consist of ((seven)) nine members appointed by the governor.
Members of the board shall include ((four)) six persons who ((hold
valid certified public accountant certificates and have been in public practice
as certified public accountants)) have been licensed in this state
continuously for the previous ten years ((and two persons who have held a
valid certified public accountant's certificate in this state for at least ten
years)). ((The seventh)) Three members shall be ((the))
public members ((and shall be a person who is)) qualified to
judge whether the qualifications, activities, and professional practice of
those regulated under this chapter conform with standards to protect the public
interest, including one public member qualified to represent the interests
of clients of individuals and firms licensed under this chapter.

(2) The members of the
board ((of accountancy)) shall be appointed by the governor to a term of
three years. Vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment
for the unexpired term. Upon the expiration of a member's term of office, the
member shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed and has
assumed office. The governor shall remove from the board any member whose ((certificate
or)) license to practice has been revoked or suspended and may, after
hearing, remove any member of the board for neglect of duty or other just
cause. No person who has served two successive complete terms is eligible for
reappointment. Appointment to fill an unexpired term is not considered a
complete term. In order to stagger their terms, of the two new appointments
made to the board upon June 11, 1992, the first appointed member shall serve a
term of two years initially.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.04.045 and 1992 c
103 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall annually
elect a chair, a vice-chair, and a secretary from its members.

(2) A majority of the
board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(3) The board shall
have a seal which shall be judicially noticed.

(4) The board shall
keep records of its proceedings, and of any proceeding in court arising from or
founded upon this chapter. Copies of these records certified as correct under
the seal of the board are admissible in evidence as tending to prove the content
of the records.

(5) The governor shall
appoint an executive director of the board, who shall serve at the pleasure of
the governor. The executive director may employ such personnel as is
appropriate for carrying out the purposes of this chapter. The executive
director shall hold a valid Washington ((CPA certificate)) license.
The board may arrange for such volunteer assistance as it requires to perform
its duties. Individuals or committees assisting the board constitute
volunteers for purposes of chapter 4.92 RCW.

(6) The board shall
file an annual report of its activities with the governor. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, a statement of all receipts and disbursements.
Upon request, the board shall mail a copy of each annual report to any member
of the public.

(7) In making
investigations concerning alleged violations of the provisions of this chapter
and in all proceedings under RCW 18.04.295 or chapter 34.05 RCW, the board
chair, or a member of the board, or a board designee acting in the chair's
place, may administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses appearing before the
board, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take testimony, and
require that documentary evidence be submitted.

(8) The board may
review the publicly available professional work of licensees on a general and
random basis, without any requirement of a formal complaint or suspicion of
impropriety on the part of any particular licensee. If as a result of such
review the board discovers reasonable grounds for a more specific
investigation, the board may proceed under its investigative and disciplinary
rules.

(9) The board may
provide for consumer alerts and public protection information to be published
regarding persons or firms who violate the provisions of this chapter or board
rule and may provide general consumer protection information to the public.

(10) As provided in
RCW 18.04.370, the board may enter into stipulated agreements and orders of
assurance with persons who have violated the provisions of RCW 18.04.345 or
certify the facts to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which such
person resides for criminal prosecution.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.04.055 and 1992 c
103 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may adopt and
amend rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the orderly conduct of its affairs.
The board shall prescribe rules consistent with this chapter as necessary to
implement this chapter. Included may be:

(1) Rules of procedure
to govern the conduct of matters before the board;

(2) Rules of
professional conduct for all ((certificate and license holders)) licensees,
certificate holders, and nonlicensee owners of licensed firms, in order to
establish and maintain high standards of competence and ethics ((of
certified public accountants)) including rules dealing with independence,
integrity, objectivity, and freedom from conflicts of interest;

(3) Rules specifying
actions and circumstances deemed to constitute holding oneself out as a
licensee in connection with the practice of public accountancy;

(4) Rules specifying
the manner and circumstances of the use of the titles "certified public
accountant" and "CPA," by holders of certificates who do not
also hold licenses under this chapter;

(5) Rules specifying
the educational requirements to take the certified public accountant
examination ((or for the issuance of the certificate or license of certified
public accountant));

(6) Rules designed to
ensure that ((certified public accountants')) licensees' "reports
on financial statements" meet the definitional requirements for that term
as specified in RCW 18.04.025;

(7) Requirements for ((continuing
professional education)) CPE to maintain or improve the professional
competence of ((certificate and license holders)) licensees as a
condition to maintaining their ((certificate or)) license ((to
practice)) and certificate holders as a condition to maintaining their
certificate under RCW 18.04.215;

(8) Rules governing ((sole
proprietors, partnerships, and corporations practicing public accounting)) firms
issuing or offering to issue reports on financial statements or using the title
"certified public accountant" or "CPA" including, but
not limited to, rules concerning their style, name, title, and affiliation with
any other organization, and establishing reasonable practice and ethical
standards to protect the public interest;

(9) The board may by
rule implement a quality assurance review program as a means to monitor
licensees' quality of practice and compliance with professional standards. The
board may exempt from such program, licensees who undergo periodic ((quality))
peer reviews in programs of the American Institute of Certified Public
Accountants, ((National Association of State Boards of Accountancy)) NASBA,
or other programs recognized and approved by the board;

(10) The board may by
rule require licensed firms to obtain professional liability insurance
if in the board's discretion such insurance provides additional and necessary
protection for the public; ((and))

(11) Rules
specifying the experience requirements in order to qualify for a license;

(12) Rules
specifying the requirements for certificate holders to qualify for a license
under this chapter which must include provisions for meeting CPE and experience
requirements prior to application for licensure;

(13) Rules
specifying the registration requirements, including ethics examination and fee
requirements, for resident nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of
licensed firms;

(14) Rules
specifying the ethics CPE requirements for certificate holders and owners of
licensed firms, including the process for reporting compliance with those
requirements;

(15) Rules
specifying the experience and CPE requirements for licensees offering or
issuing reports on financial statements; and

(16) Any other
rule which the board finds necessary or appropriate to implement this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.04.065 and 1992 c
103 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall set its
fees at a level adequate to pay the costs of administering this chapter. ((Beginning
in the 1993-95 biennium,)) All fees for ((certified public
accountants')) licenses, ((certificates,)) registrations of
nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of licensed firms,
renewals of licenses, renewals of registrations of nonlicensee partners,
shareholders, and managers of licensed firms, renewals of certificates, reinstatements
of lapsed licenses, reinstatements of lapsed certificates, reinstatements of
lapsed registrations of nonlicensee partners, shareholders, and managers of
licensed firms, and delinquent filings received under the authority of this
chapter shall be deposited in the certified public accountants' account created
by RCW 18.04.105. Appropriation from such account shall be made only for the
cost of administering the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.04.105 and 2000 c
171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The
certificate of "certified public accountant")) A license to
practice public accounting shall be granted by the board to any person:

(a) Who is of good
character. Good character, for purposes of this section, means lack of a
history of dishonest or felonious acts. The board may refuse to grant a ((certificate))
license on the ground of failure to satisfy this requirement only if
there is a substantial connection between the lack of good character of the
applicant and the professional and ethical responsibilities of a ((certified
public accountant)) licensee and if the finding by the board of lack
of good character is supported by a preponderance of evidence. When an
applicant is found to be unqualified for a ((certificate)) license
because of a lack of good character, the board shall furnish the applicant a
statement containing the findings of the board and a notice of the applicant's
right of appeal;

(b) Who has met the
educational standards established by rule as the board determines to be
appropriate;

((The board may, in
its discretion, waive the educational requirements for any person if it is
satisfied through review of documentation of successful completion of an
equivalency examination that the person's educational qualifications are an
acceptable substitute for the requirements of (b) of this subsection; and))

(c) Who has passed ((a
written)) an examination;

(d) Who has had one
year of experience which is gained:

(i) Through the use
of accounting, issuing reports on financial statements, management advisory,
financial advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills;

(ii) While employed
in government, industry, academia, or public practice; and

(iii) Meeting the
competency requirements in a manner as determined by the board to be
appropriate and established by board rule; and

(e) Who has paid
appropriate fees as established by rule by the board.

(2) The examination
described in subsection (1)(c) of this section ((shall be in writing, shall
be held twice a year, and)) shall test the applicant's knowledge of the
subjects of accounting and auditing, and other related fields the board may
specify by rule. The time for holding the examination is fixed by the board
and may be changed from time to time. The board shall prescribe by rule the
methods of applying for and taking the examination, including methods for
grading ((papers)) examinations and determining a passing grade
required of an applicant for a ((certificate)) license. The
board shall to the extent possible see to it that the grading of the
examination, and the passing grades, are uniform with those applicable to all
other states. The board may make use of all or a part of the uniform certified
public accountant examination and advisory grading service of the American
Institute of Certified Public Accountants and may contract with third parties
to perform administrative services with respect to the examination as the board
deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties under this chapter. The
board shall establish by rule provisions for transitioning to a new examination
structure or to a new media for administering the examination.

(3) ((An applicant
is required to pass all sections of the examination provided for in subsection
(2) of this section in order to qualify for a certificate. If at a given
sitting of the examination an applicant passes two or more but not all
sections, then the applicant shall be given credit for those sections that he
or she passed, and need not take those sections again: PROVIDED, That:

(a) The applicant
took all sections of the examination at that sitting;

(b) The applicant
attained a minimum grade of fifty on each section not passed at that sitting;

(c) The applicant
passes the remaining sections of the examination within six consecutive
examinations given after the one at which the first sections were passed;

(d) At each
subsequent sitting at which the applicant seeks to pass additional sections,
the applicant takes all sections not yet passed; and

(e) In order to
receive credit for passing additional sections in a subsequent sitting, the
applicant attains a minimum grade of fifty on sections written but not passed
on the sitting.

(4) The board may
waive or defer any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this section for
candidates transferring conditional CPA exam credits from other states or for
qualifying reciprocity certification applicants who met the conditioning
requirements of the state or foreign jurisdiction issuing their original
certificate.

(5))) The board shall charge each applicant an
examination fee for the initial examination ((under subsection (1) of this
section,)) or for reexamination ((under subsection (3) of this section
for each subject in which the applicant is reexamined)). The applicable
fee shall be paid by the person at the time he or she applies for examination,
reexamination, or evaluation of educational qualifications. Fees for
examination, reexamination, or evaluation of educational qualifications shall
be determined by the board under chapter 18.04 RCW. There is established in
the state treasury an account to be known as the certified public accountants'
account. All fees received from candidates to take any or all sections of the
certified public accountant examination shall be used only for costs related to
the examination.

(((6) Persons who on
June 30, 1986, held certified public accountant certificates previously issued
under the laws of this state shall not be required to obtain additional
certificates under this chapter, but shall otherwise be subject to this
chapter. Certificates previously issued shall, for all purposes, be considered
certificates issued under this chapter and subject to its provisions.

(7) A certificate of
a "certified public accountant" under this chapter is issued every
three years with renewal subject to requirements of continuing professional
education and payment of fees, prescribed by the board.

(8) The board shall
adopt rules providing for continuing professional education for certified
public accountants. The rules shall:

(a) Provide that a
certified public accountant shall verify to the board that he or she has
completed at least an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of continuing
professional education during the last three-year period to maintain the
certificate;

(b) Establish
continuing professional education requirements;

(c) Establish when
newly certificated public accountants shall verify that they have completed the
required continuing professional education;

(d) Provide that
failure to furnish verification of the completion of the continuing
professional education requirement shall make the certificate invalid and
subject to reinstatement, unless the board determines that the failure was due
to retirement, reasonable cause, or excusable neglect; and

(e) Provide for
transition from existing to new continuing professional education requirements.

(9) The board may
adopt by rule new CPE standards that differ from those in subsection (8) of
this section or RCW 18.04.215 if: (a) The new standards are consistent with
the continuing professional education standards of other states so as to
provide to the greatest extent possible, consistent national standards; and (b)
the new standards are at least as strict as the standards set forth in
subsection (8) of this section or RCW 18.04.215.))

(4) Persons who on
June 30, 2001, held valid certificates previously issued under this chapter
shall be deemed to be certificate holders, subject to the following:

(a) Certificate
holders may, prior to June 30, 2004, petition the board to become licensees by
documenting to the board that they have gained one year of experience through
the use of accounting, issuing reports on financial statements, management
advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills, without
regard to the eight-year limitation set forth in (b) of this subsection, while
employed in government, industry, academia, or public practice.

(b) Certificate
holders who do not petition to become licensees prior to June 30, 2004, may
after that date petition the board to become licensees by documenting to the
board that they have one year of experience acquired within eight years prior
to applying for a license through the use of accounting, issuing reports on
financial statements, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax
advisory, or consulting skills in government, industry, academia, or public
practice.

(c) Certificate
holders who petition the board pursuant to (a) or (b) of this subsection must
also meet competency requirements in a manner as determined by the board to be
appropriate and established by board rule.

(d) Any certificate
holder petitioning the board pursuant to (a) or (b) of this subsection to
become a licensee must submit to the board satisfactory proof of having
completed an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE during the
thirty-six months preceding the date of filing the petition.

(e) Any certificate
holder petitioning the board pursuant to (a) or (b) of this subsection to
become a licensee must pay the appropriate fees established by rule by the
board.

(5) Certificate
holders shall comply with the prohibition against the practice of public
accounting in RCW 18.04.345.

(6) Persons who on
June 30, 2001, held valid certificates previously issued under this chapter are
deemed to hold inactive certificates, subject to renewal as inactive
certificates, until they have petitioned the board to become licensees and have
met the requirements of subsection (4) of this section. No individual who did
not hold a valid certificate before July 1, 2001, is eligible to obtain an
inactive certificate.

(7) Persons deemed
to hold inactive certificates under subsection (6) of this section shall comply
with the prohibition against the practice of public accounting in subsection
(8)(b) of this section and RCW 18.04.345, but are not required to display the
term inactive as part of their title, as required by subsection (8)(a) of this
section until renewal. Certificates renewed to any persons after June 30,
2001, are inactive certificates and the inactive certificate holders are
subject to the requirements of subsection (8) of this section.

(8) Persons holding
an inactive certificate:

(a) Must use or
attach the term "inactive" whenever using the title CPA or certified
public accountant or referring to the certificate, and print the word
"inactive" immediately following the title, whenever the title is
printed on a business card, letterhead, or any other document, including
documents published or transmitted through electronic media, in the same font
and font size as the title; and

(b) Are prohibited
from practicing public accounting.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.04.180 and 1992 c
103 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board
shall issue a ((certificate to a holder of a certificate issued by another
state, or shall issue a certificate and)) license to a holder of a
certificate/valid license issued by another state that entitles the holder to
practice public accountancy, provided that:

(((1))) (a)
Such state makes similar provision to grant reciprocity to a holder of a ((certificate
or)) valid certificate ((and valid)) or license in
this state; ((and

(2))) (b) The applicant meets the ((continuing
professional education)) CPE requirements of RCW ((18.04.105(8)))
18.04.215(5); ((and

(3) If the
application is for a certificate only:

(a) The applicant
passed the examination required for issuance of his or her certificate with
grades that would have been passing grades at that time in this state; and

(b) The applicant:
Meets all current requirements in this state for issuance of a certificate at
the time application is made; or at the time of the issuance of the applicant's
certificate in the other state, met all the requirements then applicable in
this state; or

(4) If the
application is for a certificate and license:

(a))) (c) The applicant meets the good character
requirements of RCW 18.04.105(1)(a); and

(d) The
applicant passed the examination required for issuance of his or her
certificate or license with grades that would have been passing grades
at that time in this state((;)) and

(((b) The applicant:))
meets all current requirements in this state for issuance of a license
at the time application is made; or at the time of the issuance of the
applicant's license in the other state, met all the requirements then
applicable in this state; or has had five years of experience within the ten
years immediately preceding application in the practice of public accountancy
that meets the requirements prescribed by the board.

(2) The board may
accept NASBA's designation of the applicant as substantially equivalent to
national standards as meeting the requirement of subsection (1)(d) of this
section.

(3) A licensee who
has been granted a license under the reciprocity provisions of this section
shall notify the board within thirty days if the license or certificate issued
in the other jurisdiction has lapsed or if the status of the license or
certificate issued in the other jurisdiction becomes otherwise invalid.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.04.183 and 1999 c
378 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall grant a
((certificate or)) license as a certified public accountant to a holder
of a permit, license, or certificate issued by a foreign country's board,
agency, or institute, provided that:

(1) The foreign country
where the foreign permit, license, or certificate was issued is a party to an
agreement on trade with the United States that encourages the mutual
recognition of licensing and certification requirements for the provision of
covered services by the parties under the trade agreement; ((and))

(2) Such foreign
country's board, agency, or institute makes similar provision to allow a person
who holds a valid ((certificate)) license issued by this state to
obtain such foreign country's comparable permit, license, or certificate; ((and))

(3) The foreign permit,
license, or certificate:

(a) Was duly issued by
such foreign country's board, agency, or institute that regulates the practice
of public accountancy; and

(b) Is in good standing
at the time of the application; and

(c) Was issued upon the
basis of educational, examination, experience, and ethical requirements
substantially equivalent currently or at the time of issuance of the foreign
permit, license, or certificate to those in this state; ((and))

(4) The applicant has
within the thirty-six months prior to application completed an accumulation of
one hundred twenty hours of ((continuing professional education)) CPE
as required under RCW ((18.04.105(8))) 18.04.215(5). The board
shall provide for transition from existing to new ((continuing professional
education)) CPE requirements; ((and))

(5) ((If the
application is for a certificate:

(a))) The applicant's foreign permit, license, or
certificate was the type of permit, license, or certificate requiring the most
stringent qualifications if, in the foreign country, more than one type of
permit, license, or certificate is issued. This state's board shall decide
which are the most stringent qualifications; ((and

(b))) (6) The applicant has passed a written
examination or its equivalent, approved by the board, that tests knowledge in
the areas of United States accounting principles, auditing standards,
commercial law, income tax law, and Washington state rules of professional
ethics; ((or

(6) If the application
is for a certificate and license:

(a) The requirements
of subsections (1) through (5) of this section are satisfied;)) and

(((b))) (7)
The applicant has within the ((five)) eight years prior to
applying for ((the certificate and)) a license under this
section, demonstrated, in accordance with the rules issued by the board, one
year of public accounting experience, within the foreign country where the
foreign permit, license, or certificate was issued, equivalent to the
experience required under RCW 18.04.215(1)(a) or such other experience or
employment which the board in its discretion regards as substantially
equivalent.

The board may adopt by
rule new CPE standards that differ from those in subsection (4) of this section
or RCW 18.04.215 if the new standards are consistent with the ((continuing
professional education)) CPE standards of other states so as to
provide to the greatest extent possible, consistent national standards.

A licensee who has
been granted a license under the reciprocity provisions of this section shall
notify the board within thirty days if the permit, license, or certificate
issued in the other jurisdiction has lapsed or if the status of the permit,
license, or certificate issued in the other jurisdiction becomes otherwise
invalid.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.04.185 and 1999 c
378 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1) Application
for certification as certified public accountants by persons who are not
residents of this state constitutes appointment of the secretary of state as an
agent for service of process in any action or proceeding against the applicants
arising from any transaction, activity, or operation connected with or
incidental to the practice of public accounting in this state by nonresident
holders of certified public accountant certificates.

(2))) Application for a license to practice public
accounting in this state by a certified public accountant or CPA firm who holds
a license or permit to practice issued by another state constitutes the
appointment of the secretary of state as an agent for service of process in any
action or proceeding against the applicant arising from any transaction or
operation connected with or incidental to the practice of public accounting in this
state by the holder of the license to practice.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.04.195 and 1999 c
378 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sole
proprietorship engaged in business in this state ((in the practice of
public accounting)) and offering to issue or issuing reports on
financial statements or using the title CPA or certified public accountant
shall license, as a firm, every three years with the board ((as a
firm)).

(a) ((The principal
purpose and business of the firm shall be to furnish services to the public
which are consistent with this chapter and the rules of the board.

(b))) The ((person)) sole proprietor
shall ((be a certified public accountant holding)) hold a license
to practice under RCW 18.04.215((.));

(((c))) (b)
Each resident ((licensee)) person in charge of an office ((of
the sole proprietorship engaged in this state in the practice of public
accounting)) located in this state shall ((be a certified public
accountant holding)) hold a license to practice under RCW 18.04.215;
and

(c) The licensed
firm must meet competency requirements established by rule by the board.

(2) A partnership
engaged in business in this state ((in the practice of public
accounting)) and offering to issue or issuing reports on financial
statements or using the title CPA or certified public accountant shall
license as a firm every three years with the board ((as a partnership
of certified public accountants)), and shall meet the following
requirements:

(a) ((The principal
purpose and business of the partnership shall be to furnish services to the
public which are consistent with this chapter and the rules of the board;

(b))) At least one general partner of the
partnership shall ((be a certified public accountant holding)) hold
a license to practice under RCW 18.04.215;

(((c))) (b)
Each resident ((licensee)) person in charge of an office ((of
the partnership)) in this state ((and each resident partner personally
engaged within this state in the practice of public accounting)) shall ((be
a certified public accountant holding)) hold a license to practice
under RCW 18.04.215;

(c) A simple
majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests
and voting rights of all partners or owners shall be held by natural persons
who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by
another state that entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this
state. The principal partner of the partnership and any partner having
authority over issuing reports on financial statements shall hold a license
under this chapter or issued by another state that entitles the holder to
practice public accounting in this state; and

(d) The licensed
firm must meet competency requirements established by rule by the board.

(3) A corporation ((organized
for the practice of public accounting and)) engaged in business in
this state ((in the practice of public accounting)) and offering to
issue or issuing reports on financial statements or using the title CPA or
certified public accountant shall license as a firm every three
years with the board ((as a corporation of certified public accountants))
and shall meet the following requirements:

(a) ((The principal
purpose and business of the corporation shall be to furnish services to the
public which are consistent with this chapter and the rules of the board; and

(b) Each shareholder
of the corporation shall be a certified public accountant of some state holding
a license to practice and shall be))
A simple majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of
financial interests and voting rights of all shareholders or owners shall be
held by natural persons who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued
under this chapter or by another state that entitles the holder to practice
public accounting in this state and is principally employed by the
corporation or actively engaged in its business. ((No other person may have
any interest in the stock of the corporation.)) The principal officer of
the corporation and any officer or director having authority over ((the
practice of public accounting by the corporation)) issuing reports on
financial statements shall ((be a certified public accountant of some
state holding)) hold a license ((to practice)) under this
chapter or issued by another state that entitles the holder to practice public
accounting in this state;

(((c))) (b)
At least one shareholder of the corporation shall ((be a certified public
accountant holding)) hold a license ((to practice)) under RCW
18.04.215;

(((d))) (c)
Each resident ((licensee)) person in charge of an office ((of
the corporation)) located in this state ((and each shareholder or
director personally engaged within this state in the practice of public
accounting)) shall ((be a certified public accountant holding)) hold
a license ((to practice)) under RCW 18.04.215;

(((e))) (d)
A written agreement shall bind the corporation or its shareholders to purchase
any shares offered for sale by, or not under the ownership or effective control
of, a qualified shareholder, and bind any holder not a qualified shareholder to
sell the shares to the corporation or its qualified shareholders. The
agreement shall be noted on each certificate of corporate stock. The
corporation may purchase any amount of its stock for this purpose,
notwithstanding any impairment of capital, as long as one share remains
outstanding; ((and

(f))) (e) The corporation shall comply with
any other rules pertaining to corporations practicing public accounting in this
state as the board may prescribe; and

(f) The licensed
firm must meet competency requirements established by rule by the board.

(4) A limited liability
company engaged in business in this state ((in the practice of public
accounting)) and offering to issue or issuing reports on financial
statements or using the title CPA or certified public accountant shall
license as a firm every three years with the board ((as a limited
liability company of certified public accountants)), and shall meet the
following requirements:

(a) ((The principal
purpose and business of the limited liability company shall be to furnish
services to the public which are consistent with this chapter and the rules of
the board;

(b))) At least one ((manager)) member
of the limited liability company shall ((be a certified public accountant
holding)) hold a license ((to practice)) under RCW 18.04.215;

(((c))) (b)
Each resident manager or member in charge of an office ((of the limited
liability company)) located in this state ((and each resident
manager or member personally engaged within this state in the practice of
public accounting)) shall ((be a certified public accountant holding))
hold a license ((to practice)) under RCW 18.04.215;

(c) A simple
majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests
and voting rights of all owners shall be held by natural persons who are
licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another
state that entitles the holder to practice public accounting in this state.
The principal member or manager of the limited liability company and any member
having authority over issuing reports on financial statements shall hold a
license under this chapter or issued by another state that entitles the holder
to practice public accounting in this state; and

(d) The licensed
firm must meet competency requirements established by rule by the board.

(5) Application for a
license as a firm shall be made upon the affidavit of the proprietor or person
designated as managing partner, member, or shareholder for Washington.
This person shall ((be a certified public accountant holding)) hold
a license ((to practice)) under RCW 18.04.215. The board shall
determine in each case whether the applicant is eligible for a license. A
partnership ((or)), corporation, or limited liability company
which is licensed to practice under RCW 18.04.215 may use the designation
"certified public accountants" or "CPAs" in connection with
its partnership, limited liability company, or corporate name. The
board shall be given notification within ninety days after the admission or
withdrawal of a partner ((or)), shareholder, or member engaged
in this state in the practice of public accounting from any partnership ((or)),
corporation, or limited liability company so licensed.

(6) Licensed firms
which fall out of compliance with the provisions of this section due to changes
in firm ownership or personnel, after receiving or renewing a license, shall
notify the board in writing within thirty days of its falling out of compliance
and propose a time period in which they will come back into compliance. The
board may grant a reasonable period of time for a firm to be in compliance with
the provisions of this section. Failure to bring the firm into compliance
within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the board, may result in
suspension, revocation, or imposition of conditions on the firm's license.

(7) Fees for the
license as a firm and for notification of the board of the admission or
withdrawal of a partner ((or)), shareholder, or member
shall be determined by the board. Fees shall be paid by the firm at the time
the license application form or notice of admission or withdrawal of a partner
((or)), shareholder, or member is filed with the board.

(8) Nonlicensee
owners of licensed firms are:

(a) Required to
fully comply with the provisions of this chapter and board rules;

(b) Required to be a
natural person;

(c) Required to be
an active individual participant in the licensed firm or affiliated entities as
these terms are defined by board rule; and

(d) Subject to
discipline by the board for violation of this chapter.

(9) Resident
nonlicensee owners of licensed firms are required to meet:

(a) The ethics
examination, registration, and fee requirements as established by the board
rules; and

(b) The ethics CPE
requirements established by the board rules.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.04.205 and 1999 c
378 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each office
established or maintained in this state for the ((practice of public
accounting)) purpose of offering to issue or issuing reports on
financial statements in this state ((by a certified public accountant,
or a partnership or corporation of certified public accountants)) or
that uses the title "certified public accountant" or "CPA,"
shall register with the board under this chapter every three years.

(2) Each office shall
be under the direct supervision of a resident licensee holding a license under
RCW 18.04.215 ((who may be a sole proprietor, partner, principal
shareholder, or a staff employee)).

(3) The board shall by
rule prescribe the procedure to be followed to register and maintain offices
established in this state for the ((practice of public accounting)) purpose
of offering to issue or issuing reports on financial statements or that use the
title "certified public accountant" or "CPA."

(4) Fees for the
registration of offices shall be determined by the board. Fees shall be paid
by the applicant at the time the registration form is filed with the board.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.04.215 and 1999 c
378 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Three-year licenses
shall be issued by the board:

(a) To ((holders of
certificates as certified public accountants who have demonstrated, in
accordance with rules issued by the board, one year of public accounting
experience, or such other experience or employment which the board in its
discretion regards as substantially equivalent and who, if their certificate
was issued more than forty-eight months prior to application under this
section, submit to the board satisfactory proof of having completed an
accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of continuing professional education
during the thirty-six months preceding the application;)) persons
meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.105(1), 18.04.180, or 18.04.183.

(b) To certificate
holders meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.105(4).

(c) To firms
under RCW 18.04.195, ((if all offices of the firm in this state are
maintained and registered as required under)) meeting the requirements
of RCW 18.04.205.

(2) The board shall, by
rule, provide for a system of certificate and license renewal and
reinstatement. Applicants for ((issuance or)) renewal ((of
certificates or licenses)) or reinstatement shall, at the time of
filing their applications, list with the board all states and foreign
jurisdictions in which they hold or have applied for certificates, permits or
licenses to practice.

(3) An inactive
certificate is renewed every three years with renewal subject to the
requirements of ethics CPE and the payment of fees, prescribed by the board.
Failure to renew the inactive certificate shall cause the inactive certificate
to lapse and be subject to reinstatement. The board shall adopt rules
providing for fees and procedures for renewal and reinstatement of inactive
certificates.

(4) A license is
issued every three years with renewal subject to requirements of CPE and
payment of fees, prescribed by the board. Failure to renew the license shall
cause the license to lapse and become subject to reinstatement. Persons
holding a lapsed license are prohibited from using the title "CPA" or
"certified public accountant." Persons holding a lapsed license are
prohibited from practicing public accountancy. The board shall adopt rules
providing for fees and procedures for issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of
licenses.

(5) The board shall
adopt rules providing for CPE for licensees and certificate holders. The rules
shall:

(a) Provide that a
licensee shall verify to the board that he or she has completed at least an
accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE during the last three-year
period to maintain the license;

(b) Establish CPE
requirements; and

(c) Establish when
new licensees shall verify that they have completed the required CPE.

(6) A certified
public accountant who holds a ((permit or)) license issued by another
state, and applies for a license in this state, may practice in this state from
the date of filing a completed application with the board, until the board has
acted upon the application provided the application is made prior to holding
out as a certified public accountant in this state and no sanctions or
investigations, deemed by the board to be pertinent to public accountancy, by
other jurisdictions or agencies are in process.

(((4))) (7)
A ((certified public accountant)) licensee shall submit to the
board satisfactory proof of having completed an accumulation of one hundred
twenty hours of ((continuing education)) CPE recognized and
approved by the board during the preceding three years. Failure to furnish
this evidence as required shall make the ((certificate invalid)) license
lapse and subject to reinstatement procedures, unless the board determines
the failure to have been due to retirement((,)) or reasonable
cause((, or excusable neglect)).

The board in its
discretion may renew a certificate or license despite failure to furnish
evidence of compliance with requirements of ((continuing professional
education)) CPE upon condition that the applicant follow a
particular program of ((continuing professional education)) CPE.
In issuing rules and individual orders with respect to ((continuing
professional education)) CPE requirements, the board, among other
considerations, may rely upon guidelines and pronouncements of recognized
educational and professional associations, may prescribe course content,
duration, and organization, and may take into account the accessibility of ((continuing
education)) CPE to ((applicants)) licensees and
certificate holders and instances of individual hardship.

(((5))) (8)
Fees for ((issuance or)) renewal or reinstatement of certificates
and licenses in this state shall be determined by the board under this chapter
((18.04 RCW)). Fees shall be paid by the applicant at the time the
application form is filed with the board. The board, by rule, may provide for
proration of fees for ((certificates and)) licenses or certificates
issued between normal renewal dates.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.04.295 and 2000 c
171 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board ((of
accountancy)) shall have the power to: Revoke, suspend, ((or))
refuse to renew ((a)), or reinstate a license or certificate ((or
license, and may)); impose a fine in an amount not to exceed ((one))
ten thousand dollars plus the board's investigative and legal costs in
bringing charges against a certified public accountant, ((or)) a
certificate holder, a licensee, a licensed firm, or a nonlicensee holding an
ownership interest in a licensed firm; may impose full restitution to injured
parties; may impose conditions precedent to renewal of ((the)) a
certificate or a license ((of any certified public accountant));
or may prohibit a nonlicensee from holding an ownership interest in a licensed
firm, for any of the following causes:

(1) Fraud or deceit in
obtaining a ((certificate as a certified public accountant, or in obtaining
a)) license, or in any filings with the board;

(2) Dishonesty, fraud,
or negligence while representing oneself as a ((CPA)) nonlicensee
owner holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm, a licensee, or a
certificate holder;

(3) A violation of any
provision of this chapter;

(4) A violation of a
rule of professional conduct promulgated by the board under the authority
granted by this chapter;

(5) Conviction of a
crime or an act constituting a crime under:

(a) The laws of this
state;

(b) The laws of another
state, and which, if committed within this state, would have constituted a
crime under the laws of this state; or

(c) Federal law;

(6) Cancellation,
revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the authority to practice as a
certified public accountant by any other state for any cause other than failure
to pay a fee or to meet the requirements of ((continuing education)) CPE
in the other state;

(7) Suspension or
revocation of the right to practice matters relating to public accounting
before any state or federal agency;

For purposes of
subsections (6) and (7) of this section, a certified copy of such revocation,
suspension, or refusal to renew shall be prima facie evidence;

(8) Failure to maintain
compliance with the requirements for issuance, renewal, or reinstatement of ((the))
a certificate or license, or to report changes to the board;

(9) Failure to
cooperate with the board by:

(a) Failure to furnish
any papers or documents requested or ordered by the board;

(b) Failure to furnish
in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in the
complaint filed with the board or the inquiry of the board;

(c) Failure to respond
to subpoenas issued by the board, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena
is the accused in the proceeding;

(10) Failure by a
nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or board rule; and

(11) Failure to
comply with an order of the board.

Sec. 15. RCW 18.04.305 and 1992 c
103 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The board ((of
accountancy)) may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the license issued to
a firm if at any time the firm does not meet the requirements of this chapter
for licensing, or for any of the causes enumerated in RCW 18.04.295, or for any
of the following additional causes:

(1) The revocation or
suspension of the ((certificate as a certified public accountant)) sole-practitioner's
license or the revocation or suspension or refusal to renew the ((certificate
or)) license of any partner, manager, member, or shareholder; ((or))

(2) The revocation,
suspension, or refusal to renew the license ((or permit)) of the firm,
or any partner, manager, member, or shareholder thereof, to practice
public accounting in any other state or foreign jurisdiction for any cause
other than failure to pay a fee or to meet the CPE requirements of ((continuing
professional education in)) the other state or foreign jurisdiction;

(3) Failure by a
nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or board rule; or

(4) Failure of the
firm to comply with the requirements of this chapter or board rule.

Sec. 16. RCW 18.04.335 and 1997 c
58 s 812 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon application in
writing and after hearing pursuant to notice, the board may:

(a) Modify the
suspension of, or reissue a certificate or a license to, an individual
whose certificate or license has been revoked or suspended; or

(b) Modify the
suspension of, or reissue a license to a firm whose license has been revoked,
suspended, or which the board has refused to renew.

(2) In the case of
suspension for failure to comply with a support order under chapter 74.20A RCW
((or a residential or visitation order under chapter 26.09 RCW)), if the
person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during
the suspension, reissuance of a certificate or a license shall be
automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the individual is in compliance with
the order.

Sec. 17. RCW 18.04.345 and 1999 c
378 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
assume or use the designation "certified public accountant-inactive"
or "CPA-inactive" or any other title, designation, words,
letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the
person is a certified public accountant-inactive or CPA-inactive
unless the person holds a ((valid)) certificate ((as a certified
public accountant)). Persons holding only a certificate may not
practice public accounting.

(2) No person may hold
himself or herself out to the public ((and)) or assume or use the
designation "certified public accountant" or "CPA" or any
other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device
tending to indicate that the person is a certified public accountant or CPA
unless the person holds a ((valid certificate as a certified public
accountant and holds a valid)) license ((to practice)) under RCW
18.04.215.

(3) No firm may hold
itself out to the public as offering to issue or issuing reports on
financial statements, or assume or use the designation "certified
public accountant" or "CPA" or any other title, designation,
words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that
the firm is composed of certified public accountants or CPAs, unless the firm
is licensed under RCW 18.04.195((, holds a valid license to practice under
RCW 18.04.215,)) and all offices of the firm in this state ((for the
practice of public accounting)) are maintained and registered under RCW
18.04.205.

(4) No person,
partnership, limited liability company, or corporation offering
accounting services to the public may hold himself, herself, or itself out
to the public, or assume or use along, or in connection with his, hers, or its
name, or any other name the title or designation "certified
accountant," "chartered accountant," "licensed accountant,"
"licensed public accountant," "public accountant," or any
other title or designation likely to be confused with "certified public
accountant" or any of the abbreviations "CA," "LA,"
"LPA," or "PA," or similar abbreviations likely to be
confused with "CPA." ((However, nothing in this chapter prohibits
use of the title "accountant" by any person regardless of whether the
person has been granted a certificate or holds a license under this chapter.))

(5) No licensed firm
may operate under an alias, a firm name, title, or "DBA" that differs
from the firm name that is registered with the board.

(6) No person
may sign, affix, or associate his or her name or any trade or assumed name used
by the person in his or her business to any report designated as an "audit,"
"review," or "compilation," unless the person holds a
license to practice under RCW 18.04.215 and a firm license under RCW
18.04.195, and all of the person's offices in this state ((for the
practice of public accounting are maintained and)) are licensed
under RCW 18.04.205.

(((6))) (7)
No person may sign, affix, or associate a firm name to any report designated as
an "audit," "review," or "compilation," unless
the firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215, and all of its offices
in this state ((for the practice of public accounting)) are maintained
and registered under RCW 18.04.205.

(((7))) (8)
No person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation not
holding a license to practice under RCW 18.04.215 may hold himself, herself, or
itself out to the public as an "auditor" with or without any other
description or designation by use of such word on any sign, card, letterhead,
or in any advertisement or directory.

(((8) No person may
assume or use the designation "certified public accountant" or
"CPA" in conjunction with names indicating or implying that there is
a partnership or corporation, if there is in fact no bona fide partnership or
corporation registered under RCW 18.04.195.

(9) No person,
partnership, or corporation holding a license under RCW 18.04.215 may hold
himself, herself, or itself out to the public in conjunction with the
designation "and Associates" or "and Assoc." unless he or
she has in fact a partner or employee who holds a license under RCW 18.04.215.))

Sec. 18. RCW 18.04.350 and 1992 c
103 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits any person not ((a certified public accountant)) holding
a license from serving as an employee of a firm licensed((, or as
assistant to, a certified public accountant or partnership composed of
certified public accountants or corporation of certified public accountants
holding a valid license)) under RCW 18.04.215. However, the employee or
assistant shall not issue any accounting or financial statement over his or her
name.

(2) ((Nothing in
this chapter prohibits a certified public accountant registered in another
state, or any accountant of a foreign country holding a certificate, degree or
license which permits him to practice therein from temporarily practicing in
this state on professional business incident to his regular practice)) (a)
An individual, whose principal place of business is not in this state, who has
a valid certificate or license as a certified public accountant from another
state, and (i) whose state of licensure has education, examination, and
experience requirements that are deemed by the board to be substantially
equivalent to this state's requirements or (ii) who, as an individual, has education,
examination, and experience that are deemed by the board to be substantially
equivalent to this state's requirement shall have all the privileges of license
holders of this state without the need to obtain a license under RCW 18.04.105
or 18.04.195. However, such individuals shall notify the board, under such
circumstances and in such manner as the board determines by rule, of their
intent to enter the state under this section. The board shall have the
authority to establish a fee for the practice privilege granted under this
section by rule.

(b) An individual
that enters the state under this section and is granted this practice privilege
shall abide by this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter and shall
be subject to discipline for violation of this chapter. However, such
individual is exempt from the continuing education requirements of this chapter
provided the individual has met the continuing education requirements of the
state in which the individual holds a valid certificate or license. The board
may accept NASBA's designation of the individual's state as substantially
equivalent to national standards, or NASBA's designation of the applicant as
substantially equivalent to national standards, as meeting the requirement for
a certified public accountant to be substantially equivalent to this state's
requirements.

(c) Any certificate
or license holder of another state exercising the privilege afforded under this
section consents, as a condition of the grant of this privilege:

(i) To the personal
and subject matter jurisdiction of the board;

(ii) To the
appointment of the state board which issued the certificate or license as their
agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding by this
state's board against the certificate holder or licensee.

(d) A licensee of
this state offering or rendering services or using their certified public
accountant title in another state shall be subject to disciplinary action in
this state for an act committed in another state for which the certificate or
permit holder would be subject to discipline for an act committed in the other
state provided the board receives timely notification of the act.
Notwithstanding RCW 18.04.295, the board may investigate any complaint made by
the board of accountancy of another state.

(3) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits a ((certified public accountant, a partnership, or
corporation of certified public accountants)) licensee, a licensed firm,
or any of their employees from disclosing any data in confidence to other
certified public accountants, quality assurance or peer review teams,
partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations of public
accountants or to the board or any of its employees engaged in conducting ((quality,))
quality assurance((,)) or peer reviews, or any one of their employees in
connection with quality or peer reviews of that accountant's accounting and
auditing practice conducted under the auspices of recognized professional
associations.

(4) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits a ((certified public accountant, a partnership, or
corporation of certified public accountants)) licensee, a licensed firm,
or any of their employees from disclosing any data in confidence to any
employee, representative, officer, or committee member of a recognized
professional association, or to the board ((of accountancy)), or any of
its employees or committees in connection with a professional investigation
held under the auspices of recognized professional associations or the board ((of
accountancy)).

(5) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits any officer, employee, partner, or principal of any
organization:

(a) From affixing his
or her signature to any statement or report in reference to the affairs of the
organization with any wording designating the position, title, or office which
he or she holds in the organization; or

(b) From describing
himself or herself by the position, title, or office he or she holds in such
organization.

(6) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits any person((,)) or ((partnership or corporation))
firm composed of persons not holding a license under RCW 18.04.215 from
offering or rendering to the public bookkeeping, accounting, tax services, the
devising and installing of financial information systems, management advisory,
or consulting services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of
advice on tax matters, the preparation of financial statements, written
statements describing how such financial statements were prepared, or similar services,
provided that persons, partnerships, limited liability companies, or
corporations not holding a license under RCW 18.04.215 who offer or render
these services do not designate any written statement as an "audit
report," "review report," or "compilation report," do
not issue any written statement which purports to express or disclaim an
opinion on financial statements which have been audited, and do not issue any
written statement which expresses assurance on financial statements which have
been reviewed.

(7) Nothing in this
chapter prohibits any act of or the use of any words by a public official or a
public employee in the performance of his or her duties.

(8) Nothing contained
in this chapter prohibits any person who holds only a valid ((certified
public accountant)) certificate from assuming or using the designation
"certified public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive"
or any other title, designation, words, letters, sign, card, or device tending
to indicate the person is a ((certified public accountant)) certificate
holder, provided, that such person ((shall)) does not ((hold
himself or herself out to the public as engaged in the practice of public
accounting unless that person holds a valid license in addition to the
certificate under RCW 18.04.215)) perform or offer to perform for the
public one or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or
auditing skills, including issuance of reports on financial statements or of
one or more kinds of management advisory, financial advisory, consulting
services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax
matters.

(9)
Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of the title "accountant"
by any person regardless of whether the person has been granted a certificate
or holds a license under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the
use of the title "enrolled agent" or the designation "EA"
by any person regardless of whether the person has been granted a certificate
or holds a license under this chapter if the person is properly authorized at
the time of use to use the title or designation by the United States department
of the treasury. The board shall by rule allow the use of other titles by any
person regardless of whether the person has been granted a certificate or holds
a license under this chapter if the person using the titles or designations is
authorized at the time of use by a nationally recognized entity sanctioning the
use of board authorized titles.

Sec. 19. RCW 18.04.370 and 1983 c
234 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person
who violates any provision of this chapter, shall be guilty of a crime, as
follows:

(a) Any person who
violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon
conviction thereof, shall be subject to a fine of not more than ((one)) ten
thousand dollars, or to imprisonment for not more than six months, or to both
such fine and imprisonment.

(b) Notwithstanding
(a) of this subsection, any person who uses a professional title intended to
deceive the public, in violation of RCW 18.04.345, having previously entered
into a stipulated agreement and order of assurance with the board, is guilty of
a felony, and upon conviction thereof, is subject to a fine of not more than
ten thousand dollars, or to imprisonment for not more than two years, or to
both such fine and imprisonment.

(2) With the
exception of first time violations of RCW 18.04.345, subject to subsection (3)
of this section whenever the board has reason to believe that any person is
violating the provisions of this chapter it shall certify the facts to the
prosecuting attorney of the county in which such person resides or may be
apprehended and the prosecuting attorney shall cause appropriate proceedings to
be brought against such person.

(3) The board may
elect to enter into a stipulated agreement and orders of assurance with persons
in violation of RCW 18.04.345 who have not previously been found to have
violated the provisions of this chapter. The board may order full restitution
to injured parties as a condition of a stipulated agreement and order of
assurance.

(4) Nothing
herein contained shall be held to in any way affect the power of the courts to
grant injunctive or other relief as above provided.

Sec. 20. RCW 18.04.380 and 1986 c
295 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The display
or presentation by a person of a card, sign, advertisement, or other printed,
engraved, or written instrument or device, bearing a person's name in
conjunction with the words "certified public accountant" or any
abbreviation thereof((, or "licensed public accountant" or any
abbreviation thereof, or "public accountant" or any abbreviation thereof,))
shall be prima facie evidence in any action brought under this chapter that the
person whose name is so displayed, caused or procured the display or
presentation of the card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or
written instrument or device, and that the person is holding himself or herself
out to be a licensee, a certified public accountant, or a ((public
accountant holding a license to practice)) person holding a certificate
under this chapter.

(2) The display or
presentation by a person of a card, sign, advertisement, or other printed,
engraved, or written instrument or device, bearing a person's name in
conjunction with the words certified public accountant-inactive or any
abbreviation thereof is prima facie evidence in any action brought under this
chapter that the person whose name is so displayed caused or procured the
display or presentation of the card, sign, advertisement, or other printed,
engraved, or written instrument or device, and that the person is holding
himself or herself out to be a certified public accountant-inactive under this
chapter.

(3)
In any ((such)) action under subsection (1) or (2) of this section,
evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited by this chapter is
sufficient to justify an injunction or a conviction without evidence of a
general course of conduct.

Sec. 21. RCW 18.04.390 and 1992 c
103 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the absence of
an express agreement between the ((certified public accountant)) licensee
or licensed firm and the client to the contrary, all statements, records,
schedules, working papers, and memoranda made by a ((certified public
accountant)) licensee or licensed firm incident to or in the course
of professional service to clients, except reports submitted by a ((certified
public accountant to a client)) licensee or licensed firm, are the
property of the ((certified public accountant)) licensee or licensed
firm.

(2) No statement,
record, schedule, working paper, or memorandum may be sold, transferred, or
bequeathed without the consent of the client or his or her personal
representative or assignee, to anyone other than one or more surviving
partners, shareholders, or new partners or new shareholders of the ((accountant))
licensee, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, or any
combined or merged partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation, or successor in interest.

(3) A licensee shall
furnish to the board or to his or her client or former client, upon request and
reasonable notice:

(a) A copy of the
licensee's working papers or electronic documents, to the extent that
such working papers or electronic documents include records that would
ordinarily constitute part of the client's records and are not otherwise
available to the client; and

(b) Any accounting or
other records belonging to, or obtained from or on behalf of, the client that
the licensee removed from the client's premises or received for the client's
account; the licensee may make and retain copies of such documents of the
client when they form the basis for work done by him or her.

(4) Nothing in this
section shall require a licensee to keep any work paper or electronic
document beyond the period prescribed in any other applicable statute.

(5) Nothing in this
section should be construed as prohibiting any temporary transfer of workpapers
or other material necessary in the course of carrying out peer reviews or as
otherwise interfering with the disclosure of information pursuant to RCW
18.04.405.

Sec. 22. RCW 18.04.405 and 1992 c
103 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((certified
public accountant, a partnership or corporation of certified public accountants))
licensee, certificate holder, or licensed firm, or any of their
employees shall not disclose any confidential information obtained in the
course of a professional transaction except with the consent of the client or
former client or as disclosure may be required by law, legal process, the
standards of the profession, or as disclosure of confidential information is
permitted by RCW 18.04.350 (3) and (4), 18.04.295(8), 18.04.390, and this
section in connection with ((quality,)) quality assurance, or peer
reviews, investigations, and any proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) This section shall
not be construed as limiting the authority of this state or of the United States
or an agency of this state, the board, or of the United States to subpoena and
use such confidential information obtained by a licensee, or any of
their employees in the course of a professional transaction in connection
with any investigation, public hearing, or other proceeding, nor shall this
section be construed as prohibiting a licensee or certified public
accountant whose professional competence has been challenged in a court of law
or before an administrative agency from disclosing confidential information as
a part of a defense to the court action or administrative proceeding.

(3) The proceedings,
records, and work papers of a review committee shall be privileged and shall
not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal process or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, arbitration, administrative
proceeding, or ((state accountancy)) board proceeding and no member of
the review committee or person who was involved in the ((quality)) peer
review process shall be permitted or required to testify in any such civil
action, arbitration, administrative proceeding, or ((state accountancy))
board proceeding as to any matter produced, presented, disclosed, or discussed
during or in connection with the ((quality)) peer review process,
or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions
of such committees, or any members thereof. Information, documents, or records
that are publicly available are not to be construed as immune from discovery or
use in any civil action, arbitration, administrative proceeding, or ((state
accountancy)) board proceeding merely because they were presented or
considered in connection with the quality assurance or peer review
process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---