BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.82.300 and 1980 c
25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This section applies to
all cities and counties.

(1) Joint ((city-county))
housing authorities are hereby authorized when the legislative ((authority
of the county)) authorities of one or more counties and the
legislative ((authority)) authorities of any city or cities
within ((the county)) any of those counties or in another county or
counties have authorized such joint ((city-county)) housing ((authorities))
authority by ordinance.

(2) The ((ordinance))
ordinances enacted by the legislative authorities creating the joint
housing authority shall prescribe the number of commissioners, the method for
their appointment and length of their terms, the election of officers, and the
method for removal of commissioners.

(3) The ordinances
enacted by the legislative authorities creating the joint housing authority
shall prescribe the allocation of all costs of the joint housing authority and
any other matters necessary for the operation of the joint housing authority.

(4) A joint ((city-county))
housing authority shall have all the powers as prescribed by this chapter for
any housing authority. The area of operation of a joint ((city-county))
housing authority shall be the combined areas ((of each as they are)),
defined by RCW 35.82.020(6), of the housing authorities created in each city
and county authorizing the joint housing authority.

(5) The
provisions of RCW 35.82.040 and 35.82.060 ((as now or hereafter amended))
shall not apply to a joint ((city-county)) housing authority created
pursuant to this section.

--- END ---