BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that registration of athletic trainers is in the interest of the public health,
safety, and welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Athletic
injury" means an injury sustained by a person as a result of that person's
participation in sports, games, or related skill activities.

(2) "Athletic
trainer" means a person who practices athletic training.

(3) "Athletic
training" means the practice of prevention, recognition, evaluation,
management, disposition, treatment, rehabilitation, physical conditioning, or
physical reconditioning of athletic injuries.

(4)
"Department" means the department of health.

(5)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. No person may represent
himself or herself as an athletic trainer by use of any title or description
without being registered by the department under the provisions of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Nothing in this chapter
may be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice of an
individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this state and
performing services within his or her authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice by an
individual employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the
performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States; or

(3) The practice by a
person who is a regular student in an educational program approved by the secretary,
and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of
instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision
of the instructor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In addition to any other
authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW as required to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish all
registration and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and
procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Register an
applicant or deny registration based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment
governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5) Hire clerical,
administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this
chapter; and

(6) Maintain the
official department record of all applicants and persons with registrations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. An applicant shall
identify the name and address of the applicant and other information required
by the secretary necessary to establish whether there are grounds for denial of
a registration or conditional registration under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The secretary shall
register an applicant on forms provided by the secretary. Each applicant shall
pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee must
accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The secretary shall
establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of
registration. Failure to renew invalidates the registration and all privileges
granted by the registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The uniform disciplinary
act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of registration,
uncertified and unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons registered
under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The provisions of
this chapter relating to the regulation of athletic trainers are exclusive. A
governmental subdivision of this state may not enact a law or rule regulating
athletic trainers, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section.

(2) This section does
not prevent a political subdivision of this state from levying a business fee,
business and occupation tax, or other tax upon athletic trainers, if the fee or
tax is levied by the state on other types of businesses within its boundaries.

(3) This section does
not prevent this state or a political subdivision of this state from regulating
athletic trainers with respect to activities that are not regulated under this
chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.130.040 and 1999
c 335 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter
applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having
jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary
has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing
opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Naturopaths
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) Midwives licensed
under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv) Ocularists
licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v) Massage operators
and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi) Dental hygienists
licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii) Acupuncturists
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii) Radiologic
technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84
RCW;

(ix) Respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x) Persons registered
or certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered
as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing assistants
registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Health care
assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv) Dietitians and
nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv) Chemical
dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi) Sex offender
treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii) Persons licensed
and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii) Persons
registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under RCW
18.48.020;

(xix) Denturists
licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;

(xx) Orthotists and
prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; ((and))

(xxi) Surgical
technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW; and

(xxii) Athletic
trainers registered under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 of this act).

(b) The boards and
commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric
medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv) The board of
hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of
examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry
board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing
licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The board of
pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The medical
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing
licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of
physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of
occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing
licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining
board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter
18.83 RCW; and

(xiv) The veterinary
board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3) In addition to the
authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the
authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria
established in this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of
this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license
conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW
18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4) All disciplining
authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent application
of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining
authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---