BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.95.020 and 1998 c
305 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is guilty of
aggravated first degree murder if he or she commits first degree murder as
defined by RCW 9A.32.030(1)(a), as now or hereafter amended, and one or more of
the following aggravating circumstances exist:

(1) The victim was a
law enforcement officer, corrections officer, or fire fighter who was
performing his or her official duties at the time of the act resulting in death
and the victim was known or reasonably should have been known by the person to
be such at the time of the killing;

(2) At the time of the
act resulting in the death, the person was serving a term of imprisonment, had
escaped, or was on authorized or unauthorized leave in or from a state facility
or program for the incarceration or treatment of persons adjudicated guilty of
crimes;

(3) At the time of the
act resulting in death, the person was in custody in a county or county-city
jail as a consequence of having been adjudicated guilty of a felony;

(4) The person
committed the murder pursuant to an agreement that he or she would receive
money or any other thing of value for committing the murder;

(5) The person
solicited another person to commit the murder and had paid or had agreed to pay
money or any other thing of value for committing the murder;

(6) The defendant
knew the victim was pregnant;

(7) The person
committed the murder to obtain or maintain his or her membership or to advance
his or her position in the hierarchy of an organization, association, or
identifiable group;

(((7))) (8)
The murder was committed during the course of or as a result of a shooting
where the discharge of the firearm, as defined in RCW 9.41.010, is either from
a motor vehicle or from the immediate area of a motor vehicle that was used to
transport the shooter or the firearm, or both, to the scene of the discharge;

(((8))) (9)
The victim was:

(a) A judge; juror or
former juror; prospective, current, or former witness in an adjudicative
proceeding; prosecuting attorney; deputy prosecuting attorney; defense
attorney; a member of the indeterminate sentence review board; or a probation
or parole officer; and

(b) The murder was
related to the exercise of official duties performed or to be performed by the
victim;

(((9))) (10)
The person committed the murder to conceal the commission of a crime or to
protect or conceal the identity of any person committing a crime, including,
but specifically not limited to, any attempt to avoid prosecution as a
persistent offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(((10))) (11)
There was more than one victim and the murders were part of a common scheme or
plan or the result of a single act of the person;

(((11))) (12)
The murder was committed in the course of, in furtherance of, or in immediate
flight from one of the following crimes:

(a) Robbery in the
first or second degree;

(b) Rape in the first
or second degree;

(c) Burglary in the
first or second degree or residential burglary;

(d) Kidnapping in the
first degree; or

(e) Arson in the first
degree;

(((12))) (13)
The victim was regularly employed or self-employed as a newsreporter and the
murder was committed to obstruct or hinder the investigative, research, or
reporting activities of the victim;

(((13))) (14)
At the time the person committed the murder, there existed a court order,
issued in this or any other state, which prohibited the person from either
contacting the victim, molesting the victim, or disturbing the peace of the
victim, and the person had knowledge of the existence of that order;

(((14))) (15)
At the time the person committed the murder, the person and the victim were
"family or household members" as that term is defined in RCW
10.99.020(1), and the person had previously engaged in a pattern or practice of
three or more of the following crimes committed upon the victim within a
five-year period, regardless of whether a conviction resulted:

(a) Harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.020; or

(b) Any
criminal assault.

--- END ---