BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.290 and 1965 c
49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person under the age of twenty-one years who purchases or attempts to purchase
liquor shall be guilty of a violation of this title. This section does not
apply to persons between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years who are
participating in a controlled purchase program authorized by the liquor control
board under rules adopted by the board. Violations occurring under a private,
controlled purchase program authorized by the liquor control board may not be
used for criminal or administrative prosecution.

--- END ---