BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding RCW
48.13.220 and 48.13.240, an insurer may not loan or invest its funds in common
stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities of one or more
subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding the lesser of the following
sums: Ten percent of its assets, or fifty percent of its surplus as regards
policyholders. In calculating the amount of investments under this section,
investments in domestic or foreign insurance subsidiaries, health care service
contractors, and health maintenance organizations are excluded.

(2) For
the purposes of this section, "subsidiary" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.31B.005.

--- END ---