BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to authorize the department of social and health services to
investigate the background of current and future state employees to the same
extent and with the same effect as it has authorized the state to investigate
the background and exclude from the provision of service current and future
care providers, independent contractors, volunteers, and others receiving state
dollars when the state employee works or will work in a position that has or
may have unsupervised access to any person under the age of eighteen, juveniles
under department of social and health services' supervision who may be as old
as twenty-one, vulnerable adults as currently defined in statute, and
vulnerable persons who may be any age, but lack the ability to care for themselves.
The department of social and health services must coordinate with the
department of personnel to develop rules that address the procedures for
undertaking background checks, and specifically what action would be taken
against a current employee who is disqualified from his or her current position
because of a background check not previously performed. Current employees
would not be subject to a check under the provisions of this act until one year
from the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.96A RCW to read as follows:

This chapter is not
applicable to the department of social and health services when employing a
person, who in the course of his or her employment, has or may have
unsupervised access to any person who is under the age of eighteen, who is
under the age of twenty-one and has been sentenced to a term of confinement
under the supervision of the department of social and health services under
chapter 13.40 RCW, who is a vulnerable adult under chapter 74.34 RCW, or who is
a vulnerable person. For purposes of this section "vulnerable
person" means an adult of any age who lacks the functional, mental, or
physical ability to care for himself or herself.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 72.40 RCW to read as follows:

The state school for
the deaf and the state school for the blind shall require a record check
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW
43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal
bureau of investigation before hiring an employee who will have regularly
scheduled unsupervised access to children. The record check shall include a fingerprint
check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint
card. The requesting school shall provide a copy of the record report to the
applicant. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis
pending completion of the investigation. If the applicant has had a record
check within the previous two years, the school may waive the requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 72.40 RCW to read as follows:

The state school for
the deaf and the state school for the blind may adopt rules to implement this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall amend
any existing rules established under RCW 41.06.475 and adopt rules developed in
cooperation and agreement with the department of social and health services to
implement the provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Any background check
performed on current employees under this act shall not occur until one year
from the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---