BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The use of traffic
safety cameras is subject to the following regulations:

(a) The appropriate
legislative authority must enact an ordinance allowing for their use to detect
one or more of the following: Stoplight or railroad crossing violations. At a
minimum, the local ordinance must contain the restrictions described in
sections 1 through 4 of this act. Cities and counties using traffic safety
cameras before the effective date of this act are subject to the restrictions
described in sections 1 through 4 of this act, but are not required to enact an
authorizing ordinance.

(b) Traffic safety
cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and the vehicle license plate only.

(c) The jurisdiction
must develop a public notification program for areas in which traffic safety
cameras will be used. Under their respective jurisdictions, the law
enforcement agency shall plainly mark the locations where the traffic safety
cameras are used by placing signs on street locations that clearly indicate to
a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are enforced by
traffic safety cameras.

(d) A notice of traffic
infraction must be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within
fourteen days of the infraction occurring. The jurisdiction must not issue an
additional infraction to the registered owner of the vehicle during the
fourteen-day notification period.

(e) A person receiving
a notice of traffic infraction based on evidence detected by a traffic safety
camera may respond to the notice by mail.

(2) Infractions
detected through the use of traffic safety cameras will be recorded as are
stopping, standing, or parking violations under RCW 46.61.560, but are not part
of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.

(3) The traffic safety
commission may adopt rules regarding:

(a) Mechanical and
operational standards for traffic safety camera equipment;

(b) The placement of
signs to notify drivers that they are entering a jurisdiction or area that uses
traffic safety cameras;

(c) Recommendations on
how cities and counties will educate the public about traffic safety cameras.

(4) Jurisdictions using
traffic safety cameras must comply with any standards adopted under subsection
(3) of this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.63.030 and 1995 c
219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement
officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic infraction:

(a) When the infraction
is committed in the officer's presence;

(b) When the officer is
acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence the
traffic infraction was committed; ((or))

(c) If an officer
investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has reasonable cause to
believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident has
committed a traffic infraction; or

(d) When a notice of
traffic infraction may be mailed to the registered owner of or the person
renting a vehicle as authorized under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) When a traffic
safety camera is used in compliance with section 1 of this act, a law
enforcement officer, whether present or not during the commission of the
infraction, or other issuing agency may issue a notice of traffic infraction by
mail to the registered owner of the vehicle or the person renting the vehicle.
The registered owner of the vehicle or the person renting the vehicle is
responsible for the infraction.

(3) A court may
issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written statement of the
officer that there is reasonable cause to believe that an infraction was
committed.

(((3))) (4)
If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or stopped in
violation of this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local
law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the vehicle
shall take its registration number and may take any other information displayed
on the vehicle which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to
the vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.

(((4))) (5)
In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.120, upon
receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck operator that has incurred
costs in removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer
of the law enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal of the
vehicle shall send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known
address of the registered owner of the vehicle. The officer shall append to
the notice of infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of licensing,
a notice indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of removing,
storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction will not be
considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty payable under this
chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the
vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

The registered owner of
a vehicle is responsible for an infraction under RCW 46.63.030(2) unless within
fifteen days after notification of the infraction the registered owner
furnishes the officials or agents of the municipality that issued the notice of
infraction with:

(1) An affidavit made
under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in
the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered owner;
or

(2) Testimony in open court
under oath that the person was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of
the alleged infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

If a notice of traffic
infraction is sent to the registered owner under RCW 46.63.030(2) and the
registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction will be dismissed
against the business if it mails to the issuing agency, within fourteen days of
receiving the notice, the name and known mailing address of the individual
driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred. If the business
is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred, the business must sign an affidavit making this
declaration. The affidavit must be mailed to the issuing agency within
fourteen days of receiving the notice of infraction. An affidavit form
suitable for this purpose must be included with each infraction issued, along
with instructions for its completion and use.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.63.140 and 1980 c
128 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In any traffic
infraction case involving a violation of this title or equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution
relating to the stopping, standing, or parking of a vehicle, proof that the
particular vehicle described in the notice of traffic infraction was stopping,
standing, or parking in violation of any such provision of this title or an
equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, together with proof that the person named in the notice of traffic
infraction was at the time of the violation the registered owner of the
vehicle, ((shall)) constitute in evidence a prima facie presumption that
the registered owner of the vehicle was the person who parked or placed the
vehicle at the point where, and for the time during which, the violation
occurred.

(2) The foregoing
stated presumption ((shall apply)) applies only when the
procedure prescribed in RCW 46.63.030(((3))) (4) has been
followed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The legislature
respectfully requests the Washington state supreme court to amend the
Infraction Rules for Courts of Limited Jurisdiction to conform to this act.
Furthermore, the legislature respectfully asks the court to create a notice of
traffic infraction that is consistent with this act.

---
END ---