BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limits and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized against the tax
otherwise due under this chapter for the employment of eligible persons by
persons engaged in activities taxed under this chapter.

(2)(a) Effective July
1, 2001, an annual tax credit of up to one thousand dollars may be claimed for
a maximum of two tax years for each eligible person employed.

(b)(i) The tax credit
for an eligible person who has been employed for one thousand five hundred
hours or more during the tax year is one thousand dollars;

(ii) The tax credit for
an eligible person employed for one thousand hours or more but less than one
thousand five hundred hours during the tax year is seven hundred fifty dollars;

(iii) The tax credit
for an eligible person employed for five hundred hours or more but less than
one thousand hours during the tax year is five hundred dollars; and

(iv) The tax credit for
an eligible person employed for one hundred hours or more but less than five
hundred hours during the tax year is two hundred fifty dollars.

(c) Credit may be
accrued and carried over until it is used. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.

(3) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Eligible
person" means a person with a significant disability as determined by the
division of vocational rehabilitation or the department of services for the
blind.

(b) "Significant
disability" means a severe physical or mental impairment that seriously
limits one or more functional capacities such as, but not limited to, mobility,
communication, self-care, self-direction, interpersonal skills, work tolerance,
or work skills, in terms of an employment outcome, as determined by the
division of vocational rehabilitation or the department of services for the
blind.

(4) The department of
services for the blind or the division of vocational rehabilitation shall
provide determination of significant disability for purposes of the tax
credit. An individual who is not a client or former client of the department
of services for the blind or the division of vocational rehabilitation may
request and receive determination of significant disability for purposes of the
tax credit without applying to become a client or requesting any additional
services.

(5) An employer becomes
eligible to claim the tax credit by employing an individual who has been
determined to have a significant disability by the department of services for
the blind or by the division of vocational rehabilitation, when the
individual's earnings from the employment are in compliance with all state and
federal requirements.

(6) No application is
necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section. This information
includes:

(a) Employment records
for the previous three years;

(b) Information
verifying that the employee is an eligible person as defined in subsection (3)
of this section; and

(c) Documentation of
the employment position filled and hours worked by the eligible person.

(7) If at any time the
department finds that a person is not eligible for tax credit under this
section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used shall be
immediately due. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
the credited taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be
assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32
RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and
shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. This act shall be known
and cited as the José "Pepe" Lladró act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---