BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter shall not
apply to any person in respect to the business of boarding, breeding, or
selling horses.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of feed for horses.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of feed for
horses.

---
END ---