BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 40.24.010 and 1998 c
138 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that persons attempting to escape from actual or threatened domestic violence
((or)), sexual assault, or stalking frequently establish
new addresses in order to prevent their assailants or probable assailants from
finding them. The purpose of this chapter is to enable state and local
agencies to respond to requests for public records without disclosing the
location of a victim of domestic violence ((or)), sexual assault,
or stalking, to enable interagency cooperation with the secretary of state
in providing address confidentiality for victims of domestic violence ((or)),
sexual assault, or stalking, and to enable state and local agencies to
accept a program participant's use of an address designated by the secretary of
state as a substitute mailing address.

Sec. 2. RCW 40.24.030 and 1998 c
138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An adult person, a
parent or guardian acting on behalf of a minor, or a guardian acting on behalf
of an incapacitated person, as defined in RCW 11.88.010, may apply to the
secretary of state to have an address designated by the secretary of state
serve as the person's address or the address of the minor or incapacitated
person. The secretary of state shall approve an application if it is filed in
the manner and on the form prescribed by the secretary of state and if it
contains:

(a) A sworn statement
by the applicant that the applicant has good reason to believe (i) that the
applicant, or the minor or incapacitated person on whose behalf the application
is made, is a victim of domestic violence ((or)), sexual assault,
or stalking; and (ii) that the applicant fears for his or her safety or his
or her children's safety, or the safety of the minor or incapacitated person on
whose behalf the application is made;

(b) A designation of
the secretary of state as agent for purposes of service of process and for the
purpose of receipt of mail;

(c) The mailing address
where the applicant can be contacted by the secretary of state, and the phone
number or numbers where the applicant can be called by the secretary of state;

(d) The new address or
addresses that the applicant requests not be disclosed for the reason that
disclosure will increase the risk of domestic violence ((or)),
sexual assault, or stalking;

(e) The signature of
the applicant and of any individual or representative of any office designated
in writing under RCW 40.24.080 who assisted in the preparation of the
application, and the date on which the applicant signed the application.

(2) Applications shall
be filed with the office of the secretary of state.

(3) Upon filing a
properly completed application, the secretary of state shall certify the
applicant as a program participant. Applicants shall be certified for four
years following the date of filing unless the certification is withdrawn or
invalidated before that date. The secretary of state shall by rule establish a
renewal procedure.

(4) A person who
falsely attests in an application that disclosure of the applicant's address
would endanger the applicant's safety or the safety of the applicant's children
or the minor or incapacitated person on whose behalf the application is made,
or who knowingly provides false or incorrect information upon making an
application, shall be punishable under RCW 40.16.030 or other applicable
statutes.

Sec. 3. RCW 40.24.080 and 1998 c
138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of state shall designate state and local agencies and nonprofit
agencies that provide counseling and shelter services to ((either))
victims of domestic violence ((or)), sexual assault, or
stalking to assist persons applying to be program participants. Any
assistance and counseling rendered by the office of the secretary of state or
its designees to applicants shall in no way be construed as legal advice.

---
END ---