BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
29.81.210 and 1999 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The secretary of state shall, whenever at least one
statewide

_7 measure or office is scheduled to appear on the primary
or general

_8 election ballot, print and distribute a voters'
pamphlet.

_9 The secretary of state shall distribute the voters'
pamphlet to

10 each household in the state, to public libraries, and to
any other

11 locations he or she deems appropriate. The secretary of
state shall

12 also produce taped or Braille transcripts of the voters'
pamphlet,

13 publicize their availability, and mail without charge a
copy to

14 any person who requests one.

15 The secretary of state may make the material
required to be

16 distributed by this chapter available to the public in
electronic

17 form. The secretary of state may provide the material
in electronic

p. 1 SB
5616

_1 form to computer bulletin boards, print and broadcast
news media,

_2 community computer networks, and similar services at the
cost of

_3 reproduction or transmission of the data.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5616 p. 2