BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, the following education requirements apply
to an applicant for a vehicle dealer license under RCW 46.70.021:

(a) An applicant for a
vehicle dealer license under RCW 46.70.021 must complete a minimum of eight
hours of approved education programs described in subsection (3) of this
section and pass a test prior to submitting an application for the license; and

(b) An applicant for a
renewal of a vehicle dealer license under RCW 46.70.083 must complete a minimum
of five hours per year in a licensing period of approved continuing education
programs described in subsection (3) of this section prior to submitting an
application for the renewal of the vehicle dealer license.

(2) The education
requirements in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to an applicant for
a vehicle dealer license under RCW 46.70.021 if the applicant is:

(a) A franchised dealer
of nationally advertised and recognized motor vehicles;

(b) A franchised dealer
of new recreational vehicles;

(c) A nationally
franchised or corporate‑owned motor vehicle rental company;

(d) A dealer of
manufactured dwellings; or

(e) A national auction
company that holds a vehicle dealer license and a tow truck operator
registration certificate whose primary activity in this state is the sale or
disposition of totaled vehicles.

(3) The education
programs and test required in subsection (1) of this section shall be developed
by motor vehicle industry organizations including, but not limited to, the
state independent auto dealers association and shall be submitted to the
department for approval. The department shall approve a program or test if it
pertains to the motor vehicle industry and includes, but is not limited to,
state and federal law in the following areas:

(a) Motor vehicle
advertising;

(b) Odometer laws and
regulations;

(c) Vehicle licensing
and registration;

(d) Unlawful dealer
activities;

(e) Washington state
and industry standard motor vehicle forms;

(f) Truthful lending
practices;

(g) Motor vehicle
financing; and

(h) Service and
warranty contracts.

(4) The education programs
and test may be provided by accredited educational institutions, private
vocational schools, correspondence schools, or trade associations if the
education programs and test have been approved by the department as required in
subsection (3) of this section.

(5) A new motor vehicle
dealer, as defined under RCW 46.96.020, is deemed to have met the education
requirements required for applicants for a vehicle dealer license under this
section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.70.041 and 1993 c
307 s 6 and 1993 c 175 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Every application
for a vehicle dealer license shall contain the following information to the
extent it applies to the applicant:

(a) Proof as the
department may require concerning the applicant's identity, including but not
limited to his or her fingerprints, the honesty, truthfulness, and good
reputation of the applicant for the license, or of the officers of a
corporation making the application;

(b) The applicant's
form and place of organization including if the applicant is a corporation,
proof that the corporation is licensed to do business in this state;

(c) The qualification
and business history of the applicant and any partner, officer, or director;

(d) The applicant's
financial condition or history including a bank reference and whether the
applicant or any partner, officer, or director has ever been adjudged bankrupt
or has any unsatisfied judgment in any federal or state court;

(e) Whether the
applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime which directly relates to the
business for which the license is sought and the time elapsed since the
conviction is less than ten years, or has suffered any judgment within the
preceding five years in any civil action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or
conversion and in the case of a corporation or partnership, all directors,
officers, or partners;

(f) A business
telephone with a listing in the local directory;

(g) The name or names
of new vehicles the vehicle dealer wishes to sell;

(h) The names and
addresses of each manufacturer from whom the applicant has received a
franchise;

(i) A certificate by a
representative of the department, that the applicant's principal place of
business and each subagency business location in the state of Washington meets
the location requirements as required by this chapter. The certificate shall
include proof of the applicant's ownership or lease of the real property where
the applicant's principal place of business is established;

(j) A copy of a current
service agreement with a manufacturer, or distributor for a foreign
manufacturer, requiring the applicant, upon demand of any customer receiving a
new vehicle warranty to perform or arrange for, within a reasonable distance of
his or her established place of business, the service repair and
replacement work required of the manufacturer or distributor by such vehicle
warranty. This requirement applies only to applicants seeking to sell, to
exchange, to offer, to auction, to solicit, to advertise, or to broker new or
current-model vehicles with factory or distributor warranties;

(k) The class of
vehicles the vehicle dealer will be buying, selling, listing, exchanging,
offering, brokering, leasing with an option to purchase, auctioning,
soliciting, or advertising, and which classification or classifications the
dealer wishes to be designated as;

(l) A certificate
from the provider of each education program or test showing that the applicant
has completed the education programs and passed the test required under section
1 of this act if the applicant is a dealer subject to the education and test
requirements;

(m) Any other
information the department may reasonably require.

(2) If the applicant is
a manufacturer the application shall contain the following information to the
extent it is applicable to the applicant:

(a) The name and
address of the principal place of business of the applicant and, if different,
the name and address of the Washington state representative of the applicant;

(b) The name or names
under which the applicant will do business in the state of Washington;

(c) Evidence that the
applicant is authorized to do business in the state of Washington;

(d) The name or names
of the vehicles that the licensee manufactures;

(e) The name or names
and address or addresses of each and every distributor, factory branch, and
factory representative;

(f) The name or names
and address or addresses of resident employees or agents to provide service or
repairs to vehicles located in the state of Washington only under the terms of
any warranty attached to new or unused vehicles manufactured, unless such manufacturer
requires warranty service to be performed by all of its dealers pursuant to a
current service agreement on file with the department;

(g) Any other
information the department may reasonably require.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.70.070 and 1996 c
194 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before issuing a
vehicle dealer's license, the department shall require the applicant to file
with the department a surety bond in the amount of:

(a) ((Fifteen)) Thirty
thousand dollars for motor vehicle dealers;

(b) Thirty thousand
dollars for mobile home, park trailer, and travel trailer dealers((:
PROVIDED, That if such dealer does not deal in mobile homes or park trailers
such bond shall be fifteen thousand dollars));

(c) Five thousand
dollars for miscellaneous dealers,

running to the state, and
executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state. Such bond
shall be approved by the attorney general as to form and conditioned that the
dealer shall conduct his or her business in conformity with the
provisions of this chapter.

Any retail purchaser,
consignor who is not a motor vehicle dealer, or a motor vehicle dealer who has
purchased from, sold to, or otherwise transacted business with a wholesale
dealer, who has suffered any loss or damage by reason of any act by a dealer
which constitutes a violation of this chapter shall have the right to institute
an action for recovery against such dealer and the surety upon such bond.
However, under this section, motor vehicle dealers who have purchased from,
sold to, or otherwise transacted business with wholesale dealers may only
institute actions against wholesale dealers and their surety bonds. Successive
recoveries against said bond shall be permitted, but the aggregate liability of
the surety to all persons shall in no event exceed the amount of the bond.
Upon exhaustion of the penalty of said bond or cancellation of the bond by the
surety the vehicle dealer license shall automatically be deemed canceled.

(2) The bond for any
vehicle dealer licensed or to be licensed under more than one classification
shall be the highest bond required for any such classification.

(3)
Vehicle dealers shall maintain a bond for each business location in this state
and bond coverage for all temporary subagencies.

---
END ---