BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) It is declared to be
the public policy of the state of Washington to promote and facilitate the
orderly development and economic stability of its communities. The provision
of adequate government services and the creation and retention of employment
opportunities for all citizens depends upon the economic growth and strength of
the tax base.

(2) In many areas of
the state the lack of necessary infrastructure and vacant brownfields act as an
impediment to economic growth.

(3) The construction of
necessary public improvements in accordance with local economic development
plans will encourage investment in job-producing private development and will
expand the public tax base.

(4) It is the purpose
of sections 2 through 4 of this act to provide financial resources for a
limited time to assist cities in the financing of public improvements which are
needed to encourage private development where this development would not
otherwise occur due to the presence of contaminated property and other
environmental considerations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply to sections 3 and 4 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1)
"Brownfield" means abandoned, idled, or underused property, including
industrial and commercial facilities, where expansion or redevelopment is
complicated by real or perceived contamination.

(2) "Local
economic development project" means a project that:

(a) Promotes economic
development and job creation by the private sector;

(b) Returns tax
revenues to the state general fund and other taxing jurisdictions; and

(c) Includes cleanup of
contaminated brownfield sites, rivers, and lakes that have been designated a
priority for cleanup by the department of ecology.

(3) "Local
economic development project costs" means:

(a) Infrastructure
improvements including but not limited to:

(i) Street and road
construction and maintenance;

(ii) Water and sewer system
construction and improvements;

(iii) Sidewalks and
streetlights;

(iv) Parking, terminal,
and dock facilities;

(v) Public
transportation facilities;

(vi) Park facilities
and recreational areas; and

(vii) Environmental
cleanup, including restoring brownfields and fish habitat.

(b) The costs of land
use planning and associated environmental analysis, project design and
planning, acquisition, site preparation, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, operation, and installation of the local economic
development project; the costs of relocation, maintenance, and operation of
property pending construction of the local economic development project; the
costs of financing, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, and insurance; other capital costs that support
the project; the costs of complying with sections 3 and 4 of this act and other
applicable law; and the administrative costs reasonably necessary and related
to these costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The municipal
economic development project financing account is created in the state
treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2002, the state treasurer shall transfer
into the municipal economic development project financing account for
distribution under this section from the general fund the amount of five
million dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October
1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state
treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as
defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of
financial management in November of the previous year.

(2) No city may receive
a distribution under this section from the municipal economic development
project financing account unless:

(a) The city has
proposed a plan to the department of community, trade, and economic development
that includes a description of the contemplated property and the local economic
development project; the estimated cost of the total project, including both
public and private components; the estimated period during which state revenues
are to be received; ways in which the city plans to use state revenues to
finance the public portion of the project; and the estimated state tax revenues
to be derived from the project.

(b) The city has
delivered notice of the information required under (a) of this subsection and
the department of community, trade, and economic development has reviewed the
information and determined there is a sufficient amount of revenue available to
fund the project under subsection (1) of this section.

(c) The department of
community, trade, and economic development has determined that the project
meets the definition of local economic development project under section 2 of
this act.

(3) Moneys deposited in
the municipal economic development project financing account shall be
distributed by the department of community, trade, and economic development to
cities to assist with the costs of local economic development projects defined
under section 2 of this act. Beginning January 2003, and every year
thereafter, on the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October, the state treasurer shall distribute moneys in the account to
qualifying cities.

(4) No city may receive
more than two million five hundred thousand dollars of all moneys distributed
under subsection (3) of this section in fiscal year 2002. For each fiscal year
thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal
growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by
the office of financial management in November of the previous year.

(5) Moneys distributed
under this section shall be used exclusively for the purposes defined under
section 2 of this act and not be used to replace or supplant existing funding.

(6) No city may lower
its tax rate during the period it receives state revenues under subsection (3)
of this section to finance a local economic development project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department of
community, trade, and economic development, in consultation with the department
of revenue, must submit an annual report to appropriate legislative committees
on the amount of revenue allocated to cities under the economic development
financing program created in sections 2 through 4 of this act. The report must
also contain information on: (1) The number, description, and location of
requests for local economic development projects; (2) the number of local
economic development projects approved by the department; and (3) an evaluation
of how the local economic development project is meeting the definition of
local economic development project in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 39.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Cities with local
economic development projects approved by the department of community, trade,
and economic development under section 3 of this act may issue bonds for the
purpose of funding local economic development projects authorized by section 3
of this act and may pledge to the payment of these bonds the amounts approved
under section 3 of this act to provide financing for the project.

(2) A county in whose
jurisdiction a local economic development project is located is authorized to
issue bonds and incur indebtedness to finance a local economic development project
and may pledge to the payment of these bonds the amounts approved under section
3 of this act to provide financing for the project pursuant to an interlocal
agreement between the city receiving the funds and the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. This act supplements and
neither restricts nor limits any powers which the state or any local government
might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 82.14 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---