BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The intent of this
act is to provide

_7 relief for low-income families for their laundry costs.

_8 Sec. 2. RCW
82.04.050 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 23 are each amended

_9 to read as follows:

10 (1) "Sale at retail" or "retail
sale" means every sale of

11 tangible personal property (including articles produced,

12 fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of
the

13 nature of their business and including, among others,
without

14 limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair,
clean,

15 alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal
property

16 of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who
presents a

17 resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:

p. 1 SB
5619

_1 (a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible
personal

_2 property in the regular course of business without
intervening use

_3 by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale
by a

_4 regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a
sale for

_5 resale; or

_6 (b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints,
improves,

_7 constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or
for

_8 consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an

_9 ingredient or component of such real or personal
property without

10 intervening use by such person; or

11 (c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the
property

12 purchased in producing for sale a new article of
tangible personal

13 property or substance, of which such property becomes an

14 ingredient or component or is a chemical used in
processing, when

15 the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical

16 reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of
a new

17 article being produced for sale; or

18 (d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the
property

19 purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in

20 producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of
such

21 property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact

22 with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

23 (e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the
property to

24 consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as
defined in

25 RCW 82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of
tangible

26 personal property which is used or consumed or to be
used or

27 consumed in the performance of any activity classified
as a "sale

28 at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or

29 utilized as provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of
this

30 subsection following such use. The term also means
every sale of

31 tangible personal property to persons engaged in any
business

32 which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and (7) and
82.04.290.

33 (2) The term "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" shall include

34 the sale of or charge made for tangible personal
property consumed

35 and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the

36 following:

37 (a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering,
imprinting,

38 or improving of tangible personal property of or for
consumers,

SB 5619 p. 2

_1 including charges made for the mere use of facilities in
respect

_2 thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of

_3 ((coin-operated)) self-service laundry
facilities ((when such

_4 facilities are situated in an apartment house,
rooming house, or

_5 mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants
thereof)),

_6 and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health

_7 care facilities, and excluding services rendered in
respect to

_8 live animals, birds and insects;

_9 (b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or
improving of

10 new or existing buildings or other structures under,
upon, or

11 above real property of or for consumers, including the
installing

12 or attaching of any article of tangible personal
property therein

13 or thereto, whether or not such personal property
becomes a part

14 of the realty by virtue of installation, and shall also
include

15 the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of
land and

16 the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land
used in

17 commercial farming or agriculture;

18 (c) The charge for labor and services rendered in
respect to

19 constructing, repairing, or improving any structure
upon, above,

20 or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the

21 property by title, possession, or any other means to the
person

22 performing such construction, repair, or improvement for
the

23 purpose of performing such construction, repair, or
improvement

24 and the property is then reconveyed by title,
possession, or any

25 other means to the original owner;

26 (d) The sale of or charge made for labor and
services rendered

27 in respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving
of

28 existing buildings or structures, but shall not include
the charge

29 made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this
section the

30 term "janitorial services" shall mean those
cleaning and

31 caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial
janitor

32 service businesses including, but not limited to, wall
and window

33 washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in
place of

34 rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial
services" does

35 not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or
septic tank

36 cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

37 (e) The sale of or charge made for labor and
services rendered

p. 3 SB
5619

_1 in respect to automobile towing and similar automotive

_2 transportation services, but not in respect to those
required to

_3 report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

_4 (f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing
of lodging

_5 and all other services by a hotel, rooming house,
tourist court,

_6 motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar
license to

_7 use real property, as distinguished from the renting or
leasing of

_8 real property, and it shall be presumed that the
occupancy of real

_9 property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes

10 a rental or lease of real property and not a mere
license to use

11 or enjoy the same;

12 (g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal
property,

13 labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b),
(c), (d),

14 (e), and (f) of this subsection when such sales or
charges are for

15 property, labor and services which are used or consumed
in whole

16 or in part by such persons in the performance of any
activity

17 defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such

18 property, labor and services may be resold after such
use or

19 consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection shall
be

20 construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and
nothing

21 contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to

22 modify this subsection.

23 (3) The term "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" shall include

24 the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or
professional

25 services including amounts designated as interest,
rents, fees,

26 admission, and other service emoluments however
designated,

27 received by persons engaging in the following business
activities:

28 (a) Amusement and recreation services including but
not limited

29 to golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts
and tows,

30 day trips for sightseeing purposes, and others, when
provided to

31 consumers;

32 (b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

33 (c) Credit bureau services;

34 (d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;

35 (e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services
but

36 excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers
and (ii)

37 pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of
trees and

SB 5619 p. 4

_1 brush near electric transmission or distribution lines
or

_2 equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an
electric

_3 utility;

_4 (f) Service charges associated with tickets to
professional

_5 sporting events; and

_6 (g) The following personal services: Physical
fitness services,

_7 tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam
bath

_8 services, turkish bath services, escort services, and
dating

_9 services.

10 (4) The term shall also include the renting or
leasing of

11 tangible personal property to consumers and the rental
of

12 equipment with an operator.

13 (5) The term shall also include the providing of
telephone

14 service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

15 (6) The term shall also include the sale of canned
software

16 other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate

17 under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of
delivery to the

18 end user, but shall not include custom software or the

19 customization of canned software.

20 (7) The term shall not include the sale of or charge
made for

21 labor and services rendered in respect to the building,
repairing,

22 or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right

23 of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility,

24 bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal

25 corporation or political subdivision of the state or by
the United

26 States and which is used or to be used primarily for
foot or

27 vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles
of any

28 kind.

29 (8) The term shall also not include sales of
chemical sprays or

30 washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest
treatment of

31 fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or
decay, nor

32 shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings,
fertilizer,

33 agents for enhanced pollination including insects such
as bees,

34 and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in
the federal

35 conservation reserve program, the environmental quality
incentives

36 program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife
habitat

37 incentives program, or their successors administered by
the United

38 States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the
purpose of

p. 5 SB
5619

_1 producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c)
farmers

_2 acting under cooperative habitat development or access
contracts

_3 with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26

_4 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department
of fish

_5 and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on
land that

_6 the farmer owns or leases.

_7 (9) The term shall not include the sale of or charge
made for

_8 labor and services rendered in respect to the
constructing,

_9 repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings

10 or other structures under, upon, or above real property
of or for

11 the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a
county or

12 city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW,

13 including the installing, or attaching of any article of
tangible

14 personal property therein or thereto, whether or not
such personal

15 property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation.

16 Nor shall the term include the sale of services or
charges made

17 for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or
for the

18 United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county
or city

19 housing authority. Nor shall the term include the sale
of services

20 or charges made for cleaning up for the United States,
or its

21 instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of

22 weapons production and nuclear research and development.

23 (10) Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include
the sale of

24 or charge made for labor and services rendered for
environmental

25 remedial action as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).

26 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
August 1, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5619 p. 6