BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to encourage the deployment of advanced telecommunications services
in rural areas of the state, and in furtherance thereof, to provide tax
exemptions and credits. The exemptions and credits are available only to nongovernmental
entities providing telecommunications, cable television, or radio
communications services. It is the intent of the legislature that the
exemptions and credits provided by this act apply not only to facilities and
equipment for technologies currently available, but also to those that may
become available in the future.

The legislature finds
that it is in the public interest of all residents of the state to ensure that
advanced telecommunications services are deployed in rural areas of the state
so that the rural areas of the state may serve as areas for economic
development, reduce use of the public highways by encouraging telecommuting
through the use of advanced services, and to benefit the environment of the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to or by telecommunications companies of
machinery and equipment, and to services rendered by or to telecommunications
companies in respect to constructing structures or telecommunications facilities
or repairing, altering, or improving such structures or facilities or to sales
of tangible personal property that become an ingredient or component of
eligible structures, machinery, equipment, or facilities if such structure,
machinery, equipment, or facility is used for the deployment of
telecommunications infrastructure to allow the provisioning of advanced
telecommunications services in rural areas of the state.

(2) A
telecommunications company taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section.
The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) This section
expires January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of machinery, equipment, or
facilities used by telecommunications companies to provide advanced
telecommunications services to rural areas of the state, or tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of eligible machinery,
equipment, or facilities used by telecommunications companies to provide
advanced telecommunications services to rural areas of the state.

(2) A
telecommunications company taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section.

(3) This section
expires January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A
telecommunications company that is eligible for the exemption under section 2
or 3 of this act may take a credit against tax imposed by this chapter, subject
to the limitations in this section.

(2) The credit under
this section is equal to fifty percent of the amount of costs expended for constructing
structures or facilities or acquiring machinery and equipment for which an
exemption was taken under section 2 or 3 of this act.

(3) No application is
necessary for the credit under this section. A telecommunications company
taking the credit must keep records necessary for the department to verify
eligibility under this section. A tax credit may not be claimed for
expenditures that occurred before the effective date of this section.

(4) No applicant is
eligible for tax credits under this section in excess of the amount of tax that
would otherwise be due under this chapter. Approved credit may not be carried
over for more than one calendar year. The credit must be claimed by the due
date of the last tax return for the calendar year in which the payment is
made. Any unused credit remaining, unapplied after the due date of the last
tax return for the first calendar year after the year in which the credit
arose, expires. Refunds shall not be given in place of credits.

(5) This section expires
January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Personal property
eligible for exemption under section 2 or 3 of this act is exempt from
taxation.

(2) This section
applies to taxes levied for collection in 2002 through 2008.

(3) This section
expires January 1, 2009.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. As used in this act,
"rural areas of the state" means those areas that are both (1)
outside the limits of any incorporated city of the first class, and (2) outside
of a corridor in the counties of Snohomish, King, and Pierce, the width of
which corridor is three miles on either side of Interstate 5.

---
END ---