BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that massage therapists have contributed significantly to the welfare of
humans. The legislature also finds that massage therapists can have a
significant positive impact on the well-being of animals, especially in the
equine industry.

It is the legislature's
intent to have the Washington state board of massage adopt rules under their
current authority providing for an endorsement for currently licensed massage
practitioners to perform animal massage upon completion of certain training
courses.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.108.010 and 1997
c 297 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In this chapter, unless
the context otherwise requires, the following meanings shall apply:

(1) "Board"
means the Washington state board of massage.

(2) "Massage"
and "massage therapy" mean a health care service involving the
external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue for therapeutic purposes.
Massage therapy includes techniques such as tapping, compressions, friction,
Swedish gymnastics or movements, gliding, kneading, shaking, and facial or
connective tissue stretching, with or without the aids of superficial heat,
cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not include diagnosis
or attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the body or spine or
mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting force, nor does
it include genital manipulation.

(3) "Massage
practitioner" means an individual licensed under this chapter.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(5) "Massage
business" means the operation of a business where massages are
given.

(6) "Animal
massage practitioner" means an individual with a license to practice massage
therapy in this state with additional training in animal therapy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 18.108 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A massage
practitioner licensed under this chapter may apply for an endorsement as a
small or large animal massage practitioner upon completion of one hundred hours
of training in either large or small animal massage. Training must include
animal massage techniques, kinesiology, anatomy, physiology, first aid care,
and proper handling techniques. The board may adopt rules to implement this
section.

(2) Massage therapy of
animals does not include diagnosis, prognosis, or all treatment of diseases,
deformities, defects, wounds, or injuries of animals. For the purposes of this
section, massage for therapeutic purposes may be performed solely for purposes
of patient well-being.

(3) A
person licensed and endorsed under this section may hold themselves out as an
animal massage practitioner.

---
END ---