BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 48.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commissioner
may license as a surplus line broker a person who is otherwise qualified under
this code but who is not a resident of this state, if by the laws of the state
or province of his or her residence or domicile a similar privilege is extended
to residents of this state.

(2) A
person under subsection (1) of this section must meet the same qualifications,
other than residency, as any other person seeking to be licensed as a surplus
line broker under this chapter. A person granted a nonresident surplus line
broker's license must have all the same responsibilities as any other surplus
line broker and is subject to the (a) commissioner's supervision as though
resident in this state and (b) rules adopted under this chapter.

--- END ---