BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.18.060 and 1991 c
154 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The landlord will at
all times during the tenancy keep the premises fit for human habitation, and
shall in particular:

(1) Maintain the
premises to substantially comply with any applicable code, statute, ordinance,
or regulation governing their maintenance or operation, which the legislative
body enacting the applicable code, statute, ordinance or regulation could
enforce as to the premises rented if such condition substantially endangers or
impairs the health or safety of the tenant;

(2) Maintain the roofs,
floors, walls, chimneys, fireplaces, foundations, and all other structural
components in reasonably good repair so as to be usable and capable of
resisting any and all normal forces and loads to which they may be subjected;

(3) Keep any shared or
common areas reasonably clean, sanitary, and safe from defects increasing the
hazards of fire or accident;

(4) Provide a
reasonable program for the control of infestation by insects, rodents, and
other pests at the initiation of the tenancy and, except in the case of a
single family residence, control infestation during tenancy except where such
infestation is caused by the tenant;

(5) Except where the
condition is attributable to normal wear and tear, make repairs and
arrangements necessary to put and keep the premises in as good condition as it
by law or rental agreement should have been, at the commencement of the
tenancy;

(6) Provide reasonably
adequate locks and furnish keys to the tenant;

(7) Maintain all
electrical, plumbing, heating, and other facilities and appliances supplied by
him in reasonably good working order;

(8) Maintain the
dwelling unit in reasonably weathertight condition;

(9) Except in the case
of a single family residence, provide and maintain appropriate receptacles in
common areas for the removal of ashes, rubbish, and garbage, incidental to the
occupancy and arrange for the reasonable and regular removal of such waste;

(10) Except where the
building is not equipped for the purpose, provide facilities adequate to supply
heat and water and hot water as reasonably required by the tenant;

(11)(a) Provide a
written notice to all tenants disclosing fire safety and protection
information. The landlord or his or her authorized agent must provide a
written notice to the tenant that the dwelling unit is equipped with a smoke
detection device as required in RCW 48.48.140. The notice shall inform the
tenant of the tenant's responsibility to maintain the smoke detection device in
proper operating condition and of penalties for failure to comply with the
provisions of RCW 48.48.140(3). The notice must be signed by the landlord or
the landlord's authorized agent and tenant with copies provided to both
parties. Further, except with respect to a single-family residence, the
written notice must also disclose the following:

(i) Whether the
smoke detection device is hard-wired or battery operated;

(ii) Whether the
building has a fire sprinkler system;

(iii) Whether the
building has a fire alarm system;

(iv) Whether the
building has a smoking policy, and what that policy is;

(v) Whether the
building has an emergency notification plan for the occupants and, if so,
provide a copy to the occupants;

(vi) Whether the
building has an emergency relocation plan for the occupants and, if so, provide
a copy to the occupants; and

(vii) Whether the
building has an emergency evacuation plan for the occupants and, if so, provide
a copy to the occupants.

(b) The written
notice must be provided to new tenants at the time the lease or rental
agreement is signed, and must be provided to current tenants as soon as
possible, but not later than January 1, 2004; and

(12) Designate to the
tenant the name and address of the person who is the landlord by a statement on
the rental agreement or by a notice conspicuously posted on the premises. The
tenant shall be notified immediately of any changes by certified mail or by an
updated posting. If the person designated in this section does not reside in
the state where the premises are located, there shall also be designated a
person who resides in the county who is authorized to act as an agent for the
purposes of service of notices and process, and if no designation is made of a
person to act as agent, then the person to whom rental payments are to be made
shall be considered such agent((.));

No duty
shall devolve upon the landlord to repair a defective condition under this
section, nor shall any defense or remedy be available to the tenant under this
chapter, where the defective condition complained of was caused by the conduct
of such tenant, his family, invitee, or other person acting under his control,
or where a tenant unreasonably fails to allow the landlord access to the
property for purposes of repair. When the duty imposed by subsection (1) of
this section is incompatible with and greater than the duty imposed by any
other provisions of this section, the landlord's duty shall be determined
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---