BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.04.005 and 1999 c
65 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in RCW
41.04.005, 41.16.220, ((and)) 41.20.050, 41.40.170, and 28B.15.380
"veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she seeks the
benefits of RCW 41.04.005, ((41.04.010,)) 41.16.220, 41.20.050,
41.40.170, ((73.04.110, or 73.08.080)) or 28B.15.380 has received
an honorable discharge or received a discharge for physical reasons with an
honorable record and who meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) The person has
served between World War I and World War II or during any period of war, as
defined in subsection (2) of this section, as either:

(i) A member in any
branch of the armed forces of the United States;

(ii) A member of the
women's air forces service pilots;

(iii) A U.S. documented
merchant mariner with service aboard an oceangoing vessel operated by the war
shipping administration, the office of defense transportation, or their agents,
from December 7, 1941, ((to)) through December 31, 1946; or

(iv) A civil service
crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army transport service or U.S. naval
transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, ((to))
through December 31, 1946; or

(b) The person has
received the armed forces expeditionary medal, or marine corps and navy
expeditionary medal, for opposed action on foreign soil, for service:

(i) In any branch of
the armed forces of the United States; or

(ii) As a member of the
women's air forces service pilots.

(2) A "period of
war" includes:

(a) World War I;

(b) World War II;

(c) The Korean conflict;

(d) The Vietnam era,
which was the period beginning August 5, 1964, and ending on May 7, 1975;

(e) The Persian Gulf
War, which was the period beginning August 2, 1990, and ending on the date
prescribed by presidential proclamation or law;

(f) The period
beginning on the date of any future declaration of war by the congress and
ending on the date prescribed by presidential proclamation or concurrent
resolution of the congress; and

(g) The following armed
conflicts, if the participant was awarded the respective campaign badge or
medal: The crisis in Lebanon; the invasion of Grenada; Panama, Operation Just
Cause; Somalia, Operation Restore Hope; Haiti, Operation Uphold Democracy; and
Bosnia, Operation Joint Endeavor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Veteran"
includes every person, who at the time he or she seeks the benefits of RCW
72.36.030, 41.04.010, 73.04.090, 73.04.110, 73.08.010, 73.08.060, 73.08.070, or
73.08.080 has received an honorable discharge or received a discharge for
medical reasons with an honorable record, where applicable, and who has served
in at least one of the following capacities:

(1) As a member in any
branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard
and armed forces reserves, and has fulfilled his or her initial military
service obligation;

(2) As a member of the
women's air forces service pilots;

(3) As a member of the
armed forces reserves, national guard, or coast guard, and has been called into
federal service by a presidential select reserve call up for at least one
hundred eighty cumulative days;

(4) As a civil service
crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army transport service or U.S. naval
transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941,
through December 31, 1946; or

(5) As a member of the
Philippine armed forces/scouts during the period of armed conflict from December
7, 1941, through August 15, 1945.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.027 and 1999 c
199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A Washington state
motor vehicle driver's license issued to any ((person serving in the armed
forces of the United States,)) service member if valid and in force
and effect while such person is serving in the armed forces, shall remain in
full force and effect so long as such service continues unless the same is
sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law and for not
to exceed ninety days following the date on which the holder of such driver's
license is honorably separated from service in the armed forces of the United
States. A Washington state driver's license issued to the spouse or dependent
child of such service member likewise remains in full force and effect if the
person is residing with the service member.

For purposes of this
section, "service member" means every person serving in the armed
forces whose service as of the date of application for the driver's license
meets the definition of veteran pursuant to section 2 of this act or the person
will meet the definition of veteran at the time of discharge.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.04.010 and 2000 c
140 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In all competitive
examinations, unless otherwise provided in this section, to determine the
qualifications of applicants for public offices, positions or employment, the
state, and all of its political subdivisions and all municipal corporations,
shall give a scoring criteria status to all veterans as defined in ((RCW
41.04.005)) section 2 of this act, by adding to the passing mark,
grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating of one hundred points as
perfect a percentage in accordance with the following:

(1) Ten percent to a
veteran who served during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in
RCW 41.04.005 and does not receive military retirement. The percentage shall
be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations
until the veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in
promotional examinations;

(2) Five percent to a
veteran who did not serve during a period of war or in an armed conflict as
defined in ((RCW 41.04.005)) section 2 of this act or is
receiving military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing
mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first
appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional examinations;

(3) Five percent to a
veteran who was called to active military service for one or more years from
employment with the state or any of its political subdivisions or municipal
corporations. The percentage shall be added to the first promotional
examination only;

(4) All veterans'
scoring criteria specified in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section
must be claimed within fifteen years of the date of release from active
military service. This period may be extended for valid and extenuating
reasons to include but not be limited to:

(a) Documented medical
reasons beyond control of the veteran;

(b) United States
department of veterans' affairs documented disabled veteran; or

(c) Any
veteran who has his or her employment terminated through no fault or action of
his or her own and whose livelihood is adversely affected may seek scoring
criteria employment consideration under this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 72.36.035 and 1993
sp.s. c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) "Actual bona
fide residents of this state" means persons who have a domicile in the
state of Washington immediately prior to application for admission to a state
veterans' home.

(2)
"Department" means the Washington state department of veterans affairs.

(3)
"Domicile" means a person's true, fixed, and permanent home and place
of habitation, and shall be the place where the person intends to remain, and
to which the person expects to return when the person leaves without intending
to establish a new domicile elsewhere.

(4) "State
veterans' home" means either the Washington soldiers' home and colony in
Orting, or the Washington veterans' home in Retsil, or both.

(5)
"Veteran" has the same meaning established in ((RCW 41.04.005))
section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 73.04.090 and 1991 c
240 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

All
benefits, advantages or emoluments, not available upon equal terms to all
citizens, including but not being limited to preferred rights to public
employment, civil service preference, exemption from license fees or other
impositions, preference in purchasing state property ((and special pension
or retirement rights)), which by any law of this state have been made
specially available to war veterans or to persons who have served in the armed
forces or defense forces of the United States, shall be available only to
persons who have been subject to full and continuous military control and
discipline as actual members of the federal armed forces or to persons defined
as "veterans" in ((RCW 41.04.005)) section 2 of this act.
Service with such forces in a civilian capacity, or in any capacity wherein a
person retained the right to terminate his or her service or to refuse full
obedience to military superiors, shall not be the basis for eligibility for
such benefits. Service in any of the following shall not for purposes of this
section be considered as military service: The office of emergency services or
any component thereof; the American Red Cross; the United States Coast Guard
Auxiliary; United States Coast Guard Reserve Temporary; United States Coast and
Geodetic Survey; American Field Service; Civil Air Patrol; Cadet Nurse Corps,
and any other similar organization.

Sec. 7. RCW 73.08.010 and 1983 c
295 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the
relief of indigent and suffering veterans as defined in ((RCW 41.04.005))
section 2 of this act and their families or the families of those
deceased, who need assistance in any city, town or precinct in this state, the
legislative authority of the county in which the city, town or precinct is
situated shall provide such sum or sums of money as may be necessary, to be
drawn upon by the commander and quartermaster, or commander and adjutant or
commander and service officer of any post, camp or chapter of any national
organization of veterans now, or which may hereafter be, chartered by an act of
congress in the city or town upon recommendation of the relief committee of
said post, camp or chapter: PROVIDED, Said veteran or the families of those
deceased are and have been residents of the state for at least twelve months,
and the orders of said commander and quartermaster, or commander and adjutant
or commander and service officer shall be the proper voucher for the
expenditure of said sum or sums of money.

Sec. 8. RCW 73.08.060 and 1983 c
295 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

County legislative
authorities are hereby prohibited from sending indigent or disabled veterans as
defined in ((RCW 41.04.005)) section 2 of this act or their
families or the families of the deceased to any almshouse (or orphan asylum)
without the concurrence and consent of the commander and relief committee of
the post, camp or chapter of any national organization of veterans now, or
which may hereafter be, chartered by an act of congress as provided in RCW
73.08.010 and 73.08.030. Indigent veterans shall, whenever practicable, be
provided for and relieved at their homes in such city, town or precinct in
which they shall have a residence, in the manner provided in RCW 73.08.010 and
73.08.030. Indigent or disabled veterans as defined in ((RCW 41.04.005))
section 2 of this act, who are not insane and have no families or
friends with whom they may be domiciled, may be sent to any soldiers' home.

Sec. 9. RCW 73.08.070 and 1997 c
286 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall
be the duty of the legislative authority in each of the counties in this state
to designate some proper authority other than the one designated by law for the
care of paupers and the custody of criminals who shall cause to be interred at
the expense of the county the body of any honorably discharged veterans as
defined in ((RCW 41.04.005)) section 2 of this act and the wives,
husbands, minor children, widows or widowers of such veterans, who shall
hereafter die without leaving means sufficient to defray funeral expenses; and
when requested so to do by the commanding officer of any post, camp or chapter
of any national organization of veterans now, or which may hereafter be,
chartered by an act of congress or the relief committee of any such posts, camps
or chapters: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such interment shall not cost more than
the limit established by the county legislative authority nor less than three
hundred dollars. If the deceased has relatives or friends who desire to
conduct the burial of such deceased person, then upon request of said commander
or relief committee a sum not to exceed the limit established by the county
legislative authority nor less than three hundred dollars shall be paid to said
relatives or friends by the county treasurer, upon due proof of the death and
burial of any person provided for by this section and proof of expenses
incurred.

Sec. 10. RCW 73.24.030 and 1977 c
31 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The said plot shall be
available, to the extent such space is available, without charge or cost for
the burial of persons who have served in the army, navy, or marine corps in the
United States, in the Spanish-American war, Philippine insurrection, or the
Chinese Relief Expedition, or who served in any said branches of said service
at any time between April 21, 1898 and July 4, 1902 and any veteran as defined
in ((RCW 41.04.005)) section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The higher education
coordinating board and the joint committee on pension policy shall each conduct
a study as to the eligibility of veterans for benefits provided, respectively,
by higher education and the state retirement system if the definition of
veteran is modified in the manner provided in section 2 of this act and report
their findings to the legislature by December 1, 2002.

---
END ---