BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 73.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
created a joint committee on veterans' and military affairs. The committee
shall consist of: (a) Eight members of the senate appointed by the president
of the senate, four of whom shall be members of the majority party and four of
whom shall be members of the minority party; and (b) eight members of the house
of representatives appointed by the speaker, four of whom shall be members of
the majority party and four of whom shall be members of the minority party.
Members of the committee shall be appointed before the close of the 2001
legislative session, and before the close of each regular session during an
odd-numbered year thereafter.

(2) Each member's term
of office shall run from the close of the session in which he or she was appointed
until the close of the next regular session held in an odd-numbered year. If a
successor is not appointed during a session, the member's term shall continue
until the member is reappointed or a successor is appointed. The term of
office for a committee member who does not continue as a member of the senate
or house of representatives shall cease upon the convening of the next session
of the legislature during an odd-numbered year after the member's appointment,
or upon the member's resignation, whichever is earlier. Vacancies on the
committee shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as described in
subsection (1) of this section. All such vacancies shall be filled from the
same political party and from the same house as the member whose seat was
vacated.

(3) The committee shall
establish an executive committee of four members representing the majority and
minority caucuses of each house. The executive committee is responsible for
performing all general administrative and personnel duties assigned to it in
the rules and procedures adopted by the joint committee, as well as other
duties delegated to it by the joint committee.

(4) The joint committee
on veterans' and military affairs has the following powers and duties:

(a) To study veterans'
issues, active military forces issues, and national guard and reserve component
issues, and make recommendations to the legislature; and

(b) To study structure
and administration of the department of veterans affairs and the military
department, and make recommendations to the legislature.

(5) The
joint committee shall adopt rules and procedures for its orderly operation.
The joint committee may create subcommittees to perform duties under this
section.

--- END ---