BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.379 and 2000 c
103 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that the property tax exemption authorized by Article VII, section 10 of the
state Constitution should be made available on the basis of a veteran's
widow or widower or retired person's ability to pay property taxes. The
legislature further finds that the best measure of a ((retired))
person's ability to pay taxes is that person's disposable income as defined in
RCW 84.36.383.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

A person shall be
exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the amount of
excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year following
the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the
following:

(1) The property taxes
must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied by a veteran's widow
or widower claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of the
time of filing. Any person who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or
her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement
residence, but no claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one
residence in any year. Confinement of the person to a hospital or nursing home
shall not disqualify the claim of exemption if:

(a) The residence is
temporarily unoccupied;

(b) The residence is
occupied by a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or

(c) The residence is
rented for the purpose of paying nursing home or hospital costs;

(2) The person claiming
the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in fee, as a life estate,
or by contract purchase, the residence on which the property taxes have been
imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, the person must own a share therein
representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he or she resides.
For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by cotenants shall be deemed
to be owned by each cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a life
estate;

(3)(a) The person
claiming the exemption must be:

(i) Sixty-one years of
age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is
filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful
employment by reason of physical disability; and

(ii) A widow or widower
of a veteran who:

(A) Died as a result of
a service-connected disability;

(B) Was rated as one
hundred percent disabled by the United States veterans' administration for the
ten years prior to his or her death;

(C) Was a former
prisoner of war as substantiated by the United States veterans' administration
and was rated as one hundred percent disabled by the United States veterans'
administration for one or more years prior to his or her death; or

(D) Died in active
training status as a member of the United States reserves or national guard;

(b) The person claiming
the exemption must not have remarried;

(4) The amount of
property taxes from which the person is exempt shall be calculated on the basis
of disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the income of the person
claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment year due
to substantial changes that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of
time, the disposable income of the person shall be calculated by multiplying
the average monthly disposable income of the person after such occurrences by
twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection,
the assessor may require confirming documentation of such income prior to May
31st of the year following application;

(5)(a) A person who
otherwise qualifies under this section and has a disposable income of
thirty-two thousand dollars or less is exempt from all regular and excess
property taxes on the first two hundred thousand dollars of assessed value;

(b) A person who
otherwise qualifies under this section and has a disposable income of forty
thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty two thousand dollars is exempt
from all regular and excess property taxes on the first one hundred fifty
thousand dollars of assessed value;

(c) A person who
otherwise qualifies under this section and has a disposable income of fifty
thousand dollars or less but greater than forty thousand dollars is exempt from
all regular and excess property taxes on the first one hundred thousand dollars
of assessed value; and

(6) For a person who
otherwise qualifies under this section and has a disposable income of fifty
thousand dollars or less, the valuation of the residence shall be the assessed
value of the residence on the later of January 1, 2001, or January 1st of the
assessment year in which the person first qualifies under this section. If the
person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one year
because of high income, this same valuation shall be used upon requalification.
If the person fails to qualify for more than one year in succession because of
high income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon
requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of the assessment
year in which the person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption
under this section to a different residence, the valuation of the different
residence shall be the assessed value of the different residence on January 1st
of the assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.

In no event may the
valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and fair value of the
residence on January 1st of the assessment year.

This subsection does
not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the year in which the
improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the property shall be added
to the value otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair
value in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.383 and 1999 c
358 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section 2 of this act, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:

(1) The term
"residence" means a single family dwelling unit whether such unit be
separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which such
dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include a share
ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if
the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents
the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The
term shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of
which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including
an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence shall be deemed
real property.

(2) The term "real
property" shall also include a mobile home which has substantially lost
its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed in location upon
land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and placed on a foundation
(posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other
utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the owner of the mobile
home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the
personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4) "Combined
disposable income" means the disposable income of the person claiming the
exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse, and the disposable
income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the assessment year, less
amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during
the assessment year for:

(a) Drugs supplied by
prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws of this state or
another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; and

(b) The treatment or
care of either person received in the home or in a nursing home.

(5) "Disposable
income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal
revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as
the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section,
plus all of the following items to the extent they are not included in or have
been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a) Capital gains,
other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal
revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b) Amounts deducted
for loss;

(c) Amounts deducted
for depreciation;

(d) Pension and annuity
receipts;

(e) Military pay and
benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f) Veterans benefits
other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(g) Federal social
security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h) Dividend receipts;
and

(i) Interest received
on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

(7)
"Veteran" has the same meaning as provided under RCW 41.04.005.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.36.385 and 1992 c
206 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A claim for
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act as now or
hereafter amended, shall be made and filed at any time during the year for
exemption from taxes payable the following year and thereafter and solely upon
forms as prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue. However, an
exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act shall
continue for no more than four years unless a renewal application is filed as
provided in subsection (3) of this section. The county assessor may also
require, by written notice, a renewal application following an amendment of the
income requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act.
Renewal applications shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue.

(2) A person granted an
exemption under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act shall inform the
county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's entitlement to
the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(3) Each person exempt
from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 ((in 1993 and thereafter,)) or section
2 of this act shall file with the county assessor a renewal application not
later than December 31 of the year the assessor notifies such person of the
requirement to file the renewal application.

(4)(a) An
application for exemption under section 2 of this act must be accompanied by
the following documentation to substantiate the request for the exemption and
any other documentation required by the county in which the exemption is
sought:

(i) The deceased
veteran's DD 214 report of separation, or its equivalent, that must be under
honorable conditions;

(ii) A copy of the
applicant's certificate of marriage to the deceased;

(iii) A copy of the
deceased veteran's death certificate; and

(iv) A letter from
the United States veterans' administration certifying that the death of the
veteran meets the requirements of section 2(3) of this act.

(b) The Washington
state department of veterans affairs shall assist an eligible widow or widower
in the preparation and submission of an application and the procurement of
necessary substantiating documentation to satisfy the pertinent county
assessor's or other designated official's requirements for obtaining the
property tax exemption under section 2 of this act.

(5) Beginning in
1992 and in each of the three succeeding years, the county assessor shall
notify approximately one-fourth of those persons exempt from taxes under RCW
84.36.381 or section 2 of this act in the current year who have not
filed a renewal application within the previous four years, of the requirement
to file a renewal application.

(((5))) (6)
If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications as
set forth in RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act, as now or hereafter
amended, the claim or exemption shall be denied but such denial shall be
subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010(5). If the applicant
had received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the taxes
shall be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for a
period of not to exceed three years.

(((6))) (7)
The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to publicize the
qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW 84.36.381 through
84.36.389 and section 2 of this act, through communications media,
including such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice
of the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for not
reporting a change in status, and availability of further information shall be
included on or with property tax statements and revaluation notices for all
residential property including mobile homes, except rental properties.

Sec. 5. RCW 84.36.387 and 1992 c
206 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All claims for
exemption shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the exemption, by
his or her attorney in fact or in the event the residence of such person is
under mortgage or purchase contract requiring accumulation of reserves out of
which the holder of the mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate
taxes, by such holder or by the owner, either before two witnesses or the
county assessor or his deputy in the county where the real property is located:
PROVIDED, That if a claim for exemption is made by a person living in a
cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such claim shall
be made and signed by the person entitled to the exemption and by the
authorized agent of such cooperative.

(2) If the taxpayer is
unable to submit his own claim, the claim shall be submitted by a duly
authorized agent or by a guardian or other person charged with the care of the
person or property of such taxpayer.

(3) All claims for
exemption and renewal applications shall be accompanied by such documented
verification of income as shall be prescribed by rule adopted by the department
of revenue.

(4) Any person signing
a false claim with the intent to defraud or evade the payment of any tax shall
be guilty of the offense of perjury.

(5) The tax liability
of a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership shall be
reduced by the amount of tax exemption to which a claimant residing therein is
entitled and such cooperative shall reduce any amount owed by the claimant to
the cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or, if no amount be owed,
the cooperative shall make payment to the claimant of such exact amount of
exemption.

(6) A remainderman or
other person who would have otherwise paid the tax on real property that is the
subject of an exemption granted under RCW 84.36.381 or section 2 of this act
for an estate for life shall reduce the amount which would have been payable by
the life tenant to the remainderman or other person to the extent of the
exemption. If no amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation between
these persons, the remainderman or other person shall make payment to the life
tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.36.389 and 1979
ex.s. c 214 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of the
department of revenue shall adopt such rules and regulations and prescribe such
forms as may be necessary and appropriate for implementation and administration
of this chapter subject to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(2) The department may
conduct such audits of the administration of RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and
section 2 of this act and the claims for exemption filed thereunder as it
considers necessary. The powers of the department under chapter 84.08 RCW
apply to these audits.

(3) Any information or
facts concerning confidential income data obtained by the assessor or the
department, or their agents or employees, under subsection (2) of this section
shall be used only to administer RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 and section
2 of this act. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
absent written consent by the person about whom the information or facts have
been obtained, the confidential income data shall not be disclosed by the
assessor or the assessor's agents or employees to anyone other than the
department or the department's agents or employees nor by the department or the
department's agents or employees to anyone other than the assessor or the
assessor's agents or employees except in a judicial proceeding pertaining to
the taxpayer's entitlement to the tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389
and section 2 of this act. Any violation of this subsection is a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 7. RCW 84.04.030 and 1997 c
3 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

"Assessed value of
property" shall be held and construed to mean the aggregate valuation of
the property subject to taxation by any taxing district as determined under RCW
84.40.0305, reduced by the value of any applicable exemptions under RCW
84.36.381, section 2 of this act, or other law, and placed on the last completed
and balanced tax rolls of the county preceding the date of any tax levy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---