BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.88.160 and 1998 c
135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This section sets forth
the major fiscal duties and responsibilities of officers and agencies of the
executive branch. The regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this
chapter shall provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management
and control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the
executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition, such
requirements as will generally promote more efficient public management in the
state.

(1) Governor; director
of financial management. The governor, through the director of financial
management, shall devise and supervise a modern and complete accounting system
for each agency to the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts,
disbursements, resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and
systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the
development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial affairs of
the state. The system shall also provide for central accounts in the office of
financial management at the level of detail deemed necessary by the director to
perform central financial management. The director of financial management
shall adopt and periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency
maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with the
updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director adopted
under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from complying with this
requirement if the waiver is approved by the director. Waivers expire at the
end of the fiscal biennium for which they are granted. The director shall
forward notice of waivers granted to the appropriate legislative fiscal
committees. The director of financial management may require such financial,
statistical, and other reports as the director deems necessary from all
agencies covering any period.

(2) Except as provided
in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of financial management is responsible for
quarterly reporting of primary operating budget drivers such as applicable
workloads, caseload estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports
shall be transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic
means to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance between
actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also include estimates of
these items for the remainder of the budget period.

(3) The director of
financial management shall report at least annually to the appropriate
legislative committees regarding the status of all appropriated capital
projects, including transportation projects, showing significant cost overruns
or underruns. If funds are shifted from one project to another, the office of
financial management shall also reflect this in the annual variance report.
Once a project is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing
estimated start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual
dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs, and
whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled claims at the
time of completion.

(4) In addition, the
director of financial management, as agent of the governor, shall:

(a) Develop and
maintain a system of internal controls and internal audits comprising methods
and procedures to be adopted by each agency that will safeguard its assets,
check the accuracy and reliability of its accounting data, promote operational
efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed managerial policies for
accounting and financial controls. The system developed by the director shall
include criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal
controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of resources
at risk.

Each agency head or
authorized designee shall be assigned the responsibility and authority for
establishing and maintaining internal audits following the standards of
internal auditing of the institute of internal auditors;

(b) Make surveys and
analyses of agencies with the object of determining better methods and
increased effectiveness in the use of manpower and materials; and the director
shall authorize expenditures for employee training to the end that the state
may benefit from training facilities made available to state employees;

(c) Establish policies
for allowing the contracting of child care services;

(d) Report to the
governor with regard to duplication of effort or lack of coordination among
agencies;

(e) Review any pay and
classification plans, and changes thereunder, developed by any agency for their
fiscal impact: PROVIDED, That none of the provisions of this subsection shall
affect merit systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter
established by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements
for recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The
director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate standing
committees of the legislature as may be designated by the speaker of the house
and the president of the senate regarding the fiscal impact of such plans and
may amend or alter ((said)) the plans, except that for the
following agencies no amendment or alteration of ((said)) the
plans may be made without the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies
headed by elective officials;

(f) Fix the number and
classes of positions or authorized ((man)) employee years of
employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend the
determinations previously fixed by the director except that the director shall
not be empowered to fix ((said)) the number or ((said)) the
classes for the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(g) Adopt rules to effectuate
provisions contained in (a) through (f) of this subsection.

(5) The treasurer
shall:

(a) Receive, keep, and
disburse all public funds of the state not expressly required by law to be
received, kept, and disbursed by some other persons: PROVIDED, That this
subsection shall not apply to those public funds of the institutions of higher
learning which are not subject to appropriation;

(b) Receive, disburse,
or transfer public funds under the treasurer's supervision or custody;

(c) Keep a correct and
current account of all moneys received and disbursed by the treasurer,
classified by fund or account;

(d) Coordinate
agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and other payment methods, if the
agencies have received authorization under RCW 43.41.180;

(e) Perform such other
duties as may be required by law or by regulations issued pursuant to this law.

It shall be unlawful
for the treasurer to disburse public funds in the treasury except upon forms or
by alternative means duly prescribed by the director of financial management.
These forms or alternative means shall provide for authentication and
certification by the agency head or the agency head's designee that the
services have been rendered or the materials have been furnished; or, in the
case of loans or grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in
the case of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state
owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance services
is currently in effect ((and copies thereof are on file with the office of
financial management)); and the treasurer shall not be liable under the
treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so made. When services
are lawfully paid for in advance of full performance by any private individual
or business entity other than equipment maintenance providers or as
provided for by RCW 42.24.035, such individual or entity other than central
stores rendering such services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond
coverage to the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by
law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the department
of general administration but in no case shall such required cash deposit or
surety bond be less than an amount which will fully indemnify the state against
any and all losses on account of breach of promise to fully perform such
services. No payments shall be made in advance for any equipment maintenance
services to be performed more than ((three)) twelve months after
such payment. Any such bond so furnished shall be conditioned that the person,
firm or corporation receiving the advance payment will apply it toward
performance of the contract. The responsibility for recovery of erroneous or
improper payments made under this section shall lie with the agency head or the
agency head's designee in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this
chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public body to
advance funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant or loan before
services have been rendered or material furnished.

(6) The state auditor
shall:

(a) Report to the
legislature the results of current post audits that have been made of the
financial transactions of each agency; to this end the auditor may, in the
auditor's discretion, examine the books and accounts of any agency, official,
or employee charged with the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds.
Where feasible in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and
findings from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial
management. The current post audit of each agency may include a section on
recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(b) Give information to
the legislature, whenever required, upon any subject relating to the financial
affairs of the state.

(c) Make the auditor's
official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the
meeting of the legislature. The report shall be for the last complete fiscal
period and shall include determinations as to whether agencies, in making
expenditures, complied with the laws of this state. The state auditor is
authorized to perform or participate in performance verifications and
performance audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus
biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan approved by
the joint legislative audit and review committee. The state auditor, upon
completing an audit for legal and financial compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW
or a performance verification, may report to the joint legislative audit and
review committee or other appropriate committees of the legislature, in a
manner prescribed by the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts
relating to the management or performance of governmental programs where such
facts are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or performance
verification. The auditor may make such a report to a legislative committee
only if the auditor has determined that the agency has been given an
opportunity and has failed to resolve the management or performance issues
raised by the auditor. If the auditor makes a report to a legislative
committee, the agency may submit to the committee a response to the report.
This subsection (6) shall not be construed to authorize the auditor to allocate
other than de minimis resources to performance audits except as expressly
authorized in the appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan.
The results of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been
requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only be
transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(d) Be empowered to
take exception to specific expenditures that have been incurred by any agency
or to take exception to other practices related in any way to the agency's
financial transactions and to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of
public record, including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director
of financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of financial
management to cause corrective action to be taken within six months, such
action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of funds as provided in RCW
43.88.110. The director of financial management shall annually report by
December 31st the status of audit resolution to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the state auditor, and the attorney general. The director of
financial management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of personnel
actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped goods or
services.

(e) Promptly report any
irregularities to the attorney general.

(f) Investigate
improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40 RCW.

(7) The joint
legislative audit and review committee may:

(a) Make post audits of
the financial transactions of any agency and management surveys and program
reviews as provided for in chapter 44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and
program evaluations. To this end the joint committee may in its discretion
examine the books, accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or
employee.

(b) Give information to
the legislature or any legislative committee whenever required upon any subject
relating to the performance and management of state agencies.

(c) Make a report to
the legislature which shall include at least the following:

(i) Determinations as
to the extent to which agencies in making expenditures have complied with the
will of the legislature and in this connection, may take exception to specific
expenditures or financial practices of any agencies; and

(ii) Such plans as it
deems expedient for the support of the state's credit, for lessening
expenditures, for promoting frugality and economy in agency affairs, and
generally for an improved level of fiscal management.

Sec. 2. RCW 79.44.040 and 1989 c
243 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Notice of the intention
to make such improvement, or impose any assessment, together with the estimate
of the amount to be charged to each lot, tract or parcel of land, or other
property owned by the state to be assessed, shall be forwarded by registered or
certified mail to the ((director of financial management and to the))
chief administrative officer of the agency of state government occupying,
using, or having jurisdiction over such lands at least thirty days prior to the
date fixed for hearing on the resolution or petition initiating ((said))
the assessment. Such assessing district, shall not have jurisdiction to
order such improvement as to the interest of the state in harbor areas and
state tidelands until the written consent of the commissioner of public lands
to the making of such improvement shall have been obtained, unless other means
be provided for paying that portion of the cost which would otherwise be levied
on the interest of the state of Washington in and to ((said)) those
tidelands, and nothing herein shall prevent the city from assessing the
proportionate cost of ((said)) the improvement against any
leasehold, contractual, or possessory interest in and to any tideland or
harbor area owned by the state: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in the case of
tidelands and harbor areas within the boundaries of any port district, notice
of intention to make such improvement shall also be forwarded to the
commissioners of ((said)) the port district.

Sec. 3. RCW 79.44.050 and 1989 c
243 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the approval and
confirmation of the assessment roll ordered by the proper authorities of any
assessing district, the treasurer of such assessing district shall certify and
forward ((to the director of financial management and)) to the chief
administrative officer of the agency of state government occupying, using, or
having jurisdiction over the lands, ((in accordance with such rules and
regulations as the director of financial management may provide,)) a
statement of all the lots or parcels of land held or owned by the state and
charged on such assessment roll, separately describing each such lot or parcel
of the state's land, with the amount of the local assessment charged against
it, or the proportionate amount assessed against the fee simple interest of the
state, in case ((said)) the land has been leased. The chief
administrative officer upon receipt of such statement shall cause a proper
record to be made in his office of the cost of such assessment upon the lands
occupied, used, or under the jurisdiction of his agency.

No penalty shall be
provided or enforced against the state, and the interest upon such assessments
shall be computed and paid at the rate paid by other property situated in the
same assessing district.

Sec. 4. RCW 79.44.070 and 1979 c
151 s 180 are each amended to read as follows:

When any assessing
district has made or caused to be made an assessment against such leasehold,
contractual, or possessory interest for any such local improvement, the
treasurer of ((said)) that assessing district shall immediately
give notice ((to the director of financial management and)) to the chief
administrative officer of the agency having jurisdiction over the lands. ((Said))
The assessment shall become a lien against the leasehold, contractual,
or possessory interest in the same manner as the assessments on other property,
and its collection may be enforced against such interests as provided by law
for the enforcement of other local improvement assessments: PROVIDED, That ((said))
the assessment shall not be made payable in installments unless the
owner of such leasehold, contractual, or possessory interest shall first
file with such treasurer a satisfactory bond guaranteeing the payment of such
installments as they become due.

Sec. 5. RCW 79.44.080 and 1979 c
151 s 181 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any assessing
district shall have foreclosed the lien of any such delinquent assessments, as
provided by law, and shall have obtained title to such leasehold, contractual,
or possessory interest, ((the director of financial management and)) the
chief administrative officer of the agency having jurisdiction over the lands
shall be notified by registered or certified mail of such action and furnished
a statement of all assessments against such leasehold, contractual, or
possessory interest, and the chief administrative officer ((or director of
financial management)) shall cause the amount of such assessments to be
paid as provided in RCW 79.44.060, and upon the receipt of an assignment from
such assessing district, the chief administrative officer shall cancel such
lease or contract: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That unless the assessing district
making ((said)) the local improvement and levying ((said))
the special assessment shall have used due diligence in the foreclosure
thereof, the chief administrative officer ((and the director of financial
management)) shall not be required to pay any sum in excess of what they
deem to be the special benefits accruing to the state's reversionary interest
in ((said)) the property: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if such
delinquent assessment or installment shall be against a leasehold interest in
fresh water harbor areas within a port district, the chief administrative
officer shall notify the commissioners of ((said)) that port
district of the receipt of such assignment, and ((said)) the
commissioners shall forthwith cancel such lease.

Sec. 6. RCW 79.44.140 and 1979 c
151 s 182 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall apply to all local improvements initiated after June 11, 1919,
including assessments to pay the cost and expense of taking and damaging
property by the power of eminent domain, as provided by law: PROVIDED, That in
case of eminent domain assessments, it shall not be necessary to forward notice
of the intention to make such improvement, but the eminent domain
commissioners, authorized to make such assessment, shall, at the time of filing
the assessment roll with the court in the manner provided by law, forward by
registered or certified mail ((to the director of financial management and))
to the chief administrative officer of the agency using, occupying or having
jurisdiction over the lands a notice of such assessment, and of the day fixed
by the court for the hearing thereof: PROVIDED, That no assessment against the
state's interest in tidelands or harbor areas shall be binding against the
state if the commissioner of public lands shall file a disapproval of the same
in court before judgment confirming the roll.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. RCW 79.44.180 (Director of financial
management to adopt rules and regulations) and 1979 c 151 s 183 & 1963 c 20
s 14 are each repealed.

---
END ---