BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who
solicits or procures signatures on an initiative or referendum petition must be
a resident of the state as defined by RCW 29.01.140 and at least eighteen years
of age.

(2) When a person who
receives compensation for soliciting or procuring signatures on an initiative
or referendum petition is soliciting or procuring signatures for which he or
she has been or will be compensated, the person shall wear a badge on the front
of his or her outermost clothing above the waist that clearly and conspicuously
identifies the person as a paid signature solicitor.

(3) A person who is
soliciting or procuring signatures on an initiative or referendum for which he
or she will not be compensated shall wear a badge on the front of his or her
outermost clothing above the waist that clearly and conspicuously identifies
the person as an unpaid volunteer signature solicitor.

(4) A person who
solicits or procures signatures on an initiative or referendum petition must
execute an affidavit that includes his or her printed name, the permanent
address where he or she physically resides, the county, and the date he or she
signed the affidavit; that he or she has read and understands the laws
governing the circulation of petitions; that he or she will permit signatures
to be affixed only in the solicitor's presence; that to the best of the
solicitor's ability each of the persons signing the petition section is, at the
time of signing, registered to vote in this state; a statement of the
solicitor's paid or unpaid status at the time this petition will be circulated;
and that he or she has not paid or will not in the future pay and that he or
she believes that no other person has paid or will pay, directly or indirectly,
any money or other thing of value to any signer for the purpose of inducing or
causing the signer to affix his or her signature to the petition. Each
petition circulated for signatures must have a properly executed affidavit
attached while it is being circulated.

(5) The affidavit
required by subsection (4) of this section must be attached to each individual
petition submitted to the secretary of state for validation. The secretary of
state may not accept for filing a petition that does not have a properly
executed affidavit attached.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.79.490 and 1993 c
256 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person ((shall
be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who:

(1) For any
consideration or gratuity or promise thereof, signs or declines to sign any
initiative or referendum petition; or

(2) Provides or
receives consideration for soliciting or procuring signatures on an initiative
or referendum petition if any part of the consideration is based upon the
number of signatures solicited or procured, or offers to provide or agrees to
receive such consideration any of which is based on the number of signatures
solicited or procured; or

(3) Gives or offers any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce him or her to sign or not to
sign or to vote for or against any initiative or referendum measure; or

(4) Interferes with or
attempts to interfere with the right of any voter to sign or not to sign an
initiative or referendum petition or with the right to vote for or against an
initiative or referendum measure by threats, intimidation, or any other corrupt
means or practice; or

(5) Receives, handles,
distributes, pays out, or gives away, directly or indirectly, money or any
other thing of value contributed by or received from any person, firm,
association, or corporation whose residence or principal office is, or the
majority of whose members or stockholders have their residence outside, the
state of Washington, for any service rendered for the purpose of aiding in
procuring signatures upon any initiative or referendum petition or for the
purpose of aiding in the adoption or rejection of any initiative or referendum
measure: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to or prohibit any
activity which is properly reported in accordance with the applicable
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(6) Solicits or
procures signatures for an initiative or referendum petition if he or she is
not a resident of the state as defined in RCW 29.01.140 and at least eighteen
years of age; or

(7) Fails to wear a
badge identifying him or her as a paid signature solicitor when required by
section 1(2) of this act; or

(8) Wears a badge
identifying him or her as an unpaid volunteer signature solicitor under section
1(3) of this act when he or she is compensated for soliciting or procuring
signatures under section 1(2) of this act; or

(9) Solicits or
procures signatures for an initiative or referendum petition without having
attached to it a properly executed affidavit as required by section 1(4) of
this act.

A gross
misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same extent as a gross
misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

---
END ---