BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.42.020 and 1987 c
295 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The state committee of
each major political party shall consist of one committeeman ((and)),
one committeewoman, and the chairman from each county elected by the
county committee at its organization meeting. It shall have a chair and
vice-chair who must be of opposite sexes. This committee shall meet during
January of each odd-numbered year for the purpose of organization at a time and
place designated by a sufficient notice to all the newly elected state
committeemen ((and)), committeewomen, and chairmen by the
authorized officers of the retiring committee. For the purpose of this section
a notice mailed at least one week prior to the date of the meeting shall
constitute sufficient notice. At its organizational meeting it shall elect its
chair and vice-chair, and such officers as its bylaws may provide, and adopt
bylaws, rules and regulations. It shall have power to:

(1) Call conventions at
such time and place and under such circumstances and for such purposes as the
call to convention shall designate. The manner, number and procedure for
selection of state convention delegates shall be subject to the committee's
rules and regulations duly adopted;

(2) Provide for the
election of delegates to national conventions;

(3) Fill vacancies on
the ticket for any federal or state office to be voted on by the electors of
more than one county;

(4) Provide for the
nomination of presidential electors; and

(5) Perform all
functions inherent in such an organization.

Notwithstanding
any provision of this chapter, the committee shall not set rules which shall
govern the conduct of the actual proceedings at a party state convention.

--- END ---