BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that:

_9 It is in the best interest of the state of
Washington to

10 promote private investment in many areas for the purpose
of

11 stimulating economic vitality and promoting economic
stability. In

12 many urban areas, urban decay, abandoned buildings, and

13 environmental contamination pose a barrier to
redevelopment.

14 Public investment is needed to reclaim brownfields,
update

15 infrastructure, and improve the condition of public
areas. In the

16 absence of public investment, urban redevelopment
projects often

17 cannot pay a return sufficient to attract private
investment. These

p. 1 SSB
5636

_1 urban areas need private investment to create employment

_2 opportunities and to generally improve the economic
stability of

_3 many neighborhoods.

_4 In other areas, the public infrastructure necessary
to attract

_5 new business or to facilitate the growth and expansion
of existing

_6 industry is inadequate. Industry expects that basic
infrastructure

_7 such as sewer, roads, power, natural gas, and
telecommunications

_8 services will be available at potential industrial and
commercial

_9 sites. Private investment is necessary to diversify and
strengthen

10 many economies throughout the state; however the private
sector is

11 unlikely to invest in areas in which public
infrastructure is

12 lacking.

13 In 1999, the state of Washington local government

14 infrastructure study identified a gap in infrastructure
financing

15 well over three billion dollars. The legislature finds
that with

16 existing local resources, counties, cities, or Indian
tribes

17 cannot finance needed public infrastructure projects.
The

18 legislature further finds that a partnership between the
state,

19 and counties, cities, or Indian tribes, and private
industry can

20 make strategic investments in public infrastructure that
will

21 stimulate the private investment needed to spur economic

22 development and create jobs.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 82.14

24 RCW to read as follows:

25 (1) A county, city, or Indian tribe that obtains
approval under

26 section 3 of this act shall receive a monthly
distribution from

27 the infrastructure improvement account, hereby created
in the

28 state treasury, subject to the limitations in this
section and

29 section 3 of this act. The distribution shall be equal
to the

30 proceeds from the state share of the sales tax and use
tax upon

31 taxable events under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW,
within the

32 boundaries of the county or city, or within Indian
country of the

33 tribe, subject to the funding limitations in this
section. The

34 proceeds shall be from a portion of the state share of
the sales

35 and use tax from within the specific county, city, or
Indian

36 country of the tribe, and shall be deposited as directed
in

37 section 5 of this act. For the purposes of the
distribution under

SSB 5636 p. 2

_1 this section, proceeds distributed to a tribe shall be
based on

_2 estimates of taxable events taking place in the tribal

_3 jurisdiction. The department shall, in consultation
with the tribe,

_4 calculate the estimate and provide the information to
the state

_5 treasurer. No more than five hundred thousand dollars
are available

_6 for any one project in any fiscal year, and no one city,
county,

_7 or tribe may receive more than one million dollars in
any fiscal

_8 year.

_9 (2) The funding provided in this section shall
expire when the

10 debt obligation for the infrastructure improvement
project, as

11 approved under section 3 of this act, is repaid, but in
no event

12 may the funding be received for more than twenty years
after the

13 first distribution under this section.

14 (3) The proceeds received under this section shall
be used for

15 the purpose of payments on the infrastructure
improvement project

16 debt obligations to cover infrastructure improvements and
related

17 infrastructure expenses. This revenue is the state's
share of the

18 debt obligation repayment, and it may not exceed thirty
percent of

19 the total public sector project budget. At least
seventy percent of

20 the funding must come from other public or private
sources.

21 (4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this
section

22 and sections 3 and 5 of this act.

23 (a) "Indian country" has the meaning given
in RCW 82.24.010.

24 (b) "Indian tribe" means an Indian nation,
tribe, band,

25 community, or other entity recognized as a federally
recognized

26 Indian tribe by the United States department of the
interior.

27 (c) "Infrastructure improvements" means
the construction,

28 renovation, or expansion of publicly owned
infrastructure

29 improvements such as dock facilities, park and
recreation

30 facilities and areas, parking facilities, public transit

31 facilities, sewer systems, sidewalks, lighting, and
pedestrian

32 improvements and amenities, telecommunications systems,
water

33 systems, and wastewater systems, including demolition
and clean-up

34 activities related to the improvements.

35 (d) "Private partner" does not include any
government or any

36 government enterprise, corporation, or other similar
entity.

37 (e) "Related infrastructure expenses"
includes expenditures for

38 activities such as design, planning, environmental
analysis, land

p. 3 SSB
5636

_1 and materials acquisition, and site preparation, as well
as

_2 expenditures for the financing of the infrastructure
improvement,

_3 such as legal fees, insurance fees, financing fees,
principal and

_4 interest costs on general indebtedness including
reserves, and

_5 administrative costs.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is
added to chapter 82.14

_7 RCW to read as follows:

_8 (1) The department of community, trade, and economic

_9 development shall review and approve or deny
applications from

10 counties, cities, or Indian tribes for infrastructure
improvement

11 projects, consistent with the criteria in this section.
Counties,

12 cities, and tribes may develop proposals with other
government

13 entities such as port districts, special purpose
districts,

14 municipal corporations, and public development
authorities, but

15 the county, city, or tribe remains the only entity
eligible under

16 this section and section 2 of this act. Applications
shall be in a

17 form and manner as required by the department of
community, trade,

18 and economic development. Funding is available on a
first-come

19 basis, with priority based on the date and time an
application is

20 received. In the event that a subsequent application is
received

21 from a taxing jurisdiction that has overlapping jurisdiction
with

22 a jurisdiction with a priority application, the
subsequent

23 application shall be approved only if there are
sufficient

24 revenues expected to be generated to cover the state's
share of

25 the project. All qualifying projects shall be funded
until the

26 fiscal funding cap is met. At the point the fiscal
funding cap is

27 reached, no proposals may be evaluated until the
following fiscal

28 year. Applications denied due to the program funding
cap being met

29 must be resubmitted the following fiscal year in order
to be

30 reconsidered. The department of community, trade, and
economic

31 development shall provide a response to a proposal
within sixty

32 days of receipt.

33 (a) During each fiscal year, the department of
community,

34 trade, and economic development may approve no more than
one

35 million dollars in new projects for each fiscal year.

36 (b) A county, city, or Indian tribe may have no more
than two

SSB 5636 p. 4

_1 ongoing infrastructure improvement projects at any one
time and

_2 may not be approved for more than one project in any one
year.

_3 (c) The funds received under section 3 of this act
may not

_4 exceed five hundred thousand dollars for any one project
per year.

_5 (2) A county, city, or Indian tribe may finance
infrastructure

_6 improvements and related infrastructure expenses in part
by using

_7 tax revenue dedicated under section 5 of this act,
subject to

_8 providing the department of community, trade, and
economic

_9 development with documentation regarding the following
conditions

10 and requirements:

11 (a) The county, city, or Indian tribe must certify
to the

12 department that an analysis has been made of the value
to the

13 state of the private portion of the project, and that
over a

14 thirty-year term the projected state revenue, such as
sales and

15 use tax and business and occupation tax, from all state
taxes

16 directly associated with the private portion of the
project will

17 at least equal the dollar value of the state's funding
of the

18 project;

19 (b) The county, city, or Indian tribe must identify
the source

20 of funds through which it will fund its share of the

21 infrastructure improvement project;

22 (c) The county, city, or Indian tribe must have
received an

23 agreement in writing from a private entity committing to
a

24 privately funded private project that will directly
benefit from

25 the infrastructure improvements and must provide a copy
of such

26 agreement to the department; and

27 (d) A project proposed by a county or city must be
consistent

28 with the comprehensive plan and development regulations
it has

29 adopted in conformance with chapter 36.70A RCW.

30 (3) The department of community, trade, and economic

31 development may give an approval conditioned on the
county, city,

32 or Indian tribe satisfying the conditions and
requirements in this

33 section, but in no circumstances may funds be received
under

34 section 2 of this act before the conditions in
subsection (2) of

35 this section are satisfied, at which point final
approval may be

36 given. Upon final approval under this section, the
department of

37 community, trade, and economic development shall notify
the

38 applicant and the department of revenue.

p. 5 SSB
5636

_1 (4) No projects may be approved under this section
after June

_2 30, 2006.

_3 Sec. 4. RCW
43.135.080 and 1998 c 321 s 14 are each amended to

_4 read as follows:

_5 (1) Initiative Measure No. 601 (chapter 43.135 RCW,
as amended

_6 by chapter 321, Laws of 1998 and the amendatory changes
enacted by

_7 section 6, chapter 2, Laws of 1994) is hereby reenacted
and

_8 reaffirmed. The legislature also adopts chapter 321,
Laws of 1998

_9 to continue the general fund revenue and expenditure
limitations

10 contained in this chapter 43.135 RCW after this one-time
transfer

11 of funds.

12 (2) RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to sections 5
through 13,

13 chapter 321, Laws of 1998.

14 (3) RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to sections
2 and 3 of

15 this act.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is
added to chapter 82.32

17 RCW to read as follows:

18 The department shall deposit into the infrastructure

19 improvement account, created in section 2 of this act,
proceeds

20 from the state share of the sales tax and use tax upon
taxable

21 events, for those counties, cities, or Indian tribes
that have

22 been approved under section 3 of this act. The proceeds
shall be

23 from the state share of the sales and use tax from
within the

24 specific county, city, or Indian country of the tribe
and shall be

25 limited to that portion of the proceeds necessary to
finance the

26 projects approved under the terms of sections 2 and 3 of
this

27 act. Pursuant to section 2 of this act, no more than
five hundred

28 thousand dollars shall be for any one project in any
fiscal year,

29 and any one jurisdiction may receive not more than one
million

30 dollars in any fiscal year. If the department has received
notice

31 of final approval from the department of community,
trade, and

32 economic development under section 3(3) of this act and
the sale

33 of bonds or other debt instruments is complete, the
department

34 shall notify the state treasurer regarding the monthly

35 distributions under section 2(1) of this act.

SSB 5636 p. 6

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The state incurs no
obligation or

_2 liability regarding an infrastructure improvement
project under

_3 section 3 of this act, other than the funding provided
through the

_4 sales and use tax under section 2 of this act.

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If any provision of
this act or its

_6 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

_7 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

_8 persons or circumstances is not affected.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 7 SSB
5636