BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that a comprehensive program of monitoring and assessments is fundamental to
making sound public policy and programmatic decisions regarding salmon recovery
and watershed health. Monitoring provides accountability for results of
management actions and provides the data upon which an adaptive management
framework can lead to improvement of strategies and programs. While numerous
agencies and citizen organizations are engaged in monitoring a wide range of
watershed parameters, there is a greater need for coordination of monitoring
efforts, for using limited monitoring resources to obtain information most
useful for achieving relevant local, state, and federal requirements regarding
watershed health, and for making the information more accessible to those
agencies and organizations implementing watershed health programs and
projects. Regarding salmon recovery monitoring, the state independent science
panel has concluded that many programs already monitor indicators relevant to
salmonids, but the efforts are largely uncoordinated or unlinked among
programs, have different objectives, use different indicators, lack support for
sharing data, and lack shared statistical designs to address specific issues
raised by listing of salmonid species under the federal endangered species act.

Therefore it is the
purpose of this act to establish a framework for greater coordination of
existing monitoring activities, to encourage monitoring and assessment
activities most relevant to adopted local, state, and federal watershed health
objectives, and to facilitate availability of monitoring and assessment
information to agencies and organizations carrying out watershed health, salmon
recovery, and water resources management planning and programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.82 RCW to read as follows:

State and local
agencies responsible for implementing, funding, or directing watershed-related
monitoring activities shall give full consideration to furthering the following
objectives in designing and implementing monitoring activities:

(1) The goals, objectives,
and questions that need to be addressed must be clearly articulated.

(2) Statistical designs
need to be appropriate to the objectives.

(3) Meaningful
performance measures need to be defined by objectives and address the
appropriate geographical, temporal, and biological scales.

(4) Monitoring
protocols need to be standardized to allow comparison among locations, times,
entities, or programs.

(5) Procedures need to
be developed to ensure quality assurance and quality control of all data.

(6) Data management
systems need to allow easy access, sharing, and coordination among different
collectors and users.

(7) Funding should be
stable and adequate.

(8) Decision support
systems need to help integrate monitoring information into decision making.

For the purposes of
this section, "watershed-related monitoring activities" means
monitoring and data analysis relating to the management, protection, and
restoration of the state's water resources, water quality, riparian habitat,
and fish and wildlife species with life cycles principally located in state
waters and adjacent riparian areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 77.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The monitoring
oversight committee is hereby established. The committee shall be comprised of
the directors or their designated representatives of:

(a) The salmon recovery
office;

(b) The department of
ecology;

(c) The department of
fish and wildlife;

(d) The conservation
commission;

(e) The Puget Sound
action team;

(f) The department of
natural resources;

(g) The independent
science panel;

(h) The salmon recovery
funding board; and

(i) Treaty Indian
tribes.

The director of the
salmon recovery office shall chair the committee.

(2) The chair shall
convene the committee from time to time to review the progress of state and
local agencies with watershed-related monitoring responsibilities in achieving
a comprehensive and coordinated monitoring program and in furthering the
characteristics of monitoring activities under section 2 of this act. The
committee shall invite participation by other state and local agencies and
other entities when the committee reviews monitoring activities and
responsibilities of those agencies and entities. The committee shall consider
the recommendations of the state independent science panel and other technical
or policy committees that have responsibility for reviewing or implementing
monitoring programs related to watershed health.

(3) The committee may
make recommendations to individual agencies to improve coordination among
monitoring activities and to further the characteristics of monitoring
described in section 2 of this act. At the request of the office of financial
management, the committee may evaluate and make recommendations upon budget
proposals for monitoring.

(4) By June 30, 2002,
the committee shall provide an action plan to the governor, the senate, and the
house of representatives for achieving a comprehensive watershed-related
monitoring program. The plan shall identify key existing monitoring activities
that support all levels of monitoring, including confirming that management
decisions were implemented, making accurate status assessments of the resource
to determine whether management objectives are being achieved, and confirming
that management actions have the desired result through improved understanding
of the functioning of hydrological, biological, and ecosystem functions. The
plan shall describe measures needed for individual monitoring activities to
further the objectives described in section 2 of this act. The plan shall make
recommendations for increasing public access to relevant monitoring information
and analysis to support the many watershed-related programs and activities that
are ongoing. The plan shall make recommendations based upon a goal of
completing enhanced coordination and modification of existing programs by June 30,
2007.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.85.050 and 1999
sp.s. c 13 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Counties,
cities, and tribal governments must jointly designate, by resolution or by
letters of support, the area for which a habitat project list is to be
developed and the lead entity that is to be responsible for submitting the
habitat project list. No project included on a habitat project list shall be
considered mandatory in nature and no private landowner may be forced or
coerced into participation in any respect. The lead entity may be a county,
city, conservation district, special district, tribal government, or other
entity.

(b) The lead entity
shall establish a committee that consists of representative interests of counties,
cities, conservation districts, tribes, environmental groups, business
interests, landowners, citizens, volunteer groups, regional fish enhancement
groups, and other habitat interests. The purpose of the committee is to
provide a citizen-based evaluation of the projects proposed to promote salmon
habitat. The technical review team may provide the lead entity with
organizational models that may be used in establishing the committees.

(c) The committee shall
compile a list of habitat projects, establish priorities for individual
projects, define the sequence for project implementation, and submit these
activities as the habitat project list. The committee shall also identify
potential federal, state, local, and private funding sources.

(2) The area covered by
the habitat project list must be based, at a minimum, on a WRIA, combination of
WRIAs, or any other area as agreed to by the counties, cities, and tribes in
resolutions or in letters of support meeting the requirements of this
subsection. Preference will be given to projects in an area that contain a
salmon species that is listed or proposed for listing under the federal
endangered species act.

(3) The lead entity
shall submit the habitat project list to the technical review team in accordance
with procedures adopted by the board.

(4) In reviewing and
developing the monitoring elements of projects to be included on the habitat
project list, the committee shall consider the objectives in section 2 of this
act.

(5) Where watershed
planning under chapter 90.82 RCW has been initiated within the area covered by
the habitat project list, and the watershed planning unit is addressing a
habitat component under RCW 90.82.100, the committee shall share technical
support and assessment information with the planning unit.

Sec. 5. RCW 77.85.060 and 2000 c
107 s 95 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Critical pathways
methodology shall be used to develop a habitat project list and a habitat work
schedule that ensures salmon habitat projects will be prioritized and
implemented in a logical sequential manner that produces habitat capable of
sustaining healthy populations of salmon.

(2) The critical
pathways methodology shall:

(a) Include a limiting
factors analysis for salmon in streams, rivers, tributaries, estuaries, and
subbasins in the region. The technical advisory group shall have
responsibility for the limiting factors analysis;

(b) Identify local
habitat projects that sponsors are willing to undertake. The projects
identified must have a written agreement from the landowner on which the
project is to be implemented. Project sponsors shall have the lead
responsibility for this task;

(c) Identify how
projects will be monitored and evaluated. The project sponsor, in consultation
with the technical advisory group and the appropriate landowner, shall have
responsibility for this task;

(d) Include a review of
monitoring data, evaluate project performance, and make recommendations to the
committee established under RCW 77.85.050 and to the technical review team.
The technical advisory group has responsibility for this task; and

(e) Describe the
adaptive management strategy that will be used. The committee established
under RCW 77.85.050 shall have responsibility for this task. If a committee
has not been formed, the technical advisory group shall have the responsibility
for this task.

(3) The habitat work
schedule shall include all projects developed pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, and shall identify and coordinate with any other salmon habitat
project implemented in the region, including habitat preservation projects
funded through the Washington wildlife and recreation program, the conservation
reserve enhancement program, and other conservancy programs. The habitat work
schedule shall also include the start date, duration, estimated date of
completion, estimated cost, and, if appropriate, the affected salmonid species
of each project. Each schedule shall be updated on an annual basis to depict
new activities.

(4) In developing
the monitoring components of limiting factors analysis and habitat work
schedules, the committee established under RCW 77.85.050 and the technical
advisory group shall consider the objectives in section 2 of this act.

(5) Where watershed
planning under chapter 90.82 RCW has been initiated within the area covered by
the habitat work schedule, and the watershed planning unit is addressing a
habitat component under RCW 90.82.100, the committee shall share the habitat
work schedule and limiting factors analysis information with the planning unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 90.82 RCW to read as follows:

In conducting
assessments and other studies that include monitoring components or
recommendations, the department and planning units shall consider the
monitoring objectives in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 77.85.160 and 1999
sp.s. c 13 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) State salmon
monitoring data provided by lead entities, regional fisheries enhancement
groups, and others shall be included in the data base of ((SASSI [salmon and
steelhead stock inventory] and SSHIAP [salmon and steelhead habitat inventory
assessment project])) the salmon and steelhead stock inventory and the
salmon and steelhead habitat inventory assessment project. Information
pertaining to habitat preservation projects funded through the Washington
wildlife and recreation program, the conservation reserve enhancement program,
and other conservancy programs related to salmon habitat shall be included in
the SSHIAP data base.

(2) In designing,
funding, and implementing monitoring activities, lead entities, regional
fisheries enhancement groups, the department of fish and wildlife, the salmon
recovery funding board, and others shall give consideration to the objectives
in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 76.09 RCW to read as follows:

In developing and
implementing monitoring activities regarding practices regulated under this
chapter as well as those authorized under the forest and fish agreement, the
department, the forest practices board, and advisory groups shall consider the
monitoring objectives in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

In developing, funding,
and implementing water quality monitoring activities authorized under this
chapter, the department shall consider the monitoring objectives in section 2
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

In developing, funding,
and implementing water resources monitoring activities authorized under this
chapter, the department shall consider the monitoring objectives in section 2
of this act.

Sec. 11. RCW 90.71.060 and 1996 c
138 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other
powers and duties specified in this chapter, the action team shall ensure
implementation and coordination of the Puget Sound ambient monitoring program
established in the Puget Sound management plan. The program shall include, at
a minimum:

(1) A research program,
including but not limited to methods to provide current research information to
managers and scientists, and to establish priorities based on the needs of the
action team;

(2) A monitoring
program, including baselines, protocols, guidelines, and quantifiable
performance measures. In consultation with state agencies, local and tribal
governments, and other public and private interests, the action team shall
develop and track quantifiable performance measures that can be used by the
governor and the legislature to assess the effectiveness over time of programs
and actions initiated under the plan to improve and protect Puget Sound water
quality and biological resources. The performance measures shall be developed
by June 30, 1997. The performance measures shall include, but not be limited
to a methodology to track the progress of: Fish and wildlife habitat; sites
with sediment contamination; wetlands; shellfish beds; and other key indicators
of Puget Sound health. State agencies shall assist the action team in the
development and tracking of these performance measures. The performance
measures may be limited to a selected geographic area. In developing and
implementing the monitoring program, state agencies shall consider the
monitoring objectives in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 89.08 RCW to read as follows:

In
developing, funding, and implementing monitoring activities related to
watershed health, the conservation commission and conservation districts shall
consider the monitoring objectives in section 2 of this act.

---
END ---