BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Personal
information about a permanent employee, temporary employee, official, or
volunteer of a school district that is maintained in the files of a school
district, educational service district, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, or the state board of education is exempt from public
inspection and copying to the extent that such disclosure would violate the
individual's right to privacy. The residential addresses and telephone numbers
of a permanent employee, temporary employee, official, or volunteer of a school
district that are held by a school district, educational service district, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, or the state board of
education in personnel records, employment or volunteer rosters, or mailing
lists of employees or volunteers is exempt from public inspection and copying.

(2) The
exemptions provided in subsection (1) of this section are in addition to any
other exemptions that may exist. Notwithstanding RCW 42.17.251, the exemptions
provided in subsection (1) of this section shall not be interpreted to
authorize the public inspection and copying of similar personal information
about another public employee, official, or volunteer.

--- END ---