BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
48.18.080 and 1947 c 79 s .18.08 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 (1) No application for the issuance of any insurance
policy or

_7 contract shall be admissible in evidence in any action
relative to

_8 such policy or contract, unless a true copy of the
application was

_9 attached to or otherwise made a part of the policy when
issued and

10 delivered. This provision shall not apply to policies
or contracts

11 of industrial life insurance or property and casualty
insurance.

12 (2) If any policy of life or disability insurance
delivered in

13 this state is reinstated or renewed, and the insured or
the

14 beneficiary or assignee of the policy makes written
request to the

15 insurer for a copy of the application, if any, for such

16 reinstatement or renewal, the insurer shall, within
fifteen days

17 after receipt of such request at its home office or at
any of its

18 branch offices, deliver or mail to the person making
such request,

p. 1 SB
5643

_1 a copy of such application. If such copy is not so
delivered or

_2 mailed, the insurer shall be precluded from introducing
the

_3 application as evidence in any action or proceeding
based upon or

_4 involving the policy or its reinstatement or renewal.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5643 p. 2