BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that the public's interest is well-served by a strong commitment to
public safety in our communities, on our streets, and in our neighborhoods.

The legislature further
recognizes that, given its commitment to strengthening laws against alcohol
abuse and drinking and driving, the importance of public safety within a
community must also be factored into the decision-making process regarding the
issuance and renewal of liquor licenses for eating and drinking establishments
in the state of Washington.

It is the intent of the
legislature to balance the legitimate rights of operators of eating and
drinking establishments to obtain lawful liquor licenses and license renewals
with the public's expectation of a significant commitment to public safety.

Therefore, the
legislature intends to add criteria to the laws on liquor license issuances and
renewals that adequately recognize the public safety role of cities and
counties and that will serve the public.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.010 and 1998 c
126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every license shall
be issued in the name of the applicant, and the holder thereof shall not allow
any other person to use the license.

(2) For the purpose of
considering any application for a license, the board may cause an inspection of
the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters in connection with
the construction and operation of the premises. For the purpose of reviewing
any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension or
revocation of any license, the liquor control board may consider any prior
criminal conduct of the applicant and the provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of
chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases. The board may, in its
discretion, grant or refuse the license applied for. Authority to approve an
uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any staff
member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting such authority
shall be adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind may be issued to:

(a) A person who has
not resided in the state for at least one month prior to making application,
except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on railroads, boats, or
aircraft;

(b) A copartnership,
unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a license, as
provided in this section;

(c) A person whose
place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless such manager or
agent possesses the same qualifications required of the licensee;

(d) A corporation or a
limited liability company, unless it was created under the laws of the state of
Washington or holds a certificate of authority to transact business in the
state of Washington.

(3)(a) The board may,
in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or
cancel any license; and all rights of the licensee to keep or sell liquor
thereunder shall be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b) The board shall
immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the
person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during
the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c) The board may
request the appointment of administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW
who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of
witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony,
examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation,
hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under such rules and
regulations as the board may adopt.

(d) Witnesses shall be
allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any such inquiry, investigation,
hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446, as now or
hereafter amended. Fees need not be paid in advance of appearance of witnesses
to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal evidence.

(e) In case of
disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or a subpoena
issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law judges, or on
the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may
be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in
which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or
administrative law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as in
the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said
court or a refusal to testify therein.

(4) Upon receipt of
notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the licensee shall
forthwith deliver up the license to the board. Where the license has been suspended
only, the board shall return the license to the licensee at the expiration or
termination of the period of suspension. The board shall notify all vendors in
the city or place where the licensee has its premises of the suspension or
cancellation of the license; and no employee may allow or cause any liquor to
be delivered to or for any person at the premises of that licensee.

(5)(a) At the time of
the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, the
board shall prorate the license fee charged to the new licensee according to
the number of calendar quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the first
renewal of that license is required.

(b) Unless sooner
canceled, every license issued by the board shall expire at midnight of the
thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for which it was issued. However, if
the board deems it feasible and desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates
for any and all licenses authorized by this chapter. If such a system of
staggered annual renewal dates is established by the board, the license fees
provided by this chapter shall be appropriately prorated during the first year
that the system is in effect.

(6) Every license
issued under this section shall be subject to all conditions and restrictions
imposed by this title or by the regulations in force from time to time. All
conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in the issuance of an
individual license shall be listed on the face of the individual license along
with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(7) Every licensee
shall post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on
the premises.

(8) Before the board
shall issue a license to an applicant, or renew an existing license, it
shall give notice of such application to the chief executive officer of the
incorporated city or town, if the application be for a license within an
incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if the
application be for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or
towns; and such incorporated city or town, through the official or employee
selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or employee
selected by it, shall have the right to file with the board within twenty days
after date of transmittal of such notice, written objections against the
applicant or against the premises for which the license is asked((, and
shall include with such objections a statement of all facts upon which such
objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, may request and
the liquor control board may in its discretion)). If a public hearing
is requested by a city or town, or by a county legislative authority if the
proposed establishment is outside the incorporated boundaries of a city or
town, the board shall hold a formal hearing subject to the applicable
provisions of Title 34 RCW. Upon the granting of a license under this title
the board shall send a duplicate of the license or written notification to the
chief executive officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license
is granted, or to the county legislative authority if the license is granted
outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(9) Before the board
issues any license to any applicant, or renews an existing license, it
shall ((give)) (a) give due consideration to the location of the
business to be conducted under such license with respect to the proximity of
churches, schools, and public institutions ((and)); (b) provide
written notice by certified mail of the application to churches, schools, and
public institutions within five hundred feet of the premises to be licensed;
(c) review the public safety record with respect to the establishment,
including numbers of service calls involving police departments; the nature of
the service calls involving police departments; charges and convictions of
patrons, employees, and licensees of conduct on the premises that is prohibited
by any portion of Title 9, 9A, or 69 RCW; the adverse impact caused by patrons
to the neighboring community; public safety problems involving patrons of the
establishment; driving while under the influence (DUI) arrests traceable to the
establishment; substantial evidence of a pattern of overserving of alcohol; and
other documentation of public safety-related matters brought forth by a city,
town, or county. The board shall take these criteria into account in
determining whether to grant a license. The board shall issue no beer
retailer license for either on-premises or off-premises consumption or wine
retailer license for either on-premises or off-premises consumption or spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license covering any premises not now licensed, if
such premises are within five hundred feet of the premises of any tax-supported
public elementary or secondary school measured along the most direct route over
or across established public walks, streets, or other public passageway from
the outer property line of the school grounds to the nearest public entrance of
the premises proposed for license, and if, after receipt by the school or
public institution of the notice as provided in this subsection, the board
receives written notice, within twenty days after posting such notice, from an
official representative or representatives of the school within five hundred
feet of said proposed licensed premises, indicating to the board that there is
an objection to the issuance of such license because of proximity to a school.
For the purpose of this section, church shall mean a building erected for and
used exclusively for religious worship and schooling or other activity in
connection therewith. No liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board
to any motor sports facility or licensee operating within the motor sports
facility unless the motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably
calculated to prevent alcohol or alcoholic beverages not purchased within the
facility from entering the facility and such program is approved by local law
enforcement agencies. It is the intent under this subsection that a retail
license shall not be issued by the board where doing so would, in the judgment
of the board, adversely affect a private school meeting the requirements for
private schools under Title 28A RCW, which school is within five hundred feet
of the proposed licensee. The board shall fully consider and give substantial
weight to objections filed by private schools. If a license is issued despite
the proximity of a private school, the board shall state in a letter addressed
to the private school the board's reasons for issuing the license.

(10) The restrictions
set forth in subsection (9) of this section shall not prohibit the board from
authorizing the assumption of existing licenses now located within the
restricted area by other persons or licenses or relocations of existing
licensed premises within the restricted area. In no case may the licensed
premises be moved closer to a church or school than it was before the
assumption or relocation.

(11) Nothing in this
section prohibits the board, in its discretion, from issuing a temporary retail
or distributor license to an applicant assuming an existing retail or
distributor license to continue the operation of the retail or distributor
premises during the period the application for the license is pending and when
the following conditions exist:

(a) The licensed
premises has been operated under a retail or distributor license within ninety
days of the date of filing the application for a temporary license;

(b) The retail or
distributor license for the premises has been surrendered pursuant to issuance
of a temporary operating license;

(c) The applicant for
the temporary license has filed with the board an application to assume the
retail or distributor license at such premises to himself or herself; and

(d) The application for
a temporary license is accompanied by a temporary license fee established by
the board by rule.

A temporary license
issued by the board under this section shall be for a period not to exceed
sixty days. A temporary license may be extended at the discretion of the board
for an additional sixty-day period upon payment of an additional fee and upon
compliance with all conditions required in this section.

Refusal by the board to
issue or extend a temporary license shall not entitle the applicant to request
a hearing. A temporary license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any
time if the board determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension
exists. RCW 66.08.130 and chapter 34.05 RCW shall apply to temporary licenses.

Application for a
temporary license shall be on such form as the board shall prescribe. If an
application for a temporary license is withdrawn before issuance or is refused
by the board, the fee which accompanied such application shall be refunded in
full.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 66.44 RCW to read as follows:

In any proceeding under
this title, substantial evidence of a pattern of overserving of alcohol is
sufficient as a violation with respect to this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
September 1, 2001.

---
END ---