BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.16.055 and 1980 c
149 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax
under this chapter there shall be deducted from the gross income:

(a) An amount equal to
the cost of production at the plant for consumption within the state of Washington
of:

(i) Electrical energy
produced or generated from cogeneration as defined in RCW 82.35.020; and

(ii) Electrical energy
or gas produced or generated from renewable energy resources such as solar
energy, wind energy, hydroelectric energy, geothermal energy, wood, wood
wastes, municipal wastes, agricultural products and wastes, and end-use waste
heat; and

(b) Those amounts
expended to improve consumers' efficiency of energy end use or to otherwise
reduce the use of electrical energy or gas by the consumer.

(2)(a) This
section applies only to new facilities for the production or generation of
energy from cogeneration or renewable energy resources or measures to improve
the efficiency of energy end use on which construction or installation is begun
after June 12, 1980, and before January 1, 1990.

(b) In addition,
this section applies to new or expanded facilities for the production or
generation of energy from cogeneration on which construction or installation is
begun after July 1, 2001, and before January 1, 2011.

(3) Deductions under
subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be allowed for a period not to exceed
thirty years after the project is placed in operation.

(4) Measures or
projects encouraged under this section shall at the time they are placed in
service be reasonably expected to save, produce, or generate energy at a total
incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end use which is less
than or equal to the incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to
end use from similarly available conventional energy resources which utilize
nuclear energy or fossil fuels and which the gas or electric utility could
acquire to meet energy demand in the same time period.

(5) The
department of revenue, after consultation with the utilities and transportation
commission in the case of investor-owned utilities and the governing bodies of
locally regulated utilities, shall determine the eligibility of individual
projects and measures for deductions under this section.

--- END ---