BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 shall not apply to lighting, clothes washers, dishwashers, central
air conditioners, room air conditioners, furnaces, boilers, and programmable
thermostats that meet or exceed the applicable energy saving efficiency
requirements developed by the United States department of energy and the United
States environmental protection agency under Presidential Executive Order
13123, as it exists on the effective date of this act, and that have received
their energy star rating. This section applies to lighting, clothes washers,
dishwashers, central air conditioners, room air conditioners, furnaces,
boilers, and programmable thermostats purchased after the effective date of
this act and before July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of lighting, clothes washers,
dishwashers, central air conditioners, room air conditioners, furnaces,
boilers, and programmable thermostats that meet or exceed the applicable energy
saving efficiency requirements developed by the United States department of
energy and the United States environmental protection agency under Presidential
Executive Order 13123, as it exists on the effective date of this act, and that
have received their energy star rating. This section applies to lighting,
clothes washers, dishwashers, central air conditioners, room air conditioners,
furnaces, boilers, and programmable thermostats that were acquired after the
effective date of this act and before July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---