BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

At any
time prior to a general rate proceeding, an electrical company may file with
the commission information concerning any decision made by the company to
acquire electricity generation resources. The commission shall by rule adopt
standards governing the filing of such information by electrical companies
under this section. The commission shall consider the information in
subsequent rate-making proceedings, as well as any other information deemed
relevant to the proceedings. Nothing in this section relieves the company of
its burden to prove, based on this or other information, that its acquisitions
of electricity generation resources are reasonable and prudent for rate-making
purposes. For the purposes of this section, "electricity generation
resources" includes resources acquired by the company either by contract
or ownership.

--- END ---