BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 18.73 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall annually, by rule, establish the maximum rates that may be
charged by an ambulance or aid service operating in the state of Washington.
The rates may vary by county or other appropriate geographic region, and within
each region may not exceed the amounts reasonable and necessary to ensure
quality services.

--- END ---