BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The passage of
Initiative Measure No. 695 in 1999 is a social indicator that governments,
business, media, and community organizations need improved listening skills
which can involve citizens responsibly in the political process.

(2) The governor has a
constitutional responsibility to administer state affairs, the legislature has
a constitutional responsibility to enact legislation in the state, and citizens
have a political right to be enabled to participate viably in their
organizations, institutions, and governments in the state in a process of
building "social capital" and improving community mental health.

(3) The Washington
state auditor has a constitutional responsibility and independently serves the
citizens of Washington by promoting accountability, fiscal integrity, and
openness in state and local government, and the approach of an auditor's work
is constantly professionally evolving through new administrative theories
involving the use of "symbolic dialogues" and "social
audits" of intangible assets along with regular financial, compliance, and
performance audits in Washington and other states. Furthermore, in working
with these governments in partnerships, the auditor strives to ensure the
proper use of public resources to enable its citizens to more clearly envision
their future in the theme, "Washington, an inspirational state in pursuit
of happiness!"

(4) More than two
thousand four hundred local governments of thirty-three different types and one
hundred sixty-eight state agencies, colleges, universities, boards, and
commissions are administered and audited for fiscal accountability of roughly
forty billion dollars annually. Furthermore, as relationships are in
partnerships with governments, and state auditor reports are constructive
management tools for them to use.

(5) Accountability is a
goal both of administration and auditing, but accountability is fundamental to
the work of the state auditor as audits touch heavily on legal compliance with
state laws and regulations and governmental entities' own policies and
ordinances.

(6) Similar experiences
in other states including Texas, Colorado, Oregon, and Utah have been positive
to create a public forum to restore citizens' trust in their governments, expand
social capital, and improve community mental health.

(7) Washington has long
been recognized as a precursor state in social and economic innovation. It was
the only state that emerged from the national bicentennial celebration in 1976
utilizing the last of its resources from royalties to fund ongoing programs in
"citizen participation." Washington was able to discern that it was
not quite "volunteerism" they were after: "Give me your body,
your hands, your time." Rather Washington was more interested in
"give me your mind," which was significantly different. Furthermore,
our nation is now on the verge of major discoveries in social science and some
of the major discoveries have been occurring here in Washington state and the
greater Seattle area by the Forum Foundation and was recognized as such in
Washington State Senate Resolution No. 1993-8636.

(8) It is natural in
our democratic republic that the citizens of Washington state be invited to
participate in its governing processes in the exercise of their political
rights whenever possible and within their time and energy levels and help the
governor, legislature, and the state auditor in their constitutional
responsibilities to administer, legislate, and monitor all governments and
public entities and public funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature
recognizes that some citizens have difficulty accessing political processes
that rely on public hearings held at locations that are often distant or held
at inappropriate times from their residence or workplace. To increase public
participation in the political process, the legislature intends to establish
and support a self-funding pilot process in cooperation with the state auditor
by which citizens can receive information about public issues and provide
feedback to elected officials in a convenient, timely manner and local setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The office of citizen
councilor is created in accordance with section 11 of this act. According to
Webster's Dictionary, "councilor" means an official advisor to a
sovereign or chief magistrate. Any citizen registered to vote, or who lives or
works in Washington but is not a registered voter, who volunteers to act as an
official government advisor may become a citizen councilor on request by
sending a letter to the state auditor or by calling a special toll-free number
and subscribing to a nominal fee as set by the state auditor to recover
substantially the direct costs from citizen participation in the program. The
indirect costs of public officials and government employee participation to
provide information to citizen councilors in their discussions shall be borne
by the government entity participating. Citizen councilors shall act collectively
as official advisors or a sounding board for the governor, the legislature, the
state auditor, or other public officials and agencies such as the department of
community, trade, and economic development on issues of public interest or
concern. Conveners of citizen councilor groups shall be those designated by
the citizen councilor coordinator or deputy citizen councilor coordinator under
section 5 of this act from among citizen councilors who volunteer to host a
group. Every effort shall be made to assign citizen councilors to a group that
meets at a convenient time and place for those participating. Meetings will
usually be in small groups meeting in similar resident or work area zip codes.

(2) Citizen councilors
may participate:

(a) In a citizen
councilor group of approximately eight to twelve persons organized by residence
or work area zip code with the assistance of the citizen councilor coordinator;

(b) In a citizen
councilor organizational group under section 8 of this act; or

(c) As an individual if
the individual is unable to attend meetings in groups due to age, disability,
remote location, or personality conflict.

(3) Citizen councilors
will be reassigned a group on request to assure that their group meeting place,
time, and makeup is convenient and compatible, or the citizen councilor
coordinator may make individual assignments of a councilor when deemed
necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The state auditor
shall determine suggested issues for public discussion approximately quarterly
but not more than monthly from suggestions received from the governor, the
legislature, public officials, agencies, and individual citizen councilors and
recommend an appropriate issue or issues for consideration by citizen
councilors to a steering committee in rotation and in accord with subsection
(2) of this section. An advisory steering committee shall be composed of the
following nonvoting members: (a) A representative from the governor's office,
(b) legislative members: One member of the minority and one member of the
majority party from each house of the legislature, (c) a representative from
the superintendent of public instruction, (d) a representative from each
county, (e) a representative from each regional government, (f) a
representative of higher education, (g) a representative from the association
of Washington cities, (h) a representative from any organization participating
with over fifty groups of eight to twelve persons under section 6(7) of this
act, (i) the citizen councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor
coordinator selected as provided in section 5 of this act, and (j) others
invited by the state auditor.

(2) After consideration
by the members of the steering committee, the state auditor shall determine and
assign the issue or issues approved for discussion to the volunteer citizen
councilor coordinator for preparation and implementation by value reporters and
others, except that the first meeting of a group will be an orientation meeting
prepared by the state auditor. Thereafter issues will be determined in
rotation first by the governor, second by the legislature, and then by the
state auditor. If the governor or legislature at its turn fails to determine
an issue for discussion within ten days of its consideration and adjournment by
the steering committee, the determination will be made by the state auditor.
Value reporters assigned to gather information on issues shall be careful to
present all issues as evenhandedly as possible, taking care to present the
generally prevailing viewpoints surrounding an issue or issues from experts,
officials, scholars, and others in an effort to provide the public with
information needed for discussion. Value reporters shall represent the
"people's right to know" and conduct interviews of experts,
officials, scholars, and others to solicit their various viewpoints and record
such interviews on audio or video tape for later reproduction and distribution
to citizen councilor groups. Before any materials are released to citizen
councilor groups, however, persons interviewed and taped shall approve their
taped interview for release or complete another interview to their
satisfaction, otherwise their statement shall not be included in materials sent
to citizens.

(3) The state auditor
shall refer the public information material prepared by the citizen councilor
coordinator, deputy citizen councilor coordinator, and staffs to the steering
committee for its review and recommendations. The governor, legislative committee
assigned, or the state auditor, whichever determined the issue, shall then make
the final determination of any materials distributed to citizen councilors,
except if the governor or legislative committee assigned fails to make a final
determination within ten days of adjournment of the steering committee giving
its recommendations, then the state auditor shall make the final determination
and distribute the materials to the citizen councilor network.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The offices of citizen
councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator are created
within the office of state auditor. The state auditor shall appoint the
citizen councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator with the
advice of the steering committee. The citizen councilor coordinator and deputy
citizen councilor coordinator shall serve at the pleasure of the state auditor,
until terminated with the approval of the steering committee, and shall be
citizen volunteers and serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for
actual expenses incurred in carrying out their duties under sections 1 through
11 of this act as funds for subscriptions and donations are available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The citizen councilor
coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator shall:

(1) Promote to the
citizens of the state the citizen councilor program and its contribution to
public and private planning processes;

(2) Oversee
preparation, tabulation, summarization, and dissemination of data and
information by the government and volunteer staff;

(3) Receive, on behalf
of the citizen councilor revolving fund, gifts and donations of real or
personal property, including cash and in-kind services;

(4) Hire a value
reporter and other paid staff to assist the volunteer staff if funds are
available;

(5) Contract for any
services including without limitation a toll-free telephone number and
answering service, keying, optical scanning, computer tabulation, recording,
reporting, research, consulting, printing, and mailing to carry out sections 1
through 11 of this act;

(6) Solicit volunteers
to assist in administering the program from community service, educational,
civic, business, religious, and other organizations;

(7) Solicit citizen
councilor groups from existing organizations;

(8) Solicit individual
citizen councilors to participate in local groups organized by mutual
convenience usually within the same residence or work zip code area;

(9) Assign value
reporters to interview scholars, experts, public officials, planners, leaders,
and others on tape concerning topics of discussion assigned by the state
auditor;

(10) Produce audio or
video cassette tapes, or both, and printed materials as evenhandedly as
possible;

(11) Mail public
information materials to citizen councilor conveners or individual citizen
councilors, or both, after final approval by the state auditor;

(12) Provide, at cost,
group mailing labels of its own conveners on request of an organization
participating or to a county, regional government, municipality, or school
district if a private iteration of their own constituents is desired at their
own time and expense;

(13) Machine-scan or
key, or both, citizen councilor response sheets and tabulate data;

(14) Mail
organizational, community, school, business, or church profiles to the leaders
of such participating organizations for their information and without cost when
they have over fifty groups responding statewide. Such information shall be
filed for public review;

(15) Prepare summary
reports of data generated and press releases;

(16) Mail summary
reports and other information to all citizen councilor conveners for their
groups and to participating organizations, and to those public officials who
have indicated to the citizen councilor coordinator that they are interested;
and

(17) Maintain data
generated for public and media reference in the state auditor's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The citizen councilor
coordinator shall actively encourage citizen councilor groups to form
throughout the state. Citizen councilor groups shall usually consist of a
minimum of eight and a maximum of twelve regularly assigned members and meet on
call of their convener at times and places they deem most appropriate during a
thirty-day or other designated time period. Citizen councilor groups might
normally meet approximately two or three times per year on state issues, one or
two times on county or municipal issues, and one time on federal issues in
response to the president of the United States through the state-of-the-union
address. They shall have the opportunity to listen to audio or video tapes
articulating an issue of public interest or concern and study other materials
prepared or authorized as described in section 4 of this act. Citizen
councilors shall have the opportunity to respond anonymously making their
opinions known on individual mark-sense response sheets for return to the
citizen councilor coordinator for keying or optical scanning, tabulation, and
analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Eight through twelve
citizens from organizations such as, but not limited to, community service,
civic associations, cooperatives, unions, religious, business, or school
district groups may enroll as an organizational group with their own convener
designated. An organizational profile report shall be provided the leaders of
organizations with fifty or more groups without cost to inform them of how
their members responded to public issues posed or approved by the state auditor
and shall be open to public inspection in the office of the state auditor. If
additional profiles or services are requested by an organization of its own
constituents, the policy, rules, and fees to cover such costs shall be paid
separately. Organizations with fifty or more groups may purchase mailing
labels of their group conveners from the state auditor and prepare and mail
their own group materials for tabulation at their own effort and expense.
These data shall not be tabulated by the citizen councilor coordinator and
shall not be combined with the public data nor available for public inspection
at the office of the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Each citizen councilor
shall be asked to make donations from time to time to help cover the costs of
the citizen councilor program estimated at fifteen to twenty dollars per person
per year at present costs. It is also the intention of the state auditor that
donations and gifts be solicited from public-spirited individuals, businesses,
and foundations for the purpose of assisting in the funding of the program and
the providing of scholarships to unemployed or low-income citizens. However,
since all direct costs of this program are provided by donations and
subscriptions with no funds from public sources, the citizen councilor
coordinator shall use his or her discretion in determining the scale and the
scope of the program so that expenses do not exceed available funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A citizen councilor
revolving fund is created and shall consist of donations and subscriptions
collected under sections 1 through 11 of this act and any moneys appropriated
to it by law for specific purposes. The state treasurer shall be custodian of
the revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on
authorization of the citizen councilor coordinator. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the citizen councilor revolving fund
shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) The state auditor may
provide the citizen councilor coordinator and his or her volunteer staff with
space in existing offices and with clerical services from existing staff to
assist in establishing and conducting the citizen councilor program. Appropriations
are not required, but the state auditor may consider the services provided
under this section in submitting the department's budget.

(2) The citizen
councilor coordinator shall seek to obtain donations from citizen councilor
organizational groups, citizen councilors, and public-spirited individuals,
community service organizations, businesses, and foundations to help cover the
costs of the program. When ten thousand dollars in donations have been
received, the state auditor shall authorize the citizen councilor coordinator
to establish a toll-free telephone number and answering service and to develop
a list of the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of persons and groups
interested in serving as citizen councilors, citizen councilor conveners, or in
citizen councilor organizational groups, or in making donations. Whenever
possible, the names, addresses, and legislative districts of registered voters
maintained by the secretary of state shall be copied to reduce costs of the
state auditor while increasing accuracy of the citizen councilor records. When
forty thousand dollars in donations have been received, the citizen councilor
coordinator may initiate the new communication process contemplated in sections
1 through 11 of this act and continue it at a scope and scale that is
supportable by the resources available.

(3) In the event the
program under sections 1 through 11 of this act fails to support its direct
costs and is necessary to be terminated by the state auditor, funds remaining
after payment of all outstanding expenses and disposal of equipment and
supplies owned shall be deposited in the general fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act are each added to chapter 43.09 RCW.

---
END ---