BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
48.31.280 and 1993 c 462 s 83 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 The priority of distribution of claims from the
insurer's

_8 estate is as follows: Every claim in a class must be
paid in full

_9 or adequate funds retained for payment before the
members of the

10 next class receive any payment; no subclasses may be
established

11 within a class; and no claim by a sharehold­er,
policyholder, or

12 other creditor may circumvent the priority classes
through the use

13 of equitable remedies. The order of distribution of
claims is:

14 (1) Class 1. The costs and expenses of administra­tion
during

15 rehabilitation and liquidation, including but not
limited to the

16 following:

17 (a) The actual and necessary costs of preserving or
recovering

18 the assets of the insurer;

p. 1 SB
5653

_1 (b) Compensation for all authorized services ren­dered
in the

_2 rehabilitation and liquidation;

_3 (c) Necessary filing fees;

_4 (d) The fees and mileage payable to witnesses;

_5 (e) Authorized reasonable attorneys' fees and other

_6 professional services rendered in the rehabilitation and

_7 liquidation;

_8 (f) The reasonable expenses of a guaranty associa­tion
or

_9 foreign guaranty association for unallocated loss
adjustment

10 expenses.

11 (2) Class 2. ((Reasonable compensation to
employees for services

12 performed to the extent that they do not exceed two
months of

13 monetary compensation and represent payment for
services performed

14 within one year before the filing of the petition for
liquidation

15 or, if rehabilitation preceded liquidation, within
one year before

16 the filing of the petition for rehabilitation.
Principal officers

17 and directors are not entitled to the benefit of this
priority

18 except as otherwise approved by the liquidator and
the court. The

19 priority is in lieu of any other similar priority
that may be

20 authorized by law as to wages or compensation of
employees.

21 (3) Class 3. Loss claims. For purposes of this
section, "loss

22 claims" are all claims under policies, including
claims of the

23 federal or a state or local government, for losses
incurred,

24 including third-party claims and all claims of a
guaranty

25 association or foreign guaranty association. All
claims under life

26 insurance and annuity policies, whether for death
proceeds,

27 annuity proceeds, or investment values, are loss
claims. That

28 portion of any loss indemnification that is provided
for by other

29 benefits or advantages recovered by the claimant, is
not included

30 in this class, other than benefits or advantages
recovered or

31 recoverable in discharge of familial obligation of
support or by

32 way of succession at death or a proceeds of life
insurance, or as

33 gratuities. No payment by an employer to his or her
employee may be

34 treated as a gratuity.

35 (4) Class 4. Claims under nonassessable policies
for unearned

36 premium or other premium refunds and claims of
general creditors

37 including claims of ceding and assuming companies in
their

38 capacity as such.

SB 5653 p. 2

_1 (5) Class 5. Claims of the federal or any state
or local

_2 government except those under subsection (3) of this
section.

_3 Claims, including those of any governmen­tal body for
a penalty or

_4 forfeiture, are allowed in this class only to the
extent of the

_5 pecuniary loss sustained from the act, transaction,
or proceeding

_6 out of which the penalty or forfeiture arose, with
reason­able and

_7 actual costs occasioned thereby. The remainder of
such claims are

_8 postponed to the class of claims under subsection (8)
of this

_9 section.

10 (6) Class 6. Claims filed late or any other
claims other than

11 claims under subsections (7) and (8) of this section.

12 (7) Class 7. Surplus or contribution notes, or
similar

13 obligations, and premium refunds on assessable
policies. Payments

14 to members of domestic mutual insurance companies are
limited in

15 accordance with law.

16 (8) Class 8. The claims of shareholders or other
owners in their

17 capacity as shareholders.)) Loss claims. For
purposes of this

18 section, loss claims are all claims under policies,
including

19 claims of the federal or a state or local government,
for losses

20 incurred, including third-party claims, and all
claims of a

21 guaranty association or foreign guaranty
association. All claims

22 under life insurance and annuity policies, whether
for death

23 proceeds, annuity proceeds, or investment values, are
loss

24 claims. That portion of any loss indemnification
that is provided

25 for by other benefits or advantages recovered by the
claimant, is

26 not included in this class, other than benefits or
advantages

27 recovered or recoverable in discharge of familial
obligations of

28 support or by way of succession at death or as
proceeds of life

29 insurance, or as gratuities. No payment by an
employer to an

30 employee may be treated as a gratuity. Loss claims
also include

31 claims under nonassessable policies for unearned
premium or other

32 premium refunds.

33 (3) Class 3. Claims of the federal government,
other than claims

34 which are included as loss claims under subsection
(2) of this

35 section.

36 (4) Class 4. Reasonable compensation to
employees for services

37 performed to the extent that they do not exceed two
months of

38 monetary compensation and represent payment for
services performed

p. 3 SB
5653

_1 within one year before the filing of the petition for
liquidation

_2 or, if rehabilitation preceded liquidation, within
one year before

_3 the filing of the petition for rehabilitation;
except, where there

_4 are no claims and no potential claims of the federal
government in

_5 the estate, in which case claims in this class shall
have priority

_6 over claims in class 2 and below. Principal officers
and directors

_7 are not entitled to the benefit of this priority
except as

_8 otherwise approved by the liquidator and the court. This
priority

_9 is in lieu of any other similar priority that may be
authorized by

10 law as to wages or compensation of employees.

11 (5) Class 5. Claims of general creditors
including claims of

12 ceding and assuming companies in their capacity as
such.

13 (6) Class 6. Claims of any state or local
government, except

14 those under subsection (2) of this section. Claims,
including those

15 of any governmental body for a penalty or forfeiture,
are allowed

16 in this class only to the extent of the pecuniary
loss sustained

17 from the act, transaction, or proceeding out of which
the penalty

18 or forfeiture arose, with reasonable and actual costs
occasioned

19 thereby. The remainder of such claims are postponed
to the class of

20 claims under subsection (9) of this section.

21 (7) Class 7. Claims filed late or any other
claims other than

22 claims under subsections (8) and (9) of this section.

23 (8) Class 8. Surplus or contribution notes, or
similar

24 obligations, and premium refunds on assessable
policies. Payments

25 to members of domestic mutual insurance companies are
limited in

26 accordance with law.

27 (9) Class 9. The claims of shareholders or other
owners in their

28 capacity as shareholders.

29 Sec. 2. RCW
48.31.260 and 1947 c 79 s .31.26 are each amended to

30 read as follows:

31 The rights and liabilities of the insurer and of its
creditors,

32 policyholders, stockholders, members, subscribers, and
all other

33 persons interested in its estate shall, unless otherwise
directed

34 by the court, be fixed as of the date on which the order
directing

35 the liquidation of the insurer is filed in the office of
the clerk

36 of the court which made the order, subject to the
provisions of

SB 5653 p. 4

_1 RCW 48.31.300 with respect to the rights of claimants
holding

_2 contingent claims and RCW 48.31.280 with respect to
the priority

_3 and order of distributions of claims.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies to
and governs all

_5 claims filed in any proceeding to liquidate an insurer
that is

_6 initiated on or after January 1, 2001.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of
this act or its

_8 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

_9 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

10 persons or circumstances is not affected.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5653