BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

A contractor's record
of compliance with tax laws, labor and employment laws, and environmental laws
shall be a factor in the awarding of all state contracts for public works and
purchases.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70B.030 and 1995
c 347 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Fundamental land
use planning choices made in adopted comprehensive plans and development
regulations shall serve as the foundation for project review. The review of a
proposed project's consistency with applicable development regulations, or in
the absence of applicable regulations the adopted comprehensive plan, under RCW
36.70B.040 shall incorporate the determinations under this section.

(2) During project
review, a local government or any subsequent reviewing body shall determine
whether the items listed in this subsection are defined in the development
regulations applicable to the proposed project or, in the absence of applicable
regulations the adopted comprehensive plan. At a minimum, such applicable
regulations or plans shall be determinative of the:

(a) Type of land use permitted
at the site, including uses that may be allowed under certain circumstances,
such as planned unit developments and conditional and special uses, if the
criteria for their approval have been satisfied;

(b) Density of
residential development in urban growth areas; and

(c) Availability and
adequacy of public facilities identified in the comprehensive plan, if the plan
or development regulations provide for funding of these facilities as required
by chapter 36.70A RCW.

(3) During project
review, the local government or any subsequent reviewing body shall not
reexamine alternatives to or hear appeals on the items identified in subsection
(2) of this section, except for issues of code interpretation. As part of its
project review process, a local government shall provide a procedure for
obtaining a code interpretation as provided in RCW 36.70B.110.

(4) Pursuant to RCW
43.21C.240, a local government may determine that the requirements for
environmental analysis and mitigation measures in development regulations and
other applicable laws provide adequate mitigation for some or all of the
project's specific adverse environmental impacts to which the requirements
apply.

(5) Nothing in this
section limits the authority of a permitting agency to approve, condition, or
deny a project as provided in its development regulations adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW and in its policies adopted under RCW 43.21C.060. Project review
shall be used to identify specific project design and conditions relating to
the character of development, such as the details of site plans, curb cuts,
drainage swales, transportation demand management, the payment of impact fees,
or other measures to mitigate a proposal's probable adverse environmental
impacts, if applicable.

(6) As part of the
review of the proposed project, the applicant's record of compliance with tax
laws, labor and employment laws, and environmental laws shall be a factor in
the permitting agency's decision to approve, deny, or condition a project.

(7)
Subsections (1) through (4) of this section apply only to local governments
planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

---
END ---