BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.210 and 1997 c
241 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt of the
application and proper fee for original vehicle license, the director shall
make a recheck of the application and in the event that there is any error in
the application it may be returned to the county auditor or other agent to
effectively secure the correction of such error, who shall return the same
corrected to the director.

(2) Application for the
renewal of a vehicle license shall be made to the director or his agents,
including county auditors, by the registered owner on a form prescribed by the
director. The application must be accompanied by ((the certificate of
registration for the last registration period in which the vehicle was
registered in Washington unless the applicant submits a preprinted application
mailed from Olympia, and)) the payment of such license fees and excise tax
as may be required by law. Such application shall be handled in the same
manner and the fees transmitted to the state treasurer in the same manner as in
the case of an original application. Any such application which upon
validation becomes a renewal certificate need not have entered upon it the name
of the lien holder, if any, of the vehicle concerned.

(3) Persons expecting
to be out of the state during the normal renewal period of a vehicle license
may secure renewal of such vehicle license and have license plates or tabs
preissued by making application to the director or his agents upon forms
prescribed by the director. The application must be accompanied by ((the
certificate of registration for the last registration period in which the
vehicle was registered in Washington and be accompanied by)) such license
fees, and excise tax as may be required by law.

(4)
Application for the annual renewal of a vehicle license number plate to the
director or the director's agents shall not be required for those vehicles
owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington, or by any county, city,
town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington or a governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state and
recognized as a governmental entity by the United States department of the
interior.

--- END ---