BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c
272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted budget the
capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax
authorized in this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to be
in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects.

(2) The legislative
authority of any county or any city may impose an excise tax on each sale of
real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and
in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. The revenues from this tax
shall be used by any city or county with a population of five thousand or less
and any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any capital
purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local capital
improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.

After April 30, 1992,
revenues generated from the tax imposed under this subsection in counties over
five thousand population and cities over five thousand population that are
required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used solely for
financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a
comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and
59.18.450. However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt
retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose
until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (b)
committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may
continue to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.

(3) In lieu of imposing
the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the legislative authority of any county
or any city may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property
in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-half
of one percent of the selling price.

(4) Taxes imposed under
this section shall be collected from persons who are taxable by the state under
chapter 82.45 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate limits of the city,
as the case may be.

(5) Taxes imposed under
this section shall comply with all applicable rules, regulations, laws, and
court decisions regarding real estate excise taxes as imposed by the state
under chapter 82.45 RCW.

(6) As used in this
section, "city" means any city or town and "capital
project" means those public works projects of a local government for
planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads; highways; sidewalks; street
and road lighting systems; traffic signals; bridges; domestic water systems;
storm and sanitary sewer systems; parks; recreational facilities; law
enforcement facilities; fire protection facilities; trails; libraries;
administrative and/or judicial facilities; low-income housing; and river
and/or waterway flood control projects by those jurisdictions that, prior to
June 11, 1992, have expended funds derived from the tax authorized by this
section for such purposes((; and, until December 31, 1995, housing projects
for those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or
committed to expend funds derived from the tax authorized by this section or
the tax authorized by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes)).

Sec. 2. RCW 82.46.035 and 1992 c
221 s 3 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 33 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted budget the capital
projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax authorized in
this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to
other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.

(2) The legislative
authority of any county or any city that plans under RCW 36.70A.040(1) may
impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate
limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one
percent of the selling price. Any county choosing to plan under RCW
36.70A.040(2) and any city within such a county may only adopt an ordinance
imposing the excise tax authorized by this section if the ordinance is first
authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing
district voting on the proposition at a general election held within the
district or at a special election within the taxing district called by the
district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters.

(3) Revenues generated
from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section shall be used by such
counties and cities solely for financing capital projects specified in a
capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan. However, revenues (a)
pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to March 1, 1992,
may continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the
revenues were pledged is retired, or (b) committed prior to March 1, 1992, by
such counties or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose
until the project is completed.

(4) Revenues generated
by the tax imposed by this section shall be deposited in a separate account.

(5) As used in this
section, "city" means any city or town and "capital
project" means those public works projects of a local government for
planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street
and road lighting systems, traffic signals, bridges, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, ((and planning, construction,
reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of)) parks,
recreational facilities, law enforcement facilities, fire protection
facilities, trails, libraries, administrative and judicial facilities, and
low-income housing.

(6) When
the governor files a notice of noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.340 with the
secretary of state and the appropriate county or city, the county or city's
authority to impose the additional excise tax under this section shall be
temporarily rescinded until the governor files a subsequent notice rescinding
the notice of noncompliance.

---
END ---