BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.36.010 and 1998 c
176 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Blended
fuel" means a mixture of motor vehicle fuel and another liquid, other than
a de ((minimus)) minimis amount of the liquid, that can be used
as a fuel to propel a motor vehicle.

(2) "Bond"
means a bond duly executed with a corporate surety qualified under chapter
48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the state of Washington conditioned upon
faithful performance of all requirements of this chapter, including the payment
of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations arising out of this chapter.

(3) "Bulk
transfer" means a transfer of motor vehicle fuel by pipeline or vessel.

(4) "Bulk
transfer-terminal system" means the motor vehicle fuel distribution system
consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and terminals. Motor vehicle
fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal is in the bulk
transfer-terminal system. Motor vehicle fuel in the fuel tank of an engine,
motor vehicle, or in a railcar, trailer, truck, or other equipment suitable for
ground transportation is not in the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(5) "Dealer"
means a person engaged in the retail sale of motor vehicle fuel.

(6)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(7)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(8) "Evasion"
or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the computation, assessment, or
payment of authorized taxes or fees through:

(a) A knowing: False
statement; misrepresentation of fact; or other act of deception; or

(b) An intentional:
Omission; failure to file a return or report; or other act of deception.

(9) "Export"
means to obtain motor vehicle fuel in this state for sales or distribution
outside the state.

(10)
"Highway" means every way or place open to the use of the public, as
a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.

(11) "Import"
means to bring motor vehicle fuel into this state by a means of conveyance
other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.

(12)
"Licensee" means a person holding a license issued under this
chapter.

(13) "Marine fuel
dealer" means a person engaged in the retail sale of motor vehicle fuel
whose place of business and/or sale outlet is located upon a navigable
waterway.

(14) "Motor
vehicle fuel blender" means a person who produces blended motor fuel
outside the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(15) "Motor
vehicle fuel distributor" means a person who acquires motor vehicle fuel
from a supplier, distributor, or licensee for subsequent sale and distribution.

(16) "Motor
vehicle fuel exporter" means a person who purchases motor vehicle fuel in this
state and directly exports the fuel by a means other than the bulk
transfer-terminal system to a destination outside of the state. If the
exporter of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is
acting is the exporter. If there is no exporter of record, the owner of the
motor fuel at the time of exportation is the exporter.

(17) "Motor
vehicle fuel importer" means a person who imports motor vehicle fuel into
the state by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal system. If the
importer of record is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is
acting is the importer. If there is no importer of record, the owner of the
motor vehicle fuel at the time of importation is the importer.

(18) "Motor
vehicle fuel supplier" means a person who ((owns and stores motor
vehicle fuel in a terminal facility or who refines and stores motor vehicle
fuel at a refinery)) holds a federal certificate of registry that is
issued under the internal revenue code and authorizes the person to enter into
federal tax-free transactions on motor vehicle fuel in the bulk
transfer-terminal system.

(19) "Motor
vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed for operation upon land
utilizing motor vehicle fuel as the means of propulsion.

(20) "Motor vehicle
fuel" means gasoline and any other inflammable gas or liquid, by
whatsoever name the gasoline, gas, or liquid may be known or sold, the chief
use of which is as fuel for the propulsion of motor vehicles or motorboats.

(21) "Person"
means a natural person, fiduciary, association, or corporation. The term
"person" as applied to an association means and includes the partners
or members thereof, and as applied to corporations, the officers thereof.

(22) "Position
holder" means a person who holds the inventory position in motor vehicle
fuel, as reflected by the records of the terminal operator. A person holds the
inventory position in motor vehicle fuel if the person has a contractual
agreement with the terminal for the use of storage facilities and terminating
services at a terminal with respect to motor vehicle fuel. "Position
holder" includes a terminal operator that owns motor vehicle fuel in their
terminal.

(23) "Rack"
means a mechanism for delivering motor vehicle fuel from a refinery or terminal
into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other means of nonbulk transfer.

(24)
"Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise controls a
refinery.

(25)
"Removal" means a physical transfer of motor vehicle fuel other than
by evaporation, loss, or destruction.

(26)
"Terminal" means a motor vehicle fuel storage and distribution
facility that has been assigned a terminal control number by the internal
revenue service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which reportable
motor vehicle fuel is removed at a rack.

(27) "Terminal
operator" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise controls a
terminal.

(28) "Two-party
exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a transaction in which
taxable motor vehicle fuel is transferred from one licensed supplier to another
licensed supplier under an exchange or buy-sell agreement whereby the supplier
that is the position holder agrees to deliver taxable motor vehicle fuel to the
other supplier or the other supplier's customer at the rack of the terminal at
which the delivering supplier is the position holder.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.36.020 and 2000 c
103 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and imposed upon motor vehicle fuel users a tax at the rate computed in
the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel.

(2) The tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section is imposed when any of the following occurs:

(a) Motor vehicle fuel
is removed in this state from a terminal if the motor vehicle fuel is removed
at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to
a destination outside of the state;

(b) Motor vehicle fuel
is removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:

(i) The removal is by
bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the motor vehicle fuel
immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or

(ii) The removal is at
the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct
delivery to a destination outside of the state;

(c) Motor vehicle fuel
enters into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage if either of the
following applies:

(i) The entry is by
bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensee; or

(ii) The entry is not
by bulk transfer;

(d) Motor vehicle fuel
is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there
was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the motor vehicle fuel;

(e) Blended motor
vehicle fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The
number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel subject to the tax is the
difference between the total number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel
removed or sold and the number of gallons of previously taxed motor vehicle
fuel used to produce the blended motor vehicle fuel;

(f) Motor vehicle
fuel is sold by a licensed motor vehicle fuel supplier to a motor vehicle fuel
distributor, motor vehicle fuel importer, or motor vehicle fuel blender and the
motor vehicle fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(3) The proceeds of the
motor vehicle fuel excise tax shall be distributed as provided in RCW 46.68.090.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.36.026 and 1998 c
176 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((position
holder)) licensed supplier shall remit tax to the department ((on
motor vehicle fuel removed from a terminal)) as provided in RCW 82.36.020(((2)(a))).
On a two-party exchange, or buy-sell agreement between two licensed
suppliers, the receiving exchange partner or buyer((, becomes the position
holder,)) who shall remit the tax.

(2) A refiner shall
remit tax to the department on motor vehicle fuel removed from a refinery as
provided in RCW 82.36.020(2)(b).

(3) An importer shall
remit tax to the department on motor vehicle fuel imported into this state as
provided in RCW 82.36.020(2)(c).

(4) A blender shall
remit tax to the department on the removal or sale of blended motor vehicle
fuel as provided in RCW 82.36.020(2)(e).

Sec. 4. RCW 82.36.060 and 1998 c
176 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application for
a license issued under this chapter shall be made to the department on forms to
be furnished by the department and shall contain such information as the
department deems necessary.

(2) Every application
for a license must contain the following information to the extent it applies
to the applicant:

(a) Proof as the
department may require concerning the applicant's identity, including but not
limited to his or her fingerprints or those of the officers of a corporation
making the application;

(b) The applicant's
form and place of organization including proof that the individual,
partnership, or corporation is licensed to do business in this state;

(c) The qualification
and business history of the applicant and any partner, officer, or director;

(d) The applicant's
financial condition or history including a bank reference and whether the
applicant or any partner, officer, or director has ever been adjudged bankrupt
or has an unsatisfied judgment in a federal or state court;

(e) Whether the
applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime that directly relates to the
business for which the license is sought and the time elapsed since the
conviction is less than ten years, or has suffered a judgment within the
preceding five years in a civil action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or
conversion and in the case of a corporation or partnership, all directors,
officers, or partners.

(3) An applicant for a
license as a motor vehicle fuel importer must list on the application each
state, province, or country from which the applicant intends to import motor
vehicle fuel and, if required by the state, province, or country listed, must
be licensed or registered for motor vehicle fuel tax purposes in that state,
province, or country.

(4) An applicant for a
license as a motor vehicle fuel exporter must list on the application each
state, province, or country to which the exporter intends to export motor
vehicle fuel received in this state by means of a transfer outside of the bulk
transfer-terminal system and, if required by the state, province, or country
listed, must be licensed or registered for motor vehicle fuel tax purposes in
that state, province, or country.

(5) An applicant for a
license as a motor vehicle fuel supplier must have a federal certificate of
registry that is issued under the internal revenue code and authorizes the
applicant to enter into federal tax-free transactions on motor vehicle fuel in
the terminal transfer system.

(6) After receipt of an
application for a license, the director may conduct an investigation to
determine whether the facts set forth are true. The director shall require a
fingerprint record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system and the federal bureau of investigation before
issuance of a license. The results of the background investigation including
criminal history information may be released to authorized department personnel
as the director deems necessary. The department shall charge a license holder
or license applicant a fee of fifty dollars for each background investigation
conducted.

An applicant who makes
a false statement of a material fact on the application may be prosecuted for
false swearing as defined by RCW 9A.72.040.

(7) Except as
provided in subsection (8) of this section, before granting any license
issued under this chapter, the department shall require applicant to file with
the department, in such form as shall be prescribed by the department, a
corporate surety bond duly executed by the applicant as principal, payable to
the state and conditioned for faithful performance of all the requirements of
this chapter, including the payment of all taxes, penalties, and other
obligations arising out of this chapter. The total amount of the bond or bonds
shall be fixed by the department and may be increased or reduced by the
department at any time subject to the limitations herein provided. In fixing
the total amount of the bond or bonds, the department shall require a bond or
bonds equivalent in total amount to twice the estimated monthly excise tax
determined in such manner as the department may deem proper. If at any time
the estimated excise tax to become due during the succeeding month amounts to
more than fifty percent of the established bond, the department shall require
additional bonds or securities to maintain the marginal ratio herein specified
or shall demand excise tax payments to be made weekly or semimonthly to meet
the requirements hereof.

The total amount of the
bond or bonds required of any licensee shall never be less than five thousand
dollars nor more than one hundred thousand dollars.

No recoveries on any
bond or the execution of any new bond shall invalidate any bond and no
revocation of any license shall effect the validity of any bond but the total
recoveries under any one bond shall not exceed the amount of the bond.

In lieu of any such
bond or bonds in total amount as herein fixed, a licensee may deposit with the
state treasurer, under such terms and conditions as the department may
prescribe, a like amount of lawful money of the United States or bonds or other
obligations of the United States, the state, or any county of the state, of an
actual market value not less than the amount so fixed by the department.

Any surety on a bond
furnished by a licensee as provided herein shall be released and discharged
from any and all liability to the state accruing on such bond after the
expiration of thirty days from the date upon which such surety has lodged with
the department a written request to be released and discharged, but this
provision shall not operate to relieve, release, or discharge the surety from
any liability already accrued or which shall accrue before the expiration of
the thirty day period. The department shall promptly, upon receiving any such
request, notify the licensee who furnished the bond; and unless the licensee,
on or before the expiration of the thirty day period, files a new bond, or
makes a deposit in accordance with the requirements of this section, the
department shall forthwith cancel the license. Whenever a new bond is
furnished by a licensee, the department shall cancel the old bond as soon as
the department and the attorney general are satisfied that all liability under
the old bond has been fully discharged.

The department may
require a licensee to give a new or additional surety bond or to deposit
additional securities of the character specified in this section if, in its
opinion, the security of the surety bond theretofore filed by such licensee, or
the market value of the properties deposited as security by the licensee, shall
become impaired or inadequate; and upon the failure of the licensee to give such
new or additional surety bond or to deposit additional securities within thirty
days after being requested so to do by the department, the department shall
forthwith cancel his or her license.

(8) The department
may waive the requirements of subsection (7) of this section for licensed
distributors, if upon determination of the department, the licensed distributor
has sufficient resources, assets, other financial instruments, or other means
to adequately make payments on the estimated monthly motor vehicle fuel tax
payments, penalties, and interest arising out of this chapter. The department
shall establish rules to administer this subsection (8).

Sec. 5. RCW 82.38.020 and 1998 c
176 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Blended
special fuel" means a mixture of undyed diesel fuel and another liquid,
other than a de minimus amount of the liquid, that can be used as a fuel to
propel a motor vehicle.

(2) "Blender"
means a person who produces blended special fuel outside the bulk
transfer-terminal system.

(3) "Bond"
means a bond duly executed with a corporate surety qualified under chapter
48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the state of Washington conditioned upon
faithful performance of all requirements of this chapter, including the payment
of all taxes, penalties, and other obligations arising out of this chapter.

(4) "Bulk
transfer-terminal system" means the special fuel distribution system
consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and terminals. Special fuel in a
refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal is in the bulk transfer-terminal
system. Special fuel in the fuel tank of an engine, motor vehicle, or in a
railcar, trailer, truck, or other equipment suitable for ground transportation
is not in the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(5) "Bulk
transfer" means a transfer of special fuel by pipeline or vessel.

(6) "Bulk
storage" means the placing of special fuel into a receptacle other than
the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.

(7)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(8) "Dyed special
fuel user" means a person authorized by the internal revenue code to
operate a motor vehicle on the highway using dyed special fuel, in which the
use is not exempt from the special fuel tax.

(9) "Evasion"
or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the computation, assessment, or
payment of authorized taxes or fees through:

(a) A knowing: False
statement; misrepresentation of fact; or other act of deception; or

(b) An intentional:
Omission; failure to file a return or report; or other act of deception.

(10) "Export"
means to obtain special fuel in this state for sales or distribution outside
the state.

(11)
"Highway" means every way or place open to the use of the public, as
a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.

(12) "Import"
means to bring special fuel into this state by a means of conveyance other than
the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.

(13)
"International fuel tax agreement licensee" means a special fuel user
operating qualified motor vehicles in interstate commerce and licensed by the
department under the international fuel tax agreement.

(14) "Lessor"
means a person: (a) Whose principal business is the bona fide leasing or
renting of motor vehicles without drivers for compensation to the general
public; and (b) who maintains established places of business and whose lease or
rental contracts require the motor vehicles to be returned to the established
places of business.

(15)
"Licensee" means a person holding a license issued under this
chapter.

(16) "Motor
vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed for operation upon land
utilizing special fuel as the means of propulsion.

(17) "Natural
gas" means naturally occurring mixtures of hydrocarbon gases and vapors
consisting principally of methane, whether in gaseous or liquid form.

(18) "Person"
means a natural person, fiduciary, association, or corporation. The term
"person" as applied to an association means and includes the partners
or members thereof, and as applied to corporations, the officers thereof.

(19) "Position
holder" means a person who holds the inventory position in special fuel,
as reflected by the records of the terminal operator. A person holds the
inventory position in special fuel if the person has a contractual agreement
with the terminal for the use of storage facilities and terminating services at
a terminal with respect to special fuel. "Position holder" includes
a terminal operator that owns special fuel in their terminal.

(20) "Rack"
means a mechanism for delivering special fuel from a refinery or terminal into
a truck, trailer, railcar, or other means of nonbulk transfer.

(21)
"Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise controls a
refinery.

(22)
"Removal" means a physical transfer of special fuel other than by
evaporation, loss, or destruction.

(23) "Special
fuel" means and includes all combustible gases and liquids suitable for
the generation of power for propulsion of motor vehicles, except that it does
not include motor vehicle fuel as defined in chapter 82.36 RCW, nor does it
include dyed special fuel as defined by federal regulations. However, if the
federal regulations authorize dyed special fuel to be used in highway vehicles,
that usage is considered taxable under this chapter, unless otherwise exempted.

(24) "Special fuel
distributor" means a person who acquires special fuel from a supplier,
distributor, or licensee for subsequent sale and distribution.

(25) "Special fuel
exporter" means a person who purchases special fuel in this state and
directly exports the fuel by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal
system to a destination outside of the state.

(26) "Special fuel
importer" means a person who imports special fuel into the state by a
means other than the bulk transfer-terminal system. If the importer of record
is acting as an agent, the person for whom the agent is acting is the
importer. If there is no importer of record, the owner of the special fuel at
the time of importation is the importer.

(27) "Special fuel
supplier" means a person who ((owns and stores special fuel in a
terminal facility or who refines and stores special fuel at a refinery)) holds
a federal certificate issued under the internal revenue code and authorizes the
person to tax-free transactions on special fuel in the bulk transfer-terminal
system.

(28) "Special fuel
user" means a person engaged in uses of special fuel that are not specifically
exempted from the special fuel tax imposed under this chapter.

(29)
"Terminal" means a special fuel storage and distribution facility
that has been assigned a terminal control number by the internal revenue
service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which reportable special
fuel is removed at a rack.

(30) "Terminal
operator" means a person who owns, operates, or otherwise controls a
terminal.

(31) "Two-party
exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a transaction in which
taxable special fuel is transferred from one licensed supplier to another
licensed supplier under an exchange or buy-sell agreement whereby the supplier
that is the position holder agrees to deliver taxable special fuel to the other
supplier or the other supplier's customer at the rack of the terminal at which
the delivering supplier is the position holder.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.38.030 and 1998 c
176 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby
levied and imposed upon special fuel users a tax at the rate computed in the
manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of special fuel, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature.

(2) The tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section is imposed when:

(a) Special fuel is
removed in this state from a terminal if the special fuel is removed at the
rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a
destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a special fuel
distributor for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee
under RCW 82.38.320;

(b) Special fuel is
removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:

(i) The removal is by
bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the special fuel immediately
before the removal is not a licensee; or

(ii) The removal is at
the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed exporter for direct
delivery to a destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a special
fuel distributor for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320;

(c) Special fuel enters
into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage if either of the
following applies:

(i) The entry is by
bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensee; or

(ii) The entry is not
by bulk transfer;

(d) Special fuel is sold
or removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there was a prior
taxable removal, entry, or sale of the special fuel;

(e) Blended special
fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The number
of gallons of blended special fuel subject to tax is the difference between the
total number of gallons of blended special fuel removed or sold and the number
of gallons of previously taxed special fuel used to ((produced [produce]))
produce the blended special fuel;

(f) Dyed special fuel
is used on a highway, as authorized by the internal revenue code, unless the
use is exempt from the special fuel tax; ((and))

(g) Special fuel
purchased by an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320
is used on a highway; and

(h) Special fuel is
sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a special fuel distributor, special
fuel importer, or special fuel blender and the special fuel is not removed from
the bulk transfer-terminal system.

(3) The tax imposed by
this chapter, if required to be collected by the licensee, is held in trust by
the licensee until paid to the department, and a licensee who appropriates or
converts the tax collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the
payment of the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of
a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft and anticipatory
provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership, corporation, or corporate
officer who fails to collect the tax imposed by this section, or who has
collected the tax and fails to pay it to the department in the manner
prescribed by this chapter, is personally liable to the state for the amount of
the tax.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.38.035 and 1998 c
176 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((position
holder)) licensed supplier shall remit tax on special fuel to
the department ((on special fuel removed from a terminal)) as provided
in RCW 82.38.030(2)(a). On a two-party exchange, or buy-sell agreement between
two licensed suppliers, the receiving exchange partner or buyer ((becomes
the position holder, who)) shall remit the tax.

(2) A refiner shall
remit tax to the department on special fuel removed from a refinery as provided
in RCW 82.38.030(2)(b).

(3) An importer shall
remit tax to the department on special fuel imported into this state as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(2)(c).

(4) A blender shall
remit tax to the department on the removal or sale of blended special fuel as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(2)(e).

(5) A dyed special fuel
user shall remit tax to the department on the use of dyed special fuel as
provided in RCW 82.38.030(2)(f).

Sec. 8. RCW 82.38.110 and 1998 c
176 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Application for a
license issued under this chapter shall be made to the department. The
application shall be filed upon a form prepared and furnished by the department
and shall contain such information as the department deems necessary.

(2) Every application
for a special fuel license, other than an application for a dyed special fuel
user or international fuel tax agreement license, must contain the following
information to the extent it applies to the applicant:

(a) Proof as the
department shall require concerning the applicant's identity, including but not
limited to his or her fingerprints or those of the officers of a corporation
making the application;

(b) The applicant's
form and place of organization including proof that the individual,
partnership, or corporation is licensed to do business in this state;

(c) The qualification
and business history of the applicant and any partner, officer, or director;

(d) The applicant's
financial condition or history including a bank reference and whether the
applicant or any partner, officer, or director has ever been adjudged bankrupt
or has an unsatisfied judgment in a federal or state court;

(e) Whether the applicant
has been adjudged guilty of a crime that directly relates to the business for
which the license is sought and the time elapsed since the conviction is less
than ten years, or has suffered a judgment within the preceding five years in a
civil action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion and in the case
of a corporation or partnership, all directors, officers, or partners.

(3) An applicant for a
license as a special fuel importer must list on the application each state,
province, or country from which the applicant intends to import fuel and, if
required by the state, province, or country listed, must be licensed or
registered for special fuel tax purposes in that state, province, or country.

(4) An applicant for a
license as a special fuel exporter must list on the application each state,
province, or country to which the exporter intends to export special fuel
received in this state by means of a transfer outside the bulk
transfer-terminal system and, if required by the state, province, or country
listed, must be licensed or registered for special fuel tax purposes in that
state, province, or country.

(5) An applicant for a
license as a special fuel supplier must have a federal certificate of registry
that is issued under the internal revenue code and authorizes the applicant to
enter into federal tax-free transactions on special fuel in the terminal
transfer system.

(6) After receipt of an
application for a license, the director shall conduct an investigation to
determine whether the facts set forth are true. The director shall require a
fingerprint record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system and the federal bureau of investigation before
issuance of a license. The results of the background investigation including
criminal history information may be released to authorized department personnel
as the director deems necessary. The department shall charge a license holder
or license applicant a fee of fifty dollars for each background investigation
conducted.

(7) An applicant who
makes a false statement of a material fact on the application may be prosecuted
for false swearing as defined by RCW 9A.72.040.

(8) A special fuel
license may not be issued to any person or continued in force unless such
person has furnished bond, as defined in RCW 82.38.020, in such form as the
department may require, to secure his or her compliance with this chapter, and
the payment of any and all taxes, interest, and penalties due and to become due
hereunder. The requirement of furnishing a bond may be waived for special fuel
distributors who only deliver special fuel into the fuel tanks of marine
vessels, for dyed special fuel users and for persons issued licenses under the
international fuel tax agreement; and for licensed special fuel distributors
who, upon determination of the department, have sufficient resources, assets,
other financial instruments, or other means to adequately make payments on the
estimated monthly motor vehicle fuel tax payments, penalties, and interest
arising out of this chapter. The department shall establish rules to
administer this subsection (8).

(9) The department may
require a licensee to post a bond if the licensee, after having been licensed,
has failed to file timely reports or has failed to remit taxes due, or when an
investigation or audit indicates problems severe enough that the department, in
its discretion, determines that a bond is required to protect the interests of
the state. The department may also adopt rules prescribing conditions that, in
the department's discretion, require a bond to protect the interests of the
state.

(10) The total amount
of the bond or bonds required of any licensee shall be equivalent to three
times the estimated monthly fuel tax, determined in such manner as the
department may deem proper: PROVIDED, That those licensees having held a
special fuel license for five or more years without having said license
suspended or revoked by the department shall be permitted to reduce the amount
of their bond to twice the estimated monthly tax liability: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the total amount of the bond or bonds shall never be less than five
hundred dollars nor more than one hundred thousand dollars.

(11) An application for
a dyed special fuel user license must be made to the department. The
application must be filed upon a form prescribed by the department and contain
such information as the department deems necessary.

(12) An
application for an international fuel tax agreement license must be made to the
department. The application must be filed upon a form prescribed by the
department and contain such information as the department may require.

---
END ---