BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A commercial
telephone solicitor, when engaging in commercial telephone solicitation, shall
provide caller identification information that is required by a caller
identification service if such service is available.

(2) A commercial
telephone solicitor, when engaging in commercial telephone solicitation, shall
not circumvent or interfere with the capability of a caller identification
service to deliver the solicitor's name, number, or location.

(3) A commercial
telephone solicitor using a caller identification service shall ensure that
three asterisks appear before the solicitor's name so that a caller
identification service can identify the call as a commercial telephone
solicitation.

(4) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally affecting
the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this section is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. In addition to any
other penalties or remedies available under this chapter or chapter 19.86 RCW,
a person injured by a violation of this section may bring an action for
recovery of liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars per
violation, plus court costs and attorneys' fees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act
shall be known and cited as the three stars and you're out act.

---
END ---