BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that a large and growing body of research supports the premise that
all students learn more, perform better, and exhibit more responsible and
respectful behavior in schools where they are known personally and as
individuals by the adults in the school.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definition in this
section applies throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

"Personalized
school" means a school with each of the following characteristics:

(1) The school enrolls
no more than two hundred seventy-five students if it is an elementary school,
or no more than four hundred forty students if it is a middle, junior high, or
high school with three or four grade levels;

(2) Every teacher at
the school works with every student assigned to his or her classroom for a
minimum of two consecutive years;

(3) The school develops
and implements a plan for high levels of parental involvement in which parents
are directly engaged in supporting their child's learning and in which parents
play a significant role in school governance;

(4) The school develops
a governance plan which involves an administrator, teachers, parents and other
community members, and, if it is a secondary school, the students; and

(5) The school develops
a philosophy and mission which focuses on the personalization of learning and
academic and personal success for each student. The school embodies its
philosophy and mission in its daily operations and activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A personalized schools
research and development program is established to study the extent to which
personalized schools can result in increased academic and personal achievement
for students in public schools. The program is intended to determine the
capacity of personalized schools to promote higher academic achievement, as
measured by performance on the Washington assessment of student learning, and
personal achievement, as measured by retention and graduation rates, student
behavior, student, parent, and teacher satisfaction, and other relevant data.
The legislature intends for this pilot program to operate five full school
years, to include evaluation of personalized schools, and to publish and
disseminate the results of the project's research and findings for the benefit
of the entire state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The superintendent of
public instruction shall develop a process for school districts to apply for
grant funding to participate in the personalized schools research and
development program. School districts may apply on behalf of existing schools
that intend to meet the program requirements or on behalf of proposed new
schools to be created in order to meet the program requirements. In order to
be eligible to participate in the program, a school must have its own
leadership, staff, and governance, but may share a common school building with
another school in the district. The school-within-a-school model program and the
academic house model program may not be employed by schools participating in
the program established by this chapter.

(2) The superintendent
shall appoint a selection committee to review applications and, to the extent
funding is provided for this program, select up to fifty schools to participate
from among qualified applicants. The selection committee shall include one
member of the superintendent's office, two teachers from schools in a district
not applying for a grant under the program, one administrator from a school
district which has not applied for a grant under the program, one
representative from an institution of higher education, and two additional
members.

(3) The selection
committee shall attempt to select approximately equal numbers of schools
enrolling elementary school students, middle or junior high school students,
and high school students. The selection committee shall make every possible
effort to award grants to at least nine schools in each of the three categories
of school: Elementary, middle or junior high, and high school. The selection
committee shall also endeavor to balance grants among schools serving urban,
suburban, and rural communities and to achieve geographic balance in grant
awards to include all regions of the state.

(4) The selection
committee shall determine the grant award recipients by December 10, 2001, and
inform all applicants of its decisions by December 18, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Applications for
grants under this chapter must be submitted to the superintendent by November
1, 2001.

(2) Each application on
behalf of an existing school must include:

(a) A description of
how the school currently satisfies all of the conditions set forth in the
definition of a personalized school, as provided in section 2 of this act, or a
description of how the school plans to satisfy those conditions by September 1,
2002;

(b) A statement of the
applicant school's understanding of the value of personalization in education;

(c) A letter from the
applying school district affirming the commitment of the board of directors of
the district and the district superintendent to maintain the applicant school
as a personalized school, as defined in section 2 of this act, for the entire
five-year duration of this research and development program, if the school is
selected to receive a grant to participate in the program; and

(d) A letter from the
applicant school's principal articulating his or her commitment to the
personalized schools research and development program.

(3) Each application on
behalf of a proposed school to be created for purposes of the personalized
schools program must include:

(a) A description of
how the proposed school will satisfy all the conditions set forth in the
definition of a personalized school, as defined in section 2 of this act;

(b) A statement of the
understanding of the applicant for the proposed school regarding the value of
personalization in education;

(c) A letter from the
applying school district affirming the commitment of the board of directors of
the district and the district superintendent to maintain the proposed school as
a personalized school, as defined in section 2 of this act, for the entire
five-year duration of this research and development program, if the application
for a proposed school is selected to receive a grant to participate in the
program; and

(d) A letter from the
individual who would become the proposed school's principal articulating his or
her commitment to the personalized schools research and development program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The superintendent
shall award start-up grants for selected schools by January 15, 2002. Subject
to available funding, each personalized school shall receive a thirty-five
thousand dollar start-up grant.

(a) Up to fifteen
thousand dollars of the start-up grant may be used for facilities.

(b) The remainder of
the start-up grant must be expended for needs directly related to teaching and
learning, with a focus on professional development. This may not include
purchase of material or curricula, unless such materials or curricula are
necessary for the conduct of professional development activities.

(2) Subject to
available funding, by July 1, 2002, the superintendent shall award each
personalized school a grant of twenty-five thousand dollars for the first year
of operation of the personalized school. Subject to available funding, by July
1, 2003, the superintendent shall award each personalized school a grant of
fifteen thousand dollars for the second year of operation of the personalized
school. Subject to available funding, by July 1, 2004, the superintendent
shall award each personalized school a grant of eight thousand dollars for the
third year of operation of the personalized school.

(3) Schools selected to
participate in the personalized schools program shall begin planning activities
in January 2002 and shall begin their first year of operation within the
personalized school program in September 2002. Participating schools shall
continue to operate as personalized schools at least through the end of the
2006-07 school year. All funds awarded for personalized schools under this
chapter must be under the control of the personalized school and may be spent
according to the school's discretion, subject to the requirements of all other
applicable laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The superintendent of
public instruction shall develop an assessment system for personalized
schools. The assessment system must include the Washington assessment of
student learning, information concerning student behavior, data relating to the
perceptions that students, parents, and educators have about personalized
schools, and other information that may be relevant to determining the
effectiveness of personalized schools. Up to thirty thousand dollars of the
appropriation provided for this program in the 2002 fiscal year may be used for
development of the assessment system created pursuant to this section.

(2) The superintendent
shall designate a program staff member within the agency to manage the
assessment development activities and to provide technical assistance to
personalized schools. Subject to available funding, the designated staff
member shall also organize an annual institute for representatives of each
personalized school to gain additional professional development and provide
opportunities to learn from the experiences of other personalized schools.

(3) The superintendent
may require personalized schools to collect and report information the
superintendent deems necessary for an adequate evaluation of the personalized
schools pilot program. The superintendent shall compile and analyze
information on the results and effectiveness of the personalized school pilot
program and report its findings to the legislature and to the public annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The superintendent may
adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act expire December 31, 2007.

---
END ---