BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.5055 and 1999
c 324 s 5, 1999 c 274 s 6, and 1999 c 5 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) A person who is
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior
offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of
the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that
the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial
risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not
less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than two days nor more than one year. Two consecutive days of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may order not
less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2) A person who is
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior
offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed
shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic
home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment
and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3) A person who is
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two or more
prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one hundred twenty days of
electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and
one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One
thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one year and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. One hundred
twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(4) In exercising its
discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the
court shall particularly consider the following:

(a) Whether the
person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or
damage to another or another's property; and

(b) Whether the person
was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers at
the time of the offense.

(5) An offender
punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment and
treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6) The license,
permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs must:

(a) If the person's
alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the
person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test
result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has
been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or denied by the
department for ninety days;

(ii) Where there has
been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for two years; or

(iii) Where there have
been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for three years;

(b) If the person's
alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or if by reason of the person's
refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has
been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for one year;

(ii) Where there has
been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for nine hundred days; or

(iii) Where there have
been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for four years.

For purposes of this
subsection, the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under
RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.

(7) After expiration of
any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license,
permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall
place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW
46.20.355.

(8)(a) In addition to
any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section,
whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court shall also
suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding
five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i)
Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive
and proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a motor
vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more
within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of
his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a
law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose
conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device on the probationer's motor
vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions
that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon
violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.

(b) For each violation
of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii) or (a)(i) and (iii)
of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined
for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(c) For each incident
involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this
subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be
suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or
privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the
finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify the
department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(9) An additional
thirty days of imprisonment shall be added to any mandatory minimum jail
sentence required by this section for any person who, at the time of the
current offense, had as a passenger in the vehicle a child under the age of
ten.

(10) A court may
waive the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:

(a) The offender does
not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an
electronic home monitoring system;

(b) The offender does
not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c) The court
determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the
conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever the mandatory
minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver
is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive
consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to,
additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever the
combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence
would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail
portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or
alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination
does not exceed three hundred sixty-five days.

(((10))) (11)
An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory
minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by
the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in
RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(((11))) (12)
For purposes of this section:

(a) A "prior
offense" means any of the following:

(i) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii) A conviction for
a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug;

(v) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally
filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local
ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi) An out-of-state
conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii),
(iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this state;

(vii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the
deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520
or 46.61.522; and

(b)
"Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

--- END ---