BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that every individual possesses a fundamental right of privacy with respect to
his or her genetic information.

(1) It is the public
policy of the state of Washington that:

(a) Every individual
has the fundamental right to choose or refuse to release his or her genetic
information;

(b) The state shall not
deny or interfere with a person's fundamental right to choose or refuse to
release his or her genetic information; and

(c) The state shall not
discriminate against the exercise of these rights in the regulation or
provision of benefits, facilities, services, or information.

(2) It is the purpose
of this act to (a) protect the results of genetic tests as private information;
(b) prohibit discrimination based on genetic information; (c) prohibit
disclosure of genetic information without the consent of the person to whom the
information pertains; and (d) prohibit required genetic testing or the release
of genetic information as a condition of employment, real estate transactions, credit
transactions, or insurance.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.91.010 and 1953 c
87 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Terms used in this
section shall have the following definitions:

(1)(a) "Every
person" shall be construed to include any owner, lessee, proprietor,
manager, agent or employee whether one or more natural persons, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives,
trustees, receivers, of this state and its political subdivisions, boards and
commissions, engaged in or exercising control over the operation of any place
of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement.

(b) "Deny" is
hereby defined to include any act which directly or indirectly, or by
subterfuge, by a person or his agent or employee, results or is intended or
calculated to result in whole or in part in any discrimination, distinction,
restriction, or unequal treatment, or the requiring of any person to pay a
larger sum than the uniform rates charged other persons, or the refusing or
withholding from any person the admission, patronage, custom, presence,
frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging in any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement except for conditions and limitations established
by law and applicable alike to all persons, regardless of race, creed or color.

(c) "Full
enjoyment of" shall be construed to include the right to purchase any
service, commodity or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by,
any establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to
accommodations, advantages, facilities or privileges of any place of public
resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts directly
or indirectly causing persons of any particular race, creed or color, to be
treated as not welcome, accepted, desired or solicited.

(d) "Any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement" is hereby
defined to include, but not to be limited to, any public place, licensed or
unlicensed, kept for gain, hire or reward, or where charges are made for
admission, service, occupancy or use of any property or facilities, whether
conducted for the entertainment, housing or lodging of transient guests, or for
the benefit, use or accommodation of those seeking health, recreation or rest,
or for the sale of goods and merchandise, or for the rendering of personal
services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land, water or in the
air, including the stations and terminals thereof and the garaging of vehicles,
or where food or beverages of any kind are sold for consumption on the
premises, or where public amusement, entertainment, sports or recreation of any
kind is offered with or without charge, or where medical service or care is
made available, or where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for
amusement, recreation or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators and
public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more tenants,
or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library or any
educational institution wholly or partially supported by public funds, or
schools of special instruction, or nursery schools, or day care centers or
children's camps; nothing herein contained shall be construed to include, or
apply to, any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation, which is by
its nature distinctly private provided that where public use is permitted that
use shall be covered by this section; nor shall anything herein contained apply
to any educational facility operated or maintained by a bona fide religious or
sectarian institution; and the right of a natural parent in loco parentis
to direct the education and upbringing of a child under his control is hereby
affirmed.

(e) "Genetic
information" means information about genes, gene products, or inherited
characteristics, that may derive from an individual or a family member of such
individual and includes but is not limited to information derived from genetic
tests and information about a request for or the receipt of genetic services by
such individual or family member of such individual. "Genetic
information" also includes information about the occurrence of a disease
or disorder in family members.

(f) "Genetic
services" means health services, including genetic tests, provided to
obtain, assess, or interpret genetic information for diagnostic and therapeutic
purposes, and for genetic education and counseling.

(g) "Genetic
test" means the analysis of human DNA, RNA, mitochondrial DNA, chromosomes,
proteins, and certain metabolites in order to detect genotypes, mutations,
chromosomal damages, or the presence or absence of inherited or acquired
characteristics in genetic material.

(2) Every person who
denies to any other person because of race, creed, ((or)) color, or
genetic information, the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 3. RCW 9A.36.080 and 1993 c
127 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of malicious harassment if he or she maliciously and intentionally commits one
of the following acts because of his or her perception of the victim's race,
color, religion, ancestry, national origin, genetic information as defined
in RCW 9.91.010, gender, sexual orientation, or mental, physical, or
sensory handicap:

(a) Causes physical
injury to the victim or another person;

(b) Causes physical
damage to or destruction of the property of the victim or another person; or

(c) Threatens a
specific person or group of persons and places that person, or members of the
specific group of persons, in reasonable fear of harm to person or property.
The fear must be a fear that a reasonable person would have under all the
circumstances. For purposes of this section, a "reasonable person"
is a reasonable person who is a member of the victim's race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or who has the same genetic
characteristics or mental, physical, or sensory handicap as the victim.
Words alone do not constitute malicious harassment unless the context or
circumstances surrounding the words indicate the words are a threat.
Threatening words do not constitute malicious harassment if it is apparent to
the victim that the person does not have the ability to carry out the threat.

(2) In any prosecution
for malicious harassment, unless evidence exists which explains to the trier of
fact's satisfaction that the person did not intend to threaten the victim or
victims, the trier of fact may infer that the person intended to threaten a
specific victim or group of victims because of the person's perception of the
victim's or victims' race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender,
sexual orientation, or mental, physical, or sensory handicap if the person
commits one of the following acts:

(a) Burns a cross on
property of a victim who is or whom the actor perceives to be of African
American heritage; or

(b) Defaces property of
a victim who is or whom the actor perceives to be of Jewish heritage by
defacing the property with a swastika.

This subsection only
applies to the creation of a reasonable inference for evidentiary purposes.
This subsection does not restrict the state's ability to prosecute a person
under subsection (1) of this section when the facts of a particular case do not
fall within (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(3) It is not a defense
that the accused was mistaken that the victim was a member of a certain race,
color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or
had certain genetic characteristics or a mental, physical, or sensory
handicap.

(4) Evidence of
expressions or associations of the accused may not be introduced as substantive
evidence at trial unless the evidence specifically relates to the crime
charged. Nothing in this chapter shall affect the rules of evidence governing
impeachment of a witness.

(5) Every person who
commits another crime during the commission of a crime under this section may be
punished and prosecuted for the other crime separately.

(6) "Sexual
orientation" for the purposes of this section means heterosexuality,
homosexuality, or bisexuality.

(7) Malicious
harassment is a class C felony.

(8) The penalties
provided in this section for malicious harassment do not preclude the victims
from seeking any other remedies otherwise available under law.

(9) Nothing in this
section confers or expands any civil rights or protections to any group or
class identified under this section, beyond those rights or protections that
exist under the federal or state Constitution or the civil laws of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 4. RCW 26.26.100 and 1997 c
58 s 946 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court may, and
upon request of a party shall, require the child, mother, and any alleged or
presumed father who has been made a party to submit to blood tests or genetic
tests of blood, tissues, or other bodily fluids. If a party objects to a
proposed order requiring blood or genetic tests, the court shall require the
party making the allegation of possible paternity to provide sworn testimony,
by affidavit or otherwise, stating the facts upon which the allegation is
based. The court shall order blood or genetic tests if it appears that a
reasonable possibility exists that the requisite sexual contact occurred or
where nonpaternity is alleged, that the requisite sexual contact did not
occur. The tests shall be performed by an expert in paternity blood or genetic
testing appointed by the court. The expert's verified report identifying the
blood or genetic characteristics observed is admissible in evidence in any
hearing or trial in the parentage action, if (a) the alleged or presumed father
has had the opportunity to gain information about the security, validity, and
interpretation of the tests and the qualifications of any experts, and (b) the
report is accompanied by an affidavit from the expert which describes the
expert's qualifications as an expert and analyzes and interprets the results.
Verified documentation of the chain of custody of the blood or genetic samples
tested is admissible to establish the chain of custody. The court may consider
published sources as aids to interpretation of the test results.

(2)(a) Any objection to
genetic testing results must be made in writing and served upon the opposing
party, within twenty days before any hearing at which such results may be
introduced into evidence.

(b) If an objection is
not made as provided in this subsection, the test results are admissible as
evidence of paternity without the need for foundation testimony or other proof
of authenticity or accuracy.

(3) The court, upon
request by a party, shall order that additional blood or genetic tests be
performed by the same or other experts qualified in paternity blood or genetic
testing, if the party requesting additional tests advances the full costs of
the additional testing within a reasonable time. The court may order
additional testing without requiring that the requesting party advance the
costs only if another party agrees to advance the costs or if the court finds,
after hearing, that (a) the requesting party is indigent, and (b) the
laboratory performing the initial tests recommends additional testing or there
is substantial evidence to support a finding as to paternity contrary to the
initial blood or genetic test results. The court may later order any other
party to reimburse the party who advanced the costs of additional testing for
all or a portion of the costs.

(4) In all cases, the
court shall determine the number and qualifications of the experts.

(5) The court shall
not make available any genetic information, as defined in RCW 9.91.010,
obtained under the terms of this section for any purpose other than paternity
determination.

Sec. 5. RCW 35.81.170 and 1965 c
7 s 35.81.170 are each amended to read as follows:

For all of
the purposes of this chapter, no person shall, because of race, creed, color,
((or)) national origin, or genetic information as defined in RCW
9.91.010, be subjected to any discrimination.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.14.180 and 1959 c
1 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

No commissioner or any
other person, shall, ((by himself)) singly or in cooperation with
others, defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person in respect of his or her
right of examination or registration according to the rules and regulations, or
falsely mark, grade, estimate, or report upon the examination or proper
standing of any person examined, registered, or certified pursuant to this
chapter, or aid in so doing, or make any false representation concerning the
same, or concerning the person examined, or furnish any person any special or
secret information for the purpose of improving or injuring the prospects or
chances of any person so examined, registered or certified, or to be examined,
registered, or certified, or persuade any other person, or permit or aid in any
manner any other person to personate him or her, in connection with any
examination or registration of application or request to be examined or
registered.

The right of any person
to an appointment or promotion to any position in a sheriff's office shall not
be withheld because of ((his)) race, color, creed, national origin, genetic
information as defined in RCW 9.91.010, political affiliation or belief,
nor shall any person be dismissed, demoted, or reduced in grade for such
reason.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.01.100 and 1965 c
8 s 43.01.100 are each amended to read as follows:

The inclusion of any
question relative to an applicant's race ((or)), religion, or
genetic information as defined in RCW 9.91.010 in any application blank or
form for employment or license required to be filled in and submitted by an
applicant to any department, board, commission, officer, agent, or employee of
this state or the disclosure on any license of the race or religion of the
licensee is hereby prohibited.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 48.01 RCW to read as follows:

As used in this title:

(1) "Genetic
information" means information about genes, gene products, or inherited
characteristics, that may derive from an individual or a family member of such
individual and includes but is not limited to information derived from genetic
tests and information about a request for or the receipt of genetic services by
such individual or family member of such individual. "Genetic information"
also includes information about the occurrence of a disease or disorder in
family members.

(2) "Genetic
services" means health services, including genetic tests, provided to
obtain, assess, or interpret genetic information for diagnostic and therapeutic
purposes, and for genetic education and counseling.

(3) "Genetic
test" means the analysis of human DNA, RNA, mitochondrial DNA,
chromosomes, proteins, and certain metabolites in order to detect genotypes,
mutations, chromosomal damages, or the presence or absence of inherited or
acquired characteristics in genetic material.

Sec. 9. RCW 48.18.480 and 1957 c
193 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

No insurer shall make
or permit any unfair discrimination between insureds or subjects of insurance
having substantially like insuring, risk, and exposure factors, and expense
elements, in the terms or conditions of any insurance contract, or in the rate
or amount of premium charged therefor, or in the benefits payable or in any
other rights or privileges accruing thereunder. This provision shall not
prohibit fair discrimination by a life insurer as between individuals having
unequal expectation of life, except that insurers shall neither require nor
use genetic information as a basis for such discrimination.

Sec. 10. RCW 48.30.300 and 1993 c
492 s 287 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any
provision contained in Title 48 RCW to the contrary:

(1) No person or entity
engaged in the business of insurance in this state shall refuse to issue any
contract of insurance or cancel or decline to renew such contract because of
the sex ((or)), marital status, or genetic information of the
insured or prospective insured or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical handicap of the insured or prospective insured. The amount of
benefits payable, or any term, rate, condition, or type of coverage shall not
be restricted, modified, excluded, increased or reduced on the basis of the sex
((or)), marital status, or genetic information of the insured
or prospective insured, or be restricted, modified, excluded or reduced on
the basis of the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical handicap of the
insured or prospective insured. Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of
this section these provisions shall not prohibit fair discrimination on the
basis of sex, or marital status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical handicap when bona fide statistical differences in risk or exposure
have been substantiated, except that insurers shall neither require nor use
genetic information as a basis for such discrimination.

(2) With respect to
disability policies issued or renewed on and after July 1, 1994, that provide
coverage against loss arising from medical, surgical, hospital, or emergency
care services:

(a) Policies shall
guarantee continuity of coverage. Such provision, which shall be included in
every policy, shall provide that:

(i) The policy may be
canceled or nonrenewed without the prior written approval of the commissioner
only for nonpayment of premium or as permitted under RCW 48.18.090; and

(ii) The policy may be
canceled or nonrenewed because of a change in the physical or mental condition
or health of a covered person only with the prior written approval of the
commissioner. Such approval shall be granted only when the insurer has
discharged its obligation to continue coverage for such person by obtaining
coverage with another insurer, health care service contractor, or health
maintenance organization, which coverage is comparable in terms of premiums and
benefits as defined by rule of the commissioner.

(b) It is an unfair
practice for a disability insurer to modify the coverage provided or rates
applying to an in-force disability insurance policy and to fail to make such
modification in all such issued and outstanding policies.

(c) Subject to rules
adopted by the commissioner, it is an unfair practice for a disability insurer
to:

(i) Cease the sale of a
policy form unless it has received prior written authorization from the
commissioner and has offered all policyholders covered under such discontinued
policy the opportunity to purchase comparable coverage without health
screening; or

(ii) Engage in a
practice that subjects policyholders to rate increases on discontinued policy
forms unless such policyholders are offered the opportunity to purchase
comparable coverage without health screening.

The insurer may limit
an offer of comparable coverage without health screening to a period not less
than thirty days from the date the offer is first made.

Sec. 11. RCW 48.43.021 and 2000 c
79 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
required by statute or rule, a carrier and the Washington state health
insurance pool, and persons acting at the direction of or on behalf of a
carrier or the pool, who are in receipt of an enrollee's or applicant's
personally identifiable health information included in the standard health
questionnaire or any genetic information shall not disclose the
identifiable health or genetic information unless such disclosure is
explicitly authorized in writing by the person who is the subject of the
information.

Sec. 12. RCW 48.43.505 and 2000 c
5 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Health carriers and
insurers shall adopt policies and procedures that conform administrative,
business, and operational practices to protect an enrollee's right to privacy including
the privacy of genetic information or right to confidential health care
services granted under state or federal laws.

(2) The commissioner
may adopt rules to implement this section after considering relevant standards
adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations and the national
association of insurance commissioners, and after considering the effect of
those standards on the ability of carriers to undertake enrollee care
management and disease management programs.

Sec. 13. RCW 48.44.220 and 1983 c
154 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

No health care service
contractor shall deny coverage to any person solely on account of race,
religion, national origin, genetic information, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical handicap. Nothing in this section shall be
construed as limiting a health care service contractor's authority to deny or
otherwise limit coverage to a person when the person because of a medical
condition does not meet the essential eligibility requirements established by
the health care service contractor for purposes of determining coverage for any
person, except that health care service contractors shall neither require
nor use genetic information in determining coverage.

No health
care service contractor shall refuse to provide reimbursement or indemnity to
any person for covered health care services for reasons that the health care
services were provided by a holder of a license under chapter 18.22 RCW.

Sec. 14. RCW 48.46.370 and 1983 c
106 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

No health maintenance
organization may deny coverage to a person solely on account of the presence of
any sensory, mental, or physical handicap. Nothing in this section may be
construed as limiting a health maintenance organization's authority to deny or otherwise
limit coverage to a person when the person because of a medical condition does
not meet the essential eligibility requirements established by the health
maintenance organization for purposes of determining coverage for any person,
except that health maintenance organizations shall neither require nor use
genetic information in determining coverage for any person.

Sec. 15. RCW 49.60.010 and 1997 c
271 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall be
known as the "law against discrimination". It is an exercise of the
police power of the state for the protection of the public welfare, health, and
peace of the people of this state, and in fulfillment of the provisions of the
Constitution of this state concerning civil rights. The legislature hereby
finds and declares that practices of discrimination against any of its
inhabitants because of race, creed, color, national origin, genetic
information, families with children, sex, marital status, age, or the presence
of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a disabled person are a matter of state concern,
that such discrimination threatens not only the rights and proper privileges of
its inhabitants but menaces the institutions and foundation of a free
democratic state. A state agency is herein created with powers with respect to
elimination and prevention of discrimination in employment, in credit and
insurance transactions, in places of public resort, accommodation, or
amusement, and in real property transactions because of race, creed, color,
national origin, genetic information, families with children, sex,
marital status, age, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled
person; and the commission established hereunder is hereby given general
jurisdiction and power for such purposes.

Sec. 16. RCW 49.60.020 and 1993 c
510 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall be construed liberally for the accomplishment
of the purposes thereof. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to
repeal any of the provisions of any other law of this state relating to
discrimination because of race, color, creed, national origin, genetic
information, sex, marital status, age, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, other than a law which purports to require or
permit doing any act which is an unfair practice under this chapter. Nor shall
anything herein contained be construed to deny the right to any person to
institute any action or pursue any civil or criminal remedy based upon an
alleged violation of his or her civil rights.

Sec. 17. RCW 49.60.030 and 1997 c
271 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to be
free from discrimination because of race, creed, color, national origin, genetic
information, sex, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled
person is recognized as and declared to be a civil right. This right shall
include, but not be limited to:

(a) The right to obtain
and hold employment without discrimination;

(b) The right to the
full enjoyment of any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or
privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement;

(c) The right to engage
in real estate transactions without discrimination, including discrimination
against families with children;

(d) The right to engage
in credit transactions without discrimination;

(e) The right to engage
in insurance transactions or transactions with health maintenance organizations
without discrimination: PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under
RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice
for the purposes of this subparagraph; and

(f) The right to engage
in commerce free from any discriminatory boycotts or blacklists.
Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for purposes of this section shall be
defined as the formation or execution of any express or implied agreement,
understanding, policy or contractual arrangement for economic benefit between
any persons which is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United
States and which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly
or covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to restrict,
condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude any person or
persons from any business relationship on the basis of race, color, creed,
religion, genetic information, sex, the presence of any sensory, mental,
or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by
a disabled person, or national origin or lawful business relationship:
PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall prohibit the use of
boycotts as authorized by law pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor
practices.

(2) Any person deeming
himself or herself injured by any act in violation of this chapter shall have a
civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations,
or to recover the actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together
with the cost of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate
remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act of 1964
as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
3601 et seq.).

(3) Except for any
unfair practice committed by an employer against an employee or a prospective
employee, or any unfair practice in a real estate transaction which is the
basis for relief specified in the amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in
chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which
is committed in the course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer
Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that
chapter, a matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 18. RCW 49.60.040 and 1997 c
271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Person"
includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations, organizations,
corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives, trustees and receivers, or
any group of persons; it includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager,
agent, or employee, whether one or more natural persons; and further includes
any political or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or
instrumentality of the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof;

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state human rights commission;

(3)
"Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an employer,
directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons, and does not include
any religious or sectarian organization not organized for private profit;

(4)
"Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or her
parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any person;

(5) "Labor
organization" includes any organization which exists for the purpose, in
whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances or terms or
conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in connection
with employment;

(6) "Employment
agency" includes any person undertaking with or without compensation to
recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for an employer;

(7) "Marital
status" means the legal status of being married, single, separated,
divorced, or widowed;

(8) "National
origin" includes "ancestry";

(9) "Full
enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service, commodity, or
article of personal property offered or sold on, or by, any establishment to
the public, and the admission of any person to accommodations, advantages,
facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation,
assemblage, or amusement, without acts directly or indirectly causing persons
of any particular race, creed, color, sex, national origin, or with any
sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person, to be treated as not welcome, accepted,
desired, or solicited;

(10) "Any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement" includes, but is
not limited to, any place, licensed or unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or
reward, or where charges are made for admission, service, occupancy, or use of
any property or facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing,
or lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation of
those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or other
disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods, merchandise, services,
or personal property, or for the rendering of personal services, or for public
conveyance or transportation on land, water, or in the air, including the
stations and terminals thereof and the garaging of vehicles, or where food or
beverages of any kind are sold for consumption on the premises, or where public
amusement, entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or where the
public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement, recreation, or public
purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and public washrooms of buildings
and structures occupied by two or more tenants, or by the owner and one or more
tenants, or any public library or educational institution, or schools of
special instruction, or nursery schools, or day care centers or children's
camps: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed
to include or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of
accommodation, which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be covered
by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this definition apply to any educational
facility, columbarium, crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained
by a bona fide religious or sectarian institution;

(11) "Real
property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings, real estate, lands,
tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate cooperatives, condominiums, and
hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest therein;

(12) "Real estate
transaction" includes the sale, appraisal, brokering, exchange, purchase,
rental, or lease of real property, transacting or applying for a real estate
loan, or the provision of brokerage services;

(13)
"Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is
occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or
more families, and any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the
construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion
thereof;

(14) "Sex"
means gender;

(15) "Aggrieved
person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have been injured by an
unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b) believes that he or she
will be injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction that is
about to occur;

(16)
"Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real estate
transaction;

(17) "Respondent"
means any person accused in a complaint or amended complaint of an unfair
practice in a real estate transaction;

(18) "Credit
transaction" includes any open or closed end credit transaction, whether
in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction, credit card issue or
charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or for business purposes, in
which a service, finance, or interest charge is imposed, or which provides for
repayment in scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular
course of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending institutions of
whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or mercantile establishment
which as part of its ordinary business permits or provides that payment for
purchases of property or service therefrom may be deferred;

(19) "Families
with children status" means one or more individuals who have not attained
the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a parent or another person
having legal custody of such individual or individuals, or with the designee of
such parent or other person having such legal custody, with the written permission
of such parent or other person. Families with children status also applies to
any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of
any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years;

(20) "Covered
multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings consisting of four or more
dwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and (b) ground
floor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of four or more dwelling
units;

(21)
"Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components,
or elements of a building, including individual dwelling units and the public
and common use areas of a building;

(22) "Dog
guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of guiding blind
persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of assisting hearing impaired
persons;

(23) "Service
animal" means an animal that is trained for the purpose of assisting or
accommodating a disabled person's sensory, mental, or physical disability;

(24) "Genetic
information" means information about genes, gene products, or inherited
characteristics, that may derive from an individual or a family member of such
individual and includes but is not limited to information derived from genetic
tests and information about a request for or the receipt of genetic services by
such individual or family member of such individual. "Genetic
information" also includes information about the occurrence of a disease
or disorder in family members;

(25) "Genetic
services" means health services, including genetic tests, provided to
obtain, assess, or interpret genetic information for diagnostic and therapeutic
purposes, and for genetic education and counseling;

(26) "Genetic
test" means the analysis of human DNA, RNA, mitochondrial DNA,
chromosomes, proteins, and certain metabolites in order to detect genotypes,
mutations, chromosomal damages, or the presence or absence of inherited or
acquired characteristics in genetic material.

Sec. 19. RCW 49.60.175 and 1997 c
271 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall
be an unfair practice to use the sex, race, creed, color, national origin, genetic
information, marital status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability of any person, or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person, concerning an application for credit in any credit
transaction to determine the credit worthiness of an applicant.

Sec. 20. RCW 49.60.176 and 1997 c
271 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair
practice for any person whether acting for himself, herself, or another in
connection with any credit transaction because of race, creed, color, national
origin, genetic information, sex, marital status, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person:

(a) To deny credit to
any person;

(b) To increase the
charges or fees for or collateral required to secure any credit extended to any
person;

(c) To restrict the
amount or use of credit extended or to impose different terms or conditions
with respect to the credit extended to any person or any item or service
related thereto;

(d) To attempt to do
any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2) Nothing in this
section shall prohibit any party to a credit transaction from considering the
credit history of any individual applicant.

(3)
Further, nothing in this section shall prohibit any party to a credit
transaction from considering the application of the community property law to
the individual case or from taking reasonable action thereon.

Sec. 21. RCW 49.60.178 and 1997 c
271 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair
practice for any person whether acting for himself, herself, or another in
connection with an insurance transaction or transaction with a health
maintenance organization to cancel or fail or refuse to issue or renew insurance
or a health maintenance agreement to any person because of sex, marital status,
race, creed, color, national origin, genetic information, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a disabled person: PROVIDED, That a practice
which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not
constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of this section. For the
purposes of this section, "insurance transaction" is defined in RCW
48.01.060, health maintenance agreement is defined in RCW 48.46.020, and
"health maintenance organization" is defined in RCW 48.46.020.

The fact that such
unfair practice may also be a violation of chapter 48.30, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW
does not constitute a defense to an action brought under this section.

The
insurance commissioner, under RCW 48.30.300, and the human rights commission,
under chapter 49.60 RCW, shall have concurrent jurisdiction under this section
and shall enter into a working agreement as to procedure to be followed in
complaints under this section.

Sec. 22. RCW 49.60.180 and 1997 c
271 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair
practice for any employer:

(1) To refuse to hire
any person because of age, sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national
origin, genetic information, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification:
PROVIDED, That the prohibition against discrimination because of such
disability shall not apply if the particular disability prevents the proper
performance of the particular worker involved.

(2) To discharge or bar
any person from employment because of age, sex, marital status, race, creed,
color, national origin, genetic information, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person.

(3) To discriminate
against any person in compensation or in other terms or conditions of
employment because of age, sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national
origin, genetic information, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person: PROVIDED, That it shall not be an unfair practice for an
employer to segregate washrooms or locker facilities on the basis of sex, or to
base other terms and conditions of employment on the sex of employees where the
commission by regulation or ruling in a particular instance has found the
employment practice to be appropriate for the practical realization of equality
of opportunity between the sexes.

(4) To print, or circulate,
or cause to be printed or circulated any statement, advertisement, or
publication, or to use any form of application for employment, or to make any
inquiry in connection with prospective employment, which expresses any
limitation, specification, or discrimination as to age, sex, marital status,
race, creed, color, national origin, genetic information, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a disabled person, or any intent to make any
such limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona
fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall
prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

(5) To offer a
person an inducement to undergo a genetic test or otherwise disclose genetic
information; to question a person about his or her genetic information; to
solicit submission to, require, or administer a genetic test to any person as a
condition of employment; or to collect, solicit, or require disclosure of
genetic information from any person as a condition of employment.

Sec. 23. RCW 49.60.190 and 1997 c
271 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice
for any labor union or labor organization:

(1) To deny membership
and full membership rights and privileges to any person because of age, sex,
marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, genetic information,
or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person.

(2) To expel from
membership any person because of age, sex, marital status, race, creed, color,
national origin, genetic information, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person.

(3) To discriminate
against any member, employer, employee, or other person to whom a duty of
representation is owed because of age, sex, marital status, race, creed, color,
national origin, genetic information, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person.

(4) To
offer a person an inducement to undergo a genetic test or otherwise disclose
genetic information; to question a person about his or her genetic information;
to solicit submission to, require, or administer a genetic test to any person
as a condition of membership; or to collect, solicit, or require disclosure of
genetic information from any person as a condition of membership.

Sec. 24. RCW 49.60.200 and 1997 c
271 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair
practice for any employment agency:

(1) To fail or
refuse to classify properly or refer for employment, or otherwise to
discriminate against, an individual because of age, sex, marital status, race,
creed, color, national origin, genetic information, or the presence of
any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide
or service animal by a disabled person, or to print or circulate, or cause to
be printed or circulated any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to
use any form of application for employment, or to make any inquiry in
connection with prospective employment, which expresses any limitation,
specification or discrimination as to age, sex, race, creed, color, or national
origin, genetic information, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, or any intent to make any such limitation, specification, or
discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification:
PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall prohibit advertising in a foreign
language.

(2) To
offer a person an inducement to undergo a genetic test or otherwise disclose
genetic information; to question a person about his or her genetic information;
to solicit submission to, require, or administer a genetic test to any person
as a condition of employment classification, assignment, or referral; or to
collect, solicit, or require disclosure of genetic information from any person
as a condition of employment classification, assignment, or referral.

Sec. 25. RCW 49.60.215 and 1997 c
271 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall
be an unfair practice for any person or the person's agent or employee to
commit an act which directly or indirectly results in any distinction,
restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of any person to pay a larger
sum than the uniform rates charged other persons, or the refusing or
withholding from any person the admission, patronage, custom, presence,
frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging in any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, except for conditions and limitations
established by law and applicable to all persons, regardless of race, creed,
color, national origin, genetic information, sex, the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be
construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make
any place accessible to a disabled person except as otherwise required by law:
PROVIDED, That behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or other
persons can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair practice.

Sec. 26. RCW 49.60.222 and 1997 c
400 s 3 and 1997 c 271 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair
practice for any person, whether acting for himself, herself, or another,
because of sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, genetic
information, families with children status, the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person:

(a) To refuse to engage
in a real estate transaction with a person;

(b) To discriminate
against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of a real estate
transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection
therewith;

(c) To refuse to
receive or to fail to transmit a bona fide offer to engage in a real estate
transaction from a person;

(d) To refuse to
negotiate for a real estate transaction with a person;

(e) To represent to a
person that real property is not available for inspection, sale, rental, or
lease when in fact it is so available, or to fail to bring a property listing
to his or her attention, or to refuse to permit the person to inspect real
property;

(f) To discriminate in
the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling, to any
person; or to a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling
after it is sold, rented, or made available; or to any person associated with
the person buying or renting;

(g) To make, print,
circulate, post, or mail, or cause to be so made or published a statement,
advertisement, or sign, or to use a form of application for a real estate
transaction, or to make a record or inquiry in connection with a prospective
real estate transaction, which indicates, directly or indirectly, an intent to
make a limitation, specification, or discrimination with respect thereto;

(h) To offer, solicit,
accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the understanding that a
person may be discriminated against in a real estate transaction or in the
furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;

(i) To expel a person
from occupancy of real property;

(j) To discriminate in
the course of negotiating, executing, or financing a real estate transaction
whether by mortgage, deed of trust, contract, or other instrument imposing a
lien or other security in real property, or in negotiating or executing any
item or service related thereto including issuance of title insurance, mortgage
insurance, loan guarantee, or other aspect of the transaction. Nothing in this
section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.176 relating to unfair practices in
credit transactions; or

(k) To attempt to do
any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2) For the purposes of
this chapter discrimination based on the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
blind, deaf, or physically disabled person includes:

(a) A refusal to
permit, at the expense of the disabled person, reasonable modifications of
existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such
modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the
dwelling, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is
reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter
agreeing to restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed
before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;

(b) To refuse to make
reasonable accommodation in rules, policies, practices, or services when such
accommodations may be necessary to afford a person with the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled person equal
opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

(c) To fail to design
and construct covered multifamily dwellings and premises in conformance with
the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.)
and all other applicable laws or regulations pertaining to access by persons
with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or use of a trained dog guide
or service animal. Whenever the requirements of applicable laws or regulations
differ, the requirements which require greater accessibility for persons with
any sensory, mental, or physical disability shall govern.

Nothing in (a) or (b)
of this subsection shall apply to: (i) A single-family house rented or leased
by the owner if the owner does not own or have an interest in the proceeds of
the rental or lease of more than three such single-family houses at one time,
the rental or lease occurred without the use of a real estate broker or
salesperson, as defined in RCW 18.85.010, and the rental or lease occurred
without the publication, posting, or mailing of any advertisement, sign, or
statement in violation of subsection (1)(g) of this section; or (ii) rooms or
units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to be
occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other if
the owner maintains and occupies one of the rooms or units as his or her
residence.

(3) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice or a denial
of civil rights for any public or private educational institution to separate
the sexes or give preference to or limit use of dormitories, residence halls,
or other student housing to persons of one sex or to make distinctions on the
basis of marital or families with children status.

(4) Except pursuant to
subsection (2)(a) of this section, this section shall not be construed to
require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make facilities
accessible to a disabled person except as otherwise required by law. Nothing
in this section affects the rights, responsibilities, and remedies of landlords
and tenants pursuant to chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, including the right to post
and enforce reasonable rules of conduct and safety for all tenants and their
guests, provided that chapters 59.18 and 59.20 RCW are only affected to the
extent they are inconsistent with the nondiscrimination requirements of this
chapter. Nothing in this section limits the applicability of any reasonable
federal, state, or local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants
permitted to occupy a dwelling.

(5) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice for any
public establishment providing for accommodations offered for the full
enjoyment of transient guests as defined by RCW 9.91.010(1)(c) to make
distinctions on the basis of families with children status. Nothing in this
section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair practices in
places of public accommodation.

(6) Nothing in this
chapter prohibiting discrimination based on families with children status
applies to housing for older persons as defined by the federal fair housing
amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by
the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December
28, 1995. Nothing in this chapter authorizes requirements for housing for
older persons different than the requirements in the federal fair housing
amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by
the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December
28, 1995.

Sec. 27. RCW 49.60.223 and 1997 c
271 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an
unfair practice for any person, for profit, to induce or attempt to induce any
person to sell or rent any real property by representations regarding the entry
or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons because
of ((a particular)) race, creed, color, sex, national origin, genetic
information, families with children status, or with any sensory, mental, or
physical disability and/or because of the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled person.

Sec. 28. RCW 49.60.224 and 1997 c
271 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every provision in
a written instrument relating to real property which purports to forbid or
restrict the conveyance, encumbrance, occupancy, or lease thereof to
individuals because of ((a specified)) race, creed, color, sex,
national origin, genetic information, families with children status, or
with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled person, and
every condition, restriction, or prohibition, including a right of entry or
possibility of reverter, which directly or indirectly limits the use or
occupancy of real property on the basis of race, creed, color, sex, national
origin, genetic information, families with children status, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled person is
void.

(2) It is
an unfair practice to insert in a written instrument relating to real property
a provision that is void under this section or to honor or attempt to honor
such a provision in the chain of title.

Sec. 29. RCW 49.60.225 and 1997 c
271 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a reasonable
cause determination has been made under RCW 49.60.240 that an unfair practice
in a real estate transaction has been committed and a finding has been made
that the respondent has engaged in any unfair practice under RCW 49.60.250, the
administrative law judge shall promptly issue an order for such relief suffered
by the aggrieved person as may be appropriate, which may include actual damages
as provided by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
3601 et seq.), and injunctive or other equitable relief. Such order may, to
further the public interest, assess a civil penalty against the respondent:

(a) In an amount up to
ten thousand dollars if the respondent has not been determined to have
committed any prior unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(b) In an amount up to
twenty-five thousand dollars if the respondent has been determined to have
committed one other unfair practice in a real estate transaction during the
five-year period ending on the date of the filing of this charge; or

(c) In an amount up to
fifty thousand dollars if the respondent has been determined to have committed
two or more unfair practices in a real estate transaction during the seven-year
period ending on the date of the filing of this charge, for loss of the right
secured by RCW 49.60.010, 49.60.030, 49.60.040, and 49.60.222 through
49.60.224, as now or hereafter amended, to be free from discrimination in real
property transactions because of sex, marital status, race, creed, color,
national origin, genetic information, families with children status, or
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled
person. Enforcement of the order and appeal therefrom by the complainant or
respondent may be made as provided in RCW 49.60.260 and 49.60.270. If acts
constituting the unfair practice in a real estate transaction that is the
object of the charge are determined to have been committed by the same natural
person who has been previously determined to have committed acts constituting
an unfair practice in a real estate transaction, then the civil penalty of up
to fifty thousand dollars may be imposed without regard to the period of time within
which any subsequent unfair practice in a real estate transaction occurred.
All civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the state
treasury and credited to the general fund.

(2) Such order shall
not affect any contract, sale, conveyance, encumbrance, or lease consummated
before the issuance of an order that involves a bona fide purchaser,
encumbrancer, or tenant who does not have actual notice of the charge filed
under this chapter.

(3)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, persons awarded damages
under this section may not receive additional damages pursuant to RCW
49.60.250.

Sec. 30. RCW 70.02.010 and 1993 c
448 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Audit"
means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or investigation of a health
care provider by a person not employed by or affiliated with the provider to
determine compliance with:

(a) Statutory,
regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific standards;

(b) A private or public
program of payments to a health care provider; or

(c) Requirements for
licensing, accreditation, or certification.

(2) "Directory
information" means information disclosing the presence, and for the
purpose of identification, the name, residence, sex, and the general health
condition of a particular patient who is a patient in a health care facility or
who is currently receiving emergency health care in a health care facility.

(3) "General
health condition" means the patient's health status described in terms of
"critical," "poor," "fair," "good,"
"excellent," or terms denoting similar conditions.

(4) "Genetic
information" means information about genes, gene products, or inherited
characteristics, that may derive from an individual or a family member of such
individual and includes but is not limited to information derived from genetic
tests and information about a request for or the receipt of genetic services by
such individual or family member of such individual. "Genetic
information" also includes information about the occurrence of a disease
or disorder in family members.

(5) "Genetic
services" means health services, including genetic tests, provided to
obtain, assess, or interpret genetic information for diagnostic and therapeutic
purposes, and for genetic education and counseling.

(6) "Genetic
test" means the analysis of human DNA, RNA, mitochondrial DNA,
chromosomes, proteins, and certain metabolites in order to detect genotypes,
mutations, chromosomal damages, or the presence or absence of inherited or
acquired characteristics in genetic material.

(7) "Health
care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by a health care
provider:

(a) To diagnose, treat,
or maintain a patient's physical or mental condition; or

(b) That affects the
structure or any function of the human body.

(((5))) (8)
"Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home,
laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care provider provides
health care to patients.

(((6))) (9)
"Health care information" means any information, whether oral or
recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can readily be associated
with the identity of a patient and directly relates to the patient's health
care. The term includes genetic information and any record of
disclosures of health care information.

(((7))) (10)
"Health care provider" means a person who is licensed, certified,
registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health
care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(((8))) (11)
"Institutional review board" means any board, committee, or other
group formally designated by an institution, or authorized under federal or
state law, to review, approve the initiation of, or conduct periodic review of
research programs to assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human
research subjects.

(((9))) (12)
"Maintain," as related to health care information, means to hold,
possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that information.

(((10))) (13)
"Patient" means an individual who receives or has received health
care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received health care.

(((11))) (14)
"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(((12))) (15)
"Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or searching the
record, but shall not exceed sixty-five cents per page for the first thirty
pages and fifty cents per page for all other pages. In addition, a clerical
fee for searching and handling may be charged not to exceed fifteen dollars.
These amounts shall be adjusted biennially in accordance with changes in the
consumer price index, all consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan
statistical area as determined by the secretary of health. However, where
editing of records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done
by the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge for a
basic office visit.

(((13)))
(16) "Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under
Title 48 RCW authorized to transact business in this state or other
jurisdiction, including a health care service contractor, and health
maintenance organization; or an employee welfare benefit plan; or a state or
federal health benefit program.

---
END ---