BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This chapter shall be
known as "the

_6 student improvement tuition scholarship program."

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in
this section apply

_8 throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires

_9 otherwise.

10 (1) "Eligible student" means a child
enrolled in a public

11 school who is experiencing academic or behavioral
difficulties at

12 the public school in which the child is enrolled.

13 (2) "Parent" means either or both parents
of a child or the

14 child's legal guardian.

15 (3) "Eligible private school" means any
private school approved

16 by the state board of education.

p. 1 SB
5666

_1 (4) "Student improvement tuition scholarship
student" means an

_2 eligible student whose parents have received a student
improvement

_3 tuition scholarship.

_4 (5) "Student improvement tuition
scholarship" means the lesser

_5 amount between the cost of tuition at the eligible
private school

_6 chosen to redeem the scholarship and up to ninety-three
percent of

_7 the state-appropriated basic education funds and any
learning

_8 assistance program, transitional bilingual instruction
program,

_9 special education program, and highly capable program
funds that

10 were generated by the eligible student when enrolled in
the public

11 school, prorated for the amount of time the student is
enrolled in

12 an eligible private school. The sole acceptable use of
the student

13 improvement tuition scholarship funds is application
towards the

14 cost of tuition at an eligible private school. A single
scholarship

15 cannot extend beyond one school year. However, eligible
students

16 may apply for a scholarship in consecutive school years.

17 (6) "Assisting payments" means the
following:

18 (a) When the tuition at the eligible private school
chosen to

19 redeem the student improvement tuition scholarship is
less than

20 the maximum amount available for the scholarship, then
the

21 assisting payments are equal to the difference between
the tuition

22 and the state-appropriated basic education funds and any
learning

23 assistance program, transitional bilingual instruction
program,

24 special education program, and highly capable program
funds that

25 were generated by the eligible student when enrolled in
the public

26 school, prorated for the amount of time the student is
enrolled in

27 an eligible private school; or

28 (b) When the tuition at the eligible private school
that is

29 chosen to redeem the student improvement tuition
scholarship is

30 greater than the maximum amount available for the
scholarship,

31 then the assisting payments are equal to up to seven
percent of

32 the state-appropriated basic education funds and any
learning

33 assistance program, transitional bilingual instruction
program,

34 special education program, and highly capable program
funds that

35 were generated by the eligible student when enrolled in
the public

36 school, prorated for the amount of time the student is
enrolled in

37 an eligible private school.

SB 5666 p. 2

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Beginning in the
2001-02 school year, to

_2 the extent funds are appropriated, the superintendent of
public

_3 instruction shall make student improvement tuition
scholarships

_4 available to the parent of an eligible student to be
used toward

_5 the payment of the tuition of the eligible student at an
eligible

_6 private school.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The superintendent of
public instruction

_8 shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to
implement

_9 this chapter. The rules shall include a process and
criteria for

10 accepting student improvement tuition scholarship
applications

11 from the parent of eligible students.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Private schools
accepting student

13 improvement tuition scholarship students shall report
the number

14 of student improvement tuition scholarship students
monthly,

15 October through June, to the superintendent of public

16 instruction. Reports shall show the total number of
student

17 improvement tuition scholarship students served, the
name of each

18 student, and the hours of enrollment of each student per
week.

19 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Based upon the
reports submitted under

20 section 5 of this act, the superintendent shall make the
following

21 payments:

22 (1) Monthly student improvement tuition scholarship
payments to

23 the parent of student improvement tuition scholarship
students

24 enrolled in eligible private schools; and

25 (2) Monthly assisting payments to the public school
district

26 the student improvement tuition scholarship student
transferred

27 from to attend the eligible private school.

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Each school district
shall annually

29 provide general information regarding the student
improvement

30 tuition scholarship program to the parent of all
students of the

31 school district.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act is necessary
for the immediate

p. 3 SB
5666

_1 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

_2 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

_3 takes effect immediately.

_4

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8
of this act

_6 constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5666 p. 4