BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.400.100 and 1977
ex.s. c 272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

School districts may
employ public school principals and/or vice principals to supervise the
operation and management of the school to which they are assigned. Such
persons shall hold valid ((teacher and administrative certificates)) administrative
certificates but shall not be required to hold teacher certificates when
employed primarily as a school principal or vice principal. In addition to
such other duties as shall be prescribed by law and by the job description
adopted by the board of directors, each principal shall:

(1) Assume
administrative authority, responsibility and instructional leadership, under
the supervision of the school district superintendent, and in accordance with
the policies of the school district board of directors, for the planning,
management, supervision and evaluation of the educational program of the
attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

(2) Submit
recommendations to the school district superintendent regarding appointment,
assignment, promotion, transfer and dismissal of all personnel assigned to the
attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

(3) Submit
recommendations to the school district superintendent regarding the fiscal
needs to maintain and improve the instructional program of the attendance area
for which he or she is responsible.

(4) Assume
administrative authority and responsibility for the supervision, counseling and
discipline of pupils in the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

--- END ---