BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All machinery and
equipment owned by a farmer and used exclusively in farming activities is
exempt from property taxes levied for any state purpose.

(2) "Farmer"
means any person, as defined in RCW 82.04.213, engaged solely or primarily in
the business of growing or producing any agricultural product for sale.
"Farmer" does not include:

(a) Persons using
agricultural products as ingredients in a manufacturing process;

(b) Persons selling any
animal or animal substance in connection with the business of operating a
stockyard, slaughterhouse, or packinghouse; or

(c) Persons in the
business of taking, cultivating, or raising timber.

(3)(a) "Farming
activity" includes, but is not limited to, the business of producing
agricultural products as defined in RCW 82.04.213.

(b) The term
"farming activity" does not mean processing for sale or handling for
sale a commodity or product grown or produced by a person other than the farmer
or the farmer's employees.

(4) A claim for
exemption under this section shall be filed with the county assessor together
with the verified statement required under RCW 84.40.190, for exemption from
taxes payable the following year. The claim shall be made solely upon forms as
prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.48.080 and 1997 c
3 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Annually during the
months of September and October, the department of revenue shall examine and
compare the returns of the assessment of the property in the several counties
of the state, and the assessment of the property of railroad and other
companies assessed by the department, and proceed to equalize the same, so that
each county in the state shall pay its due and just proportion of the taxes for
state purposes for such assessment year, according to the ratio the assessed
valuation of the property in each county bears to the correct total assessed
valuation of all property in the state.

First. The department
shall classify all property, real and personal, and shall raise and lower the
assessed valuation of any class of property in any county to a value that shall
be equal, so far as possible, to the correct assessed value of such class as of
January 1st of the current year, after determining the correct appraised value,
and any adjustment applicable under RCW 84.40.0305 for the property, for the
purpose of ascertaining the just amount of tax due from each county for state
purposes. In equalizing personal property as of January 1st of the current
year, the department shall use the assessment level of the preceding year.
Such classification may be on the basis of types of property, geographical areas,
or both. For purposes of this section, for each county that has not provided
the department with an assessment return by December 1st, the department shall
proceed, using facts and information and in a manner it deems appropriate, to
estimate the value of each class of property in the county.

Second. The department
shall keep a full record of its proceedings and the same shall be published
annually by the department.

(2) The department
shall levy the state taxes authorized by law. The amount levied in any one
year for general state purposes shall not exceed the lawful dollar rate on the
dollar of the assessed value of the property of the entire state as equalized
under this section. The department shall apportion the amount of tax for state
purposes levied by the department, among the several counties, in proportion to
the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county for the year as
equalized by the department: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this
apportionment, the department shall recompute the previous year's levy and the
apportionment thereof to correct for changes and errors in taxable values
reported to the department after October 1 of the preceding year and shall
adjust the apportioned amount of the current year's state levy for each county
by the difference between the apportioned amounts established by the original
and revised levy computations for the previous year. For purposes of this
section, changes in taxable values mean a final adjustment made by a county
board of equalization, the state board of tax appeals, or a court of competent
jurisdiction and shall include additions of omitted property, other additions
or deletions from the assessment or tax rolls, any assessment return provided
by a county to the department subsequent to December 1st, or a change in the
indicated ratio of a county. Errors in taxable values mean errors corrected by
a final reviewing body.

In addition to
computing a levy under this subsection ((that is reduced under RCW 84.55.012)),
the department shall compute a hypothetical levy at the rate authorized in
RCW 84.52.065 without regard to ((the)) any reduction ((under
RCW 84.55.012)) or restriction otherwise provided by law. This
hypothetical levy shall also be apportioned among the several counties in
proportion to the valuation of the taxable property of the county for the year,
as equalized by the department, in the same manner as the actual levy and shall
be used by the county assessors for the purpose of recomputing and establishing
a consolidated levy under RCW 84.52.010.

In computing the
levy under this subsection, the department shall include the value of any
property exempted under section 1 of this act.

(3) The department
shall have authority to adopt rules and regulations to enforce obedience to its
orders in all matters in relation to the returns of county assessments, the
equalization of values, and the apportionment of the state levy by the
department.

(4) After the
completion of the duties prescribed in this section, the director of the
department shall certify the record of the proceedings of the department under
this section, the tax levies made for state purposes and the apportionment
thereof among the counties, and the certification shall be available for public
inspection.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.52.010 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as is permitted
under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in specific amounts.

The rate percent of all
taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts
coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and fixed by the
county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by
law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for
purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be determined, calculated
and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
taxing districts respectively.

When a county assessor
finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to
the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the
limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor shall recompute
and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1) The full certified
rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, and city or town
purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the
limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take precedence
over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that
required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW
84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district
that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these
levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated.

(2) The certified rates
of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts
imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to
bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:

(a) First, the
certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized
under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated;

(b) Second, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c) Third, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire
protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars
of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d) Fourth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(e) Fifth, if the
consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified
property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In determining whether
the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the
limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in
that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as
apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to ((the)) any reduction ((under RCW
84.55.012)) or restriction otherwise provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2003 and every year thereafter.

---
END ---