BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.522 and 1996 c
199 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of vehicular assault if he operates or drives any vehicle:

(a) In a reckless
manner, and this conduct is the proximate cause of serious bodily injury to
another; ((or))

(b) While under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW 46.61.502, and
this conduct is the proximate cause of serious bodily injury to another; or

(c) With disregard
for the safety of others, and this conduct is the proximate cause of serious
bodily injury to another.

(2) "Serious
bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves a substantial risk of
death, serious permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any part or organ of the body.

(3)
Vehicular assault is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---