BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.60.040 and 1998
c 213 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be
unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in a reckless manner.

(2) ((It shall be a
violation for a person to operate a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug. A person is considered to be under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug if:

(a) The person has
0.08 grams or more of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath, as shown by
analysis of the person's breath made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b) The person has
0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the person's blood, as shown by
analysis of the person's blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(c) The person is
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or

(d) The person is
under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any
drug.

The fact that any
person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use
such drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against
any charge of violating this section. A person cited under this subsection may
upon request be given a breath test for breath alcohol or may request to have a
blood sample taken for blood alcohol analysis. An arresting officer shall
administer field sobriety tests when circumstances permit.

(3))) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor,
punishable as provided under RCW 9.92.030. In addition, the court may order
the defendant to pay restitution for any damages or injuries resulting from the
offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A person is guilty of
operating a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
if the person operates a vessel within this state:

(a) And the person has,
within two hours after operating a vessel, an alcohol concentration at or above
the amount specified in RCW 46.61.502 as shown by analysis of the person's
breath or blood made under section 7 of this act; or

(b) While the person is
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or

(c) While the person is
under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any
drug.

(2) The fact that a
person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use
a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against a
charge of violating this section.

(3) It is an
affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section which
the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of operating a vessel
and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to
cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be at or above the amount
specified in RCW 46.61.502 within two hours after operating a vessel. The
court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies
the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the
defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4) Analyses of blood
or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged operating a
vessel may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged operating a
vessel, a person had an alcohol concentration at or above the amount specified
in RCW 46.61.502 in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any
case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be
used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b) or (c) of
this section.

(5) A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor punishable under section 5 of this act if the
person was operating, at the time of the violation, a vessel equipped with a
motor or other propulsion machinery of more than two horsepower, or any
sailboat; and a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9.92.030 if the person was
operating, at the time of the violation, any other vessel. In addition, the court
may order the defendant to pay restitution for any damages or injuries
resulting from the offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this title, a person is guilty of operating a vessel after
consuming alcohol if the person operates a vessel within this state and the
person:

(a) Is under the age of
twenty-one;

(b) Has, within two
hours after operating the vessel, an alcohol concentration of at least 0.02 but
less than the concentration specified in RCW 46.61.502, as shown by analysis of
the person's breath or blood made under section 7 of this act.

(2) It is an
affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1) of this section which the
defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of operating a vessel
and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to
cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be in violation of subsection
(1) of this section within two hours after operating a vessel. The court shall
not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the
prosecution prior to the earlier of: (a) Seven days prior to trial; or (b) the
omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the
affirmative defense.

(3) Analyses of blood
or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged operating a
vessel may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged operating a
vessel, a person had an alcohol concentration in violation of subsection (1) of
this section.

(4) A violation of this
section is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1)(a) In addition to
penalties set forth in section 5 of this act, a one hundred twenty-five dollar
fee shall be assessed to a person who is either convicted, sentenced to a
lesser charge, or given deferred prosecution, as a result of an arrest for
violating section 2 of this act. This fee is for the purpose of funding the
Washington state toxicology laboratory and local government for grants and
activities to increase the conviction rate and decrease the incidence of
persons operating vessels under the influence of alcohol or drugs.

(b) Upon a verified
petition by the person assessed the fee, the court may suspend payment of all
or part of the fee if it finds that the person does not have the ability to
pay.

(c) When a minor has
been adjudicated a juvenile offender for an offense which, if committed by an
adult, would constitute a violation of section 2 of this act, the court shall
assess the one hundred twenty-five dollar fee under (a) of this subsection.
Upon a verified petition by a minor assessed the fee, the court may suspend
payment of all or part of the fee if it finds that the minor does not have the
ability to pay the fee.

(2) The fee assessed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be collected by the clerk of the
court and distributed as follows:

(a) Ninety percent
shall be subject to distribution under RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, 35.20.220,
3.62.020, 3.62.040, or 10.82.070.

(b) The remainder of
the fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the death
investigations account to be used solely for funding the state toxicology
laboratory blood or breath testing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) A person who is
convicted of a gross misdemeanor violation of section 2 of this act and who has
no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to section 10
of this act there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of
the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that
the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial
risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum
sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension
or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than
fifteen days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of
electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may
consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to section 10 of this act
there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than two days nor more than one year. Two consecutive days of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may order not
less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent.

(2) A person who is
convicted of a gross misdemeanor violation of section 2 of this act and who has
one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to section 10
of this act there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed
shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic
home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to section 10 of this act
there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment
and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(3) A person who is
convicted of a gross misdemeanor violation of section 2 of this act and who has
two or more prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to section 10
of this act there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one hundred twenty days of
electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and
one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One
thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to section 10 of this act
there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one year and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. One hundred
twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(4) In exercising its
discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the
court shall particularly consider whether the person's vessel operation at the
time of the offense was responsible for injury or damage to another or
another's property.

(5) An offender
punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment and
treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6) An offender
punishable under subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall be required by the
court to complete a course in boating safety approved by the commission
pursuant to section 6 of this act.

(7)(a) In addition to
any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section,
whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court shall also
suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding
five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i)
Not operating a vessel within this state while having an alcohol concentration
of 0.08 or more within two hours after operating a vessel; and (ii) not
refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol
concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable
grounds to believe the person was operating a vessel within this state while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of
probation that include nonrepetition, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised
probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be
imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during
the suspension period.

(b) For each violation
of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection,
the court shall order the convicted person to be confined for thirty days,
which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(8) A court may waive
the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:

(a) The offender does
not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an
electronic home monitoring system;

(b) The offender does
not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c) The court
determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the
conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever the mandatory
minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver
is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive
consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to,
additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever the
combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence
would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail
portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or
alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination
does not exceed three hundred sixty-five days.

(9) An offender serving
a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has
expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail
administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW
9.94A.150(4).

(10) For purposes of
this section:

(a) A "prior
offense" means any of the following:

(i) A conviction for a
violation of section 2 of this act or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii) An out-of-state
conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i) of this
subsection if committed in this state; or

(iii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
section 2 of this act or an equivalent local ordinance.

(b) "Within seven
years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within seven
years of the arrest for the current offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The commission shall
prescribe standards for approval of boating safety courses qualifying for
referral of offenders pursuant to section 5 of this act. The commission shall
adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) Upon the trial of any
civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been
committed by any person while operating a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, if the person's alcohol concentration is less
than the amount specified in RCW 46.61.502, it is evidence that may be
considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(2) The breath analysis
shall be based upon grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath. The
foregoing provisions of this section shall not be construed as limiting the
introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether
the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(3) Analysis of the
person's blood or breath to be considered valid under the provisions of this
section or section 2 of this act shall have been performed according to
methods approved by the state toxicologist and by an individual possessing a
valid permit issued by the state toxicologist for this purpose pursuant to RCW
46.61.506.

(4) When a blood test
is administered under the provisions of section 10 of this act, the withdrawal
of blood for the purpose of determining its alcoholic or drug content may be
performed only by a physician, a registered nurse, or a qualified technician.
This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath specimens.

(5) The person tested
may have a physician, or a qualified technician, chemist, registered nurse, or
other qualified person of his or her own choosing administer one or more tests
in addition to any administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer.
The failure or inability to obtain an additional test by a person shall not
preclude the admission of evidence relating to the test or tests taken at the
direction of a law enforcement officer.

(6) Upon the request of
the person who shall submit to a test or tests at the request of a law enforcement
officer, full information concerning the test or tests shall be made available
to him or her or his or her attorney.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A sentencing court may
allow persons convicted of violating section 2 of this act to fulfill the terms
of the sentence provided in section 5 of this act in nonconsecutive or
intermittent time periods. However, any mandatory minimum sentence under
section 5 of this act shall be served consecutively unless suspended or
deferred as otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The refusal of a person
to submit to a test of the alcoholic content of the person's blood or breath
under section 10 of this act is admissible into evidence at a subsequent criminal
trial.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) Any person who
operates a vessel within this state is deemed to have given consent, subject to
the provisions of section 7 of this act, to a test or tests of his or her
breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or
presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense
where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person had been operating a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or was in violation of section 3 of this act.

(2) The test or tests
of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer
having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been operating a vessel
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
or the person to have been operating a vessel while having alcohol in a
concentration in violation of section 3 of this act in his or her system and
being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where the
person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other
physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the person is being
treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle,
ambulance, or other similar facility in which a breath testing instrument is
not present or where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the
person is under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by
a qualified person as provided in section 7 of this act. The officer shall
inform the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and
of his or her right to have additional tests administered by any qualified
person of his or her choosing as provided in section 7 of this act. The
officer shall warn the operator that:

(a) The operator's
refusal to take the test may subject him or her to civil penalty; and

(b) The operator's
refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial.

(3) Except as provided
in this section, the test administered shall be of the breath only. If an
individual is unconscious or is under arrest for the crime of homicide by
watercraft as provided in RCW 79A.60.050, assault by watercraft as provided in
RCW 79A.60.060, or operating a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs as provided in section 2 of this act, which arrest results from
an accident in which there has been serious bodily injury to another person, a
breath or blood test may be administered without the consent of the individual
so arrested.

(4) Any person who is
dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a condition rendering him or her
incapable of refusal, shall be deemed not to have withdrawn the consent
provided by subsection (1) of this section and the test or tests may be
administered, subject to the provisions of section 7 of this act, and the
person shall be deemed to have received the warnings required under subsection
(2) of this section.

(5) If, following his
or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of this section, the
person arrested refuses upon the request of a law enforcement officer to submit
to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except
as authorized under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.

(6) A person's refusal
to submit to a test or tests pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall
constitute a class 1 civil infraction, pursuant to RCW 7.80.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) Whenever the operator
of a vessel is arrested for violation of RCW 79A.60.040 or section 2 or 3 of
this act, the arresting officer may take custody of the vessel and provide for
its prompt removal to a place of safety.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, a place of safety may include a private moorage facility as
defined in RCW 88.26.010, a moorage facility as defined in RCW 53.08.310, or a
commission facility as defined in RCW 79A.65.010.

(3) At the time the
arresting officer removes a vessel to safety pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the officer shall notify the operator or owner of the facility to
which the vessel is removed of the fact that the vessel has been secured at such
facility, and shall notify the facility owner or operator of the names and
addresses of the vessel operator and owner, if known.

Sec. 12. RCW 10.31.100 and 2000 c
119 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A police officer having
probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a felony
shall have the authority to arrest the person without a warrant. A police
officer may arrest a person without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the presence of the
officer, except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.

(1) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to
any person or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use
or possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years under RCW
66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070 or 9A.52.080,
shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(2) A police officer
shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal recognizance,
or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause
to believe that:

(a) An order has been
issued of which the person has knowledge under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 10.99,
26.09, 26.10, 26.26, 26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person
has violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats
of violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person
from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified
distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued under RCW 26.44.063,
imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon the person; or

(b) A foreign
protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has been issued of which the
person under restraint has knowledge and the person under restraint has
violated a provision of the foreign protection order prohibiting the person
under restraint from contacting or communicating with another person, or
excluding the person under restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or
day care, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of any
provision for which the foreign protection order specifically indicates that a
violation will be a crime; or

(c) The person is
sixteen years or older and within the preceding four hours has assaulted a
family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and the officer
believes: (i) A felonious assault has occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred
which has resulted in bodily injury to the victim, whether the injury is
observable by the responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action
has occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical pain,
illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the officer has probable
cause to believe that family or household members have assaulted each other,
the officer is not required to arrest both persons. The officer shall arrest
the person whom the officer believes to be the primary physical aggressor. In
making this determination, the officer shall make every reasonable effort to
consider: (i) The intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW
10.99.010; (ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic violence
between the persons involved.

(3) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a
violation of any of the following traffic laws shall have the authority to
arrest the person:

(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating
to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(b) RCW 46.52.020,
relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or damage to an
attended vehicle;

(c) RCW 46.61.500 or
46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or racing of vehicles;

(d) RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, relating to persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
drugs;

(e) RCW 46.20.342,
relating to driving a motor vehicle while operator's license is suspended or
revoked;

(f) RCW 46.61.5249,
relating to operating a motor vehicle in a negligent manner.

(4) A law enforcement
officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident may arrest the
driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident if the officer has probable
cause to believe that the driver has committed in connection with the accident
a violation of any traffic law or regulation.

(5) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a
violation of RCW 79A.60.040 or section 2 or 3 of this act shall have the
authority to arrest the person.

(6) An officer may act
upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence a traffic
infraction was committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic
infraction to the driver who is believed to have committed the infraction. The
request by the witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.

(7) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing
any act of indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the
person.

(8) A police officer
may arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal
recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has
probable cause to believe that an order has been issued of which the person has
knowledge under chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that
order.

(9) Any police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person has, within twenty-four hours of
the alleged violation, committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such
person.

(10) A police officer
having probable cause to believe that a person illegally possesses or illegally
has possessed a firearm or other dangerous weapon on private or public
elementary or secondary school premises shall have the authority to arrest the
person.

For purposes of this
subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning defined in
RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).

(11) Except as
specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (6) of this section,
nothing in this section extends or otherwise affects the powers of arrest
prescribed in Title 46 RCW.

(12) No police officer
may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest pursuant to RCW
10.31.100 (2) or (8) if the police officer acts in good faith and without
malice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 2 through 11 of
this act are each added to chapter 79A.60 RCW.

---
END ---