BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The intent of this act is
to confirm the holding in State v. Edelman, 97 Wn. App. 161 (1999), that
restitution under RCW 9.94A.142 must be paid to the estate of the victim after
the victim is deceased.

Sec. 2. RCW 7.68.290 and 1997 c
358 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If a
defendant has paid restitution pursuant to court order under RCW 9.92.060,
9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, 9.95.210, or 9A.20.030 and the victim entitled to restitution
cannot be found or has died, any unpaid restitution shall be paid to the
victim's estate or, if the victim has died without being survived by any heirs,
the clerk of the court shall deposit with the county treasurer the amount of
restitution unable to be paid to the victim. The county treasurer shall
monthly transmit the money to the state treasurer for deposit as provided in
RCW 43.08.250. Moneys deposited under this section shall be used to compensate
victims of crimes through the crime victims compensation fund.

---
END ---