BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature makes
the following findings:

(1) The recent
consensus report of the world's climate research community has concluded that
significant climate change arising from pollutants generated by human activity
is already underway.

(2) The best available
analyses by northwest climate experts now indicate a projected doubling of
carbon dioxide in the atmosphere is now expected to increase the average
temperature in Washington state four to seven degrees over the next fifty
years.

(3) Such changes are
likely to have major, adverse impacts on the state's environment and economy.

(4) The citizens of
Washington state have consistently demonstrated global scientific,
technological, and policy leadership.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means the board of directors of the Washington climate center.

(2) "Center"
means the Washington climate center.

(3) "Climate
change" means a change of climate attributed directly or indirectly to
human activity that alters the composition of the global atmosphere.

(4)
"Emissions" means the release of greenhouse gases.

(5)
"Emitter" means the entity releasing greenhouse gases.

(6) "Greenhouse
gases" includes carbon dioxide (CO2), methane and natural gas (CH4), and
nitrous oxide (N2O).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The state legislature
authorizes the establishment of an independent, nonprofit organization known as
the Washington climate center to serve as a central clearinghouse for all
climate change activities in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The center shall be
funded through grants and voluntary cash and in-kind contributions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The activities of
the center shall be directed by a board of directors appointed by the governor,
for terms of four years, beginning July 1, 2001. The board shall include
fifteen members as follows:

(a) One member from
each major party of the senate as recommended by their leadership;

(b) One member from
each major party of the house of representatives as recommended by their
leadership;

(c) One member from
the office of the commissioner of public lands;

(d) One member from
the department of community, trade, and economic development, energy policy
group;

(e) One member from
the Washington State University energy program;

(f) Three members from
the nonprofit, climate sector;

(g) Three members from
the business sector; and

(h) Two members from
the climate academic sector, one representing the University of Washington,
climate impacts group.

(2) The board shall
retain and assign staff and volunteers as the board deems necessary.

(3) The Washington
State University energy program and the University of Washington climate
impacts group may provide technical assistance and research for the center.

(4) A vote of a
majority of the members of the board shall bind the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The duties of the
center may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Determining
current and projected emissions of greenhouse gases in the state;

(b) Collecting and
sharing scientific and technological data related to climate change;

(c) Assisting and
collecting all climate contingency planning in the state;

(d) Advising relevant
sectors of prospective commercial opportunities;

(e) Studying and
recommending avenues for reducing short-term and long-term greenhouse gas
emissions in the state;

(f) Studying and
recommending the most cost-effective methods for reducing all net greenhouse
gas emissions in the state, taking into consideration the absorption of greenhouse
gas emissions through carbon sequestration;

(g) Studying and
recommending the most cost-effective methods for reducing greenhouse gas
emissions from the transportation sector consistent with federal law;

(h) Certifying the
extent and degree of any mitigation projects;

(i) Developing
adequate methods for the monitoring and verification of mitigation projects;
and

(j) Serving as a
central, independent registry available for the trading of emissions credits,
if any.

(2) The center shall:

(a) Develop and
publish its rules of operation, calculations, and methods;

(b) Accomplish any
other duty assigned to it by the legislature for which adequate funding is
provided; and

(c) Provide an annual
report to the governor and legislature by December 31st regarding its
operations, including the status of greenhouse gas emissions in the state.

(3) The center shall,
within available funds, also:

(a) Identify key
sectors within the state likely to be affected adversely by climate change;

(b) Examine and report
the feasibility of a carbon storage program for the state by:

(i) Evaluating other
states' and nations' attempts to establish carbon credit programs, carbon
storage programs, carbon storage requirements worldwide, and methods and
scientific programs that are used to implement carbon storage programs;

(ii) Analyzing other
programs in the state of Washington, including the conservation reserve
enhancement program, that could facilitate a carbon storage program and a
stable carbon storage market;

(iii) Analyzing
methods to encourage and increase appropriate carbon storage activities; and

(iv) Developing and
preparing appropriate legislative responses and recommendations;

(c) Notify and convene
meetings of key members of those sectors;

(d) Provide relevant
scientific and technological information to the public and key sectors;

(e) Support a
collaborative response to assist those sectors; and

(f) Assist in the
creation of effective contingency planning for those sectors.

(4) The following
agencies and programs shall work with the center to assist with the duties
under this section: The department of community, trade, and economic
development, the department of ecology, the department of transportation, the
department of health, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of
agriculture, the department of natural resources, and the Washington State
University energy program.

(5) The board may
establish task forces and technical advisory committees composed of state and
local agencies, businesses, labor groups, timber industry groups, agricultural
groups, nonprofit organizations, university and college programs, and
interested groups and citizens as necessary to assist in the duties in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) All emitters of
greenhouse gases are encouraged to seek mitigation of their emissions.

(2) Upon a request,
accompanied with adequate funding, the center may:

(a) Assist any emitter
in selecting mitigation projects;

(b) Determine and
certify the amount of mitigation accomplished by any mitigation project; and

(c) Determine what
monitoring and verification standards would be useful in the evaluation of
mitigation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The center shall
publicize successful mitigation projects and efforts to reduce the emission of
greenhouse gases.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. This act is necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1 through 9 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---