BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The purpose of this
act is to establish a

_5 study of the state's food service rules and objectives
to ensure a

_6 continuation of the industry's role as a nationally
recognized

_7 leader in food safety.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The secretary of
health shall create a

_9 committee on food service regulation. The secretary, or
the

10 secretary's designee, shall be a member of the committee
and shall

11 chair the committee. The committee shall be composed of
the

12 secretary and the following additional members:

13 (a) Four representatives of various segments of the
food

14 service industry, appointed by the secretary from lists
of

15 nominees submitted by organizations within the industry;

16 (b) Four representatives of local health
jurisdictions,

17 appointed by the secretary from lists of nominees
submitted

p. 1 SB
5675

_1 individually or collectively by such jurisdictions; and

_2 (c) Two members of a labor organization appointed by
the

_3 secretary to represent employees in the food service
industry on a

_4 statewide basis.

_5 (2) The committee shall review the provisions of the
current

_6 food service rules codified in chapter 246-215 WAC, the
objectives

_7 of the rules, and the interpretations of the rules made
by the

_8 department of health and by local health jurisdictions
throughout

_9 the state. Following the review, the committee shall
report to the

10 legislature and to the state board of health its
recommendations

11 regarding:

12 (a) Revisions that should be made to the food
service rules to

13 update the rules or to respond to other changes in food
service

14 regulatory requirements recommended by the committee;

15 (b) Revisions that should be made to the food
service rules

16 that further describe the requirements of the rules or
otherwise

17 clarify the rules in a manner that will likely provide
uniform

18 interpretation of the rules throughout the state; and

19 (c) Which rules should apply uniformly throughout
the state

20 without local variation.

21 (3) Staff and administrative support for the work of
the

22 committee shall be provided by the department of health.

23 (4) The committee shall report its recommendations
to the

24 legislature and to the state board of health by July 1,
2002.

25 (5) This section expires December 31, 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5675 p. 2