BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.46.165 and 1998 c
322 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Contractors shall
be required to submit with each annual nursing facility cost report a proposed
settlement report showing underspending or overspending in each component rate
during the cost report year on a per-resident day basis. The department shall
accept or reject the proposed settlement report, explain any adjustments, and
issue a revised settlement report if needed.

(2) Contractors shall
not be required to refund payments made in the operations, variable return,
property, and ((return on investment)) financing allowance
component rates in excess of the adjusted costs of providing services
corresponding to these components.

(3) The facility will
return to the department any overpayment amounts in each of the direct care,
therapy care, and support services rate components that the department
identifies following the audit and settlement procedures as described in this
chapter, provided that the contractor may retain any overpayment that does not
exceed 1.0% of the facility's direct care, therapy care, and support services
component rate. However, no overpayments may be retained in a cost center to
which savings have been shifted to cover a deficit, as provided in subsection
(4) of this section. Facilities that are not in substantial compliance for
more than ninety days, and facilities that provide substandard quality of care
at any time, during the period for which settlement is being calculated, will not
be allowed to retain any amount of overpayment in the facility's direct care,
therapy care, and support services component rate. The terms "not in
substantial compliance" and "substandard quality of care" shall
be defined by federal survey regulations.

(4) Determination of
unused rate funds, including the amounts of direct care, therapy care, and
support services to be recovered, shall be done separately for each component
rate, and, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, neither
costs nor rate payments shall be shifted from one component rate or
corresponding service area to another in determining the degree of
underspending or recovery, if any. ((However,)) In computing a
preliminary or final settlement, savings in the support services cost center ((may))
shall be shifted to cover a deficit in the direct care or therapy cost
centers up to the amount of any savings, but no more than twenty percent of
the support services component rate may be shifted. Savings in direct care and
therapy care may be shifted between these two cost centers up to the amount of
savings in each, regardless of the percentage of either component rate
shifted. Contractor-retained overpayments up to one percent of direct care,
therapy care, and support services rate components, as authorized in subsection
(3) of this section, shall be calculated and applied after all shifting is
completed. ((Not more than twenty percent of the rate in a cost center
may be shifted.))

(5) Total and component
payment rates assigned to a nursing facility, as calculated and revised, if
needed, under the provisions of this chapter and those rules as the department
may adopt, shall represent the maximum payment for nursing facility services
rendered to medicaid recipients for the period the rates are in effect. No
increase in payment to a contractor shall result from spending above the total
payment rate or in any rate component.

(6) RCW 74.46.150
through 74.46.180, and rules adopted by the department prior to July 1, 1998,
shall continue to govern the medicaid settlement process for periods prior to
October 1, 1998, as if these statutes and rules remained in full force and
effect.

(7) For calendar year
1998, the department shall calculate split settlements covering January 1,
1998, through September 30, 1998, and October 1, 1998, through December 31,
1998. For the period beginning October 1, 1998, rules specified in this
chapter shall apply. The department shall, by rule, determine the division of
calendar year 1998 adjusted costs for settlement purposes.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.46.410 and 1998 c
322 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Costs will be
unallowable if they are not documented, necessary, ordinary, and related to the
provision of care services to authorized patients.

(2) Unallowable costs
include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Costs of items or
services not covered by the medical care program. Costs of such items or
services will be unallowable even if they are indirectly reimbursed by the
department as the result of an authorized reduction in patient contribution;

(b) Costs of services
and items provided to recipients which are covered by the department's medical
care program but not included in the medicaid per-resident day payment rate
established by the department under this chapter;

(c) Costs associated
with a capital expenditure subject to section 1122 approval (part 100, Title 42
C.F.R.) if the department found it was not consistent with applicable
standards, criteria, or plans. If the department was not given timely notice
of a proposed capital expenditure, all associated costs will be unallowable up
to the date they are determined to be reimbursable under applicable federal
regulations;

(d) Costs associated
with a construction or acquisition project requiring certificate of need
approval, or exemption from the requirements for certificate of need for the
replacement of existing nursing home beds, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW if
such approval or exemption was not obtained;

(e) Interest costs
other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on and after January 1, 1985;

(f) Salaries or other
compensation of owners, officers, directors, stockholders, partners,
principals, participants, and others associated with the contractor or its home
office, including all board of directors' fees and, in the case of publicly
operated facilities, commissioners' fees, for any purpose, except
reasonable compensation paid for service related to patient care;

(g) Costs in excess of
limits or in violation of principles set forth in this chapter;

(h) Costs resulting
from transactions or the application of accounting methods which circumvent the
principles of the payment system set forth in this chapter;

(i) Costs applicable to
services, facilities, and supplies furnished by a related organization in
excess of the lower of the cost to the related organization or the price of
comparable services, facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;

(j) Bad debts of Title
XIX or non-Title XIX recipients((. Bad debts of Title XIX recipients
are allowable if the debt is related to covered services, it arises from the
recipient's required contribution toward the cost of care, the provider can
establish that reasonable collection efforts were made, the debt was actually
uncollectible when claimed as worthless, and sound business judgment
established that there was no likelihood of recovery at any time in the future));

(k) Charity and
courtesy allowances;

(l) Cash, assessments,
or other contributions, excluding dues, to charitable organizations,
professional organizations, trade associations, or political parties, and costs
incurred to improve community or public relations;

(m) Vending machine
expenses;

(n) Expenses for barber
or beautician services not included in routine care;

(o) Funeral and burial
expenses;

(p) Costs of gift shop
operations and inventory;

(q) Personal items such
as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers and magazines, and clothing, except
those used in patient activity programs;

(r) Fund-raising
expenses, except those directly related to the patient activity program;

(s) Penalties and
fines;

(t) Expenses related to
telephones, ((televisions,)) radios, and similar appliances in patients'
private accommodations;

(u) Federal, state, and
other income taxes;

(v) Costs of special
care services except where authorized by the department;

(w) Expenses of an
employee benefit not in fact made available to all employees on an equal or
fair basis, for example, key-man insurance and other insurance or retirement
plans;

(x) Expenses of
profit-sharing plans;

(y) Expenses related to
the purchase and/or use of private or commercial airplanes which are in excess
of what a prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary and economic
provision of such a transportation need related to patient care;

(z) Personal expenses
and allowances of owners or relatives;

(aa) All expenses of
maintaining professional licenses or membership in professional organizations;

(bb) Costs related to
agreements not to compete;

(cc) Amortization of
goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other intangible asset, whether related to
resident care or not, and whether recognized under generally accepted
accounting principles or not;

(dd) Expenses related
to vehicles which are in excess of what a prudent contractor would expend for
the ordinary and economic provision of transportation needs related to patient
care;

(ee) Legal and
consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing against the department where
a decision is rendered in favor of the department or where otherwise the
determination of the department stands;

(ff) Legal and
consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in connection with a lawsuit
against the department;

(gg) Lease acquisition
costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or any other intangible assets;

(hh) All rental or
lease costs other than those provided in RCW 74.46.300 on and after January 1,
1985;

(ii) Postsurvey charges
incurred by the facility as a result of subsequent inspections under RCW
18.51.050 which occur beyond the first postsurvey visit during the
certification survey calendar year;

(jj) Compensation paid
for any purchased nursing care services, including registered nurse, licensed
practical nurse, and nurse assistant services, obtained through service
contract arrangement in excess of the amount of compensation paid for such
hours of nursing care service had they been paid at the average hourly wage,
including related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of like
classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most recent
cost report period;

(kk) For all partial or
whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, costs of land and depreciable assets
that cannot be reimbursed under the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 and
implementing state statutory and regulatory provisions;

(ll) Costs reported by
the contractor for a prior period to the extent such costs, due to statutory
exemption, will not be incurred by the contractor in the period to be covered
by the rate;

(mm) Costs of outside
activities, for example, costs allocated to the use of a vehicle for personal
purposes or related to the part of a facility leased out for office space;

(nn) Travel expenses
outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington and the province of British
Columbia. However, travel to or from the home or central office of a chain
organization operating a nursing facility is allowed whether inside or outside
these areas if the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related to resident care;

(oo) Moving expenses of
employees in the absence of demonstrated, good-faith effort to recruit within
the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington, and the province of British
Columbia;

(pp) Depreciation in
excess of four thousand dollars per year for each passenger car or other
vehicle primarily used by the administrator, facility staff, or central office
staff;

(qq) Costs for
temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool not registered with the
secretary of the department of health;

(rr) Payroll taxes
associated with compensation in excess of allowable compensation of owners,
relatives, and administrative personnel;

(ss) Costs and fees
associated with filing a petition for bankruptcy;

(tt) All advertising or
promotional costs, except reasonable costs of help wanted advertising;

(uu) Outside
consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data set
completion proficiency;

(vv) Interest charges
assessed by any department or agency of this state for failure to make a timely
refund of overpayments and interest expenses incurred for loans obtained to
make the refunds;

(ww) All home office or
central office costs, whether on or off the nursing facility premises, and
whether allocated or not to specific services, in excess of the median of those
adjusted costs for all facilities reporting such costs for the most recent
report period; ((and))

(xx) Tax expenses that
a nursing facility has never incurred; and

(yy) All nursing
facility management fees and costs.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.46.431 and 1999 c
353 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective July 1,
1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have seven components: Direct care, therapy care,
support services, operations, property, financing allowance, and variable
return. The department shall establish and adjust each of these components, as
provided in this section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid
nursing facility in this state.

(2) All component rate
allocations shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((eighty-five))
ninety percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up
or in use.

(3) Information and
data sources used in determining medicaid payment rate allocations, including
formulas, procedures, cost report periods, resident assessment instrument
formats, resident assessment methodologies, and resident classification and
case mix weighting methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to
time as determined by the department.

(4)(a) Direct care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, direct care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, direct care component rate allocations.

(b) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1996 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

(c) Direct care
component rate allocations based on 1999 cost report data shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

(5)(a) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 will be used
for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001,
through June 30, 2004, therapy care component rate allocations.

(b) Therapy care
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(6)(a) Support services
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, support services component rate allocations.

(b) Support services
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(7)(a) Operations
component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost report data
covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be
used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, operations component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, operations component rate allocations.

(b) Operations
component rate allocations shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act.

(8) For July 1, 1998,
through September 30, 1998, a facility's property and return on investment
component rates shall be the facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on
investment component rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 1999, a facility's property and return on investment component rates
shall be rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.

(9) Total payment rates
under the nursing facility medicaid payment system shall not exceed facility
rates charged to the general public for comparable services.

(10) Medicaid
contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum wage of the greater of ((five
dollars and fifteen cents per hour)) the state minimum wage or the
federal minimum wage.

(11) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions for determining
component rate allocations for facilities in circumstances not directly
addressed by this chapter, including but not limited to: The need to prorate
inflation for partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities,
existing facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership of the
nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or converting beds back into
service, facilities having less than six months of either resident assessment,
cost report data, or both, under the current contractor prior to rate setting,
and other circumstances.

(12) The department
shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions, including
necessary threshold costs, for adjusting rates to reflect capital improvements
or new requirements imposed by the department or the federal government. Any
such rate adjustments are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.46.433 and 1999 c
353 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish for each medicaid nursing facility a variable return component
rate allocation. In determining the variable return allowance:

(a) The variable return
array and percentage assigned at the October 1, 1998, rate setting shall remain
in effect until June 30, 2001, and the variable return array and percentage
assigned at the July 1, 2001, rate setting shall remain in effect until June
30, 2004.

(b) To calculate the
array of facilities for the July 1, 2001, rate setting, the department, without
using peer groups, shall first rank all facilities in numerical order from
highest to lowest according to each facility's examined and documented, but
unlidded, combined direct care, therapy care, support services, and operations
per resident day cost from the 1999 cost report period. However, before being
combined with other per resident day costs and ranked, a facility's direct care
cost per resident day shall be adjusted to reflect its facility average case
mix index, to be averaged from the four calendar quarters of 1999, weighted by
the facility's resident days from each quarter, under RCW 74.46.501(7)(b)(ii).
The array shall then be divided into four quartiles, each containing, as nearly
as possible, an equal number of facilities, and four percent shall be assigned
to facilities in the lowest quartile, three percent to facilities in the next
lowest quartile, two percent to facilities in the next highest quartile, and
one percent to facilities in the highest quartile.

(c) The
department shall ((then)) compute the variable return allowance by
multiplying ((the appropriate)) a facility's assigned percentage
((amounts, which shall not be less than one percent and not greater than
four percent,)) by the sum of the facility's direct care, therapy care,
support services, and operations ((rate)) component((s)) rates
determined in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by the department.
((The percentage amounts will be based on groupings of facilities according
to the rankings prescribed in (a) of this subsection, as applicable. Those
groups of facilities with lower per diem costs shall receive higher percentage
amounts than those with higher per diem costs.))

(2) The
variable return rate allocation calculated in accordance with this section
shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.46.435 and 1999 c
353 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The property
component rate allocation for each facility shall be determined by dividing the
sum of the reported allowable prior period actual depreciation, subject to RCW
74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for any capitalized additions or
replacements approved by the department, and the retained savings from such
cost center, by the greater of a facility's total resident days for the
facility in the prior period or resident days as calculated on ((eighty-five))
ninety percent facility occupancy. If a capitalized addition or
retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity during
the ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used in computing the
property component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident day level.

(2) A nursing
facility's property component rate allocation shall be rebased annually,
effective July 1st or October 1st as applicable, in accordance with this
section and this chapter.

(3) When a certificate
of need for a new facility is requested, the department, in reaching its
decision, shall take into consideration per-bed land and building construction
costs for the facility which shall not exceed a maximum to be established by
the secretary.

(4) For the purpose of
calculating a nursing facility's property component rate, if a contractor
elects to bank licensed beds or to convert banked beds to active service, under
chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's anticipated resident
occupancy level subsequent to the decrease or increase in licensed bed
capacity. However, in no case shall the department use less than ((eighty-five))
ninety percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after
banking or conversion.

(5) The
property component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section
shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 6. RCW 74.46.437 and 1999 c
353 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
1999, the department shall establish for each medicaid nursing facility a
financing allowance component rate allocation. The financing allowance
component rate shall be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance
with the provisions of this section and this chapter.

(2) The financing
allowance shall be determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each
facility by .10, and dividing by the greater of a nursing facility's total
resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated on ((eighty-five)) ninety percent facility occupancy.
However, assets acquired on or after May 17, 1999, shall be grouped in a
separate financing allowance calculation that shall be multiplied by .085. The
financing allowance factor of .085 shall not be applied to the net invested
funds pertaining to new construction or major renovations receiving certificate
of need approval or an exemption from certificate of need requirements under chapter
70.38 RCW, or to working drawings that have been submitted to the department of
health for construction review approval, prior to May 17, 1999. If a
capitalized addition or retirement of an asset will result in a different
licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period, the prior period total
resident days used in computing the financing allowance shall be adjusted to
the greater of the anticipated resident day level or ((eighty-five)) ninety
percent of the new licensed bed capacity.

(3) In computing the
portion of net invested funds representing the net book value of tangible fixed
assets, the same assets, depreciation bases, lives, and methods referred to in
RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350, 74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned
and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost of land
upon which the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is
reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of providing resident
care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and limitations contained
in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984,
capitalized cost of land shall be the buyer's capitalized cost. For all
partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased
after July 17, 1984, capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on
July 17, 1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of
leased facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor is
unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested funds, the
secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount for net invested
funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW 74.46.360(1).

(4) For the purpose of
calculating a nursing facility's financing allowance component rate, if a
contractor elects to bank licensed beds or to convert banked beds to active
service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's
anticipated resident occupancy level subsequent to the decrease or increase in
licensed bed capacity. However, in no case shall the department use less than
((eighty-five)) ninety percent occupancy of the facility's
licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.

(5) The financing
allowance rate allocation calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 7. RCW 74.46.501 and 1998 c
322 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) From individual
case mix weights for the applicable quarter, the department shall determine two
average case mix indexes for each medicaid nursing facility, one for all
residents in the facility, known as the facility average case mix index, and
one for medicaid residents, known as the medicaid average case mix index.

(2)(a) In calculating a
facility's two average case mix indexes for each quarter, the department shall
include all residents or medicaid residents, as applicable, who were physically
in the facility during the quarter in question (January 1st through March 31st,
April 1st through June 30th, July 1st through September 30th, or October 1st
through December 31st).

(b) The facility
average case mix index shall exclude all default cases as defined in this
chapter. However, the medicaid average case mix index shall include all
default cases.

(3) Both the facility
average and the medicaid average case mix indexes shall be determined by
multiplying the case mix weight of each resident, or each medicaid resident, as
applicable, by the number of days, as defined in this section and as
applicable, the resident was at each particular case mix classification or
group, and then averaging.

(4)(a) In determining
the number of days a resident is classified into a particular case mix group,
the department shall determine a start date for calculating case mix grouping
periods as follows:

(i) If a resident's
initial assessment for a first stay or a return stay in the nursing facility is
timely completed and transmitted to the department by the cutoff date under
state and federal requirements and as described in subsection (5) of this
section, the start date shall be the later of either the first day of the
quarter or the resident's facility admission or readmission date;

(ii) If a resident's
significant change, quarterly, or annual assessment is timely completed and
transmitted to the department by the cutoff date under state and federal
requirements and as described in subsection (5) of this section, the start date
shall be the date the assessment is completed;

(iii) If a resident's
significant change, quarterly, or annual assessment is not timely completed and
transmitted to the department by the cutoff date under state and federal
requirements and as described in subsection (5) of this section, the start date
shall be the due date for the assessment.

(b) If state or federal
rules require more frequent assessment, the same principles for determining the
start date of a resident's classification in a particular case mix group set
forth in subsection (4)(a) of this section shall apply.

(c) In calculating the
number of days a resident is classified into a particular case mix group, the
department shall determine an end date for calculating case mix grouping periods
as follows:

(i) If a resident is
discharged before the end of the applicable quarter, the end date shall be the
day before discharge;

(ii) If a resident is
not discharged before the end of the applicable quarter, the end date shall be
the last day of the quarter;

(iii) If a new
assessment is due for a resident or a new assessment is completed and
transmitted to the department, the end date of the previous assessment shall be
the earlier of either the day before the assessment is due or the day before
the assessment is completed by the nursing facility.

(5) The cutoff date for
the department to use resident assessment data, for the purposes of calculating
both the facility average and the medicaid average case mix indexes, and for
establishing and updating a facility's direct care component rate, shall be one
month and one day after the end of the quarter for which the resident
assessment data applies.

(6) A threshold of
ninety percent, as described and calculated in this subsection, shall be used to
determine the case mix index each quarter. The threshold shall also be used to
determine which facilities' costs per case mix unit are included in determining
the ceiling, floor, and price. If the facility does not meet the ninety
percent threshold, the department may use an alternate case mix index to
determine the facility average and medicaid average case mix indexes for the
quarter. The threshold is a count of unique minimum data set assessments, and
it shall include resident assessment instrument tracking forms for residents
discharged prior to completing an initial assessment. The threshold is
calculated by dividing ((the)) a facility's count of ((unique
minimum data set assessments)) residents being assessed by the
average census for ((each)) the facility. A daily census shall
be reported by each nursing facility as it transmits assessment data to the
department. The department shall compute a quarterly average census based on
the daily census. If no census has been reported by a facility during a
specified quarter, then the department shall use the facility's licensed beds
as the denominator in computing the threshold.

(7)(a) Although the
facility average and the medicaid average case mix indexes shall both be
calculated quarterly, the facility average case mix index will be used only
every three years in combination with cost report data as specified by RCW
74.46.431 and 74.46.506, to establish a facility's allowable cost per case mix
unit. A facility's medicaid average case mix index shall be used to update a
nursing facility's direct care component rate quarterly.

(b) The facility
average case mix index used to establish each nursing facility's direct care
component rate shall be based on an average of calendar quarters of the
facility's average case mix indexes.

(i) For October 1,
1998, direct care component rates, the department shall use an average of
facility average case mix indexes from the four calendar quarters of 1997.

(ii) For July 1, 2001,
direct care component rates, the department shall use an average of facility
average case mix indexes from the four calendar quarters of 1999.

(c) The medicaid
average case mix index used to update or recalibrate a nursing facility's
direct care component rate quarterly shall be from the calendar quarter
commencing six months prior to the effective date of the quarterly rate. For
example, October 1, 1998, through December 31, 1998, direct care component
rates shall utilize case mix averages from the April 1, 1998, through June 30,
1998, calendar quarter, and so forth.

Sec. 8. RCW 74.46.506 and 1999 c
353 s 5 and 1999 c 181 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The direct care
component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of nursing care for one
resident of a nursing facility for one day, including direct care supplies.
Therapy services and supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component
rate, shall be excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of
case mix determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine and update quarterly for each nursing
facility serving medicaid residents a facility-specific per-resident day direct
care component rate allocation, to be effective on the first day of each
calendar quarter. In determining direct care component rates the department
shall utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident assessment
data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to, and if necessary
corrected by, the department in the resident assessment instrument format
approved by federal authorities for use in this state.

(3) The department may
question the accuracy of assessment data for any resident and utilize corrected
or substitute information, however derived, in determining direct care
component rates. The department is authorized to impose civil fines and to
take adverse rate actions against a contractor, as specified by the department
in rule, in order to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data
transmission requirements and to ensure accuracy.

(4) Cost report data
used in setting direct care component rate allocations shall be 1996 and 1999,
for rate periods as specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).

(5) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall rebase each nursing facility's direct care component
rate allocation as described in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care component
rate allocation for economic trends and conditions as described in RCW
74.46.431, and update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:

(a) Reduce total direct
care costs reported by each nursing facility for the applicable cost report
period specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments,
and to eliminate reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to
derive the facility's total allowable direct care cost;

(b) Divide each
facility's total allowable direct care cost by its adjusted resident days for
the same report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy of ((eighty-five))
ninety percent; that is, the greater of actual or imputed occupancy at
((eighty-five)) ninety percent of licensed beds, to derive the
facility's allowable direct care cost per resident day;

(c) Adjust the
facility's per resident day direct care cost by the applicable factor specified
in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) and (c) to derive its adjusted allowable direct care
cost per resident day;

(d) Divide each
facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day by the facility
average case mix index for the applicable quarters specified by RCW
74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per case
mix unit;

(e) Divide nursing
facilities into two peer groups: Those located in metropolitan statistical
areas as determined and defined by the United States office of management and
budget or other appropriate agency or office of the federal government, and
those not located in a metropolitan statistical area;

(f) Array separately
the allowable direct care cost per case mix unit for all metropolitan
statistical area and for all nonmetropolitan statistical area facilities, and
determine the median allowable direct care cost per case mix unit for each peer
group, provided, that for the purposes of establishing corridors under this
subsection for July 1, 2001, and following rate setting, the medians determined
for the metropolitan and nonmetropolitan peer groups shall each be increased by
3.9 percent;

(g) Except as provided
in (k) of this subsection, from October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2000,
determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than eighty-five percent of the
facility's peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the
facility's peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate
allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied
by that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred fifteen percent of
the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the
peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal
to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between eighty-five and one hundred
fifteen percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this
subsection shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(h) Except as provided
in (k) of this subsection, from July 1, 2000, through June 30, 2002, determine
each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than ninety percent of the facility's
peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred ten percent of the
peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred ten percent of the peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between ninety and one hundred ten
percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(i) From July 1, 2002,
through June 30, 2004, determine each facility's quarterly direct care
component rate as follows:

(i) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is less than ninety-five percent of the
facility's peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to ninety-five percent of the
facility's peer group median, and shall have a direct care component rate
allocation equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied
by that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(ii) Any facility whose
allowable cost per case mix unit is greater than one hundred five percent of
the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection shall be
assigned a cost per case mix unit equal to one hundred five percent of the peer
group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's
medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);

(iii) Any facility
whose allowable cost per case mix unit is between ninety-five and one hundred
five percent of the peer group median established under (f) of this subsection
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);

(j) Beginning July 1,
2004, determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate by
multiplying the facility's peer group median allowable direct care cost per case
mix unit by that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
quarter as specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c).

(k)(i) Between October
1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department shall compare each facility's direct
care component rate allocation calculated under (g) of this subsection with the
facility's nursing services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998,
less therapy costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates;

(ii) Between July 1,
2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall compare each facility's direct
care component rate allocation calculated under (h) of this subsection with the
facility's direct care component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility
shall receive the higher of the two rates.

(6) The direct care
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(7) Payments resulting
from increases in direct care component rates, granted under authority of RCW
74.46.508(1) for a facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset
against the facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report
year or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in allowable
direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and other purposes
deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 9. RCW 74.46.511 and 1999 c
353 s 6 and 1999 c 181 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The therapy care
component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of medicaid one-on-one
therapy provided by a qualified therapist as defined in this chapter, including
therapy supplies and therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid
resident of a nursing facility. The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted therapy
costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component rate allocation
for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, shall be based on adjusted therapy
costs and days from calendar year 1999. The therapy care component rate shall
be adjusted for economic trends and conditions as specified in RCW
74.46.431(5)(b), and shall be determined in accordance with this section.

(2) In rebasing, as
provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department shall take from the cost
reports of facilities the following reported information:

(a) Direct one-on-one
therapy charges for all residents by payer including charges for supplies;

(b) The total units or
modules of therapy care for all residents by type of therapy provided, for
example, speech or physical. A unit or module of therapy care is considered to
be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or
support personnel; and

(c) Therapy consulting
expenses for all residents.

(3) The department
shall determine for all residents the total cost per unit of therapy for each
type of therapy by dividing the total adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for
each type by the total units provided for that therapy type.

(4) The department
shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this state into two peer groups:

(a) Those facilities
located within a metropolitan statistical area; and

(b) Those not located
in a metropolitan statistical area.

Metropolitan
statistical areas and nonmetropolitan statistical areas shall be as determined
by the United States office of management and budget or other applicable
federal office. The department shall array the facilities in each peer group
from highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for each
therapy type. The department shall determine the median total cost per unit of
therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of median total cost per unit
of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type at a nursing
facility shall be the lesser of its cost per unit of therapy for each therapy
type or the median total cost per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type
for its peer group.

(5) The department
shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy care component rate allocation
as follows:

(a) To determine the
allowable total therapy cost for each therapy type, the allowable cost per unit
of therapy for each type of therapy shall be multiplied by the total therapy
units for each type of therapy;

(b) The medicaid
allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be calculated taking the allowable
total therapy cost for each therapy type times the medicaid percent of total
therapy charges for each therapy type;

(c) The medicaid
allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each therapy type shall be divided by
total adjusted medicaid days to arrive at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost
per patient day for each therapy type;

(d) The medicaid
one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each therapy type shall be
multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all residents to calculate the
total allowable one-on-one therapy expense. The lesser of the total allowable
therapy consultant expense for the therapy type or a reasonable percentage of
allowable therapy consultant expense for each therapy type, as established in
rule by the department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one
therapy expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;

(e) The allowable
therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added together, the sum of which
shall be the total allowable therapy expense for the nursing facility;

(f) The total allowable
therapy expense will be divided by the greater of adjusted total patient days
from the cost report on which the therapy expenses were reported, or patient
days at ((eighty-five)) ninety percent occupancy of licensed
beds. The outcome shall be the nursing facility's therapy care component rate
allocation.

(6) The therapy care
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(7) The therapy care
component rate shall be suspended for medicaid residents in qualified nursing
facilities designated by the department who are receiving therapy paid by the
department outside the facility daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).

Sec. 10. RCW 74.46.515 and 1999 c
353 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The support
services component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of food, food
preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and laundry services for one resident for
one day.

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
support services component rate allocation using cost report data specified by RCW
74.46.431(6).

(3) To determine each
facility's support services component rate allocation, the department shall:

(a) Array facilities'
adjusted support services costs per adjusted resident day for each facility
from facilities' cost reports from the applicable report year, for facilities
located within a metropolitan statistical area, and for those not located in any
metropolitan statistical area and determine the median adjusted cost for each
peer group;

(b) Set each facility's
support services component rate at the lower of:

(i) The
facility's per resident day adjusted support services costs from the applicable
cost report period, using the greater of adjusted resident days from the
applicable report period or imputed occupancy at ninety percent of the
facility's licensed beds; or

(ii) The
adjusted median per resident day support services cost for that facility's peer
group, either metropolitan statistical area or nonmetropolitan statistical
area, plus ten percent; and

(c) Adjust each
facility's support services component rate for economic trends and conditions
as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6).

(4) The
support services component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this
section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 11. RCW 74.46.521 and 1999 c
353 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The operations
component rate allocation corresponds to the general operation of a nursing
facility for one resident for one day, including but not limited to management,
administration, utilities, office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other supplies and
services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support services, property,
financing allowance, and variable return.

(2) Beginning October
1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
operations component rate allocation using cost report data specified by RCW
74.46.431(7)(a).

(3) To determine each
facility's operations component rate allocation the department shall:

(a) Array facilities' adjusted
general operations costs per adjusted resident day for each facility from
facilities' cost reports from the applicable report year, for facilities
located within a metropolitan statistical area and for those not located in a
metropolitan statistical area and determine the median adjusted cost for each
peer group;

(b) Set each facility's
operations component rate at the lower of:

(i) The
facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from the applicable cost
report period, utilizing the greater of adjusted resident days from the
applicable report period or imputed occupancy at ninety percent of the
facility's licensed beds; or

(ii) The
adjusted median per resident day general operations cost for that facility's
peer group, either metropolitan statistical area or nonmetropolitan
statistical area; and

(c) Adjust each
facility's operations component rate for economic trends and conditions as
provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).

(4) The operations
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section shall be
adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 12. RCW 74.46.711 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 18 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the death of a
resident with a personal fund deposited with the facility, the facility must
convey within ((forty-five)) thirty days the resident's funds,
and a final accounting of those funds, to the individual or probate jurisdiction
administering the resident's estate; but in the case of a resident who received
long-term care services paid in whole or in part by the department, the
funds and accounting shall be sent to the state of Washington, department of
social and health services, office of financial recovery. The department shall
establish a release procedure for use for burial expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 74.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The methodologies
for funding the medicaid share of the costs of nursing facility new
construction, renovation, or other capital improvement projects, shall continue
as provided by this chapter and department rule, however, effective July 1,
2001, projects eligible for this funding shall not exceed a total dollar limit
to be established by the legislature.

(2) The department is
authorized to adopt rules to administer the capital funding limit in a way that
ensures:

(a) All capital
improvement projects receive prior approval upon application for funding
submitted to the department prior to a deadline for each state fiscal year, to
be established by the department; and

(b) Projects approved
for funding receive complete funding of the medicaid share of applicable costs,
and those that are not approved receive no funding prior to approval.

(3) Nothing in this
section is intended to alter the responsibilities or functions of the
department of health in administering the certificate of need program or the construction
review of health care facility projects, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW,
however, the department of health is authorized to consider medicaid funding
approval or lack of approval in reviewing nursing facility new construction,
renovation, and other capital improvement projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The department of social
and health services shall study and develop recommendations exploring alternate
ways of paying for and providing care services to the state's needy nursing
facility residents receiving assistance under the Title XIX medicaid program.
The department of social and health services shall report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature on or before September 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 74.46.280 (Management fees,
agreements--Limitation on scope of services) and 1998 c 322 s 15, 1993 sp.s. c
13 s 4, & 1980 c 177 s 28; and

(2) RCW 74.46.908 (Repealer) and 1999 c 353
s 17.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. (1) Sections 1 through 14
of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2001.

(2)
Section 15 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect June 29, 2001.

---
END ---