BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that the AIDS omnibus act of 1988 created a network of HIV/AIDS prevention
efforts and programs in Washington state, establishing statewide policies,
programs, and procedures surrounding HIV/AIDS prevention and other HIV/AIDS care
services and programs. Since the original passage of the AIDS omnibus act in
1988, the HIV/AIDS pandemic has changed dramatically. Once impacting white,
gay men, HIV/AIDS has increased among the young, heterosexual women, people of
color, and rural communities. Consequently, the effective management and
distribution of funds and resources are necessary not only to maintain current
services, but also to meet the rising demands and needs of these new
populations.

(2) The HIV/AIDS
prevention study committee is established to consist of thirteen members. The
president of the senate shall appoint two members, one from each major party in
the senate; the co-speakers of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members, one from each major party in the house of representatives; and the
governor shall appoint eight members, including: Three members representing
the local public health; one member representing the state board of health; and
four members from the community, three of whom represent community-based
organizations, and one consumer representative living with HIV/AIDS. The state
health officer shall chair the committee.

(3) The HIV/AIDS
prevention study committee shall meet at least six times throughout 2001 at
various locations around Washington. The committee shall:

(a) Review the goals of
prevention strategies under the AIDS omnibus act in relation to trends in the
current epidemic;

(b) Analyze funding
streams and levels for the AIDS omnibus act and other HIV/AIDS prevention
funding; and

(c) Review the
interaction and coordination of HIV/AIDS prevention programs with care
services.

(4) The department of
health shall supply staffing and coordination of this section.

(5) The committee shall
submit a report of its findings and propose specific recommendations to update
the AIDS omnibus act to the Washington state legislature in January 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---