BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to provide flexibility for the department of transportation to adopt rules
that will allow certain fire-fighting apparatuses to operate on state and local
highways if they exceed existing gross weight limits currently established in
statute. The legislature recognizes that, due to their nature of operation,
fire-fighting apparatuses do not significantly contribute to the deterioration
of surface roadways. The legislature further recognizes that any exemption or
special permit that would allow the apparatuses to operate on state and local
highways should also consider any bridge located in the designated fire service
area to assure that the exemption or special permit will not result in any
potential damage to a bridge or similar structure. The legislature further
recognizes that any exemption or special permit granted as a result of this act
must not compromise existing state and federal safety standards.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.44.091 and 1989 c
52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, no special permit shall be
issued for movement on any state highway or route of a state highway within the
limits of any city or town where the gross weight, including load, exceeds the
following limits:

(a) Twenty-two thousand
pounds on a single axle or on dual axles with a wheelbase between the first and
second axles of less than three feet six inches;

(b) Forty-three
thousand pounds on dual axles having a wheelbase between the first and second
axles of not less than three feet six inches but less than seven feet;

(c) On any group of
axles or in the case of a vehicle employing two single axles with a wheel base
between the first and last axle of not less than seven feet but less than ten
feet, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying six thousand five hundred
times the distance in feet between the center of the first axle and the center
of the last axle of the group;

(d) On any group of
axles with a wheel base between the first and last axle of not less than ten
feet but less than thirty feet, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying
two thousand two hundred times the sum of twenty and the distance in feet
between the center of the first axle and the center of the last axle of the
group;

(e) On any group of
axles with a wheel base between the first and last axle of thirty feet or
greater, a weight in pounds determined by multiplying one thousand six hundred
times the sum of forty and the distance in feet between the center of the first
axle and the center of the last axle of the group.

(2) The total weight of
a vehicle or combination of vehicles allowable by special permit under
subsection (1) of this section shall be governed by the lesser of the weights
obtained by using the total number of axles as a group or any combination of
axles as a group.

(3) The weight
limitations pertaining to single axles may be exceeded to permit the movement
of equipment operating upon single pneumatic tires having a rim width of twenty
inches or more and a rim diameter of twenty-four inches or more or dual
pneumatic tires having a rim width of sixteen inches or more and a rim diameter
of twenty-four inches or more and specially designed vehicles manufactured and
certified for special permits prior to July 1, 1975.

(4) Permits may be
issued for weights in excess of the limitations contained in subsection (1) of
this section on highways or sections of highways which have been designed and
constructed for weights in excess of such limitations, or for any shipment duly
certified as necessary by military officials, or by officials of public or
private power facilities, or when in the opinion of the department of
transportation the movement or action is a necessary movement or action:
PROVIDED, That in the judgment of the department of transportation the
structures and highway surfaces on the routes involved are capable of sustaining
weights in excess of such limitations and it is not reasonable for economic or
operational considerations to transport such excess weights by rail or water
for any substantial distance of the total mileage applied for.

(5) ((Permits may be
issued for the operation of fire trucks on the public highways if the maximum
gross weight on any single axle does not exceed twenty-four thousand pounds and
the gross weight on any tandem axle does not exceed forty-three thousand
pounds.

(6))) Application shall be made in writing on
special forms provided by the department of transportation and shall be
submitted at least thirty-six hours in advance of the proposed movement. An
application for a special permit for a gross weight of any combination of
vehicles exceeding two hundred thousand pounds shall be submitted in writing to
the department of transportation at least thirty days in advance of the
proposed movement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 46.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section, "fire-fighting apparatus" means a vehicle or combination of
vehicles, owned by a regularly organized fire suppression agency, designed,
maintained, and used exclusively for fire suppression and rescue or for fire
prevention activities. These vehicles and associated loads or equipment are
necessary to protect the public safety and are considered nondivisible loads.
A vehicle or combination of vehicles that is not designed primarily for fire
suppression including, but not limited to, a hazardous materials response
vehicle, bus, mobile kitchen, mobile sanitation facility, and heavy equipment
transport vehicle is not a fire-fighting apparatus for purposes of this section.

(2) Fire-fighting
apparatus must comply with all applicable federal and state vehicle operating
and safety criteria, including rules adopted by agencies within each
jurisdiction.

(3) All owners and
operators of fire-fighting apparatus shall comply with current information,
available through the department, regarding the applicable load restrictions of
state bridges within the designated fire service area, including any automatic
or mutual aid agreement areas.

(4) Fire-fighting
apparatus operating within a fire district boundary of the owner of the
apparatus, including any automatic or mutual aid agreement areas, may operate
without a permit if:

(a) The weight does not
exceed:

(i) 600 pounds per inch
width of tire;

(ii) 24,000 pounds on a
single axle;

(iii) 43,000 pounds on
a tandem axle set;

(iv) 67,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight, subject to the gross weight limits of RCW 46.44.091(1)
(c), (d), and (e);

(v) The tire
manufacturer's tire load rating.

(b) There is no tridem
axle set.

(c) The dimensions do
not exceed:

(i) 8 feet, 6 inches
wide;

(ii) 14 feet high;

(iii) 50 feet overall
length;

(iv) 15 foot front
overhang;

(v) Rear overhang not
exceeding the length of the wheel base.

(5) The
department may grant permits for fire fighting apparatus that exceed the weight
limits in subsection (4) of this section only if they were put into operation
in this state before July 1, 2001. The department shall issue the permit on an
annual basis for the apparatus to operate within the designated fire service
area, including mutual benefit agreement areas, subject to the applicable load
restrictions of state bridges referred to in subsection (3) of this section and
any other limitations stipulated on the permit. Before issuing a permit, the
department will compare the apparatus to be permitted with the bridge load
ratings for structures on state highways within the operating area. The permit
will denote any structures where access by the apparatus is either based on
special operating instructions or is denied.

---
END ---