BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.40.092 and 1983 c
81 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Active members of
the Washington state patrol retirement system who have previously established
service credit in the public employees' retirement system while employed by the
state patrol as a cadet as defined in RCW 43.43.120(6)(b) may have such service
credit transferred to the state patrol retirement system subject to the terms
and conditions specified in chapter 43.43 RCW, including reestablishment of
such service for the sole purpose of transfer. Service reestablishment shall
be subject to the interest requirements of RCW 41.40.150(2).

(2) Active members
of the Washington state patrol retirement system who have previously
established service credit in the public employees' retirement system while
employed by the state patrol as commercial vehicle enforcement officers or
commercial vehicle officers may have such service credit transferred to the
state patrol retirement system. Any such transfer is subject to the terms and
conditions specified in chapter 43.43 RCW including reestablishment of such
service for the sole purpose of transfer. Service reestablishment shall be
subject to the interest requirements of RCW 41.40.150(2).

(3) Service
credit established for employment other than that specified in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section is not eligible for transfer.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.40.092 and 2000 c
247 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Active members of the
Washington state patrol retirement system who have previously established
service credit in the public employees' retirement system, plan 1 or plan 2
while employed by the state patrol as a cadet as defined in RCW 43.43.120(6)(b)
may have such service credit transferred to the state patrol retirement system
subject to the terms and conditions specified in chapter 43.43 RCW, including
reestablishment of such service for the sole purpose of transfer. Service
reestablishment shall be subject to the interest requirements of RCW
41.40.150(2).

(2) Active members
of the Washington state patrol retirement system who have previously
established service credit in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 or
plan 2 while employed by the state patrol as commercial vehicle enforcement
officers or commercial vehicle officers may have such service credit
transferred to the state patrol retirement system. Any such transfer is
subject to the terms and conditions specified in chapter 43.43 RCW including
reestablishment of such service for the sole purpose of transfer. Service
reestablishment shall be subject to the interest requirements of RCW
41.40.150(2).

(3) Service
credit established for employment other than that specified in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section is not eligible for transfer.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.43.130 and 1994 c
197 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A Washington state
patrol retirement fund is hereby established for members of the Washington
state patrol which shall include funds created and placed under the management
of a retirement board for the payment of retirement allowances and other
benefits under the provisions hereof.

(2) Any employee of the
Washington state patrol, upon date of commissioning, shall be eligible to
participate in the retirement plan and shall start contributing to the fund
immediately. Any employee of the Washington state patrol employed by the state
of Washington or any of its political subdivisions prior to August 1, 1947,
unless such service has been credited in another public retirement or pension
system operating in the state of Washington shall receive full credit for such
prior service but after that date each new commissioned employee must
automatically participate in the fund. If a member shall terminate service in
the patrol and later reenter, he shall be treated in all respects as a new
employee.

(3)(a) A member who
reenters or has reentered service within ten years from the date of his
termination, shall upon completion of six months of continuous service and upon
the restoration of all withdrawn contributions, plus interest as determined by
the director, which restoration must be completed within five years after
resumption of service, be returned to the status of membership he earned at the
time of termination.

(b) A member who does
not meet the time limitations for restoration under (a) of this subsection, may
restore the service credit destroyed by the withdrawn contributions by paying
the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.

(4)(a) An employee of
the Washington state patrol who becomes a member of the retirement system after
June 12, 1980, and who has service as a cadet in the patrol training program
may make an irrevocable election to transfer the service to the retirement
system. Any member upon making such election shall have transferred all
existing service credited in a prior public retirement system in this state for
periods of employment as a cadet. Transfer of credit under this subsection is
contingent on completion of the transfer of funds specified in (b) of this
subsection.

(b) Within sixty days
of notification of a member's cadet service transfer as provided in (a) of this
subsection, the department of retirement systems shall transfer the employee's
accumulated contributions attributable to the periods of service as a cadet,
including accumulated interest.

(5) A member of the
retirement system who has served or shall serve on active federal service in
the armed forces of the United States pursuant to and by reason of orders by
competent federal authority, who left or shall leave the Washington state
patrol to enter such service, and who within one year from termination of such
active federal service, resumes employment as a state employee, shall have his
service in such armed forces credited to him as a member of the retirement
system: PROVIDED, That no such service in excess of five years shall be credited
unless such service was actually rendered during time of war or emergency.

(6) An active employee
of the Washington state patrol who either became a member of the retirement
system prior to June 12, 1980, and who has prior service as a cadet in the public
employees' retirement system may make an irrevocable election to transfer such
service to the retirement system within a period ending June 30, 1985, or, if
not an active employee on July 1, 1983, within one year of returning to
commissioned service, whichever date is later. Any member upon making such
election shall have transferred all existing service credited in the public
employees' retirement system which constituted service as a cadet together with
the employee's contributions plus credited interest. If the employee has
withdrawn the employee's contributions, the contributions must be restored to
the public employees' retirement system before the transfer of credit can occur
and such restoration must be completed within the time limits specified in this
subsection for making the elective transfer.

(7) An active employee
of the Washington state patrol who either became a member of the retirement
system prior to June 12, 1980, or who has prior service as a cadet in the
public employees' retirement system may make an irrevocable election to
transfer such service to the retirement system if they have not met the time
limitations of subsection (6) of this section by paying the amount required
under RCW 41.50.165(2) less the contributions transferred. Any member upon
making such election shall have transferred all existing service credited in
the public employees' retirement system that constituted service as a cadet
together with the employee's contributions plus credited interest. If the
employee has withdrawn the employee's contributions, the contributions must be
restored to the public employees' retirement system before the transfer of
credit can occur and such restoration must be completed within the time limits
specified in subsection (6) of this section for making the elective transfer.

(8) An active employee
of the Washington state patrol may establish up to six months' retirement
service credit in the state patrol retirement system for any period of
employment by the Washington state patrol as a cadet if service credit for such
employment was not previously established in the public employees' retirement
system, subject to the following:

(a) Certification by
the patrol that such employment as a cadet was for the express purpose of
receiving on-the-job training required for attendance at the state patrol
academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper.

(b) Payment by the
member of employee contributions in the amount of seven percent of the total
salary paid for each month of service to be established, plus interest at seven
percent from the date of the probationary service to the date of payment. This
payment shall be made by the member no later than July 1, 1988.

(c) If the payment
required under (b) of this subsection was not made by July 1, 1988, the member
may establish the probationary service by paying the amount required under RCW
41.50.165(2).

(d) A written waiver by
the member of the member's right to ever establish the same service in the
public employees' retirement system at any time in the future.

(9) As authorized by
RCW 41.40.092, an active employee of the Washington state patrol who has prior
or current service as a commercial vehicle enforcement officer or a commercial
vehicle officer in the public employees' retirement system may make an
irrevocable election to transfer such service to the Washington state patrol
retirement system. The election shall be open to the member until one year
from the effective date of this section or, if not an active employee on the
effective date of this section, then within one year of returning to
commissioned service, whichever date is later. If a qualifying member makes
such an election within the time specified:

(a) If the employee
has withdrawn his or her contributions, the contributions must be restored to
the public employees' retirement system before the transfer of credit can occur
and such restoration must be completed within the time limits specified in this
subsection for making the elective transfer;

(b) The department
shall transfer all existing service credited in the public employees'
retirement system which constituted service as a commercial vehicle enforcement
officer or a commercial vehicle officer from the public employees' retirement
system to the state patrol retirement system; and

(c) The department
shall transfer all contributions made by the employee to the public employees'
retirement system while employed as a commercial vehicle enforcement officer or
a commercial vehicle officer, together with credited interest, from the public
employees' retirement system to the state patrol retirement system.

(10) The
department of retirement systems shall make the requested transfer subject to
the conditions specified in subsections (6) and (7) of this section or
establish additional credit as provided in subsection (8) of this section.
Employee contributions and credited interest transferred shall be credited to
the employee's account in the Washington state patrol retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Section 1 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 2 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---