BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c
347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
governments shall develop or amend, within twenty-four months after the ((adoption
of guidelines as provided in)) legislature has voted to approve
guidelines adopted by the department under RCW 90.58.060, a master program
for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the
required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department and approved
by the legislature.

---
END ---