BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares:

(1) The national board
for professional teaching standards has established high and rigorous standards
for what highly accomplished teachers should know and be able to do in order to
increase student learning results;

(2) The national board
certifies teachers who meet these standards through a rigorous,
performance-based assessment process;

(3) A certificate
awarded by the national board attests that a teacher has met high and rigorous
standards and has demonstrated the ability to make sound professional judgments
about how to best meet students' learning needs and effectively help students
meet challenging academic standards;

(4) Teachers who attain
national board certification should be acknowledged and rewarded in order to
encourage more teachers to pursue certification for the benefit of Washington
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.405 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the compensation received under the salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200, teachers who have attained certification by
the national board for professional teaching standards shall receive an annual
fifteen percent salary bonus for the duration of their national board for
professional teaching standards certification. The fifteen percent bonus shall
be calculated as follows: Multiply the school district's derived base salary
for certificated instructional staff by the national board certified teacher's
staff mix factor, and multiply that amount by fifteen percent. The school
district's derived base salary shall be determined by using the LEAP document
for base salaries cited in the appropriations act. The national board
certified teacher's staff mix factor shall be determined by using the LEAP
document for staff mix factors cited in the appropriations act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null
and void.

---
END ---