BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.60.010 and 2000
c 11 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Accredited
boating educator" means a person or organization accredited under section
7 of this act to provide a course of mandatory boating safety education.

(2) "Accredited
course" means a mandatory course of instruction on boating safety
education that has been accredited by the commission under section 7 of this
act.

(3) "Accredited
test" means a test that has been accredited by the commission under
section 9 of this act.

(4) "Boat
wastes" includes, but is not limited to, sewage, garbage, marine debris,
plastics, contaminated bilge water, cleaning solvents, paint scrapings, or
discarded petroleum products associated with the use of vessels.

(((2))) (5)
"Boater" means any person on a vessel on waters of the state of
Washington.

(((3))) (6)
"Boater education card" means a card issued by an accredited boating
educator to a person who:

(a) Successfully
completed the course before September 1, 2000;

(b) Has successfully
completed an accredited course; or

(c) Has passed an
accredited test.

(7)
"Carrying passengers for hire" means carrying passengers in a vessel
on waters of the state for valuable consideration, whether given directly or
indirectly or received by the owner, agent, operator, or other person having an
interest in the vessel. This shall not include trips where expenses for food,
transportation, or incidentals are shared by participants on an even basis.
Anyone receiving compensation for skills or money for amortization of equipment
and carrying passengers shall be considered to be carrying passengers for hire
on waters of the state.

(((4))) (8)
"Certificate of competency" means a certificate in a form approved by
the commission to be issued by the provider of a rental motor vessel or the
provider of a recently delivered vessel certifying that the person renting the
vessel or having recently received the vessel has successfully completed a
motor vessel safety check list and is competent to operate that vessel.

(9)
"Commission" means the state parks and recreation commission.

(((5))) (10)
"Darkness" means that period between sunset and sunrise.

(((6))) (11)
"Educated operator" means a person who has met the mandatory boating
safety education requirements established in section 7 or 9 of this act.

(12)
"Environmentally sensitive area" means a restricted body of water
where discharge of untreated sewage from boats is especially detrimental
because of limited flushing, shallow water, commercial or recreational
shellfish, swimming areas, diversity of species, the absence of other pollution
sources, or other characteristics.

(((7))) (13)
"Guide" means any individual, including but not limited to
subcontractors and independent contractors, engaged for compensation or other
consideration by a whitewater river outfitter for the purpose of operating
vessels. A person licensed under RCW ((77.32.211 or 75.28.780)) 77.65.440
or 77.65.480 and acting as a fishing guide is not considered a guide for
the purposes of this chapter.

(((8))) (14)
"Horsepower" means the rated amount of mechanical power of the engine
actually being used at any particular time.

(15)
"Marina" means a facility providing boat moorage space, fuel, or
commercial services. Commercial services include but are not limited to
overnight or live‑aboard boating accommodations.

(((9))) (16)
"Motor driven boats and vessels" means all boats and vessels which
are self propelled.

(((10))) (17)
"Motor vessel safety check list" means a printed list of the safety
requirements of a motor vessel being rented or having been recently delivered
and meeting the minimum requirements established by the commission in
accordance with section 7 of this act.

(18)
"Muffler" or "muffler system" means a sound suppression
device or system, including an underwater exhaust system, designed and
installed to abate the sound of exhaust gases emitted from an internal
combustion engine and that prevents excessive or unusual noise.

(((11))) (19)
"National association of boating law administrators" means the
organization of state and local law enforcement officers, boating safety
experts, and the administrative personnel who are responsible for boating
safety programs.

(20)
"Observer" means the individual riding in a vessel who is responsible
for observing a water skier at all times.

(21)
"Operate" means to steer, direct, or otherwise have physical control
of a vessel that is underway.

(((12))) (22)
"Operator" means an individual who steers, directs, or otherwise has
physical control of a vessel that is underway or exercises actual authority to
control the person at the helm.

(((13)
"Observer" means the individual riding in a vessel who is responsible
for observing a water skier at all times.

(14))) (23) "Out-of-state education
card" means a document issued under the Canadian mandatory boating safety
education law or under the law of a state meeting safety education requirements
similar to the minimum requirements established by the commission.

(24)
"Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of a
vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal action whether
or not the vessel is subject to a security interest.

(((15))) (25)
"Person" means any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization, limited liability company,
firm, association, or other legal entity located within or outside this state.

(((16))) (26)
"Personal flotation device" means a buoyancy device, life preserver,
buoyant vest, ring buoy, or buoy cushion that is designed to float a person in
the water and that is approved by the commission.

(((17))) (27)
"Personal watercraft" means a vessel of less than sixteen feet that
uses a motor powering a water jet pump, as its primary source of motive power
and that is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling
on, or being towed behind the vessel, rather than in the conventional manner of
sitting or standing inside the vessel.

(((18))) (28)
"Polluted area" means a body of water used by boaters that is
contaminated by boat wastes at unacceptable levels, based on applicable water
quality and shellfish standards.

(((19))) (29)
"Proof of age" means a boater education card, birth certificate,
passport, driver's license, or other official document that states a person's
date of birth.

(30) "Proof of
residency" means a passport, driver's license, or other official
government document that states a person's place of residence.

(31)
"Public entities" means all elected or appointed bodies, including
tribal governments, responsible for collecting and spending public funds.

(((20))) (32)
"Recently delivered vessel" means a motor vessel delivered within the
previous sixty days under a lease exceeding sixty days, under a purchase, or by
gift.

(33)
"Reckless" or "recklessly" means acting carelessly and
heedlessly in a willful and wanton disregard of the rights, safety, or property
of another.

(((21))) (34)
"Rental motor vessel" means a motor vessel being rented for sixty
days or less.

(35)
"Sewage pumpout or dump unit" means:

(a) A receiving chamber
or tank designed to receive vessel sewage from a "porta‑potty"
or a portable container; and

(b) A stationary or
portable mechanical device on land, a dock, pier, float, barge, vessel, or
other location convenient to boaters, designed to remove sewage waste from
holding tanks on vessels.

(((22))) (36)
"Underway" means that a vessel is not at anchor, or made fast to the
shore, or aground.

(((23))) (37)
"Vessel" includes every description of watercraft on the water, other
than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on
the water. However, it does not include inner tubes, air mattresses,
sailboards, and small rafts or flotation devices or toys customarily used by
swimmers.

(((24))) (38)
"Water skiing" means the physical act of being towed behind a vessel
on, but not limited to, any skis, aquaplane, kneeboard, tube, or any other
similar device.

(((25))) (39)
"Waters of the state" means any waters within the territorial limits
of Washington state.

(((26))) (40)
"Whitewater river outfitter" means any person who is advertising to
carry or carries passengers for hire on any whitewater river of the state, but
does not include any person whose only service on a given trip is providing
instruction in canoeing or kayaking skills.

(((27))) (41)
"Whitewater rivers of the state" means those rivers and streams, or
parts thereof, within the boundaries of the state as listed in RCW 79A.60.470
or as designated by the commission under RCW 79A.60.495.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A person may not
operate a motor vessel under mechanical power of more than ten horsepower
unless the person is at least thirteen years old, and:

(a) Has in the person's
possession on the vessel a boater education card and has proof of age;

(b) Possesses a valid
master's, mate's, or motorboat operator's license issued by the United States
coast guard, or issued by another country in a form recognized by the United
States coast guard, or is working under and supervised directly by a person so
licensed;

(c) Possesses a
certificate under the international standards for training, certification, and
watchkeeping for seafarers;

(d) Is authorized to
operate the vessel as an enforcement officer, a member of a branch of the
military, scientific service, or other similar government service;

(e) Possesses proof of
residency showing the person not a resident of this state, and is operating a
motor vessel that has not been in Washington state for more than sixty
consecutive days;

(f) Possesses a current
out-of-state education card;

(g) Has in the person's
possession a rental motor vessel safety check list and certificate of
competency for the rental motor vessel being operated;

(h) Is the lessee of a
vessel on a lease exceeding sixty days, or the owner of a vessel delivered
within the previous sixty days, and has in the person's possession a motor
vessel safety check list and certificate of competency for the recently
delivered vessel being operated;

(i) Has successfully
completed a boating safety course substantially equivalent to an accredited
course before September 30, 2002, and has in the person's possession and
exhibits to an enforcement officer a certificate or other creditable written
proof of that completion;

(j) Is accompanied by
and under the direct supervision of a person at least sixteen years old who is
an educated operator;

(k) Is an educated
operator ten to fourteen years old operating a motor vessel being powered by an
engine of twenty horsepower or less, provided that the vessel so powered is
proved to be incapable of reaching speeds in excess of twenty miles per hour;

(l) Is an educated
operator twelve to fifteen years old operating a motor vessel being powered by
an engine greater than twenty horsepower if accompanied by and under the direct
supervision of a parent, guardian, or responsible educated operator at least
sixteen years old. However, the vessel so powered must be incapable of
reaching speeds in excess of thirty-five miles per hour as loaded; or

(m) Is not yet required
to have a boater education card under subsection (3) of this section.

(2)(a) The operation of
a vessel carrying passengers for hire in violation of this section is a
misdemeanor.

(b) All other
violations of this section are civil infractions.

(3) This section
applies as follows:

(a) Beginning January
1, 2002, this section applies to an operator born after April 1, 1985, who
operates a motor vessel powered by more than ten horsepower;

(b) Beginning January
1, 2003, this section applies to a person born before April 1, 1985, who
operates a motor vessel powered by more than ten horsepower that is less than
four meters in length; and

(c) Beginning January
1, 2009, this section applies to any person who operates a motor vessel of any
length.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. In a proceeding for a
violation of section 2 of this act for the operation of a vessel not carrying
passengers for hire, the court may conditionally suspend all or part of the
fine to be imposed if the defendant appears personally and agrees to complete
within the time limits imposed by the court, and at the defendant's own
expense, an accredited course.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A certificate of
competency for a rental vessel is valid only for the period or periods of
rental of that vessel or of the period of the rental of a vessel from the same
provider that is of similar size, design, and power. A certificate of
competency for a recently delivered vessel is valid for the lesser of: (a) The
time specified in the certificate; (b) until the lessee or the owner is issued
a boater education card; or (c) sixty days from the date of issue of the
certificate. A certificate of competency must state the time limitations on
its validity.

(2) A violation of this
section is an infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. When an enforcement
officer has a reason to believe that there has been a violation of this
chapter, the enforcement officer may require the operator to present a boater
education card, proof of age, proof of residency, or other document required to
comply with section 2 of this act. Failure to exhibit a document required to
comply with section 2 of this act constitutes prima facie evidence of a
violation of section 2 of this act. An operator may rebut the prima facie
evidence by presenting to the court evidence that he or she was operating the motor
vessel in compliance with section 2 of this act on the date of the violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) A person may not:

(a) Give a false
statement in order to obtain a boater education card for the person or another;

(b) Exhibit to an
enforcement officer an altered boater education card;

(c) Forge or alter a
boater education card, certificate of accreditation, certificate of competency,
or a motor vessel safety check list;

(d) Produce or possess
an unauthorized replica of a boater education card or a certificate of
competency; or

(e) Permit another to
use a boater education card issued in their name.

(2) A violation of this
section is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. In consultation with the
Washington state boating safety council, the commission shall establish and
implement a program of mandatory boating safety education. In establishing the
mandatory boating safety education program, the commission shall by rule
establish minimum standards:

(1) For a mandatory
boating safety education course that are consistent with the applicable
standards established by the national association of state boating law
administrators and that take into consideration the mandatory boating safety
education requirement of Canada. The commission may revise the minimum
education standards as necessary to meet changes in standards by other
jurisdictions;

(2) To issue accredited
course certification to commercial and volunteer organizations that provide boating
safety education courses. These organizations must meet the standards adopted
by the commission by rule for an accredited boating educator;

(3) To produce a
waterproof and counterfeit resistant form of a boater education card to be
issued by an accredited boating educator showing satisfactory completion of the
accredited course;

(4) For motor vessel
safety check lists and a form of certificate of competency to be issued by
providers of rental motor vessels or recently delivered vessels as prerequisite
to operating such a vessel by a person not possessing a boater education card;
and

(5) To issue accredited
course certification or a written statement of the reason for denying
accreditation to a commercial or volunteer organization that provides boating
safety education courses within a reasonable time after receiving an
application to become an accredited course.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Boating safety courses
offered as part of the regular programs of the United States coast guard
auxiliary and the United States power squadrons are declared accredited courses
and these organizations are accredited boating educators and authorized to
issue boater education cards to persons who have successfully completed an
accredited course. These organizations may issue a boater education card to
individuals who have successfully completed a United States coast guard
auxiliary or United States power squadrons boating safety course prior to the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. As an alternative to
taking an accredited course as required under section 7 of this act, an
operator may choose to take an accredited test.

(1) The commission may
accredit a test that:

(a) Uses association items,
multiple choice questions, or short answer questions; and

(b) Includes at least
the collision rules and the rules stated in RCW 79A.60.010 through 79A.60.220;
and

(c) Covers the minimum
standards for an accredited course.

(2) An accredited test
must be administered, proctored, and supervised for its duration by an
accredited boating educator or by another person approved by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The commission may not
require that the course content and printed material for an accredited course
include more than that required by the standards of the national association of
boating law administrators. At the discretion of the accredited boating
educator, an accredited course may include content and printed material on
boating education that is additional to the standards published by the national
association of boating law administrators.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. At least annually, an
accredited boating educator shall, for statistical purposes only, submit to the
commission a record of the number of boating education cards issued. An
accredited boating educator shall keep a record of the names of the persons issued
boater education cards within the previous ten years, but is not required to
submit this information to the state unless it ceases to be an accredited
boating educator.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 2 through 11 of
this act are each added to chapter 79A.60 RCW.

---
END ---