BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The purpose of this
chapter is to

_7 establish a certification program for managers of mobile
home

_8 parks.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Unless the context
clearly requires

10 otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this

11 chapter.

12 (1) "Advisory council" means the advisory
council on mobile

13 home park manager training and certification created in
section 7

14 of this act.

15 (2) "Department" means the department of
community, trade, and

16 economic development.

p. 1 SB
5694

_1 (3) "Director" means the director of the
department of

_2 community, trade, and economic development.

_3 (4) "Mobile home park" has the same
meaning as in RCW

_4 59.20.030.

_5 (5) "Mobile home park management" means
those actions,

_6 functions, or duties related to the management of a
mobile home

_7 park.

_8 (6) "Mobile home park manager" means a
person who performs

_9 mobile home park management duties and is required to be
certified

10 under this chapter to perform mobile home park management
services

11 and includes resident owners of mobile home parks who
perform

12 management duties.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A person will not
manage a mobile home

14 park in this state for any mobile home park with more
than twenty-

15 five mobile home lots until a certificate of
registration

16 certifying him or her as a mobile home park manager has
been

17 issued to him or her by the director in accordance with
this

18 chapter, except that a person initially employed as a
park manager

19 after the effective date of this act may be employed in
that

20 capacity for no more than ninety consecutive days
following

21 commencement of employment. At the end of that
ninety-day period

22 the park manager must have attained certification in
accordance

23 with this chapter or immediately cease their employment.

24 (2) A corporation, partnership, trust, association,
sole

25 proprietor, or other like organization may own or
operate a mobile

26 home park or engage in the business of mobile home park
management

27 without being certified if it employs, retains, or
contracts with

28 certified natural persons who are registered mobile home
park

29 managers subject to this chapter.

30 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The director will
not issue an initial

31 certificate of registration to any person to act as a
mobile home

32 park manager until that person has:

33 (a) Executed a written application on a form
prescribed by the

34 director, subscribed and sworn to by the applicant;

35 (b) Attended and completed a department-approved
training

36 course for mobile home park managers;

SB 5694 p. 2

_1 (c) Passed an examination approved by the department
which

_2 demonstrates that the applicant has a fundamental
knowledge of the

_3 manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act under
chapter 59.20

_4 RCW; and

_5 (d) Paid to the director a fee authorized in section
8 of this

_6 act.

_7 (2) Certificates of registration are effective on
the date

_8 issued by the department and must be renewed every two
years.

_9 (3) A certificate of registration may be renewed
annually

10 provided the applicant provides evidence of continuing
education

11 as approved by the department. This evidence must be submitted
with

12 an application to renew certification. A maximum of
eight hours of

13 continuing education biennially may be required by the
department

14 for renewal of certification.

15 (4) As of the effective date of this section, mobile
home park

16 managers may present a verification of having
successfully

17 completed a training course conducted by a statewide
trade

18 association of mobile home park owners, which will
satisfy the

19 initial training requirement for one year and entitle
the park

20 manager to certification for that year.

21 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The department will
contract with a

22 statewide trade association exclusively representing
mobile home

23 park owners for the delivery of training courses required
by this

24 chapter. Training courses shall be made available
within ninety

25 days after the effective date of this section. The
trade

26 association may charge a fee for delivery of the
training

27 courses. The department, in consultation with the
advisory council,

28 will approve the curriculum of the training program.

29 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) The department,
in consultation with

30 the advisory council, will administer, coordinate, and
enforce

31 this chapter, develop the examination of applicants, and
be

32 responsible for the granting of certificates to
qualified persons.

33 (2) The department is authorized to adopt rules that
are

34 necessary to implement, enforce, and interpret this
chapter.

35 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) There is created
an advisory council

p. 3 SB
5694

_1 on mobile home park manager training and certification.
The council

_2 consists of five members as follows: Two members of the
council

_3 must be residents of mobile home parks; two members must
be owners

_4 of mobile home parks; and one member must be the
director or the

_5 director's designee, who serves as the chair of the
council and is

_6 a nonvoting member. The resident members of the council
must be

_7 selected from nominees submitted by organizations that
represent

_8 mobile home owners. The park owner members of the
council must be

_9 selected from nominees submitted by the manufacturing
housing

10 communities of Washington. The director will appoint
the members

11 for terms of two years.

12 (2) Members of the council will serve without
compensation but

13 are entitled to receive reimbursement for travel
expenses as

14 provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

15 (3) The functions of the advisory council are to:

16 (a) Review, evaluate, and advise the department
concerning

17 revisions and adoption of rules affecting certification
of mobile

18 home park managers and the fees to be charged under
section 8 of

19 this act; and

20 (b) Develop, review, revise, and approve, in
consultation with

21 the department, the program for certification of mobile
home park

22 managers.

23 (4) The advisory council will meet at the call of
its chair, at

24 the request of a majority of its membership, at the
request of the

25 department, or at such times as are prescribed by rule.

26 (5) The department will provide adequate staff
support to the

27 advisory council to assist it in fulfilling its duties.

28 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The department may
charge reasonable fees

29 for services under this chapter that include, but are
not limited

30 to, the initial application fee, an application renewal
fee, and

31 fees for manager certification training costs. These
fees are not

32 intended to exceed the cost of providing the service
under this

33 chapter.

34 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 3 and 4 of
this act are necessary

35 for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or

SB 5694 p. 4

_1 safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public

_2 institutions, and take effect July 1, 2001.

_3 NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If any provision of
this act or its

_4 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

_5 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

_6 persons or circumstances is not affected.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. The sum of thirty‑five
thousand dollars,

_8 or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the

_9 fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund
to the

10 department of community, trade, and economic development
for the

11 purposes of this act.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 1 through
10 of this act

13 constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5694