BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares:

(1) Teacher
qualifications and effectiveness are the most important influences on student
learning in schools.

(2) Preparation of
individuals to become well-qualified, effective teachers must be high quality.

(3) Teachers who
complete high-quality alternative route programs with intensive field-based
experience, adequate coursework, and strong mentorship do as well or better
than teachers who complete traditional preparation programs.

(4) High-quality
alternative route programs can provide more flexibility and expedience for
individuals to transition from their current career to teaching.

(5) High-quality
alternative route programs can help school districts fill subject matter
shortage areas and areas with shortages due to geographic location.

(6) Regardless of
route, all candidates for residency teacher certification must meet the high
standards required by the state.

The legislature
recognizes widespread concerns about the potential for teacher shortages and
finds that classified instructional staff in public schools represent a great
untapped resource for recruiting the teachers of the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. There is hereby created a
statewide partnership grant program to provide new high-quality alternative
routes to residency teacher certification. To the extent funds are
appropriated, funds provided under this partnership grant program shall be used
solely for school districts, or consortia of school districts, to partner with
state-approved higher education teacher preparation programs to provide one or
more of three alternative route programs in section 5 of this act, aimed at
recruiting candidates to teaching in subject matter shortage areas and areas
with shortages due to geographic location. Districts, or consortia of
districts, may also include their educational service districts in their
partnership grant program. Partnership programs receiving grants may enroll
candidates as early as January 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Each district or
consortia of school districts applying for state funds through this program
shall submit a proposal to the Washington professional educator standards board
specifying:

(a) Which route or
routes the partnership program intends to offer and a detailed description of
how routes will be structured and operated by the partnership;

(b) The number of
candidates that will be enrolled per route;

(c) Identification,
indication of commitment, and description of role of approved teacher
preparation programs partnering with the district or consortia of districts;

(d) An assurance of
district provision of adequate training for mentor teachers either through
participation in a state mentor training academy or district-provided training
that meets state-established mentor-training standards specific to the
mentoring of alternative route candidates;

(e) An assurance of the
provision of significant time for mentor teachers with the alternative route
teacher candidates throughout the internship. Partnerships must provide
mentoring in classrooms until such time that the candidates demonstrate
competency necessary to manage the classroom with supervision and guidance from
a mentor;

(f) A description of
the rigorous screening process for applicants to alternative route programs,
including entry requirements specific to each route, as provided in section 5
of this act; and

(g) Development and use
of a teacher development plan for each candidate that specifies the alternative
route coursework and training required of each candidate by comparing the
candidate's prior experience and coursework with the state's new
performance-based standards for residency certification and adjusting requirements
accordingly.

(2) Districts may apply
for funds through this program for stipends for interns during their mentored
internship and for stipends for mentorship program.

(3) Districts may
enroll candidates seeking endorsements in nonshortage areas, however these
candidates are not eligible for state funds under this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The professional
educator standards board, with support from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, shall select school districts and consortia of school
districts to receive partnership grants from funds appropriated by the
legislature for this purpose. Factors to be considered in selecting proposals
include:

(a) The degree to which
the district, or consortia of districts in partnership, are currently
experiencing teacher shortages;

(b) The degree to which
the proposal addresses criteria specified in section 3 of this act and is in
keeping with specifications of program routes in section 5 of this act;

(c) The
cost-effectiveness of the proposed program; and

(d) Demonstrated
district and in-kind contributions to the program.

(2) Selection of
proposals shall also take into consideration the need to ensure an adequate
number of candidates for each type of route in order to evaluate their success.

(3) Funds appropriated
for the partnership grant program in this chapter shall be administered by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Partnership grants funded
under this chapter shall operate one to three specific route programs.

(1) Partnership grant
programs seeking funds to operate route one programs shall enroll currently
employed classified instructional employees with transferable associate degrees
seeking residency teacher certification with endorsements in special education
or English as a second language. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in
this route will complete both their bachelor's degree and requirements for
residency certification in two years or less, including a mentored internship
to be completed in the final year. In addition, partnership programs shall
uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:

(a) District or
building validation of qualifications, including three years of successful
student interaction and leadership as a classified instructional employee;

(b) Successful passage
of the statewide basic skills exam, when available; and

(c) Meeting the age,
good moral character, and personal fitness requirements adopted by rule for
teachers.

(2) Partnership grant
programs seeking funds to operate route two programs shall enroll currently
employed classified staff with bachelors' degrees seeking residency teacher
certification in subject matter shortage areas and areas with shortages due to
geographic location. Candidates enrolled in this route must complete a
mentored internship complemented by flexibly scheduled training and coursework
offered at a local site, such as a school or educational service district, or
on-line or via video-conference over the K-20 network, in collaboration with
the partnership program's higher education partner. In addition, partnership
grant programs shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:

(a) District or
building validation of qualifications, including three years of successful
student interaction and leadership as classified staff;

(b) A bachelor of arts
or bachelor of science degree. The individual's grade point average will be
considered as a factor;

(c) Successful
completion of the content test, once the state content test is available;

(d) Meeting the age,
good moral character, and personal fitness requirements adopted by rule for
teachers; and

(e) Successful passage
of the statewide basic skills exam, when available.

(3) Partnership grant
programs seeking funds to operate route three programs shall enroll individuals
with bachelors' degrees seeking residency teacher certification in subject
matter shortage areas, other than special education or English as a second
language, or shortages due to geographic location. Cohorts of candidates for
this route shall attend an intensive summer teaching academy, followed by a
full year employed by a district in a mentored internship, followed, if necessary,
by a second summer teaching academy. In addition, partnership programs shall
uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:

(a) Five years'
experience in the work force;

(b) A bachelor of arts
or bachelor of science degree. The individual's grade point average will be
considered as a factor;

(c) Successful
completion of the content test, once the state content test is available;

(d) External validation
of qualifications, including demonstrated successful experience with students
or children, such as references letters and letters of support from previous
employers;

(e) Meeting the age,
good moral character, and personal fitness requirements adopted by rule for
teachers; and

(f) Successful passage
of statewide basic skills exams, when available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The alternative route
conditional scholarship program is created under the following guidelines:

(1) The program shall
be administered by the higher education coordinating board. In administering
the program, the higher education coordinating board has the following powers
and duties:

(a) To adopt necessary
rules and develop guidelines to administer the program;

(b) To collect and
manage repayments from participants who do not meet their service obligations;
and

(c) To accept grants
and donations from public and private sources for the program.

(2) The Washington
professional educator standards board shall select the classified instructional
staff and other classified staff accepted in alternative routes one or two
through the partnership grant program, as described in section 5 of this act,
who are eligible to receive conditional scholarships.

(3) In order to receive
conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall be accepted and maintain
enrollment in alternative certification routes one or two through the
partnership grant program, as provided in section 5 of this act. Recipients
must continue to make satisfactory progress towards completing the alternative
route certification program and receiving a residency teaching certificate.

(4) For the purpose of
this chapter, a conditional scholarship is a loan that is forgiven in exchange
for service as a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12
public school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients that fail to
continue a course of study leading to residency teacher certification or cease
to teach in a public school in the state of Washington in their endorsement
area are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest.

(5) Recipients who fail
to fulfill the required teaching obligation are required to repay the remaining
loan principal with interest and any other applicable fees. The higher
education coordinating board shall adopt rules to define the terms for
repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.

(6) To the extent funds
are appropriated, the annual amount of the scholarship is the annual cost of
tuition for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled, not to exceed four thousand dollars. The board may adjust the
annual award by the rate of undergraduate resident tuition increases at the
public four-year research institutions of higher education.

(7) The higher
education coordinating board may deposit all appropriations, collections, and
any other funds received for the program in this chapter in the student loan
account authorized in RCW 28B.102.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This chapter expires June
30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The Washington state
institute for public policy shall submit to the education and fiscal committees
of the legislature, the governor, and the Washington professional educator
standards board an interim evaluation of partnership grant programs funded
under this act by December 1, 2002, and a final evaluation by December 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION.
Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

---
END ---