BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
82.04.260 and 1998 c 312 s 5 and 1998 c 311 s 2 are

_7 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

_8 (1) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the

_9 business of manufacturing:

10 (a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley,
soybeans into

11 soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or
canola

12 byproducts, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to
such

13 persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be

14 equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil,
canola meal,

15 or canola byproduct manufactured, multiplied by the rate
of 0.138

16 percent;

17 (b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw
frozen, or raw

18 salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by
that

p. 1 SB
5696

_1 person; as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such

_2 business shall be equal to the value of the products
manufactured,

_3 multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; ((and))

_4 (c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or

_5 dehydrating fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at
wholesale

_6 fresh fruits and vegetables canned, preserved, frozen,
processed,

_7 or dehydrated by the seller and sold to purchasers who
transport

_8 in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as

_9 to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business

10 shall be equal to the value of the products canned,
preserved,

11 frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied by the rate
of 0.138

12 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports in
the

13 ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the
seller

14 shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed
by the

15 department and retain the statement as a business record;
and

16 (d) Dairy products that as of the effective date
of this

17 section are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts
131, 133,

18 and 135, including byproducts from the manufacturing
of the dairy

19 products such as whey and casein; or selling the same
to

20 purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the

21 goods out of state; as to such persons the tax
imposed shall be

22 equal to the value of the products manufactured
multiplied by the

23 rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person
who transports

24 in the ordinary course of business goods out of this
state, the

25 seller shall annually provide a statement in a form
prescribed by

26 the department and retain the statement as a business
record.

27 (2) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the

28 business of splitting or processing dried peas; as to
such persons

29 the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to

30 the value of the peas split or processed, multiplied by
the rate

31 of 0.138 percent.

32 (3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit
association

33 engaging within this state in research and development,
as to such

34 corporations and associations, the amount of tax with
respect to

35 such activities shall be equal to the gross income
derived from

36 such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

37 (4) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the

38 business of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing
perishable

SB 5696 p. 2

_1 meat products and/or selling the same at wholesale only
and not at

_2 retail; as to such persons the tax imposed shall be
equal to the

_3 gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the
rate of

_4 0.138 percent.

_5 (5) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the

_6 business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
nuclear fuel

_7 assemblies manufactured by that person, as to such
persons the

_8 amount of tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the

_9 gross proceeds of sales of the assemblies multiplied by
the rate

10 of 0.275 percent.

11 (6) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the

12 business of manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to
such

13 persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be

14 equal to the value of the products manufactured
multiplied by the

15 rate of 0.275 percent.

16 (7) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the

17 business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator;
as to such

18 persons the amount of the tax with respect to such
activities

19 shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities

20 multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

21 (8) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as

22 an international steamship agent, international customs
house

23 broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or
cargo

24 charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international
air cargo

25 agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with
respect to

26 only international activities shall be equal to the
gross income

27 derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275

28 percent.

29 (9) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the

30 business of stevedoring and associated activities
pertinent to the

31 movement of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or

32 foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax
with

33 respect to such business shall be equal to the gross
proceeds

34 derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275

35 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be

36 exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that

37 portion of their business subject to taxation under this

38 subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities
pertinent to the

p. 3 SB
5696

_1 conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or

_2 foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a
labor, service

_3 or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or
unloaded

_4 to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or
under a wharf,

_5 pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or

_6 similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement

_7 in import or export or may move to a consolidation
freight station

_8 and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or
otherwise

_9 segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any
mode of

10 transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific
activities

11 included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling,
loading,

12 unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of
delivery to

13 the consignee or a convenient place for further movement
to export

14 mode; documentation services in connection with the
receipt,

15 delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo
required in

16 the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling
prior to

17 delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and
incidental vessel

18 services, including but not limited to plugging and
unplugging

19 refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other

20 refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch
covers.

21 (10) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the

22 business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in
RCW

23 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of the tax
with respect

24 to such business shall be equal to the gross income of
the

25 business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter
43.200 RCW,

26 multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.

27 If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable
to

28 activities both within and without this state, the gross
income

29 attributable to this state shall be determined in
accordance with

30 the methods of apportionment required under RCW
82.04.460.

31 (11) Upon every person engaging within this state as
an

32 insurance agent, insurance broker, or insurance
solicitor licensed

33 under chapter 48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount
of the tax

34 with respect to such licensed activities shall be equal
to the

35 gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484

36 percent.

37 (12) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business

38 as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is
operated

SB 5696 p. 4

_1 as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its
political

_2 subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect

_3 to such activities shall be equal to the gross income of
the

_4 business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through
June 30,

_5 1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter. The moneys collected
under this

_6 subsection shall be deposited in the health services
account

_7 created under RCW 43.72.900.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
August 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5696