BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 68.50.320 and 1984 c
17 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

When a person reported
missing has not been found within thirty days of the report, the sheriff, chief
of police, county coroner or county medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority initiating and conducting the investigation for the missing person
shall ask the missing person's family or next of kin to give written consent to
contact the dentist or dentists of the missing person and request the person's
dental records.

When a person reported
missing has not been found within thirty days, the sheriff, chief of police, or
other law enforcement authority initiating and conducting the investigation for
the missing person shall confer with the county coroner or medical examiner
prior to the preparation of a missing person's report. After conferring with
the coroner or medical examiner, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law
enforcement authority shall submit a missing person's report and the dental
records received under this section to the dental identification system of the
state patrol identification and criminal history section on forms supplied by
the state patrol for such purpose.

When a person reported
missing has been found, the sheriff, chief of police, coroner or medical
examiner, or other law enforcement authority shall report such information to
the state patrol. ((The dental identification system shall then erase all
records with respect to such person.))

The dental
identification system shall maintain a file of information regarding persons
reported to it as missing ((and who have not been reported found)). The
file shall contain the information referred to in this section and such other
information as the state patrol finds relevant to assist in the location of a
missing person.

The files
of the dental identification system shall, upon request, be made available to
law enforcement agencies attempting to locate missing persons.

--- END ---