BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 68.50.330 and 1984 c
17 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

If the county coroner
or county medical examiner investigating a death is unable to establish the
identity of a body or human remains by visual means, fingerprints, or other
identifying data, he or she shall have a qualified dentist, as determined by
the county coroner or county medical examiner, carry out a dental examination
of the body or human remains. If the county coroner or county medical examiner
with the aid of the dental examination and other identifying findings is still
unable to establish the identity of the body or human remains, he or she shall
prepare and forward such dental examination records within thirty days of
the date the body or human remains were found to the dental identification
system of the state patrol identification and criminal history section on forms
supplied by the state patrol for such purposes.

The dental
identification system shall act as a repository or computer center or both with
respect to such dental examination records. It shall compare such dental
examination records with dental records filed with it and shall determine which
scoring probabilities are the highest for the purposes of identification. It
shall then submit such information to the county coroner or county medical
examiner who prepared and forwarded the dental examination records.

--- END ---