BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.600.100 and 1990
c 33 s 499 are each amended to read as follows:

Each year high ((schools))
school students, who live in the state of Washington ((graduate a
significant number of students who have distinguished)) and either
attend a public or private high school in Washington or commute to a private
high school in Oregon or Idaho, distinguish themselves through outstanding
academic achievement. The purpose of RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 is to
establish a consistent and uniform program which will recognize and honor the
accomplishments of these students; encourage and facilitate privately funded
scholarship awards among them; stimulate the recruitment of outstanding
students to Washington public and private colleges and universities; and allow
educational and legislative leaders, as well as the governor, to reaffirm the
importance of educational excellence to the future of this state.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.600.110 and 1994
c 234 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

There is established by
the legislature of the state of Washington the Washington state scholars
program. The purposes of this program annually are to:

(1) Provide for the
selection of three seniors residing in each legislative district in the state
graduating from high schools who have distinguished themselves academically
among their peers.

(2) Maximize public
awareness of the academic achievement, leadership ability, and community
contribution of high school seniors who attend either a Washington state
public ((and)) or private high school ((seniors)) or a
private high school in Oregon or Idaho if the student continues to live in
Washington and commutes to the private school, through appropriate
recognition ceremonies and events at both the local and state level.

(3) Provide a listing
of the Washington scholars to all Washington state public and private colleges
and universities to facilitate communication regarding academic programs and
scholarship availability.

(4) Make available a
state level mechanism for utilization of private funds for scholarship awards
to outstanding high school seniors.

(5) Provide, on written
request and with student permission, a listing of the Washington scholars to
private scholarship selection committees for notification of scholarship
availability.

(6) Permit a waiver of
tuition and services and activities fees as provided for in RCW 28B.15.543 and
grants under RCW 28B.80.245.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

Each year
on or before February 1st, the principal of any student who lives in the state
of Washington and commutes to a private high school in Oregon or Idaho may
submit to the Washington association of secondary school principals the names
of graduating senior high school students who have been identified and
recommended to be outstanding in academic achievement based on the criteria
established under RCW 28A.600.130. The association shall submit the names of
these students to the higher education coordinating board as established in RCW
28A.600.140.

---
END ---