BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.240 and 1994 c
197 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All teachers
employed full time in the public schools shall be members of the system except
alien teachers who have been granted a temporary permit to teach as exchange
teachers. However, a member who has earned thirty or more service credit
years and who is employed by an institution of higher education shall have the
option of terminating membership in the system for the purpose of enrolling in
a higher education retirement plan administered pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.

(2) A minimum of ninety
days or the equivalent of ninety days of employment during a fiscal year shall
be required to establish membership. A teacher shall be considered as employed
full time if serving regularly for four-fifths or more of a school day or if
assigned to duties which are the equivalent of four-fifths or more of a full
time assignment. A teacher who is employed for less than full time service may
become a member by filing an application with the retirement system, submitting
satisfactory proof of teaching service and making the necessary payment before
June 30 of the school year immediately following the one during which the
service was rendered.

(3) After
June 30th of the school year immediately following the one during which the
less than full-time service was rendered, the necessary payment may be made
under RCW 41.50.165(2).

--- END ---