BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The labor, commerce, and
financial institutions committee of the senate shall conduct a study of the
problems of owners of mobile/manufactured homes in connection with obtaining
the necessary permits for repair, remodel, maintenance, and alteration of their
homes. The committee shall enlist the assistance of mobile/manufactured
homeowners, mobile/manufactured home mortgage lenders, the department of labor
and industries, and other state or local government agencies as needed.

The study shall address
the following issues:

(1) The fact that many
mobile/manufactured homeowners have performed alterations or repairs to their
homes without obtaining the required permits with the result that potential
buyers may be unable to obtain mortgage financing from the usual sources;

(2) The costs
associated with obtaining required permits, particularly on those occasions
when an engineering analysis is required;

(3) The possibility of
reducing the number and type of repairs and alterations that require a permit,
consistent with public health and safety considerations;

(4) The appropriateness
of the current legal sanction for not obtaining a permit when required, which
is that the home may not be sold;

(5) Any methods,
procedures, or changes in the law that can assist mobile/manufactured
homeowners in the proper and economical maintenance and improvement of their
homes, and the protection of their equity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The committee shall
complete the study and develop any recommended legislation prior to the
beginning of the 2002 legislative session.

---
END ---