BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

If an initiative,
whether to the people or to the legislature, would require spending public
funds for its implementation, the office of financial management shall prepare
a fiscal impact statement for the initiative. Fiscal impact statements must be
written in clear and concise language and avoid legal and technical terms when
possible, and may include easily understood graphics.

A fiscal impact
statement must describe any projected increase or decrease in revenues, costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness that the state or local governments will
experience if the initiative is approved by state voters. Where appropriate, a
fiscal impact statement may include both estimated dollar amounts and a
description placing the estimated dollar amounts into context. A fiscal impact
statement must include both a summary of not to exceed one hundred words and a
more detailed statement that includes the assumptions that were made to develop
the fiscal impacts.

Fiscal impact
statements must be available on line from the secretary of state's web site and
included in the state voters' pamphlet.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.79.040 and 2000 c
197 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within five
days after the receipt of an initiative or referendum the attorney general
shall formulate the ballot title, or portion of the ballot title that the
legislature has not provided, required by RCW 29.79.035 and a summary of the
measure, not to exceed seventy-five words, and transmit the serial number for
the measure, complete ballot title, and summary to the secretary of state.
Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted in calculating the time
limits in this section.

(2) If an initiative
increases spending, the following wording in bold type must appear after the
ballot title:

"This measure
has been determined to cost a significant amount of money to implement.

If it passes, a tax
increase or a new tax may be required or significant cuts to vital state
services may occur."

This
statement must appear in bold print along with the ballot title on all
documents in which the ballot title is required to appear, and must appear in
all forms of advertising and displays.

---
END ---