BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.34.035 and 1999 c
176 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When there is
reasonable cause to believe that abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, self-neglect,
or neglect of a vulnerable adult has occurred, mandated reporters shall immediately
report to the department. If there is reason to suspect that sexual or
physical ((assault)) abuse has occurred, mandated reporters shall
immediately report to the appropriate law enforcement agency and to the
department. However, suspected sexual or physical abuse by an incompetent
or mentally incapacitated person shall be reported to the department only. For
purposes of this section, an "incompetent or mentally incapacitated
person" includes but is not limited to persons with a guardian appointed
under chapter 11.88 RCW or RCW 73.36.050(4), persons determined incompetent or
mentally incapacitated under a valid durable power of attorney, and persons
properly assessed by a qualified assessor or health care professional as
incompetent or mentally incapacitated as documented in their care plan or
service plan. When a mandated reporter is a state or department employee,
mandated reports to the department under this chapter shall be made to the
aging and adult services administration's statewide complaint hotline.

(2) Permissive
reporters may report to the department or a law enforcement agency when there
is reasonable cause to believe that a vulnerable adult is being or has been
abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected.

(3) No facility, as
defined by this chapter, agency licensed or required to be licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW, or facility or agency under contract with the department to
provide care for vulnerable adults may develop policies or procedures that
interfere with the reporting requirements of this chapter.

(4) Each report, oral
or written, must contain as much as possible of the following information:

(a) The name and
address of the person making the report;

(b) The name and
address of the vulnerable adult and the name of the facility or agency
providing care for the vulnerable adult;

(c) The name and
address of the legal guardian or alternate decision maker;

(d) The nature and
extent of the abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or
self-neglect;

(e) Any history of
previous abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect;

(f) The identity of the
alleged perpetrator, if known; and

(g) Other information
that may be helpful in establishing the extent of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or the cause of death of the deceased vulnerable adult.

(5) Unless there is a
judicial proceeding or the person consents, the identity of the person making
the report under this section is confidential.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.124.020 and 1999
c 176 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Court"
means the superior court of the state of Washington.

(2) "Law
enforcement agency" means the police department, the director of public
safety, or the office of the sheriff.

(3) "Practitioner
of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a person licensed
by this state to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry, pharmacy,
physical therapy, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic medicine and
surgery, or medicine and surgery. The term "practitioner" includes a
nurse's aide and a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner.

(4)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(5) "Social
worker" means anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular
course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support,
or education of patients, or providing social services to patients, whether in
an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private
organization or institution.

(6)
"Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology under
chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(7)
"Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW,
whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.

(8) (("Abuse or
neglect" or "patient abuse or neglect" means the nonaccidental
physical injury or condition, sexual abuse, or negligent treatment of a state
hospital patient under circumstances which indicate that the patient's health,
welfare, or safety is harmed thereby.

(9) "Negligent
treatment" means an act or omission which evinces a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to
the patient's health, welfare, or safety.

(10))) "Abuse" means the willful action
or inaction that inflicts injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or
punishment on a state hospital patient. In instances of abuse of a patient who
is unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental anguish, the
abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental anguish.
"Abuse" includes sexual abuse, physical abuse, and mental abuse of a
patient, which have the following meanings:

(a) "Sexual
abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact, including but not
limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape, sodomy, sexual coercion,
sexually explicit photographing, and sexual harassment. "Sexual
abuse" includes any consensual or nonconsensual sexual contact with a
state hospital patient by a department employee, agent, or contractor.

(b) "Physical
abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily injury or physical
mistreatment. "Physical abuse" includes, but is not limited to,
striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching, choking, kicking,
shoving, prodding, or the use of chemical restraints or physical restraints
unless the restraints are consistent with licensing or certification
requirements, and includes restraints that are otherwise being used
inappropriately.

(c) "Mental
abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental or verbal abuse.
"Mental abuse" includes, but is not limited to, coercion, harassment,
inappropriately isolating a patient from family, friends, or regular activity,
and verbal abuse that includes ridiculing, intimidating, yelling, or swearing.

(9)
"Neglect" means: (a) A pattern of conduct or inaction by a person or
entity with a duty of care to a state hospital patient that results in the
failure (i) to provide the goods and services needed to maintain the patient's
physical or mental health, or (ii) to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm
or pain to such patient; or (b) an act or omission that demonstrates a serious
disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and
present danger to the patient's health, welfare, or safety.

(10)
"Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity with a
duty of care for a state hospital patient that leaves the patient without the
means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing, shelter, or health care.

(11) "Financial
exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of the property, income, resources,
or trust funds of a state hospital patient by any person for any person's
profit or advantage.

(12) "State
hospital" means any hospital operated and maintained by the state for the
care of the mentally ill under chapter 72.23 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.124.030 and 1999
c 176 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When any
practitioner, social worker, psychologist, pharmacist, employee of a state
hospital, or employee of the department has reasonable cause to believe that a
state hospital patient has suffered abuse ((or)), neglect,
financial exploitation, or abandonment, the person shall report such
incident, or cause a report to be made, to either a law enforcement agency or
to the department as provided in RCW 70.124.040.

(2) Any other person
who has reasonable cause to believe that a state hospital patient has suffered
abuse ((or)), neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment
may report such incident to either a law enforcement agency or to the
department as provided in RCW 70.124.040.

(3) The department or
any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of abuse ((or)),
neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment involving a state
hospital patient who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted
other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to sexual abuse shall
report the incident to the proper county prosecutor for appropriate action.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.124.040 and 1999
c 176 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Where a report is
required under RCW 70.124.030, an immediate oral report must be made by
telephone or otherwise to either a law enforcement agency or to the department
and, upon request, must be followed by a report in writing. Mandated
reports to the department under this chapter shall be made to the aging and
adult services administration's statewide complaint hotline. The reports
must contain the following information, if known:

(a) The name and
address of the person making the report;

(b) The name and
address of the state hospital patient;

(c) The name and
address of the patient's relatives having responsibility for the patient;

(d) The nature and
extent of the alleged injury or injuries;

(e) The nature and
extent of the alleged abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment;

(f) The nature and
extent of the alleged sexual abuse;

(g) Any evidence of
previous injuries, including their nature and extent; and

(h) Any other
information that may be helpful in establishing the cause of the patient's
death, injury, ((or)) injuries, or loss, and the identity of the
perpetrator or perpetrators.

(2) Each law
enforcement agency receiving such a report shall, in addition to taking the
action required by RCW 70.124.050, immediately relay the report to the
department, and to other law enforcement agencies, including the medicaid fraud
control unit of the office of the attorney general, as appropriate. For any
report it receives, the department shall likewise take the required action and
in addition relay the report to the appropriate law enforcement agency or
agencies. The appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies must receive
immediate notification when the department, upon receipt of such report, has
reasonable cause to believe that a criminal act has been committed.

(3) No state
hospital may have policies or procedures that interfere with the reporting
requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.124.060 and 1999
c 176 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person other than
a person alleged to have committed the abuse ((or)), neglect,
financial exploitation, or abandonment, participating in good faith in the
making of a report pursuant to this chapter, or testifying as to alleged
patient abuse ((or)), neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment in a judicial proceeding, is, in so doing, immune from any
liability, civil or criminal, arising out of such reporting or testifying under
any law of this state or its political subdivisions, and if such person is an
employee of a state hospital it is an unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
for the employer to discharge, expel, or otherwise discriminate against the
employee for such reporting activity.

(2)
Conduct conforming with the reporting requirements of this chapter is not a
violation of the confidential communication privilege of RCW 5.60.060 (3) or
(4) or 18.83.110. Nothing in this chapter supersedes or abridges remedies
provided in chapter 4.92 RCW.

---
END ---