BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section, a "chlor‑alkali electrolytic processing business"
means a person who is engaged in a business that uses more than ten average
megawatts of electricity per month in a chlor‑alkali electrolytic process
to split the electrochemical bonds of sodium chloride and water to make
chlorine and sodium hydroxide. A "chlor‑alkali electrolytic
processing business" does not include direct service industrial customers
or their subsidiaries that contract for the purchase of power from the
Bonneville power administration as of the effective date of this section.

(2) Effective July 1,
2001, the tax levied under this chapter does not apply to sales of electricity
made by a light and power business to a chlor‑alkali electrolytic
processing business for the electrolytic process if the contract for sale of
electricity to the business contains the following terms:

(a) The electricity to
be used in the electrolytic process is separately metered from the electricity
used for general operations of the business;

(b) The price charged
for the electricity used in the electrolytic process will be reduced by an
amount equal to the tax exemption available to the light and power business
under this section; and

(c) Disallowance of all
or part of the exemption under this section is a breach of contract and the
damages to be paid by the chlor‑alkali electrolytic processing business
are the amount of the tax exemption disallowed.

(3) The exemption
provided for in this section does not apply to amounts received from the
remarketing or resale of electricity originally obtained by contract for the
electrolytic process.

(4) In order to claim
an exemption under this section, the chlor‑alkali electrolytic processing
business must provide the light and power business with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---