BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.30.025 and 1990 c
59 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

After the close of
business on the last day for candidates to file for office, the filing officer
shall, from among those filings made in person and by mail, determine by lot
the order in which the names of those candidates will appear on all primary,
sample, and absentee ballots. ((In the case of candidates for city,
town, and district office, this procedure shall also determine the order for
candidate names on the official primary ballot used at the polling place.))
The determination shall be done publicly and may be witnessed by the media and
by any candidate. If no primary is required for any nonpartisan office under
RCW 29.15.150 or 29.21.015, the names shall appear on the general election
ballot in the order determined by lot.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 29.30.040 (Primaries‑-Rotating
names of candidates) and 1990 c 59 s 94, 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 54, & 1965 c 9 s 29.30.040
are each repealed.

---
END ---