BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.108.010 and 1997
c 297 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In this chapter, unless
the context otherwise requires, the following meanings shall apply:

(1) "Board"
means the Washington state board of massage.

(2) "Massage"
and "massage therapy" mean a health care service involving the
external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue for therapeutic purposes.
Massage therapy includes techniques such as tapping, compressions, friction,
Swedish gymnastics or movements, gliding, kneading, shaking, and ((facial))
fascial or connective tissue stretching, with or without the aids of
superficial heat, cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not
include diagnosis or attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the
body or spine or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting
force, nor does it include genital manipulation.

(3) "Massage
practitioner" means an individual licensed under this chapter.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(5) "Massage
business" means the operation of a business where massages are
given.

(6) "Certified
reflexologist" means a person certified to practice reflexology under this
chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.108.020 and 1991
c 3 s 253 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
board of massage is hereby created. The board shall consist of ((four))
five members who shall be appointed by the governor for a term of four
years each. Four members shall be residents of this state and shall
have not less than three years experience in the practice of massage
immediately preceding their appointment and shall be licensed under this
chapter and actively engaged in the practice of massage during their
incumbency. One member shall be a certified reflexologist who is engaged in
the active practice of reflexology and who is a resident of the state.

In addition to the
members specified in this section, the governor shall appoint a consumer member
of the board, who shall serve for a term of four years. The consumer member of
the board shall be an individual who does not derive his or her livelihood by
providing health care services or massage therapy and is not a licensed health
professional. The consumer member shall not be an employee of the state nor a
present or former member of another licensing board.

In the event that a
member cannot complete his or her term of office, another appointment shall be
made by the governor in accordance with the procedures stated in this section
to fill the remainder of the term. No member may serve more than two
successive terms whether full or partial. The governor may remove any member
of the board for neglect of duty, incompetence, or unprofessional or disorderly
conduct as determined under chapter 18.130 RCW.

Each member of the
board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240. Members shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their
duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

The board may annually
elect a chairperson to direct the meetings of the board. The board shall meet
as called by the chairperson or the secretary. Three members of the board
shall constitute a quorum of the board.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.108.025 and 1991
c 3 s 254 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other authority provided by law, the board may:

(1) Adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter, subject
to the approval of the secretary;

(2) Define, evaluate,
approve, and designate those schools, programs, and apprenticeship programs
including all current and proposed curriculum, faculty, and health, sanitation,
and facility standards from which graduation will be accepted as proof of an
applicant's eligibility to take the licensing examination;

(3) Review approved
schools and programs periodically;

(4) Prepare, grade, administer,
and supervise the grading and administration of, examinations for applicants
for licensure; ((and))

(5) Determine which
states have educational and licensing requirements equivalent to those of this
state; and

(6) Certify
reflexologists.

The board shall
establish by rule the standards and procedures for approving courses of study
and may contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the
profession or in education to assist in evaluating courses of study. The
standards and procedures set shall apply equally to schools and training within
the United States of America and those in foreign jurisdictions.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.108.030 and 1995
c 198 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
practice or represent himself or herself as a massage practitioner without
first applying for and receiving from the department a license to practice.

(2) A person represents
himself or herself as a massage practitioner when the person adopts or uses any
title or any description of services that incorporates one or more of the
following terms or designations: Massage, massage practitioner, massage
therapist, massage therapy, therapeutic massage, massage technician, massage
technology, massagist, masseur, masseuse, myotherapist or myotherapy, touch
therapist, ((reflexologist,)) acupressurist, body therapy or body
therapist, or any derivation of those terms that implies a massage technique or
method.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) No person may for a
fee or as part of his or her position as an employee, proprietorship, or
corporation practice reflexology without being certified under this chapter
unless otherwise authorized by law in his or her professional scope of
practice.

(2) The board shall
establish by rule initial certification standards for applicants for
reflexology certification. The initial certification standards must meet
recognized national standards for reflexology training.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The practice of
reflexology is limited to the distal one-third of the forearm, the distal
one-third of the lower leg, and the external ear.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The department shall
appoint an ad hoc committee of reflexologists to advise the board.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.130.040 and 1999
c 335 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter
applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having
jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary
has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing
opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Naturopaths
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) Midwives licensed
under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv) Ocularists
licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v) ((Massage
operators and businesses licensed)) Persons credentialed under
chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi) Dental hygienists
licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii) Acupuncturists
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii) Radiologic
technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84
RCW;

(ix) Respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x) Persons registered
or certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered
as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing
assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Health care
assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv) Dietitians and
nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv) Chemical
dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi) Sex offender
treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii) Persons licensed
and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii) Persons
registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under RCW
18.48.020;

(xix) Denturists
licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;

(xx) Orthotists and
prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; and

(xxi) Surgical
technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW.

(b) The boards and
commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric
medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv) The board of
hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of
examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry
board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing
licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The board of
pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The medical
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing
licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of
physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of
occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing
licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining
board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter
18.83 RCW; and

(xiv) The veterinary
board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3) In addition to the
authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the
authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria
established in this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of
this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license
conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW
18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4) All disciplining
authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent
application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the
disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The department of health
shall review the implementation of this act and make recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2005, regarding regulatory changes to this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Sections 5 and 6 of this
act are each added to chapter 18.108 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---