BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

The contractor
registration account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
registration, penalties, and other sources under this chapter must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

The factory assembled
structures account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
inspections, insignias, permits, plan reviews, and other sources under this
chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.87 RCW to read as follows:

The elevator inspection
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from inspections,
permits, plan reviews, penalties, and other sources under this chapter must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
of this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including,
but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the
state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the contractor registration account,
the county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the
elevator inspection account, the factory assembled structures account, the
federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan
2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington
state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall
occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this
section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the contractor registration account,
the county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
drinking water assistance account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the
elevator inspection account, the factory assembled structures account, the
federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal
fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 4 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Section 5 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---