BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) It is declared to be
the public policy of the state of Washington to promote and facilitate the
orderly development and economic stability of its communities. Local
governments need the ability to raise revenue to finance public improvements
that are designed to encourage economic growth and development in geographic
areas characterized by high levels of unemployment and stagnate employment and
income growth. The construction of necessary public improvements in accordance
with local economic development plans will encourage investment in job-producing
private development and expand the public tax base.

(2) It is the purpose of this
chapter:

(a) To encourage taxing
districts to cooperate in the allocation of future tax revenues that are used
to finance public improvements designed to encourage private development in
selected areas, in particular in those local governments that are located
adjacent to another state or international border;

(b) To assist those
local governments that have a competitive disadvantage in its ability to
attract business, private investment, or commercial development due to its
location near a state or international border; and

(c) To prevent or
arrest the decay of selected areas due to the inability of existing financial
methods to provide needed public improvements, and to encourage private
investment designed to promote and facilitate the orderly redevelopment of
selected areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Assessed
value of real property" means the valuation of real property as placed on
the last completed assessment roll.

(2) "Increment
area" means the geographic area from which taxes are to be appropriated to
finance public improvements authorized under this chapter.

(3) "Increment
value" means seventy-five percent of any increase in the true and fair
value of real property in an increment area that is placed on the tax rolls
after the increment area is created.

(4) "Local
government" means any sponsoring city, town, county, or combination
thereof.

(5)
"Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative action
by a local government.

(6) "Public
improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design, planning, acquisition,
site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement,
and installation of public improvements; (b) relocating, maintaining, and
operating property pending construction of public improvements; (c) relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on
general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary
reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred in revaluing real
property for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value that are
in excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation
plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and
complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and (f) administrative
expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these
costs, including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of
the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of community revitalization
financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.

(7) "Public
improvements" means:

(a) Infrastructure
improvements within the increment area that include, but are not limited to:

(i) Street and road
construction and maintenance;

(ii) Water and sewer
system construction and improvements;

(iii) Sidewalks and
streetlights;

(iv) Parking, terminal,
and dock facilities;

(v) Public
transportation facilities; and

(vi) Park facilities
and recreational areas;

(b) Publicly owned or
leased facilities within the jurisdiction of a local government which the
sponsor has authority to provide; and

(c) Expenditures for
any of the following purposes:

(i) Providing
environmental analysis, professional management, planning, and promotion within
the apportionment district, including the management and promotion of retail
trade activities in the apportionment district;

(ii) Providing
maintenance and security for common or public areas in the apportionment
district; or

(iii) Historic
preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395.

(8) "Regular
property taxes" means regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140,
except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by port districts or public utility
districts specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal
and interest on general indebtedness; and (b) regular property taxes levied by
the state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065. Regular
property taxes do not include excess property tax levies that are exempt from
the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing districts as provided in RCW
84.52.043.

(9) "Tax
allocation base value" means the true and fair value of real property
located within an increment area for taxes imposed in the year in which the
increment area is created, plus seventy-five percent of any increase in the
true and fair value of real property located within an increment area that is
placed on the assessment rolls after the increment area is created.

(10) "Tax
allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from the imposition
of regular property taxes on the increment value and distributed to finance
public improvements.

(11) "Taxing
districts" means a governmental entity that levies or has levied for it
regular property taxes upon real property located within a proposed or approved
increment area.

(12) "Value of
taxable property" means the value of the taxable property as defined in
RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A sponsoring local
government may finance public improvements using community revitalization
financing subject to the following conditions:

(1) The local
government adopts an ordinance designating an increment area within its
boundaries and specifying the public improvements proposed to be financed in
whole or in part with the use of community revitalization financing;

(2) The public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using community
revitalization financing are expected to encourage private development within
the increment area and to increase the fair market value of real property
within the increment area;

(3) Private development
that is anticipated to occur within the increment area, as a result of the
public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy
adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's
comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A
RCW; and

(4) Taxing districts,
in the aggregate, that levy at least sixty percent of the regular property tax
within which the increment area is located approves the community
revitalization financing of the project under section 5(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Public improvements that
are financed with community revitalization financing may be undertaken and
coordinated with other programs or efforts undertaken by the local government
and other taxing districts and may be funded in part from revenue sources other
than community revitalization financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Before adopting an
ordinance creating the increment area, a local government must:

(1) Obtain written
agreement for the use of community revitalization financing to finance all or a
portion of the costs of the designated public improvements from taxing
districts that, in the aggregate, levy at least sixty percent of the regular
property tax on property within the increment area. A signed, written
agreement from taxing districts that in the aggregate levy at least sixty
percent of the regular property tax within the increment area, constitutes
concurrence by all taxing districts in the increment district in the public
improvement and participation in the public improvement to the extent of
providing limited funding under community revitalization financing authorized
under this chapter. The agreement must be authorized by the governing body of
taxing districts that in the aggregate levy at least sixty percent of the
regular property tax on property within the increment area;

(2) Hold a public
hearing on the proposed financing of the public improvement in whole or in part
with community revitalization financing. Notice of the public hearing must be
published in a legal newspaper of general circulation within the proposed
increment area at least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at
least six conspicuous public places located in the proposed increment area.
Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements, estimate the costs
of the public improvements, describe the portion of the costs of the public
improvements to be borne by community revitalization financing, describe any
other sources of revenue to finance the public improvements, describe the
boundaries of the proposed community revitalization area, and estimate the
period during which community revitalization financing is contemplated to be
used. The public hearing may be held by either the governing body of the local
government, or a committee of the governing body that includes at least a
majority of the whole governing body; and

(3) Adopt an ordinance
establishing the community revitalization area that describes the public
improvements, describes the boundaries of the community revitalization area,
estimates the cost of the public improvements and the portion of these costs to
be financed by community revitalization financing, estimates the time during
which regular property taxes are to be apportioned, provides the date when the
apportionment of the regular property taxes will commence, and finds that the
conditions of section 3 of this act are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Within fifteen days after
a local government adopts an ordinance creating the increment area and
authorizing community revitalization financing, the local government shall:

(1) Publish notice in a
legal newspaper of general circulation within the increment area that describes
the public improvement, describes the boundaries of the increment area, and
identifies the location and times where the ordinance and other public
information concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and

(2) Deliver a certified
copy of the ordinance to the county treasurer, the county assessor, and the
governing body of each taxing district within which the increment area is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) Commencing on the
later of either the date established in the ordinance creating the increment
area, or the first day of the calendar year following the passage of the
ordinance, the county treasurer shall distribute receipts from regular property
taxes imposed on real property located in the community revitalization area as
follows:

(a) Each taxing
district shall receive that portion of its regular property taxes produced by
the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the tax allocation base
value for that community revitalization financing project in the taxing
district, or upon the total assessed value of real property in the taxing
district, whichever is smaller; and

(b) The local
government that created the increment area shall receive an additional portion
of the regular property taxes levied by or for each taxing district upon the
increment value within the increment area. However, the local government that
created the increment area may agree to receive less than the full amount of
this portion as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other bond covenant
requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of these tax receipts
shall be allocated to the taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes,
or have regular property taxes imposed for them, in the increment area for
collection that year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for
collection that year. The local government may request that the treasurer
transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to its designated
agent. The portion of the tax receipts distributed to the local government or
its agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance public
improvement costs associated with the public improvements financed in whole or
in part by community revitalization financing.

(2) The county assessor
shall allocate twenty-five percent of any increased real property value
occurring in the increment area to the tax allocation base value and
seventy-five percent to the increment value. This section does not authorize
revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation that are
not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW or under other authorized revaluation procedures.

(3) The apportionment
of increases in assessed valuation in an increment area, and the associated
distribution to the local government of receipts from regular property taxes
that are imposed on the increment value, must cease when tax allocation
revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay the costs of the public
improvements. Any excess tax allocation revenues and earnings on the tax
allocation revenues remaining at the time the apportionment of tax receipts
terminates must be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the
taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property
taxes imposed for it, in the increment area for collection that year, in
proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies for collection
that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) A local government
designating an increment area and authorizing the use of community
revitalization financing may incur general indebtedness, and issue general
obligation bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the
indebtedness in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues it receives,
subject to the following requirements:

(a) The ordinance
adopted by the local government creating the increment area and authorizing the
use of community revitalization financing indicates an intent to incur this
indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated;
and

(b) The local
government includes this statement of the intent in all notices required by
section 5 of this act.

(2) The general indebtedness
incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be payable from other tax
revenues, the full faith and credit of the local government, and nontax income,
revenues, fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well as
contributions, grants, and nontax money available to the local government for
payment of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service on the
general indebtedness.

(3) In addition to the
requirements in subsection (1) of this section, a local government designating
an increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization financing
may require the nonpublic participant to provide adequate security to protect
the public investment in the public improvement within the increment area.

(4) The ordinance creating
the increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization
financing is subject to potential referendum action by the voters of the local
government if the ordinance authorizes the local government to incur
nonvoter-approved general indebtedness payable from increment receipts. If the
voters of the local government otherwise possess the general power of
referendum on local government matters, the ordinance is subject to that
procedure. If the voters of the local government do not otherwise possess the
general power of referendum on local government matters, the referendum shall
conform to the requirements and procedures for referendum petitions provided
for code cities in RCW 35A.11.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A direct or collateral
attack on a public improvement, public improvement ordinance, or increment area
purported to be authorized or created in conformance with applicable legal
requirements, including this chapter, may not be commenced more than thirty
days after publication of notice as required by section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. This chapter supplements
and neither restricts nor limits any powers which the state or any local
government might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a rural county library district or intercounty rural library
district possesses, a rural county library district or an intercounty rural
library district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2
of this act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the
financing of the public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a rural county library district or intercounty rural
library district to otherwise participate in the public improvements if that
authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a metropolitan park district possesses, a metropolitan park
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a metropolitan park district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a county possesses, a county may provide any public improvement
as defined under section 2 of this act, but this additional authority is
limited to participating in the financing of the public improvements as
provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a county to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 36.68 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a park and recreation service area possesses, a park and
recreation service area may provide any public improvement as defined under
section 2 of this act, but this additional authority is limited to
participating in the financing of the public improvements as provided under
section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a park and recreation service area to otherwise
participate in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 36.69 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a park and recreation district possesses, a park and recreation
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a park and recreation district to otherwise participate
in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 36.75 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a road district possesses, a road district may provide any
public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but this additional
authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a road district to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 52.12 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a fire protection district possesses, a fire protection district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the
public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a fire protection district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a port district possesses, a port district may provide any
public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but this additional
authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a port district to otherwise participate in the public
improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a public utility district possesses, a public utility district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the
public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a public utility district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 67.38 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district
possesses, a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district may provide
any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but this
additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a cultural arts, stadium, and convention center district
to otherwise participate in the public improvements if that authority exists
elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. A new section is added
to chapter 68.52 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a cemetery district possesses, a cemetery district may provide
any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but this
additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public
improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a cemetery district to otherwise participate in the
public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. A new section is added
to chapter 70.44 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a public hospital district possesses, a public hospital district
may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this act, but
this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the
public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a public hospital district to otherwise participate in
the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. A new section is added
to chapter 86.15 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other
authority that a flood control zone district possesses, a flood control zone
district may provide any public improvement as defined under section 2 of this
act, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing
of the public improvements as provided under section 5 of this act.

This section does not
limit the authority of a flood control zone district to otherwise participate
in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added to
chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

Limitations on regular
property taxes that are provided in this chapter shall continue in a taxing
district whether or not an increment area exists within the taxing district as
provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 and 30 of this act).

Sec. 25. RCW 36.33.220 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative
authority of any county may budget, in accordance with the provisions of chapter
36.40 RCW, and expend any portion of the county road property tax revenues for
any service to be provided in the unincorporated area of the county
notwithstanding any other provision of law, including chapter 36.82 RCW and RCW
84.52.050 and 84.52.043. County road property tax revenues that are
diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 and 30 of this act) may
be expended as provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 and 30
of this act).

Sec. 26. RCW 36.79.140 and 1997 c
81 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time the board
reviews the six-year program of each county each even-numbered year, it shall
consider and shall approve for inclusion in its recommended budget, as required
by RCW 36.79.130, the portion of the rural arterial construction program
scheduled to be performed during the biennial period beginning the following
July 1st. Subject to the appropriations actually approved by the legislature,
the board shall as soon as feasible approve rural arterial trust account funds
to be spent during the ensuing biennium for preliminary proposals in priority
sequence as established pursuant to RCW 36.79.090. Only those counties that
during the preceding twelve months have spent all revenues collected for road
purposes only for such purposes, including traffic law enforcement, as are
allowed to the state by Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution are
eligible to receive funds from the rural arterial trust account((: PROVIDED
HOWEVER)), except that: (1) Counties with a population of
less than eight thousand are exempt from this eligibility restriction((:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)); (2) counties expending revenues
collected for road purposes only on other governmental services after
authorization from the voters of that county under RCW 84.55.050 are also
exempt from this eligibility restriction; and (3) this restriction shall not
apply to any moneys diverted from the road district levy under chapter 39.--
RCW (sections 1 through 10 and 30 of this act). The board shall authorize
rural arterial trust account funds for the construction project portion of a
project previously authorized for a preliminary proposal in the sequence in which
the preliminary proposal has been completed and the construction project is to
be placed under contract. At such time the board may reserve rural arterial
trust account funds for expenditure in future years as may be necessary for
completion of preliminary proposals and construction projects to be commenced
in the ensuing biennium.

The board may, within
the constraints of available rural arterial trust funds, consider additional
projects for authorization upon a clear and conclusive showing by the submitting
county that the proposed project is of an emergent nature and that its need was
unable to be anticipated at the time the six-year program of the county was
developed. The proposed projects shall be evaluated on the basis of the
priority rating factors specified in RCW 36.79.080.

Sec. 27. RCW 36.82.040 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of
raising revenue for establishing, laying out, constructing, altering,
repairing, improving, and maintaining county roads, bridges, and wharves
necessary for vehicle ferriage and for other proper county purposes, the board
shall annually at the time of making the levy for general purposes make a
uniform tax levy throughout the county, or any road district thereof, of not to
exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
of the last assessed valuation of the taxable property in the county, or road
district thereof, unless other law of the state requires a lower maximum levy,
in which event such lower maximum levy shall control. All funds accruing from
such levy shall be credited to and deposited in the county road fund except
that revenue diverted under RCW 36.33.220 shall be placed in a separate and
identifiable account within the county current expense fund and except that
revenue diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 and 30 of this
act) shall be expended as provided under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through
10 and 30 of this act).

Sec. 28. RCW 46.68.124 and 1990 c
33 s 586 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The equivalent
population for each county shall be computed as the sum of the population residing
in the county's unincorporated area plus twenty-five percent of the population
residing in the county's incorporated area. Population figures required for
the computations in this subsection shall be certified by the director of the
office of financial management on or before July 1st of each odd-numbered year.

(2) The total annual
road cost for each county shall be computed as the sum of one twenty-fifth of
the total estimated county road replacement cost, plus the total estimated
annual maintenance cost. Appropriate costs for bridges and ferries shall be
included. The county road administration board shall be responsible for
establishing a uniform system of roadway categories for both maintenance and
construction and also for establishing a single statewide cost per mile rate
for each roadway category. The total annual cost for each county will be based
on the established statewide cost per mile and associated mileage for each
category. The mileage to be used for these computations shall be as shown in
the county road log as maintained by the county road administration board as of
July 1, 1985, and each two years thereafter. Each county shall be responsible
for submitting changes, corrections, and deletions as regards the county road
log to the county road administration board. Such changes, corrections, and
deletions shall be subject to verification and approval by the county road
administration board prior to inclusion in the county road log.

(3) The money need
factor for each county shall be the county's total annual road cost less the
following four amounts:

(a) One-half the sum of
the actual county road tax levied upon the valuation of all taxable property
within the county road districts pursuant to RCW 36.82.040, including any
amount of such tax diverted under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 and
30 of this act), for the two calendar years next preceding the year of
computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the department of
revenue;

(b) One-half the sum of
all funds received by the county road fund from the federal forest reserve fund
pursuant to RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020 during the two calendar years next
preceding the year of computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the
state treasurer;

(c) One-half the sum of
timber excise taxes received by the county road fund pursuant to chapter 84.33
RCW in the two calendar years next preceding the year of computation of the
allocation amounts as certified by the state treasurer;

(d) One-half the sum of
motor vehicle license fees and motor vehicle and special fuel taxes refunded to
the county, pursuant to RCW 46.68.080 during the two calendar years next
preceding the year of computation of the allocation amounts as certified by the
state treasurer.

(4) The state treasurer
and the department of revenue shall furnish to the county road administration
board the information required by subsection (3) of this section on or before
July 1st of each odd-numbered year.

(5) The county road
administration board, shall compute and provide to the counties the allocation
factors of the several counties on or before September 1st of each year based
solely upon the sources of information herein before required: PROVIDED, That
the allocation factor shall be held to a level not more than five percent above
or five percent below the allocation factor in use during the previous calendar
year. Upon computation of the actual allocation factors of the several
counties, the county road administration board shall provide such factors to
the state treasurer to be used in the computation of the counties' fuel tax
allocation for the succeeding calendar year. The state treasurer shall adjust
the fuel tax allocation of each county on January 1st of every year based
solely upon the information provided by the county road administration board.

Sec. 29. RCW 82.03.130 and 1998 c
54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
have jurisdiction to decide the following types of appeals:

(a) Appeals taken
pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.

(b) Appeals from a
county board of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.08.130.

(c) Appeals by an
assessor or landowner from an order of the director of revenue made pursuant to
RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if filed with the board of tax appeals within
thirty days after the mailing of the order, the right to such an appeal being
hereby established.

(d) Appeals by an
assessor or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car company from
determinations by the director of revenue of equalized assessed valuation of
property and the apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant to chapter
84.12 and 84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days
after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being hereby
established.

(e) Appeals by an
assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car
company from a determination of any county indicated ratio for such county
compiled by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075: PROVIDED,
That

(i) Said appeal be
filed after review of the ratio under RCW 84.48.075(3) and not later than
fifteen days after the mailing of the certification; and

(ii) The hearing before
the board shall be expeditiously held in accordance with rules prescribed by
the board and shall take precedence over all matters of the same character.

(f) Appeals from the
decisions of sale price of second class shorelands on navigable lakes by the
department of natural resources pursuant to RCW 79.94.210.

(g) ((Appeals from
urban redevelopment property tax apportionment district proposals established
by governmental ordinances pursuant to RCW 39.88.060.

(h))) Appeals from interest rates as determined by
the department of revenue for use in valuing farmland under current use
assessment pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.

(((i))) (h)
Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to determine value by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.

(((j))) (i)
Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the department of revenue
pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.

(((k))) (j)
Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).

(2) Except as otherwise
specifically provided by law hereafter, the provisions of RCW 1.12.070 shall
apply to all notices of appeal filed with the board of tax appeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act expire July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. Sections 1 through 10 and
30 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 32. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---