BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.305 and 1997 c
291 s 6 and 1997 c 241 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The department shall
continue to issue the categories of special plates issued by the department
under the sections repealed under section 12 (1) through (7), chapter 250, Laws
of 1990. Special license plates issued under those repealed sections before January
1, 1991, are valid to the extent and under the conditions provided in those
repealed sections. The following conditions, limitations, or requirements
apply to certain special license plates issued after January 1, 1991:

(1) A horseless
carriage plate and a plate or plates issued for collectors' vehicles more than
thirty years old, upon payment of the initial fees required by law and the
additional special license plate fee established by the department, are valid
for the life of the vehicle for which application is approved by the
department. When a single plate is issued, it shall be displayed on the rear
of the vehicle.

(2) The department may
issue special license plates denoting amateur radio operator status only to
persons having a valid official radio operator license issued by the Federal
Communications Commission, upon payment of regular license
fees.

(3) The department
shall issue one set of special license plates to each resident of this state
who has been awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor for use on a passenger
vehicle registered to that person. The department shall issue the plate
without the payment of licensing fees and motor vehicle excise tax.

(((4) The department
may issue for use on only one motor vehicle owned by the qualified applicant
special license plates denoting that the recipient of the plate is a survivor
of the attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, to persons meeting all of
the following criteria:

(a) Is a resident of
this state;

(b) Was a member of
the United States Armed Forces on December 7, 1941;

(c) Was on station
on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at
Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three
miles;

(d) Received an
honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces; and

(e) Is certified by
a Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor survivors association as
satisfying the qualifications in (c) of this subsection.

The department may
issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any deceased Pearl Harbor survivor
who met the requirements of this subsection. If the surviving spouse
remarries, he or she shall return the special plates to the department within
fifteen days and apply for regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a
resident of this state.

The department shall
issue these plates upon payment by the applicant of all other license fees, but
the department may not set or charge an additional fee for these special
license plates.))

(4) The department
may set a charge or an additional fee for special veteran license plates that
are available to active duty and former members of the United States Armed
Forces and Washington State National Guard and Reserves under the following
terms:

(a) The department
may issue for use on only one motor vehicle owned by a qualified applicant
special veteran license plates denoting the following:

(i) United States
Marine Corps;

(ii) United States
Army;

(iii) United States
Navy;

(iv) United States
Air Force;

(v) United States
Coast Guard;

(vi) Washington
State National Guard;

(vii) Washington
State Reserves.

(b) The department
shall charge an additional fee of twenty-five dollars, over the department's
costs, for the special veteran license plates. All such additional fees for
the special veteran license plates collected by the department must be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the veterans' emblem account.
The governor's veterans advisory council shall oversee the disbursement of this
revenue, which must be used for veteran memorial and education programs.

(c) Applicants for
the special veteran license plates must show proof of their eligibility by
presenting one of the following: An active duty military, guard, or reserves
identification card; a veteran or retired military identification card; or a
DD-214 form or discharge papers. The documents must be submitted with valid
picture identification.

(5) The department
shall replace, free of charge, special license plates issued under subsection((s))
(3) ((and (4))) of this section if they are lost, stolen, damaged,
defaced, or destroyed. ((Such)) The department shall charge a
replacement fee for other special license plates issued under this section if
they are lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed. The amount of the
replacement fee may not exceed the cost to the department to replace the
special license plates. Plates ((shall)) issued under
subsections (2) through (4) of this section remain with the persons upon
transfer or other disposition of the vehicle for which they were initially
issued, and may be used on another vehicle registered to the recipient in
accordance with ((the provisions of)) RCW 46.16.316(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

Special license plates
issued under RCW 46.16.305(4), 73.04.110, and 73.04.115 as they existed before
their amendment or repeal by this act continue to be valid for the life of the
person to whom they were issued, and the department may not recall the plates
or require their return to the department. However, the department need not
replace the plates if they are lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 73.04.110 (Free license plates for
disabled veterans, prisoners of war--Penalty) and 1987 c 98 s 2, 1983 c 230 s
2, 1982 c 115 s 1, 1980 c 88 s 2, 1979 c 158 s 221, 1972 ex.s. c 60 s 1, 1971
ex.s. c 193 s 1, 1951 c 206 s 1, & 1949 c 178 s 1; and

(2) RCW 73.04.115 (Free license plates for
surviving spouses of deceased prisoners of war) and 1990 c 250 s 91 & 1987
c 98 s 1.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---