BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.50.020 and 1991 c
202 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Controlled
access facility" means a transportation facility to which access is
regulated by the governmental entity having jurisdiction over the facility.
Owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have a right of access
to or from such facility at such points only and in such manner as may be
determined by the governmental entity.

(2)
"Connection" means approaches, driveways, turnouts, or other means of
providing for the right of access to or from controlled access facilities on
the state highway system.

(3) "Major
access permit" means a written authorization given by the department for a
specifically designed connection to the state highway system at a specific
location for a specific type and intensity of property use and specific volume
of traffic for the proposed connection, based on the final stage of proposed
development of the applicant's property. The department shall determine the
actual form used for this authorization.

(4) "Minor
access permit" means a written authorization given by the department for
any change in the connection granted in a major access permit. Minor access
permits may only be granted for one year after completion of construction of a
major access permit connection.

(5)
"Permitting authority" means the department for connections in
unincorporated areas or a city or town within incorporated areas ((which))
that are authorized to regulate access to state highways pursuant to
chapter 47.24 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.50.030 and 1991 c
202 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Vehicular access
and connections to or from the state highway system shall be regulated by the
permitting authority in accordance with the provisions of this chapter in order
to protect the public health, safety, and welfare.

(2) The department
shall ((by July 1, 1992,)) adopt administrative procedures pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW which establish state highway access standards and rules for
its issuance and modification of major and minor access permits, closing
of unpermitted connections, revocation of permits, and waiver provisions in
accordance with this chapter. The department shall consult with the Association
of Washington Cities and obtain concurrence of the city design standards
committee as established by RCW 35.78.030 in the development and adoption of
rules for access standards for city streets designated as state highways under
chapter 47.24 RCW.

(3) Cities and towns
shall, no later than July 1, 1993, adopt standards for access permitting on
streets designated as state highways which meet or exceed the department's
standards, provided that such standards may not be inconsistent with standards
adopted by the department.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.50.040 and 1991 c
202 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No connection to a
state highway shall be constructed or altered without obtaining ((an)) a
major or minor access permit in accordance with this chapter in advance of
such action. A permitting authority has the authority to deny access to the
state highway system at the location specified in the permit until the
permittee constructs or alters the connection in accordance with the permit
requirements.

(2) The cost of
construction or alteration of a connection shall be borne by the permittee,
except for alterations which are not required by law or administrative rule,
but are made at the request of and for the convenience of the permitting
authority. The permittee, however, shall bear the cost of alteration of any
connection which is required by the permitting authority due to increased or
altered traffic flows generated by changes in the permittee's facilities or
nature of business conducted at the location specified in the permit.

(3) Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, an unpermitted connection is subject to closure by
the appropriate permitting authority which shall have the right to install
barriers across or remove the connection. When the permitting authority
determines that a connection is unpermitted and subject to closure, it shall
provide reasonable notice of its impending action to the owner of property served
by the connection. The permitting authority's procedures for providing notice
and preventing the operation of unpermitted connections shall be adopted by
rule.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.50.050 and 1991 c
202 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
establish by rule a schedule of fees for permit applications made to the
department. The fee for a minor access permit application must be less than
the fee charged for a major access permit application. The fee ((shall
be)) is nonrefundable and ((shall)) may be used only
to offset the costs of administering the access permit review process and the
costs associated with administering ((the provisions of)) this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.50.060 and 1991 c
202 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The review
process for major and minor access permit applications made by the
department ((shall be)) is as follows: Any person seeking an
access permit shall file an application with the department. The department by
rule shall establish application form and content requirements. The fee
required by RCW 47.50.050 must accompany the applications.

---
END ---