BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

The joint legislative
audit and review committee, the joint committee on pension policy, the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and the joint
legislative systems committee are subject to such operational policies,
procedures, and oversight as are deemed necessary by the facilities and
operations committee of the senate and the executive rules committee of the
house of representatives to ensure operational consistency among the agencies
of the legislative branch. As used in this section, "operational
policies, procedures, and oversight" includes the development of biennial
budgets, personnel policies and compensation plans, selection of a chief
administrator, facilities, contracts, and expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 44.28 RCW to read as follows:

The administration of
the joint legislative audit and review committee is subject to section 1 of
this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 44.28.060 and 1996 c
288 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The members of the
joint committee shall form an executive committee consisting of one member from
each of the four major political caucuses, which shall include a chair and a
vice-chair. The chair and vice-chair shall serve for a period not to exceed
two years. The chair and the vice-chair may not be members of the same
political party. The chair shall alternate between the members of the majority
parties in the senate and the house of representatives.

Subject to section 1
of this act, the executive committee is responsible for performing all
general administrative and personnel duties assigned to it in the rules and
procedures adopted by the joint committee, as well as other duties delegated to
it by the joint committee. The executive committee shall recommend applicants
for the position of the legislative auditor to the membership of the joint
committee. The legislative auditor shall be hired with the approval of a
majority of the membership of the joint committee. Subject to section 1 of
this act, the executive committee shall set the salary of the legislative
auditor.

The joint committee
shall adopt rules and procedures for its orderly operation. The joint
committee may create subcommittees to perform duties under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 44.28.065 and 1996 c
288 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to section 1
of this act, the legislative auditor shall:

(1) Establish and
manage the office of the joint legislative audit and review committee to carry
out the functions of this chapter;

(2) Direct the audit
and review functions described in this chapter and ensure that performance
audits are performed in accordance with the "Government Auditing
Standards" published by the comptroller general of the United States as
applicable to the scope of the audit;

(3) Make findings and
recommendations to the joint committee and under its direction to the
committees of the state legislature concerning the organization and operation
of state agencies and the expenditure of state funds by units of local
government;

(4) In consultation
with and with the approval of the executive committee, hire staff necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter. Employee salaries, other than the
legislative auditor, shall be set by the legislative auditor with the approval
of the executive committee;

(5) Assist the several
standing committees of the house and senate in consideration of legislation
affecting state departments and their efficiency; appear before other
legislative committees; and assist any other legislative committee upon
instruction by the joint legislative audit and review committee;

(6) Provide the
legislature with information obtained under the direction of the joint
legislative audit and review committee;

(7) Maintain a record
of all work performed by the legislative auditor under the direction of the
joint legislative audit and review committee and keep and make available all
documents, data, and reports submitted to the legislative auditor by any
legislative committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 44.44 RCW to read as follows:

The administration of
the joint committee on pension policy is subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 44.44.030 and 1987 c
25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
section 1 of this act, the state actuary shall have the authority to select
and employ such research, technical, clerical personnel, and consultants as the
actuary deems necessary, whose salaries shall be fixed by the actuary and
approved by the joint committee on pension policy, and who shall be exempt from
the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) All actuarial valuations
and experience studies performed by the office of the state actuary shall be
signed by a member of the American academy of actuaries. If the state actuary
is not such a member, the state actuary, after approval by the committee, shall
contract for a period not to exceed two years with a member of the American
academy of actuaries to assist in developing actuarial valuations and
experience studies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 44.48 RCW to read as follows:

The administration of
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee is subject to
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 8. RCW 44.48.120 and 1977
ex.s. c 373 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The committee is hereby
authorized and empowered to appoint an officer to be known as the LEAP
administrator who shall be the executive officer of the committee and assist in
its duties and shall compile information for the committee.

Subject to section 1
of this act, the committee is hereby authorized and empowered to select and
employ temporary and permanent personnel and fix their salaries.

The duties of the
administrator shall be as follows:

(1) To manage the LEAP
operations.

(2) To assist the several
standing committees of the house and senate; to appear before other legislative
committees; and to assist any other legislative committee upon instruction by
the committee.

(3) To provide the
legislature with information obtained under the direction of the committee.

(4) To maintain a
record of all work performed by the administrator under the direction of the
committee and to keep and make available all documents, data, and reports
submitted to the administrator by any legislative committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 44.68 RCW to read as follows:

The administration of
the joint legislative systems committee is subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 10. RCW 44.68.040 and 1986 c
61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to section 1
of this act:

(1) The systems
committee, after consultation with the administrative committee, shall employ a
legislative systems coordinator. The coordinator shall serve at the pleasure
of the systems committee, which shall fix the coordinator's salary.

(2) The coordinator
shall serve as the executive and administrative head of the center, and shall
assist the administrative committee in managing the information processing and
communications systems of the legislature as directed by the administrative
committee.

Sec. 11. RCW 44.68.050 and 1986 c
61 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrative
committee shall, subject to the approval of the systems committee and
subject to section 1 of this act:

(1) Adopt policies,
procedures, and standards regarding the information processing and
communications systems of the legislature;

(2) Establish
appropriate charges for services, equipment, and publications provided by the
legislative information processing and communications systems, applicable to
legislative and nonlegislative users as determined by the administrative
committee;

(3) Employ or engage
and fix the compensation for personnel required to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;

(4) Enter into
contracts for (a) the sale, exchange, or acquisition of equipment, supplies,
services, and facilities required to carry out the purposes of this chapter and
(b) the distribution of legislative information;

(5)
Generally assist the systems committee in carrying out its responsibilities
under this chapter, as directed by the systems committee.

---
END ---