BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Benefit
date" means the date that the recipient receives the business subsidy. If
the business subsidy involves the purchase, lease, or donation of physical
equipment, then the benefit date begins when the recipient puts the equipment
into service. If the business subsidy is for improvements to property, then
the benefit date refers to the earliest date of either:

(a) When the
improvements are finished for the entire project; or

(b) When a business
occupies the property. If a business occupies the property and the subsidy
grantor expects that other businesses will also occupy the same property, the
grantor may assign a separate benefit date for each business when it first
occupies the property.

(2) "Business
subsidy" or "subsidy" means a state or local government agency
grant, contribution of personal property, real property, infrastructure, the
principal amount of a loan at rates below those commercially available to the
recipient, any reduction or deferral of any tax or any fee, and guarantee of
any payment under any loan, lease, or other obligation, or any preferential use
of government facilities given to a business for the purpose of job creation or
retention.

The following forms of
financial assistance are not business subsidies:

(a) A grant of less
than twenty-five thousand dollars;

(b) Tax reductions
resulting from conformity with federal tax law; and

(c) Employer
contributions made under Title 50 RCW.

(3) "Government
agency" means a state and local government agency.

(4) "Grantor"
means any state or local government agency with the authority to grant a
business subsidy.

(5) "Local
government agency" means a city, code city, town, county, special purpose
district, port district, nonprofit entity created by a local government agency,
or any other entity created by or authorized by a local government with
authority to provide business subsidies.

(6)
"Recipient" means any for-profit or nonprofit business entity that
receives a business subsidy.

(7) "State
government agency" means any state agency that has the authority to award
business subsidies.

(8) "Wage
bands" means the following five grouping of wage rates: (a) Up to state
minimum wage plus two dollars per hour; (b) between state minimum wage plus two
dollars and one cent to state minimum wage plus four dollars per hour; (c)
between state minimum wage plus four dollars and one cent to state minimum wage
plus six dollars per hour; (d) between state minimum wage plus six dollars and
one cent to state minimum wage plus eight dollars per hour; and (e) greater
than state minimum wage plus eight dollars per hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A recipient must
provide information to grantors. The department of revenue shall develop the
business subsidy disclosure statement and provide the forms to the recipients.
The recipient must provide to the government agency that provided the business
subsidy and the department of revenue a subsidy disclosure statement in the
following format and that contains the following information:

WASHINGTON BUSINESS
ASSISTANCE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT

(Please
return by August 1st)

Please
type or print in dark ink.

1.Funding
government agency name

2.Contact
name

3.Agency
street address or post office box

4.City
and county

5.Zip
code

6.Phone
number (area code)

7.Fax
number (area code)

8.Type
of government agency

_____City ____County
_____State

____Other (Please
indicate)__________________

9.Name
of business receiving business assistance

10.Industry
of recipient (SIC code or NAIC code, please indicate code used)

11.Type
of public assistance (e.g., loan, grant, tax credit or deferral,
infrastructure, etc.)

12.Date
business assistance agreement was signed

13.Date
business assistance was provided

14.Date
project (building, machinery, etc.) was placed in service

15.Dollar
value of business assistance

16.Job
creation/retention goals for business receiving assistance (please specify)

17.Average
hourly wage goals for business receiving assistance (per hour)

18.Actual
jobs created/retained since business received assistance (please specify)

19.Actual
average hourly wage paid to employees hired since receiving assistance

20.Goals
of business assistance received: (Please indicate number of employees by
category of job, e.g., full-time, part-time, or contingent/temporary job,
number of employees per wage band, and indicate the corresponding benefit
level.)

21.Actual
performance since project placed in service: (Please indicate number of
employees by category of job, e.g., full-time, part-time, or
contingent/temporary job, number of employees per wage band, and indicate the
corresponding benefit level.)

22.Last
date actual wage and job creation/retention levels documented

23.Have
all wage and job goals been achieved?

[ ] Yes B do not submit future forms
for this project

[ ] No B please submit another form
next year

24.Signature
and phone number of person filling out the form

25.Date
this disclosure form is completed

(2) The department of
revenue, to the extent feasible, shall design the disclosure statement required
under subsection (1) of this section so that it does not exceed two
letter-sized pages in length.

(3) The report under
subsection (1) of this section must be filed by August 1st of each year for the
previous fiscal year.

(4) If the recipient
does not submit its report by November 1st, it shall be ineligible for
subsidies until the report has been satisfactorily completed and submitted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Local government
agencies and state government agencies that have awarded any business subsidies
must file a report by September 1st of each year with the department of
revenue. The local government agency must include a list of recipients that
did not complete the report required under section 2 of this act, recipients
that have not met their job and wage goals within two years, and the steps
being taken to bring them into compliance.

(2) If the department
of revenue has not received the report under subsection (1) of this section by
September 1st from a government agency required to report, the department of
revenue shall issue a warning to the government agency.

(3) The department of
revenue must provide information on reporting requirements to state and local
government agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The department of
revenue must publish a compilation and summary of the results of the reports
for the previous calendar year by December 1st of each year. The reports of
the recipients and government agencies to the department of revenue and the
compilation and summary report of the department of revenue must be made
available to the public.

(2) The department of
revenue must coordinate the production of reports so that useful comparisons
across time periods and across grantors can be made. The department of revenue
may add other information to the report as the department of revenue deems
necessary to evaluate business subsidies. Among the information in the summary
and compilation report, the department of revenue must include:

(a) Total amount of
subsidies awarded in each city, code city, county, and town of the state;

(b) Distribution of
business subsidy amounts by size of the business subsidy;

(c) Distribution of
business subsidy amounts by time category, such as monthly or quarterly;

(d) Distribution of
subsidies by type and by public purpose;

(e) Number of part-time,
full-time, and contingency or temporary jobs within separate bands of wages;
and

(f) Benefits paid
within separate bands of wages.

(3) The department of
revenue shall forward the compilation and summary report to the house of
representatives committee on trade and economic development and the senate
committee on economic development and telecommunications by December 31st of
each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act are each added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. This act applies to all
business subsidies entered into or state appropriations authorized after July
1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---