BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of
the state of

_6 Washington to protect the public against the health and
safety

_7 risks that dangerous wild animals pose to the community
and to

_8 protect the welfare of individual animals held in
private

_9 possession. By their very nature, these animals are
wild and

10 inherently dangerous and, as such, do not adjust well to
a captive

11 environment.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in
this section apply

13 throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires

14 otherwise.

15 (1) "Animal control authority" means an
entity acting alone or

16 in concert with other local governmental units for
enforcement of

17 the animal control laws of the city, county, and state,
and the

p. 1 SB
5729

_1 shelter and welfare of animals. "Animal control
authority"

_2 includes, but is not limited to the following
individuals: Animal

_3 control officers, local law enforcement agents, and
county

_4 sheriffs.

_5 (2) "Animal control officer" means an
individual employed,

_6 contracted with, or appointed by the animal control
authority for

_7 the purpose of aiding in the enforcement of this chapter
or any

_8 law or ordinance relating to the licensure of animals,
control of

_9 animals, or seizure and impoundment of animals.
"Animal control

10 officer" includes any state or local law
enforcement officer, or

11 other employee whose duties in whole or in part include

12 assignments that involve the seizure and impoundment of
any

13 animal.

14 (3) "Department" means the department of
fish and wildlife.

15 (4) "Dangerous wild animal" means those
species of animals that

16 are inherently dangerous to humans. "Dangerous
wild animals"

17 include the following classes, orders, and families,
whether bred

18 in the wild or in captivity:

19 (a) Class Mammalia:

20 (i) Order Carnivora:

21 (A) Family Felidae, except domesticated cats and
hybrids;

22 (B) Family Canidae, only wolves, not wolf-hybrids;

23 (C) Family Ursidae; and

24 (ii) Order Primates; and

25 (b) Class Reptilia:

26 (i) Order Squamata:

27 (A) Family Boidae, only African rock pythons,
amethystine

28 pythons, boelen's pythons, burmese pythons, Indian
pythons, olive

29 pythons, reticulated pythons, yellow anacondas, green
anacondas,

30 and Jamaican boas;

31 (B) Family Colubridae, only boomslangs, mangrove
snakes,

32 African twig snakes, and brown tree snakes;

33 (C) Family Elapidae;

34 (D) Family Helodermatidae;

35 (E) Family Lacertilia, only Salvator monitors and
Salvadoran

36 monitors; and

37 (F) Family Viperidae; and

38 (ii) Order Crocodilia.

SB 5729 p. 2

_1 "Dangerous wild animal" may include
species not listed if they

_2 are declared dangerous wild animals by the department,
in

_3 cooperation with the animal control authority, if the
confinement

_4 of the animal within the state can be shown to
constitute a threat

_5 to public health and safety.

_6 (5) "Person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation,

_7 organization, trade or professional association, firm, limited

_8 liability company, joint venture, association, trust,
estate, or

_9 any other legal entity, and any officer, member,
shareholder,

10 director, employee, agent, or representative thereof.

11 (6) "Wildlife sanctuary" means a nonprofit
organization

12 described in section 170(b)(1)(A)(vi) of the internal
revenue code

13 of 1986, that operates a place of refuge where abused,
neglected,

14 unwanted, impounded, abandoned, orphaned, or displaced
dangerous

15 wild animals are provided care for their lifetime or
released back

16 to their natural habitat and, with respect to any animal
owned by

17 the organization, does not:

18 (a) Conduct any activity that is not inherent to the
animal's

19 nature;

20 (b) Use the animal for any type of entertainment;

21 (c) Sell, trade, or barter the animal or the
animal's body

22 parts; or

23 (d) Breed the animal for purposes of sale.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) It is unlawful
for any person to own,

25 possess, keep, harbor, bring, or have in one's
possession a

26 dangerous wild animal, except in compliance with this
chapter.

27 (2) It is unlawful for the owner or any other person
in control

28 of a lot, tract, or parcel of land or any residence or
business

29 premises situated thereon to knowingly permit any other
person to

30 be in possession of a dangerous wild animal upon the
property,

31 residence, or premises, except in compliance with this
chapter.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This chapter shall
not apply to:

33 (1) Institutions accredited by the American zoo and
aquarium

34 association.

35 (2) Licensed humane societies;

p. 3 SB
5729

_1 (3) Animal control officers or law enforcement
officers acting

_2 under the authority of this chapter;

_3 (4) Licensed veterinary hospitals or clinics;

_4 (5) Any wildlife rehabilitator licensed by the
state, under RCW

_5 77.12.040 and WAC 232-12-275;

_6 (6) Any wildlife sanctuary;

_7 (7) Any licensed or accredited research or medical
institution;

_8 (8) Any licensed or accredited educational
institution;

_9 (9) Any circus, rodeo, or trade show;

10 (10) A person temporarily transporting a dangerous
wild animal

11 through the state if the transit time is not more than
ninety-six

12 hours and the animal is at all times maintained within a

13 confinement sufficient to prevent the dangerous wild
animal from

14 escaping.

15 NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A person may
possess a dangerous wild

16 animal if: The person was in legal possession of the
dangerous wild

17 animal before the effective date of this act; the person
is the

18 legal owner of the dangerous wild animal; and the person
applies

19 for and is granted a personal possession permit for the
dangerous

20 wild animal in their possession within ninety days after
the

21 effective date of this act. The permit is valid in any
local unit

22 in which the possession of a dangerous wild animal is
not

23 prohibited by local law. Persons who meet the
requirements in this

24 subsection shall annually obtain a personal possession
permit.

25 (2) After the effective date of this act, no new
dangerous wild

26 animal shall be brought into possession under authority
of a

27 personal possession permit.

28 (3) An applicant shall file an application to
receive a

29 personal possession permit with the animal control
authority on a

30 form provided by the animal control authority. The
application

31 shall include the following:

32 (a) A nonrefundable permit fee. The amount of the
annual permit

33 fee shall be established by the animal control
authority;

34 (b) A written statement completed by the owner which
sets forth

35 the following information:

36 (i) The name, address, and telephone number of the
applicant;

37 (ii) A description of each dangerous wild animal,
including the

SB 5729 p. 4

_1 scientific name, name, sex, age, color, weight, and any

_2 distinguishing marks or coloration that would aid in the

_3 identification of the animal;

_4 (iii) A photograph of the dangerous wild animal;

_5 (iv) The exact location where the dangerous wild
animal is to

_6 be kept;

_7 (v) The name, address, and telephone number of the
person from

_8 whom the applicant obtained the dangerous wild animal,
if known;

_9 (vi) The identification number of the dangerous wild
animal,

10 excluding reptiles when such device would endanger the
well-being

11 of the reptile; and

12 (vii) The name, address, and phone number of the
veterinarian

13 who is expected to provide veterinary care to the
dangerous wild

14 animal;

15 (c) Any additional information the animal control
authority may

16 deem necessary to carry out this chapter.

17 (4) A permit shall not be granted unless the animal
control

18 authority finds that all of the following apply:

19 (a) The provisions outlined under subsection (1) of
this

20 section are met;

21 (b) The applicant is twenty-one years of age or
older;

22 (c) The applicant has not been convicted of, or
found

23 responsible for, violating a local or state law
prohibiting

24 cruelty, neglect, or mistreatment of an animal or has
not within

25 the past ten years been convicted of a felony or been
convicted

26 for possession, sale, or use of illegal narcotics;

27 (d) The facility and the conditions in which the
dangerous wild

28 animal will be kept are in compliance with this chapter;

29 (e) The owner of the dangerous wild animal has
obtained the

30 requisite liability insurance coverage or surety bond
for the

31 dangerous wild animal under his or her control as set
forth in

32 section 9 of this act; and

33 (f) The owner has regularly provided veterinary care
to the

34 dangerous wild animal when needed and intends to provide
such care

35 in the future.

36 (5) The personal possession permit shall set forth
all of the

37 following information:

38 (a) The name, address, and phone number of the
permit holder;

p. 5 SB
5729

_1 (b) The address if different than (a) of this
subsection, where

_2 the dangerous wild animal will be kept;

_3 (c) The name, number, species, and age of the
dangerous wild

_4 animal, and any distinguishing marks or coloration that
would aid

_5 in the identification of the animal;

_6 (d) The identification number as required under
section 6 of

_7 this act, if applicable;

_8 (e) The name, address, and phone number of the
veterinarian who

_9 is expected to provide veterinary care to the dangerous
wild

10 animal named on the permit; and

11 (f) Any other relevant information the animal
control authority

12 may deem necessary.

13 (6) The animal control authority shall keep records
of who is

14 carrying a valid permit. A permit holder shall notify
the animal

15 control authority of any changes of the stated
information on the

16 permit, which shall include the death of the dangerous
wild

17 animal.

18 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The owner of the
dangerous wild animal

19 shall have an identification number placed in the
dangerous wild

20 animal via subcutaneous microchip, at the expense of the
owner, by

21 or under the supervision of a veterinarian. This
section does not

22 apply to dangerous wild reptiles if a veterinarian
determines that

23 the placement of a subcutaneous microchip would endanger
the well-

24 being of the reptile.

25 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) The animal
control authority may

26 establish specific caging requirements for the keeping
and

27 confinement of dangerous wild animals. If the animal
control

28 authority establishes caging requirements, the permittee
shall

29 keep and confine the dangerous wild animal in strict
accordance

30 with the established caging requirements. Any
deviations from the

31 regulations established by the animal control authority
shall be

32 approved by the animal control authority upon a showing
of good

33 cause.

34 (2) All caging requirements established by the
animal control

35 authority shall ensure that the dangerous wild animal is
confined

SB 5729 p. 6

_1 in a primary enclosure that protects the public's safety
and

_2 health and ensures the safety and well-being of the
dangerous wild

_3 animal.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) A dangerous wild
animal shall not be

_5 tethered, leashed, or chained outdoors, or allowed to
run at

_6 large.

_7 (2) A dangerous wild animal shall not be mistreated,
neglected,

_8 abandoned, or deprived of necessary food, water, and
sustenance.

_9 (3) A permittee transporting a dangerous wild animal
in a

10 vehicle shall ensure that the dangerous wild animal is

11 individually and securely caged, even while inside a
passenger

12 vehicle or in the bed of a truck.

13 (4) Each permittee shall have a plan for the quick
and safe

14 recapture of the dangerous wild animal if the dangerous
wild

15 animal escapes, if recapture is impossible, then a plan
for the

16 destruction of the dangerous wild animal held under a
personal

17 possession permit.

18 (5) If an owner realizes that he or she can no
longer care for

19 the dangerous wild animal, an animal rescue facility,
wildlife

20 sanctuary, or an American zoo and aquarium association
accredited

21 facility shall be contacted for possible placement of
the animal

22 before euthanization of the dangerous wild animal.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) All owners of a
dangerous wild animal

24 shall either: (a) Maintain liability insurance coverage
with an

25 insurer qualified under Title 48 RCW in the amount of at
least two

26 hundred fifty thousand dollars insuring for bodily
injury to or

27 death of a person or injury and destruction to property
caused by

28 the dangerous wild animal; or (b) must guarantee that
the owner

29 has a surety bond issued by a surety insurer qualified
under

30 chapter 48.28 RCW in a form acceptable to the animal
control

31 authority in the amount of at least two hundred fifty
thousand

32 dollars. All owners of a dangerous wild animal shall
provide a copy

33 of the policy for liability insurance or proof of surety
bond to

34 the animal control authority on a yearly basis.

35 (2) All owners of a dangerous wild animal shall have
posted and

36 displayed at each possible entrance onto the premises
where a

p. 7 SB
5729

_1 dangerous wild animal is kept a conspicuous sign,
clearly legible,

_2 and easily readable by the public warning that there is
a

_3 dangerous wild animal on the premises. In addition, the
owner shall

_4 conspicuously display a sign with a warning symbol that
informs

_5 children of the presence of a dangerous wild animal.

_6 (3) If any dangerous wild animal escapes or is
released, either

_7 intentionally or unintentionally, the owner of the
dangerous wild

_8 animal shall immediately contact a law enforcement
officer of the

_9 city or county where the owner resides to report the
escape or

10 release. The owner is liable for all expenses
associated with

11 efforts to recapture the animal. If it is determined
that the owner

12 was not at fault for the escape or release of the
dangerous wild

13 animal, and the person who is responsible for the escape
or

14 release is known, the owner may bring a civil action suit
for

15 damages against the person.

16 NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. The permittee shall
not bring a dangerous

17 wild animal to any commercial or retail establishment
unless the

18 permittee is bringing the animal to a veterinarian or a
veterinary

19 clinic.

20 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. An owner of a
dangerous wild animal, at

21 all reasonable times, shall allow an animal control
officer to

22 enter the premises where the animal is kept to ensure compliance

23 with this chapter.

24 NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. (1) Any dangerous
wild animal shall be

25 immediately confiscated by an animal control authority
if the: (a)

26 Owner does not have a personal possession permit under
section 5

27 of this act; (b) owner does not secure the liability
insurance

28 coverage or surety bond required under section 9 of this
act; (c)

29 provisions of section 8 of this act are not being met;
(d)

30 conditions under which the dangerous wild animal is kept
are

31 directly or indirectly dangerous to human health and
safety. In

32 addition, the owner is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
punishable in

33 accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.

34 (2) A dangerous wild animal may be returned to the
owner only

SB 5729 p. 8

_1 if the owner has a personal possession permit and has
corrected

_2 the conditions resulting in the confiscation.

_3 (3) If a dangerous wild animal is confiscated, the
owner is

_4 liable for the costs of placement and care for the
dangerous wild

_5 animal from the time of confiscation until the time of
return to

_6 the owner or until the time the animal has been
relocated to an

_7 alternative facility, such as a sanctuary, licensed
humane

_8 society, or an institution accredited by the American
zoo and

_9 aquarium association.

10 NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through
12 of this act

11 constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 9 SB
5729