BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature
finds and declares that:

_6 (1) The Salmonella enteritidis (Se) bacteria in
shell eggs has

_7 increasingly been implicated as a primary cause of
foodborne

_8 illness in Washington;

_9 (2) Salmonella bacteria can cause a variety of
serious health

10 problems, including flu-like symptoms, bloodstream
infections,

11 arthritis, meningitis, and sometimes death;

12 (3) Once infected, chickens can pass the pathogen
directly from

13 their ovaries to the contents of the eggs they lay;

14 (4) Forcing egg-laying hens to molt includes
withholding food

15 from the hens for up to fourteen days and withholding
water from

16 the hens for up to three days;

17 (5) The practice of forcing the molting of
egg-laying hens can

p. 1 SB
5730

_1 contribute to increased Salmonella levels because the
birds'

_2 immune systems become severely impaired by prolonged
food and

_3 water deprivation;

_4 (6) Many egg-laying hens in Washington undergo
forced molting;

_5 and

_6 (7) Regulation of forced molting practices by the
department of

_7 health is essential for the preservation of the
public's health.

_8 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 43.70

_9 RCW to read as follows:

10 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

11 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

12 (a) "Harm" means physical injury or a
stress reaction

13 including, but not limited to, the following: A
compromised immune

14 system, rapid weight loss, cannibalism, reduction in
appetite,

15 feather-picking, excessive drinking, and
unresponsiveness.

16 (b) "Induced or forced molt" means to
artificially manipulate a

17 bird's processes normally associated with seasonal
feather loss

18 and regrowth for the purposes of manipulating egg
production and

19 the economics of production.

20 (2) No egg handler may negligently deprive any bird
used for

21 egg-laying purposes of clean water or nutritious food
or otherwise

22 cause an induced or forced molt that results in harm to
the egg-

23 laying bird.

24 (3) A person who violates this section is subject
to the

25 penalties provided for in this chapter. Whenever a
person has

26 violated this section, the department of health must
notify the

27 department of agriculture of the violation so that the
department

28 of agriculture may take appropriate action under RCW
69.25.070.

29 (4) The department of health may adopt rules as
necessary to

30 implement this section.

31 Sec. 3. RCW
69.25.070 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 201 s 8 are each

32 amended to read as follows:

33 The department may deny, suspend, revoke, or issue
a license or

34 a conditional license if it determines that an
applicant or

35 licensee has committed any of the following acts:

SB 5730 p. 2

_1 (1) That the applicant or licensee is violating or
has violated

_2 any of the provisions of this chapter or rules ((and
regulations))

_3 adopted thereunder or violated section 2 of this act.

_4 (2) That the application contains any materially
false or

_5 misleading statement or involves any misrepresentation
by any

_6 officer, agent, or employee of the applicant.

_7 (3) That the applicant or licensee has concealed or
withheld

_8 any facts regarding any violation of this chapter by
any officer,

_9 agent, or employee of the applicant or licensee.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5730