BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) Sales of tangible
personal property to an electric utility for construction or improvement of new
or existing generating facilities; or

(b) Sales of or charges
made for labor and services performed in respect to the construction of new or
additional generating facilities.

(2) The following
definitions apply to this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(a) "Electric
utility" has the same meaning as provided under RCW 19.29A.010 and
includes, but is not limited to, utilities that generate electricity from
sources such as hydroelectric, natural gas, nuclear, plasma arc, tidal,
biomass, fuel cells, geothermal, or landfill gas.

(b) "Generating
facilities" means (i) any machinery, equipment, structure, property,
property improvement, or accessory installed, built, or acquired for the
primary purpose of increasing the output or efficiency of the electric utility;
or (ii) a facility as defined in RCW 82.34.010(1).

(3) The purchaser must
provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate
for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use of tangible personal property by an
electric utility for construction or improvement of new or existing generating
facilities.

(2) The following
definitions apply to this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(a) "Electric utility"
has the same meaning as provided under RCW 19.29A.010 and includes, but is not
limited to, utilities that generate electricity from sources such as
hydroelectric, natural gas, nuclear, plasma arc, tidal, biomass, fuel cells,
geothermal, or landfill gas.

(b) "Generating
facilities" means (i) any machinery, equipment, structure, property,
property improvement, or accessory installed, built, or acquired for the
primary purpose of increasing the output or efficiency of the electric utility;
or (ii) a facility as defined in RCW 82.34.010(1).

(3) The
purchaser must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.

---
END ---