BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
18.160.010 and 1990 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 The ((following words or terms shall have the
meanings

_9 indicated)) definitions in this section apply
throughout this

10 chapter unless the context clearly ((indicates))
requires

11 otherwise.

12 (1) "Apprentice" or "trainee"
means a person who is learning

13 the fire sprinkler fitting trade, under the direct
supervision of

14 a state certified fire sprinkler fitter holding a
level of

15 certification equal to or above the level of fire
sprinkler work

16 being done by the apprentice.

17 (2) "Board" means the state fire
protection policy board

18 created in RCW 43.43.932.

p. 1 SB
5732

_1 (3) "Certificate of competency
holder" means an individual who

_2 has satisfactorily met the qualifications and has
received a

_3 certificate of competency from the state director of
fire

_4 protection under the provisions of this chapter.

_5 (((2))) (4) "Certified fire sprinkler
fitter" means a person

_6 who has been certified by the board to work under the
supervision

_7 of a licensed fire protection contractor under the
provisions of

_8 this chapter.

_9 (5) "Fire protection sprinkler fitting"
means the installation,

10 maintenance, and repair of sprinkler, standpipe,
hose, or other

11 hazard systems for fire protection purposes, that is
an assembly

12 of underground and/or overhead piping or conduit
beginning at the

13 connection to the primary water supply, whether
public or private.

14 (6) "Fire protection sprinkler system
contractor" means a

15 person or organization that offers to undertake the
execution of

16 contracts for the installation, inspection, maintenance,
or

17 servicing of a fire protection sprinkler system or any
part of

18 such a system.

19 (((3))) (7) "Fire protection
sprinkler system" means an

20 assembly of underground and/or overhead piping or
conduit

21 beginning at the connection to the primary water supply,
whether

22 public or private, that conveys water with or without
other agents

23 to dispersal openings or devices to extinguish, control,
or

24 contain fire and to provide protection from exposure to
fire or

25 other products of combustion.

26 (((4))) (8) "Fire protection
sprinkler system contractor's

27 license" means the license issued by the state
director of fire

28 protection to a fire protection sprinkler system
contractor upon

29 an application being approved, the fee being paid, and
the

30 satisfactory completion of the requirements of this
chapter. The

31 license shall be issued in the name of the fire
protection

32 sprinkler system contractor with the name or names of
the

33 certificate of competency holder noted thereon.

34 (((5))) (9) "Fire sprinkler
certificate holder" includes a

35 level I, II, and III fire sprinkler certificate
holder, a level IV

36 underground installer certificate holder, a level V
inspection,

37 testing, and maintenance technician, and a level VI
limited fire

SB 5732 p. 2

_1 sprinkler fitter certificate holder and training
certificate

_2 holder.

_3 (10) "NFPA 13" means whatever standard
that is used by the

_4 national fire protection association for the
installation of fire

_5 protection sprinkler systems.

_6 (11) "NFPA 13-D" means whatever
standard that is used by the

_7 national fire protection association for the
installation of fire

_8 protection sprinkler systems in one or two-family
residential

_9 dwellings or mobile homes.

10 (((6))) (12) "NFPA 13-R"
means whatever standard that is used

11 by the national fire protection association for the
installation

12 of fire protection sprinkler systems in residential
dwellings up

13 to four stories in height.

14 (((7))) (13) "NFPA 25" means
whatever standard that is used by

15 the national fire protection association establishing
minimum

16 requirements for the periodic inspection, testing,
and maintenance

17 of water-based fire protection systems.

18 (14) "Inspection" means a visual
examination of a fire

19 protection sprinkler system or portion of the system to
verify

20 that the system appears to be in operating condition and
is free

21 from physical damage and complies with the applicable
statutes and

22 ((regulations)) rules adopted by the state
director of fire

23 protection.

24 (((8))) (15) "Installation"
means the initial design placement

25 of fire protection sprinkler system equipment or the
extension,

26 modification, or alteration of equipment after the
initial

27 placement. Installation shall include the work from a
street or

28 main water access throughout the entire building.

29 (((9))) (16) "Maintenance"
means to maintain in the condition

30 of repair that provides performance as originally
planned.

31 (((10))) (17) "Organization"
means a corporation, partnership,

32 firm, or other business association, governmental
entity, or any

33 other legal or commercial entity.

34 (((11))) (18) "Person" means
a natural person, including an

35 owner, manager, partner, officer, employee, or occupant.

36 (((12))) (19) "Service"
means to repair or test.

37 (20) "State certified level I - journeyman
fire sprinkler

p. 3 SB
5732

_1 fitter" means a state certificate holder who is
qualified to

_2 install, inspect, maintain, or service an NFPA 13-D
fire

_3 protection sprinkler system or any part of such a
system.

_4 (21) "State certified level II - journeyman
fire sprinkler

_5 fitter" means a state certificate holder who is
qualified to

_6 install, inspect, maintain, or service either an NFPA
13-D, or an

_7 NFPA 13-R, or both, fire protection sprinkler system
or any part

_8 of such a system.

_9 (22) "State certified level III - journeyman
fire sprinkler

10 fitter" means a state certificate holder who is
qualified to

11 install, inspect, maintain, or service a fire
protection sprinkler

12 system.

13 (23) "State certified level IV - fire
sprinkler underground

14 pipe fitter" means a state certificate holder
who is qualified to

15 install, inspect, maintain, or service the
underground portions of

16 fire protection systems in conformance with
recognized standards

17 adopted by the board.

18 (24) "State certified level V - fire
sprinkler system

19 inspection, testing, and maintenance technician"
means a state

20 certificate holder who is qualified to inspect,
maintain, or test

21 an NFPA 13-D, NFPA 13-R, NFPA 13, or all other fire
protection

22 sprinkler systems regulated in this chapter.

23 (25) "State certified level VI - limited
journeyman fire

24 sprinkler fitter" means a person with limited
certification

25 restricted to working on premises or that part of the
premises

26 actually owned or leased, and occupied by the limited
certificate

27 holder's employer. A limited certificate holder is
limited to

28 working on the properties owned or leased by the
limited fire

29 sprinkler fitter's employer, to the level of
competence, as

30 certified and documented to the board by the limited
certificate

31 holder's employer.

32 (26) "State director" or
"director" means the state director of

33 fire protection appointed under RCW 43.43.938.

34 Sec. 2. RCW
18.160.030 and 2000 c 171 s 35 are each amended to

35 read as follows:

36 (1) This chapter shall be administered by the state
director of

37 fire protection.

SB 5732 p. 4

_1 (2) The state director of fire protection shall have
the

_2 authority, and it shall be his or her duty to:

_3 (a) Issue such administrative ((regulations))
rules as

_4 necessary for the administration of this chapter;

_5 (b)(i) Set reasonable fees for licenses,
certificates, testing,

_6 and other aspects of the administration of this
chapter. However,

_7 the license fee for fire protection sprinkler system
contractors

_8 engaged solely in the installation, inspection,
maintenance, or

_9 servicing of NFPA 13-D fire protection sprinkler systems
shall not

10 exceed one hundred dollars, and the license fee for fire

11 protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely
in the

12 installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of
NFPA 13-R

13 fire protection sprinkler systems shall not exceed three
hundred

14 dollars;

15 (ii) Adopt rules establishing a special category
restricted to

16 contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW who
install

17 underground systems that service fire protection
sprinkler

18 systems((. The rules shall be adopted within ninety
days of March

19 31, 1992));

20 (c) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;

21 (d) Conduct investigations of complaints to
determine if any

22 infractions of this chapter or the ((regulations))
rules developed

23 under this chapter have occurred;

24 (e) Assign a certificate number to each certificate
of

25 competency holder; ((and))

26 (f) Adopt rules necessary to implement and
administer a program

27 which requires the affixation of a seal any time a fire
protection

28 sprinkler system is installed, which seal shall include
the

29 certificate number of any certificate of competency
holder who

30 installs, in whole or in part, the fire protection
sprinkler

31 system;

32 (g) Adopt rules necessary to assess and collect
fees associated

33 with the enforcement of a correction order. These
fees shall

34 include but not be limited to personnel costs and
inspection costs

35 associated with compliance of the order;

36 (h) Assess and collect fees associated with the
investigation

37 of violations of this chapter and the issuance of a
correction

38 order. These fees shall include but not be limited
to personnel

p. 5 SB
5732

_1 costs and inspection costs associated with the
investigation of

_2 the violation of this chapter and the issuance and
compliance of

_3 the order;

_4 (i) Adopt rules necessary to assess monetary
penalties of a

_5 civil nature for a violation of the provisions of
this chapter;

_6 (j) Adopt rules, make specific decisions, orders,
and rulings,

_7 including demands and findings, and take other
necessary action

_8 for the implementation and investigation of alleged
infractions of

_9 this chapter; and

10 (k) Adopt rules necessary to collect fees and
establish

11 guidelines for conducting plan reviews and
inspections when

12 requested.

13 Sec. 3. RCW
18.160.040 and 2000 c 171 s 36 are each amended to

14 read as follows:

15 (1) To become a certificate of competency holder
under this

16 chapter, an applicant must have satisfactorily passed an

17 examination administered by the state director of fire

18 protection. A certificate of competency holder can
satisfy this

19 examination requirement by presenting a copy of a
current

20 certificate of competency from the national institute
for

21 certification in engineering technologies showing that
the

22 applicant has achieved the classification of engineering

23 technician level 3 or senior engineering technician
level 4 in the

24 field of fire protection, automatic sprinkler system
layout. ((The

25 state director of fire protection may accept
equivalent proof of

26 qualification in lieu of examination.)) This
examination

27 requirement is mandatory except as otherwise provided in
this

28 chapter.

29 (2) Every applicant for a certificate of competency
shall

30 fulfill the requirements established by the state
director of fire

31 protection under chapter 34.05 RCW.

32 (3) Every applicant for a certificate of competency
shall make

33 application to the state director of fire protection and
pay the

34 fees required.

35 (4) ((Provided the application for the
certificate of

36 competency is made prior to ninety days after May 1,
1991, the

37 state director of fire protection, in lieu of the
examination

SB 5732 p. 6

_1 requirements of the applicant for a certificate of
competency, may

_2 accept as satisfactory evidence of competency and
qualification,

_3 affidavits attesting that the applicant has had a
minimum of three

_4 years' experience.

_5 (5) The state director of fire protection may
issue a temporary

_6 certificate of competency to an applicant who, in his
or her

_7 judgment, will satisfactorily perform as a
certificate of

_8 competency holder under the provisions of this
chapter. The

_9 temporary certificate of competency shall remain in
effect for a

10 period of up to three years. The temporary
certificate of

11 competency holder shall, within the three-year
period, complete

12 the examination requirements specified in subsection
(1) of this

13 section. There shall be no examination exemption for
an individual

14 issued a temporary certificate of competency. Prior
to the

15 expiration of the three-year period, the temporary
certificate of

16 competency holder shall make application for a
regular certificate

17 of competency. The procedures and qualifications for
issuance of a

18 regular certificate of competency shall be applicable
to the

19 temporary certificate of competency holder. When a
temporary

20 certificate of competency expires, the holder shall
cease all

21 activities associated with the holding of a temporary
certificate

22 of competency, subject to the penalties contained in
this chapter.

23 (6))) To become a licensed fire protection
sprinkler system

24 contractor under this chapter, a person or firm must
comply with

25 the following:

26 (a) Must be or have in his or her full-time employ a
holder of

27 a valid certificate of competency;

28 (b) Comply with the minimum insurance requirements of
this

29 chapter; and

30 (c) Make application to the state director of fire
protection

31 for a license and pay the fees required.

32 (((7))) (5) Each license and
certificate of competency issued

33 under this chapter must be posted in a conspicuous place
in the

34 fire protection sprinkler system contractor's place of
business.

35 (((8))) (6) All bids, advertisements,
proposals, offers, and

36 installation drawings for fire protection sprinkler
systems must

37 prominently display the fire protection sprinkler system

38 contractor's license number.

p. 7 SB
5732

_1 (((9))) (7) A certificate of
competency or license issued under

_2 this chapter is not transferable.

_3 (((10))) (8) In no case shall a
certificate of competency

_4 holder be employed full time by more than one fire
protection

_5 sprinkler system contractor at the same time. If the
certificate of

_6 competency holder should leave the employment of the
fire

_7 protection sprinkler system contractor, he or she must
notify the

_8 state director of fire protection within thirty days.
If the

_9 certificate of competency holder should leave the
employment of

10 the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, the
contractor

11 shall have six months or until the expiration of the
current

12 license, whichever occurs last, to submit a new
application

13 identifying another certificate of competency holder who
is at the

14 time of application an owner of the fire protection
sprinkler

15 system business or a full-time employee of the fire
protection

16 sprinkler system contractor, in order to be issued a new
license.

17 If such application is not received and a new license
issued

18 within the allotted time, the state director of fire
protection

19 shall revoke the license of the fire protection
sprinkler system

20 contractor.

21 Sec. 4. RCW
18.160.080 and 1997 c 58 s 834 are each amended to

22 read as follows:

23 (1) The state director of fire protection may refuse
to issue

24 or renew or may suspend or revoke the privilege of a
licensed fire

25 protection sprinkler system contractor or the
certificate of a

26 certificate of competency holder to engage in the fire
protection

27 sprinkler system business or in lieu thereof, establish and
assess

28 civil fines or penalties as prescribed by
Washington state law,

29 for any of the following reasons:

30 (a) Gross incompetency or gross negligence in the
preparation

31 of technical drawings, installation, repair, alteration,

32 maintenance, inspection, service, or addition to fire
protection

33 sprinkler systems;

34 (b) Conviction of a felony;

35 (c) Fraudulent or dishonest practices while engaging
in the

36 fire protection sprinkler systems business;

SB 5732 p. 8

_1 (d) Use of false evidence or misrepresentation in an

_2 application for a license or certificate of competency;

_3 (e) Permitting his or her license to be used in
connection with

_4 the preparation of any technical drawings which have not
been

_5 prepared by him or her personally or under his or her
immediate

_6 supervision, or in violation of this chapter; or

_7 (f) Knowingly violating any provisions of this
chapter or the

_8 ((regulations)) rules issued thereunder.

_9 (2) The state director of fire protection shall
revoke the

10 license of a licensed fire protection sprinkler system
contractor

11 or the certificate of a certificate of competency holder
who

12 engages in the fire protection sprinkler system business
while the

13 license or certificate of competency is suspended.

14 (3) ((The state director of fire protection shall
immediately

15 suspend any license or certificate issued under this
chapter if

16 the holder has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the

17 department of social and health services as a person
who is not in

18 compliance with a support order or a residential or
visitation

19 order. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements

20 for issuance or reinstatement during the suspension,
issuance or

21 reissuance of the license or certificate shall be
automatic upon

22 the director's receipt of a release issued by the
department of

23 social and health services stating that the person is
in

24 compliance with the order.

25 (4))) Any licensee or certificate of
competency holder who is

26 aggrieved by an order of the state director of fire
protection

27 suspending or revoking a license or assessing civil
fines may,

28 within thirty days after notice of such suspension ((or)),

29 revocation, or civil fine, appeal under chapter
34.05 RCW. ((This

30 subsection does not apply to actions taken under
subsection (3) of

31 this section.))

32 Sec. 5. RCW
18.160.100 and 1992 c 116 s 3 are each amended to read

33 as follows:

34 Any fire protection sprinkler system contractor who
constructs,

35 installs, or maintains a fire protection sprinkler
system in any

36 occupancy, except an owner-occupied single-family
dwelling,

37 without first obtaining a fire sprinkler contractor's
license from

p. 9 SB
5732

_1 the state of Washington, is guilty of either a
gross misde­meanor,

_2 or subject to civil fines and penalties, or both.
This section may

_3 not be construed to create any criminal liability for a
prime

_4 contractor or an owner of an occupancy unless it is
proved that

_5 the prime contractor or owner had actual knowledge of ((an))
the

_6 illegal construction, installation, or maintenance of a fire

_7 protection sprinkler system by a fire protection
sprinkler system

_8 contractor.

_9 NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) A person wishing
to engage in the

10 trade of fire sprinkler fitting must, within three years
of the

11 effective date of this section, obtain and maintain a
fire

12 sprinkler fitter certification equal to or greater than
the level

13 of work in which the sprinkler fitter will be engaged.

14 (2) No person may engage in or offer to engage in
the trade of

15 fire sprinkler fitting without having:

16 (a) A level I journeyman fire sprinkler fitter
certificate;

17 (b) A level II journeyman fire sprinkler fitter
certificate;

18 (c) A level III journeyman fire sprinkler fitter
certificate;

19 (d) A level IV fire sprinkler underground pipe
fitter

20 certificate;

21 (e) A level V fire sprinkler system inspection,
testing, and

22 maintenance technician certificate;

23 (f) A level VI limited journeyman fire sprinkler
fitter

24 certificate; or

25 (g) A training certificate.

26 (3) A trainee must be supervised by a person who has
a fire

27 sprinkler certificate level I, II, III, IV, or V, as
required by

28 section 7 of this act.

29 (4) No contractor may employ a person to engage in
or offer to

30 engage in the trade of fire sprinkler fitting unless the
person

31 employed has a level I, II, or III journeyman fire
sprinkler

32 fitter certificate or training certificate. For the
purposes of

33 this section, "contractor" means any person or
entity, corporate

34 or otherwise, engaged in any work covered by the
provisions of

35 this chapter, or chapter 18.27 RCW.

36 (5) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is
an

37 infraction. Each day in which a person engages in the
trade of fire

SB 5732 p. 10

_1 sprinkler fitting in violation of subsection (1) of this
section

_2 or employs a person in violation of subsection (1) of
this section

_3 is a separate infraction. Each worksite at which a
person engages

_4 in the trade of fire sprinkler fitting in violation of
subsection

_5 (1) of this section or at which a person is employed in
violation

_6 of subsection (1) of this section is a separate
infraction.

_7 (6) Notices of infractions for violations of
subsection (1) of

_8 this section may be issued to one or all of the
following:

_9 (a) The person engaging in or offering to engage in
the trade

10 of fire sprinkler fitting in violation of subsection (1)
of this

11 section;

12 (b) The contractor in violation of subsection (1) of
this

13 section; and

14 (c) The contractor's employee who authorized the
work

15 assignment of the person employed in violation of
subsection (1)

16 of this section.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) An applicant for
a fire sprinkler

18 fitter certificate must submit an application to the
board on a

19 form and in the manner as provided by the board by
rule. The

20 application must state the level of certificate
requested, and be

21 accompanied by a fee as provided by the board by rule.

22 (2) Upon receipt of the application, the board must
review the

23 application and make a determination as to whether the
applicant

24 is eligible to take an examination for the level of
certification

25 requested.

26 (a) To be eligible to take the examination for a
level I

27 journeyman fire sprinkler fitter certificate, the
applicant must

28 be at least eighteen years old, and provide a notarized
affidavit

29 of at least two thousand hours proven fire sprinkler
fitter

30 experience in the employment of a fire sprinkler
contractor.

31 (b) To be eligible to take the examination for a
level II

32 journeyman fire sprinkler fitter certificate, the
applicant must

33 be at least eighteen years old, and provide a notarized
affidavit

34 of at least four thousand hours proven fire sprinkler
fitter

35 experience in the employment of a level II or III fire
sprinkler

36 contractor.

37 (c) To be eligible to take the examination for a
level III

p. 11 SB
5732

_1 journeyman fire sprinkler fitter certificate, the
applicant must

_2 be at least eighteen years old, and provide a notarized
affidavit

_3 of at least eight thousand hours proven fire sprinkler
fitter

_4 experience in the employment of a level III fire sprinkler

_5 contractor.

_6 (d) To be eligible to take the examination for a
level IV fire

_7 sprinkler underground pipe fitter certificate, the
applicant must

_8 be at least eighteen years old, and provide a notarized
affidavit

_9 of at least two thousand hours proven experience
installing public

10 or private water mains for an underground or utility
contractor.

11 (e) To be eligible to take the examination for a
level V fire

12 sprinkler system inspection, testing, and maintenance
technician

13 certificate, the applicant must be at least eighteen
years old,

14 and provide a notarized affidavit of at least two
thousand hours

15 proven fire sprinkler fitter experience in the
employment of a

16 level III fire sprinkler contractor.

17 (f) The board may issue a level VI limited
journeyman fire

18 sprinkler fitter certificate to an applicant whose
employer has

19 submitted documentation to the board certifying that the
applicant

20 is qualified to work to the level of competence
requested by the

21 applicant, on properties owned or leased and occupied by
the

22 employer.

23 (3) The board may adopt rules, make specific
decisions, orders,

24 and rulings, including demands and findings, and take
other

25 necessary action for the implementation, investigation
of alleged

26 infractions of, and enforcement of this chapter and
rules adopted

27 under this chapter.

28 (4) Upon determination that the applicant is
eligible to take

29 the examination, the board must notify the applicant,
and indicate

30 the time and place for taking the exam.

31 (5) Examinations are administered by the board and
held at the

32 times and places within the state as the board
determines. Each

33 applicant must take and pass an objective, written
examination of

34 his or her fitness for a certificate at the level of
certification

35 requested by the applicant. The contents and procedures
of the

36 examination process must be established by the board by
rule.

37 (6) The board must issue certificates to all
applicants who

SB 5732 p. 12

_1 have passed the examination and paid the fee for the

_2 certificate. The certificate must bear the date of
issuance and

_3 expire on the date of renewal as set by rule.

_4 (7) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship
program

_5 approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the fire sprinkler
fitting

_6 construction trade, or an individual who is learning the
fire

_7 sprinkler fitting construction trade, may work in the
fire

_8 sprinkler fitting construction trade if supervised by a
certified

_9 fire sprinkler fitter holding a level of certification
equal to or

10 greater than the level of fire sprinkler work being done
by the

11 apprentice or trainee.

12 (a) All apprentices, trainees, or other individuals
learning

13 the fire sprinkler fitting construction trade must
obtain a fire

14 sprinkler fitting training certificate from the board.
The

15 certificate authorizes the holder to learn the fire
sprinkler

16 fitting construction trade while under the direct
supervision of a

17 certified fire sprinkler fitter holding certification
equal to or

18 greater than the apprentice or trainee fire sprinkler
fitter=s

19 level of work.

20 (b) A person who has been issued a fire sprinkler
fitting

21 training certificate under this chapter must renew the
training

22 certificate annually. At the time of renewal, the
training

23 certificate holder must provide the board with an
accurate list of

24 the holder=s employers in the fire
sprinkler industry for the

25 previous year and the number of hours worked for each
employer.

26 (c) There is an annual fee for the issuance or
renewal of a

27 training certificate. The board must set the fee by
rule. The fee

28 must cover, but not exceed, the cost of administering
and

29 enforcing the training certification and supervision
requirements

30 of this chapter. Apprentices, trainees, or others
learning the fire

31 sprinkler fitting trade must have their fire sprinkler
training

32 certificate card in their possession at all times while
they are

33 performing fire sprinkler fitting work. They must
produce the

34 certificate for an authorized representative of the
board at the

35 representative's request.

36 (8) The board may issue a one-time temporary
journeyman fire

37 sprinkler fitter permit whenever a fire sprinkler fitter
coming

38 into the state of Washington from another state makes a
request to

p. 13 SB
5732

_1 the board for a temporary permit to engage in the trade
of fire

_2 sprinkler fitting as a state certified level I, II, or
III

_3 journeyman fire sprinkler fitter, during the period of
time

_4 between the filing of an application for a certificate
and taking

_5 the examination as provided for in this section. A
temporary permit

_6 may be issued for up to ninety calendar days. A
temporary permit

_7 may not be issued to:

_8 (a) A person who has failed to pass the examination
for

_9 journeyman fire sprinkler fitter certificate;

10 (b) An applicant who has not furnished the board
with the

11 evidence required by this section; or

12 (c) To an apprentice or trainee fire sprinkler fitter.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) The board must
issue certificates to

14 all applicants who pass the examination and have paid
the fee for

15 the certificate. The certificate must bear the date of
issuance,

16 and expires three years from the date of issuance.

17 (2) Failure to renew a certificate on or before the
renewal

18 date causes the certificate to lapse. It is unlawful
thereafter for

19 any person to engage, offer to engage, or hold himself
or herself

20 out as a certified journeyman fire sprinkler fitter
unless the

21 certificate is renewed.

22 (3) The certificate may not be renewed without
retesting unless

23 the certificate holder provides the board, at the time
of renewal,

24 with documentation of at least eight hours continuing
education

25 during each of the three years, for a total of
twenty-four

26 continuing education hours during the licensure period.
The

27 continuing education curriculum must include categories
covering

28 work place safety, fire sprinkler trade materials and
tools, new

29 technologies, and codes and standards, of which no more
than eight

30 hours shall be in any one category in a three-year
period. The

31 continuing education required under this section may
include

32 seminars and conferences. Any employer‑sponsored
training and its

33 components must be reviewed and approved by the board.

34 (4) Level I journeyman fire sprinkler fitter
certificate

35 holders, level II journeyman fire sprinkler fitter
certificate

36 holders, level III journeyman fire sprinkler fitter
certificate

37 holders, level IV fire sprinkler underground pipe fitter

SB 5732 p. 14

_1 certificate holders, level V fire sprinkler system
inspection,

_2 testing, and maintenance technicians, and level VI
limited

_3 journeyman fire sprinkler fitter certificate holders
must at all

_4 times carry an identification card containing
identifying

_5 information as prescribed by the board by rule. The
identification

_6 card must be produced on demand by a state, city, or
county fire

_7 official. The board must supply the card. The fee for
the card must

_8 be related to the cost of producing the card.

_9 (5) The holder of a fire sprinkler fitter training
certificate

10 must renew the certificate annually. At the time of
renewal, the

11 holder must provide the board with an accurate list of
the

12 training certificate holder's employers in the fire
sprinkler

13 fitting construction industry for the previous year and
the number

14 of hours worked for each employer.

15 (a) There is an annual fee for the issuance or
renewal of the

16 fire sprinkler fitter training certificate. The amount
of the

17 annual fee must be set by the board by rule.
Individuals learning

18 the fire sprinkler fitting trade must have their fire
sprinkler

19 fitter training certificate in their possession at all
times while

20 performing fire sprinkler fitting work. They shall
produce their

21 certificate for an authorized representative of the board
at the

22 representative's request.

23 (b) A person who has been issued a fire sprinkler
fitter

24 training certificate under this chapter may engage in
the trade of

25 a fire sprinkler fitter if that person is working under
the direct

26 supervision of a certified journeyman fire sprinkler
fitter.

27 Supervision consists of a person being on the same job
site and

28 under the control of the certified journeyman fire
sprinkler

29 fitter holding a level of certification equal to or
greater than

30 the level of fire sprinkler fitter work being done by
the trainee.

31 NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. An authorized
representative of the board

32 may investigate alleged or apparent violations of this
chapter. An

33 authorized representative of the board, upon
presentation of

34 credentials, may inspect sites at which a person is
doing fire

35 sprinkler fitting work for the purpose of determining
whether that

36 person has a certificate issued by the board in
accordance with

37 this chapter or is supervised by a person who has such a

p. 15 SB
5732

_1 certificate or permit. Upon the request of the
authorized

_2 representative of the board, a person doing fire
sprinkler fitting

_3 work must produce evidence that the person has a
certificate or

_4 permit issued by the board in accordance with this
chapter or is

_5 supervised by a person who has such a certificate or
permit.

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) The board may
revoke, suspend, or fine

_7 a certified journeyman fire sprinkler fitter, fire
sprinkler

_8 underground pipe fitter, fire sprinkler system
inspection,

_9 testing, and maintenance technician, limited journeyman
fire

10 sprinkler fitter, or training certificate for any of the
following

11 reasons:

12 (a) The certificate was obtained through error or
fraud;

13 (b) The certificate holder is judged to be
incompetent to carry

14 on the trade; or

15 (c) The certificate holder has violated a provision
of this

16 chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter.

17 (2) Before a certificate is revoked or suspended, or
a

18 certificate holder is fined, the board must send a
written notice

19 by registered mail, with return receipt requested, to
the

20 certificate holder's last known address. The notice
must list the

21 allegations against the certificate holder and give him
or her the

22 opportunity to request a hearing before an
administrative law

23 judge. At the hearing, the board and the certificate
holder may

24 produce witnesses and give testimony. The hearing must
be conducted

25 in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The
administrative law judge

26 shall render his or her decision based upon the
testimony and

27 evidence presented and must notify the parties immediately
upon

28 reaching a decision.

29 (3) The board may deny renewal of a certificate
issued under

30 this chapter if the applicant owes outstanding penalties
for a

31 final judgment under this chapter. The board must
notify the

32 applicant of the denial by registered mail, return
receipt

33 requested, to the address on the application. The
applicant may

34 appeal the denial within thirty days by filing a notice
of appeal

35 with the board. The office of administrative hearings
shall conduct

36 the hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

SB 5732 p. 16

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. (1) An authorized
representative of the

_2 board may issue a notice of infraction as specified in
section 10

_3 of this act, if a person who is doing fire sprinkler
fitting work

_4 or who is offering to do fire sprinkler fitting work
fails to

_5 produce evidence of having a certificate or permit
issued by the

_6 board in accordance with this chapter or of being supervised
by a

_7 person who has such a certificate or permit. A notice
of infraction

_8 issued under this section must be personally served on
the person

_9 named in the notice by an authorized representative of
the board

10 or sent by certified mail to the last known address
provided to

11 the board of the person named in the notice.

12 (2) The form of the notice of infraction issued
under this

13 chapter must include the following:

14 (a) A statement that the notice represents a
determination that

15 the infraction has been committed by the person named in
the

16 notice and that the determination is final unless
contested as

17 provided in this chapter;

18 (b) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal
offense

19 for which imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction;

20 (c) A statement of the specific infraction for which
the notice

21 was issued;

22 (d) A statement of the monetary penalty that has
been

23 established for the infraction;

24 (e) A statement of the options provided in this
chapter for

25 responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to
exercise

26 these options;

27 (f) A statement that at any hearing to contest the

28 determination, the state has the burden of proving, by a

29 preponderance of the evidence, that the infraction was
committed;

30 and that the person may subpoena witnesses, including
the

31 authorized representative of the board who issued and
served the

32 notice of infraction;

33 (g) A statement, which the person shall sign, that
the person

34 promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one
of the ways

35 provided in this chapter;

36 (h) A statement that refusal to sign the infraction
as directed

37 in (g) of this subsection is a misdemeanor; and

p. 17 SB
5732

_1 (i) A statement that failure to respond to a notice
of

_2 infraction as promised is a misdemeanor and may be
punished by

_3 either a fine, or imprisonment in jail, or both.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. (1) The board may
charge fees for

_5 issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of all certificates
and

_6 permits and for examinations required by this chapter.
The board

_7 must set the fees by rule.

_8 (2) All receipts from fees collected under this
chapter must be

_9 deposited into the fire protection contractor license
fund created

10 in RCW 18.160.050.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. (1) A person found
to have committed an

12 infraction in violation of this act is responsible for
all costs

13 associated with the board=s
investigation of the infraction, and

14 may also be assessed a monetary penalty. The board must
set by rule

15 a schedule of penalties for infractions imposed under
this

16 chapter.

17 (2) The administrative law judge may waive, reduce,
or suspend

18 the monetary penalty imposed for the infraction for good
cause

19 shown.

20 (3) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter
must be

21 deposited in the fire protection contractor license fund
created

22 in RCW 18.160.050.

23 NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 6 through
13 of this act are each

24 added to chapter 18.160 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5732 p. 18