BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.77.065 and 1980 c
40 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may cause any
county road to be constructed or improved by day labor as provided in this
section.

(1) As used in this
section, "county road construction budget" means the aggregate total
of those costs as defined by the budgeting, accounting, and reporting system
for counties and cities and other local governments authorized under RCW
43.09.200 and 43.09.230 as prescribed in the state auditor's budget,
accounting, and reporting manual's (BARS) road and street construction accounts
541.00 through 541.90 in effect April 1, 1975: PROVIDED, That such costs shall
not include those costs assigned to the preliminary engineering account 541.11,
right of way accounts 541.20 through 541.25, ancillary operations account
541.80, and ferries account 541.81 in the budget, accounting, and reporting
manual.

(2) For counties
with a population that equals or exceeds fifty thousand people, the total
amount of day labor construction programs one county may perform annually shall
total no more than the amounts determined in the following manner:

(a) Any county with a
total annual county road construction budget of four million dollars or more
may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to no more than eight
hundred thousand dollars or fifteen percent of the county's total annual county
road construction budget, whichever is greater.

(b) Any county with a
total annual county road construction budget ((over)) of one
million five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than four million
dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to not more
than five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars or twenty percent of the
county's total annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater.

(c) Any county with a
total annual county road construction budget ((over)) of five
hundred thousand dollars or more and less than one million five hundred
thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to
two hundred fifty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the county's total
annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater.

(d) Any county with a
total annual county road construction budget less than five hundred thousand
dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to two
hundred fifty thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That any county with a total annual
road construction budget of less than five hundred thousand dollars may, by
resolution of the board at the time the county road construction budget is
adopted, elect to construct or improve county roads by day labor in an amount
not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars on any one project, including labor,
equipment, and materials; such election to be in lieu of the two hundred fifty
thousand dollar limit provided for in this section, except that any project
means a complete project and the division of any project into units of work or
classes of work so as to permit construction by day labor is not authorized.

(3) For counties
with a population of less than fifty thousand people, the total amount of day
labor construction programs one county may perform annually may total no more
than the amounts determined in the following manner:

(a) A county with a
total annual county road construction budget of four million dollars or more
may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to not more than
eight hundred eighty thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the county's
total annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater;

(b) A county with a
total annual county road construction budget of one million five hundred
thousand dollars or more and less than four million dollars may accumulate a
day labor road construction budget equal to not more than five hundred
seventy-seven thousand dollars or thirty percent of the county's total annual
county road construction budget, whichever is greater;

(c) A county with a
total annual county road construction budget of five hundred thousand dollars
or more and less than one million five hundred thousand dollars may accumulate
a day labor road construction budget equal to two hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars or forty-five percent of the county's total annual county road
construction budget, whichever is greater;

(d) A county with a
total annual county road construction budget less than five hundred thousand
dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to two
hundred seventy-five thousand dollars. However, such a county may, by
resolution of the board at the time the county road construction budget is adopted,
elect instead to construct or improve county roads by day labor in an amount
not to exceed thirty-eight thousand five hundred dollars on any one project,
including labor, equipment, and materials. That election is in lieu of the two
hundred seventy-five thousand dollar limit provided for in this section. As
used in this section, "any project" means a complete project, and a
county may not divide a project into units of work or classes of work so as to
permit construction by day labor.

(4) Any county
that adopts a county road construction budget unreasonably exceeding that
county's actual road construction expenditures for the same budget year which
has the effect of permitting the county to exceed the day labor amounts
established in this section is in violation of the county road administration
board's standards of good practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of
this section. Any county, whose expenditure for day labor for road
construction projects unreasonably exceeds the limits specified in this
section, is in violation of the county road administration board's standards of
good practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of this section.

(((3))) (5)
Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, whenever the construction
work or improvement is the installation of electrical traffic control devices,
highway illumination equipment, electrical equipment, wires, or equipment to
convey electrical current, in an amount exceeding ten thousand dollars for any
one project including labor, equipment, and materials, such work shall be
performed by contract as in this chapter provided. This section means a
complete project and does not permit the construction of any project by day
labor by division of the project into units of work or classes of work.

--- END ---