BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.76.140 and 1995 c
374 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before any
agricultural fair may become eligible for state allocations it must have
conducted two successful consecutive annual fairs immediately preceding
application for such allocations, and have its application therefor approved by
the director.

(2) Beginning January
1, 1994, ((and until June 30, 1997,)) the director may waive this
requirement for an agricultural fair that through itself or its predecessor
sponsoring organization has successfully operated at least two years as a
county fair((, has received a funding allocation as a county fair under
chapter 374, Laws of 1995 for those two years,)) and that reorganizes as an
area fair.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---