BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that schools are being asked to play an increasingly expanding role in
protecting our children's health. Schools are responsible for monitoring the
immunization of children, evaluating children's hearing and vision, and
screening for scoliosis. Chronically ill children often require medically
ordered treatment to enable them to attend school. Prescription medication is
often required to be given to children during the school day. Schools are also
responsible for identifying and reporting child abuse, identifying drug and
alcohol problems, treating emergencies, providing counseling and assistance for
teenage parents, and providing AIDS education. The legislature finds that
expertise is needed in our schools to protect the health of students in our
schools and to help students learn.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the
2001-2002 school year, each school district shall maintain a ratio of not less
than one school nurse for every one thousand five hundred full-time equivalent
students. In the 2002-03 school year, each school district shall maintain a
ratio of not less than one school nurse for every one thousand full-time equivalent
students. In the 2003-04 school year, each school district shall maintain a
ratio of not less than one school nurse for every seven hundred fifty full-time
equivalent students.

(2) The state board of
education shall adopt rules providing for the initial and continuing
certification for certified school nurses. Application shall be made within
one year after the effective date of this section.

(3) A second class
school district may continue to hire persons who meet the requirements of RCW
28A.210.300.

(4) As used in this
section, "school nurse" means a person who satisfies the following
requirements:

(a)(i) The candidate
holds a bachelor of science degree in nursing, including training in public
health nursing;

(ii) The candidate
holds a valid license as a registered nurse (RN) in Washington state;

(iii) The candidate is
certified as an educational staff associate pursuant to requirements
established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(iv) The candidate has
successfully completed additional postgraduate work including, but not limited
to, school health, crisis intervention, health counseling, child development,
health curriculum, and drug and alcohol abuse curriculum; and

(v) The candidate has
professional nursing experience in school settings for the equivalent of three
school years within the six years immediately preceding the effective date of
this section; or

(b) The candidate
qualifies under subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. By December 31, 2003, the
superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report to the legislature
on the implementation of section 2 of this act and the impact of the services
provided. The report shall include recommendations about whether funding for
school nurses should be an ongoing responsibility of the state and part of
basic education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this
act expire June 30, 2004.

---
END ---