BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that managed competition has been used in a number of cities around the country
as a method to unleash creative ideas from the work force and has potentially
led to improvements and greater efficiencies. Managed competition has been
most successful in localities where the work force is able to engage in
full-scope collective bargaining. A process of managed competition, therefore,
should maintain a level playing field between the public and private sectors
and should ensure that any competitive comparisons include comparable wages,
medical, pension, and any other benefits enjoyed by the respective private or
public sector workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
transportation may purchase services, including services that have been
customarily and historically provided by employees in the classified service
under this chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, employee business units, or other entities if the following
criteria are met:

(a) The invitation for
bid or request for proposal contains measurable standards for the performance
of the contract;

(b) Employees in the
classified service whose positions or work would be displaced by the contract
are provided an opportunity to offer alternatives to purchasing services by
contract and, if these alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract
under competitive contracting procedures in subsection (4) of this section;

(c) The contract with
an entity other than an employee business unit includes a provision requiring
the entity to consider employment of state employees who may be displaced by
the contract;

(d) The department has
established a contract monitoring process to measure contract performance,
costs, service delivery quality, and other contract standards, and to cancel
contracts that do not meet those standards; and

(e) The department has
demonstrated that the contract results in savings or efficiency improvements.
The department must consider the consequences and potential mitigation of
improper or failed performance by the contractor.

(2) A provision
contrary to or in conflict with this section in a collective bargaining
agreement in effect on the effective date of this act is not effective beyond
the expiration date of the agreement.

(3) Contracting for
services that was authorized by law before the effective date of this act is
not subject to the processes set forth in subsections (1) and (4) through (6)
of this section.

(4) Competitive
contracting must be implemented as follows:

(a) At least ninety
days before the date the department requests bids from private entities for a
contract for services provided by classified employees, the department shall
notify the classified employees whose positions or work would be displaced by
the contract. The employees will have sixty days from the date of notification
to offer alternatives to purchasing services by contract, and the department
shall consider the alternatives before requesting bids.

(b) If the employees
decide to compete for the contract, they shall notify the department of their
decision. Employees must form one or more employee business units for the
purpose of submitting a bid or bids to perform the services.

(c) The director of
personnel, with the advice and assistance of the department of general
administration, shall develop and make available to employee business units
training in the bidding process and general bid preparation.

(d) The implementation
process must also be based upon inclusion of the following minimum bid items:
(i) Current certified prevailing wages established by the department of labor
and industries for the classification of work to be performed under the
proposed contract; (ii) an overhead factor of not less than sixty-six percent
of the base prevailing wage rates; and (iii) equipment charges that reflect the
current fair market value rate.

(e) The director of
general administration, with the advice and assistance of the department of
personnel, shall, by rule, establish procedures to ensure that bids are
submitted and evaluated in a fair and objective manner and that there exists a
competitive market for the service. The rules must include, but not be limited
to: (i) Prohibitions against participation in the bid evaluation process by
employees who prepared the business unit's bid or who perform any of the
services to be contracted; (ii) provisions to ensure that no bidder receives an
advantage over other bidders and that bid requirements are applied equitably to
all parties; and (iii) procedures that require the department to receive
complaints regarding the bidding process and to consider them before awarding
the contract. Appeal of the department's actions under this subsection is an
adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, with the final decision to be rendered
by an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.

(f) An employee
business unit's bid must include the fully allocated costs of the service,
including the cost of the employees' salaries and benefits, space, equipment,
materials, and other costs necessary to perform the function. An employee
business unit's cost may not include the state's indirect overhead costs unless
those costs can be attributed directly to the function in question and would
not exist if that function were not performed in state service.

(g) The department of
transportation may contract with the department of general administration to
conduct the bidding process.

(5) As used in this
section:

(a) "Employee
business unit" means a group of employees who perform services to be
contracted under this section and who submit a bid for the performance of those
services under subsection (4) of this section.

(b) "Indirect
overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing department
administrative salaries and benefits, and rent, equipment costs, utilities, and
materials associated with those administrative functions.

(c) "Competitive
contracting" means the process by which classified employees of the
department of transportation compete with businesses, individuals, nonprofit
organizations, or other entities for contracts authorized by subsection (1) of
this section.

(6) The joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a performance audit of the
implementation of this section, including the adequacy of the appeals process
in subsection (4)(d) of this section, and report to the legislature by January
1, 2005, on the results of the audit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Since managed competition
is a relatively new, untested concept at the state level, it is the intent of
the legislature that managed competition for transportation operations and
maintenance functions will occur contingent upon civil service reform
legislation becoming law.

---
END ---