BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares that a contracting procedure that facilitates construction of
transportation facilities in a more timely manner may occasionally be necessary
to ensure that construction can proceed simultaneously with the design of the
facility. The legislature further finds that the design-build process and
other alternative project delivery concepts achieve the goals of time savings
and avoidance of costly change orders.

The legislature finds
and declares that a 2001 audit, conducted by Talbot, Korvola & Warwick,
examining the Washington state ferries' capital program resulted in a
recommendation for improvements and changes in auto ferry procurement
processes. The auditors recommended that auto ferries be procured through use
of a modified request for proposals process whereby the prevailing shipbuilder
and Washington state ferries engage in a design and build partnership. This
process promotes ownership of the design by the shipbuilder while using the
department of transportation's expertise in ferry design and operations.
Alternative processes like design-build partnerships can promote innovation and
create competitive incentives that increase the likelihood of finishing
projects on time and within the budget.

The purpose of this act
is to authorize the department's use of a modified request for proposals
process for procurement of auto ferries, and to prescribe appropriate
requirements and criteria to ensure that contracting procedures for this
procurement process serve the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.20 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
transportation shall develop a process for awarding competitively bid highway
construction contracts for projects over ten million dollars that may be
constructed using a design-build procedure. As used in this section and
section 3 of this act, "design-build procedure" means a method of
contracting under which the department of transportation contracts with another
party for the party to both design and build the structures, facilities, and
other items specified in the contract.

The process developed by
the department must, at a minimum, include the scope of services required under
the design-build procedure, contractor prequalification requirements, criteria
for evaluating technical information and project costs, contractor selection
criteria, and issue resolution procedures. In addition, the department should
provide methods by which public employees may participate in the design-build
process. This section expires April 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.20 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
transportation may use the design-build procedure for public works projects
over ten million dollars where:

(1) The construction
activities are highly specialized and a design-build approach is critical in
developing the construction methodology; or

(2) The projects
selected provide opportunity for greater innovation and efficiencies between
the designer and the builder; or

(3) Significant savings
in project delivery time would be realized.

This section expires
April 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may
purchase new auto ferries through use of a modified request for proposals
process whereby the prevailing shipbuilder and the department engage in a
design and build partnership for the design and construction of the auto
ferries. The process consists of the three phases described in subsection (2)
of this section.

(2) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout sections 5 through 10 of this act.

(a) "Phase
one" means the evaluation and selection of proposers to participate in
development of technical proposals in phase two.

(b) "Phase
two" means the preparation of technical proposals by the selected
proposers in consultation with the department.

(c) "Phase
three" means the submittal and evaluation of bids, the award of the
contract to the successful proposer, and the design and construction of the
auto ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

To commence the request
for proposals process, the department shall publish a notice of its intent once
a week for at least two consecutive weeks in at least one trade paper and one
other paper, both of general circulation in the state. The notice must contain,
but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) The number of auto
ferries to be procured, the auto and passenger capacities, the delivery dates,
and the estimated price range for the contract;

(2) A statement that a
modified request for proposals design and build partnership will be used in the
procurement process;

(3) A short summary of
the requirements for prequalification of proposers including a statement that
prequalification is a prerequisite to submittal of a proposal in phase one; and

(4) An address and
telephone number that may be used to obtain a prequalification questionnaire
and the request for proposals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to legislative
appropriation for the procurement of vessels, the department shall issue a
request for proposals to interested parties that must include, at least, the
following:

(1) Solicitation of a
proposal to participate in a design and build partnership with the department
to design and construct the auto ferries;

(2) Instructions on the
prequalification process and procedures;

(3) A description of
the modified request for proposals process. Under this process, the department
may modify any component of the request for proposals, including the outline
specifications, by addendum at any time before the submittal of bids in phase
three;

(4) A description of
the design and build partnership process to be used for procurement of the
vessels;

(5) Outline
specifications that provide the requirements for the vessels including, but not
limited to, items such as length, beam, displacement, speed, propulsion
requirements, capacities for autos and passengers, passenger space
characteristics, and crew size. The department will produce notional line
drawings depicting hull geometry that will interface with Washington state
ferries terminal facilities. Notional lines may be modified in phase two,
subject to approval by the department;

(6) Instructions for
the development of technical proposals in phase two, and information regarding
confidentiality of technical proposals;

(7) The vessel delivery
schedule, identification of the port on Puget Sound where delivery must take
place, and the location where acceptance trials must be held;

(8) The estimated price
range for the contract;

(9) The form and amount
of the required bid deposit and contract security;

(10) A copy of the
contract that will be signed by the successful proposer;

(11) The date by which
proposals in phase one must be received by the department in order to be
considered;

(12) A description of
information to be submitted in the proposals in phase one concerning each
proposer's qualifications, capabilities, and experience;

(13) A statement of the
maximum number of proposers that may be selected in phase one for development
of technical proposals in phase two;

(14) Criteria that will
be used for the phase one selection of proposers to participate in the phase
two development of technical proposals;

(15) A description of
the process that will be used for the phase three submittal and evaluation of
bids, award of the contract, and postaward administrative activities;

(16) A requirement that
the contractor comply with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations
including but not limited to those pertaining to the environment, worker health
and safety, and prevailing wages;

(17) A requirement that
the vessels be constructed within the boundaries of the state of Washington
except that equipment furnished by the state and components, products, and
systems that are standard manufactured items are not subject to the in-state
requirement under this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection,
"constructed" means the fabrication, by the joining together by
welding or fastening of all steel parts from which the total vessel is
constructed, including, but not limited to, all shell frames, longitudinals,
bulkheads, webs, piping runs, wire ways, and ducting. "Constructed"
also means the installation of all components and systems, including, but not
limited to, equipment and machinery, castings, electrical, electronics, deck
covering, lining, paint, and joiner work required by the contract.
"Constructed" also means the interconnection of all equipment,
machinery, and services, such as piping, wiring, and ducting; and

(18) A requirement that
all warranty work on the vessel must be performed within the boundaries of the
state of Washington, insofar as practical.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

Phase one of the
request for proposals process consists of evaluation and selection of
prequalified proposers to participate in subsequent development of technical
proposals in phase two, as follows:

(1) The department
shall issue a request for proposals to interested parties.

(2) The request for
proposals must require that each proposer prequalify for the contract under
chapter 468-310 WAC, except that the department may adopt rules for the
financial prequalification of proposers for this specific contract only. The
department shall modify the financial prequalification rules in chapter 468-310
WAC in order to maximize competition among financially capable and otherwise qualified
proposers. In adopting these rules, the department shall consider factors
including, without limitation: (a) Shipyard resources in Washington state; (b)
the cost to design and construct multiple vessels under a single contract
without options; and (c) the sequenced delivery schedule for the vessels.

(3) The department may
use some, or all, of the nonfinancial prequalification factors as part of the
evaluation factors in phase one to enable the department to select a limited
number of best qualified proposers to participate in development of technical
proposals in phase two.

(4) The department
shall evaluate submitted proposals in accordance with the selection criteria
established in the request for proposals. Selection criteria may include, but
are not limited to, the following:

(a) Shipyard
facilities;

(b) Organization
components;

(c) Design capability;

(d) Build strategy;

(e) Experience and past
performance;

(f) Ability to meet
vessel delivery dates;

(g) Projected workload;
and

(h) Expertise of
project team and other key personnel.

(5) Upon concluding its
evaluation of proposals, the department shall select the best qualified
proposers in accordance with the request for proposals. The selected proposers
must participate in development of technical proposals. Selection must be made
in accordance with the selection criteria stated in the request for proposals.
All proposers must be ranked in order of preference as derived from the same
selection criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

Phase two of the
request for proposals process consists of preparation of technical proposals in
consultation with the department, as follows:

(1) The development of
technical proposals in compliance with the detailed instructions provided in
the request for proposals, including the outline specifications, and any
addenda to them. Technical proposals must include the following:

(a) Design and
specifications sufficient to fully depict the ferries' characteristics and
identify installed equipment;

(b) Drawings showing
arrangements of equipment and details necessary for the proposer to develop a
firm, fixed price bid;

(c) Project schedule
including vessel delivery dates; and

(d) Other appropriate
items.

(2) The department
shall conduct periodic reviews with each of the selected proposers to consider
and critique their designs, drawings, and specifications. These reviews must
be held to ensure that technical proposals meet the department's requirements
and are responsive to the critiques conducted by the department during the
development of technical proposals.

(3) If, as a result of
the periodic technical reviews or otherwise, the department determines that it
is in the best interests of the department to modify any element of the request
for proposals, including the outline specifications, it shall do so by written
addenda to the request for proposals.

(4) Proposers must
submit final technical proposals for approval that include design, drawings,
and specifications at a sufficient level of detail to fully depict the ferries'
characteristics and identify installed equipment, and to enable a proposer to
deliver a firm, fixed price bid to the department. The department shall reject
final technical proposals that modify, fail to conform to, or are not fully
responsive to and in compliance with the requirements of the request for
proposals, including the outline specifications, as amended by addenda.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

Phase three consists of
the submittal and evaluation of bids and the award of the contract to the
successful proposer for the final design and construction of the auto ferries,
as follows:

(1) The department
shall request bids for detailed design and construction of the vessels after
completion of the review of technical proposals in phase two. The department
will review detailed design drawings in phase three for conformity with the
technical proposals submitted in phase two. In no case may the department's
review replace the builder's responsibility to deliver a product meeting the
phase two technical proposal. The department may only consider bids from
selected proposers that have qualified to bid by submitting technical proposals
that have been approved by the department.

(2) Each qualified
proposer must submit its total bid price for all vessels, including
certification that the bid is based upon its approved technical proposal and
the request for proposals.

(3) Bids constitute an
offer and remain open for ninety days from the date of the bid opening. A
deposit in cash, certified check, cashier's check, or surety bond in an amount
specified in the request for proposals must accompany each bid and no bid may
be considered unless the deposit is enclosed.

(4) The department
shall evaluate the submitted bids. Upon completing the bid evaluation, the
department may select the responsive and responsible proposer that offers the
lowest total bid price for all vessels.

(5) The department may
waive informalities in the proposal and bid process, accept a bid from the
lowest responsive and responsible proposer, reject any or all bids, republish,
and revise or cancel the request for proposals to serve the best interests of
the department.

(6) The department may:

(a) Award the contract
to the proposer that has been selected as the responsive and responsible
proposer that has submitted the lowest total bid price;

(b) If a contract
cannot be signed with the apparent successful proposer, award the contract to
the next lowest responsive and responsible proposer; or

(c) If necessary,
repeat this procedure with each responsive and responsible proposer in order of
rank until the list of those proposers has been exhausted.

(7) If the department
awards a contract to a proposer under this section, and the proposer fails to
enter into the contract and furnish satisfactory contract security as required
by chapter 39.08 RCW within twenty days from the date of award, its deposit is
forfeited to the state and will be deposited by the state treasurer to the
credit of the Puget Sound capital construction account. Upon the execution of
a ferry design and construction contract all proposal deposits will be
returned.

(8) The department may
provide an honorarium to reimburse each unsuccessful phase three proposer for a
portion of its technical proposal preparation costs at a preset, fixed amount
to be specified in the request for proposals. If the department rejects all
bids, the department may provide the honoraria to all phase three proposers
that submitted bids.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall immediately notify those proposers that are not selected to participate
in development of technical proposals in phase one and those proposers who
submit unsuccessful bids in phase three.

(2) The
department's decision is conclusive unless an aggrieved proposer files an
appeal with the superior court of Thurston county within five days after
receiving notice of the department's award decision. The court shall hear any
such appeal on the department's administrative record for the project. The
court may affirm the decision of the department, or it may reverse or remand
the administrative decision if it determines the action of the department was
arbitrary and capricious.

---
END ---