BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that a skilled technical work force is necessary for maintaining, preserving,
and improving Washington's transportation system. The Blue Ribbon Commission
on Transportation found that state and local transportation agencies are
showing signs of a work force that is insufficiently skilled to operate the
transportation system at its highest level. This act is intended to explore
methods for fostering a stronger industry in transportation planning and
engineering.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

The apprenticeship
council shall work with the department of transportation, local transportation
jurisdictions, local and state joint apprenticeships, representatives of
transportation labor groups, and representatives of the state's universities
and community and vocational colleges to establish technical apprenticeship
opportunities specific to the needs of transportation. The council shall issue
a report of findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2002. The report must include, but not be
limited to, findings and recommendations regarding the establishment of
transportation technical training programs within the community and vocational
college system and in the state universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
transportation shall work with local transportation jurisdictions and
representatives of transportation labor groups to establish a human resources
skills bank of transportation professionals. The skills bank must be designed
to allow all transportation authorities to draw from it when needed. The
department shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002. The report
must include, but not be limited to, identification of any statutory or
administrative rule changes necessary to create the skills bank and allow it to
function in the manner described.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 47.06 RCW to read as follows:

The state-interest
component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan must include a plan
for enhancing the skills of the existing technical transportation work force.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.80.030 and 1998 c
171 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each regional
transportation planning organization shall develop in cooperation with the
department of transportation, providers of public transportation and high
capacity transportation, ports, and local governments within the region, adopt,
and periodically update a regional transportation plan that:

(a) Is based on a least
cost planning methodology that identifies the most cost-effective facilities,
services, and programs;

(b) Identifies existing
or planned transportation facilities, services, and programs, including but not
limited to major roadways including state highways and regional arterials,
transit and nonmotorized services and facilities, multimodal and intermodal facilities,
marine ports and airports, railroads, and noncapital programs including
transportation demand management that should function as an integrated regional
transportation system, giving emphasis to those facilities, services, and
programs that exhibit one or more of the following characteristics:

(i) Crosses member
county lines;

(ii) Is or will be used
by a significant number of people who live or work outside the county in which
the facility, service, or project is located;

(iii) Significant impacts
are expected to be felt in more than one county;

(iv) Potentially
adverse impacts of the facility, service, program, or project can be better
avoided or mitigated through adherence to regional policies;

(v) Transportation
needs addressed by a project have been identified by the regional
transportation planning process and the remedy is deemed to have regional
significance; and

(vi) Provides for
system continuity;

(c) Establishes level
of service standards for state highways and state ferry routes, with the
exception of transportation facilities of statewide significance as defined in
RCW 47.06.140. These regionally established level of service standards for
state highways and state ferries shall be developed jointly with the department
of transportation, to encourage consistency across jurisdictions. In
establishing level of service standards for state highways and state ferries,
consideration shall be given for the necessary balance between providing for
the free interjurisdictional movement of people and goods and the needs of
local commuters using state facilities;

(d) Includes a
financial plan demonstrating how the regional transportation plan can be
implemented, indicating resources from public and private sources that are
reasonably expected to be made available to carry out the plan, and
recommending any innovative financing techniques to finance needed facilities,
services, and programs;

(e) Assesses regional
development patterns, capital investment and other measures necessary to:

(i) Ensure the
preservation of the existing regional transportation system, including
requirements for operational improvements, resurfacing, restoration, and
rehabilitation of existing and future major roadways, as well as operations,
maintenance, modernization, and rehabilitation of existing and future transit,
railroad systems and corridors, and nonmotorized facilities; and

(ii) Make the most
efficient use of existing transportation facilities to relieve vehicular
congestion and maximize the mobility of people and goods;

(f) Sets forth a
proposed regional transportation approach, including capital investments,
service improvements, programs, and transportation demand management measures
to guide the development of the integrated, multimodal regional transportation
system; ((and))

(g) Where appropriate,
sets forth the relationship of high capacity transportation providers and other
public transit providers with regard to responsibility for, and the
coordination between, services and facilities; and

(h) Provides for
training that enhances the skills of the existing technical transportation work
force.

(2) The organization
shall review the regional transportation plan biennially for currency and
forward the adopted plan along with documentation of the biennial review to the
state department of transportation.

(3) All transportation
projects, programs, and transportation demand management measures within the
region that have an impact upon regional facilities or services must be
consistent with the plan and with the adopted regional growth and
transportation strategies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The department of labor
and industries, in cooperation with the department of transportation, shall
conduct an assessment of the current practices, including survey techniques,
used in setting prevailing wages for those trades related to transportation
facilities and transportation project delivery. The assessment must include an
analysis of regional variations. A final report must be submitted to the
governor and the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2002.

---
END ---