BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.12.010 and 1989 c
12 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
"prevailing rate of wage", for the intents and purposes of this
chapter, shall be the rate of hourly wage, usual benefits, and overtime paid in
the locality, as hereinafter defined, to the majority of workers, laborers, or
mechanics, in the same trade or occupation. In the event that there is not a
majority in the same trade or occupation paid at the same rate, then the
average rate of hourly wage and overtime paid to such laborers, workers, or
mechanics in the same trade or occupation shall be the prevailing rate. If the
wage paid by any contractor or subcontractor to laborers, workers, or mechanics
on any public work is based on some period of time other than an hour, the
hourly wage for the purposes of this chapter shall be mathematically determined
by the number of hours worked in such period of time.

(2) The
"locality" for the purposes of this chapter shall be the ((largest
city in the)) county wherein the physical work is being performed.

(3) The "usual
benefits" for the purposes of this chapter shall include the amount of:

(a) The rate of
contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or subcontractor to a trustee or
to a third person pursuant to a fund, plan, or program; and

(b) The rate of costs to
the contractor or subcontractor which may be reasonably anticipated in
providing benefits to workers, laborers, and mechanics pursuant to an
enforcible commitment to carry out a financially responsible plan or program
which was communicated in writing to the workers, laborers, and mechanics
affected, for medical or hospital care, pensions on retirement or death,
compensation for injuries or illness resulting from occupational activity, or
insurance to provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment benefits, life
insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or accident insurance, for
vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship or other
similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but only where the
contractor or subcontractor is not required by other federal, state, or local
law to provide any of such benefits.

(4) An "interested
party" for the purposes of this chapter shall include a contractor,
subcontractor, an employee of a contractor or subcontractor, an organization whose
members' wages, benefits, and conditions of employment are affected by this
chapter, and the director of labor and industries or the director's designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

Public
works projects and public building service maintenance contracts of the state
or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, that
are under one hundred thousand dollars in total project costs, are exempt from
this chapter.

---
END ---