BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.0621 and 2000
1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) License tab fees
shall be thirty dollars per year for motor vehicles, regardless of year, value,
make, or model, beginning January 1, 2000.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "license tab fees" are defined as the general fees paid
annually for licensing motor vehicles, including cars, sport utility vehicles,
motorcycles, ((and)) motor homes, and nonmotorized vehicles including
trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620. Trailers licensed under RCW 46.16.065,
46.16.068, or 46.16.085 shall not be required to pay license tab fees under
this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16.070 and 1994 c
262 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In lieu of all
other vehicle licensing fees, unless specifically exempt, and in addition to
the excise tax prescribed in chapter 82.44 RCW and the mileage fees prescribed
for buses and stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and collected
annually for each ((truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor,
tractor, bus, auto stage, or for hire vehicle with seating capacity of more
than six)) motor vehicle, based upon the declared combined gross
weight or declared gross weight ((thereof)) pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 46.44 RCW, the following licensing fees by such gross weight:

DECLARED GROSS WEIGHT SCHEDULE
A SCHEDULE B

Less than 4,000 lbs. $ 36.00 $ 30.00

4,000 lbs...... $ ((37.00)) $ 37.00

43.00

6,000 lbs...... $ ((44.00)) $ 44.00

50.00

8,000 lbs...... $ ((55.00)) $ 55.00

61.00

10,000 lbs..... $ ((62.00)) $ 62.00

68.00

12,000 lbs..... $ ((72.00)) $ 72.00

78.00

14,000 lbs..... $ ((82.00)) $ 82.00

88.00

16,000 lbs..... $ ((92.00)) $ 92.00

98.00

18,000 lbs..... $ ((137.00)) $ 137.00

143.00

20,000 lbs..... $ ((152.00)) $ 152.00

158.00

22,000 lbs..... $ ((164.00)) $ 164.00

170.00

24,000 lbs..... $ ((177.00)) $ 177.00

183.00

26,000 lbs..... $ ((187.00)) $ 187.00

193.00

28,000 lbs..... $ ((220.00)) $ 220.00

226.00

30,000 lbs..... $ ((253.00)) $ 253.00

259.00

32,000 lbs..... $ ((304.00)) $ 304.00

310.00

34,000 lbs..... $ ((323.00)) $ 323.00

329.00

36,000 lbs..... $ ((350.00)) $ 350.00

356.00

38,000 lbs..... $ ((384.00)) $ 384.00

390.00

40,000 lbs..... $ ((439.00)) $ 439.00

445.00

42,000 lbs..... $ ((456.00)) $ 546.00

462.00

44,000 lbs..... $ ((466.00)) $ 556.00

472.00

46,000 lbs..... $ ((501.00)) $ 591.00

507.00

48,000 lbs..... $ ((522.00)) $ 612.00

528.00

50,000 lbs..... $ ((566.00)) $ 656.00

572.00

52,000 lbs..... $ ((595.00)) $ 685.00

601.00

54,000 lbs..... $ ((642.00)) $ 732.00

648.00

56,000 lbs..... $ ((677.00)) $ 767.00

683.00

58,000 lbs..... $ ((704.00)) $ 794.00

710.00

60,000 lbs..... $ ((750.00)) $ 840.00

756.00

62,000 lbs..... $ ((804.00)) $ 894.00

810.00

64,000 lbs..... $ ((822.00)) $ 912.00

828.00

66,000 lbs..... $ ((915.00)) $ 1,005.00

921.00

68,000 lbs..... $ ((954.00)) $ 1,044.00

960.00

70,000 lbs..... $ ((1,027.00)) $ 1,117.00

1,033.00

72,000 lbs..... $ ((1,098.00)) $ 1,188.00

1,104.00

74,000 lbs..... $ ((1,193.00)) $ 1,283.00

1,199.00

76,000 lbs..... $ ((1,289.00)) $ 1,379.00

1,295.00

78,000 lbs..... $ ((1,407.00)) $ 1,497.00

1,413.00

80,000 lbs..... $ ((1,518.00)) $ 1,608.00

1,524.00

82,000 lbs..... $ ((1,623.00)) $ 1,713.00

1,629.00

84,000 lbs..... $ ((1,728.00)) $ 1,818.00

1,734.00

86,000 lbs..... $ ((1,833.00)) $ 1,923.00

1,839.00

88,000 lbs..... $ ((1,938.00)) $ 2,028.00

1,944.00

90,000 lbs..... $ ((2,043.00)) $ 2,133.00

2,049.00

92,000 lbs..... $ ((2,148.00)) $ 2,238.00

2,154.00

94,000 lbs..... $ ((2,253.00)) $ 2,343.00

2,259.00

96,000 lbs..... $ ((2,358.00)) $ 2,448.00

2,364.00

98,000 lbs..... $ ((2,463.00)) $ 2,553.00

2,469.00

100,000 lbs.... $ ((2,568.00)) $ 2,658.00

2,574.00

102,000 lbs.... $ ((2,673.00)) $ 2,763.00

2,679.00

104,000 lbs.... $ ((2,778.00)) $ 2,868.00

2,784.00

105,500 lbs.... $ ((2,883.00)) $ 2,973.00

2,889.000

Schedule A applies to
vehicles either used exclusively for hauling logs or that do not tow trailers.
Schedule B applies to vehicles that tow trailers and are not covered under
Schedule A.

(2) Every truck,
motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding 6,000 pounds empty scale
weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87, or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed
for not less than one hundred fifty percent of its empty weight unless the
amount would be in excess of the legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in
RCW 46.44.041 or 46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for
the maximum weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used
only for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air compressor,
rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house, tool house, bunk
house, or similar machine or structure attached to or made a part of such
vehicle.

(3) Beginning with
all motor vehicle registrations that are due or become due on November 1, 2002,
and thereafter, there shall be paid and collected annually a twenty-five
percent surcharge on the gross weight portion of the current combined licensing
fees for all trucks, motor trucks, truck tractors, and tractors. The proceeds
from the surcharge shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund for use on
projects dealing with freight mobility.

(4) The
following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined gross weight for a
vehicle licensed under this section:

(a) The new license fee
will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above for the new gross weight,
multiplied by the number of months remaining in the period for which licensing
fees have been paid, including the month in which the new gross weight is
effective.

(b) Upon surrender of
the current certificate of registration or cab card, the new licensing fees due
shall be reduced by the amount of the licensing fees previously paid for the
same period for which new fees are being charged.

(((2))) (5)
The proceeds from the fees collected under subsections (1), (2), and
(4) of this section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.035 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

All proceeds from
combined vehicle licensing fees received by the director for vehicles licensed
under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to
be distributed into accounts according to the following method:

(1) The sum of two
dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into the multimodal transportation
account, except that for each vehicle registered by a county auditor or agent
to a county auditor pursuant to RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be
credited to the current county expense fund.

(2) The remainder shall
be distributed as follows, except the twenty-five percent surcharge:

(a) 23.677 percent
shall be deposited into the state patrol highway account of the motor vehicle
fund;

(b) 1.521 percent shall
be deposited into the Puget Sound ferry operations account of the motor vehicle
fund; and

(c) The remaining
proceeds shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund.

(3) The proceeds
from the twenty-five percent surcharge on the gross weight of trucks, motor trucks,
truck trailers, and tractors shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund
pursuant to RCW 46.16.070(3).

Sec. 4. RCW 47.60.326 and 1999 c
94 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to
maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound schedule of charges for the
transportation of passengers, vehicles, and commodities on the Washington state
ferries, the department of transportation each year shall conduct a full review
of such charges.

(2) Prior to February
1st of each odd-numbered year the department shall transmit to the
transportation commission a report of its review together with its
recommendations for the revision of a schedule of charges for the ensuing
biennium. The commission on or before July 1st of that year shall adopt as a
rule, in the manner provided by the Washington administrative procedure act, a
schedule of charges for the Washington state ferries for the ensuing biennium
commencing July 1st. The schedule may initially be adopted as an emergency
rule if necessary to take effect on, or as near as possible to, July 1st.

(3) The department in
making its review and formulating recommendations and the commission in
adopting a schedule of charges may consider any of the following factors:

(a) The amount of
subsidy available to the ferry system for maintenance and operation;

(b) The time and
distance of ferry runs;

(c) The maintenance and
operation costs for ferry runs with a proper adjustment for higher costs of
operating outmoded or less efficient equipment;

(d) The efficient
distribution of traffic between cross-sound routes;

(e) The desirability of
reasonable commutation rates for persons using the ferry system to commute
daily to work;

(f) The effect of
proposed fares in increasing walk-on and vehicular passenger use;

(g) The effect of
proposed fares in promoting all types of ferry use during nonpeak periods;

(h) Such other factors
as prudent managers of a major ferry system would consider.

(4) The commission
shall adopt a schedule of charges that will produce revenues equal to or
greater than:

(a) Eighty percent
of the total cost of maintenance and operation of the Washington state ferries
by July 1, 2007; and

(b) Ninety percent
of the total cost of maintenance and operation of the Washington state ferries
by July 1, 2021.

(5) The commission's
adoption of a schedule of charges sufficient to meet the revenue targets of
subsection (4) of this section is subject to the following conditions:

(a) Increases to the
schedule of charges shall be phased in over time to mitigate the impact to
ferry dependant communities while still ensuring that the revenue targets are
met by the deadline established in subsection (4) of this section;

(b) The department shall
annually evaluate the impact on the volume of ridership of any increases to the
schedule of charges. The department and commission shall consider revising
future increases in the schedule of charges based upon that impact; and

(c) The commission
may incorporate changes to its schedule of charges designed to meet other
policy goals as allowed under subsection (3) of this section as part of the
changes to the schedule of charges implemented under subsection (4) of this
section.

(6) If at any
time during the biennium it appears that projected revenues from the Puget
Sound ferry operations account and any other operating subsidy available to the
Washington state ferries will be less than the projected total cost of
maintenance and operation of the Washington state ferries for the biennium, the
department shall forthwith undertake a review of its schedule of charges to
ascertain whether or not the schedule of charges should be revised. The
department shall, upon completion of its review report, submit its
recommendation to the transportation commission which may in its sound
discretion revise the schedule of charges as required to meet necessary
maintenance and operation expenditures of the ferry system for the biennium or
may defer action until the regular annual review and revision of ferry charges
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(((5))) (7)
The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public participation shall apply to
the process of revising ferry tolls under this section.

(8) Under RCW
43.135.055, the transportation commission may increase ferry tolls included in
the schedule of charges adopted under this section by a percentage that exceeds
the fiscal growth factor.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.08.020 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and
there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this state equal to six
and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2) The tax on motor
vehicle fuel shall be based upon the commodity price of the fuel up to a cap of
eighty cents and shall be collected at the rack as that term is defined in RCW
82.36.010(23).

(3) There is
levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail car
rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to
five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under
this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.

(((3))) (4)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(((4))) (5)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.08.0255 and 1998
c 176 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:

(a) Motor vehicle fuel
used in aircraft by the manufacturer ((thereof)) for research,
development, and testing purposes; and

(b) Motor vehicle and
special fuel if:

(i) The fuel is
purchased for the purpose of public transportation and the purchaser is
entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or

(ii) The fuel is
purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation provider certified under
chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption
under RCW 82.36.285 or 82.38.080(1)(h)((; or

(iii) The fuel is
taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW)).

(2) Any person who has
paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on the sale of special fuel delivered in
this state shall be entitled to a credit or refund of such tax with respect to
fuel subsequently established to have been actually transported and used
outside this state by persons engaged in interstate commerce. The tax shall be
claimed as a credit or refunded through the tax reports required under RCW
82.38.150.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.36.025 and 1999 c
269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon shall apply to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(2) Beginning July
1, 2001, an additional motor fuel tax rate of six cents per gallon shall apply
to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds from
this additional tax rate shall be deposited in the motor vehicle account of the
motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.80.020 and 2000 c
103 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county, or ((subject to subsection (7) of this section,))
a ((qualifying)) city or town located in a county that has not imposed
((a fifteen-dollar)) the maximum fee under this section, may fix
and impose an additional fee, not to exceed ((fifteen)) fifty
dollars per vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to license fees under RCW
46.16.060 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen
weight of six thousand pounds or less, and that is determined by the department
of licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the county.

(2) The department of
licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the
taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

(3) The proceeds of
this fee shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with
RCW 82.80.070.

(4) A county ((or
qualifying)), city, or town imposing this fee or initiating
an exemption process shall delay the effective date at least six months from
the date the ordinance is enacted to allow the department of licensing to
implement administration and collection of or exemption from the fee.

(5) The legislative
authority of a county ((or qualifying)), city, or town may
develop and initiate an exemption process of the ((fifteen dollar)) fee
for the registered owners of vehicles residing within the boundaries of the
county ((or qualifying)), city, or town: (a) Who are
sixty-one years old or older at the time payment of the fee is due and whose
household income for the previous calendar year is less than an amount prescribed
by the county ((or qualifying)), city, or town legislative
authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.

(6) The legislative
authority of a county ((or qualifying)), city, or town
shall develop and initiate an exemption process of the ((fifteen-dollar))
fee for vehicles registered within the boundaries of the county that are
licensed under RCW 46.16.374.

(7) ((For purposes
of this section, a "qualifying city or town" means a city or town
residing within a county having a population of greater than seventy-five
thousand in which is located all or part of a national monument.)) A ((qualifying))
city or town may impose the fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The city or town
may impose the fee only if authorized to do so by a majority ((of voters
voting at a general or special election on a proposition for that purpose. At
a minimum, the ballot measure shall contain: (i) A description of the
transportation project proposed for funding, properly identified by mileposts
or other designations that specify the project parameters; (ii) the proposed number
of months or years necessary to fund the city or town's share of the project
cost; and (iii) the amount of fee to be imposed for the project)) vote
of the legislative authority.

(b) The city or town
may not impose a fee that, if combined with the county fee, exceeds ((fifteen))
fifty dollars. If a county imposes or increases a fee under this
section that, if combined with the fee imposed by a city or town, exceeds ((fifteen))
fifty dollars, the city or town fee shall be reduced or eliminated as
needed so that in no city or town does the combined fee exceed ((fifteen))
fifty dollars. All revenues from county-imposed fees shall be
distributed as called for in RCW 82.80.080.

(((c) Any fee
imposed by a city or town under this section shall expire at the end of the
term of months or years provided in the ballot measure, or when the city or
town's bonded indebtedness on the project is retired, whichever is sooner.))

(8) The fee imposed
under subsection (7) of this section shall apply only to renewals and shall not
apply to ownership transfer transactions.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.80.070 and 1991 c
141 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The proceeds
collected pursuant to the exercise of the local option authority of RCW 82.80.010,
82.80.020, 82.80.030, ((and)) 82.80.050, and section 8 of this act
(hereafter called "local option transportation revenues") shall be
used for transportation purposes only, including but not limited to the
following: The operation and preservation of roads, streets, and other
transportation improvements; new construction, reconstruction, and expansion of
city streets, county roads, and state highways and other transportation
improvements; development and implementation of public transportation and high-capacity
transit improvements and programs; and planning, design, and acquisition of
right of way and sites for such transportation purposes. The proceeds
collected from excise taxes on the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle
fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010 shall be used exclusively for
"highway purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section
40 of the state Constitution.

(2) The local option
transportation revenues shall be expended for transportation uses consistent
with the adopted transportation and land use plans of the jurisdiction
expending the funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted regional
transportation plan for metropolitan planning areas.

(3) Each local
government with a population greater than eight thousand that levies or expends
local option transportation funds, is also required to develop and adopt a
specific transportation program that contains the following elements:

(a) The program shall
identify the geographic boundaries of the entire area or areas within which
local option transportation revenues will be levied and expended.

(b) The program shall
be based on an adopted transportation plan for the geographic areas covered and
shall identify the proposed operation and construction of transportation
improvements and services in the designated plan area intended to be funded in
whole or in part by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the
annual costs applicable to the program.

(c) The program shall
indicate how the local transportation plan is coordinated with applicable
transportation plans for the region and for adjacent jurisdictions.

(d) The program shall
include at least a six-year funding plan, updated annually, identifying the
specific public and private sources and amounts of revenue necessary to fund
the program. The program shall include a proposed schedule for construction of
projects and expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new development
within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional revenue is proposed
to be earmarked as future appropriations for transportation improvements in the
program.

(4) Local governments
with a population greater than eight thousand exercising the authority for
local option transportation funds shall periodically review and update their
transportation program to ensure that it is consistent with applicable local
and regional transportation and land use plans and within the means of estimated
public and private revenue available.

(5) In the case of
expenditure for new or expanded transportation facilities, improvements, and
services, priorities in the use of local option transportation revenues shall
be identified in the transportation program and expenditures shall be made
based upon the following criteria, which are stated in descending order of
weight to be attributed:

(a) First, the project
serves a multijurisdictional function;

(b) Second, it is
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion;

(c) Third, it has the
greatest person-carrying capacity;

(d) Fourth, it is
partially funded by other government funds, such as from the state
transportation improvement board, or by private sector contributions, such as
those from the local transportation act, chapter 39.92 RCW; and

(e) Fifth, it meets
such other criteria as the local government determines is appropriate.

(6) It is the intent of
the legislature that as a condition of levying, receiving, and expending local
option transportation revenues, no local government agency use the revenues to
replace, divert, or loan any revenues currently being used for transportation
purposes to nontransportation purposes. ((The association of Washington
cities and the Washington state association of counties, in consultation with
the legislative transportation committee, shall study the issue of nondiversion
and make recommendations to the legislative transportation committee for
language implementing the intent of this section by December 1, 1990.))

(7) Local governments
are encouraged to enter into interlocal agreements to jointly develop and adopt
with other local governments the transportation programs required by this
section for the purpose of accomplishing regional transportation planning and
development.

(8) Local governments
may use all or a part of the local option transportation revenues for the
amortization of local government general obligation and revenue bonds issued
for transportation purposes consistent with the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. It is declared to be the public
policy of the state of Washington to encourage and facilitate the improvement
of transportation infrastructure. The construction of necessary transportation
improvements in accordance with local community planning will encourage
investment in job-producing economic development and will expand the public tax
base.

It is the purpose of
this chapter to allocate a portion of regular property taxes for limited
periods of time to assist in the financing of transportation improvements which
are needed to encourage economic development of urban areas; to improve
transportation mobility in congested urban areas due to the inability of
existing financing methods to provide needed transportation improvements; to
encourage local taxing districts to cooperate in the allocation of future tax
revenues arising in urban areas in order to facilitate the long-term growth of
their common tax base; and to encourage private investment within congested
urban areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Apportionment
district" means the geographic area, within an urban area, from which
regular property taxes are to be apportioned to finance a transportation
improvement contained therein.

(2) "Assessed
value of real property" means the valuation of real property as placed on
the last completed assessment roll of the county.

(3) "City"
means any city or town.

(4)
"Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking a legislative
action by a county or city, whether known as a statute, resolution, ordinance,
or otherwise.

(5)
"Transportation improvement" means an undertaking to provide
transportation facilities in an urban area which the sponsor has authority to
provide.

(6)
"Transportation improvement costs" means the costs of design,
planning, right of way acquisition, site preparation, construction,
reconstruction, rehabilitation, maintenance, preservation, and installation of
the transportation improvement; costs of relocation, maintenance, and operation
of property pending construction of the transportation improvement; costs of
utilities relocated as a result of the transportation improvement; costs of
financing, including interest during construction, legal and other professional
services, taxes, and insurance; costs incurred by the assessor to revalue real
property for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value that are
in excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with his or her
revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the
taxes and complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and
administrative costs reasonably necessary and related to these costs. These
costs may include costs incurred prior to the adoption of the transportation
improvement ordinance, but subsequent to the effective date of this section.

(7)
"Transportation improvement ordinance" means the ordinance passed
under section 13(4) of this act.

(8) "Regular
property taxes" means regular property taxes as now or hereafter defined
in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by port districts
or public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making required
payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness; and (b) regular
property taxes levied by the state for the support of the common schools under
RCW 84.52.065.

(9) "Sponsor"
means the legislative authority of any county or city initiating and
undertaking a transportation improvement.

(10) "Tax
allocation base value of real property" means the true and fair value of
real property within an apportionment district for the year in which the
apportionment district was established.

(11) "Tax
allocation bonds" means any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by a
sponsor under section 19 of this act.

(12) "Tax
allocation revenues" means those tax revenues allocated to a sponsor under
section 16(1)(b) of this act.

(13) "Taxing
districts" means any governmental entity which levies or has levied for it
regular property taxes upon real property located within a proposed or approved
apportionment district.

(14) "Vacant
land" means land that is not used for any purpose. "Vacant
land" does not include paved or unpaved revenue-generating motor vehicle
parking lots.

(15) "Value of
taxable property" means value of taxable property as defined in RCW
39.36.015.

(16) "Urban
area" means an urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, a new
fully contained community designated under RCW 36.70A.350, a major industrial
development designated under RCW 36.70A.365, or a master planned location for
major industrial developments designated under RCW 36.70A.367.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) Only transportation
improvements which are determined by the legislative authority of the sponsor
to meet the following criteria are eligible to be financed under this chapter:

(a) The transportation
improvement is located within an urban area;

(b) The transportation
improvement will stimulate economic development within the apportionment
district;

(c) The economic
development within the apportionment district will increase the assessed value
of the apportionment district;

(d) The economic
development which is anticipated to occur within the apportionment district as
a result of the transportation improvement is consistent with an existing
comprehensive land use plan and approved growth policies of the jurisdiction
within which it is located;

(e) A transportation
improvement located within a city has been approved by the legislative
authority of such city; and

(f) A transportation
improvement located within an urban area in an unincorporated area has been
approved by the legislative authority of the county within whose boundaries the
area lies.

(2) Apportionment of
regular property tax revenues to finance the transportation improvements is
subject to the following limitations:

(a) No apportionment of
regular property tax revenues may take place within a previously established
apportionment district where regular property taxes are still apportioned to
finance public or transportation improvements without the concurrence of the
sponsor which established the district;

(b) No apportionment
district may be established which includes any geographic area included within
a previously established apportionment district which has outstanding bonds
payable in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues;

(c) The total amount of
outstanding bonds payable in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues
arising from property located within a city shall not exceed two percent of the
value of taxable property within the city, and the total amount of outstanding
bonds payable in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues arising from
property located within the unincorporated areas of a county shall not exceed
two percent of the value of taxable property within the entire unincorporated
area of the county; and

(d) No taxes other than
regular property taxes may be apportioned under this chapter.

(3) Transportation
improvements may be undertaken and coordinated with other programs or efforts
undertaken by the sponsor or others and may be funded in whole or in part from
sources other than those provided by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Transportation
improvements funded by tax allocation revenues may only be located within an
urban area. In order to secure an allocation of regular property taxes to finance
a transportation improvement, a sponsor shall:

(1) Propose by
ordinance a plan for the transportation improvement which includes a
description of the contemplated transportation improvement, the estimated cost
thereof, the boundaries of the apportionment district, the estimated period
during which tax revenue apportionment is contemplated, and the ways in which
the sponsor plans to use tax allocation revenues to finance the transportation
improvement, and which sets at least three public hearings thereon before the
legislative authority of the sponsor or a committee thereof: PROVIDED, That
public hearings for the transportation improvement that is undertaken in
combination or coordination by two or more sponsors may be held jointly; and
public hearings, held before the legislative authority or a committee of a
majority thereof may be combined with public hearings held for other purposes;

(2) At least fifteen
days in advance of the hearing:

(a) Deliver notice of
the hearing to all taxing districts, the county treasurer, and the county
assessor, which notice includes a map or drawing showing the location of the
contemplated transportation improvement and the boundaries of the proposed
apportionment district, a brief description of the transportation improvement,
the estimated cost thereof, the anticipated increase in property values within
the apportionment district, the location of the sponsor's principal business
office where it will maintain information concerning the transportation
improvement for public inspection, and the date and place of hearing; and

(b) Post notice in at
least six public places located in the proposed apportionment district and
publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation within the sponsor's
jurisdiction briefly describing the transportation improvement, the proposed
apportionment, the boundaries of the proposed apportionment district, the
location where additional information concerning the transportation improvement
may be inspected, and the date and place of hearing;

(3) At the time and
place fixed for the hearing under subsection (1) of this section, and at such
times to which the hearing may be adjourned, receive and consider all
statements and materials as may be submitted, and objections and letters filed
before or within ten days thereafter;

(4) Within one hundred
twenty days after completion of the public hearings, pass an ordinance
establishing the apportionment district and authorizing the proposed
transportation improvement, including any modifications which in the sponsor's
opinion the hearings indicated should be made, which includes the boundaries of
the apportionment district, a description of the transportation improvement,
the estimated cost thereof, the portion of the estimated cost thereof to be
reimbursed from tax allocation revenues, the estimated time during which
regular property taxes are to be apportioned, the date upon which apportionment
of the regular property taxes will commence, and a finding that the
transportation improvement meets the conditions of section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. Within fifteen days after
enactment of the public improvement ordinance, the sponsor shall publish notice
in a legal newspaper circulated within the designated apportionment district
summarizing the final transportation improvement, including a brief description
of the transportation improvement, the boundaries of the apportionment
district, and the location where the transportation improvement ordinance and
any other information concerning the transportation improvement may be
inspected.

Within fifteen days
after enactment of the transportation improvement ordinance, the sponsor shall
deliver a certified copy thereof to each taxing district, the county treasurer,
and the county assessor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. (1) Any taxing district
that objects to the apportionment district, the duration of the apportionment,
the manner of apportionment, or the propriety of cost items established by the
transportation improvement ordinance of the sponsor may, within thirty days
after mailing of the ordinance, petition for review thereof by the state board
of tax appeals. The state board of tax appeals shall meet within a reasonable
time, hear all the evidence presented by the parties on matters in dispute, and
determine the issues upon the evidence as may be presented to it at the
hearing. The board may approve or deny the transportation improvement
ordinance as enacted or may grant approval conditioned upon modification of the
ordinance by the sponsor. The decision by the state board of tax appeals shall
be final and conclusive but shall not preclude modification or discontinuation
of the transportation improvement.

(2) If the sponsor
modifies the transportation improvement ordinance as directed by the board, the
transportation improvement ordinance shall be effective without further
hearings or findings and shall not be subject to any further appeal. If the
sponsor modifies the transportation improvement ordinance in a manner other
than as directed by the board, the transportation improvement ordinance shall
be subject to the procedures established under sections 13 and 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. (1) Upon the date
established in the transportation improvement ordinance, but not sooner than
the first day of the calendar year following the passage of the ordinance, the
regular property taxes levied upon the assessed value of real property within
the apportionment district shall be divided as follows:

(a) That portion of the
regular property taxes produced by the rate of tax levied each year by or for
each of the taxing districts upon the tax allocation base value of real
property, or upon the assessed value of real property in each year, whichever
is smaller, shall be allocated to and paid to the respective taxing districts;
and

(b) That portion of the
regular property taxes levied each year by or for each of the taxing districts
upon the assessed value of real property within an apportionment district which
is in excess of the tax allocation base value of real property shall be
allocated and paid to the sponsor, or the sponsor's designated agent, until all
transportation improvement costs to be paid from the tax allocation revenues
have been paid, except that the sponsor may agree to receive less than the full
amount of such portion as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other bond
covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of the taxes
shall be allocated to the respective taxing districts as the sponsor and the
taxing districts may agree.

(2) The county assessor
shall revalue the real property within the apportionment district for the
purpose of determining the tax allocation base value for the apportionment
district and shall certify to the sponsor the tax allocation base value as soon
as practicable after the assessor receives notice of the transportation
improvement ordinance and shall certify to the sponsor the total assessed value
of real property within thirty days after the property values for each
succeeding year have been established. Nothing in this section authorizes
revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation that are
not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW.

(3) The date upon which
the apportionment district was established shall be considered the date upon
which the transportation improvement ordinance was enacted by the sponsor.

(4) The apportionment
of regular property taxes under this section shall cease when tax allocation
revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay transportation improvement
costs or to pay principal of and interest on bonds issued to finance
transportation improvement costs and payable in whole or in part from tax allocation
revenues. At the time of termination of the apportionment, any excess money
and any earnings thereon held by the sponsor shall be returned to the county
treasurer and distributed to the taxing districts which were subject to the
allocation in proportion to their regular property tax levies due for the year
in which the funds are returned.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Tax allocation revenues
may be applied as follows:

(1) To pay
transportation improvement costs;

(2) To pay principal of
and interest on, and to fund any necessary reserves for, tax allocation bonds;

(3) To pay into bond
funds established to pay the principal of and interest on general obligation
bonds issued pursuant to law to finance transportation facilities that are
specified in the transportation improvement ordinance and constructed following
the establishment of and within the apportionment district; or

(4) To pay any
combination of the foregoing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. General obligation bonds
which are issued to finance transportation facilities that are specified in the
transportation improvement ordinance, and for which part or all of the
principal or interest is paid by tax allocation revenues, shall be subject to
the following requirements:

(1) The intent to issue
such bonds and the maximum amount which the sponsor contemplates issuing are
specified in the transportation improvement ordinance; and

(2) A statement of the
intent of the sponsor to issue such bonds is included in all notices required
by sections 13 and 14 of this act.

In addition, the
ordinance or resolution authorizing the issuance of such general obligation
bonds shall be subject to potential referendum approval by the voters of the
issuing entity when the bonds are part of the nonvoter approved indebtedness
limitation established under RCW 39.36.020. If the voters of the county or
city issuing such bonds otherwise possess the general power of referendum on
county or city matters, the ordinance or resolution shall be subject to that
procedure. If the voters of the county or city issuing such bonds do not
otherwise possess the general power of referendum on county or city matters,
the referendum shall conform to the requirements and procedures for referendum
petitions provided for code cities in RCW 35A.11.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. (1) A sponsor may issue
such tax allocation bonds as it may deem appropriate for the financing of
transportation improvement costs and a reasonable bond reserve and for the
refunding of any outstanding tax allocation bonds.

(2) The principal and
interest of tax allocation bonds may be made payable from:

(a) Tax allocation
revenues;

(b) Project revenues
which may include: (i) Nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the
transportation improvement financed with the proceeds of the bonds, or portions
thereof; and (ii) contributions, grants, and nontax money available to the
sponsor for payment of costs of the transportation improvement or the debt
service of the bonds issued therefor;

(c) Any combination of
the revenues under (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(3) Tax allocation
bonds shall not be the general obligation of or guaranteed by all or any part
of the full faith and credit of the sponsor or any other state or local
government, or any tax revenues other than tax allocation revenues, and shall
not be considered a debt of the sponsor or other state or local government for
general indebtedness limitation purposes.

(4) The terms and
conditions of tax allocation bonds may include provisions for the following
matters, among others:

(a) The date of
issuance, maturity date or dates, denominations, form, series, negotiability,
registration, rank or priority, place of payment, interest rate or rates which
may be fixed or may vary over the life of the tax allocation bonds, bond
reserve, coverage, and such other terms related to repayment of the tax
allocation bonds;

(b) The application of
tax allocation bond proceeds; the use, sale, or disposition of property
acquired; consideration or rents and fees to be charged in the sale or lease of
property acquired; consideration or rents and fees to be charged in the sale or
lease of property within a transportation improvement; the application of
rents, fees, and revenues within a transportation improvement; the maintenance,
insurance, and replacement of property within a transportation improvement;
other encumbrances, if any, upon all or part of property within a
transportation improvement, then existing or thereafter acquired; and the type
of debts that may be incurred;

(c) The creation of
special funds; the money to be so applied; and the use and disposition of the
money;

(d) The securing of the
tax allocation bonds by a pledge of property and property rights, by assignment
of income generated by the transportation improvement, or by pledging such
additional specifically described resources other than tax revenues as are
available to the sponsor;

(e) The terms and
conditions for redemption;

(f) The replacement of
lost and destroyed bond instruments;

(g) Procedures for
amendment of the terms and conditions of the tax allocation bonds;

(h) The powers of a
trustee to enforce covenants and take other actions in event of default; the
rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach of any
covenant, condition, or obligation; and

(i) When consistent
with this chapter, such other terms, conditions, and provisions which may make
the tax allocation bonds more marketable and further the purposes of this
chapter.

(5) Tax allocation
bonds may be issued and sold in such manner as the legislative authority of the
sponsor shall determine.

(6) The sponsor may
also issue or incur obligations in anticipation of the receipt of tax
allocation bond proceeds or other money available to pay transportation
improvement costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. Tax allocation bonds
authorized in this chapter shall be legal investments for any of the funds of
the state and of municipal corporations, for trustees, and for other
fiduciaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. Whenever notice is
required to be given to the state, notice shall be given to the director of
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. No direct or collateral
attack on any transportation improvement, transportation improvement ordinance,
or apportionment district purported to be authorized or created in conformance
with applicable legal requirements, including the requirements of this chapter,
may be commenced more than thirty days after publication of notice as required
by section 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. This chapter supplements
and neither restricts nor limits any powers which the state or any municipal
corporation might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. This chapter may be known
and cited as the transportation infrastructure financing act.

Sec. 25. RCW 82.03.130 and 1998 c
54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
have jurisdiction to decide the following types of appeals:

(a) Appeals taken
pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.

(b) Appeals from a
county board of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.08.130.

(c) Appeals by an
assessor or landowner from an order of the director of revenue made pursuant to
RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if filed with the board of tax appeals within
thirty days after the mailing of the order, the right to such an appeal being
hereby established.

(d) Appeals by an
assessor or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car company from
determinations by the director of revenue of equalized assessed valuation of
property and the apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant to chapter
84.12 and 84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days
after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being hereby
established.

(e) Appeals by an
assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car
company from a determination of any county indicated ratio for such county
compiled by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075: PROVIDED,
That

(i) Said appeal be
filed after review of the ratio under RCW 84.48.075(3) and not later than
fifteen days after the mailing of the certification; and

(ii) The hearing before
the board shall be expeditiously held in accordance with rules prescribed by
the board and shall take precedence over all matters of the same character.

(f) Appeals from the
decisions of sale price of second class shorelands on navigable lakes by the
department of natural resources pursuant to RCW 79.94.210.

(g) Appeals from urban
redevelopment property tax apportionment district proposals established by
governmental ordinances pursuant to ((RCW 39.88.060)) section 15 of
this act.

(h) Appeals from
interest rates as determined by the department of revenue for use in valuing
farmland under current use assessment pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.

(i) Appeals from
revisions to stumpage value tables used to determine value by the department of
revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.

(j) Appeals from denial
of tax exemption application by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW
84.36.850.

(k) Appeals pursuant to
RCW 84.40.038(3).

(2) Except as otherwise
specifically provided by law hereafter, the provisions of RCW 1.12.070 shall
apply to all notices of appeal filed with the board of tax appeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. A new section is added
to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

Pursuant to chapter
47.-- RCW (sections 10 through 24 of this act), any increase in the assessed
value of real property within an apportionment district resulting from new
construction, improvements to property, or any increase in the assessed value
of state-assessed property shall not be included in the increase in assessed
value resulting from new construction, improvements, or any increase in the
assessed value of state-assessed property for purposes of calculating any limitations
upon regular property taxes under this chapter until the termination of
apportionment as set forth in section 16(4) of this act, except to the extent a
taxing district actually will receive the taxes levied upon this value. Tax
allocation revenues, as defined in section 11 of this act, shall not be deemed
to be "regular property taxes" for purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 39.88.010 (Declaration) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 42 s 2;

(2) RCW 39.88.020 (Definitions) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 42 s 3;

(3) RCW 39.88.030 (Authority--Limitations)
and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 4;

(4) RCW 39.88.040 (Procedure for adoption of
public improvement) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 5;

(5) RCW 39.88.050 (Notice of public
improvement) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 6;

(6) RCW 39.88.060 (Disagreements between
taxing districts) and 1989 c 378 s 1 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 7;

(7) RCW 39.88.070 (Apportionment of taxes)
and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 8;

(8) RCW 39.88.080 (Application of tax
allocation revenues) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 9;

(9) RCW 39.88.090 (General obligation bonds)
and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 10;

(10) RCW 39.88.100 (Tax allocation bonds) and
1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 11;

(11) RCW 39.88.110 (Legal investments) and
1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 13;

(12) RCW 39.88.120 (Notice to state) and 1982
1st ex.s. c 42 s 14;

(13) RCW 39.88.130 (Conclusive presumption of
validity) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 15;

(14) RCW 39.88.900 (Supplemental nature of
chapter) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 16;

(15) RCW 39.88.905 (Short title) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 42 s 1;

(16) RCW 39.88.910 (Captions not part of
law--1982 1st ex.s. c 42) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 17;

(17) RCW 39.88.915 (Severability--1982 1st
ex.s. c 42) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 18; and

(18) RCW 84.55.080 (Adjustment to tax
limitation) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. Sections 10 through 24 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to direct revenue collected from sales and use taxes paid on
transportation-related activities into the multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
deposit into the multimodal transportation account all revenue received from
taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the sale of, use of,
repair of, lease of, or any charge made for:

(1) Building,
repairing, or improving of, or ingredients, including all materials, labor,
equipment, contracts, and components used for, any publicly owned street,
place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation
terminal or parking facility, bridge, signing, tunnel, or trestle as described
in RCW 82.04.050; and

(2) Construction,
improvement, equipment, components, or repair of a ferry, ferry terminal, or
other facility operated by the Washington state ferries or a local government,
or for the repair, overhaul, or dry-docking of any ferry operated by Washington
state ferries or a local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. Sections 29 and 30 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county that is a member of the Puget Sound regional council may
submit an authorizing proposition to its voters, and if approved by a majority
of persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this section for the purposes designated in subsection (3) of this
section.

(2) The tax authorized
in this section shall be in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the county. The rate of tax shall equal two-tenths of one percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax.

(3) Moneys received
from any tax imposed under this section shall be used solely for transportation
purposes as that term is used in RCW 82.80.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. A new section is added
to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county, city, or town may impose a charge based upon the vehicle
miles traveled by a person within a congested region.

(2) For purposes of
this section, "congested region" means King, Pierce, or Snohomish
counties.

(3) Charges imposed
against a vehicle owner shall not exceed two cents per mile driven and shall be
paid and collected annually by the department of licensing upon registration of
the vehicle. Only the miles traveled in a congested region are subject to the
charge.

(4) During the first
year after the charge is in effect, the number of vehicle miles traveled shall
be those reported by the vehicle owner. Each year thereafter, there shall be
odometer checks verifying the number of vehicle miles traveled and the charge
shall be based upon the number of miles traveled pursuant to the odometer
check.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. A new section is added
to chapter 82.44 RCW to read as follows:

There shall be paid and
collected annually upon registration a traffic mitigation excise tax of twenty
dollars for each motor vehicle and noncommercial truck. The excise tax shall
be collected by the department of licensing. The proceeds from the excise tax
collected under this section shall be deposited into the multimodal
transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An additional tax
is imposed on any person selling in this state motor vehicles and motor vehicle
accessories at wholesale; as to such persons, the amount of the additional tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of
the business, multiplied by the rate of two percent.

(2) "Motor
vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.320.

(3) "Motor vehicle
accessories" means items of tangible personal property which become a
component part affixed to motor vehicles.

(4) Moneys collected
under this section shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 36. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder
of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---