BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.63.060 and 1988 c
127 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may act
as the research and fact finding agency of the municipality. To that end it
may make such surveys, analyses, researches and reports as are generally
authorized or requested by its council or board, or by the state with the
approval of its council or board. The commission, upon such request or
authority may also:

(1) Make inquiries,
investigations, and surveys concerning the resources of the county, including
but not limited to the potential for solar energy development and alternative
means to encourage and protect access to direct sunlight for solar energy
systems;

(2) Assemble and
analyze the data thus obtained and formulate plans for the conservation of such
resources and the systematic utilization and development thereof;

(3) Make
recommendations from time to time as to the best methods of such conservation,
utilization, and development;

(4) Cooperate with
other commissions and with other public agencies of the municipality, state and
United States in such planning, conservation, and development; and

(5) In particular
cooperate with and aid the state within its territorial limits in the
preparation of the state master plan provided for in RCW 43.21A.350 and in
advance planning of public works programs.

In
carrying out its powers and duties, the commission should demonstrate how land
use planning is integrated with transportation planning.

Sec. 2. RCW 35A.63.060 and 1967
ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.060 are each amended to read as follows:

Every code city, by
ordinance, shall direct the planning agency to prepare a comprehensive plan for
anticipating and influencing the orderly and coordinated development of land
and building uses of the code city and its environs. The comprehensive plan
may be prepared as a whole or in successive parts. The plan should
integrate transportation and land use planning.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.05.051 and 1998 c
175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive
six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs identified in the
state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan
as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection systems that incorporate
the following criteria:

(1) Priority
programming for the preservation program shall take into account the following,
not necessarily in order of importance:

(a) Extending the
service life of the existing highway system;

(b) Ensuring the
structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and bridges; and

(c) Minimizing life
cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the provisions of
this section may delegate to the department of transportation the authority to
select preservation projects to be included in the six-year program.

(2) Priority
programming for the improvement program shall take into account the following,
not necessarily in order of importance:

(a) Support for the
state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(b) The cost-effective
movement of people and goods;

(c) Accident and
accident risk reduction;

(d) Protection of the
state's natural environment;

(e) Continuity and
systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(f) Consistency with
local comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW as follows:

(i) Support for
development in and revitalization of existing downtowns;

(ii) Extent that
development implements local comprehensive plans for rural and urban
residential and nonresidential densities;

(iii) Extent of
compact, transit-oriented development at appropriate residential and
nonresidential densities; and

(iv) Feasibility of
multimodal transportation;

(g) Consistency with
regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80 RCW;

(h) Public views
concerning proposed improvements;

(i) The conservation of
energy resources;

(j) Feasibility of
financing the full proposed improvement;

(k) Commitments
established in previous legislative sessions;

(l) Relative costs and
benefits of candidate programs;

(m) Major projects
addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for preliminary
engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium, based upon
updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or canceled by the
transportation commission if higher priority projects are awaiting funding; ((and))

(n) Major project
approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost from original
prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's estimated
revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects may be
delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding.

(3) The commission may
depart from the priority programming established under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section: (a) To the extent that otherwise funds cannot be utilized
feasibly within the program; (b) as may be required by a court judgment,
legally binding agreement, or state and federal laws and regulations; (c) as
may be required to coordinate with federal, local, or other state agency
construction projects; (d) to take advantage of some substantial financial
benefit that may be available; (e) for continuity of route development; or (f)
because of changed financial or physical conditions of an unforeseen or
emergent nature. The commission or secretary of transportation shall maintain
in its files information sufficient to show the extent to which the commission
has departed from the established priority.

(4) The
commission shall identify those projects that yield freight mobility benefits
or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon affected communities.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.06.040 and 1998 c
199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
develop a statewide multimodal transportation plan under RCW 47.01.071(3) and
in conformance with federal requirements, to ensure the continued mobility of
people and goods within regions and across the state in a safe, cost-effective
manner. The statewide multimodal transportation plan shall consist of:

(1) A state-owned
facilities component, which shall guide state investment for state highways
including bicycle and pedestrian facilities, and state ferries; and

(2) A state-interest
component, which shall define the state interest in aviation, marine ports and
navigation, freight rail, intercity passenger rail, bicycle transportation and
pedestrian walkways, and public transportation, and recommend actions in
coordination with appropriate public and private transportation providers to
ensure that the state interest in these transportation modes is met.

The plans developed
under each component must be consistent with the state transportation policy
plan and with each other, reflect public involvement, be consistent with
regional transportation planning, high-capacity transportation planning, and
local comprehensive plans prepared under chapter 36.70A RCW, and include
analysis of intermodal connections and choices. A primary emphasis for these
plans shall be the relief of congestion, the preservation of existing
investments and downtowns, ability to attract or accommodate planned
population, and employment growth, the improvement of traveler safety, the
efficient movement of freight and goods, and the improvement and integration of
all transportation modes to create a seamless intermodal transportation system
for people and goods.

In the development of
the statewide multimodal transportation plan, the department shall identify and
document potential affected environmental resources, including, but not limited
to, wetlands, storm water runoff, flooding, air quality, fish passage, and
wildlife habitat. The department shall conduct its environmental
identification and documentation in coordination with all relevant
environmental regulatory authorities, including, but not limited to, local
governments. The department shall give the relevant environmental regulatory authorities
an opportunity to review the department's environmental plans. The relevant
environmental regulatory authorities shall provide comments on the department's
environmental plans in a timely manner. Environmental identification and
documentation as provided for in RCW 47.01.300 and this section is not intended
to create a private right of action or require an environmental impact
statement as provided in chapter 43.21C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 47.26 RCW to read as follows:

In any project funded
by the transportation improvement board, and in addition to any other items
required to be considered by statute, the board also shall consider the land
use implications of the project, such as whether the programs and projects:

(1) Support development
in and revitalization of existing downtowns;

(2) Implement local
comprehensive plans for rural and urban residential and nonresidential
densities;

(3) Have land use planning
and regulations encouraging compact development at appropriate residential and
nonresidential densities; and

(4)
Promote the use of multimodal transportation.

---
END ---