BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.05.010 and 1993 c
490 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that solutions to state highway deficiencies have become increasingly complex
and diverse and that anticipated transportation revenues will fall
substantially short of the amount required to satisfy all transportation
needs. Difficult investment trade-offs will be required.

It is the intent of the
legislature that investment of state transportation funds to address
deficiencies on the state highway system be based on a policy of priority
programming having as its basis the rational selection of projects and services
according to factual need and an evaluation of life cycle costs and benefits ((and
which)) that are systematically scheduled to carry out defined
objectives within available revenue. The state must develop analytic tools to
use a common methodology to measure benefits and costs for all modes.

The priority
programming system ((shall)) must ensure preservation of the
existing state highway system, relieve congestion, provide mobility for
people and goods, support the state's economy, and promote environmental
protection and energy conservation.

The priority
programming system ((shall)) must implement the state-owned
highway component of the statewide ((multimodal)) transportation plan,
consistent with local and regional transportation plans, by targeting state
transportation investment to appropriate multimodal solutions ((which)) that
address identified state highway system deficiencies.

The priority
programming system for improvements ((shall)) must incorporate a
broad range of solutions that are identified in the statewide ((multimodal))
transportation plan as appropriate to address state highway system deficiencies,
including but not limited to highway expansion, efficiency improvements,
nonmotorized transportation facilities, high occupancy vehicle facilities,
transit facilities and services, rail facilities and services, and
transportation demand management programs.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.05.030 and 1998 c
171 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation
commission shall adopt a comprehensive six-year investment program specifying
program objectives and performance measures for the preservation and
improvement programs defined in this section. In the specification of
investment program objectives and performance measures, the transportation
commission, in consultation with the Washington state department of
transportation, shall define and adopt standards for effective programming and
prioritization practices including a needs analysis process. The ((needs))
analysis process ((shall)) must ensure the identification of
problems and deficiencies, the evaluation of alternative solutions and
trade-offs, and estimations of the costs and benefits of prospective projects.
The investment program ((shall)) must be revised biennially,
effective on July 1st of odd-numbered years. The investment program ((shall))
must be based upon the needs identified in the state-owned highway
component of the statewide ((multimodal)) transportation plan as defined
in RCW 47.01.071(3).

(1) The preservation
program ((shall)) consists of those investments necessary to
preserve the existing state highway system and to restore existing safety
features, giving consideration to lowest life cycle costing. The
preservation program must require use of the most cost-effective pavement
surfaces, considering:

(a) Life-cycle cost
analysis;

(b) Traffic volume;

(c) Subgrade soil
conditions;

(d) Environmental
and weather conditions;

(e) Materials
available; and

(f) Construction
factors.

The comprehensive
six-year investment program for preservation ((shall)) must
identify projects for two years and an investment plan for the remaining four
years.

(2) The improvement
program ((shall)) consists of investments needed to address
identified deficiencies on the state highway system to increase mobility,
address congestion, and improve ((mobility,)) safety, support for
the economy, and protection of the environment. The six-year investment
program for improvements ((shall)) must identify projects for two
years and major deficiencies proposed to be addressed in the six-year period
giving consideration to relative benefits and life cycle costing. The
transportation commission shall give higher priority for correcting identified
deficiencies on those facilities classified as facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140. Project prioritization must be
based primarily upon cost-benefit analysis, where appropriate.

The
transportation commission shall approve and present the comprehensive six-year
investment program to the legislature in support of the biennial budget request
under RCW 44.40.070 and 44.40.080.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.05.035 and 1993 c
490 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
and the commission shall use the transportation demand modeling tools developed
under subsection (2) of this section to evaluate investments based on the best
mode or improvement, or mix of modes and improvements, to meet current and
future long-term demand within a corridor or system for the lowest cost. The
end result of these demand modeling tools is to provide a cost-benefit analysis
by which the department and the commission can determine the relative mobility
improvement and congestion relief each mode or improvement under consideration
will provide and the relative investment each mode or improvement under
consideration will need to achieve that relief.

(2) The department
will participate in the refinement, enhancement, and application of existing
transportation demand modeling tools to be used to evaluate investments. This
participation and use of transportation demand modeling tools will be phased
in. The first phase will build upon the modeling work initiated by the
four-county Puget Sound regional council.

(3) In
developing program objectives and performance measures, the transportation
commission shall evaluate investment trade-offs between the preservation and
improvement programs. In making these investment trade-offs, the commission
shall evaluate, using cost-benefit techniques, roadway and bridge maintenance
activities as compared to roadway and bridge preservation program activities
and adjust those programs accordingly.

(4) The
commission shall allocate the estimated revenue between preservation and
improvement programs giving primary consideration to the following factors:

(((1))) (a)
The relative needs in each of the programs and the system performance levels
that can be achieved by meeting these needs;

(((2))) (b)
The need to provide adequate funding for preservation to protect the state's
investment in its existing highway system;

(((3))) (c)
The continuity of future transportation development with those improvements
previously programmed; and

(((4)))
(d) The availability of dedicated funds for a specific type of work.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.05.051 and 1998 c
175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive
six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs identified in the
state-owned highway component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan
as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection systems that incorporate
the following criteria:

(1) Priority
programming for the preservation program shall take into account the following,
not necessarily in order of importance:

(a) Extending the
service life of the existing highway system, including using the most
cost-effective pavement surfaces, considering:

(i) Life-cycle cost
analysis;

(ii) Traffic volume;

(iii) Subgrade soil
conditions;

(iv) Environmental
and weather conditions;

(v) Materials
available; and

(vi) Construction
factors;

(b) Ensuring the
structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and bridges; and

(c) Minimizing life
cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the provisions of
this section may delegate to the department of transportation the authority to
select preservation projects to be included in the six-year program.

(2) Priority
programming for the improvement program shall take into account the following:

(a) Support for the
state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(b) The cost-effective
movement of people and goods;

(c) Accident and
accident risk reduction;

(d) Protection of the
state's natural environment;

(e) Continuity and
systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(f) Consistency with local
comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g) Consistency with
regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80 RCW;

(h) Public views
concerning proposed improvements;

(i) The conservation of
energy resources;

(j) Feasibility of
financing the full proposed improvement;

(k) Commitments
established in previous legislative sessions;

(l) Relative costs and
benefits of candidate programs;

(m) Major projects
addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for preliminary
engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium, based upon
updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or canceled by the
transportation commission if higher priority projects are awaiting funding; ((and))

(n) Major project
approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost from original
prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's estimated
revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects may be
delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding; and

(o) Congestion
reduction.

(3) The commission may
depart from the priority programming established under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section: (a) To the extent that otherwise funds cannot be utilized
feasibly within the program; (b) as may be required by a court judgment,
legally binding agreement, or state and federal laws and regulations; (c) as
may be required to coordinate with federal, local, or other state agency
construction projects; (d) to take advantage of some substantial financial
benefit that may be available; (e) for continuity of route development; or (f)
because of changed financial or physical conditions of an unforeseen or
emergent nature. The commission or secretary of transportation shall maintain
in its files information sufficient to show the extent to which the commission
has departed from the established priority.

(4) The
commission shall identify those projects that yield freight mobility benefits
or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon affected communities.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.06.130 and 1993 c
446 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
department may carry out special transportation planning studies to resolve
specific issues with the development of the state transportation system or
other statewide transportation issues.

(2) The department
shall conduct multimodal corridor analyses on major congested corridors where
needed improvements are likely to cost in excess of one hundred million
dollars. Analysis will include the cost-effectiveness of all feasible
strategies in addressing congestion or improving mobility within the corridor,
and must recommend the most effective strategy or mix of strategies to address
identified deficiencies. A long-term view of corridors must be employed to
determine whether an existing corridor should be expanded, a city or county
road should become a state route, and whether a new corridor is needed to
alleviate congestion and enhance mobility based on travel demand. To the
extent practicable, full costs of all strategies must be reflected in the
analysis. At a minimum, this analysis must include:

(a) The current and
projected future demand for total person trips on that corridor;

(b) The impact of
making no improvements to that corridor;

(c) The daily cost
per added person served for each mode or improvement proposed to meet demand;

(d) The cost per
hour of travel time saved per day for each mode or improvement proposed to meet
demand; and

(e) How much of the
current and anticipated future demand will be met and left unmet for each mode
or improvement proposed to meet demand.

The end result of this
analysis will be to provide a cost-benefit analysis by which policymakers can
determine the most cost-effective improvement or mode, or mix of improvements
and modes, for increasing mobility and reducing congestion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---