BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.26 RCW
to read as follows:

The term "advance right-of-way acquisition" as used in this chapter
means the acquisition of property and property rights, together with
the engineering costs necessary for the advance right-of-way
acquisition. Property or property rights purchased must be for
projects approved by the transportation improvement board or the county
road administration board as part of a city or county six-year plan or
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 47.26 RCW
to read as follows:

The city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund is created
in the custody of the treasurer. The transportation improvement board
is the administrator of the fund and may deposit directly and spend
without appropriation.

The transportation improvement board and the county road
administration board, in consultation with the association of
Washington cities and the Washington association of counties, shall
adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 47.26 RCW
to read as follows:

(1) After any properties or property rights are acquired through
funds in the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
acquiring city or county is responsible for the management of the
properties in accordance with sound business practices and shall
provide annual status reports to the board. Funds received by the city
or county from the interim management of the properties must be
deposited into the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund.

(2) When the city or county proceeds with the construction of an
arterial project that will require the use of any of the property so
acquired, the city or county shall reimburse the city and county
advance right-of-way revolving fund. Reimbursement must reflect the
original cost of the acquired property or property rights required for
the project plus an interest rate as determined annually by the board.
The board shall report on the interest rate set to the transportation
committees through its annual report.

(3) When the city or county determines that any properties or
property rights acquired from funds in the city and county advance
right-of-way revolving fund will not be required for an arterial
construction project or the property has been held by the city or
county for more than six years, the city or county shall either sell
the property at fair market value or reimburse the fund at fair market
value. All proceeds of the sale must be deposited in the city and
county advance right-of-way revolving fund. At the board's discretion,
a portion of savings on transportation improvement board projects
realized through the use of the city and county advance revolving fund
may be deposited back into the city and county advance right-of-way
revolving fund.

(4) Deposits in the fund may be reexpended without further or
additional appropriations.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2000 c 79 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:

(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.

(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington advanced college
tuition payment program account, the agricultural local fund, the
American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the Washington international exchange
scholarship endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment
trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game farm
alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the
stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
((grant)) account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur
dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust fund. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.44.010 and 1980 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:

(1) The department of transportation may grant franchises to
persons, associations, private or municipal corporations, the United
States government, or any agency thereof, to use any state highway for
the construction and maintenance of water pipes, flume, gas, oil or
coal pipes, telephone, telegraph and electric light and power lines and
conduits, trams or railways, and any structures or facilities ((which))
that are part of an urban public transportation system owned or
operated by a municipal corporation, agency, or department of the state
of Washington other than the department of transportation, and any
other such facilities. In order to minimize the disruption to traffic
and damage to the roadway, the department is encouraged to develop a
joint trenching policy with other affected jurisdictions so that all
permittees and franchisees requiring access to ground under the roadway
may do so at one time.

(2) All applications for ((such)) the franchise ((shall)) must be
made in writing and subscribed by the applicant, and ((shall)) describe
the state highway or portion thereof over which franchise is desired
and the nature of the franchise. The application must also include the
identification of all jurisdictions affected by the franchise and the
names of other possible franchisees who should receive notice of the
application for a franchise.

(3) The department of transportation shall adopt rules providing
for a hearing or an opportunity for a hearing with reasonable public
notice thereof with respect to any franchise application involving the
construction and maintenance of utilities or other facilities within
the highway right of way which the department determines may (((1)))
(a) during construction, significantly disrupt the flow of traffic or
use of driveways or other facilities within the right of way, or
(((2))) (b) during or following construction, cause a significant and
adverse effect upon the surrounding environment.

Sec. 6. RCW 47.44.020 and 1980 c 28 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:

(1) If the department of transportation deems it to be for the
public interest, the franchise may be granted in whole or in part, with
or without hearing under such regulations and conditions as the
department may prescribe, with or without compensation, but not in
excess of the reasonable cost for investigating, handling, and granting
the franchise. The department may require that the utility and
appurtenances be so placed on the highway that they will, in its
opinion, least interfere with other uses of the highway.

(2) If a hearing is held, it ((shall)) must be conducted by the
department, and may be adjourned from time to time until completed.
The applicant may be required to produce all facts pertaining to the
franchise, and evidence may be taken for and against granting it.

(3) The facility ((shall)) must be made subject to removal when
necessary for the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of
the highway and at the expense of the franchise holder, except that the
state shall pay the cost of ((such)) the removal whenever the state
((shall be)) is entitled to receive proportionate reimbursement
therefor from the United States in the cases and in the manner set
forth in RCW 47.44.030. Renewal upon expiration of a franchise
((shall)) must be by application.

(4) A person constructing or operating such a utility on a state
highway is liable to any person injured thereby for any damages
incident to the work of installation or the continuation of the
occupancy of the highway by the utility, and except as provided above,
is liable to the state for all necessary expenses incurred in restoring
the highway to a permanent suitable condition for travel. A person
constructing or operating such a utility on a state highway is also
liable to the state for all necessary expenses incurred in inspecting
the construction and restoring the pavement or other related
transportation equipment or facilities to a permanent condition
suitable for travel and operation in accordance with requirements set
by the department. Permit and franchise holders are also financially
responsible to the department for trenching work not completed within
the contractual period and for compensating for the loss of useful
pavement life caused by trenching. No franchise may be granted for a
longer period than fifty years, and no exclusive franchise or privilege
may be granted.

(5) The holder of a franchise granted under this section is
financially responsible to the department for trenching work not
completed within the period of the permit and for compensating for the
loss of useful pavement life caused by trenching. In the case of
common trenching operations, liability under this subsection will be
assessed equally between the franchisees. The assessed parties may
thereafter pursue claims of contribution or indemnity in accord with
such fault as may be determined by arbitration or other legal action.

Sec. 7. RCW 47.44.050 and 1984 c 7 s 237 are each amended to read
as follows:

(1) The department ((is empowered to)) may grant a permit to
construct or maintain on, over, across, or along any state highway any
water, gas, telephone, telegraph, light, power, or other such
facilities when they do not extend along the state highway for a
distance greater than three hundred feet. The department may require
such information as it deems necessary in the application for any such
permit, and may grant or withhold the permit within its discretion.
Any permit granted may be canceled at any time, and any facilities
remaining upon the right of way of the state highway after thirty days
written notice of the cancellation ((is [are])) are an unlawful
obstruction and may be removed in the manner provided by law.

(2) The holder of a permit granted under this section is
financially responsible to the department for trenching work not
completed within the period of the permit and for compensating for the
loss of useful pavement life caused by trenching. In the case of
common trenching operations, liability under this subsection will be
assessed equally between the permit holders. The assessed parties may
thereafter pursue claims of contribution or indemnity in accord with
such fault as may be determined by arbitration or other legal action.

Sec. 8. RCW 47.24.020 and 1993 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:

The jurisdiction, control, and duty of the state and city or town
with respect to such streets ((shall be)) is as follows:

(1) The department has no authority to change or establish any
grade of any such street without approval of the governing body of such
city or town, except with respect to limited access facilities
established by the commission;

(2) The city or town shall exercise full responsibility for and
control over any such street beyond the curbs and if no curb is
installed, beyond that portion of the highway used for highway
purposes. However, within incorporated cities and towns the title to
a state limited access highway vests in the state, and, notwithstanding
any other provision of this section, the department shall exercise full
jurisdiction, responsibility, and control to and over such facility as
provided in chapter 47.52 RCW;

(3) The department has authority to prohibit the suspension of
signs, banners, or decorations above the portion of such street between
the curbs or portion used for highway purposes up to a vertical height
of twenty feet above the surface of the roadway;

(4) The city or town shall at its own expense maintain all
underground facilities in such streets, and has the right to construct
such additional underground facilities as may be necessary in such
streets. However, pavement trenching and restoration performed as part
of installation of such facilities must meet or exceed requirements
established by the department;

(5) The city or town has the right to grant the privilege to open
the surface of any such street, but all damage occasioned thereby shall
promptly be repaired either by the city or town itself or at its
direction. Pavement trenching and restoration performed under a
privilege granted by the city under this subsection must meet or exceed
requirements established by the department;

(6) The city or town at its own expense shall provide street
illumination and shall clean all such streets, including storm sewer
inlets and catch basins, and remove all snow, except that the state
shall when necessary plow the snow on the roadway. In cities and towns
having a population of twenty-two thousand five hundred or less
according to the latest determination of population by the office of
financial management, the state, when necessary for public safety,
shall assume, at its expense, responsibility for the stability of the
slopes of cuts and fills and the embankments within the right of way to
protect the roadway itself. When the population of a city or town
first exceeds twenty-two thousand five hundred according to the
determination of population by the office of financial management, the
city or town shall have three years from the date of the determination
to plan for additional staffing, budgetary, and equipment requirements
before being required to assume the responsibilities under this
subsection. The state shall install, maintain, and operate all
illuminating facilities on any limited access facility, together with
its interchanges, located within the corporate limits of any city or
town, and shall assume and pay the costs of all such installation,
maintenance, and operation incurred after November 1, 1954;

(7) The department has the right to use all storm sewers on such
highways without cost; and if new storm sewer facilities are necessary
in construction of new streets by the department, the cost of the
facilities shall be borne by the state and/or city as may be mutually
agreed upon between the department and the governing body of the city
or town;

(8) Cities and towns have exclusive right to grant franchises not
in conflict with state laws and rules, over, beneath, and upon such
streets, but the department is authorized to enforce in an action
brought in the name of the state any condition of any franchise which
a city or town has granted on such street. No franchise for
transportation of passengers in motor vehicles may be granted on such
streets without the approval of the department, but the department
shall not refuse to approve such franchise unless another street
conveniently located and of strength of construction to sustain travel
of such vehicles is accessible;

(9) Every franchise or permit granted any person by a city or town
for use of any portion of such street by a public utility ((shall))
must require the grantee or permittee to restore, repair, and replace
((to its original condition)) any portion of the street damaged or
injured by it to conditions that meet or exceed requirements
established by the department;

(10) The city or town has the right to issue overload or overwidth
permits for vehicles to operate on such streets or roads subject to
regulations printed and distributed to the cities and towns by the
department;

(11) Cities and towns shall regulate and enforce all traffic and
parking restrictions on such streets, but all regulations adopted by a
city or town relating to speed, parking, and traffic control devices on
such streets not identical to state law relating thereto are subject to
the approval of the department before becoming effective. All
regulations pertaining to speed, parking, and traffic control devices
relating to such streets heretofore adopted by a city or town not
identical with state laws shall become null and void unless approved by
the department heretofore or within one year after March 21, 1963;

(12) The department shall erect, control, and maintain at state
expense all route markers and directional signs, except street signs,
on such streets;

(13) The department shall install, operate, maintain, and control
at state expense all traffic control signals, signs, and traffic
control devices for the purpose of regulating both pedestrian and motor
vehicular traffic on, entering upon, or leaving state highways in
cities and towns having a population of twenty-two thousand five
hundred or less according to the latest determination of population by
the office of financial management. Such cities and towns may submit
to the department a plan for traffic control signals, signs, and
traffic control devices desired by them, indicating the location,
nature of installation, or type thereof, or a proposed amendment to
such an existing plan or installation, and the department shall consult
with the cities or towns concerning the plan before installing such
signals, signs, or devices. Cities and towns having a population in
excess of twenty-two thousand five hundred according to the latest
determination of population by the office of financial management shall
install, maintain, operate, and control such signals, signs, and
devices at their own expense, subject to approval of the department for
the installation and type only. When the population of a city or town
first exceeds twenty-two thousand five hundred according to the
determination of population by the office of financial management, the
city or town shall have three years from the date of the determination
to plan for additional staffing, budgetary, and equipment requirements
before being required to assume the responsibilities under this
subsection. For the purpose of this subsection, striping, lane
marking, and channelization are considered traffic control devices;

(14) All revenue from parking meters placed on such streets belongs
to the city or town;

(15) Rights of way for such streets shall be acquired by either the
city or town or by the state as shall be mutually agreed upon. Costs
of acquiring rights of way may be at the sole expense of the state or
at the expense of the city or town or at the expense of the state and
the city or town as may be mutually agreed upon. Title to all such
rights of way so acquired shall vest in the city or town: PROVIDED,
That no vacation, sale, rental, or any other nontransportation use of
any unused portion of any such street may be made by the city or town
without the prior written approval of the department; and all revenue
derived from sale, vacation, rental, or any nontransportation use of
such rights of way shall be shared by the city or town and the state in
the same proportion as the purchase costs were shared;

(16) If any city or town fails to perform any of its obligations as
set forth in this section or in any cooperative agreement entered into
with the department for the maintenance of a city or town street
forming part of the route of a state highway, the department may notify
the mayor of the city or town to perform the necessary maintenance
within thirty days. If the city or town within the thirty days fails
to perform the maintenance or fails to authorize the department to
perform the maintenance as provided by RCW 47.24.050, the department
may perform the maintenance, the cost of which is to be deducted from
any sums in the motor vehicle fund credited or to be credited to the
city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2001, in the transportation appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

--- END ---