BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning July 1, 2002,
and each year thereafter, in order to receive new baseline funding, the
department of transportation, counties, cities, and public transit systems must
demonstrate progress toward achieving the benchmarks provided in Senate Bill
No. . . . .. For purposes of this section "demonstrate
progress toward achieving the benchmarks" means that projects completed
during the reporting period meet at least four of the benchmarks.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
July 1, 2002, in order to receive additional funding for transportation
projects, the department of transportation, counties, cities, and public
transit systems must demonstrate that they are not supplanting existing funding
with new funding. The department of transportation, the Washington association
of counties, the association of Washington cities, and each public transit system
must, by July 1, 2002, and each year thereafter, report to the transportation
committees of the house of representatives and the senate on how they are using
new and existing funding.

---
END ---