BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct a performance review of the
administrative practices of the Washington state department of transportation.
The purpose of the review is to clarify operational costs and to identify
administrative or operational inefficiencies that can be improved.

(2) At a minimum, the
review should include the following elements:

(a) Scale and size of
accounting and management information systems division staffs;

(b) Possible
duplication of functions among regions and offices;

(c) Possible
application of computer and Internet technology for administration purposes;

(d) Scale and size of
other departmental support programs, including functions for highway management
and facilities; finance and administration; transportation planning, data, and
research; and other agency charges.

The review must be
completed no later than October 31, 2002. The joint legislative audit and
review committee may contract for specialized expertise as necessary to achieve
the purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The transportation
accountability board, created in House Bill No. ...., shall conduct a thorough
review of administrative practices of each county, each city with a population
of five thousand or greater, and each transit district. The purpose of the
review is to clarify operational costs and to identify administrative or
operational inefficiencies that can be improved.

The
transportation accountability board must develop a plan for conducting the
review. The board may consider using consultant support or contracting out the
performance reviews as necessary to achieve the purposes of this section. The
board shall submit its proposed plan to the governor and the transportation
committees of the house of representatives and the senate no later than October
31, 2001.

---
END ---