BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.17.020 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a chief
executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The secretary of
social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the director of
labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish
and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the director of
licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the director of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans
affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of health,
and (15) the director of financial institutions.

Such officers, except
((the secretary of transportation and)) the director of fish and wildlife,
shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. ((The secretary of transportation
shall be appointed by the transportation commission as prescribed by RCW
47.01.041.)) The director of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the
fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.01.041 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The executive head of
the department of transportation shall be the secretary of transportation, who
shall be appointed by the ((transportation commission)) governor,
with the consent of the senate, and may serve on an acting basis for up to one
year until confirmed by the senate, and shall be paid a salary to be fixed
by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. The
secretary shall be an ex officio member of the commission without a vote. The
secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the commission ((and be
responsible to it, and shall be guided by policies established by it)).
The secretary shall serve ((until removed by the commission, but only for
incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to
carry out the commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal shall be
acted on by the commission, the secretary shall be granted a hearing on formal
written charges before the full commission. An action by the commission to
remove the secretary shall be final)) at the pleasure of the governor.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.01.071 and 1981 c
59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation
commission shall ((have the following functions, powers, and duties:

(1) To propose
policies to be adopted by the legislature designed to assure the development
and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system
which will meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient
transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies shall provide for
the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to implement the
social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and objectives of the
people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable natural resources
including land and energy. To this end the commission shall:

(a) Develop
transportation policies which are based on the policies, goals, and objectives
expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b) Inventory the
adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and area-wide governmental
bodies of the state and define the role of the state, regional, and local
governments in determining transportation policies, in transportation planning,
and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c) Propose a
transportation policy for the state, and after notice and public hearings,
submit the proposal to the legislative transportation committee and the senate
and house transportation committees by January 1, 1978, for consideration in
the next legislative session;

(d) Establish a
procedure for review and revision of the state transportation policy and for
submission of proposed changes to the legislature;

(e) To integrate the
statewide transportation plan with the needs of the elderly and handicapped,
and to coordinate federal and state programs directed at assisting local
governments to answer such needs;

(2) To establish the
policy of the department to be followed by the secretary on each of the
following items:

(a) To provide for
the effective coordination of state transportation planning with national
transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local and
regional transportation plans and programs;

(b) To provide for
public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the public's views both
with respect to adequate transportation services and appropriate means of
minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and energy impact of
transportation programs;

(c) To provide for
the administration of grants in aid and other financial assistance to counties
and municipal corporations for transportation purposes;

(d) To provide for
the management, sale, and lease of property or property rights owned by the
department which are not required for transportation purposes;

(3) To direct the
secretary to prepare and submit to the commission a comprehensive and balanced
statewide transportation plan which shall be based on the transportation policy
adopted by the legislature and applicable state and federal laws. After public
notice and hearings, the commission shall adopt the plan and submit it to the
legislative transportation committee and to the house and senate standing
committees on transportation before January 1, 1980, for consideration in the
1980 regular legislative session. The plan shall be reviewed and revised prior
to each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter. A preliminary plan shall be submitted to such committees by
January 1, 1979.

The plan shall take
into account federal law and regulations relating to the planning,
construction, and operation of transportation facilities;

(4) To propose to
the governor and the legislature prior to the convening of each regular session
held in an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the operations of the
commission as required by RCW 47.01.061;

(5) To approve and
propose to the governor and to the legislature prior to the convening of each
regular session during an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the
operation of the department and for carrying out the program of the department
for the ensuing biennium. The proposed budget shall separately state the
appropriations to be made from the motor vehicle fund for highway purposes in
accordance with constitutional limitations and appropriations and expenditures
to be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other available
sources for other operations and programs of the department;

(6) To review and
authorize all departmental requests for legislation;

(7) To)) approve the issuance and sale of all bonds
authorized by the legislature for ((capital construction of state highways,))
all toll facilities((, Columbia Basin county roads (for which
reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban arterial
projects, and aviation facilities;

(8) To adopt such
rules, regulations, and policy directives as may be necessary to carry out
reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the commission by
statute;

(9) To delegate any
of its powers to the secretary of transportation whenever it deems it desirable
for the efficient administration of the department and consistent with the
purposes of this title;

(10) To exercise
such other specific powers and duties as may be vested in the transportation
commission by this or any other provision of law)) and set fares on state ferries and tolls on
state toll facilities.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.01.101 and 1987 c
505 s 48 and 1987 c 179 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall
have the authority and it shall be his or her duty((, subject to policy
guidance from the commission)):

(1) To serve as chief
executive officer of the department with full administrative authority to
direct all its activities;

(2) To organize the
department as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the work and
responsibilities of the department effectively;

(3) To designate and
establish such transportation district or branch offices as may be necessary or
convenient, and to appoint assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and
functions to them or any officer or employee of the department as deemed
necessary to administer the department efficiently;

(4) To direct and
coordinate the programs of the various divisions of the department to assure
that they achieve the greatest possible mutual benefit, produce a balanced
overall effort, and eliminate unnecessary duplication of activity;

(5) To adopt all
department rules that are subject to the adoption procedures contained in the
state Administrative Procedure Act, except ((rules))
fares on state ferries and tolls on state toll facilities subject to
adoption by the commission pursuant to statute;

(6) To maintain and
safeguard the official records of the department, including the commission's
recorded resolutions and orders;

(7) To provide full
staff support to the commission to assist it in carrying out its functions,
powers, and duties ((and to execute the policy established by the commission
pursuant to its legislative authority));

(8) To execute and
implement the biennial operating budget for the operation of the department in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW and with legislative appropriation and, in
such manner as prescribed therein, to make and report to the ((commission
and the)) chairs of the transportation committees of the senate and house
of representatives, including one copy to the staff of each of the committees, deviations
from the planned biennial category A and H highway construction programs
necessary to adjust to unexpected delays or other unanticipated circumstances((.));

(9) To propose
policies to be adopted by the legislature designed to assure the development
and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system
that will meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient
transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies shall provide for
the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to implement the
social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and objectives of the
people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable natural resources
including land and energy. To this end the secretary shall:

(a) Develop
transportation policies that are based on the policies, goals, and objectives
expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b) Inventory the
adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and area-wide governmental
bodies of the state and define the role of the state, regional, and local
governments in determining transportation policies, in transportation planning,
and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c) Propose a
transportation policy for the state, and after notice and public hearings,
submit the proposal to the legislative transportation committee and the senate
and house transportation committees by January 1, 2004, for consideration in
the next legislative session;

(d) Establish a
procedure for review and revision of the state transportation policy and for
submission of proposed changes to the legislature;

(e) To integrate the
statewide transportation plan with the needs of the elderly and handicapped,
and to coordinate federal and state programs directed at assisting local
governments to answer such needs;

(10) To establish
the policy of the department on each of the following items:

(a) To provide for
the effective coordination of state transportation planning with national
transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local and
regional transportation plans and programs;

(b) To provide for
public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the public's views both
with respect to adequate transportation services and appropriate means of
minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and energy impact of
transportation programs;

(c) To provide for
the administration of grants in aid and other financial assistance to counties
and municipal corporations for transportation purposes;

(d) To provide for
the management, sale, and lease of property or property rights owned by the
department which are not required for transportation purposes;

(11) To prepare a
comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation plan based on the
transportation policy adopted by the legislature and applicable state and
federal laws. After public notice and hearings, the secretary shall adopt the
plan and submit it to the legislative transportation committee and to the house
and senate standing committees on transportation before January 1, 2005, for
consideration in the 2005 regular legislative session. The plan must be
reviewed and revised before each regular session of the legislature during an
even-numbered year. A preliminary plan must be submitted to the committees by
January 1, 2004.

The plan must take
into account federal law and regulations relating to the planning,
construction, and operation of transportation facilities;

(12) To propose to the
governor and the legislature prior to the convening of each regular session
held in an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the operations of the
commission as required by RCW 47.01.061;

(13) To approve and
propose to the governor and to the legislature before the convening of each
regular session during an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the
operation of the department and for carrying out the program of the department
for the ensuing biennium. The proposed budget must separately state the
appropriations to be made from the motor vehicle fund for highway purposes in
accordance with constitutional limitations and appropriations and expenditures
to be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other available
sources for other operations and programs of the department;

(14) To review and
authorize all departmental requests for legislation;

(15) To approve the
issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the legislature for capital
construction of state highways, Columbia Basin county roads (for which
reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban arterial
projects, and aviation facilities;

(16) To adopt such
rules and policy directives as may be necessary to carry out reasonably and
properly those functions expressly vested in the department by statute;

(17) To exercise
all other powers and perform all other duties as are now or hereafter provided
by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the transportation commission pertaining to functions other
than setting fares on state ferries and tolls on state toll facilities and
bonding authority for state toll facilities are transferred to the secretary of
transportation. All references to the chairman of the transportation
commission or the transportation commission in the Revised Code of Washington
are construed to mean the secretary of transportation when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the transportation commission pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred must be delivered to the custody of the
secretary of transportation. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the transportation commission
in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred must be made
available to the secretary of transportation. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred
will be assigned to the secretary of transportation.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the transportation commission for carrying out the powers, functions,
and duties transferred will, on the effective date of this act, be transferred
and credited to the department of transportation.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in
the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of
the transportation commission engaged in performing the powers, functions, and
duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the secretary of
transportation. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the receiving agency to perform their usual duties
upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any
action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules
governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all
pending business before the transportation commission pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the
secretary of transportation. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the secretary of transportation.

(5) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the transportation commission shall
not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
act.

(6) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments
to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of
these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

(7) Nothing contained
in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining
unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until
the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by
action of the personnel resources board as provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---