BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that the citizens of Washington are becoming ever more dependent on
transportation services to maintain the economic health of the state and their
personal standard of living. Rapid growth in population and increasing vehicle
miles traveled have placed increased pressure on the capacity of our
transportation system. Growing highway congestion, the delay in goods
movement, deteriorating infrastructure, and the decline in attractive travel
alternatives demonstrate the need for new and innovative methods to address
this state's transportation needs.

The legislature finds
that many transportation decisions are best made at the regional level, where
transportation problems are most paramount. While the numerous local agencies
entrusted with planning, building, and maintaining our transportation
infrastructure and providing transportation services have each done their part
to improve mobility, an overall approach to better coordinate and fund regional
investments and services would provide better services and more cost-effective
transportation solutions.

The legislature further
finds that the consolidation of the process for planning and prioritizing
transportation projects will result in the identification and selection of
projects and services that will result in the greatest relief for traffic
congestion, faster delivery times for transportation efforts, and reduced costs
for transportation infrastructure and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Local
agencies" include counties, cities, local or road improvement districts,
public transit agencies, ports, or other municipal corporations within a
transportation region that are authorized to plan for, program, and fund the
acquisition, improvement, construction, or operation of regional transportation
facilities and services.

(2) "Regional
transportation board" means the governing authority of a transportation
region.

(3) "Regionally
significant transportation facilities or services" means those
transportation facilities or services that primarily address: (a) Regional
mobility and congestion relief and (b) travel demand between jurisdictions within
a region of the state, as compared to interregional or local travel.
"Regionally significant transportation facilities" include regional
highways, local principal arterials, bicycle-pedestrian facilities connecting
jurisdictions, transportation demand management programs, and transit
facilities and services connecting jurisdictions.

(4)
"Transportation region" means an area including one or more counties
that is designated as a transportation region by the county legislative
authority of each county included in the region.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the legislative authority of any county may, by
resolution, establish a transportation region to implement the legislative intent
of this chapter. The boundaries of the region must be the same as those of the
county, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) If a contiguous
urbanized area is required to have a metropolitan planning organization
designated by the state under 23 U.S.C. 450 to qualify for federal
transportation funding, and is located in two or more counties, those counties
may establish a single transportation region. The region must include the
entire area of the participating counties, except that a county need not be a
member if that county and at least two other member counties of the
metropolitan planning organization agree that the county need not be included
in the transportation region.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) If a county
legislative authority proposes to establish a transportation region it shall
call for a conference. An elected representative from each city within the
county and one elected official from the county legislative authority must
attend the conference. The county shall appoint a representative. The county
legislative authority calling the conference shall also invite a local elected
official from any public transportation and high-capacity transportation
agencies providing service within the county, an elected representative from a
port providing service within the county, and a representative of the
department of transportation. The conference is for the purpose of evaluating
the need for and the desirability of creating a transportation region. In
those counties where the metropolitan region extends beyond one county, or upon
a finding by more than one legislative authority of an abutting county that a
multicounty transportation region may be desirable, a multicounty conference
must be convened according to the process set forth in section 5 of this act.

(2) After the
conference, the county legislative authority shall conduct at least one public
hearing. The time and place of the hearing must be specified in a notice
published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the
proposed region, not less than ten days before the hearing. This notice is in
addition to any other notice required by law to be published. The notice must
specify the functions or activities proposed to be provided or funded by the
region. Additional notice of the hearing may be given by mail, posting within
the proposed region, or in any manner the county legislative authority deems
necessary to notify affected persons. All hearings must be public, and the
county legislative authority, and other elected officials who attended the
conference, shall conduct and attend the public hearing to seek comment from
any person affected by the formation of the region.

(3) After the
conference under subsection (1) of this section and the hearing held under
subsection (2) of this section, the county legislative authority may establish
a transportation region if: (a) The county legislative authority finds the
action to be in the public interest; (b) it adopts an ordinance or resolution
providing for the establishment of the region; (c) sixty percent of the cities
within the region representing a minimum of seventy-five percent of the cities'
and towns' population, by action of the cities' and towns' legislative authorities,
approve formation of the region; and (d) the governor approves the formation.

(4) The process for
forming a transportation region under this section may be terminated at any
time before the county legislative authority establishes a transportation
region upon the filing with the county auditor of a verified declaration of
termination signed by a majority of the registered voters of the county.

(5) The legislation
establishing a transportation region must specify the form of governance for
the region, as provided in section 6 of this act, and the functions or
activities to be exercised or funded.

(6) The governing body
of a transportation region may expand or otherwise modify the functions of, or
dissolve the transportation region, after providing notice and conducting a
public hearing or hearings in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this
section. In order for this action to be effective:

(a) The county
legislative authority must find the action to be in the public interest;

(b) Sixty percent of
the cities within the region representing a minimum of seventy-five percent of
the cities' and towns' population, by action of the cities' and towns'
legislative authorities, must approve the action;

(c) The governing body
must adopt a resolution providing for the action; and

(d) The governor must
approve the action.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) If two or more
counties propose to establish a transportation region, they shall call for a
joint conference. An elected representative from each city within each county
and one elected official from the county legislative authority of each county must
attend the conference. The county legislative authorities calling the
conference shall also invite a local elected official from any public
transportation and high-capacity transportation agency providing service within
the counties, an elected representative from a port providing service within
each of the counties, and a representative of the department of
transportation. The conference is for the purpose of evaluating the need for
and the desirability of creation of a transportation region.

(2) After the
conference, each county legislative authority shall conduct at least one public
hearing within its county. The time and place of the hearing must be specified
in a notice published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation
within the proposed region, not less than ten days before the hearing. This
notice is in addition to any other notice required by law to be published. The
notice must specify the functions or activities proposed to be provided or
funded by the region. Additional notice of the hearing may be given by mail,
posting within the proposed region, or in any manner the county legislative
authority deems necessary to notify affected persons. All hearings must be
public, and the county legislative authority and other elected officials from
that county who attended the conference shall conduct and attend the public
hearing to seek comment from any person affected by the formation of the
region.

(3) After the
conference under subsection (1) of this section and the hearing held under
subsection (2) of this section, the county legislative authority may establish
a transportation region if: (a) The county legislative authority of each
county finds the action to be in the public interest; (b) each county adopts an
ordinance or resolution providing for the establishment of the region; (c)
sixty percent of the cities within the region representing a minimum of
seventy-five percent of the cities' and towns' population, by action of the
cities' and towns' legislative authorities, approve formation of the region;
and (d) the governor approves the formation.

(4) The process for
including a county in the formation of a transportation region under this
section may be terminated at any time before the county legislative authority
establishes that county as a part of a transportation region upon the filing of
a verified declaration of termination signed by a majority of the registered
voters of the county.

(5) The legislation
establishing a transportation region must specify the form of governance for
the region, as provided in section 6 of this act, and the functions or
activities to be exercised or funded.

(6) The governing body
of a transportation region may expand or otherwise modify the functions of, or
dissolve the transportation region, after providing notice and conducting a
public hearing or hearings in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this
section. In order for this action to be effective:

(a) The county
legislative authority of each county must find the action to be in the public
interest;

(b) Sixty percent of
the cities within the region representing a minimum of seventy-five percent of
the cities' and towns' population, by action of the cities' and towns'
legislative authorities, must approve the action;

(c) The governing body
must adopt a resolution providing for the action; and

(d) The governor must
approve the action.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. If a transportation
region is to be established, the county legislative authority shall select the form
of governance for the transportation region, which may be one of the two
following alternatives:

(1) A directly elected
governing body, which may be the county legislative authority acting ex officio
and independently, and subject to the requirements of section 7 of this act, or
an independently elected body, as recommended by the conference provided for in
section 4 of this act. If the transportation region is more than one county,
the governing body must consist of a directly elected body representing each
county, which for each county may be the county legislative authority acting ex
officio and independently, with votes weighted according to each county's
population as a proportion of the entire transportation region, or an
independently elected body representing the multicounty transportation region;
or

(2) An appointed
governing body made up of elected officials from cities, members of governing
bodies of public transportation and high-capacity transportation systems
providing service within the county, elected officials from each member county,
and a representative from the department of transportation, appointed by the
secretary of transportation. The county executive shall make all other
appointments to the regional governing body, and if the county does not have an
elected county executive, the county legislative authority shall make the
appointments. If the transportation region is more than one county, the
respective appointing authorities from each county shall make the appointments
of local elected officials. Representatives must be roughly proportionate to
population and reflect the relative population of incorporated and
unincorporated areas of the region. Representatives from public ports may also
be included, as may others as deemed appropriate by the appointing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. If the county legislative
authority, acting ex officio and independently, is to act as the governing body
for a transportation district, a council must be created. The conference
provided for in section 4 of this act must specify the number and type of
appointments to the council. However, the council must include elected
officials from cities, members of governing bodies of public transportation and
high-capacity transportation providers within the county, elected officials
from each member county, and a representative from the state department of
transportation. Representatives from public ports may also be included, as may
others as deemed appropriate by the conference.

The council shall
prioritize the use of designated funds for the transportation region for
expenditure on regionally significant transportation facilities and services.
The county legislative authority, acting as an ex officio governing authority
for the transportation district, may only approve or disapprove, in its
entirety, the funding for the list of projects and services recommended by the
council.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) The transportation
region shall prioritize the use of designated funds for expenditure on
regionally significant transportation facilities and services. These funds
include federal funds authorized by federal law and state agreement, state
funds authorized by state law, and revenues from regionally imposed tax
sources.

(2) The region shall
develop criteria for project selection. These criteria must be based upon
appropriate transportation improvement benchmarks governing congestion relief,
safety, mobility, and freight mobility. The region shall select projects that
maximize the attainment of these state transportation improvement benchmarks,
and shall measure performance toward achievement of the benchmarks.

(3) The region shall
develop, or cause to be developed, through contract with local agencies or the
state department of transportation, new, or improvements to, regionally
significant transportation facilities and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A transportation region
may assume the responsibilities of a metropolitan planning organization or
regional transportation planning organization within its boundaries. If those
responsibilities are assumed, the region shall:

(1) Prepare and
periodically update a transportation strategy for the region. The strategy
must address alternative transportation modes and transportation demand
management measures in regional corridors and recommend preferred
transportation policies to implement adopted growth strategies. The strategy
will serve as a guide in preparing the regional transportation plan;

(2) Prepare a regional
transportation plan as set forth in RCW 47.80.030 that is consistent with
countywide planning policies adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, with county,
city, and town comprehensive plans, and state transportation plans;

(3) Certify that the
transportation elements of comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities, and
towns within the region reflect the guidelines and principles developed under
RCW 47.80.026, are consistent with the adopted regional transportation plan,
and, where appropriate, conform with the requirements of RCW 36.70A.070;

(4) Where appropriate,
certify that countywide planning policies adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 and the
adopted regional transportation plan are consistent;

(5) Develop, in
cooperation with the department of transportation, operators of public
transportation services, and local governments within the region, a six-year
regional transportation improvement program that proposes regionally
significant transportation projects and programs and transportation demand
management measures. The regional transportation improvement program must be
based on the programs, projects, and transportation demand management measures
of regional significance as identified by the transportation region, with the
assistance of transit agencies, cities, counties, and the state under RCW
35.58.2795, 35.77.010, and 36.81.121, and chapter 47.05 RCW respectively. The
program must include a priority list of projects and programs, project segments
and programs, transportation demand management measures, and a specific
financial plan that demonstrates how the transportation improvement program,
and specifically, regionally significant transportation facilities and
services, can be funded. The region shall update the program upon assumption
of the planning duties of a regional transportation planning organization and
at least every two years for the ensuing six-year period;

(6) Be, or designate, a
lead planning agency to coordinate preparation of the regional transportation
plan and carry out the other responsibilities of the organization. The lead
planning agency may be a regional organization, a component county, city, or
town agency, or the appropriate department of transportation regional office;

(7) Review level of
service methodologies used by cities and counties planning under chapter 36.70A
RCW to promote a consistent regional evaluation of transportation facilities
and corridors; and

(8) Work with cities,
counties, transit agencies, the department of transportation, and others to
develop level of service standards or alternative transportation performance
measures.

The region shall use
those transportation plans existing as of the date of assumption of its
planning duties until the region updates those plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A transportation region
is a body corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be
specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the authority
to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to acquire,
hold, and dispose of real and personal property, and to sue and be sued. All
projects constructed by a transportation region under this chapter must be
competitively bid and contracted.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Notwithstanding RCW
39.36.020(1), a transportation region may at any time contract indebtedness or
borrow money for the region's purposes and may issue general obligation bonds
in an amount not exceeding, together with any existing indebtedness of the
region not authorized by the voters, one and one-half percent of the value of
the taxable property within the boundaries of the region; and with the assent
of three-fifths of the region's voters voting at an election called for that
purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money for the region's purposes
and may issue general obligation bonds therefor, as long as the total
indebtedness of the region does not exceed five percent of the value of the
taxable property in it. The bonds must be issued and sold in accordance with
chapter 39.46 RCW.

The term "value of
the taxable property" has the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) A transportation
region may issue revenue bonds to provide funds to carry out its authorized
functions without submitting the matter to the voters of the region. The
region shall create a special fund or funds for the sole purpose of paying the
principal of and interest on the bonds of each such issue, into which fund or
funds the region may obligate itself to pay such amounts of the gross revenue
of the regionally significant transportation facilities or services
constructed, acquired, improved, added to, or repaired out of the proceeds of
sale of the bonds, as the region determines and may obligate the region to pay
such amounts out of otherwise unpledged revenue that may be derived from the
ownership, use, or operation of properties or facilities owned, used, or
operated incident to the performance of the authorized function for which the
bonds are issued or out of otherwise unpledged fees, tolls, charges, tariffs,
fares, rentals, special taxes, or other sources of payment lawfully authorized
for that purpose, as the region determines. The principal of, and interest on,
the bonds is payable only out of the special fund or funds, and the owners of
the bonds have a lien and charge against the gross revenue of fees, tolls,
charges, tariffs, fares, special taxes, or other authorized sources pledged to
the payment of the bonds. The revenue bonds issued against the fund or funds
and the interest on the bonds is a valid claim of the bondowners only as
against the fund or funds and the revenue pledged therefor, and is not a
general indebtedness of the region.

(2) Notwithstanding
subsection (1) of this section, the bonds may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A transportation region
may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A transportation region
may exercise the power of eminent domain within its boundaries to obtain
property for its authorized purposes in the manner cities exercise the powers
of eminent domain under chapter 8.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. If a transportation
region is formed, there must be created in the office of the county treasurer,
as ex officio treasurer of the transportation region, a transportation region
fund. The fund must have such accounts as the treasurer may find convenient or
as the state auditor or the governing body of the transportation region may
direct. The region shall deposit all revenues received by or on behalf of the
transportation region from tax levies, gifts, donations, and any other source
into the transportation region fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. The rule of strict
construction does not apply to this chapter, and this chapter must be liberally
construed to permit the accomplishment of its purposes.

Sec. 17. RCW 47.80.020 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby
authorizes creation of regional transportation planning organizations within
the state. Each regional transportation planning organization shall be formed
through the voluntary association of local governments within a county, or
within geographically contiguous counties. Each organization shall:

(1) Encompass at least
one complete county;

(2) Have a population
of at least one hundred thousand, or contain a minimum of three counties,
except that the minimum number of counties will be reduced by the number of
counties that withdraw to form a transportation region authorized in section 3
of this act; and

(3) Have as members all
counties within the region, and at least sixty percent of the cities and towns
within the region representing a minimum of seventy-five percent of the cities'
and towns' population.

The state department of
transportation must verify that each regional transportation planning
organization conforms with the requirements of this section.

In urbanized areas, the
regional transportation planning organization is the same as the metropolitan
planning organization designated for federal transportation planning purposes.

Sec. 18. RCW 47.80.023 and 1998 c
171 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Each regional
transportation planning organization shall have the following duties:

(1) Prepare and
periodically update a transportation strategy for the region. The strategy
shall address alternative transportation modes and transportation demand
management measures in regional corridors and shall recommend preferred
transportation policies to implement adopted growth strategies. The strategy
shall serve as a guide in preparation of the regional transportation plan.

(2) Prepare a regional
transportation plan as set forth in RCW 47.80.030 that is consistent with
countywide planning policies if such have been adopted pursuant to chapter
36.70A RCW, with county, city, and town comprehensive plans, and state
transportation plans.

(3) Certify by December
31, 1996, that the transportation elements of comprehensive plans adopted by
counties, cities, and towns within the region reflect the guidelines and
principles developed pursuant to RCW 47.80.026, are consistent with the adopted
regional transportation plan, and, where appropriate, conform with the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.070.

(4) Where appropriate,
certify that countywide planning policies adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 and the
adopted regional transportation plan are consistent.

(5) Develop, in
cooperation with the department of transportation, operators of public
transportation services and local governments within the region, a six-year
regional transportation improvement program which proposes regionally
significant transportation projects and programs and transportation demand
management measures. The regional transportation improvement program shall be
based on the programs, projects, and transportation demand management measures
of regional significance as identified by transit agencies, cities, and
counties pursuant to RCW 35.58.2795, 35.77.010, and 36.81.121, respectively.
The program shall include a priority list of projects and programs, project
segments and programs, transportation demand management measures, and a
specific financial plan that demonstrates how the transportation improvement
program can be funded. The program shall be updated at least every two years
for the ensuing six-year period.

(6) Designate a lead
planning agency to coordinate preparation of the regional transportation plan
and carry out the other responsibilities of the organization. The lead
planning agency may be a regional organization, a component county, city, or
town agency, or the appropriate Washington state department of transportation
district office.

(7) Review level of
service methodologies used by cities and counties planning under chapter 36.70A
RCW to promote a consistent regional evaluation of transportation facilities
and corridors.

(8) Work with cities,
counties, transit agencies, the department of transportation, transportation
regions authorized in section 3 of this act, and others to develop level of
service standards or alternative transportation performance measures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. Sections 1 through 16 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---