BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that it is in the public interest to ensure an equitable allocation of new
transportation revenues among regions of the state. It is further in the
public interest to ensure that each area of the state: (1) Has sufficient
funds to ensure adequate preservation, safety, and maintenance of existing
facilities and services; (2) is assured of receiving back a minimum proportion
of revenue that it contributes to overall state transportation revenue
collections; and (3) retains all funds generated from locally imposed revenue
sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The revenue
provided by any newly initiated sources of revenue for state transportation
programs, or increased rates for existing revenue sources, provided for after
January 1, 2001, must be distributed under this section. For the purposes of
this section, "existing revenue sources" means moneys that accrue to
the motor vehicle fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax, combined
licensing fees, vehicle license fees, gross weight fees, ferry toll revenues,
and truck surcharges.

(a) There must be a
statewide distribution among regions of the state to ensure that there are
sufficient funds in each region for basic operations, maintenance,
preservation, and safety of transportation services including transit, ferry
operations, city streets, county roads, and state highways at a minimum level
defined by the transportation commission. The commission shall develop this
defined minimum level in cooperation with the association of Washington cities
and the Washington association of counties.

(b) After the
distributions in (a) of this subsection, the funds remaining must be
distributed to regions at a minimum return rate of eighty-five percent of the
funds generated by each region.

(c) Any funds remaining
after the distributions made under (b) of this subsection are an equalization
fund and must be used for distributions to regions that are receiving a lesser
amount of funds than they generate.

(2) The transportation
commission shall work with the association of Washington cities and the
Washington association of counties to define transportation regions within the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The transportation
commission shall submit the minimum level criteria and the definition of
regions developed by it under section 2 of this act to the legislature by
January 15, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation. If approved by a majority of those voting at the
November 2001 general election, this act takes effect January 1, 2002.

---
END ---