BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall develop a formula for the distribution of federal pass-through funds that
directs funds on a geographic basis to counties and cities within counties, and
takes into account lane miles, classification and pavement type, population,
and usage, and is adjusted for changes in road jurisdiction at least once every
five years.

(2) The department
shall develop a method for joint regional programming of federal funds, with
the state, local jurisdictions, transit agencies, and other stakeholders
participating in a regional prioritization process that directs federal funds
to major corridors and facility clusters.

(3) Federal transportation
funds must be managed only by jurisdictions and agencies that are
"certification accepted."

(4) The
department shall create one-stop grant funding centers where all competitive
funds, whether federal or state, are disbursed under regional priority
programming agreements and administered using a single application process.

--- END ---