BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that emerging technologies can assist in optimizing the state's large, complex,
and increasingly congested transportation system. Traffic system management
(TSM) and intelligent transportation systems (ITS) are designed to add capacity
without requiring major new infrastructure additions.

The legislature intends
that funding be provided to projects and programs that provide cost-effective
means of relieving congestion. The projects and programs may include, but are
not limited to, freeway ramp metering, signal synchronization, patrols
dedicated to removal of disabled vehicles from roadways, and highway messaging
signs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.05 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
not spend more than five percent of funds from the improvement program for
intelligent transportation systems (ITS) and traffic system management (TSM)
projects and programs that improve system performance and capacity. The
projects and programs may include, but are not limited to, the following:
Traffic and incident management, which includes freeway on-ramp metering;
signal synchronization; intersection modification; priority treatment for
high-occupancy and transit vehicles; and roving service patrols designed to
quickly remove disabled vehicles from roadways. Projects and programs selected
for funding under this section must undergo a benefit/cost analysis that yields
benefits greater than one to one.

By December 1st of each
year the department must report to the office of financial management and the
legislature on the amount of funds spent on intelligent transportation systems
and traffic systems projects and programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---