BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that portions of Washington's transportation system are choked with traffic
congestion. Local jurisdictions should be provided tools to effectively manage
local congestion. One such tool is the creation of congestion relief districts
that could use locally imposed taxes or user fees to fund congestion choke
points, new capacity, or technology solutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The county legislative
authority of a county with a population of forty thousand or more shall, and
the legislative authority of any other county may, within ninety days of the
effective date of this act, and as often thereafter as it deems necessary, and
upon thirty days prior written notice addressed to the legislative body of each
city within the county and with thirty days public notice, convene a congestion
relief conference. One elected representative selected by the legislative body
of each city within the county and one selected by the county legislative
authority shall attend the conference. The conference shall evaluate the need
for and the desirability of the creation of a congestion relief district within
certain incorporated and unincorporated portions of the county. In those
counties where county officials believe the need for congestion relief extends
across county boundaries so as to provide congestion relief in a metropolitan
area, the county legislative authorities of two or more neighboring counties
may convene a multicounty conference. In addition, countywide conferences may
be convened by resolution of the legislative bodies of two or more cities
within the county, not to exceed one in any twelve-month period, or by a
petition signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters in the last
general election of the city, county, or city/county areas of a proposed relief
district. The chair of the conference must be elected from the members at
large.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A conference that finds
it desirable to establish a congestion relief district or change the boundaries
of an existing congestion relief district shall fix a date for a public hearing
on the issue, or the legislative bodies of any two or more component cities or
the county legislative authority by resolution may require the congestion
relief conference to fix a date for a public hearing on the issue. Before
convening the public hearing, the county legislative authority shall delineate
the area of the county proposed to be included within the congestion relief
area and shall furnish a copy of the delineation to each incorporated city
within the area. Each city shall advise the county legislative authority, on a
preliminary basis, of its desire to be included or excluded from the congestion
relief district. The county legislative authority shall cause the delineations
to be revised to reflect the wishes of the incorporated cities. The conference
shall consider this delineation at the public hearing for inclusion in the
congestion relief district.

Notice of the hearing
must be published once a week for at least four consecutive weeks in one or
more newspapers of general circulation within the area. The notice must
contain a description and map of the boundaries of the proposed congestion
relief district and state the time and place of the hearing and the fact that
any changes in the boundaries of the congestion relief district will be
considered at that time and place. At the hearing or any continuation of it,
any interested person may appear and be heard on all matters relating to the
effect of the formation of the proposed congestion relief district.

The conference may make
such changes in the boundaries of the congestion relief district as it deems
reasonable and proper, but may not delete any portion of the proposed area that
would create an island of included or excluded lands, and may not delete a
portion of a city. If the conference determines that additional territory
should be included in the congestion relief district, it must hold a second
hearing and give notice in the same manner as for the original hearing. The
conference may adjourn the hearing on the formation of a congestion relief
district from time to time, not exceeding thirty days in all.

After the conclusion of
the hearing the conference shall adopt a resolution fixing the boundaries of
the proposed congestion relief district, declaring that the formation of the
proposed congestion relief district will be conducive to the welfare and
benefit of the persons and property in it.

Within thirty days
after the adoption of the conference resolution, the county legislative
authority of each county in which a conference has established proposed
boundaries of a congestion relief district, may by resolution, upon making a
legislative finding that the proposed relief district includes portions of the
county that could not be reasonably expected to benefit from the relief
district or excludes portions of the county that could be reasonably expected
to benefit from its creation, disapprove and terminate the establishment of the
congestion relief district within the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. When it is formed, a
congestion relief district may not include only a part of a city, and every
city must be either wholly included or wholly excluded from the boundaries of
the district. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if after the
formation of a congestion relief district additional area became or will become
a part of a component city by annexation, merger, or otherwise, the additional
area is included within the boundaries of the congestion relief district and is
subject to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations of the congestion
relief district. The component city shall notify the congestion relief
district at the time the city has added the additional area. Furthermore,
notwithstanding any other provision of law except as specifically provided in
this section, if a city that is not a component city of the congestion relief
district adds area to its boundaries that is within the boundaries of the
congestion relief district, the area so added is excluded from the congestion
relief district. The city shall notify the congestion relief district of the
city's intention to add the area. If a city extends its boundaries through
annexation across a county boundary line and the extended boundaries include
areas within a congestion relief district, then the entire area of the city
within the county that is within the congestion relief district is included within
the congestion relief district boundaries. The area of the city in the
congestion relief district is considered a component city of the congestion
relief district corporation.

The boundaries of a
congestion relief district must follow school district lines or election
precinct lines, as far as practicable. Only areas that the conference
determines could reasonably benefit from congestion relief funding may be
included in a district. Only one congestion relief district may be created in
a county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Within sixty days after
the establishment of the boundaries of the congestion relief district the
members of the county legislative authority and the elected representative of
each city within the area shall provide for the selection of the governing body
of the district. The governing body will be known as a congestion relief
district authority, consisting of elected officials selected by and serving at
the pleasure of the governing bodies of component cities within the area and
the county legislative authority of each county within the area.

Within the sixty-day
period, any city may by resolution of its legislative body withdraw from
participation in the congestion relief district. The county legislative
authority and each city remaining in the congestion relief district may
disapprove and prevent the establishment of a governing body of a congestion
relief district if the composition of the governing body does not meet its
approval.

The governing body of a
single-county congestion relief district may not exceed nine members and in
the case of a multicounty district, fifteen members. Each city within the
congestion relief district that is excluded from direct membership on the
authority may designate a member of the authority to represent the interests of
the city. The legislative body of the city shall notify the authority of its
authorized representative on the authority.

Each member of the
authority may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and receive compensation, as set by resolution of the
authority, in an amount not to exceed seventy dollars for each day during which
the member attends official meetings of the authority or performs prescribed
duties approved by the chair of the authority. In no event may a member be
compensated in any year for more than seventy-five days, except the chair, who
may be paid compensation for not more than one hundred days. An elected
official or employee of federal, state, or local government who is receiving
regular full-time compensation from that government for attending meetings and
performing prescribed duties of the authority may not receive further
compensation from the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. After a congestion relief
district has been in existence for four years, members of the county
legislative authority and the elected representative of each city within the
congestion relief district shall review the composition of the governing body
of the benefit area and change the composition of the governing body if the
change is deemed appropriate. The review must be at a meeting of the
designated representatives of the component county and cities, and the majority
of those present constitute a quorum at the meeting. The chief administrative
officer of the congestion relief district authority shall give twenty days'
notice of the meeting. After the initial review, a review must be held every
four years.

If an area having a
population greater than fifteen percent, or areas with a combined population of
greater than twenty-five percent, of the population of the existing congestion
relief district as constituted at the last review meeting, annex to the
congestion relief district, the representatives of the component county and
cities shall meet within ninety days to review and change the composition of
the governing body, if the change is deemed appropriate. This meeting is in
addition to the regular four-year review meeting and must be conducted under
the same notice requirement and quorum provisions of the regular review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The congestion relief
district authority shall develop a comprehensive congestion relief plan for the
area. The plan must include, but not be limited to the following elements:

(1) A benchmark level
of congestion reduction for the district;

(2) The local funding
requirements that in addition to available state and federal funds are
necessary to meet the congestion reduction goal; and

(3) The mechanisms for
obtaining that local funding, which must primarily focus on roadway user fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. In addition to the powers
specifically granted by this chapter a congestion relief district has all
powers that are necessary to carry out the purposes of the congestion relief
district. Those powers include:

(1) Authority to
propose ballot measures for a vote by the population of the congestion relief
district for user fees for roadways within the congestion relief district;

(2) Authority to sue
and be sued in its corporate capacity in all courts and in all proceedings;

(3) Authority to
contract with the United States or an agency thereof, a state or agency
thereof, another congestion relief district, a public transportation benefit
area, a county, city, metropolitan municipal corporation, special district, or
governmental agency, inside or outside the state, and a private person, firm,
or corporation for the purpose of receiving gifts or grants or securing loans
or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility studies, or for the
design, construction, operation, or improvement of transportation facilities.
In addition, a congestion relief district may contract with a governmental
agency or with a private person, firm, or corporation for the use by either
contracting party of all or part of the facilities, structures, lands,
interests in lands, air rights over lands, and rights of way of all kinds that
are owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the purpose of planning,
constructing, improving, or operating a facility or performing a service that
the congestion relief district authority area may operate or perform, on such
terms as agreed upon by the contracting parties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. Sections 1 through 8 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

---
END ---