BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.79.090 and 1988 c
26 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon receipt of a
county's revised six-year program, the board as soon as practicable shall review
and may revise the construction program as it relates to rural arterials and
the construction of replacement bridges funded by the federal bridge
replacement program on access roads in rural areas for which rural arterial
trust account moneys are requested as necessary to conform to (1) the priority
rating of the proposed project, based upon the factors in RCW 36.79.080, in
relation to proposed projects in all other rural arterial construction programs
submitted by the counties and within each region; and (2) the amount of rural
arterial trust account funds that the board estimates will be apportioned to
the region.

Counties shall
include in their six-year program submittal to the board, documentation
addressing the environmental mitigation actions needed for each individual
project, specifying the amounts to be spent on the environmental permitting
process and the actual mitigation action.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.68.090 and 1999 c
269 s 2 and 1999 c 94 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All moneys that
have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the motor vehicle
fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be first expended for purposes enumerated
in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be
distributed monthly by the state treasurer in the proportions set forth in (c)
through (l) of this subsection.

(a) For payment of
refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax that has been paid and
is refundable as provided by law;

(b) For payment of
amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative
expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department
of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the motor
vehicle fuel tax and the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed
monthly;

(c) For distribution to
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 44.387 percent to be expended for
highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;

(d) For distribution to
the special category C account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an
amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special category C projects.
Special category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost
only, will require bond financing to complete construction.

The following criteria,
listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining which special
category C projects have the highest priority:

(i) Accident
experience;

(ii) Fatal accident
experience;

(iii) Capacity to move
people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and

(iv) Continuity of
development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys deposited in the
special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of
debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special
category C projects under this subsection (1)(d);

(e) For distribution to
the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to 2.3283 percent;

(f) For distribution to
the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 2.3726 percent;

(g) For distribution to
the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
7.5597 percent;

(h) For distribution to
the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;

(i) For distribution to
the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961
percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(j) For distribution to
the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent:
(i) Out of which there shall be distributed from time to time, as directed by
the department of transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to the
county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed monthly
as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW 46.68.120;

(k) For distribution to
the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds shall be distributed by
the county road administration board to counties in proportions corresponding
to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety,
and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road administration
board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this
program ((and)) to assure that a pavement management system is used,
and that environmental mitigation actions applied to county road projects are
cost-effective and, at a minimum, are presented to the board as a percentage of
overall project costs;

(l) For distribution to
the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.

(2) Nothing in this
section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or
conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter
authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid
from any excise taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.26 RCW to read as follows:

If a city
or county is to be considered by the transportation improvement board for
funding under this chapter, the city or county must include in its application
submittal, documentation addressing the environmental mitigation actions needed
for the project to be considered, specifying the amounts to be spent on the
environmental permitting process and the actual mitigation action.

---
END ---