BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that roads, streets, bridges, and highways in the state represent public assets
worth over one hundred billion dollars. These investments require regular
maintenance and preservation, or rehabilitation, to provide cost-effective
transportation services. Many of these facilities are in poor condition.
Given the magnitude of public investment and the importance of safe, reliable
roadways to the motoring public, the legislature intends to create stronger
accountability to ensure that cost-effective maintenance and preservation is
provided for these transportation facilities.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.84.060 and 1969
ex.s. c 281 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Every municipal
corporation which owns or operates an urban public transportation system as
defined in RCW 47.04.082 within its corporate limits, may acquire, construct,
extend, own, or operate such urban public transportation system to any
point or points not to exceed fifteen miles outside of its corporate limits:
PROVIDED, That no municipal corporation shall extend its urban public
transportation system beyond its corporate limits to operate in any territory
already served by a privately operated auto transportation company holding a
certificate of public convenience and necessity from the utilities and
transportation commission.

As a condition of
receiving state funding, the municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance
management plan for certification by the transportation commission or its
successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system assets
within the direction and control of the municipality, and provide a
preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 36.56 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of receiving
state funding, a county that has assumed the transportation functions of a
metropolitan municipal corporation shall submit a maintenance and preservation
management plan for certification by the transportation commission or its
successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system assets
within the direction and control of the county, and provide a preservation plan
based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 36.57A RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a public transportation benefit area authority shall
submit a maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the
transportation commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all
transportation system assets within the direction and control of the authority,
and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

No later than June 30,
2004, cities and towns shall provide to the transportation commission, or its
successor entity, preservation rating information on at least seventy percent
of the total city and town arterial network. Thereafter, the preservation
rating information requirement shall increase in five percent increments in
subsequent biennia. The rating system used by cities and towns must be based
upon the Washington state pavement rating method or an equivalent standard
approved by the transportation commission or its successor entity.

Sec. 6. RCW 47.06.050 and 1993 c
446 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-owned
facilities component of the statewide transportation plan shall consist of:

(1) The state highway
system plan, which identifies program and financing needs and recommends
specific and financially realistic improvements to preserve the structural
integrity of the state highway system, ensure acceptable operating conditions,
and provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and cultural
resources. The state highway system plan shall contain the following elements:

(a) A system
preservation element, which shall establish structural preservation objectives
for the state highway system including bridges, identify current and future
structural deficiencies based upon analysis of current conditions and projected
future deterioration, and recommend program funding levels and specific actions
necessary to preserve the structural integrity of the state highway system
consistent with adopted objectives. Lowest life cycle cost methodologies
must be used in developing a pavement management system. This element
shall serve as the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway
program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(b) A highway
maintenance element, establishing service levels for highway maintenance on
state-owned highways that meet benchmarks established by the transportation
commission. The highway maintenance element must include an estimate of costs
for achieving those service levels over twenty years. This element will serve
as the basis for the maintenance component of the six-year highway program and
the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(c) A capacity
and operational improvement element, which shall establish operational
objectives, including safety considerations, for moving people and goods on the
state highway system, identify current and future capacity, operational, and
safety deficiencies, and recommend program funding levels and specific
improvements and strategies necessary to achieve the operational objectives.
In developing capacity and operational improvement plans the department shall
first assess strategies to enhance the operational efficiency of the existing
system before recommending system expansion. Strategies to enhance the
operational efficiencies include but are not limited to access management, transportation
system management, demand management, and high-occupancy vehicle facilities.
The capacity and operational improvement element must conform to the state
implementation plan for air quality and be consistent with regional
transportation plans adopted under chapter 47.80 RCW, and shall serve as the
basis for the capacity and operational improvement portions of the six-year
highway program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(((c))) (d)
A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall identify and recommend
designation of scenic and recreational highways, provide for enhanced access to
scenic, recreational, and cultural resources associated with designated routes,
and recommend a variety of management strategies to protect, preserve, and
enhance these resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or federal
agencies shall jointly develop this element;

(((d))) (e)
A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of nonmotorized
transportation modes on the state transportation systems and provide the basis
for the investment of state transportation funds in paths and trails, including
funding provided under chapter 47.30 RCW.

(2) The state ferry
system plan, which shall guide capital and operating investments in the state
ferry system. The plan shall establish service objectives for state ferry
routes, forecast travel demand for the various markets served in the system, ((and))
develop strategies for ferry system investment that consider regional and
statewide vehicle and passenger needs, support local land use plans, and assure
that ferry services are fully integrated with other transportation services. The
plan must provide for maintenance of capital assets. The plan must also
provide for preservation of capital assets based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies. The plan shall assess the role of private ferries operating
under the authority of the utilities and transportation commission and shall
coordinate ferry system capital and operational plans with these private
operations. The ferry system plan must be consistent with the regional
transportation plans for areas served by the state ferry system, and shall be
developed in conjunction with the ferry advisory committees.

Sec. 7. RCW 47.06.090 and 1993 c
446 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-interest
component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan shall include an
intercity passenger rail plan, which shall analyze existing intercity passenger
rail service and recommend improvements to that service under the state
passenger rail service program including depot improvements, potential service
extensions, and ways to achieve higher train speeds.

For purposes of
maintaining and preserving any state-owned component of the state's passenger
rail program, the statewide multimodal transportation plan must identify all
such assets and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of
receiving state funding, a regional transit authority shall submit a
maintenance and preservation management plan for certification by the
transportation commission or its successor entity. The plan must inventory all
transportation system assets within the direction and control of the transit
authority, and provide a plan for preservation of assets based on lowest life
cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 36.78 RCW to read as follows:

The board
shall establish a standard of good practice for maintenance of transportation
system assets. This standard must be implemented by all counties no later than
December 31, 2007. The board shall develop a model maintenance management
system for use by counties. The board shall develop rules to assist the
counties in the implementation of this system. Counties shall annually submit
their maintenance plans to the board. The board shall compile the county data
regarding maintenance management and annually submit it to the transportation
commission or its successor entity.

---
END ---