BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND
FINDINGS.
The legislature finds that the public health and safety of its citizens,
natural resources, and the environment are vital interests of the state that
need to be protected and preserved. The legislature further finds that the
safety of the traveling public and the state's economic well-being are vital
interests that depend upon the development of cost-effective and efficient
transportation systems planned, designed, constructed, and maintained through
expedited permit decision-making processes.

It is the intent of the
legislature to achieve transportation permit reform to expedite the delivery of
statewide significant transportation projects through a streamlined approach to
environmental permit decision making while improving environmental benefits through
a watershed‑based approach to aquatic and natural resource management.
In order to optimize the limited resources available for transportation system
improvements and environmental protection, state regulatory and natural
resource agencies, public and private sector interests, Indian tribes, and the
department of transportation must work cooperatively to establish common goals,
minimize project delays, develop consistency in the application of
environmental standards, maximize environmental benefits through coordinated
investment strategies, and eliminate duplicative processes through delegation
of selected permit drafting and compliance activities between state and federal
agencies.

Therefore, the
transportation permit efficiency and accountability committee is created. The
committee must conduct three environmental permit streamlining pilot programs.
The committee must also identify and develop general permits and a programmatic
consultation process. Finally, the committee must explore other permit streamlining
opportunities by designating transportation projects of statewide significance
and selected delegation of permit authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Best
available information" means the existing sources of data, including
limiting factors analyses required under chapter 77.85 RCW that can be used to
make informed decisions regarding environmental conditions within a watershed.

(2) "Best
management practices" means currently available and generally accepted
techniques, including new technologies or strategies that seek to reduce the
negative impacts of transportation facilities, projects, and services on
communities and the environment, and promote more efficient and effective use
of transportation facilities. Examples include transportation demand
management, transportation systems management, and compensatory mitigation.

(3)
"Committee" means the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee created in section 3 of this act.

(4) "General
permit" means a permit that covers a geographic area and applies to a
project activity. A general permit allows actions to proceed without
individual review by each permit decision-making agency.

(5)
"Larger-impacting projects" means projects that are likely to affect
a species or its habitat and must be examined for ways to mitigate or reduce
the impact to avoid harm.

(6) "Least cost planning"
means the use of best available information within a watershed basin applied to
transportation decision making in the planning, permit decision making, and
mitigation phases of a project.

(7) "Low-impact
development project" means an activity or series of actions that conform
to a comprehensive land-use planning and engineering design approach with a
goal of maintaining or restoring existing natural habitat functions and
hydrologic regime of urban and developing watersheds. These projects incorporate
strategic watershed planning with site-specific management techniques to reduce
development impacts to better replicate natural watershed hydrology and water
quality, while allowing for development or infrastructure rehabilitation to
occur.

(8) "One‑stop
permit decision making" means a coordinated permit decision-making process
that streamlines environmental review and permit decision making for
transportation projects by providing concurrent, consolidated review by each
agency required to review the project.

(9) "Programmatic
agreement" means a regulatory instrument that outlines permit conditions
and obligations under which a variety of identified project activities for an
agency program or other actions may be conducted within a watershed or other geographically
defined territory, without the necessity of obtaining individual permits.

(10)
"Transportation project of statewide significance" means a surface
transportation project or combination of surface transportation projects, that
crosses multiple city or county jurisdictional boundaries or connects major
state destinations in support of the state's economy and is so designated by
the department of transportation and approved by the transportation committees
of the senate and house of representatives. The transportation committees of
the senate and house of representatives may also designate such projects. The
pilot projects established in section 4 of this act are examples of
transportation projects of statewide significance, but transportation projects
of statewide significance are not limited to the pilot projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. TRANSPORTATION PERMIT
EFFICIENCY AND ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE‑-CREATED. The transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee is created.

(1) The committee will
consist of fifteen voting members, including two members of the house of
representatives from each of the two largest caucuses and two members of the
senate from each of the two largest caucuses; one member designated by the
secretary of transportation; one member designated by the director of fish and
wildlife; one member designated by the director of ecology; one member
designated by the state commissioner of public lands; one member designated by
the Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission; one member designated by the
Columbia River Intertribal Fisheries Commission; two members appointed by the
state transportation commission or its successor agency, upon consultation with
the Association of Washington Cities and the Washington Association of
Counties, to represent local government interests; one member appointed by the
state transportation commission or its successor agency, upon consultation with
the Consulting Engineers Council of Washington, the Associated General
Contractors of Washington, and the Washington Construction Industry Council, to
represent the construction industry; one member appointed by the state
transportation commission or its successor agency, upon consultation with
statewide environmental organizations, to represent environmental interests;
and one member appointed by the state transportation commission or its
successor agency, upon consultation with the state fish and wildlife
commission, to represent the interests of citizens engaged in fish and wildlife
recovery. The committee shall elect a chair from the four legislators
appointed to the committee.

(2) Representatives
from federal regulatory and transportation agencies, including the
Environmental Protection Agency, National Marine Fisheries Service, Army Corps
of Engineers, Federal Highways Administration, and United States Fish and
Wildlife Service must be invited to participate in committee deliberations as
nonvoting members.

(3) The committee may
create technical subcommittees for the pilot projects designated in section 4
of this act and transportation projects of statewide significance. The
technical subcommittees must include, but are not limited to, representatives
of local governments from jurisdictions that have transportation projects of
statewide significance. Decisions made by the technical subcommittee must be
approved by a majority of the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee.

(4) Nonvoting members
will not be compensated but will receive reimbursement for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) The department of
transportation office of environmental affairs shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. PILOT PROJECTS. (1) It
is the expectation of the legislature that a comprehensive approach to
environmental permit decision making for transportation projects created
between agencies, public and private sector interests, and tribes that focuses
on concise design standards and a commitment to expedited permit decisions will
minimize duplicative and time‑consuming permit processes and achieve a
greater potential for benefit to the environment. Pilot efforts designed to
delegate selected permit drafting and compliance activities to the department
when agreement on standards are achieved and when compliance safeguards are
implemented should be tested. To this end, the legislature directs the
committee to select and conduct three permit reform pilot programs.

(2) The committee must
select one permit reform pilot program that includes a mix of projects from
each of the following geographic areas:

(a) The Translake and I‑405
congestion relief study areas to test the application of permit reform to near
built-out conditions in urban areas within the Cedar‑Sammamish, Duwamish‑Green,
and other applicable adjoining watersheds agreed to by the committee;

(b) Transportation
projects that can be grouped for geographic permit decision making related to
western Washington watersheds and salmon recovery areas for the Willapa, Grays‑Elochoman,
Lewis, Salmon‑Washougal, Wind‑White Salmon, Klickitat, and other
applicable adjoining watersheds agreed to by the committee; and

(c) Transportation
projects that can be grouped for geographic permit decision making related to
eastern Washington watersheds and salmon recovery areas for the Walla Walla,
Middle Snake, Lower Snake, Rock‑Glade, and other applicable adjoining
watersheds agreed to by the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. COMMITTEE‑‑RESPONSIBILITIES
FOR TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS OF STATEWIDE SIGNIFICANCE. (1) The committee and
its authorized technical subcommittees shall develop a one-stop permit
decision-making process that uses interdisciplinary review of transportation
projects of statewide significance to streamline and expedite permit decision
making. The one-stop permitting process must include early review and
coordination between state regulatory agencies and the department in order to
develop common environmental goals and strategies, and minimize subsequent
changes to conditions.

(2) The committee must
use a one-stop permitting process and other components identified in this
chapter to:

(a) Link expedited
permit decision making to best available information for a watershed; and

(b) Link investment
strategy and priorities of the pilot watershed areas with the mitigation needs
of the department along a geographic based approach.

(3) The committee must
use an interdisciplinary permit review approach for each pilot project in order
to:

(a) Provide coordinated
and consolidated review and approval of permit applications;

(b) Provide coordinated
and consolidated public hearings where required by one or more regulatory
agencies under state law;

(c) Establish timelines
for permit decision making;

(d) Allow delegation of
selected permit drafting and compliance activities to the department.

(5) The committee shall
seek federal delegation authorities to the state where appropriate to streamline
permit processes for transportation projects of statewide significance
including: Delegation of section 404 permit authority under the Clean Water
Act; nonfederal lead agency status under the federal Endangered Species Act;
section 106 cultural resource designation under the National Historic
Preservation Act; and other appropriate authority that when delegated should
result in permit streamlining.

(6) The committee shall
develop and prioritize a list of permit streamlining opportunities, specifically
identifying substantive and procedural duplications and suggestions for
resolving those duplications, and standard development needs. Based on the
list of permit streamlining opportunities, the committee shall designate
transportation projects of statewide significance and submit those projects to
the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

(7) The committee must
provide to the legislative authority of each county and city a list of the
projects that the committee has designated as pilot projects or transportation
projects of statewide significance. The committee must also provide each
county and city with a list of projects designated as transportation projects
of statewide significance by the transportation committees of the legislature.

(8) The committee must
provide a summary report to the legislature every six months beginning
September 15, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. COMMITTEE
RESPONSIBILITIES FOR PROGRAMMATIC AGREEMENTS AND GENERAL PERMITS. The
committee shall:

(1) Identify and
develop general permits and programmatic consultation processes for
low-impacting projects and for larger-impacting projects. The committee must
develop general permits for evaluating low-impacting projects in three to six
months from the effective date of this act and for larger-impacting projects in
six to nine months from the effective date of this act. The committee must
develop a programmatic consultation process for low-impacting projects in three
to six months from the effective date of this act and for larger-impacting
projects in six to nine months from the effective date of this act;

(2) Develop and
implement a general permit program. At a minimum this program must require
that decisions on minor variations to the requirements of the general permit or
programmatic conditions must be provided by the permit decision-making agencies
within fifteen business days of submittal; and

(3) Review the
department's construction project list to determine which projects can be
included in programmatic or general permit agreements. The committee shall
develop agreements to cover those projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. GENERAL COMMITTEE
RESPONSIBILITIES. The committee must:

(1) Evaluate the use of
planning and permit decision-making standards that encourage low‑impact
alternatives;

(2) Seek to accelerate
the permit process for projects that use low‑impact development
standards;

(3) Develop preliminary
models and strategies to test how best to maximize the environmental investment
of transportation funds within the framework of sections 1 through 6 of this
act;

(4) Develop a uniform
methodology for the timely and predictable submittal and evaluation of
completed plans and specifications detailing project elements that impact
environmental resources as well as proposed mitigation measures during the
preliminary specifications and engineering phase of project development;

(5) Develop a least‑cost
methodology for analyzing environmental impacts and applying compensatory
mitigation consistent with a watershed-based approach before final design;

(6) Assess models to
collate and access watershed data to support early agency involvement in
transportation planning and reviews under the national Environmental Policy Act
and the State Environmental Policy Act;

(7) In consultation
with the department, identify projects that do not qualify as transportation
projects of statewide significance or for programmatic review or general permit
agreements, and develop a streamlined permit decision-making process for them;

(8) Collaborate with
appropriate agencies and parties to develop concise environmental standards and
best management practices for transportation projects that can be applied with
certainty, consistency, and assurance of swift permit action, while taking into
account the varying climate, geomorphologic, and hydrologic conditions
throughout the state. The standards and best management practices may use
prescriptive or performance standards and must meet all current relevant
federal, state, and local environmental and land use regulations;

(9) Create a
streamlined permit decision-making and consultation process for transportation
projects for section 404 federal Clean Water Act permits and section 10 permits
issued by the United States Army Corps of Engineers, section 401 and 402
permits issued by the department of ecology, shoreline approvals reviewed by
the department of ecology, hydraulic project approvals issued by the department
of fish and wildlife, and any other applicable permit issued for transportation
projects;

(10) Use existing best
available information from watershed planning efforts, lead entities, regional
fisheries enhancement groups, and other recognized entities as deemed
appropriate by the committee, to determine potential mitigation requirements
for projects within a watershed. Priority consideration should be given to the
use of the state's alternative mitigation to best link transportation
mitigation needs with local watershed and lead entity project lists;

(11) Give consideration
to flexible approaches that maximize transportation and environmental
interests;

(12) Work with the
department of ecology to develop a virtual one-stop environmental permitting center
to provide interested parties and citizens with information regarding
environmental permitting requirements; and

(13) Develop a dispute
resolution process to resolve conflicts in interpretation of environmental
standards and best management practices, mitigation requirements, permit
requirements, and other related issues by September 15, 2001. Every effort to
include federal agencies in the dispute resolution process must be made. A
list of ongoing disputed issues must be included in the committee's report to
the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. DEPARTMENT ORGANIZATION
AND ADMINISTRATIVE ACTIONS. The legislature finds that an essential component
of streamlined permit decision making is the ability of the department to
demonstrate the capacity to meet environmental responsibilities. Therefore,
the legislature directs that:

(1) Qualified
environmental staff within the department shall lead the development of all
environmental documentation associated with department projects and permit
activities in accordance with the department's project delivery tools.

(2) The department
shall conduct special prebid meetings for projects that are environmentally
complex. In addition, the department shall review environmental considerations
related to these projects during the preconstruction meeting held with the
contractor who is awarded the bid.

(3) Environmental staff
at the department shall conduct field inspections to ensure that project
activities are performed under permit conditions. These inspectors must:

(a) Have the ability to
issue stop work orders when compliance with permit standards are not being met;

(b) For this portion of
their job duties, be accountable to the director of the office of environmental
services of the department.

(4) Failure to comply
with a stop work order may result in civil penalties being assessed against the
department and individuals involved. Willful violation of a stop work notice
issued by the department is subject to civil penalties assessed on the agency
as well as the individuals involved. Persistent violations by the department
may result in loss of permit drafting and program management responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. TRAINING AND COMPLIANCE.
The legislature expects the department to continue its efforts to improve
training and compliance. The department shall:

(1) Provide training in
environmental procedures and permit requirements for those responsible for
project delivery activities;

(2) Require wetland
mitigation sites to be designed by trained biologist or landscape architects,
qualified by the department of ecology's wetland program. Environmental
mitigation site improvements must have oversight conducted by environmental
staff;

(3) Develop an
environmental compliance data system to track all permit conditions;

(4) Report all
noncompliance activities to applicable agencies of jurisdiction along with a
remedy plan;

(5) Fund the
departments of ecology, natural resources, and fish and wildlife, operating
under their permit-granting authority to conduct audits of the department's
permit drafting and compliance activities. The department of ecology shall
collate the audits in an annual report to the legislature;

(6) Fund dedicated technical
staff at federal permit decision-making entities and the state departments of
ecology, natural resources, community, trade, and economic development, and
fish and wildlife to implement the requirements of this chapter;

(7) Fund a technical
specialist at the Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission and the Columbia River
Intertribal Fisheries Commission for the purpose of implementing this chapter;

(8) Reimburse local
jurisdictions for costs associated with local participation on the committee
and technical subcommittees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Captions used in this act
are not part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. Sections 1 through 10 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

---
END ---