BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares:

It is in the interest
of the state and the traveling public to improve the safety and efficiency of
state highways and bridges as expeditiously as possible. The existing Tacoma
Narrows bridge section of the SR 16 corridor located in Pierce and Kitsap
counties, among others, is a threat to public health and safety because of
congestion and a high number of accidents, injuries, and fatalities. Millions
of dollars are lost annually because of travel delays and accidents that cause
personal and property damage. These conditions are the result of insufficient
capacity, substandard effective lane widths, lack of emergency shoulders, and
no separation of oncoming traffic due to the physical limitation of the
existing bridge.

The SR 16 corridor
provides the only fixed roadway link crossing Puget Sound. SR 16 is classified
as an urban principal arterial and a highway of statewide significance because
it serves substantial statewide and interstate travel. Further, its national
highway system designation as a major strategic highway connector identifies SR
16 as part of the network of highways that is important to the United States
strategic defense policy providing defense access, continuity, and emergency
capabilities for the movement of personnel, materials, and equipment.

The SR 16 corridor is
vital to the economic well-being of Pierce and Kitsap counties and the Olympic
peninsula. SR 16 is a designated state freight corridor, allowing for the
efficient movement of freight, goods, and services to support local, regional,
and state economies.

The public-private
transportation initiatives act, chapter 47.46 RCW, is an important component of
the state's approach to financing and carrying out additions and improvements
to the state transportation system, including improvements to facilities
originally financed under chapter 47.56 RCW. Under chapter 47.46 RCW,
public-private initiative projects are developed according to state and federal
law and other statutorily required processes. The SR 16 corridor project
includes the financing, right-of-way acquisition, design-build construction,
operations, and maintenance of a new suspension bridge at Tacoma Narrows
parallel to the existing bridge and the reconfiguration and seismic
rehabilitation of the current bridge. Roadway improvements will also be made
on SR 16 from and to the approaches to the bridge. Voters in the affected
project area under state law approved the imposition of tolls to pay for these
improvements.

The state highway
systems plan does not provide any other funding solution for this critical
transportation project, other than public-private financing under chapter 47.46
RCW. Under RCW 47.46.040, the project has received regulatory approvals,
rights-of-way have been acquired, necessary preparations for financing have
been made, and a design-build construction price has been determined. There
have been significant state appropriations and private funding advanced to
develop the project. Delays in commencing this project will cause increases in
construction and financing costs and present a clear danger that the state will
not be able to proceed to make these vital transportation improvements. This
will result in a detrimental effect on the safety of its citizens and the
economic welfare of the region.

In order to avoid these
profound risks, including the profound risk of the project not proceeding,
which would adversely affect tens of thousands of citizens, it is necessary
that this act be effective immediately. Immediate legislative action is a
pressing necessity to support the immediate commencement of work on this
project and the SR 16 corridor.

These facts and
findings are a declaration of facts constituting an emergency, and the projects
that will be able to proceed under this act are necessary for immediate
preservation of the public health, safety, and welfare.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.46.030 and 1996 c
280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary or a
designee shall continue to solicit proposals from, and negotiate and
enter into agreements with, private entities to undertake as appropriate,
together with the department and other public entities, all or a portion of the
study, planning, design, construction, operation, and maintenance of
transportation systems and facilities, using in whole or in part private
sources of financing.

The public-private
initiatives program may develop ((up to six)) demonstration projects.
Each proposal shall be weighed on its own merits, and each ((of the six
agreements shall)) agreement must be negotiated individually, and as
a stand-alone project.

(2) If project
proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, are terminated by the public or
private sectors, the department shall not select any new projects, including
project proposals submitted to the department prior to September 1, 1994, and
designated by the transportation commission as placeholder projects, after June
16, 1995, until June 30, 1997.

The department, in
consultation with the legislative transportation committee, shall conduct a
program and fiscal audit of the public-private initiatives program for the
biennium ending June 30, 1997. The department shall submit a progress report
to the legislative transportation committee on the program and fiscal audit by
June 30, 1996, with preliminary and final audit reports due December 1, 1996,
and June 30, 1997, respectively.

The department shall
develop and submit a proposed public involvement plan to the ((1997)) 2002
legislature to identify the process for selecting new potential projects and
the associated costs of implementing the plan. The legislature must adopt the
public involvement plan before the department may proceed with any activity
related to project identification and selection. Following legislative
adoption of the public involvement plan, the department is authorized to
implement the plan and to identify potential new projects.

The public involvement
plan for projects selected after June 30, 1997, shall, at a minimum, identify
projects that: (a) Have the potential of achieving overall public support
among users of the projects, residents of communities in the vicinity of the
projects, and residents of communities impacted by the projects; (b) meet a
state transportation need; (c) provide a significant state benefit; and (d)
provide competition among proposers and maximum cost benefits to users.
Prospective projects may include projects identified by the department or
submitted by the private sector.

Projects that meet the
minimum criteria established under this section and the requirements of the
public involvement plan developed by the department and approved by the
legislature shall be submitted to the Washington state transportation
commission for its review. The commission, in turn, shall submit a list of
eligible projects to the legislative transportation committee for its
consideration. Forty-five days after the submission to the legislative
transportation committee of the list of eligible projects, the secretary is
authorized to solicit proposals for the eligible project.

(3) Prior to entering
into agreements with private entities under the requirements of RCW 47.46.040
for any project proposal selected before September 1, 1994, or after June 30,
1997, except as provided for in subsections (((11) and)) (12) and
(13) of this section, the department shall require an advisory vote as
provided under subsections (5) through (10) of this section.

(4) The advisory vote
shall apply to project proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, or after
June 30, 1997, that receive public opposition as demonstrated by the submission
to the department of original petitions bearing at least five thousand
signatures of individuals opposing the project collected and submitted in
accordance with the dates established in subsections (12) and (13) of this
section. The advisory vote shall be on the preferred alternative identified
under the requirements of chapter 43.21C RCW and, if applicable, the national
environmental policy act, 42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq. The execution by the
department of the advisory vote process established in this section is subject
to the prior appropriation of funds by the legislature for the purpose of
conducting environmental impact studies, a public involvement program, local
involvement committee activities, traffic and economic impact analyses, engineering
and technical studies, and the advisory vote.

(5) In preparing for
the advisory vote, the department shall conduct a comprehensive analysis of
traffic patterns and economic impact to define the geographical boundary of the
project area that is affected by the imposition of tolls or user fees
authorized under this chapter. The area so defined is referred to in this
section as the affected project area. In defining the affected project area,
the department shall, at a minimum, undertake: (a) A comparison of the
estimated percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the project
and in other communities impacted by the project who could be subject to tolls
or user fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient traffic
that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (b) an analysis of the anticipated
traffic diversion patterns; (c) an analysis of the potential economic impact
resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on residents,
commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the vicinity of
and impacted by the project; (d) an analysis of the economic impact of tolls or
user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and (e) an analysis of
the relationship of the project to state transportation needs and benefits.

(6)(a) After
determining the definition of the affected project area, the department shall
establish a committee comprised of individuals who represent cities and
counties in the affected project area; organizations formed to support or
oppose the project; and users of the project. The committee shall be named the
public-private local involvement committee, and be known as the local
involvement committee.

(b) The members of the
local involvement committee shall be: (i) An elected official from each city
within the affected project area; (ii) an elected official from each county
within the affected project area; (iii) two persons from each county within the
affected project area who represent an organization formed in support of the
project, if the organization exists; (iv) two persons from each county within
the affected project area who represent an organization formed to oppose the
project, if the organization exists; and (v) four public members active in a
statewide transportation organization. If the committee makeup results in an
even number of committee members, there shall be an additional appointment of
an elected official from the county in which all, or the greatest portion of
the project is located.

(c) City and county
elected officials shall be appointed by a majority of the members of the city
or county legislative authorities of each city or county within the affected
project area, respectively. The county legislative authority of each county
within the affected project area shall identify and validate organizations
officially formed in support of or in opposition to the project and shall make
the appointments required under this section from a list submitted by the chair
of the organizations. Public members shall be appointed by the governor. All
appointments to the local involvement committee shall be made and submitted to
the department of transportation no later than January 1, 1996, for projects
selected prior to September 1, 1994, and no later than thirty days after the
affected project area is defined for projects selected after June 30, 1997.
Vacancies in the membership of the local involvement committee shall be filled
by the appointing authority under (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection for
each position on the committee.

(d) The local
involvement committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the department on
all matters related to the execution of the advisory vote.

(e) Members of the
local involvement committee serve without compensation and may not receive
subsistence, lodging expenses, or travel expenses.

(7) The department
shall conduct a minimum thirty-day public comment period on the definition of
the geographical boundary of the project area. The department, in consultation
with the local involvement committee, shall make adjustments, if required, to
the definition of the geographical boundary of the affected project area, based
on comments received from the public. Within fourteen calendar days after the
public comment period, the department shall set the boundaries of the affected
project area in units no smaller than a precinct as defined in RCW 29.01.120.

(8) The department, in
consultation with the local involvement committee, shall develop a description
for selected project proposals. After developing the description of the
project proposal, the department shall publish the project proposal description
in newspapers of general circulation for seven calendar days in the affected
project area. Within fourteen calendar days after the last day of the
publication of the project proposal description, the department shall transmit
a copy of the map depicting the affected project area and the description of
the project proposal to the county auditor of the county in which any portion
of the affected project area is located.

(9) The department
shall provide the legislative transportation committee with progress reports on
the status of the definition of the affected project area and the description
of the project proposal.

(10) Upon receipt of
the map and the description of the project proposal, the county auditor shall,
within thirty days, verify the precincts that are located within the affected
project area. The county auditor shall prepare the text identifying and
describing the affected project area and the project proposal using the
definition of the geographical boundary of the affected project area and the
project description submitted by the department and shall set an election date
for the submission of a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of tolls
or user fees to implement the proposed project within the affected project
area, which date may be the next succeeding general election to be held in the
state, or at a special election, if requested by the department. The text of
the project proposal must appear in a voter's pamphlet for the affected project
area. The department shall pay the costs of publication and distribution. The
special election date must be the next date for a special election provided
under RCW 29.13.020 that is at least sixty days but, if authorized under RCW
29.13.020, no more than ninety days after the receipt of the final map and
project description by the auditor. The department shall pay the cost of an
election held under this section.

(11) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, the department may contract with a private
developer of a selected project proposal to conduct environmental impact
studies, a public involvement program, and engineering and technical studies
funded by the legislature. For projects subject to this subsection, the
department shall not enter into an agreement under RCW 47.46.040 prior to the
advisory vote on the preferred alternative.

(12) Subsections (5)
through (10) of this section shall not apply to project proposals selected
prior to September 1, 1994, that have no organized public opposition as
demonstrated by the submission to the department of original petitions bearing
at least five thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project,
collected and submitted after September 1, 1994, and by thirty calendar days
after June 16, 1995.

(13) Subsections (5)
through (10) of this section shall not apply to project proposals selected
after June 30, 1997, that have no organized public opposition as demonstrated by
the submission to the department of original petitions bearing at least five
thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project, collected and
submitted by ninety calendar days after project selection.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.56.010 and 1984 c
7 s 246 are each amended to read as follows:

"Toll bridge"
means a bridge constructed or acquired under this chapter, upon which tolls are
charged, together with all appurtenances, additions, alterations, improvements,
and replacements thereof, and the approaches thereto, and all lands and
interests used therefor, and buildings and improvements thereon.

"Toll road"
means any express highway, superhighway, or motorway at such locations and
between such termini as may be established by law, and constructed or to be
constructed as a limited access highway under the provisions of this chapter by
the department, and shall include, but not be limited to, all bridges, tunnels,
overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, toll
houses, service areas, service facilities, communications facilities, and
administration, storage, and other buildings that the department may deem
necessary for the operation of the project, together with all property, rights,
easements, and interests that may be acquired by the department for the
construction or the operation of the project, all of which shall be conducted
in the same manner and under the same procedure as provided for the
establishing, constructing, operating, and maintaining of toll bridges by the
department, insofar as those procedures are reasonably consistent and
applicable.

"Toll
bridge" and "toll road" as used in this chapter does not include
a facility that is developed, financed, constructed, reconstructed, upgraded,
maintained, or operated under chapter 47.46 RCW and for which funds have been
appropriated under RCW 47.46.030, notwithstanding the fact that the facility
was originally constructed under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.56.030 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
transportation shall have full charge of the construction of all toll bridges
and other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries, and the
operation and maintenance thereof. The transportation commission shall
determine and establish the tolls and charges thereon, and shall perform all
duties and exercise all powers relating to the financing, refinancing, and
fiscal management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the
Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the manner provided by
law. However, once bonds issued by the commission for construction of a
toll bridge or other toll facility have been paid, redeemed, or defeased in
full, the toll bridge or other toll facility may be thereafter included in
projects that have been authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW and for which funds
have been appropriated under RCW 47.46.030, and tolls on the facilities must be
established as provided by chapter 47.46 RCW. The department shall have
full charge of design of all toll facilities. The department shall proceed
with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities and the
approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway construction
immediately upon there being made available funds for such work and shall
prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as practicable. The department is
authorized to negotiate contracts for any amount without bid in order to make
repairs to ferries or ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities
whenever continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent use of
such ferries or facilities.

The department shall
proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services, and equipment
needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or
other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter
43.19 RCW except as follows:

(1) When the secretary
of the department of transportation determines in writing that the use of
invitation for bid is either not practicable or not advantageous to the state
and it may be necessary to make competitive evaluations, including technical or
performance evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract
award, a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals
method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal request
for proposals solicitation shall include a functional description of the needs
and requirements of the state and the significant factors.

(2) When purchases are
made through a formal request for proposals solicitation the contract shall be
awarded to the responsible proposer whose competitive sealed proposal is
determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into
consideration price and other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposals. No significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that
are not specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price maintainability;
reliability; commonality; performance levels; life cycle cost if applicable
under this section; cost of transportation or delivery; delivery schedule
offered; installation cost; cost of spare parts; availability of parts and
service offered; and the following:

(a) The ability,
capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the contract or provide the
service required;

(b) The character,
integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of the proposer;

(c) Whether the
proposer can perform the contract within the time specified;

(d) The quality of
performance of previous contracts or services;

(e) The previous and
existing compliance by the proposer with laws relating to the contract or
services;

(f) Objective,
measurable criteria defined in the request for proposal. These criteria may
include but are not limited to items such as discounts, delivery costs,
maintenance services costs, installation costs, and transportation costs; and

(g) Such other
information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award the
contract.

When purchases are made
through a request for proposal process, proposals received shall be evaluated
based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposal. When a
life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle cost of a proposal shall be
given at least the same relative importance as the initial price element
specified in the request of proposal documents. The department may reject any
and all proposals received. If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall
be made to the proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposal.

(3) The legislative
transportation committee shall review the secretary's use of the request for
proposals solicitation for Washington state ferries projects to determine if
the process established under chapter 4, Laws of 1995 1st sp. sess. is
appropriate. The results of the review, including recommendations for
modification of the request for proposal process, shall be reported to the
house of representatives and senate transportation committees by January 1,
1997.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.56.240 and 1984 c
7 s 265 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission is
hereby empowered to fix the rates of toll and other charges for all toll
bridges built under the terms of this chapter. Toll charges so fixed may be
changed from time to time as conditions warrant. The commission, in
establishing toll charges, shall give due consideration to the cost of
operating and maintaining such toll bridge or toll bridges including the cost
of insurance, and to the amount required annually to meet the redemption of
bonds and interest payments on them. The tolls and charges shall be at all
times fixed at rates to yield annual revenue equal to annual operating and
maintenance expenses including insurance costs and all redemption payments and
interest charges of the bonds issued for any particular toll bridge or toll
bridges as the bonds become due. The bond redemption and interest payments
constitute a first direct and exclusive charge and lien on all such tolls and
other revenues and interest thereon. Sinking funds created therefrom received
from the use and operation of the toll bridge or toll bridges, and such tolls
and revenues together with the interest earned thereon shall constitute a trust
fund for the security and payment of such bonds and shall not be used or
pledged for any other purpose as long as any of these bonds are outstanding and
unpaid.

However,
once bonds issued by the commission for construction of a toll bridge or other
toll facility have been paid, redeemed, or defeased in full, the toll bridge or
other toll facility may be thereafter included in projects that have been
authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW and for which funds have been appropriated
under RCW 47.46.030, and tolls on the facilities must be established as
provided by chapter 47.46 RCW.

Sec. 6. RCW 47.56.270 and 1983 c
3 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:

The Lake Washington
bridge ((and the Tacoma Narrows bridge)) in chapter 47.17 RCW made a
part of the primary state highways of the state of Washington, shall, upon
completion, be operated, maintained, kept up, and repaired by the department in
the manner provided in this chapter, and the cost of such operation, maintenance,
upkeep, and repair shall be paid from funds appropriated for the use of the
department for the construction and maintenance of the primary state highways
of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. RCW 47.56.271 (Tacoma Narrows
bridge--Toll free facility) and 1983 c 3 s 130 & 1965 c 50 s 1 are each
repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. For all reasons,
declarations, and facts stated in section 1 of this act, the legislature
declares that an emergency exists and that this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of
the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---