BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) There is a crisis in
health care accessibility, affordability, and choice in Washington state.
Health care through insurance companies has failed to control costs, increase
access, or preserve choice. More than six hundred thousand Washington residents
have no health care coverage. Individual plans are unavailable in most
counties. Many clinics, physician practices, and emergency departments,
especially in rural areas, are closing or operating at a loss. Employers,
faced with fewer choices and more expensive premiums, are reducing employment‑based
health care coverage. Simplifying health care financing and eliminating
administrative waste inherent in multiple insurance plans can create sufficient
savings to extend health care coverage to all residents and enhance fairness in
the system.

(2) The people of the
state of Washington declare their intent to create a framework and process to
involve the citizens of Washington state in the creation of a single financing
entity called the Washington health security trust. Through public hearings,
research, and consensus building, the trust will accomplish the follow goals:
(a) Provide fair, simple, and accountable health care financing for all
Washington residents using a single health care financing entity; (b) cover a
comprehensive package of effective and necessary personal health services; (c)
make health care coverage independent from employment; (d) eliminate excessive
administrative costs resulting from the current fragmented system of multiple insurers;
(e) generate savings sufficient to ensure coverage for all Washington
residents; (f) integrate current publicly sponsored health programs into the
health security trust; (g) preserve choice of providers for Washington
residents; (h) protect patient rights; (i) keep clinical decisions in the hands
of health professionals and patients, rather than administrative personnel; (j)
promote health care quality; and (k) control excessive health care costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any Washington
resident may purchase their choice of the basic health plan or the state
employee health benefit plan for total out-of-pocket costs no greater than
seven percent of that resident's annual income.

(2) An employer may
choose to purchase the basic health plan or the state employee health benefits
plan on behalf of any or all of their employees at a total out-of-pocket cost
determined by the state to be no more than seven percent of each employee's
income.

(3) The governor and
the state legislature shall increase the efficiency and effectiveness of state
medical care purchasing to implement this law without reducing the salaries or
benefits of teachers, the state patrol, other state employees or employees of
contractors with the state for the care of children, the blind, the elderly,
the physically or mentally disabled, or other vulnerable populations.

(4) The
legislature shall increase taxes on tobacco to an amount no greater than total
tobacco taxes in the province of British Columbia, Canada to subsidize state
residents' health insurance coverage as provided in this act. Any revenue
generated from such increases shall be deposited in the health services account
for the purposes of implementing this law and shall not be subject to the
provisions of Initiative 601 or 695.

---
END ---