BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.15.031 and 1996
c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The term
"operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the fees,
other than building fees, charged all students registering at the state's
colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short courses,
self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work, experimental
station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual instruction
and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines, which colleges
and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health,
technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other
income derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and
facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter acquired,
constructed or installed, including but not limited to income from rooms,
dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student activity
buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the appurtenances thereon, or
such other special fees as may be established by any college or university
board of trustees or regents from time to time. All moneys received as
operating fees at any institution of higher education shall be deposited in a
local account containing only operating fees revenue and related interest:
PROVIDED, That a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating fees shall
be retained by the institutions((, except the technical colleges,)) for
the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. Local operating fee accounts shall not be
subject to appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.067 and 1997
c 403 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Tuition fees shall
be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) ((Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
for the 1997-98 academic year, other than the summer term, shall be as provided
in this subsection.

(a) At the
University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, two thousand nine hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For
nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
ten thousand two hundred seventy-eight dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, nine thousand eight
hundred seventy dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, four thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand five hundred eighty-eight dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand ten dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifteen dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand one hundred twelve dollars; and

(viii) For
nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand twenty-four
dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two thousand
two hundred eleven dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand six hundred forty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand seven hundred twenty-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, eleven thousand nine hundred seventy-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred eleven dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.

(3))) Academic year tuition for full-time students
at the state's institutions of higher education beginning with the 1998-99
academic year, other than the summer term, shall be as provided in this
subsection unless different rates are adopted in the omnibus appropriations
act.

(a) At the University
of Washington and Washington State University:

(i) For resident
undergraduate students and other resident students not in graduate, law, or
first professional programs, three thousand one hundred eight dollars;

(ii)(A) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the University of
Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs, eleven
thousand one hundred thirty dollars;

(B) For nonresident
undergraduate students and other nonresident students at Washington State
University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten thousand two
hundred sixty-six dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, five thousand forty-six dollars;

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;

(v) For resident law
students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;

(vi) For nonresident
law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred eighty-two dollars;

(vii) For resident
first professional students, eight thousand four hundred thirty-six dollars;
and

(viii) For nonresident
first professional students, twenty-one thousand eight hundred sixty-four
dollars.

(b) At the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i) For resident
undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate programs, two
thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;

(ii) For nonresident
undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in graduate programs,
eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;

(iii) For resident
graduate students, three thousand eight hundred seventy-six dollars; and

(iv) For nonresident
graduate students, twelve thousand four hundred fifty-six dollars.

(c) At the community
colleges:

(i) For resident
students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars; and

(ii) For nonresident
students, five thousand eight hundred eight dollars.

(((4) For the
1997-98 and 1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at
least ten percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four
percent increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to law
students to assist needy low and middle-income resident law students. For the
1997-98 and 1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at
least ten percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four
percent increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in graduate, law,
or first professional programs to assist needy low and middle-income resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not enrolled in
graduate, law, or first professional programs. This requirement is in addition
to the deposit requirements of the institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(5))) (3)(a) Beginning with the 2002-03 academic
year and ending with the 2007-08 academic year, the governing boards of the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase
full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates.
Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor
under chapter 43.135 RCW. Tuition fees for resident graduate and professional
degree students shall not increase by more than ten percent a year. Tuition
fees for resident law students for the 2002-03 academic year shall not increase
by more than twenty-two percent and in subsequent academic years ending in
2007-08, shall not increase by more than ten percent a year. Tuition fees for
resident, graduate business degree students for the 2002-03 academic year shall
not increase by more than thirty percent and in subsequent academic years
ending in 2007-08, shall not increase by more than ten percent a year.
Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's
programs, campuses, courses, or students. The governing boards and the state
board may adjust full-time tuition fees for factors that include time of day
and day of week, delivery method, and campus to encourage full use of the
state's educational facilities and resources.

(b) Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, state colleges and universities receiving general fund
appropriations as part of the omnibus appropriations act may increase summer
term tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor. Tuition levels increased
under this subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate calculated from
the academic year tuition levels for all students, including resident
undergraduates.

(c) An amount equal
to at least three and one-half percent of revenue received as a result of the
difference in percentage rate of increase in resident graduate, law, and first
professional tuition fees over the percentage rate of increase in resident
undergraduate tuition fees must be used by the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College to assist those resident graduate,
law, and first professional degree students with demonstrated financial need
and family income below the median for Washington state, to the extent that
funds are available under this subsection. This requirement is in addition to
the deposit requirements of the institutional financial aid fund under RCW
28B.15.820, but does not create an entitlement to financial aid.

(4) Academic year
tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education
beginning with the 2008-09 academic year, other than summer term, shall be as
charged during the 2007-08 academic year unless different rates are adopted in
the omnibus appropriations act.

(5) The tuition
fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school students
enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW
28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.15.069 and 1997 c 403 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:

(1) ((As used in
this section, each of the following subsections is a separate tuition category:

(a) Resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not in first
professional, graduate, or law programs;

(b) Nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in first
professional graduate or law programs;

(c) Resident
graduate students;

(d) Resident law
students;

(e) Nonresident
graduate students;

(f) Nonresident law
students;

(g) Resident first
professional students; and

(h) Nonresident
first professional students.

(2) Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this section "first
professional programs" means programs leading to one of the following
degrees: Doctor of medicine, doctor of dental surgery, or doctor of veterinary
medicine.

(3))) The building fee for each academic year shall
be a percentage of total tuition fees. This percentage shall be calculated by
the higher education coordinating board and be based on the actual percentage
the building fee is of total tuition for each tuition category in the 1994-95
academic year, rounded up to the nearest half percent.

(((4))) (2)
The governing boards of each institution of higher education, except for the
technical colleges, shall charge to and collect from each student a services and
activities fee. A governing board may increase the existing fee annually,
consistent with budgeting procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a
percentage not to exceed the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees
for ((the applicable tuition category)) resident undergraduate
students: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase shall not apply to that
portion of the services and activities fee previously committed to the
repayment of bonded debt. These rate adjustments may exceed the fiscal growth
factor under chapter 43.135 RCW. For the 2003-04 academic year, the services
and activities fee shall be based upon the resident undergraduate services and
activities fee in 2002-03. The services and activities fee committee
provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a request to the governing board
for a fee increase.

(((5))) (3)
Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with subsection (((4)))
(2) of this section shall be set by the state board for community and
technical colleges for community college summer school students unless the
community college charges fees in accordance with RCW 28B.15.515.

(((6))) (4)
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing board of a
community college may charge such fees for ungraded courses, noncredit courses,
community services courses, and self‑supporting courses as it, in its
discretion, may determine, consistent with the rules of the state board for
community and technical colleges.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.15.910 and 2000
c 152 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of
providing state general fund support to public institutions of higher
education, except for revenue waived under programs listed in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section, and unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus
state appropriations act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived,
exempted, or reduced by a state university, a regional university, The
Evergreen State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial management, before
granting any waivers. This limitation applies to all tuition waiver programs
established before or after July 1, 1992.

(a) University of
Washington 21 percent

(b) Washington State
University 20 percent

(c) Eastern Washington
University 11 percent

(d) Central Washington
University 8 percent

(e) Western Washington University 10
percent

(f) The Evergreen State
College 6 percent

(g) Community colleges
as a whole 35 percent

(2) The limitations in
subsection (1) of this section apply to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in
operating fees contained in the following:

(a) RCW 28B.10.265;

(b) RCW 28B.15.014;

(c) RCW 28B.15.100;

(d) RCW 28B.15.225;

(e) RCW 28B.15.380;

(f) RCW 28B.15.520;

(g) RCW 28B.15.526;

(h) RCW 28B.15.527;

(i) RCW 28B.15.543;

(j) RCW 28B.15.545;

(k) RCW 28B.15.555;

(l) RCW 28B.15.556;

(m) RCW 28B.15.615;

(n) RCW 28B.15.620;

(o) RCW 28B.15.628;

(p) RCW 28B.15.730;

(q) RCW 28B.15.740;

(r) RCW 28B.15.750;

(s) RCW 28B.15.756;

(t) RCW 28B.50.259; and

(u) RCW 28B.70.050((;

(v) RCW 28B.80.580;
and

(w) During the
1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate commission for higher education
undergraduate exchange program for students attending Eastern Washington
University)).

(3) The limitations in
subsection (1) of this section do not apply to waivers, exemptions, or
reductions in services and activities fees contained in the following:

(a) RCW 28B.15.522;

(b) RCW 28B.15.540; and

(c) RCW 28B.15.558.

(4) The total amount of
operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by institutions of higher
education participating in the western interstate commission for higher
education western undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not
exceed the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.

(a) Washington State
University 1 percent

(b) Eastern Washington
University 3 percent

(c) Central Washington
University 3 percent

(5) The general fund
state appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees
revenue collected as a result of waiving less operating fees revenue than the
amounts authorized under this section. State general fund appropriations shall
not be provided for revenue forgone as a result of or for waivers granted under
RCW 28B.15.915.

Sec. 5. RCW 28B.15.100 and 1999
c 321 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen
State College, and the community colleges shall charge to and collect from each
of the students registering at the particular institution for any quarter or
semester such tuition fees and services and activities fees, and other fees as
such board shall in its discretion determine. The total of all fees shall be
rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such tuition fees
((for other than the summer term)) shall be ((in the amounts for the
respective institutions as otherwise set forth in)) established in
accordance with RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) Part-time students
shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees proportionate to
full-time student rates established for residents and nonresidents: PROVIDED,
That except for students registered at community colleges, students registered
for fewer than two credit hours shall be charged tuition and services and
activities fees at the rate established for two credit hours: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents of Idaho
or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty for six
or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted from payment of
all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential upon a
declaration by the higher education coordinating board that it finds Washington
residents from the community college district are afforded substantially
equivalent treatment by such other states.

(3) Full-time students
registered for more than eighteen credit hours shall be charged an additional
operating fee for each credit hour in excess of eighteen hours at the
applicable established per credit hour tuition fee rate for part-time
students: PROVIDED, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the
governing boards of the state universities and the community colleges may
exempt all or a portion of the additional charge, for students who are
registered exclusively in first professional programs in medicine, dental
medicine, veterinary medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are
registered exclusively in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW 28B.15.066 (General fund
appropriations to institutions of higher education) and 2000 c 152 s 2, 1999 c
309 s 932, 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3, & 1993 c 379 s 205 are each repealed.

---
END ---