BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
64.34.425 and 1992 c 220 s 23 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Except in the case of a sale where delivery of a
public

_7 offering statement is required, or unless exempt under
RCW

_8 64.34.400(2), a unit owner shall furnish to a purchaser
before

_9 execution of any contract for sale of a unit, or
otherwise before

10 conveyance, a resale certificate, signed by an officer
or

11 authorized agent of the association and based on the
books and

12 records of the association and the actual knowledge of
the person

13 signing the certificate, containing:

14 (a) A statement disclosing any right of first
refusal or other

15 restraint on the free alienability of the unit contained
in the

16 declaration;

17 (b) A statement setting forth the amount of the
monthly common

18 expense assessment and any unpaid common expense or
special

p. 1 SB
5774

_1 assessment currently due and payable from the selling
unit owner

_2 and a statement of any special assessments that have
been levied

_3 against the unit which have not been paid even though
not yet due;

_4 (c) A statement, which shall be current to within
forty-five

_5 days, of any common expenses or special assessments
against any

_6 unit in the condominium that are past due over thirty
days;

_7 (d) A statement, which shall be current to within
forty-five

_8 days, of any obligation of the association which is past
due over

_9 thirty days;

10 (e) A statement of any other fees payable by unit
owners;

11 (f) A statement of any anticipated repair or
replacement cost

12 in excess of five percent of the annual budget of the
association

13 that has been approved by the board of directors;

14 (g) A statement of the amount of any reserves for
repair or

15 replacement and of any portions of those reserves
currently

16 designated by the association for any specified
projects;

17 (h) The annual financial statement of the
association,

18 including the audit report if it has been prepared, for
the year

19 immediately preceding the current year((.));

20 (i) A balance sheet and a revenue and expense
statement of the

21 association prepared on an accrual basis, which shall be
current

22 to within one hundred twenty days;

23 (j) The current operating budget of the association;

24 (k) A statement of any unsatisfied judgments against
the

25 association and the status of any pending suits in which
the

26 association is a defendant;

27 (l) A statement describing any insurance coverage
provided for

28 the benefit of unit owners;

29 (m) A statement as to whether there are any
alterations or

30 improvements to the unit or to the limited common
elements

31 assigned thereto that violate any provision of the
declaration;

32 (n) A statement of the number of units, if any,
still owned by

33 the declarant, whether the declarant has transferred
control of

34 the association to the unit owners, and the date of such
transfer;

35 (o) A statement as to whether there are any
violations of the

36 health or building codes with respect to the unit, the
limited

37 common elements assigned thereto, or any other portion
of the

38 condominium;

SB 5774 p. 2

_1 (p) A statement of the remaining term of any
leasehold estate

_2 affecting the condominium and the provisions governing
any

_3 extension or renewal thereof; and

_4 (q) A copy of the declaration, the bylaws, the rules
or

_5 regulations of the association, and any other
information

_6 reasonably requested by mortgagees of prospective
purchasers of

_7 units. Information requested generally by the federal
national

_8 mortgage association, the federal home loan bank board,
the

_9 government national mortgage association, the veterans

10 administra­tion and the department of housing and urban
development

11 shall be deemed reasonable, provided such information is

12 reasonably available to the association.

13 (2) The association, within ten days after a request
by a unit

14 owner, and subject to payment of any fee imposed
pursuant to RCW

15 64.34.304(1)(l), shall furnish a resale certificate
signed by an

16 officer or authorized agent of the association and
containing the

17 information necessary to enable the unit owner to comply
with this

18 section. For the purposes of this chapter, a reasonable
charge for

19 the preparation of a resale certificate may not exceed
((one)) two

20 hundred fifty dollars. The association may charge a
unit owner a

21 nominal fee for updating a resale certificate within six
months of

22 the unit owner's request. The unit owner shall also
sign the

23 certificate but the unit owner is not liable to the
purchaser for

24 any erroneous information provided by the association
and included

25 in the certificate unless and to the extent the unit
owner had

26 actual knowledge thereof.

27 (3) A purchaser is not liable for any unpaid
assessment or fee

28 against the unit as of the date of the certificate
greater than

29 the amount set forth in the certificate prepared by the

30 association unless and to the extent such purchaser had
actual

31 knowledge thereof. A unit owner is not liable to a
purchaser for

32 the failure or delay of the association to provide the
certificate

33 in a timely manner, but the purchaser's contract is
voidable by

34 the purchaser until the certificate has been provided
and for five

35 days thereafter or until conveyance, whichever occurs
first.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5774