BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) Each taxpayer is
allowed an exemption against property taxes levied for state purposes. The
amount of the exemption is equal to fifty thousand dollars of assessed
valuation adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the department of revenue.

(2) The exemption shall
be applied to property owned and designated by the taxpayer. If the value of
the property is less than the amount of the exemption, the unused portion of
the exemption may be applied to additional property owned and designated by the
taxpayer. If a taxpayer sells property designated for exemption under this
section, the exemption can be transferred to another property owned and
designated by the taxpayer.

(3) No property is
eligible for total exemptions under this section in excess of fifty thousand
dollars.

(4) No taxpayer may
claim more than one exemption.

(5) The exemption under
this section is in addition to any other property tax relief that may be
provided by law.

(6) The person claiming
the exemption must have owned the property, at the time of filing, in fee, as a
life estate, or by contract purchase.

(7) For purposes of
this section, a marital community constitutes one taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) Each taxpayer is
allowed a credit against property taxes levied for state purposes. The amount
of the credit is equal to the state tax imposed on fifty thousand dollars of
assessed valuation adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the department of revenue. The credit applies to
property designated under section 1 of this act.

(2) The credit in any
tax year shall not exceed the amount of taxes levied on the property for state
purposes.

(3) No property is eligible
for total credits under this section in excess of the state tax imposed on
fifty thousand dollars of assessed valuation adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the department of
revenue.

(4) No taxpayer may
claim more than one credit.

(5) The credit under
this section is in addition to any other property tax relief that may be
provided by law.

(6) The person claiming
the credit must have owned the property, at the time of filing, in fee, as a
life estate, or by contract purchase.

(7) For purposes of
this section, a marital community constitutes one taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) A claim under this
chapter shall be made and filed with the county assessor at any time during the
year for taxes payable the following year and thereafter, and solely upon forms
as prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue. Beginning in 2007,
tax relief under this chapter continues for no more than four years unless a
renewal application is filed.

(2) Each person
receiving tax relief under this chapter shall file with the county assessor a
renewal application not later than December 31st of the year the assessor
notifies the person of the requirement to file the renewal application.
Beginning in 2006, and in each of the three succeeding years, the county
assessor shall notify approximately one-fourth of those persons receiving tax
relief under this chapter in the current year who have not filed a renewal
application within the previous four years of the requirement to file a renewal
application.

(3) A person receiving
tax relief under this chapter shall inform the county assessor of any change
affecting the person's entitlement on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue. A person receiving tax relief under this chapter may
change the properties receiving the relief on forms prescribed and furnished by
the department of revenue.

(4) If the assessor
finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications as set forth in this
chapter, the claim shall be denied, but the denial may be appealed under RCW
84.48.010. If the applicant received tax relief under this chapter in prior
years based on erroneous information, the taxes shall be collected subject to
penalties, as provided in RCW 84.40.130, for a period not to exceed three
years.

(5) The department and
each local assessor shall publicize the qualifications and manner of making
claims under this chapter through communications media, including paid
advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of the
qualifications, method of making application, the penalties for not reporting a
change, and availability of further information shall be included on or with
property tax statements and revaluation notices for all property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) All claims under this
chapter shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the tax relief.

(2) If the taxpayer is
unable to submit his or her own claim, the claim shall be submitted by a duly
authorized agent or by a guardian or other person charged with the care of the
person or property of the taxpayer.

(3) Any person signing
a false claim with the intent to defraud or evade the payment of any tax is
guilty of the offense of perjury.

(4) The tax liability
of a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership shall be
reduced by the amount of tax relief to which a claimant residing therein is
entitled and the cooperative shall reduce any amount owed by the claimant to
the cooperative by the exact amount of tax relief or, if no amount is owed, the
cooperative shall make payment to the claimant of the exact amount of the
relief.

(5) A remainderman or
other person who would have otherwise paid the tax on real property that is
receiving tax relief under this chapter for an estate for life shall reduce the
amount which would have been payable by the life tenant to the remainderman or
other person to the extent of the tax relief. If no amount is owed or
separately stated as an obligation between these persons, the remainderman or
other person shall make payment to the life tenant in the exact amount of the
tax relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The director of
revenue shall adopt rules and prescribe forms as may be necessary and
appropriate for implementation and administration of this chapter subject to
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(2) The department may
conduct audits of the administration of this chapter and the claims filed under
this chapter as it considers necessary. The powers of the department under
chapter 84.08 RCW apply to these audits.

Sec. 6. RCW 84.56.050 and 1991 c
245 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On receiving
the tax rolls the treasurer shall post all real and personal property taxes
from the rolls to the treasurer's tax roll, and shall carry forward to the
current tax rolls a memorandum of all delinquent taxes on each and every
description of property, and enter the same on the property upon which the
taxes are delinquent showing the amounts for each year. The treasurer shall
notify each taxpayer in the county, at the expense of the county, of the amount
of the real and personal property((,)) and the current and delinquent
amount of tax due on the same((; and)). The treasurer shall have
printed on the notice the name of each tax ((and)), the levy made
on the same, the amount of any credit under section 2 of this act, and the
tax payable. The county treasurer shall be the sole collector of all
delinquent taxes and all other taxes due and collectible on the tax rolls of
the county((: PROVIDED, That)).

(2) The term
"taxpayer" as used in this section shall mean any person charged, or
whose property is charged, with property tax; and the person to be notified is
that person whose name appears on the tax roll herein mentioned((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). If no name so appears, the person
to be notified is that person shown by the treasurer's tax rolls or duplicate
tax receipts of any preceding year as the payer of the tax last paid on the
property in question.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2003 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act takes effect if
the proposed amendment adding a new section to Article VII of the state
Constitution providing tax credits for owner-occupied residential housing
(Senate Joint Resolution . . . . . (S-1086/01)) is validly
submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election
held in November 2001. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified,
this act is null and void in its entirety.

---
END ---