BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.30A.015 and 1995
c 285 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
a person:

(a) Knowing that the
payment is for the referral of a claimant to a service provider, either to
accept payment from a service provider or, being a service provider, to pay
another; or

(b) To provide or claim
or represent to have provided services to a claimant, knowing the claimant was
referred in violation of (a) of this subsection.

(2) It is unlawful for
a service provider to engage in a regular practice of waiving, rebating,
giving, paying, or offering to waive, rebate, give, or pay all or any part of a
claimant's casualty or property insurance deductible if the costs of such
practices are passed on to an insurer, and if a consumer indicates his or her
intention of making a claim for property repair from his or her casualty or
property insurer, to:

(a) Commence the
work without first giving the consumer oral and written notice of:

(i) The total
estimated cost of the repair; and

(ii) The total dollar
amount the consumer is responsible to pay for the repair, which dollar amount
may not exceed the applicable deductible or other copay arrangement in the
consumer's insurance policy; or

(b) Request or
collect from a consumer an amount that exceeds the dollar amount a consumer was
initially told he or she was responsible to pay as an insurance deductible or
other copay arrangement for repair of the property under (a) of this
subsection, even if that amount is less than the full amount the casualty or property
insurance policy requires the insured to pay as a deductible or other copay
arrangement, unless:

(i) The consumer's
insurance company denies coverage exists for the repair, in which case, the
full amount of the repair may be charged and collected from the consumer;

(ii) The consumer
misstates, before the repair is commenced, the amount of the deductible or
other copay arrangement, in which case, the service provider may charge and
collect from the consumer an amount that does not exceed the actual amount of
the consumer's deductible or other copay arrangement; or

(iii)
The casualty or property insurer reimburses the consumer directly rather than
the service provider, in which case the service provider may seek payment of
the full amount of the insurance reimbursement over and above any amounts
stated in (a) of this subsection.

--- END ---