BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1)(a) The legislature
finds that it is important to address the success of Hispanic students in
institutions of higher education. Completion rates of Hispanic students in
community colleges is decreasing and participation rates of Hispanics in
baccalaureate institutions has remained stagnant. Therefore, the legislature
finds that there is a need to help these students succeed in institutions of
higher education.

(b) The legislature
finds that a task force should be created to study the participation of
Hispanics in higher education and the effectiveness of programs designed to
support Hispanic students.

(2) A task force on
Hispanic students in higher education is created. The task force study shall
include but not be limited to the following:

(a) An examination of
the efforts of institutions of higher education to recruit, retain, and provide
academic support for Hispanic students;

(b) A determination of
which programs are helpful to Hispanic students and which programs fail to
promote recruitment, retention, and program completion; and

(c) Recommendations to
improve the recruitment, retention, and completion of Hispanics in higher
education.

(3) The task force
shall report its findings and recommendations by December 31, 2001, to the
higher education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the house of representatives committee on higher education,
and the senate committee on higher education.

(4) The task force
shall consist of ten members as follows:

(a) One member each,
appointed by each of the state's public four-year institutions of higher
education, to represent the respective institution of higher education;

(b) One member,
appointed by the state board for community and technical colleges, to represent
the community and technical colleges in Washington;

(c) One member,
appointed by the higher education coordinating board, to represent the private institutions
of higher education in Washington;

(d) One member of the
higher education coordinating board, to be appointed by the chair of the higher
education coordinating board; and

(e) The director of the
Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs.

(5) This section
expires December 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---