BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.17.243 and 1999 c
47 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The district manager
for district two as defined in WAC 16‑458‑075 is authorized to
transfer two hundred thousand dollars from the fruit and vegetable district
fund to the plant pest account within the agricultural local fund. The amount
transferred is to be derived from fees collected for state inspections of tree
fruits and is to be used solely for activities related to the control of
Rhagoletis pomonella in district two. The transfer of funds shall occur by
June 1, 1997. On June 30, ((2001)) 2003, any unexpended portion
of the two hundred thousand dollars shall be returned to the fruit and
vegetable district fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2001.

---
END ---