BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 2.04 RCW

_7 to read as follows:

_8 A judge of the supreme court shall be admitted to
the practice

_9 of law in the courts of record of this state not less
than fifteen

10 years prior to taking office.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 2.08 RCW

12 to read as follows:

13 A judge of a superior court shall be admitted to the
practice

14 of law in the courts of record of this state not less
than five

15 years prior to taking office.

16

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If a judge currently
holding office does

p. 1 SB
5785

_1 not meet the minimum qualifications specified in this
act on the

_2 effective date of this act, the judge may complete his
or her

_3 current term of office.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect
thirty days after

_5 election if the proposed amendment to Article IV,
section 17 of

_6 the state Constitution specifying qualifications for
judges is

_7 validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the
voters at

_8 the next general election. If the proposed amendment is
not

_9 approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5785 p. 2