BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW 2.06.050
and 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 5 are each amended to

_6 read as follows:

_7 A judge of the court shall be:

_8 (1) Admitted to the practice of law in the courts of
this state

_9 not less than ((five)) ten years prior to
taking office.

10 (2) A resident for not less than one year at the
time of

11 appointment or initial election in the district for
which his or

12 her position was created.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If a judge currently
holding office does

14 not meet the minimum qualifications specified in this
act on the

15 effective date of this act, the judge may complete his
or her

16 current term of office.

p. 1 SB
5786

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
thirty days after

_2 election if the proposed amendment to Article IV,
section 17 of

_3 the state Constitution specifying qualifications for
judges is

_4 validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the
voters at

_5 the next general election. If the proposed amendment is
not

_6 approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5786 p. 2