BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 10.95

_6 RCW to read as follows:

_7 (1) The Washington state institute for public policy
shall

_8 convene an advisory committee to provide oversight for a
study of

_9 the fairness of implementation of the death penalty in
the state

10 of Washington. The study shall address the concerns
raised by the

11 American bar association policy of February 3, 1997, and
the

12 resolution of the Washington state bar association on
August 4,

13 2000, specifically:

14 (a) The adequacy of funding for defense counsel for
indigent

15 defendants accused of capital offenses;

16 (b) The qualifications that should be required of
defense

17 counsel in capital cases;

18 (c) Whether there are systemic problems affecting

19 implementation of the death penalty in Washington;

p. 1 SB
5787

_1 (d) Whether prosecutorial standards or criteria for
seeking

_2 imposition of the death penalty are consistent statewide
and what

_3 standards are appropriate;

_4 (e) What impact the imposition of the death penalty
has on

_5 county budgets, particularly in small counties, and what
budgetary

_6 steps can be taken to minimize the impacts; and

_7 (f) Whether the Special Pleadings Rules (Criminal),
issued by

_8 the Washington supreme court in 1997, have been
implemented

_9 statewide in a consistent and effective manner.

10 (2) The advisory committee shall be composed of:

11 (a) Two full-time prosecuting attorneys or deputy
prosecuting

12 attorneys appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting

13 attorneys;

14 (b) Two full-time criminal defense counsel, one
appointed by

15 the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers
and one

16 appointed by the office of public defense;

17 (c) The deans of the three law schools in Washington
or their

18 designees;

19 (d) One representative chosen by the governor; and

20 (e) A former judge of the superior court chosen by
the chief

21 justice.

22 Members of the advisory committee shall serve
without

23 additional compensation, but must be reimbursed for
their travel

24 expenses, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
44.04.120, incurred

25 while attending meetings of the advisory committee,
engaged in

26 other advisory committee business authorized by the
advisory

27 committee, or going to and coming from advisory committee

28 meetings.

29 (3) The Washington state institute for public policy
shall hire

30 a consultant, selected by the advisory committee, to
design and

31 perform the study. The consultant shall be an attorney
with a

32 thorough understanding of the roles of prosecution and
defense and

33 possess at least fifteen years' experience in assessing
the

34 provision of criminal defense by both private and public
defense

35 counsel.

36 (4) The Washington state institute for public policy
shall make

37 a report of advisory committee findings, conclusions,
and

SB 5787 p. 2

_1 recommendations to the legislature, governor, and
supreme court

_2 not later than June 1, 2002.

_3 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of two
hundred forty thousand

_4 dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated

_5 from the general fund to the
. . . . . . for the fiscal year ending

_6 June 30, 2002, to carry out the purposes of this act.
No more

_7 than one hundred fifty-five thousand dollars shall be
used to pay

_8 salaries, benefits, and associated costs of staff. A
maximum of

_9 eighty thousand dollars may be used for compensation of
a

10 consultant. A maximum of five thousand dollars shall be
set aside

11 for travel and expenses of the advisory board.

12 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act
expires June 30,

13 2002.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5787