BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.40.020 and 1999 c
361 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Auditor"
means the office of the state auditor.

(2)
"Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in any
department or agency of state government.

(3) "Good
faith" means a reasonable basis in fact for the communication. "Good
faith" is lacking when the employee knows or reasonably ought to know that
the report is malicious, false, or frivolous.

(4) "Gross waste
of funds" means to spend or use funds or to allow funds to be used without
valuable result in a manner grossly deviating from the standard of care or
competence that a reasonable person would observe in the same situation.

(5)(a) "Improper
governmental action" means any action by an employee undertaken in the
performance of the employee's official duties:

(i) Which is (([a]))
a gross waste of public funds or resources as defined in this section;

(ii) Which is in
violation of federal or state law or rule, if the violation is not merely
technical or of a minimum nature; or

(iii) Which is of
substantial and specific danger to the public health or safety.

(b) "Improper
governmental action" does not include personnel actions, for which other
remedies exist, including but not limited to employee grievances, complaints,
appointments, promotions, transfers, assignments, reassignments,
reinstatements, restorations, reemployments, performance evaluations,
reductions in pay, dismissals, suspensions, demotions, violations of the state
civil service law, alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, claims of
discriminatory treatment, or any action which may be taken under chapter 41.06
RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided in RCW 42.40.030.

(6) "Substantial
and specific danger" means a risk of serious injury, illness, peril, or
loss, to which the exposure of the public is a gross deviation from the
standard of care or competence which a reasonable person would observe in the
same situation.

(7) "Use of
official authority or influence" includes taking, directing others to
take, recommending, processing, or approving any personnel action such as an
appointment, promotion, transfer, assignment, reassignment, reinstatement,
restoration, reemployment, performance evaluation, or any adverse action under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action.

(8)
"Whistleblower" means an employee who in good faith reports alleged
improper governmental action to the auditor, initiating an investigation under
RCW 42.40.040. For purposes of the provisions of this chapter and chapter 49.60
RCW relating to reprisals and retaliatory action, the term
"whistleblower" also means: (a) An employee who in good faith
provides information to the auditor in connection with an investigation under
RCW 42.40.040 and an employee who is believed to have reported asserted
improper governmental action to the auditor or to have provided information to
the auditor in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 but who, in
fact, has not reported such action or provided such information; ((or))
(b) an employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting review or
provides information to the rules review committee, and an employee who is
believed to have identified rules warranting review or provided information to
the rules review committee but who, in fact, has not done so; or (c) an
employee who refuses to obey an order that he or she believes in good faith
would require him or her to violate a law.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.40.050 and 1999 c
283 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who is a
whistleblower, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, or any person who has reported
the alleged occurrence of improper governmental action to a public body,
and who has been subjected to workplace reprisal or retaliatory action is
presumed to have established a cause of action for the remedies provided under
chapter 49.60 RCW. For the purpose of this section, "public body"
means the employee's supervisor, law enforcement, attorney general, legislative
and executive branches of government, and other governmental authorities.
For the purpose of this section, "reprisal or retaliatory
action" means but is not limited to any of the following:

(a) Denial of adequate
staff to perform duties;

(b) Frequent staff
changes;

(c) Frequent and
undesirable office changes;

(d) Refusal to assign
meaningful work;

(e) Unwarranted and
unsubstantiated letters of reprimand or unsatisfactory performance evaluations;

(f) Demotion;

(g) Reduction in pay;

(h) Denial of
promotion;

(i) Suspension;

(j) Dismissal;

(k) Denial of
employment;

(l) A supervisor or
superior encouraging coworkers to behave in a hostile manner toward the
whistleblower; and

(m) A change in the
physical location of the employee's workplace or a change in the basic nature
of the employee's job, if either are in opposition to the employee's expressed
wish.

(2) The agency presumed
to have taken retaliatory action under subsection (1) of this section may rebut
that presumption by proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the agency
action or actions were justified by reasons unrelated to the employee's status
as a whistleblower.

(3)
Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from making any decision exercising
its authority to terminate, suspend, or discipline an employee who engages in
workplace reprisal or retaliatory action against a whistleblower. However, the
agency also shall implement any order under chapter 49.60 RCW (other than an
order of suspension if the agency has terminated the retaliator).

---
END ---