BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 42.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The director of the
department of personnel shall establish a rotational registry system to appoint
and monitor advocates for those whistleblowers who allege retaliation under RCW
42.40.050.

(2) Advocates shall be
limited to representation of the whistleblower under RCW 49.60.230 and
49.60.240, including the conference and conciliation stage under RCW
49.60.240. If the parties proceed under RCW 49.60.250 the human rights
commission shall provide representation.

(3) The advocate's
appointment by the department of personnel shall be pursuant to a contract of
employment awarded and administered by the department of personnel.

(4) To be eligible for
placement in the registry, a person must:

(a) Be admitted to the
practice of law in the state of Washington;

(b) Be engaged in
private practice;

(c) Not have provided
legal representation for the alleged retaliating agency for the five years
previous to the date on which his or her appointment to the case would occur;
and

(d) Be able to
demonstrate that he or she has completed training in arbitration or mediation.

The director may
establish additional criteria.

(5) Eligibility for a
whistleblower to receive appointment of an advocate on his or her behalf shall
be determined by the department of personnel and shall be limited to those
whistleblowers whose income is less than two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level for a person whose family size is the same as the whistleblower.

Whistleblowers who are
unemployed at the time they request appointment of an advocate under this
chapter are eligible to receive appointment of an advocate until such time as
they obtain employment at a level of compensation that would disqualify them
from eligibility under this section.

(6) The rotational
registry system shall list advocates in the order in which they are established
as being qualified by the department of personnel for listing on the registry.
A whistleblower who wishes to be represented by an advocate shall apply to the
department. The first three names on the list shall be given to the
whistleblower and the whistleblower shall select his or her representative from
among those three. If none of the first three choices is acceptable to the
whistleblower then the next three names shall be given to the whistleblower
from which to make his or her choice. If the whistleblower rejects the names
from the second list, he or she shall accept the next name on the list or seek
alternative representation at his or her own expense. The name of any advocate
who either serves or is rejected is placed, in order, on the bottom of the
list.

(7) The amount of
compensation for the advocate shall be calculated at the rate of one hundred
dollars per hour up to five thousand dollars which may include reasonable
litigation expenses. This shall constitute the sole and entire public
compensation of the advocate. Costs for all office, clerical, and other
support services required by the advocate shall be borne by the advocate.

The department of
personnel shall monitor compliance with the terms and conditions of the
contract. The department of personnel shall terminate any contract when the
department determines that the advocate has failed substantially to comply with
the terms and conditions of the contract. The whistleblower may terminate the
services of the advocate at any time for any cause. The secretary shall review
all terminations at the end of each year to determine whether an advocate has
failed substantially to comply with terms of his or her contracts. Any
advocate who is found to have failed substantially to comply may be removed
from the registry by the director.

(8) The registry is
established January 1, 2002, and may be used for any case open at the time of
its creation. The director of personnel shall adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.

(9) The department of
personnel shall report to the governor, the legislature, and the human rights
commission in January of every odd-numbered year. This report shall include
but not be limited to statistics on the use of the registry, costs to the
state, results of cases that received appointment of an advocate, time expended
between the filing of a complaint with the human rights commission and the
conclusion of the complaint, and any other matter of interest or use to the
governor or legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

A whistleblower who
alleges retaliation under RCW 42.40.050 may be eligible for an advocate
appointed pursuant to section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

A whistleblower who
alleges retaliation under RCW 42.40.050 may be eligible for an advocate
appointed pursuant to section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The sum of
. . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund
to the department of personnel for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

(2) The
sum of . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the
general fund to the department of personnel for the purposes of section 1 of
this act.

---
END ---