BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.522 and 1996 c
199 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person
is guilty of vehicular assault in the first degree if he or she
operates or drives any vehicle:

(((a))) (i)
In a reckless manner((,)) and ((this conduct is the proximate cause
of serious)) causes substantial bodily ((injury)) harm
to another; or

(((b))) (ii)
While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW
46.61.502, and ((this conduct is the proximate cause of serious)) causes
substantial bodily ((injury)) harm to another.

(((2) "Serious
bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves a substantial risk of
death, serious permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any part or organ of the body.

(3))) (b) Vehicular assault in the first
degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)(a) A person is
guilty of vehicular assault in the second degree if he or she, under
circumstances not amounting to vehicular assault in the first degree, operates
or drives any vehicle with criminal negligence and causes substantial bodily
harm to another.

(b) Vehicular
assault in the second degree is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20
RCW.

(3) As used in this
section, "substantial bodily harm" has the same meaning as in RCW
9A.04.110.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.010 and 1997 c 338
s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Firearm"
means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by
an explosive such as gunpowder.

(2) "Pistol"
means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches in length, or is
designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.

(3) "Rifle"
means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired
from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to
use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a
single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.

(4) "Short-barreled
rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less than sixteen inches
in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of modification if such
modified weapon has an overall length of less than twenty-six inches.

(5) "Shotgun"
means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or redesigned, made or
remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned,
made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed
shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a
single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.

(6)
"Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels
less than eighteen inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any
means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less
than twenty-six inches.

(7) "Machine
gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical rifle,
submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that the
trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt,
or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying
ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and
fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.

(8) "Antique
firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not designed or
redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed
ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any matchlock, flintlock,
percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and also any firearm using
fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no
longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the
ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(9) "Loaded"
means:

(a) There is a
cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;

(b) Cartridges are in a
clip that is locked in place in the firearm;

(c) There is a
cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a revolver;

(d) There is a
cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or

(e) There is a ball in
the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the firearm is a muzzle
loader.

(10) "Dealer"
means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms at wholesale or
retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms license under 18
U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not required to have, a
federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that
person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the
enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or part of
his or her personal collection of firearms.

(11) "Crime of
violence" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony,
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony,
manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent
liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree,
arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in
the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in the second
degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second degree;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, which is
comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony classified as a
crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(12) "Serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended:

(a) Any crime of
violence;

(b) Any felony
violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that is
classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of imprisonment of at
least ten years;

(c) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(d) Incest when committed
against a child under age fourteen;

(e) Indecent liberties;

(f) Leading organized
crime;

(g) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(h) Rape in the third
degree;

(i) Drive-by shooting;

(j) Sexual
exploitation;

(k) Vehicular assault in
the first degree;

(l) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(m) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as "sexual
motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(n) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125; or

(o) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is comparable to a serious
offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under
the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious offense.

(13) "Law
enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington peace officer
as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned Washington peace
officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement officer" also
includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW
10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a
concealed pistol.

(14) "Felony"
means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any federal or
out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws of this
state.

(15) "Sell"
refers to the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in consideration of
payment or promise of payment of a certain price in money.

(16) "Barrel
length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed action down the
length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or in the case of a
barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device permanently attached to
the end of the muzzle.

(17) "Family or
household member" means "family" or "household member"
as used in RCW 10.99.020.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2000 c
28 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.145, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the offender's
sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving payment
thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering daily
the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3) "Community
corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is
responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in
lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(2)(b),
9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.137, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or
9.94A.383, served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall
assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions
of community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(5) "Community
custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of community custody
included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as established by the
commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.040, for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 2000.

(6) "Community
placement" means that period during which the offender is subject to the
conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which begins either
upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such
time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned
release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(7) "Community
service" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the
benefit of the community by the offender.

(8) "Community
supervision" means a period of time during which a convicted offender is
subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions imposed by
a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the
court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to
his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for
out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be considered
the same as probation by other states.

(9)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(10)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(11)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(12) "Criminal
history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile
adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere. The
history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a) whether the
defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and
(b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(13) "Day
fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the
difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(14) "Day
reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the
offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in
which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(15)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(16) "Determinate
sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of
actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of
community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of community service
work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(17) "Disposable
earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after
the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be
withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means
compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as
wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any
other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment,
or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation,
specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement
programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title
74 RCW.

(18) "Drug
offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to persons
convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex offense and
who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(19) "Drug
offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(20) "Earned
release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW
9.94A.150.

(21) "Escape"
means:

(a) Escape in the first
degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful
failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from
work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for
supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(22) "Felony
traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(23) "Fine"
means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the
offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(24) "First-time
offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and
is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(25) "Home
detention" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders
wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to electronic
surveillance.

(26) "Legal
financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior
court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may
include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines,
and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(((b))) (a)(ii),
or vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident
resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(27) "Most serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) ((Vehicular
assault;

(r))) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by
the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the
operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(((s))) (r)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(((t))) (s)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(((u))) (t)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is
comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(((v))) (u)(i)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and
(c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979,
RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June
11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(28) "Nonviolent
offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(29)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender"
and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(30) "Partial
confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or
institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit
of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.

(31) "Persistent
offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse,
kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the
first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of sexual motivation; or
(C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection (31)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child
in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender
was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(32) "Postrelease
supervision" is that portion of an offender's community placement that is
not community custody.

(33)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(34) "Risk
assessment" means the application of an objective instrument supported by
research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm
done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk,
the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(35) "Serious
traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual
physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended
vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(36) "Serious
violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies;
or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(37) "Sex
offense" means:

(a) A felony that is a
violation of:

(i) Chapter 9A.44 RCW
other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) RCW 9A.64.020;

(iii) RCW 9.68A.090; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(38) "Sexual motivation"
means that one of the purposes for which the defendant committed the crime was
for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(39) "Standard
sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(40) "Statutory
maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender
may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW,
RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the maximum
penalty for a crime.

(41) "Total
confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050
and 72.64.060.

(42) "Transition
training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by
the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's
successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training
shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations
during the offender's period of community custody.

(43) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(44) "Violent
offense" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by
shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular
assault in the first degree; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(45) "Work
crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic
improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW 9.94A.135.

(46) "Work ethic
camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW
9.94A.137 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(47) "Work
release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who
are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.150 and 2000 c
28 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

No person serving a
sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the custody of the
department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility or be released
prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the term of the sentence of an
offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the department may be
reduced by earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for good
behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender with
earned release credits in advance of the offender actually earning the
credits. Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration. If an
offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the administrator
of a county jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time
spent in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23, 1995, that
involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or
(4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits or earned release time
for that portion of his or her sentence that results from any deadly weapon
enhancements. In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July
1, 1990, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifteen percent of
the sentence. In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;

(2)(a) A person
convicted of a sex offense or an offense categorized as a serious violent
offense, assault in the second degree, vehicular homicide, vehicular assault in
the first degree, assault of a child in the second degree, any crime
against persons where it is determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.125 that
the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of
commission, or any felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed
before July 1, 2000, may become eligible, in accordance with a program
developed by the department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu
of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

(b) A person convicted
of a sex offense, a violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW
9.94A.440(2), or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed
on or after July 1, 2000, may become eligible, in accordance with a program
developed by the department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu
of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

(3) An offender may
leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized furlough or leave of
absence. In addition, offenders may leave a correctional facility when in the
custody of a corrections officer or officers;

(4)(a) The secretary
may authorize an extraordinary medical placement for an offender when all of
the following conditions exist:

(i) The offender has a
medical condition that is serious enough to require costly care or treatment;

(ii) The offender poses
a low risk to the community because he or she is physically incapacitated due
to age or the medical condition; and

(iii) Granting the
extraordinary medical placement will result in a cost savings to the state.

(b) An offender
sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release
or parole is not eligible for an extraordinary medical placement.

(c) The secretary shall
require electronic monitoring for all offenders in extraordinary medical
placement unless the electronic monitoring equipment interferes with the
function of the offender's medical equipment or results in the loss of funding
for the offender's medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide
the monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.

(d) The secretary may
revoke an extraordinary medical placement under this subsection at any time.

(5) The governor, upon
recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may grant an extraordinary
release for reasons of serious health problems, senility, advanced age,
extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary circumstances;

(6) No more than the
final six months of the sentence may be served in partial confinement designed
to aid the offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in
the community;

(7) The governor may
pardon any offender;

(8) The department may
release an offender from confinement any time within ten days before a release
date calculated under this section; and

(9) An offender may
leave a correctional facility prior to completion of his or her sentence if the
sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW 9.94A.160.

Notwithstanding any
other provisions of this section, an offender sentenced for a felony crime
listed in RCW 9.94A.590 as subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total
confinement shall not be released from total confinement before the completion
of the listed mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction
unless allowed under RCW 9.94A.590, however persistent offenders are not
eligible for extraordinary medical placement.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2000 c
225 s 5, 2000 c 119 s 17, and 2000 c 66 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault 1 (RCW 46.61.522(1))

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.440 and 2000 c
119 s 28 and 2000 c 28 s 17 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Decision not to prosecute.

STANDARD: A
prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question or would result in decreased respect for the law.

GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The following are
examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the standard.

(a) Contrary to
Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent of
the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b) Antiquated Statute
- It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in question is
antiquated in that:

(i) It has not been
enforced for many years; and

(ii) Most members of
society act as if it were no longer in existence; and

(iii) It serves no
deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv) The statute has
not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This reason is not to
be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law in question is
unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c) De Minimus
Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the violation of law is
only technical or insubstantial and where no public interest or deterrent
purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d) Confinement on
Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because the accused has
been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of confinement; and

(i) Conviction of the
new offense would not merit any additional direct or collateral punishment;

(ii) The new offense is
either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly aggravated; and

(iii) Conviction of the
new offense would not serve any significant deterrent purpose.

(e) Pending Conviction
on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge because the accused
is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another county; and

(i) Conviction of the
new offense would not merit any additional direct or collateral punishment;

(ii) Conviction in the
pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii) The new offense
is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly aggravated; and

(iv) Conviction of the
new offense would not serve any significant deterrent purpose.

(f) High
Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on, prosecution
witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of prosecuting the
offense in question. This reason should be limited to minor cases and should
not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g) Improper Motives of
Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because the motives of the
complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no public purpose, would
defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or would result in
decreased respect for the law.

(h) Immunity - It may
be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given to an accused in
order to prosecute another where the accused's information or testimony will
reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible for more
serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the public
interest.

(i) Victim Request - It
may be proper to decline to charge because the victim requests that no criminal
charges be filed and the case involves the following crimes or situations:

(i) Assault cases where
the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii) Crimes against
property, not involving violence, where no major loss was suffered;

(iii) Where doing so
would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care should be taken to
insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not the product of
threats or pressure by the accused.

The presence of these
factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a prosecution which has been
commenced.

Notification

The prosecutor is
encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law enforcement
personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2) Decision to
prosecute.

(a) STANDARD:

Crimes against persons
will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which, when considered
with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised
under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable and objective
fact-finder. With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW 9A.44.040, 9A.44.050,
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020
the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or diversions intended to
place the accused in a program of treatment or counseling, so that treatment,
if determined to be beneficial, can be provided pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.

Crimes against
property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of such
convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

See table below for the
crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION
OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES
AGAINST PERSONS

Aggravated
Murder

1st Degree Murder

2nd Degree Murder

1st Degree Manslaughter

2nd Degree Manslaughter

1st Degree Kidnapping

2nd Degree Kidnapping

1st Degree Assault

2nd Degree Assault

3rd Degree Assault

1st Degree Assault of a
Child

2nd Degree Assault of a
Child

3rd Degree Assault of a
Child

1st Degree Rape

2nd Degree Rape

3rd Degree Rape

1st Degree Rape of a
Child

2nd Degree Rape of a
Child

3rd Degree Rape of a
Child

1st Degree Robbery

2nd Degree Robbery

1st Degree Arson

1st Degree Burglary

1st Degree Extortion

2nd Degree Extortion

Indecent Liberties

Incest

Vehicular Homicide

1st Degree
Vehicular Assault

2nd Degree Vehicular
Assault

1st Degree Child
Molestation

2nd Degree Child
Molestation

3rd Degree Child
Molestation

1st Degree Promoting
Prostitution

Intimidating a Juror

Communication with a
Minor

Intimidating a Witness

Intimidating a Public
Servant

Bomb Threat (if against
person)

Unlawful Imprisonment

Promoting a Suicide
Attempt

Riot (if against
person)

Stalking

Custodial Assault

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Counterfeiting (if a
violation of RCW 9.16.035(4))

CRIMES
AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES

2nd Degree
Arson

1st Degree
Escape

2nd Degree Escape

2nd Degree Burglary

1st Degree Theft

2nd Degree Theft

1st Degree Perjury

2nd Degree Perjury

1st Degree Introducing
Contraband

2nd Degree Introducing
Contraband

1st Degree Possession
of Stolen Property

2nd Degree Possession
of Stolen Property

Bribery

Bribing a Witness

Bribe received by a
Witness

Bomb Threat (if against
property)

1st Degree Malicious
Mischief

2nd Degree Malicious
Mischief

1st Degree Reckless
Burning

Taking a Motor Vehicle
without Authorization

Forgery

2nd Degree Promoting
Prostitution

Tampering with a
Witness

Trading in Public
Office

Trading in Special
Influence

Receiving/Granting
Unlawful Compensation

Bigamy

Eluding a Pursuing
Police Vehicle

Willful Failure to
Return from Furlough

Escape from Community
Custody

Riot (if against
property)

1st Degree Theft of
Livestock

2nd Degree Theft of
Livestock

ALL OTHER UNCLASSIFIED
FELONIES

Selection of
Charges/Degree of Charge

(i) The prosecutor
should file charges which adequately describe the nature of defendant's
conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are necessary to ensure
that the charges:

(A) Will significantly
enhance the strength of the state's case at trial; or

(B) Will result in
restitution to all victims.

(ii) The
prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea. Overcharging
includes:

(A)
Charging a higher degree;

(B) Charging additional
counts.

This standard is
intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which demonstrate the
nature and seriousness of a defendant's criminal conduct, but to decline to
charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication. Crimes which do
not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same course of conduct,
do not all have to be charged.

(b)
GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

(i) Police
Investigation

A prosecuting attorney
is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the necessary factual investigation
which must precede the decision to prosecute. The prosecuting attorney shall
ensure that a thorough factual investigation has been conducted before a
decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary circumstances the investigation
should include the following:

(A) The interviewing of
all material witnesses, together with the obtaining of written statements
whenever possible;

(B) The completion of
necessary laboratory tests; and

(C) The obtaining, in
accordance with constitutional requirements, of the suspect's version of the
events.

If the initial
investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist upon further
investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify what the
investigation needs to include.

(ii) Exceptions

In certain situations,
a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal complaint before the
investigation is complete if:

(A) Probable cause
exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(B) The suspect
presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee if not apprehended; or

(C) The arrest of the
suspect is necessary to complete the investigation of the crime.

In the event that the
exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting attorney shall obtain a
commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to complete the
investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation does not
produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the complaint
should be dismissed.

(iii) Investigation
Techniques

The prosecutor should
be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were used in the case
investigation including:

(A) Polygraph testing;

(B) Hypnosis;

(C) Electronic
surveillance;

(D) Use of informants.

(iv) Pre-Filing
Discussions with Defendant

Discussions with the
defendant or his/her representative regarding the selection or disposition of
charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential agreements can
be reached.

(v) Pre-Filing
Discussions with Victim(s)

Discussions with the
victim(s) or victims' representatives regarding the selection or disposition of
charges may occur before the filing of charges. The discussions may be
considered by the prosecutor in charging and disposition decisions, and should
be considered before reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding these
decisions.

Sec. 7. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2000
c 66 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION
AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile disposition

disposition category for attempt,

offense bailjump, conspiracy,

category description
(rcw citation) or solicitation

........................................

Arson
and Malicious Mischief

A Arson
1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson
2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless
Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless
Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious
Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious
Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3
(<$50 is

E
class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm

Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary
Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and Other Crimes

Involving Physical Harm

A Assault
1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault
2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault
3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault
4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion
(9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial
Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary
and Trespass

B+ Burglary
1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary
2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession
of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal
Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2
(9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1
(9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle
Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of
Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend
Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession
of Legend

Drug with Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam

Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic
Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of Marihuana
<40 grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining
Controlled

Substance
(69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance

for
Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful
Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1)
(iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform
Controlled

Substances
Act - Possession of a

Controlled Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms
and Weapons

B Theft
of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol
Without

Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by
Minor (<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous
Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person
by use

of
Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder
1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder
2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter
1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter
2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular
Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap
1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap
2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing Governmental
Operation

D Obstructing a Law
Enforcement

Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting
Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public
Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot
with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse
(9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly
Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape
1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape
2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape
3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape
of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape
of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest
1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest
2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure

(Victim
<14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent
Exposure

(Victim
14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting
Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O
& A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent
Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child
Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child
Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion,
and Forgery

B Theft
1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft
2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft
3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft
of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery
(9A.60.020) D

A Robbery
1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery
2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion
1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion
2 (9A.56.130) D+

B Possession of Stolen
Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen
Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen
Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without

Owner's
Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License

(46.20.005) E

B+ Hit
and Run - Death

(46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury

(46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular
Assault 1 (46.61.522(1)) D

D Vehicular
Assault 2 (46.61.522(2)) E

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing

Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless
Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the
Influence

(46.61.502
and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb
Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape
11
(9A.76.110) C

C Escape
21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape
3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone
Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation
of Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C
offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd escape or attempted
escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd and subsequent
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement

2If
the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose
a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE
SENTENCING STANDARDS

This
schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing
option A, B, or C.

OPTION
A

JUVENILE
OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD
RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the
grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1) The vertical axis
of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is
determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2) The horizontal axis
of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's
criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point.
Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count
as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.

(3) The standard range
disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column
defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense
category.

(4) RCW 13.40.180
applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.

(5) A current offense
that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a
disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile
offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to
36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court
may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court
determines that a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest
injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range
under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec. 8. RCW 38.52.430 and 1993 c
251 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A person whose
intoxication causes an incident resulting in an appropriate emergency response,
and who, in connection with the incident, has been found guilty of or has had
their prosecution deferred for (1) driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.502; (2) operating an aircraft under
the influence of intoxicants or drugs, RCW 47.68.220; (3) use of a vessel while
under the influence of alcohol or drugs, RCW ((88.12.100)) 79A.60.040;
(4) vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a); or (5) vehicular assault while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522 (1)(((b))) (a)(ii),
is liable for the expense of an emergency response by a public agency to the
incident.

The expense of an
emergency response is a charge against the person liable for expenses under
this section. The charge constitutes a debt of that person and is collectible
by the public agency incurring those costs in the same manner as in the case of
an obligation under a contract, expressed or implied.

In no event shall a
person's liability under this section for the expense of an emergency response
exceed one thousand dollars for a particular incident.

If more than one public
agency makes a claim for payment from an individual for an emergency response
to a single incident under the provisions of this section, and the sum of the
claims exceeds the amount recovered, the division of the amount recovered shall
be determined by an interlocal agreement consistent with the requirements of
chapter 39.34 RCW.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.20.391 and 1999 c
274 s 4 and 1999 c 272 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person licensed
under this chapter who is convicted of an offense relating to motor vehicles
for which suspension or revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other
than vehicular homicide or vehicular assault in the first degree, or who
has had his or her license suspended under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), may
submit to the department an application for an occupational driver's license.
The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that
the petitioner is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential
that the petitioner operate a motor vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's
license and may set definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No
person may petition for, and the department shall not issue, an occupational
driver's license that is effective during the first thirty days of any
suspension or revocation imposed either for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 or under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or for both a violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a) where the
action arises from the same incident. A person aggrieved by the decision of
the department on the application for an occupational driver's license may
request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.

(2)(a) A person
licensed under this chapter whose driver's license is suspended
administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic ticket under RCW 46.20.289;
a violation of the financial responsibility laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or
for multiple violations within a specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291,
may apply to the department for an occupational driver's license if the
applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that one of the
following additional conditions are met:

(i) The applicant is in
an apprenticeship program or an on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required;

(ii) The applicant
presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position in an
apprenticeship or on-the-job training program and the program has certified
that a driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect no longer than fourteen
days;

(iii) The applicant is
in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a WorkFirst program
pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully employed and the program
requires a driver's license; or

(iv) The applicant is
undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in meetings of a
twelve-step group such as alcoholics anonymous.

(b) If the suspension
is for failure to respond, pay, or comply with a notice of traffic infraction
or conviction, the applicant must enter into a payment plan with the court.

(c) An occupational
driver's license issued to an applicant described in (a) of this subsection
shall be valid for the period of the suspension or revocation but not more than
two years.

(d) Upon receipt of
evidence that a holder of an occupational driver's license granted under this
subsection is no longer enrolled in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training
program, the director shall give written notice by first class mail to the
driver that the occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective
date of cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the
notice. If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the cancellation shall
be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no
additional charge, a new occupational driver's license upon submittal of
evidence of enrollment in another program that meets the criteria set forth in
this subsection.

(e) The department
shall not issue an occupational driver's license under (a)(iv) of this
subsection if the applicant is able to receive transit services sufficient to
allow for the applicant's participation in the programs referenced under
(a)(iv) of this subsection.

(3) An applicant for an
occupational driver's license is eligible to receive such license only if:

(a) Within one year
immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present
conviction, the applicant has not committed any offense relating to motor
vehicles for which suspension or revocation of a driver's license is mandatory;
and

(b) Within seven years
immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to the present
conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed any of the following
offenses: (i) Driving or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii) vehicular homicide under
RCW 46.61.520; or (iii) vehicular assault in the first degree under RCW
46.61.522(1); and

(c) The applicant is
engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that he or she
operate a motor vehicle, except as allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section; and

(d) The applicant files
satisfactory proof of financial responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.

(4) The director shall
cancel an occupational driver's license upon receipt of notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of its
restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter 46.20 RCW would
warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license. The
cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and continues with
the same force and effect as any suspension or revocation under this title.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.61.524 and 2000 c
28 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person convicted
under RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or 46.61.522(1)(((b))) (a)(ii) shall,
as a condition of community ((supervision)) custody imposed under
RCW 9.94A.383 or community placement imposed under RCW 9.94A.660, complete a
diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or drug dependency agency approved by the
department of social and health services or a qualified probation department,
as defined under RCW 46.61.516 that has been approved by the department of
social and health services. This report shall be forwarded to the department
of licensing. If the person is found to have an alcohol or drug problem that
requires treatment, the person shall complete treatment in a program approved
by the department of social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. If
the person is found not to have an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment,
he or she shall complete a course in an information school approved by the
department of social and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW. The
convicted person shall pay all costs for any evaluation, education, or
treatment required by this section, unless the person is eligible for an
existing program offered or approved by the department of social and health
services. Nothing in chapter 348, Laws of 1991 requires the addition of new
treatment or assessment facilities nor affects the department of social and
health services use of existing programs and facilities authorized by law.

(2) As
provided for under RCW 46.20.285, the department shall revoke the license,
permit to drive, or a nonresident privilege of a person convicted of vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522. The
department shall determine the eligibility of a person convicted of vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or vehicular assault under RCW
46.61.522(1)(((b))) (a)(ii) to receive a license based upon the
report provided by the designated alcoholism treatment facility or probation
department, and shall deny reinstatement until satisfactory progress in an
approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified.

---
END ---