BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.96.041 and 1993 c
449 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever an action
or proceeding for damages is brought against any past or present officer, employee,
or volunteer of a local governmental entity of this state, arising from acts or
omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform his or her
official duties, such officer, employee, or volunteer may request the local
governmental entity to authorize the defense of the action or proceeding at the
expense of the local governmental entity.

(2)(a) If the
legislative authority of the local governmental entity, or the local
governmental entity using a procedure created by ordinance or resolution, finds
that the acts or omissions of the officer, employee, or volunteer were, or in
good faith purported to be, within the scope of his or her official duties, the
request shall be granted. If the request is granted, the necessary expenses of
defending the action or proceeding shall be paid by the local governmental
entity.

However, the
legislative authority may revoke or rescind the granting of the request, and
decline to pay further expenses if it finds, following the same procedure, that
the acts or omissions of the officer, employee, or volunteer were not, or in
good faith did not purport to be, within the scope of his or her official
duties.

(b) Any monetary
judgment against the officer, employee, or volunteer shall be paid on approval
of the legislative authority of the local governmental entity or by a procedure
for approval created by ordinance or resolution.

(3) The necessary
expenses of defending an elective officer of the local governmental entity in a
judicial hearing to determine the sufficiency of a recall charge as provided in
RCW 29.82.023 shall be paid by the local governmental entity if the officer
requests such defense and approval is granted by both the legislative authority
of the local governmental entity and the attorney representing the local
governmental entity. The expenses paid by the local governmental entity may
include costs associated with an appeal of the decision rendered by the
superior court concerning the sufficiency of the recall charge.

(4) When an officer,
employee, or volunteer of the local governmental entity has been represented at
the expense of the local governmental entity under subsection (1) of this
section and the court hearing the action has found that the officer, employee,
or volunteer was acting within the scope of his or her official duties, and a
judgment has been entered against the officer, employee, or volunteer under
chapter 4.96 RCW or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq., thereafter the judgment
creditor shall seek satisfaction for nonpunitive damages only from the local
governmental entity, and judgment for nonpunitive damages shall not become a
lien upon any property of such officer, employee, or volunteer. The
legislative authority of a local governmental entity may, pursuant to a
procedure created by ordinance or resolution, agree to pay an award for
punitive damages.

(5)(a) When a law
enforcement officer makes a request for defense under subsection (1) of this
section, the determination under subsection (2) of this section as to whether
or not the acts or omissions of the law enforcement officer were, or in good
faith purported to be, within the scope of his or her official duties shall be
made within sixty days. If the request is granted, the necessary expenses of
defending the action or proceeding shall be paid by the local governmental
entity. The proceedings conducted under subsection (2) of this section may be
conducted in executive session in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW and all
meetings, proceedings, and deliberations of the legislative authority of the
local governmental entity with regard to the request of the officer, law
enforcement officer, employee, or volunteer is confidential. However, the
final action of the legislative authority as to the acceptance or denial of the
request, or revocation or revision of a previous decision, must be done in
public session. The proceedings, reports, or written records of the
legislative authority, or of a member, employee, staff person, or investigator
of the legislative authority, are not subject to the public disclosure act,
chapter 42.17 RCW.

(b) When a law
enforcement officer of the local governmental entity has been represented at
the expense of the local governmental entity under subsection (1) of this
section and the court hearing the action has found that the law enforcement
officer was acting within the scope of his or her official duties, and a
judgment has been entered against the law enforcement officer under this
chapter or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq., any monetary judgment against the law
enforcement officer shall be paid by the legislative authority of the local
governmental entity, and thereafter the judgment creditor shall seek
satisfaction for damages only from the local governmental entity, and judgment
for damages shall not become a lien upon any property of such law enforcement
officer.

(c) For
the purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer" has the
meaning provided in RCW 9.41.010.

--- END ---