BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.88.045 and 1996 c
249 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Alleged
incapacitated individuals shall have the right to be represented by willing
counsel of their choosing at any stage in guardianship proceedings. The court
shall provide counsel to represent any alleged incapacitated person at public
expense when either: (i) The individual is unable to afford counsel, or (ii)
the expense of counsel would result in substantial hardship to the individual,
or (iii) the individual does not have practical access to funds with which to
pay counsel. If the individual can afford counsel but lacks practical access
to funds, the court shall provide counsel and may impose a reimbursement
requirement as part of a final order. When, in the opinion of the court, the
rights and interests of an alleged or adjudicated incapacitated person cannot
otherwise be adequately protected and represented, the court on its own motion
shall appoint an attorney at any time to represent such person. Counsel shall
be provided as soon as practicable after a petition is filed and long enough
before any final hearing to allow adequate time for consultation and
preparation. Absent a convincing showing in the record to the contrary, a
period of less than three weeks shall be presumed by a reviewing court to be
inadequate time for consultation and preparation.

(b) Counsel for an
alleged incapacitated individual shall act as an advocate for the client and
shall not substitute counsel's own judgment for that of the client on the
subject of what may be in the client's best interests. Counsel's role shall be
distinct from that of the guardian ad litem, who is expected to promote the
best interest of the alleged incapacitated individual, rather than the alleged
incapacitated individual's expressed preferences.

(c) If an alleged
incapacitated person is represented by counsel and does not communicate with
counsel, counsel may ask the court for leave to withdraw for that reason. If
satisfied, after affording the alleged incapacitated person an opportunity for
a hearing, that the request is justified, the court may grant the request and
allow the case to proceed with the alleged incapacitated person unrepresented.

(2) During the pendency
of any guardianship, any attorney purporting to represent a person alleged or
adjudicated to be incapacitated shall petition to be appointed to represent the
incapacitated or alleged incapacitated person. Fees for representation
described in this section shall be subject to approval by the court pursuant to
the provisions of RCW 11.92.180.

(3) The alleged
incapacitated person is further entitled to testify and present evidence and,
upon request, entitled to a jury trial on the issues of his or her alleged
incapacity. The standard of proof to be applied in a contested case, whether
before a jury or the court, shall be that of clear, cogent, and convincing
evidence.

(4) In all proceedings
for appointment of a guardian or limited guardian, the court must be presented
with a written report from a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71
or 18.57 RCW ((or licensed or certified)), psychologist licensed
under chapter 18.83 RCW, or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, selected by the guardian ad litem. If the alleged
incapacitated person opposes the health care professional selected by the
guardian ad litem to prepare the medical report, then the guardian ad litem
shall use the health care professional selected by the alleged incapacitated
person. The guardian ad litem may also obtain a supplemental examination. The
physician ((or)), psychologist, or advanced registered nurse
practitioner shall have personally examined and interviewed the alleged
incapacitated person within thirty days of preparation of the report to the
court and shall have expertise in the type of disorder or incapacity the
alleged incapacitated person is believed to have. The report shall contain the
following information and shall be set forth in substantially the following
format:

(a) The name and
address of the examining physician ((or)), psychologist, or
advanced registered nurse practitioner;

(b) The education and
experience of the physician ((or)), psychologist, or advanced
registered nurse practitioner pertinent to the case;

(c) The dates of
examinations of the alleged incapacitated person;

(d) A summary of the
relevant medical, functional, neurological, ((psychological, or psychiatric))
or mental health history of the alleged incapacitated person as known to
the examining physician ((or)), psychologist, or advanced
registered nurse practitioner;

(e) The findings of the
examining physician ((or)), psychologist, or advanced
registered nurse practitioner as to the condition of the alleged
incapacitated person;

(f) Current
medications;

(g) The effect of
current medications on the alleged incapacitated person's ability to understand
or participate in guardianship proceedings;

(h) Opinions on the
specific assistance the alleged incapacitated person needs;

(i) Identification of
persons with whom the physician ((or)), psychologist, or
advanced registered nurse practitioner has met or spoken regarding the
alleged incapacitated person.

The court shall not
enter an order appointing a guardian or limited guardian until a medical or ((psychological))
mental status report meeting the above requirements is filed.

The requirement of
filing a medical report is waived if the basis of the guardianship is minority.

(5) During
the pendency of an action to establish a guardianship, a petitioner or any
person may move for temporary relief under chapter 7.40 RCW, to protect the
alleged incapacitated person from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation,
as those terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020, or to address any other emergency
needs of the alleged incapacitated person. Any alternative arrangement
executed before filing the petition for guardianship shall remain effective
unless the court grants the relief requested under chapter 7.40 RCW, or unless,
following notice and a hearing at which all parties directly affected by the
arrangement are present, the court finds that the alternative arrangement
should not remain effective.

--- END ---