BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16.381 and 1999 c
136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
grant special parking privileges to any person who has a disability that limits
or impairs the ability to walk and meets one of the following criteria, as
determined by a licensed physician or an advanced registered nurse
practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW:

(a) Cannot walk two
hundred feet without stopping to rest;

(b) Is severely limited
in ability to walk due to arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition;

(c) Is so severely
disabled, that the person cannot walk without the use of or assistance from a
brace, cane, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive
device;

(d) Uses portable
oxygen;

(e) Is restricted by
lung disease to such an extent that forced expiratory respiratory volume, when
measured by spirometry is less than one liter per second or the arterial oxygen
tension is less than sixty mm/hg on room air at rest;

(f) Impairment by
cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to the extent that the person's
functional limitations are classified as class III or IV under standards
accepted by the American Heart Association; or

(g) Has a disability
resulting from an acute sensitivity to automobile emissions which limits or
impairs the ability to walk. The personal physician of the applicant shall
document that the disability is comparable in severity to the others listed in
this subsection.

(2) The applications
for disabled parking permits and temporary disabled parking permits are
official state documents. Knowingly providing false information in conjunction
with the application is a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20
RCW. The following statement must appear on each application form immediately
below the physician's signature and immediately below the applicant's
signature: "A disabled parking permit may be issued only for a medical
necessity that severely affects mobility (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly providing
false information on this application is a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is
up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."

(3) Persons who qualify
for special parking privileges are entitled to receive from the department of
licensing a removable windshield placard bearing the international symbol of
access and an individual serial number, along with a special identification
card bearing the name and date of birth of the person to whom the placard is
issued, and the placard's serial number. The special identification card shall
be issued no later than January 1, 2000, to all persons who are issued parking
placards, including those issued for temporary disabilities, and special
disabled parking license plates. By July 1, 2001, the department shall
incorporate a photograph of the holder of the disabled parking permit into all
special identification cards issued after that date. The department, in
conjunction with the governor's committee on disability issues and employment,
shall assess options for issuing a photo identification card to each person who
qualifies for a permanent parking placard, a temporary parking placard, or a
special disabled parking license plate and report findings to the legislative
transportation committee no later than December 31, 2000. The department shall
design the placard to be displayed when the vehicle is parked by suspending it
from the rearview mirror, or in the absence of a rearview mirror the card may be
displayed on the dashboard of any vehicle used to transport the disabled
person. Instead of regular motor vehicle license plates, disabled persons are
entitled to receive special license plates bearing the international symbol of
access for one vehicle registered in the disabled person's name. Disabled
persons who are not issued the special license plates are entitled to receive a
second special placard upon submitting a written request to the department.
Persons who have been issued the parking privileges and who are using a vehicle
or are riding in a vehicle displaying the special license plates or placard may
park in places reserved for mobility disabled persons. The director shall
adopt rules providing for the issuance of special placards and license plates
to public transportation authorities, nursing homes licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, senior citizen
centers, private nonprofit agencies as defined in chapter 24.03 RCW, and
vehicles registered with the department as cabulances that regularly transport
disabled persons who have been determined eligible for special parking
privileges provided under this section. The director may issue special license
plates for a vehicle registered in the name of the public transportation
authority, nursing home, boarding homes, senior citizen center, private
nonprofit agency, or cabulance service if the vehicle is primarily used to
transport persons with disabilities described in this section. Public
transportation authorities, nursing homes, boarding homes, senior citizen
centers, private nonprofit agencies, and cabulance services are responsible for
insuring that the special placards and license plates are not used improperly
and are responsible for all fines and penalties for improper use.

(4) Whenever the
disabled person transfers or assigns his or her interest in the vehicle, the
special license plates shall be removed from the motor vehicle. If another
vehicle is acquired by the disabled person and the vehicle owner qualifies for
a special plate, the plate shall be attached to the vehicle, and the director
shall be immediately notified of the transfer of the plate. If another vehicle
is not acquired by the disabled person, the removed plate shall be immediately
surrendered to the director.

(5) The special license
plate shall be renewed in the same manner and at the time required for the
renewal of regular motor vehicle license plates under this chapter. No special
license plate may be issued to a person who is temporarily disabled. A person
who has a condition expected to improve within six months may be issued a
temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If the condition
exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be issued upon receipt of
a new certification from the disabled person's physician. The permanent
parking placard and identification card of a disabled person shall be renewed
at least every five years, as required by the director, by satisfactory proof
of the right to continued use of the privileges. In the event of the permit
holder's death, the parking placard and identification card must be immediately
surrendered to the department. The department shall match and purge its
disabled permit data base with available death record information at least
every twelve months.

(6) Each person who has
been issued a permanent disabled parking permit on or before July 1, 1998, must
renew the permit no later than July 1, 2003, subject to a schedule to be set by
the department, or the permit will expire.

(7) Additional fees
shall not be charged for the issuance of the special placards or the
identification cards. No additional fee may be charged for the issuance of the
special license plates except the regular motor vehicle registration fee and
any other fees and taxes required to be paid upon registration of a motor
vehicle.

(8) Any unauthorized
use of the special placard, special license plate, or identification card is a
traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars.

(9) It is a parking
infraction, with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for a person
to make inaccessible the access aisle located next to a space reserved for
physically disabled persons. The clerk of the court shall report all
violations related to this subsection to the department.

(10) It is a parking
infraction, with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for any person
to park a vehicle in a parking place provided on private property without
charge or on public property reserved for physically disabled persons without a
special license plate or placard. If a person is charged with a violation, the
person shall not be determined to have committed an infraction if the person
produces in court or before the court appearance the special license plate or
placard required under this section. A local jurisdiction providing
nonmetered, on-street parking places reserved for physically disabled persons
may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use
of these parking places. A local jurisdiction may impose by ordinance time
restrictions of no less than four hours on the use of nonreserved, on-street
parking spaces by vehicles displaying the special parking placards. All time
restrictions must be clearly posted.

(11) The penalties
imposed under subsections (9) and (10) of this section shall be used by that
local jurisdiction exclusively for law enforcement. The court may also impose
an additional penalty sufficient to reimburse the local jurisdiction for any
costs it may have incurred in removal and storage of the improperly parked
vehicle.

(12) Except as provided
by subsection (2) of this section, it is a traffic infraction with a monetary
penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for any person willfully to obtain a
special license plate, placard, or identification card in a manner other than
that established under this section.

(13)(a) A law
enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws may appoint volunteers,
with a limited commission, to issue notices of infractions for violations of
this section or RCW 46.61.581. Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of
age. The law enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications the agency deems desirable.

(b) An agency
appointing volunteers under this section must provide training to the
volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of infractions.

(c) A notice of
infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under this subsection has the same
force and effect as a notice of infraction issued by a police officer for the
same offense.

(d) A police officer or
a volunteer may request a person to show the person's identification card or
special parking placard when investigating the possibility of a violation of
this section. If the request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle
may be issued a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.

(14) For second or
subsequent violations of this section, in addition to a monetary fine, the
violator must complete a minimum of forty hours of:

(a) Community service
for a nonprofit organization that serves the disabled community or persons
having disabling diseases; or

(b) Any other community
service that may sensitize the violator to the needs and obstacles faced by
persons who have disabilities.

(15) The
court may not suspend more than one-half of any fine imposed under subsection
(8), (9), (10), or (12) of this section.

--- END ---