BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.79.050 and 2000 c
64 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

"Advanced
registered nursing practice" means the performance of the acts of a
registered nurse and the performance of an expanded role in providing health
care services as recognized by the medical and nursing professions, the scope
of which is defined by rule by the commission. Upon approval by the
commission, an advanced registered nurse practitioner may prescribe legend
drugs and controlled substances contained in Schedules II through V of
the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW((, and Schedules II
through IV subject to RCW 18.79.240(1) (r) or (s))).

Nothing in this section
prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been
issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law
of the state of Washington.

This section does not
prohibit (1) the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an
unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be an advanced
registered nurse practitioner, or (2) the practice of registered nursing by a
licensed registered nurse or the practice of licensed practical nursing by a
licensed practical nurse.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.79.240 and 2000 c
64 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the context of
the definition of registered nursing practice and advanced registered nursing
practice, this chapter shall not be construed as:

(a) Prohibiting the
incidental care of the sick by domestic servants or persons primarily employed
as housekeepers, so long as they do not practice registered nursing within the
meaning of this chapter;

(b) Preventing a person
from the domestic administration of family remedies or the furnishing of
nursing assistance in case of emergency;

(c) Prohibiting the
practice of nursing by students enrolled in approved schools as may be
incidental to their course of study or prohibiting the students from working as
nursing aides;

(d) Prohibiting
auxiliary services provided by persons carrying out duties necessary for the
support of nursing services, including those duties that involve minor nursing
services for persons performed in hospitals, nursing homes, or elsewhere under
the direction of licensed physicians or the supervision of licensed registered
nurses;

(e) Prohibiting the
practice of nursing in this state by a legally qualified nurse of another state
or territory whose engagement requires him or her to accompany and care for a
patient temporarily residing in this state during the period of one such
engagement, not to exceed six months in length, if the person does not
represent or hold himself or herself out as a registered nurse licensed to
practice in this state;

(f) Prohibiting nursing
or care of the sick, with or without compensation, when done in connection with
the practice of the religious tenets of a church by adherents of the church so
long as they do not engage in the practice of nursing as defined in this
chapter;

(g) Prohibiting the
practice of a legally qualified nurse of another state who is employed by the
United States government or a bureau, division, or agency thereof, while in the
discharge of his or her official duties;

(h) Permitting the measurement
of the powers or range of human vision, or the determination of the
accommodation and refractive state of the human eye or the scope of its
functions in general, or the fitting or adaptation of lenses for the aid
thereof;

(i) Permitting the prescribing
or directing the use of, or using, an optical device in connection with ocular
exercises, visual training, vision training, or orthoptics;

(j) Permitting the
prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting and adaptation of contact
lenses to, the human eye;

(k) Prohibiting the
performance of routine visual screening;

(l) Permitting the
practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in chapters 18.32 and 18.29
RCW, respectively;

(m) Permitting the
practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter 18.25 RCW including the
adjustment or manipulation of the articulation of the spine;

(n) Permitting the
practice of podiatric medicine and surgery as defined in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(o) Permitting the
performance of major surgery, except such minor surgery as the commission may
have specifically authorized by rule adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW;

(p) Permitting the
prescribing of controlled substances as defined in Schedule((s)) I ((through
IV)) of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW((,
except as provided in (r) or (s) of this subsection));

(q) Prohibiting the
determination and pronouncement of death((;

(r) Prohibiting
advanced registered nurse practitioners, approved by the commission as
certified registered nurse anesthetists from selecting, ordering, or
administering controlled substances as defined in Schedules II through IV of
the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, consistent with their
commission-recognized scope of practice; subject to facility-specific
protocols, and subject to a request for certified registered nurse anesthetist
anesthesia services issued by a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an
osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist
licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, or a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed
under chapter 18.22 RCW; the authority to select, order, or administer Schedule
II through IV controlled substances being limited to those drugs that are to be
directly administered to patients who require anesthesia for diagnostic,
operative, obstetrical, or therapeutic procedures in a hospital, clinic,
ambulatory surgical facility, or the office of a practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.71, 18.22, 18.36, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.57A, or 18.32 RCW;
"select" meaning the decision-making process of choosing a drug,
dosage, route, and time of administration; and "order" meaning the process
of directing licensed individuals pursuant to their statutory authority to
directly administer a drug or to dispense, deliver, or distribute a drug for
the purpose of direct administration to a patient, under instructions of the
certified registered nurse anesthetist. "Protocol" means a statement
regarding practice and documentation concerning such items as categories of
patients, categories of medications, or categories of procedures rather than
detailed case-specific formulas for the practice of nurse anesthesia;

(s) Prohibiting
advanced registered nurse practitioners from ordering or prescribing controlled
substances as defined in Schedules II through IV of the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, if and to the extent: (i) Doing so is
permitted by their scope of practice; (ii) it is in response to a combined
request from one or more physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW
and an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under this chapter,
proposing a joint practice arrangement under which such prescriptive authority
will be exercised with appropriate collaboration between the practitioners; and
(iii) it is consistent with rules adopted under this subsection. The medical
quality assurance commission, the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery,
and the commission are directed to jointly adopt by consensus by rule a process
and criteria that implements the joint practice arrangements authorized under
this subsection. This subsection (1)(s) does not apply to certified registered
nurse anesthetists)).

(2) In the context of
the definition of licensed practical nursing practice, this chapter shall not
be construed as:

(a) Prohibiting the
incidental care of the sick by domestic servants or persons primarily employed
as housekeepers, so long as they do not practice practical nursing within the
meaning of this chapter;

(b) Preventing a person
from the domestic administration of family remedies or the furnishing of
nursing assistance in case of emergency;

(c) Prohibiting the
practice of practical nursing by students enrolled in approved schools as may
be incidental to their course of study or prohibiting the students from working
as nursing assistants;

(d) Prohibiting
auxiliary services provided by persons carrying out duties necessary for the
support of nursing services, including those duties that involve minor nursing
services for persons performed in hospitals, nursing homes, or elsewhere under
the direction of licensed physicians or the supervision of licensed registered
nurses;

(e) Prohibiting or
preventing the practice of nursing in this state by a legally qualified nurse
of another state or territory whose engagement requires him or her to accompany
and care for a patient temporarily residing in this state during the period of
one such engagement, not to exceed six months in length, if the person does not
represent or hold himself or herself out as a licensed practical nurse licensed
to practice in this state;

(f) Prohibiting nursing
or care of the sick, with or without compensation, when done in connection with
the practice of the religious tenets of a church by adherents of the church so
long as they do not engage in licensed practical nurse practice as defined in
this chapter;

(g) Prohibiting the
practice of a legally qualified nurse of another state who is employed by the
United States government or any bureau, division, or agency thereof, while in
the discharge of his or her official duties.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.79.250 and 2000 c
64 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

An advanced registered
nurse practitioner under his or her license may perform for compensation
nursing care, as that term is usually understood, of the ill, injured, or
infirm, and in the course thereof, she or he may do the following things that
shall not be done by a person not so licensed, except as provided in RCW
18.79.260 and 18.79.270:

(1) Perform specialized
and advanced levels of nursing as recognized jointly by the medical and nursing
professions, as defined by the commission;

(2) Prescribe legend
drugs and Schedules II through V controlled substances, as defined in
the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, ((and Schedules II
through IV subject to RCW 18.79.240(1) (r) or (s))) within the scope of
practice defined by the commission;

(3) Perform all acts
provided in RCW 18.79.260;

(4) Hold herself or
himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as an advanced
registered nurse practitioner or as a nurse practitioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 18.57.280 (Joint practice
arrangements) and 2000 c 64 s 6;

(2) RCW 18.71.370 (Joint practice
arrangements) and 2000 c 64 s 5; and

(3) RCW 18.79.320 (Joint practice
arrangements) and 2000 c 64 s 7.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---