BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.04.030 and 1998 c
230 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and treatment, including
care provided by physician assistants governed by the provisions of chapters
18.57A and 18.71A RCW, acting under a supervising physician, ((and))
including chiropractic care, and including care provided by licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioners, to workers injured during the
course of their employment at the least cost consistent with promptness and
efficiency, without discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity
as the various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of
industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time, establish and
adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms, rules, regulations,
and practices for the furnishing of such care and treatment: PROVIDED, That
the medical coverage decisions of the department do not constitute a
"rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor are such decisions subject
to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW except that criteria for
establishing medical coverage decisions shall be adopted by rule after
consultation with the workers' compensation advisory committee established in
RCW 51.04.110: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may recommend to an
injured worker particular health care services and providers where specialized
treatment is indicated or where cost effective payment levels or rates are
obtained by the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may
enter into contracts for goods and services including, but not limited to, durable
medical equipment so long as statewide access to quality service is maintained
for injured workers.

(2) The director shall,
in consultation with interested persons, establish and, in his or her
discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make available a fee
schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician, surgeon,
chiropractor, hospital, druggist, licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner, physicians' assistants as defined in chapters 18.57A and
18.71A RCW, acting under a supervising physician or other agency or person
rendering services to injured workers. The department shall coordinate with
other state purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency
and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into account
the unique requirements and differences between programs. No service covered
under this title, including services provided to injured workers, whether
aliens or other injured workers, who are not residing in the United States at
the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates
exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for
greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a
schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency
action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule
constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16).

(3) The director or
self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a record of the commencement of
every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills are rendered for
the care and treatment of injured workers, shall approve and pay those which
conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and
practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in
violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules,
regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations adopted
under it.

Sec. 2. RCW 51.04.050 and 1961 c
23 s 51.04.050 are each amended to read as follows:

In all hearings,
actions or proceedings before the department or the board of industrial
insurance appeals, or before any court on appeal from the board, any physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner having theretofore examined
or treated the claimant may be required to testify fully regarding such
examination or treatment, and shall not be exempt from so testifying by reason
of the relation of the physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner to patient.

Sec. 3. RCW 51.28.010 and 2001 c
231 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any
accident occurs to any worker it shall be the duty of such worker or someone in
his or her behalf to forthwith report such accident to his or her employer,
superintendent, or supervisor in charge of the work, and of the employer to at
once report such accident and the injury resulting therefrom to the department
pursuant to RCW 51.28.025 where the worker has received treatment from a
physician or a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, has been
hospitalized, disabled from work, or has died as the apparent result of such
accident and injury.

(2) Upon receipt of such
notice of accident, the department shall immediately forward to the worker or
his or her beneficiaries or dependents notification, in nontechnical language,
of their rights under this title. The notice must specify the worker's right
to receive health services from a physician or a licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010,
including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and must list the types of
providers authorized to provide these services.

Sec. 4. RCW 51.28.020 and 2001 c
231 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Where a worker
is entitled to compensation under this title he or she shall file with the
department or his or her self-insured employer, as the case may be, his or her
application for such, together with the certificate of the physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner who attended him or her.
An application form developed by the department shall include a notice
specifying the worker's right to receive health services from a physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner of the worker's choice
under RCW 51.36.010, including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and
listing the types of providers authorized to provide these services.

(b) The physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner who attended the injured
worker shall inform the injured worker of his or her rights under this title
and lend all necessary assistance in making this application for compensation
and such proof of other matters as required by the rules of the department
without charge to the worker. The department shall provide physicians with a
manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in applications for
compensation involving occupational diseases, and which describes claimants'
rights and responsibilities related to occupational disease claims.

(2) If application for
compensation is made to a self-insured employer, he or she shall forthwith send
a copy of the application to the department.

Sec. 5. RCW 51.28.025 and 1987 c
185 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever an
employer has notice or knowledge of an injury or occupational disease sustained
by any worker in his or her employment who has received treatment from a
physician or a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, has been
hospitalized, disabled from work or has died as the apparent result of such
injury or occupational disease, the employer shall immediately report the same
to the department on forms prescribed by it. The report shall include:

(a) The name, address,
and business of the employer;

(b) The name, address,
and occupation of the worker;

(c) The date, time,
cause, and nature of the injury or occupational disease;

(d) Whether the injury
or occupational disease arose in the course of the injured worker's employment;

(e) All available
information pertaining to the nature of the injury or occupational disease
including but not limited to any visible signs, any complaints of the worker,
any time lost from work, and the observable effect on the worker's bodily
functions, so far as is known; and

(f) Such other
pertinent information as the department may prescribe by regulation.

(2) Failure or refusal
to file the report required by subsection (1) shall subject the offending
employer to a penalty determined by the director but not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars for each offense, to be collected in a civil action in the name
of the department and paid into the supplemental pension fund.

Sec. 6. RCW 51.28.030 and 1972
ex.s. c 43 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Where death results
from injury the parties entitled to compensation under this title, or someone
in their behalf, shall make application for the same to the department or
self-insurer as the case may be, which application must be accompanied with
proof of death and proof of relationship showing the parties to be entitled to
compensation under this title, certificates of attending physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, if any, and such proof as
required by the rules of the department.

Upon receipt of notice
of accident under RCW 51.28.010, the director shall immediately forward to the
party or parties required to make application for compensation under this
section, notification, in nontechnical language, of their rights under this title.

Sec. 7. RCW 51.28.055 and 1984 c
159 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Claims for occupational
disease or infection to be valid and compensable must be filed within two years
following the date the worker had written notice from a physician or a
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner: (1) Of the existence of
his or her occupational disease, and (2) that a claim for disability benefits
may be filed. The notice shall also contain a statement that the worker has
two years from the date of the notice to file a claim. The physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner shall file the notice with
the department. The department shall send a copy to the worker and to the
self-insurer if the worker's employer is self-insured. However, a claim is
valid if it is filed within two years from the date of death of the worker
suffering from an occupational disease.

Sec. 8. RCW 51.32.055 and 1997 c
416 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) One purpose of this
title is to restore the injured worker as nearly as possible to the condition
of self-support as an able-bodied worker. Benefits for permanent disability
shall be determined under the director's supervision, except as otherwise
authorized in subsection (9) of this section, only after the injured worker's
condition becomes fixed.

(2) All determinations
of permanent disabilities shall be made by the department, except as otherwise
authorized in subsection (9) of this section. Either the worker, employer, or
self-insurer may make a request or the inquiry may be initiated by the director
or, as authorized in subsection (9) of this section, by the self-insurer on the
director or the self-insurer's own motion. Determinations shall be required in
every instance where permanent disability is likely to be present. All medical
reports and other pertinent information in the possession of or under the
control of the employer or, if the self-insurer has made a request to the department,
in the possession of or under the control of the self-insurer shall be
forwarded to the director with the request.

(3) A request for
determination of permanent disability shall be examined by the department or,
if authorized in subsection (9) of this section, the self-insurer, and the
department shall issue an order in accordance with RCW 51.52.050 or, in the
case of a self-insured employer, the self-insurer may: (a) Enter a written
order, communicated to the worker and the department self-insurance section in
accordance with subsection (9) of this section, or (b) request the department
to issue an order in accordance with RCW 51.52.050.

(4) The department or,
in cases authorized in subsection (9) of this section, the self-insurer may
require that the worker present himself or herself for a special medical
examination by a physician or physicians selected by the department, and the
department or, in cases authorized in subsection (9) of this section, the
self-insurer may require that the worker present himself or herself for a
personal interview. The costs of the examination or interview, including
payment of any reasonable travel expenses, shall be paid by the department or
self-insurer, as the case may be.

(5) The director may
establish a medical bureau within the department to perform medical
examinations under this section. Physicians hired or retained for this purpose
shall be grounded in industrial medicine and in the assessment of industrial
physical impairment. Self-insurers shall bear a proportionate share of the
cost of the medical bureau in a manner to be determined by the department.

(6) Where a dispute
arises from the handling of any claim before the condition of the injured
worker becomes fixed, the worker, employer, or self-insurer may request the
department to resolve the dispute or the director may initiate an inquiry on
his or her own motion. In these cases, the department shall proceed as
provided in this section and an order shall issue in accordance with RCW
51.52.050.

(7)(a) If a claim (i)
is accepted by a self-insurer after June 30, 1986, and before August 1, 1997,
(ii) involves only medical treatment and the payment of temporary disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090 or only the payment of temporary disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090, (iii) at the time medical treatment is
concluded does not involve permanent disability, (iv) is one with respect to
which the department has not intervened under subsection (6) of this section,
and (v) the injured worker has returned to work with the self-insured employer
of record, whether at the worker's previous job or at a job that has comparable
wages and benefits, the claim may be closed by the self-insurer, subject to
reporting of claims to the department in a manner prescribed by department
rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(b) All determinations
of permanent disability for claims accepted under this subsection (7) by
self-insurers shall be made by the self-insured section of the department under
subsections (1) through (4) of this section.

(c) Upon closure of a
claim under (a) of this subsection, the self-insurer shall enter a written
order, communicated to the worker and the department self-insurance section,
which contains the following statement clearly set forth in bold face type:
"This order constitutes notification that your claim is being closed with
medical benefits and temporary disability compensation only as provided, and
with the condition you have returned to work with the self-insured employer.
If for any reason you disagree with the conditions or duration of your return
to work or the medical benefits or the temporary disability compensation that
has been provided, you must protest in writing to the department of labor and
industries, self-insurance section, within sixty days of the date you received
this order."

(8)(a) If a claim (i)
is accepted by a self-insurer after June 30, 1990, and before August 1, 1997,
(ii) involves only medical treatment, (iii) does not involve payment of
temporary disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090, and (iv) at the time
medical treatment is concluded does not involve permanent disability, the claim
may be closed by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the
department in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under chapter
34.05 RCW. Upon closure of a claim, the self-insurer shall enter a written
order, communicated to the worker, which contains the following statement
clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order constitutes notification
that your claim is being closed with medical benefits only, as provided. If
for any reason you disagree with this closure, you must protest in writing to
the Department of Labor and Industries, Olympia, within 60 days of the date you
received this order. The department will then review your claim and enter a
further determinative order."

(b) All determinations
of permanent disability for claims accepted under this subsection (8) by
self-insurers shall be made by the self-insured section of the department under
subsections (1) through (4) of this section.

(9)(a) If a claim: (i)
Is accepted by a self-insurer after July 31, 1997; (ii)(A) involves only
medical treatment, or medical treatment and the payment of temporary disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090, and a determination of permanent partial
disability, if applicable, has been made by the self-insurer as authorized in
this subsection; or (B) involves only the payment of temporary disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090 and a determination of permanent partial
disability, if applicable, has been made by the self-insurer as authorized in
this subsection; (iii) is one with respect to which the department has not
intervened under subsection (6) of this section; and (iv) concerns an injured
worker who has returned to work with the self-insured employer of record,
whether at the worker's previous job or at a job that has comparable wages and
benefits, the claim may be closed by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of
claims to the department in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(b) If a physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner submits a report to the
self-insurer that concludes that the worker's condition is fixed and stable and
supports payment of a permanent partial disability award, and if within
fourteen days from the date the self-insurer mailed the report to the attending
or treating physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner,
the worker's attending or treating physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner disagrees in writing that the worker's condition is
fixed and stable, the self-insurer must get a supplemental medical opinion from
a provider on the department's approved examiner's list before closing the
claim. In the alternative, the self-insurer may forward the claim to the
department, which must review the claim and enter a final order as provided for
in RCW 51.52.050.

(c) Upon closure of a
claim under this subsection (9), the self-insurer shall enter a written order,
communicated to the worker and the department self-insurance section, which
contains the following statement clearly set forth in bold-face type:
"This order constitutes notification that your claim is being closed with
such medical benefits and temporary disability compensation as provided to date
and with such award for permanent partial disability, if any, as set forth
below, and with the condition that you have returned to work with the
self-insured employer. If for any reason you disagree with the conditions or
duration of your return to work or the medical benefits, temporary disability
compensation provided, or permanent partial disability that has been awarded,
you must protest in writing to the Department of Labor and Industries,
Self-Insurance Section, within sixty days of the date you received this order.
If you do not protest this order to the department, this order will become
final."

(d) All determinations
of permanent partial disability for claims accepted by self-insurers under this
subsection (9) may be made by the self-insurer or the self-insurer may request
a determination by the self-insured section of the department. All
determinations shall be made under subsections (1) through (4) of this section.

(10) If the department
receives a protest of an order issued by a self-insurer under subsections (7)
through (9) of this section, the self-insurer's closure order must be held in
abeyance. The department shall review the claim closure action and enter a
further determinative order as provided for in RCW 51.52.050. If no protest is
timely filed, the closing order issued by the self-insurer shall become final
and shall have the same force and effect as a department order that has become
final under RCW 51.52.050.

(11) If within two
years of claim closure under subsections (7) through (9) of this section, the
department determines that the self-insurer has made payment of benefits
because of clerical error, mistake of identity, or innocent misrepresentation
or the department discovers a violation of the conditions of claim closure, the
department may require the self-insurer to correct the benefits paid or
payable. This subsection (11) does not limit in any way the application of RCW
51.32.240.

(12) For the purposes
of this section, "comparable wages and benefits" means wages and
benefits that are at least ninety-five percent of the wages and benefits
received by the worker at the time of injury.

Sec. 9. RCW 51.32.090 and 1993 c
521 s 3, 1993 c 299 s 1, and 1993 c 271 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) When the total
disability is only temporary, the schedule of payments contained in RCW
51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as the total disability continues.

(2) Any compensation
payable under this section for children not in the custody of the injured
worker as of the date of injury shall be payable only to such person as
actually is providing the support for such child or children pursuant to the
order of a court of record providing for support of such child or children.

(3)(a) As soon as
recovery is so complete that the present earning power of the worker, at any
kind of work, is restored to that existing at the time of the occurrence of the
injury, the payments shall cease. If and so long as the present earning power
is only partially restored, the payments shall:

(i) For claims for
injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993, continue in the proportion which the
new earning power shall bear to the old; or

(ii) For claims for
injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993, equal eighty percent of the actual
difference between the worker's present wages and earning power at the time of
injury, but: (A) The total of these payments and the worker's present wages
may not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of this
section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker would have
received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to the worker's
claim.

(b) No compensation
shall be payable under this subsection (3) unless the loss of earning power
shall exceed five percent.

(4)(a) Whenever the
employer of injury requests that a worker who is entitled to temporary total
disability under this chapter be certified by a physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner as able to perform available work
other than his or her usual work, the employer shall furnish to the physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, with a copy to the worker,
a statement describing the work available with the employer of injury in terms
that will enable the physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner to relate the physical activities of the job to the worker's
disability. The physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner shall then determine whether the worker is physically able to
perform the work described. The worker's temporary total disability payments
shall continue until the worker is released by his or her physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner for the work, and begins
the work with the employer of injury. If the work thereafter comes to an end
before the worker's recovery is sufficient in the judgment of his or her
physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner to permit
him or her to return to his or her usual job, or to perform other available
work offered by the employer of injury, the worker's temporary total disability
payments shall be resumed. Should the available work described, once undertaken
by the worker, impede his or her recovery to the extent that in the judgment of
his or her physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner
he or she should not continue to work, the worker's temporary total disability
payments shall be resumed when the worker ceases such work.

(b) Once the worker
returns to work under the terms of this subsection (4), he or she shall not be
assigned by the employer to work other than the available work described
without the worker's written consent, or without prior review and approval by
the worker's physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner.

(c) If the worker
returns to work under this subsection (4), any employee health and welfare
benefits that the worker was receiving at the time of injury shall continue or
be resumed at the level provided at the time of injury. Such benefits shall
not be continued or resumed if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the
benefit program, or with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement
currently in force.

(d) In the event of any
dispute as to the worker's ability to perform the available work offered by the
employer, the department shall make the final determination.

(5) No worker shall
receive compensation for or during the day on which injury was received or the
three days following the same, unless his or her disability shall continue for
a period of fourteen consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED,
That attempts to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury
shall not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.

(6) Should a worker
suffer a temporary total disability and should his or her employer at the time
of the injury continue to pay him or her the wages which he or she was earning
at the time of such injury, such injured worker shall not receive any payment
provided in subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her
employer shall so pay such wages.

(7) In no event shall
the monthly payments provided in this section exceed the applicable percentage
of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under the provisions of
RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(8) If the supervisor
of industrial insurance determines that the worker is voluntarily retired and
is no longer attached to the work force, benefits shall not be paid under this
section.

Sec. 10. RCW 51.32.095 and 1999 c
110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) One of the primary
purposes of this title is to enable the injured worker to become employable at
gainful employment. To this end, the department or self-insurers shall utilize
the services of individuals and organizations, public or private, whose
experience, training, and interests in vocational rehabilitation and retraining
qualify them to lend expert assistance to the supervisor of industrial
insurance in such programs of vocational rehabilitation as may be reasonable to
make the worker employable consistent with his or her physical and mental
status. Where, after evaluation and recommendation by such individuals or
organizations and prior to final evaluation of the worker's permanent
disability and in the sole opinion of the supervisor or supervisor's designee,
whether or not medical treatment has been concluded, vocational rehabilitation
is both necessary and likely to enable the injured worker to become employable
at gainful employment, the supervisor or supervisor's designee may, in his or
her sole discretion, pay or, if the employer is a self-insurer, direct the
self-insurer to pay the cost as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) When in the sole
discretion of the supervisor or the supervisor's designee vocational
rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to make the worker employable at
gainful employment, then the following order of priorities shall be used:

(a) Return to the
previous job with the same employer;

(b) Modification of the
previous job with the same employer including transitional return to work;

(c) A new job with the
same employer in keeping with any limitations or restrictions;

(d) Modification of a
new job with the same employer including transitional return to work;

(e) Modification of the
previous job with a new employer;

(f) A new job with a
new employer or self-employment based upon transferable skills;

(g) Modification of a
new job with a new employer;

(h) A new job with a
new employer or self-employment involving on-the-job training;

(i) Short-term
retraining and job placement.

(3)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, costs for vocational rehabilitation
benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's designee under subsection
(1) of this section may include the cost of books, tuition, fees, supplies,
equipment, transportation, child or dependent care, and other necessary
expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars
in any fifty-two week period except as authorized by RCW 51.60.060, and the
cost of continuing the temporary total disability compensation under RCW
51.32.090 while the worker is actively and successfully undergoing a formal
program of vocational rehabilitation.

(b) Beginning with
vocational rehabilitation plans approved on or after July 1, 1999, costs for
vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's
designee under subsection (1) of this section may include the cost of books,
tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, child or dependent care, and other
necessary expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed four thousand
dollars in any fifty-two week period except as authorized by RCW 51.60.060, and
the cost of transportation and continuing the temporary total disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is actively and successfully
undergoing a formal program of vocational rehabilitation.

(c) The expenses
allowed under (a) or (b) of this subsection may include training fees for
on-the-job training and the cost of furnishing tools and other equipment
necessary for self-employment or reemployment. However, compensation or
payment of retraining with job placement expenses under (a) or (b) of this
subsection may not be authorized for a period of more than fifty-two weeks,
except that such period may, in the sole discretion of the supervisor after his
or her review, be extended for an additional fifty-two weeks or portion thereof
by written order of the supervisor.

(d) In cases where the
worker is required to reside away from his or her customary residence, the
reasonable cost of board and lodging shall also be paid.

(e) Costs paid under
this subsection shall be chargeable to the employer's cost experience or shall
be paid by the self-insurer as the case may be.

(4) In addition to the
vocational rehabilitation expenditures provided for under subsection (3) of
this section, an additional five thousand dollars may, upon authorization of
the supervisor or the supervisor's designee, be expended for: (a)
Accommodations for an injured worker that are medically necessary for the
worker to participate in an approved retraining plan; and (b) accommodations
necessary to perform the essential functions of an occupation in which an
injured worker is seeking employment, consistent with the retraining plan or
the recommendations of a vocational evaluation. The injured worker's attending
physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner must verify
the necessity of the modifications or accommodations. The total expenditures
authorized in this subsection and the expenditures authorized under RCW
51.32.250 shall not exceed five thousand dollars.

(5) The department
shall establish criteria to monitor the quality and effectiveness of
rehabilitation services provided by the individuals and organizations used
under subsection (1) of this section. The state fund shall make referrals for
vocational rehabilitation services based on these performance criteria.

(6) The department
shall engage in, where feasible and cost-effective, a cooperative program with
the state employment security department to provide job placement services
under this section.

(7) The benefits in
this section shall be provided for the injured workers of self-insured
employers. Self-insurers shall report both benefits provided and benefits
denied under this section in the manner prescribed by the department by rule
adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The director may, in his or her sole
discretion and upon his or her own initiative or at any time that a dispute
arises under this section, promptly make such inquiries as circumstances
require and take such other action as he or she considers will properly
determine the matter and protect the rights of the parties.

(8) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the benefits provided for in this section are
available to any otherwise eligible worker regardless of the date of industrial
injury. However, claims shall not be reopened solely for vocational
rehabilitation purposes.

Sec. 11. RCW 51.36.010 and 1986 c
58 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the occurrence of
any injury to a worker entitled to compensation under the provisions of this
title, he or she shall receive proper and necessary medical and surgical
services at the hands of a physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner of his or her own choice, if conveniently located, and proper
and necessary hospital care and services during the period of his or her
disability from such injury, but the same shall be limited in point of duration
as follows:

In the case of
permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond the date when compensation
shall be awarded him or her, except when the worker returned to work before
permanent partial disability award is made, in such case not to extend beyond
the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of
temporary disability not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to
him or her shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned
to his or her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be continued
if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by the supervisor of
industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her more complete recovery; in
case of a permanent total disability not to extend beyond the date on which a
lump sum settlement is made with him or her or he or she is placed upon the
permanent pension roll: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial
insurance, solely in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and
surgical treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when
such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the supervisor of
industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or provide for the
administration of medical and therapeutic measures including payment of
prescription medications, but not including those controlled substances
currently scheduled by the state board of pharmacy as Schedule I, II, III, or
IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, which are necessary to alleviate
continuing pain which results from the industrial injury. In order to
authorize such continued treatment the written order of the supervisor of
industrial insurance issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.

The supervisor of
industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee, or a self-insurer, in his or
her sole discretion, may authorize inoculation or other immunological treatment
in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of
the worker to a potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization of
such treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any adjudication
of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary for an occupational
disease.

Sec. 12. RCW 51.36.060 and 1991 c
89 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Physicians or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioners examining or attending
injured workers under this title shall comply with rules and regulations
adopted by the director, and shall make such reports as may be requested by the
department or self-insurer upon the condition or treatment of any such worker,
or upon any other matters concerning such workers in their care. Except under
RCW 49.17.210 and 49.17.250, all medical information in the possession or
control of any person and relevant to the particular injury in the opinion of
the department pertaining to any worker whose injury or occupational disease is
the basis of a claim under this title shall be made available at any stage of
the proceedings to the employer, the claimant's representative, and the department
upon request, and no person shall incur any legal liability by reason of
releasing such information.

Sec. 13. RCW 51.36.110 and 1994 c
154 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of the
department of labor and industries or the director's authorized representative
shall have the authority to:

(1) Conduct audits and
investigations of providers of medical, chiropractic, dental, vocational, and
other health services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant to
Title 51 RCW. In the conduct of such audits or investigations, the director or
the director's authorized representatives may examine all records, or portions
thereof, including patient records, for which services were rendered by a
health services provider and reimbursed by the department, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute which may make or purport to make such records
privileged or confidential: PROVIDED, That no original patient records shall
be removed from the premises of the health services provider, and that the
disclosure of any records or information obtained under authority of this
section by the department of labor and industries is prohibited and constitutes
a violation of RCW 42.52.050, unless such disclosure is directly connected to
the official duties of the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
disclosure of patient information as required under this section shall not
subject any physician, licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner,
or other health services provider to any liability for breach of any
confidential relationships between the provider and the patient: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the director or the director's authorized representative shall
destroy all copies of patient medical records in their possession upon
completion of the audit, investigation, or proceedings;

(2) Approve or deny
applications to participate as a provider of services furnished to industrially
injured workers pursuant to Title 51 RCW; and

(3) Terminate or
suspend eligibility to participate as a provider of services furnished to
industrially injured workers pursuant to Title 51 RCW.

Sec. 14. RCW 51.48.060 and 1985 c
347 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner who fails, neglects or
refuses to file a report with the director, as required by this title, within
five days of the date of treatment, showing the condition of the injured worker
at the time of treatment, a description of the treatment given, and an estimate
of the probable duration of the injury, or who fails or refuses to render all
necessary assistance to the injured worker, as required by this title, shall be
subject to a civil penalty determined by the director but not to exceed two
hundred fifty dollars.

Sec. 15. RCW 51.52.010 and 1999 c
149 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a
"board of industrial insurance appeals," hereinafter called the
"board," consisting of three members appointed by the governor, with
the advice and consent of the senate, as hereinafter provided. One shall be a
representative of the public and a lawyer, appointed from a mutually agreed to
list of not less than three active members of the Washington state bar
association, submitted to the governor by the two organizations defined below,
and such member shall be the chairperson of said board. The second member
shall be a representative of the majority of workers engaged in employment
under this title and selected from a list of not less than three names
submitted to the governor by an organization, statewide in scope, which through
its affiliates embraces a cross section and a majority of the organized labor
of the state. The third member shall be a representative of employers under
this title, and appointed from a list of at least three names submitted to the
governor by a recognized statewide organization of employers, representing a
majority of employers. The initial terms of office of the members of the board
shall be for six, four, and two years respectively. Thereafter all terms shall
be for a period of six years. Each member of the board shall be eligible for
reappointment and shall hold office until his or her successor is appointed and
qualified. In the event of a vacancy the governor is authorized to appoint a
successor to fill the unexpired term of his or her predecessor. All
appointments to the board shall be made in conformity with the foregoing plan.
In the event a board member becomes incapacitated in excess of thirty days
either due to his or her illness or that of an immediate family member as
determined by a request for family leave or as certified by the affected
member's treating physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner, the governor shall appoint an acting member to serve pro
tem. Such an appointment shall be made in conformity with the foregoing plan,
except that the list of candidates shall be submitted to the governor not more
than fifteen days after the affected organizations are notified of the
incapacity and the governor shall make the appointment within fifteen days
after the list is submitted. The temporary member shall serve until such time
as the affected member is able to reassume his or her duties by returning from
requested family leave or as determined by the treating physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner or until the affected
member's term expires, whichever occurs first. Whenever the workload of the
board and its orderly and expeditious disposition shall necessitate, the
governor may appoint two additional pro-tem members in addition to the regular
members. Such appointments shall be for a definite period of time, and shall be
made from lists submitted respectively by labor and industry as in the case of
regular members. One pro-tem member shall be a representative of labor and one
shall be a representative of industry. Members shall devote their entire time
to the duties of the board and shall receive for their services a salary as
fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 which
shall be in addition to travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended. Headquarters for the board
shall be located in Olympia. The board shall adopt a seal which shall be
judicially recognized.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 51.36 RCW to read as follows:

Licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioners are recognized as independent practitioners and,
subject to the provisions of this title, the health services available to an
injured worker under RCW 51.36.010 include health services provided by licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioners within their scope of practice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---