BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.101 and 1996 c
241 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall
cause an inspector to inspect all wiring, appliances, devices, and equipment to
which this chapter applies. Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed
as providing any authority for any subdivision of government to adopt by
ordinance any provisions contained or provided for in this chapter except those
pertaining to cities and towns pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3).

(2) Upon request,
electrical inspections will be made by the department within forty-eight hours,
excluding holidays, Saturdays, and Sundays. If, upon written request, the
electrical inspector fails to make an electrical inspection within twenty-four
hours, the serving utility may immediately connect electrical power to the
installation if the necessary electrical work permit is displayed: PROVIDED,
That if the request is for an electrical inspection that relates to a mobile
home installation, the applicant shall provide proof of a current building
permit issued by the local government agency authorized to issue such permits
as a prerequisite for inspection approval or connection of electrical power to
the mobile home.

(3) Whenever the
installation of any wiring, device, appliance, or equipment is not in
accordance with this chapter, or is in such a condition as to be dangerous to
life or property, the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
owning, using, or operating it shall be notified by the department and shall
within fifteen days, or such further reasonable time as may upon request be
granted, make such repairs and changes as are required to remove the danger to
life or property and to make it conform to this chapter. If the department,
or a city or town as authorized under RCW 19.28.010(3), has approved an
electrical plan, and an inspector subsequently determines that changes to the
approved plan are required to either remove the danger to life or property or
to conform to this chapter, or both, the department, city, or town must pay the
cost of any repairs and changes required, provided that the same national
electrical code was in effect at the time of plan approval and inspection.
The director, through the inspector, is hereby empowered to disconnect or order
the discontinuance of electrical service to conductors or equipment that are
found to be in a dangerous or unsafe condition and not in accordance with this
chapter. Upon making a disconnection the inspector shall attach a notice
stating that the conductors have been found dangerous to life or property and
are not in accordance with this chapter. It is unlawful for any person to
reconnect such defective conductors or equipment without the approval of the
department, and until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe
and secure condition, and in a condition that complies with this chapter.

(4) The director,
through the electrical inspector, has the right during reasonable hours to
enter into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of his or her
official duties for the purpose of making any inspection or test of the
installation of new construction or altered electrical wiring, electrical
devices, equipment, or material contained in or on the buildings or premises.
No electrical wiring or equipment subject to this chapter may be concealed
until it has been approved by the inspector making the inspection. At the time
of the inspection, electrical wiring or equipment subject to this chapter must
be sufficiently accessible to permit the inspector to employ any testing
methods that will verify conformance with the national electrical code and any
other requirements of this chapter.

(5) Persons, firms,
partnerships, corporations, or other entities making electrical installations
shall obtain inspection and approval from an authorized representative of the
department as required by this chapter before requesting the electric utility
to connect to the installations. Electric utilities may connect to the
installations if approval is clearly indicated by certification of the
electrical work permit required to be affixed to each installation or by
equivalent means, except that increased or relocated services may be
reconnected immediately at the discretion of the utility before approval if an electrical
work permit is displayed. The permits shall be furnished upon payment of the
fee to the department.

(6) The director,
subject to the recommendations and approval of the board, shall set by rule a
schedule of license and electrical work permit fees that will cover the costs
of administration and enforcement of this chapter. The rules shall be adopted
in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. No fee
may be charged for plug-in mobile homes, recreational vehicles, or portable
appliances.

(7)
Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the inspection of any wiring,
appliance, device, or equipment, or installations thereof, by any utility or by
any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity employed by a
utility in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines,
wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of the utility.
All work covered by the national electric code not exempted by the 1981 edition
of the national electric code 90-2(B)(5) shall be inspected by the department.

--- END ---