BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 34.05.328 and 1997 c
430 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before ((adopting))
proposing a rule described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency
shall:

(a) Clearly state in
detail the general goals and specific objectives of the statute that the rule
implements;

(b) Determine that the
rule is needed to achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated
under (a) of this subsection, and analyze alternatives to rule making and the
consequences of not adopting the rule;

(c) Determine that the
probable benefits of the rule are greater than its probable costs, taking into
account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and costs and the
specific directives of the statute being implemented;

(d) Determine, after
considering alternative versions of the rule and the analysis required under
(b) and (c) of this subsection, that the rule being adopted is the least
burdensome alternative for those required to comply with it that will achieve
the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;

(e) Determine that the
rule does not require those to whom it applies to take an action that violates
requirements of another federal or state law;

(f) Determine that the
rule does not impose more stringent performance requirements on private
entities than on public entities unless required to do so by federal or state
law;

(g) Determine if the
rule differs from any federal regulation or statute applicable to the same
activity or subject matter and, if so, determine that the difference is
justified by the following:

(i) A state statute
that explicitly allows the agency to differ from federal standards; or

(ii) Substantial
evidence that the difference is necessary to achieve the general goals and
specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection; and

(h) Coordinate the
rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with other federal, state, and local
laws applicable to the same activity or subject matter.

(2) In making its
determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b) through (g) of this section, the
agency shall place in the rule-making file documentation of sufficient quantity
and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the determinations are
justified.

(3) Before adopting
rules described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency shall place in the
rule-making file a rule implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting
order. The plan shall describe how the agency intends to:

(a) Implement and
enforce the rule, including a description of the resources the agency intends
to use;

(b) Inform and educate
affected persons about the rule;

(c) Promote and assist
voluntary compliance; and

(d) Evaluate whether
the rule achieves the purpose for which it was adopted, including, to the
maximum extent practicable, the use of interim milestones to assess progress
and the use of objectively measurable outcomes.

(4) After adopting a
rule described in subsection (5) of this section regulating the same activity
or subject matter as another provision of federal or state law, an agency shall
do all of the following:

(a) Provide to the ((business
assistance center)) department of community, trade, and economic
development a list citing by reference the other federal and state laws
that regulate the same activity or subject matter;

(b) Coordinate
implementation and enforcement of the rule with the other federal and state
entities regulating the same activity or subject matter by making every effort
to do one or more of the following:

(i) Deferring to the
other entity;

(ii) Designating a lead
agency; or

(iii) Entering into an
agreement with the other entities specifying how the agency and entities will
coordinate implementation and enforcement.

If the agency is unable
to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the agency shall report to the
legislature pursuant to (c) of this subsection;

(c) Report to the joint
administrative rules review committee:

(i) The existence of
any overlap or duplication of other federal or state laws, any differences from
federal law, and any known overlap, duplication, or conflict with local laws;
and

(ii) Make
recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary to eliminate or
mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap, duplication, or difference.

(5)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, this section applies to:

(i) Significant
legislative rules of the departments of ecology, labor and industries, health,
revenue, social and health services, and natural resources, the employment
security department, the forest practices board, the office of the insurance
commissioner, and to the legislative rules of the department of fish and
wildlife implementing chapter ((75.20)) 77.55 RCW; and

(ii) Any rule of any
agency, if this section is voluntarily made applicable to the rule by the
agency, or is made applicable to the rule by a majority vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of receiving the
notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

(b) This section does
not apply to:

(i) Emergency rules
adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(ii) Rules relating
only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to violation by a
nongovernment party;

(iii) Rules adopting or
incorporating by reference without material change federal statutes or
regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington state
agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of statewide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if
the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(iv) Rules that only
correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language
of a rule without changing its effect;

(v) Rules the content
of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(vi) Rules that set or
adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards; or

(vii) Rules of the department
of social and health services relating only to client medical or financial
eligibility and rules concerning liability for care of dependents.

(c) For purposes of
this subsection:

(i) A "procedural
rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals (A) any procedure,
practice, or requirement relating to any agency hearings; (B) any filing or
related process requirement for making application to an agency for a license
or permit; or (C) any policy statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations
of an agency.

(ii) An
"interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does not
subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the agency’s
interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.

(iii) A
"significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a procedural or
interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions of law pursuant to
delegated legislative authority, the violation of which subjects a violator of
such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B) establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualification or standard for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a
license or permit; or (C) adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a
policy or regulatory program.

(d) In the notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an agency shall state whether this
section applies to the proposed rule pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or
if the agency will apply this section voluntarily.

(6) By January 31,
1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the office of
financial management, after consulting with state agencies, counties, and
cities, and business, labor, and environmental organizations, shall report to
the governor and the legislature regarding the effects of this section on the
regulatory system in this state. The report shall document:

(a) The rules proposed
to which this section applied and to the extent possible, how compliance with
this section affected the substance of the rule, if any, that the agency
ultimately adopted;

(b) The costs incurred
by state agencies in complying with this section;

(c) Any legal action
maintained based upon the alleged failure of any agency to comply with this
section, the costs to the state of such action, and the result;

(d) The extent to which
this section has adversely affected the capacity of agencies to fulfill their
legislatively prescribed mission;

(e) The extent to which
this section has improved the acceptability of state rules to those regulated;
and

(f) Any
other information considered by the office of financial management to be useful
in evaluating the effect of this section.

--- END ---