BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW 4.84.350
and 1995 c 403 s 903 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by
statute, a

_7 court shall award a qualified party that prevails in a
judicial

_8 review of an agency action fees and other expenses,
including

_9 reasonable attorneys' fees, unless the court finds that
the agency

10 action was substantially justified or that circumstances
make an

11 award unjust. A qualified party shall be considered to
have

12 prevailed if the qualified party obtained relief on a
significant

13 issue that achieves some benefit that the qualified
party sought.

14 (2) The amount awarded a qualified party under subsection
(1)

15 of this section shall not exceed ((twenty-five)) fifty
thousand

16 dollars. Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply
unless

17 all parties challenging the agency action are qualified
parties.

18 If two or more qualified parties join in an action, the
award in

19 total shall not exceed ((twenty-five)) fifty
thousand dollars.

p. 1 SB
5804

_1 The court, in its discretion, may reduce the amount to
be awarded

_2 pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or deny any
award, to

_3 the extent that a qualified party during the course of
the

_4 proceedings engaged in conduct that unduly or
unreasonably

_5 protracted the final resolution of the matter in
controversy.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5804 p. 2