BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that clear and specific grants of rule-making authority are
necessary for accountability in decision making by governmental agencies, and
that an agency should exercise jurisdiction and adopt rules over a subject
matter only if it has obvious and explicit rule-making authority to do so. It
is therefore the legislature's purpose to ensure that existing and future rules
exist only under clear and appropriate rule-making authority.

(2) The legislature
further finds that state agencies have adopted administrative rules without
clear authority to do so from the legislature, relying on general grants of
authority rather than specific legislative policy direction. This has resulted
in agency-initiated policy that has been adopted without the benefit of the
public dialogue and accountability inherent to the legislative process. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature to eliminate reliance on general grants
of authority, limit certain agency rule making to those matters specifically
authorized by the legislature, and that grants of rule-making authority be
narrowly construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

The director of the
department of ecology may adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules or
policy statements, other than emergency rules, only:

(1) As specifically
required by federal law, and only to the extent specifically required; or

(2) As specifically
authorized, and only to the extent specifically authorized, by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

The director of the
department of labor and industries may adopt in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW, rules or policy statements, other than emergency rules, only:

(1) As specifically
required by federal law, and only to the extent specifically required; or

(2) As
specifically authorized, and only to the extent specifically authorized, by the
legislature.

---
END ---