BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.30.030 and 1971
ex.s. c 250 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

All meetings of the
governing body of a public agency shall be open and public and all persons
shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the governing body of a public
agency, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(1)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, an agenda shall be posted at least
seventy-two hours before each regular meeting and twenty-four hours before each
special meeting. Each agenda item must be described with enough specificity to
indicate the subject matter or action to be considered, but need not exceed
twenty words per agenda item.

(b) In the case of a
subject matter raised by a citizen during a regular or special meeting, the matter
may be heard. However, in no event shall final action be taken on any matter
about which the public has not received notice as provided in (a) of this
subsection.

(2) The governing
body shall accept written comments in addition to spoken comments.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.30.040 and 1971
ex.s. c 250 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A member of the public
shall not be required, as a condition to attendance at a meeting of a governing
body, to register his or her name and other information, to complete a
questionnaire, or otherwise to fulfill any condition precedent to his or her
attendance.

The governing body
may require persons desiring to speak or present written comments to identify
himself or herself.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.30.060 and 1989 c
42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((No)) A
governing body of a public agency ((shall)) may only adopt ((any))
an ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, order, or directive((,
except in)) when:

(a) Such action is
taken at a meeting (i) open to the public ((and then only at a
meeting,)) and (ii) for which the date ((of which)) is fixed
by law or rule((,)) or ((at a meeting of which)) notice has been
given according to the provisions of this chapter; and

(b) The agenda for
the meeting clearly indicates that the governing body may take final action on
the matter.

Any action taken at
meetings failing to comply with the provisions of this subsection shall be null
and void.

(2) No governing body
of a public agency at any meeting required to be open to the public shall vote
by secret ballot. Any vote taken in violation of this subsection shall be null
and void, and shall be considered an "action" under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 42.30.070 and 1983 c
155 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of a
public agency shall provide the time for holding regular meetings by ordinance,
resolution, bylaws, or by whatever other rule is required for the conduct of
business by that body. ((Unless otherwise provided for in the act under
which the public agency was formed,)) Meetings of ((the)) a
governing body need not be held within the boundaries of the territory over
which the public agency exercises jurisdiction unless final action is taken
on any matter. If final action is taken on a matter, then meetings of a public
agency defined under RCW 42.30.020(1)(a) shall be held within the state; and
meetings of a governing body of a public agency defined under RCW 42.30.020(1)
(b), (c), or (d) shall be held within the boundaries of the jurisdiction if
possible, or within the boundaries of the county, or of the county of largest
population if there is more than one county within which lies the territory
over which the public agency, or the subagency or policy group serving the
public agency, exercises jurisdiction. If at any time any regular meeting
falls on a holiday, such regular meeting shall be held on the next business
day. ((If, by reason of fire, flood, earthquake, or other emergency, there
is a need for expedited action by a governing body to meet the emergency, the
presiding officer of the governing body may provide for a meeting site other
than the regular meeting site and the notice requirements of this chapter shall
be suspended during such emergency.)) It shall not be a violation of the
requirements of this chapter for a majority of the members of a governing body
to travel together or gather for purposes other than a regular meeting or a
special meeting as these terms are used in this chapter: PROVIDED, That they
take no action as defined in this chapter.

Any action taken at
meetings failing to comply with the provisions of this section are null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 42.30 RCW to read as follows:

The governing body of
the public agency may waive the requirements of this chapter in the event of an
emergency.

For
purposes of this section, "emergency" means unforeseen circumstances
beyond the control of the public agency.

---
END ---