BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.170 and 2000 c
141 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a
license for domestic wineries; fee to be computed only on the liters
manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty thousand liters per year, one
hundred dollars per year; and two hundred fifty thousand liters or more per
year, four hundred dollars per year.

(2) The license allows
for the manufacture of wine in Washington state from grapes or other
agricultural products.

(3) Any domestic winery
licensed under this section may also act as a distributor and/or retailer of
wine of its own production. Any winery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws and rules
relating to distributors and/or retailers.

(4) A domestic winery
licensed under this section, at locations separate from any of its production
or manufacturing sites, may serve samples of its own products, with or without
charge, and sell wine of its own production at retail for off-premise
consumption, provided that: (a) Each additional location has been approved by
the board under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the total number of additional locations
does not exceed two; and (c) a winery may not act as a distributor at any such
additional location. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the
winery license for the purpose of this title. Nothing in this subsection shall
be construed to prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery
licenses.

(5)(a) A domestic
winery licensed under this section that did not produce more than five thousand
cases of wine in the previous year may, at one qualifying farmers market
location separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites and in
addition to the two other locations provided for in subsection (4) of this
section, sell bottled wine at retail for off-premises consumption so long as:

(i) The fruit or
other agricultural product that is the wine base was grown in Washington; and

(ii) The wine being
sold is the winery's own production.

(b) The winery must
not serve samples of its product, with or without charge, at the location
approved under this subsection.

(c) For purposes of
this subsection, "qualifying farmers market" means a membership of
five or more growers who assemble at a defined location no more than four times
per week for the purpose of selling their produce directly to consumers and
that has no more than twenty percent of its retailers who sell bottled wine.

(d) To qualify to
sell wine under this subsection a winery must gain prior approval by the board
under RCW 66.24.010.

(e) Any winery selling
wine under this subsection must comply with all other applicable laws relating
to the sale of wine, including laws relating to the protection of minors.

(6)
Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee may be shipped
out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling wine and then returned
to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall be deemed wine manufactured in
the state of Washington for the purposes of RCW 66.24.206, and shall not
require a special license.

--- END ---