BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that a large and growing body of research supports the premise that
all students learn more, perform better, and exhibit more responsible and
respectful behavior in schools where they are known personally and as
individuals by the adults in the school. In light of this research, school
districts are encouraged to create small personalized learning environments
using available resources from the student achievement fund, the purpose of
which is to improve public education and to achieve higher academic standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.505 RCW to read as follows:

(1) School districts
may, consistent with RCW 28A.505.210, spend moneys received from the student
achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045 to establish small personalized
schools that have the effect of reducing class size and improving student
achievement.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, "small personalized school" means a school with each of
the following characteristics:

(a) That enrolls no
more than two hundred seventy-five students if it is an elementary school, or
no more than four hundred forty students if it is a middle, junior high, or
high school with three or four grade levels;

(b) Where, to the
extent possible, every teacher at the school works with every student assigned
to the teacher's classroom for a minimum of two consecutive years;

(c) That develops and
implements a plan for high levels of parental involvement in which parents are
directly engaged in supporting their child's learning and in which parents play
a significant role in school governance;

(d) That develops a
governance plan that involves an administrator, teachers, parents and other
community members, and, if it is a secondary school, the students;

(e) That develops a
philosophy and mission that focuses on the personalization of learning and
academic and personal success for each student; and

(f) That
embodies its philosophy and mission in its daily operations and activities.

---
END ---