BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
intends, through its adoption of policies and appropriations, that no minors,
on the basis of ethnicity or gender, be denied access to services which are
intended to improve their lives.

(2) The legislature
intends to determine whether budgetary and administrative policies implemented
in the department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation
administration have operated in a manner designed to assure equal access by
minors to certain services without regard to arbitrary distinctions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Equal access
to services" means services are provided to recipients regardless of
ethnicity or gender.

(2) "Human
services" means those programs and services operated or funded by the
department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation
administration.

(3) "Person"
means an individual under the age of eighteen.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Upon implementation
of an automated case management information system, the department of social
and health services, juvenile rehabilitation administration shall prepare and
present to the legislature and governor an annual report of equal access to its
human services, delivered directly or by contract. For each human service
provided, the report shall identify the following: (a) The type of human
service provided; (b) whether the service was provided by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration or delivered by contract with a vendor; (c) the
number of persons who received human services who were female and the number
who were male; and (d) the number of persons who received services, by
ethnicity. The report shall be presented to the legislature and the governor.

(2) The report shall be
sufficiently detailed to permit the recipients to examine the programs and
contractors within each human service to determine the numbers of persons
receiving services by gender and ethnicity. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall, when the data within the report indicate that equal
access is not available, provide the legislature and governor an explanation of
the reasons for the lack of equal access, and a plan for attaining equal access
and the cost of doing so. The submission of a plan under this section shall
not create an entitlement to service for any person.

(3) For purposes of
this report, the delivery of basic education shall be considered a human
service only when the basic education is provided at a juvenile rehabilitation
administration facility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---