BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.46.060 and 1959 c
294 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director, to the extent necessary in order to prevent curtailment of
opportunities for employment, shall by regulations provide for: (1) The
employment of learners, of apprentices, and of messengers employed primarily in
delivering letters and messages, under special certificates issued pursuant to
regulations of the director, at such wages lower than the minimum wage
applicable under RCW 49.46.020 and subject to such limitations as to time,
number, proportion, and length of service as the director shall prescribe((,
and)); (2) the employment of trainees who are under the age of
eighteen in the food service industry under special certificates issued by the
director at wages lower than the minimum wage applicable under RCW 49.46.020
and for a period to be fixed by the certificate; and (3) the employment of
individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age or physical or mental
deficiency or injury, under special certificates issued by the director, at
such wages lower than the minimum wage applicable under RCW 49.46.020 and for
such period as shall be fixed in such certificates.

--- END ---