BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.08.026 and 1998 c
265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All
administrative expenses of the board incurred on and after April 1, 1963 shall
be appropriated and paid from the liquor revolving fund. These administrative
expenses shall include, but not be limited to: The salaries and expenses of
the board and its employees, the cost of establishing, leasing, maintaining,
and operating state liquor stores and warehouses, legal services, pilot
projects, annual or other audits, and other general costs of conducting the
business of the board, and the costs of supplying, installing, and maintaining
equipment used in state liquor stores and agency liquor vendor stores for the
purchase of liquor by nonlicensees using debit or credit cards. The
administrative expenses shall not, however, be deemed to include costs of
liquor and lottery tickets purchased, the cost of transportation and delivery
to the point of distribution, other costs pertaining to the acquisition and
receipt of liquor and lottery tickets, packaging and repackaging of liquor, agency
commissions for agency liquor vendor stores, transaction fees associated
with credit or debit card purchases for liquor in state liquor stores and in
the stores of agency liquor vendors pursuant to RCW 66.16.040 and 66.16.041,
sales tax, and those amounts distributed pursuant to RCW 66.08.180, 66.08.190,
66.08.200, 66.08.210 and 66.08.220. Agency commissions for agency liquor
vendor stores shall be established by the liquor control board after
consultation with the director of the office of financial management.

--- END ---