BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The six centers for
the deaf and hard of

_5 hearing provide critical communication and other
supportive

_6 services to people with hearing impairments. The
funding to ensure

_7 that these centers are open and available to people in
all

_8 geographic regions of the state has not been distributed
in a way

_9 that reflects the statewide needs of the deaf and hard
of

10 hearing. Therefore, the legislature finds that people
living in

11 southeast Washington state do not have the same base
support for

12 their center as those living in other regions of the
state. The

13 South Eastern Washington Service Center of the Deaf and
Hard of

14 Hearing is expected to serve nearly twenty-two thousand
deaf and

15 hard of hearing people in a six-county region. In
addition, the

16 center has received requests for services from
neighboring

17 communities, including Yakima and Grant counties.
Although the

18 South Eastern Washington Service Center of the Deaf and
Hard of

p. 1 SB
5816

_1 Hearing must meet the same uniform state requirements as
the

_2 Yakima center they currently receive only twenty-five
percent of

_3 the funding. These uniform services provided and
critically needed

_4 in each center for the deaf and hard of hearing include
assistance

_5 in accessing community services, education and training,
outreach

_6 activities, information and referral, interpreter
referrals,

_7 community advocates, mental health counseling, and
Americans with

_8 Disabilities Act counseling. In addition, each service
center is

_9 required by contract to develop and implement a
five-year

10 strategic plan and deliver numerous reports and service
records to

11 the state.

12 The legislature finds that the population of
individuals and

13 families needing these services has grown considerably
over the

14 last four years in southeast Washington and there is a
need for

15 consistent and stable funding to support the critical
services to

16 this population.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of two
hundred fourteen thousand

18 seven hundred twenty dollars, or as much thereof as may
be

19 necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June
30, 2003,

20 from the general fund to the South Eastern Washington
Center of

21 the Deaf and Hard of Hearing to provide services to the
deaf and

22 hard of hearing in their communities.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5816 p. 2