BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
48.20.025 and 2000 c 79 s 3 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

_9 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

10 (a) "Claims" means the cost to the insurer
of health care

11 services, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, provided to a
policyholder

12 or paid to or on behalf of the policyholder in
accordance with the

13 terms of a health benefit plan, as defined in RCW
48.43.005. This

14 includes capitation payments or other similar payments
made to

15 providers for the purpose of paying for health care
services for a

16 policyholder.

17 (b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The
liability for claims which

p. 1 SB
5817

_1 have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for
claims

_2 which have not been reported but which may reasonably be
expected;

_3 (iii) active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims
reserves

_4 whether for a specific liability purpose or not.

_5 (c) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as
defined in RCW

_6 48.43.005, plus any rate credits or recoupments less any
refunds,

_7 for the applicable period, whether received before,
during, or

_8 after the applicable period.

_9 (d) "Incurred claims expense" means claims
paid during the

10 applicable period plus any increase, or less any
decrease, in the

11 claims reserves.

12 (e) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims
expense as a percentage

13 of earned premiums.

14 (f) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life
reserves; and (ii)

15 additional reserves whether for a specific liability
purpose or

16 not.

17 (2) An insurer shall file, for informational
purposes only, a

18 notice of its schedule of rates for its individual
health benefit

19 plans with the commissioner prior to use.

20 (3) An insurer shall file with the notice required
under

21 subsection (2) of this section supporting documentation
of its

22 method of determining the rates charged. The
commissioner may

23 request only the following supporting documentation:

24 (a) A description of the insurer's rate-making
methodology;

25 (b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred
claims which

26 includes the experience data, assumptions, and
justifications of

27 the insurer's projection;

28 (c) The percentage of premium attributable in aggregate
for

29 nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted
community rates

30 charged; and

31 (d) A certification by a member of the American
academy of

32 actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner,
that the

33 adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably
expected to

34 result in a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss
ratio

35 standard established in subsection (7) of this section.

36 (4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise
impede the

37 implementation of the filed rates.

38 (5) By the last day of May each year any insurer

SB 5817 p. 2

_1 ((providing)) issuing or renewing
individual health benefit plans

_2 in this state during the preceding calendar year
shall file for

_3 review by the commissioner supporting documentation of
its actual

_4 loss ratio for its individual health benefit plans
offered or

_5 renewed in the state in aggregate for the
preceding calendar

_6 year. The filing shall include aggregate earned
premiums, aggregate

_7 incurred claims, and a certification by a member
of the American

_8 academy of actuaries, or other person approved by the

_9 commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been
calculated in

10 accordance with accepted actuarial principles.

11 (a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period
beginning with the

12 date the filing is ((delivered to)) received
by the commissioner,

13 the filing shall be deemed approved unless prior thereto
the

14 commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio.

15 (b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of
the actual

16 loss ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the
grounds

17 for contesting the calculation to the insurer.

18 (c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the
actual loss

19 ratio shall, upon written demand of either the
commissioner or the

20 insurer, be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04
and 34.05

21 RCW.

22 (6) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding
calendar year is

23 less than the loss ratio established in subsection (7)
of this

24 section, a remittance is due and the following shall
apply:

25 (a) The insurer shall calculate a percentage of
premium to be

26 remitted to the Washington state health insurance pool
by

27 subtracting the actual loss ratio for the preceding year
from the

28 loss ratio established in subsection (7) of this
section.

29 (b) The remittance to the Washington state health
insurance

30 pool is the percentage calculated in (a) of ((the
[this])) this

31 subsection, multiplied by the premium earned from each
enrollee in

32 the previous calendar year. Interest shall be added to
the

33 remittance due at a five percent annual rate calculated
from the

34 end of the calendar year for which the remittance is due
to the

35 date the remittance is made.

36 (c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall

37 be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be
used as

38 directed by the pool board of directors.

p. 3 SB
5817

_1 (d) Any remittance required to be issued under this
section

_2 shall be issued within thirty days after the actual loss
ratio is

_3 deemed approved under subsection (5)(a) of this section
or the

_4 determination by an administrative law judge under
subsection

_5 (5)(c) of this section.

_6 (7) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall
be seventy-

_7 four percent minus the premium tax rate applicable to
the

_8 insurer's individual health benefit plans under RCW
48.14.0201.

_9 Sec. 2. RCW
48.41.030 and 2000 c 79 s 6 are each amended to read

10 as follows:

11 The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter

12 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

13 (1) "Accounting year" means a twelve-month
period determined by

14 the board for purposes of record-keeping and
accounting. The first

15 accounting year may be more or less than twelve months
and, from

16 time to time in subsequent years, the board may order an

17 accounting year of other than twelve months as may be
required for

18 orderly management and accounting of the pool.

19 (2) "Administrator" means the entity
chosen by the board to

20 administer the pool under RCW 48.41.080.

21 (3) "Board" means the board of directors
of the pool.

22 (4) "Commissioner" means the insurance
commissioner.

23 (5) "Covered person" means any individual
resident of this

24 state who is eligible to receive benefits from any
member, or

25 other health plan.

26 (6) "Health care facility" has the same
meaning as in RCW

27 70.38.025.

28 (7) "Health care provider" means any
physician, facility, or

29 health care professional, who is licensed in Washington
state and

30 entitled to reimbursement for health care services.

31 (8) "Health care services" means services
for the purpose of

32 preventing, alleviating, curing, or healing human
illness or

33 injury.

34 (9) "Health carrier" or
"carrier" has the same meaning as in

35 RCW 48.43.005.

36 (10) "Health coverage" means any group or
individual disability

37 insurance policy, health care service contract, and
health

SB 5817 p. 4

_1 maintenance agreement, except those contracts entered
into for the

_2 provision of health care services pursuant to Title
XVIII of the

_3 Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq. The
term does not

_4 include short-term care, long-term care, dental, vision,
accident,

_5 fixed indemnity, disability income contracts, ((civilian
health

_6 and medical program for the uniform services
(CHAMPUS), 10 U.S.C.

_7 55,)) limited benefit or credit insurance,
coverage issued as a

_8 supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out
of the

_9 worker's compensation or similar law, automobile medical
payment

10 insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable
with or

11 without regard to fault and which is statutorily
required to be

12 contained in any liability insurance policy or
equivalent self-

13 insurance.

14 (11) "Health plan" means any arrangement
by which persons,

15 including dependents or spouses, covered or making
application to

16 be covered under this pool, have access to hospital and
medical

17 benefits or reimbursement including any group or
individual

18 disability insurance policy; health care service
contract; health

19 maintenance agreement; uninsured arrangements of group
or group-

20 type contracts including employer self-insured,
cost-plus, or

21 other benefit methodologies not involving insurance or
not

22 governed by Title 48 RCW; coverage under group-type
contracts

23 which are not available to the general public and can be
obtained

24 only because of connection with a particular
organization or

25 group; and coverage by medicare or other governmental
benefits.

26 This term includes coverage through "health
coverage" as defined

27 under this section, and specifically excludes those
types of

28 programs excluded under the definition of "health
coverage" in

29 subsection (10) of this section.

30 (12) "Medical assistance" means coverage
under Title XIX of the

31 federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C., Sec. 1396 et
seq.) and

32 chapter 74.09 RCW.

33 (13) "Medicare" means coverage under Title
XVIII of the Social

34 Security Act, (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq., as amended).

35 (14) "Member" means any commercial insurer
which provides

36 disability insurance or stop loss insurance, any health
care

37 service contractor, and any health maintenance
organization

38 licensed under Title 48 RCW. "Member" also means
the Washington

p. 5 SB
5817

_1 state health care authority as issuer of the state
uniform medical

_2 plan. "Member" shall also mean, as soon as
authorized by federal

_3 law, employers and other entities, including a
self-funding entity

_4 and employee welfare benefit plans that provide health
plan

_5 benefits in this state on or after May 18, 1987.
"Member" does not

_6 include any insurer, health care service contractor, or
health

_7 maintenance organization whose products are exclusively
dental

_8 products or those products excluded from the definition
of "health

_9 coverage" set forth in subsection (10) of this
section.

10 (15) "Network provider" means a health
care provider who has

11 contracted in writing with the pool administrator or a
health

12 carrier contracting with the pool administrator to offer
pool

13 coverage to accept payment from and to look solely to
the pool or

14 health carrier according to the terms of the pool health
plans.

15 (16) "Plan of operation" means the pool,
including articles, by-

16 laws, and operating rules, adopted by the board pursuant
to RCW

17 48.41.050.

18 (17) "Point of service plan" means a
benefit plan offered by

19 the pool under which a covered person may elect to
receive covered

20 services from network providers, or nonnetwork providers
at a

21 reduced rate of benefits.

22 (18) "Pool" means the Washington state
health insurance pool as

23 created in RCW 48.41.040.

24 Sec. 3. RCW
48.41.100 and 2000 c 79 s 12 are each amended to read

25 as follows:

26 (1) The following persons who are residents of this
state are

27 eligible for pool coverage:

28 (a) Any person who provides evidence of a carrier's
decision

29 not to accept him or her for enrollment in an individual
health

30 benefit plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 based upon, and
within

31 ninety days of the receipt of, the results of the
standard health

32 questionnaire designated by the board and administered
by health

33 carriers under RCW 48.43.018;

34 (b) Any person who continues to be eligible for pool
coverage

35 based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire

36 designated by the board and administered by the pool
administrator

37 pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;

SB 5817 p. 6

_1 (c) Any person who resides in a county of the state
where no

_2 carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW
offers to the

_3 public an individual health benefit plan other than a
catastrophic

_4 health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of
application

_5 to the pool, and who makes direct application to the
pool; ((and))

_6 (d) Any medicare eligible person upon providing
evidence of

_7 rejection for medical reasons, a requirement of
restrictive

_8 riders, an up-rated premium, or a preexisting conditions

_9 limitation on a medicare supplemental insurance policy
under

10 chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of which is to
substantially reduce

11 coverage from that received by a person considered a
standard risk

12 by at least one member within six months of the date of

13 application; and

14 (e) Any medicare eligible person whose health
insurance

15 coverage, other than coverage under an individual or
group health

16 plan, is involuntarily terminated for any reason
other than

17 nonpayment of premium may apply for coverage under
the plan.

18 (2) The following persons are not eligible for
coverage by the

19 pool:

20 (a) Any person having terminated coverage in the
pool unless

21 (i) twelve months have lapsed since termination, or (ii)
that

22 person can show continuous other coverage which has been

23 involuntarily terminated for any reason other than
nonpayment of

24 premiums;

25 (b) Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out
one

26 million dollars in benefits;

27 (c) Inmates of public institutions and persons whose
benefits

28 are duplicated under public programs;

29 (d) Any person who resides in a county of the state
where any

30 carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW
offers to the

31 public an individual health benefit plan other than a
catastrophic

32 health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of
application

33 to the pool and who does not qualify for pool coverage
based upon

34 the results of the standard health questionnaire, or
pursuant to

35 subsection (1)(d) of this section.

36 (3) When a carrier or insurer regulated under
chapter 48.15 RCW

37 begins to offer an individual health benefit plan in a
county

p. 7 SB
5817

_1 where no carrier had been offering an individual health
benefit

_2 plan:

_3 (a) If the health benefit plan offered is other than
a

_4 catastrophic health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005,
any person

_5 enrolled in a pool plan pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of
this

_6 section in that county shall no longer be eligible for
coverage

_7 under that plan pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this
section, but

_8 may continue to be eligible for pool coverage based upon
the

_9 results of the standard health questionnaire designated
by the

10 board and administered by the pool administrator. The
pool

11 administrator shall offer to administer the
questionnaire to each

12 person no longer eligible for coverage under subsection
(1)(c) of

13 this section within thirty days of determining that he
or she is

14 no longer eligible;

15 (b) Losing eligibility for pool coverage under this
subsection

16 (3) does not affect a person's eligibility for pool
coverage under

17 subsection (1)(a), (b), or (d) of this section; and

18 (c) The pool administrator shall provide written
notice to any

19 person who is no longer eligible for coverage under a
pool plan

20 under this subsection (3) within thirty days of the

21 administrator's determination that the person is no
longer

22 eligible. The notice shall: (i) Indicate that coverage
under the

23 plan will cease ninety days from the date that the
notice is

24 dated; (ii) describe any other coverage options, either
in or

25 outside of the pool, available to the person; (iii)
describe the

26 procedures for the administration of the standard health

27 questionnaire to determine the person's continued
eligibility for

28 coverage under subsection (1)(b) of this section; and (iv)

29 describe the enrollment process for the available
options outside

30 of the pool.

31 Sec. 4. RCW
48.41.110 and 2000 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read

32 as follows:

33 (1) The pool shall offer one or more care management
plans of

34 coverage. Such plans may, but are not required to,
include point of

35 service features that permit participants to receive
in-network

36 benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to
differential cost

37 shares. Covered persons enrolled in the pool on January
1, 2001,

SB 5817 p. 8

_1 may continue coverage under the pool plan in which they
are

_2 enrolled on that date. However, the pool may
incorporate managed

_3 care features into such existing plans.

_4 (2) The administrator shall prepare a brochure
outlining the

_5 benefits and exclusions of the pool policy in plain
language.

_6 After approval by the board, such brochure shall be made

_7 reasonably available to participants or potential
participants.

_8 (3) The health insurance policy issued by the pool
shall pay

_9 only reasonable amounts for medically necessary eligible
health

10 care services rendered or furnished for the diagnosis or
treatment

11 of illnesses, injuries, and conditions which are not otherwise

12 limited or excluded. Eligible expenses are the
reasonable amounts

13 for the health care services and items for which
benefits are

14 extended under the pool policy. Such benefits shall at
minimum

15 include, but not be limited to, the following services
or related

16 items:

17 (a) Hospital services, including charges for the
most common

18 semiprivate room, for the most common private room if
semiprivate

19 rooms do not exist in the health care facility, or for
the private

20 room if medically necessary, but limited to a total of
one hundred

21 eighty inpatient days in a calendar year, and limited to
thirty

22 days inpatient care for mental and nervous conditions,
or alcohol,

23 drug, or chemical dependency or abuse per calendar year;

24 (b) Professional services including surgery for the
treatment

25 of injuries, illnesses, or conditions, other than
dental, which

26 are rendered by a health care provider, or at the
direction of a

27 health care provider, by a staff of registered or
licensed

28 practical nurses, or other health care providers;

29 (c) The first twenty outpatient professional visits
for the

30 diagnosis or treatment of one or more mental or nervous
conditions

31 or alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse
rendered during

32 a calendar year by one or more physicians,
psychologists, or

33 community mental health professionals, or, at the
direction of a

34 physician, by other qualified licensed health care
practitioners,

35 in the case of mental or nervous conditions, and rendered
by a

36 state certified chemical dependency program approved
under chapter

37 70.96A RCW, in the case of alcohol, drug, or chemical
dependency

38 or abuse;

p. 9 SB
5817

_1 (d) Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a
prescription;

_2 (e) Services of a skilled nursing facility,
excluding custodial

_3 and convalescent care, for not more than one hundred
days in a

_4 calendar year as prescribed by a physician;

_5 (f) Services of a home health agency;

_6 (g) Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and
nuclear medicine

_7 therapy;

_8 (h) Oxygen;

_9 (i) Anesthesia services;

10 (j) Prostheses, other than dental;

11 (k) Durable medical equipment which has no personal
use in the

12 absence of the condition for which prescribed;

13 (l) Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;

14 (m) Oral surgery limited to the following:
Fractures of facial

15 bones; excisions of mandibular joints, lesions of the
mouth, lip,

16 or tongue, tumors, or cysts excluding treatment for

17 temporomandibular joints; incision of accessory sinuses,
mouth

18 salivary glands or ducts; dislocations of the jaw;
plastic

19 reconstruction or repair of traumatic injuries occurring
while

20 covered under the pool; and excision of impacted wisdom
teeth;

21 (n) Maternity care services;

22 (o) Services of a physical therapist and services of
a speech

23 therapist;

24 (p) Hospice services;

25 (q) Professional ambulance service to the nearest
health care

26 facility qualified to treat the illness or injury; and

27 (r) Other medical equipment, services, or supplies
required by

28 physician's orders and medically necessary and
consistent with the

29 diagnosis, treatment, and condition.

30 (4) The board shall design and employ cost
containment measures

31 and requirements such as, but not limited to, care
coordination,

32 provider network limitations, preadmission
certification, and

33 concurrent inpatient review which may make the pool more
cost-

34 effective.

35 (5) The pool benefit policy may contain benefit
limitations,

36 exceptions, and cost shares such as copayments,
coinsurance, and

37 deductibles that are consistent with managed care
products, except

38 that differential cost shares may be adopted by the
board for

SB 5817 p. 10

_1 nonnetwork providers under point of service plans. The
pool benefit

_2 policy cost shares and limitations must be consistent
with those

_3 that are generally included in health plans approved by
the

_4 insurance commissioner; however, no limitation, exception,
or

_5 reduction may be used that would exclude coverage for
any disease,

_6 illness, or injury.

_7 (6) The pool may not reject an individual for health
plan

_8 coverage based upon preexisting conditions of the
individual or

_9 deny, exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an
individual's

10 preexisting health conditions; except that it shall
impose a six-

11 month benefit waiting period for preexisting conditions
for which

12 medical advice was given, for which a health care
provider

13 recommended or provided treatment, or for which a
prudent

14 layperson would have sought advice or treatment, within
six months

15 before the effective date of coverage. The preexisting
condition

16 waiting period shall not apply to prenatal care
services. The pool

17 may not avoid the requirements of this section through
the

18 creation of a new rate classification or the
modification of an

19 existing rate classification. Credit against the
waiting period

20 shall be as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

21 (7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,
the pool

22 shall credit any preexisting condition waiting period in
its plans

23 for a person who was enrolled at any time during the
sixty-three

24 day period immediately preceding the date of application
for the

25 new pool plan ((in a group health benefit plan or an
individual

26 health benefit plan other than a catastrophic health
plan. The pool

27 must credit the period of coverage the person was
continuously

28 covered under the immediately preceding health plan)).
For the

29 person previously enrolled in a group health benefit
plan, the

30 pool must credit the aggregate of all periods of
preceding

31 coverage not separated by more than sixty-three days
toward the

32 waiting period of the new health plan. For the
person previously

33 enrolled in an individual health benefit plan other
than a

34 catastrophic health plan, the pool must credit the
period of

35 coverage the person was continuously covered under
the immediately

36 preceding health plan toward the waiting period
of the new health

37 plan. For the purposes of this subsection, a preceding
health plan

38 includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan.

p. 11 SB
5817

_1 (b) The pool shall waive any preexisting condition
waiting

_2 period for a person who is an eligible individual as
defined in

_3 section 2741(b) of the federal health insurance
portability and

_4 accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).

_5 (8) If an application is made for the pool policy
as a result

_6 of rejection by a carrier, then the date of
application to the

_7 carrier, rather than to the pool, should govern for
purposes of

_8 determining preexisting condition credit.

_9 Sec. 5. RCW
48.43.005 and 2000 c 79 s 18 are each amended to read

10 as follows:

11 Unless otherwise specifically provided, the
definitions in this

12 section apply throughout this chapter.

13 (1) "Adjusted community rate" means the
rating method used to

14 establish the premium for health plans adjusted to
reflect

15 actuarially demonstrated differences in utilization or
cost

16 attributable to geographic region, age, family size, and
use of

17 wellness activities.

18 (2) "Basic health plan" means the plan
described under chapter

19 70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.

20 (3) "Basic health plan model plan"
means a health plan as

21 required in RCW 70.47.060(2)(d).

22 (4) "Basic health plan services"
means that schedule of covered

23 health services, including the description of how those
benefits

24 are to be administered, that are required to be
delivered to an

25 enrollee under the basic health plan, as revised from
time to

26 time.

27 (((4))) (5) "Catastrophic health
plan" means:

28 (a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy
covering a

29 single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a
calendar year

30 deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five hundred
dollars and

31 an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid
under the plan

32 (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at
least three

33 thousand dollars; and

34 (b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy
covering

35 more than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring
a calendar

36 year deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand dollars
and an

37 annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan

SB 5817 p. 12

_1 (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at
least five

_2 thousand five hundred dollars; or

_3 (c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits
for hospital

_4 inpatient and outpatient services, professional and
prescription

_5 drugs provided in conjunction with such hospital
inpatient and

_6 outpatient services, and excludes or substantially
limits

_7 outpatient physician services and those services usually
provided

_8 in an office setting.

_9 (((5))) (6) "Certification"
means a determination by a review

10 organization that an admission, extension of stay, or
other health

11 care service or procedure has been reviewed and, based
on the

12 information provided, meets the clinical requirements
for medical

13 necessity, appropriateness, level of care, or
effectiveness under

14 the auspices of the applicable health benefit plan.

15 (((6))) (7) "Concurrent
review" means utilization review

16 conducted during a patient's hospital stay or course of
treatment.

17 (((7))) (8) "Covered person"
or "enrollee" means a person

18 covered by a health plan including an enrollee,
subscriber,

19 policyholder, beneficiary of a group plan, or individual
covered

20 by any other health plan.

21 (((8))) (9) "Dependent"
means, at a minimum, the enrollee's

22 legal spouse and unmarried dependent children who
qualify for

23 coverage under the enrollee's health benefit plan.

24 (((9))) (10) "Eligible
employee" means an employee who works on

25 a full-time basis with a normal work week of thirty or
more

26 hours. The term includes a self-employed individual,
including a

27 sole proprietor, a partner of a partnership, and may
include an

28 independent contractor, if the self-employed individual,
sole

29 proprietor, partner, or independent contractor is
included as an

30 employee under a health benefit plan of a small employer,
but does

31 not work less than thirty hours per week and derives at
least

32 seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business

33 through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable
income and

34 for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue

35 service form. Persons covered under a health benefit
plan pursuant

36 to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of
1986

37 shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes
of minimum

38 participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.

p. 13 SB
5817

_1 (((10))) (11) "Emergency medical
condition" means the emergent

_2 and acute onset of a symptom or symptoms, including
severe pain,

_3 that would lead a prudent layperson acting reasonably to
believe

_4 that a health condition exists that requires immediate
medical

_5 attention, if failure to provide medical attention would
result in

_6 serious impairment to bodily functions or serious
dysfunction of a

_7 bodily organ or part, or would place the person's health
in

_8 serious jeopardy.

_9 (((11))) (12) "Emergency
services" means otherwise covered

10 health care services medically necessary to evaluate and
treat an

11 emergency medical condition, provided in a hospital
emergency

12 department.

13 (((12))) (13) "Enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing" means

14 amounts paid to health carriers directly providing
services,

15 health care providers, or health care facilities by
enrollees and

16 may include copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.

17 (((13))) (14) "Grievance"
means a written complaint submitted

18 by or on behalf of a covered person regarding: (a)
Denial of

19 payment for medical services or nonprovision of medical
services

20 included in the covered person's health benefit plan, or
(b)

21 service delivery issues other than denial of payment for
medical

22 services or nonprovision of medical services, including

23 dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting time for
medical

24 services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or

25 dissatisfaction with service provided by the health
carrier.

26 (((14))) (15) "Health care
facility" or "facility" means

27 hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals
licensed

28 under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as
defined

29 in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric hospitals licensed under
chapter

30 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW,

31 community mental health centers licensed under chapter
71.05 or

32 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter

33 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical

34 facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and
alcohol

35 treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW,
and home

36 health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and
includes

37 such facilities if owned and operated by a political
subdivision

SB 5817 p. 14

_1 or instrumentality of the state and such other
facilities as

_2 required by federal law and implementing regulations.

_3 (((15))) (16) "Health care
provider" or "provider" means:

_4 (a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter
70.127 RCW, to

_5 practice health or health-related services or otherwise
practicing

_6 health care services in this state consistent with state
law; or

_7 (b) An employee or agent of a person described in
(a) of this

_8 subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her

_9 employment.

10 (((16))) (17) "Health care
service" means that service offered

11 or provided by health care facilities and health care
providers

12 relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of
illness, injury,

13 or disease.

14 (((17))) (18) "Health
carrier" or "carrier" means a disability

15 insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a
health care

16 service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a
health

17 maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.

18 (((18))) (19) "Health plan"
or "health benefit plan" means any

19 policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health
carrier to

20 provide, arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care
services

21 except the following:

22 (a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter
48.84 RCW;

23 (b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed
by chapter

24 48.66 RCW;

25 (c) Limited health care services offered by limited
health care

26 service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;

27 (d) Disability income;

28 (e) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty
liability

29 insurance policy such as automobile personal injury
protection

30 coverage and homeowner guest medical;

31 (f) Workers' compensation coverage;

32 (g) Accident only coverage;

33 (h) Specified disease and hospital confinement
indemnity when

34 marketed solely as a supplement to a health plan;

35 (i) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;

36 (j) Dental only and vision only coverage; and

37 (k) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to
have a short-

38 term limited purpose or duration, or to be a
student-only plan

p. 15 SB
5817

_1 that is guaranteed renewable while the covered person is
enrolled

_2 as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate student
at an

_3 accredited higher education institution, after a written
request

_4 for such classification by the carrier and subsequent
written

_5 approval by the insurance commissioner.

_6 (((19))) (20) "Material
modification" means a change in the

_7 actuarial value of the health plan as modified of more
than five

_8 percent but less than fifteen percent.

_9 (((20))) (21) "Preexisting
condition" means any medical

10 condition, illness, or injury that existed any time
prior to the

11 effective date of coverage.

12 (((21))) (22) "Premium"
means all sums charged, received, or

13 deposited by a health carrier as consideration for a
health plan

14 or the continuance of a health plan. Any assessment or
any

15 "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or

16 charge made by a health carrier in consideration for a
health plan

17 is deemed part of the premium. "Premium"
shall not include amounts

18 paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.

19 (((22))) (23) "Review
organization" means a disability insurer

20 regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service

21 contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health
maintenance

22 organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and entities
affiliated

23 with, under contract with, or acting on behalf of a
health carrier

24 to perform a utilization review.

25 (((23))) (24) "Small
employer" or "small group" means any

26 person, firm, corporation, partnership, association,
political

27 subdivision except school districts, or self-employed
individual

28 that is actively engaged in business that, on at least
fifty

29 percent of its working days during the preceding
calendar quarter,

30 employed no more than fifty eligible employees, with a
normal work

31 week of thirty or more hours, the majority of whom were
employed

32 within this state, and is not formed primarily for
purposes of

33 buying health insurance and in which a bona fide
employer-employee

34 relationship exists. In determining the number of
eligible

35 employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or
that are

36 eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of
taxation by

37 this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent
to the

38 issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for
the purpose

SB 5817 p. 16

_1 of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer
shall be

_2 determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically
provided, a

_3 small employer shall continue to be considered a small
employer

_4 until the plan anniversary following the date the small
employer

_5 no longer meets the requirements of this definition.
The term

_6 "small employer" includes a self-employed
individual or sole

_7 proprietor. The term "small employer" also
includes a self-employed

_8 individual or sole proprietor who derives at least
seventy-five

_9 percent of his or her income from a trade or business
through

10 which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to
earn

11 taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate

12 internal revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for
the

13 previous taxable year.

14 (((24))) (25) "Utilization
review" means the prospective,

15 concurrent, or retrospective assessment of the necessity
and

16 appropriateness of the allocation of health care
resources and

17 services of a provider or facility, given or proposed to
be given

18 to an enrollee or group of enrollees.

19 (((25))) (26) "Wellness
activity" means an explicit program of

20 an activity consistent with department of health
guidelines, such

21 as, smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention,
reduction

22 of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight reduction,
exercise,

23 automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol
reduction, and

24 nutrition education for the purpose of improving
enrollee health

25 status and reducing health service costs.

26 Sec. 6. RCW
48.43.012 and 2000 c 79 s 19 are each amended to read

27 as follows:

28 (1) No carrier may reject an individual for an
individual

29 health benefit plan based upon preexisting conditions of
the

30 individual except as provided in RCW 48.43.018.

31 (2) No carrier may deny, exclude, or otherwise limit
coverage

32 for an individual's preexisting health conditions except
as

33 provided in this section.

34 (3) For an individual health benefit plan originally
issued on

35 or after March 23, 2000, preexisting condition waiting
periods

36 imposed upon a person enrolling in an individual health
benefit

37 plan shall be no more than nine months for a preexisting
condition

p. 17 SB
5817

_1 for which medical advice was given, for which a health
care

_2 provider recommended or provided treatment, or for which
a prudent

_3 layperson would have sought advice or treatment, within
six months

_4 prior to the effective date of the plan. No carrier
may impose a

_5 preexisting condition waiting period on an individual
health

_6 benefit plan issued to an eligible individual as
defined in

_7 section 2741(b) of the federal health insurance
portability and

_8 accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).

_9 (4) Individual health benefit plan preexisting
condition

10 waiting periods shall not apply to prenatal care
services.

11 (5) No carrier may avoid the requirements of this
section

12 through the creation of a new rate classification or the

13 modification of an existing rate classification. A new
or changed

14 rate classification will be deemed an attempt to avoid
the

15 provisions of this section if the new or changed
classification

16 would substantially discourage applications for coverage
from

17 individuals who are higher than average health risks.
These

18 provisions apply only to individuals who are Washington
residents.

19 Sec. 7. RCW
48.43.015 and 2000 c 80 s 3 are each amended to read

20 as follows:

21 (1) For a health benefit plan offered to a group
other than a

22 small group, every health carrier shall reduce any
preexisting

23 condition exclusion or limitation for persons or groups
who had

24 similar health coverage under a different health plan at
any time

25 during the three-month period immediately preceding the
date of

26 application for the new health plan ((if such person
was

27 continuously covered under the immediately preceding
health plan.

28 If the person was continuously covered for at least
three months

29 under the immediately preceding health plan,)).
The carrier may not

30 impose a waiting period for coverage of preexisting
conditions((.

31 If the person was continuously covered for less than
three months

32 under the immediately preceding health plan)) if
the aggregate of

33 all periods of preceding coverage, not separated by
more than

34 sixty-three days, is at least three months. If the
aggregate of all

35 periods of preceding coverage, not separated by more
than

36 sixty-three days, is less than three months, the
carrier must

37 credit any waiting period under the ((immediately))
preceding

SB 5817 p. 18

_1 health plan toward the new health plan. For the
purposes of this

_2 subsection, a preceding health plan includes an
employer-provided

_3 self-funded health plan and plans of the Washington
state health

_4 insurance pool.

_5 (2) For a health benefit plan offered to a small
group, every

_6 health carrier shall reduce any preexisting condition
exclusion or

_7 limitation for persons or groups who had similar health
coverage

_8 under a different health plan at any time during the
three-month

_9 period immediately preceding the date of application for
the new

10 health plan ((if such person was continuously covered
under the

11 immediately preceding health plan. If the person was
continuously

12 covered for at least nine months under the
immediately preceding

13 health plan,)). The carrier may not
impose a waiting period for

14 coverage of preexisting conditions((. If the person
was

15 continuously covered for less than nine months under
the

16 immediately preceding health plan)) if the
aggregate of all

17 periods of previous coverage, not separated by more
than

18 sixty-three days, is greater than nine months. If
the aggregate of

19 all periods of preceding coverage, not separated by
more than

20 sixty-three days, is less than nine months, the
carrier must credit

21 any waiting period under the ((immediately))
preceding health plan

22 toward the new health plan. For the purposes of this
subsection, a

23 preceding health plan includes an employer‑provided
self-funded

24 health plan and plans of the Washington state health
insurance

25 pool.

26 (3) For a health benefit plan offered to an
individual, other

27 than an individual to whom subsection (4) of this
section applies,

28 every health carrier shall credit any preexisting
condition

29 waiting period in that plan for a person who was
enrolled at any

30 time during the sixty-three day period immediately
preceding the

31 date of application for the new health plan ((in a
group health

32 benefit plan or an individual health benefit plan,
other than a

33 catastrophic health plan)), and (a) ((the
benefits under the

34 previous plan provide equivalent or greater overall
benefit

35 coverage than that provided in the health benefit
plan the

36 individual seeks to purchase; or (b))) the person
is seeking an

37 individual health benefit plan due to his or her change
of

38 residence from one geographic area in Washington state
to another

p. 19 SB
5817

_1 geographic area in Washington state where his or her
current

_2 health plan is not offered, if application for coverage
is made

_3 within ninety days of relocation; or (((c))) (b)
the person is

_4 seeking an individual health benefit plan: (i) Because
a health

_5 care provider with whom he or she has an established
care

_6 relationship and from whom he or she has received
treatment within

_7 the past twelve months is no longer part of the
carrier's provider

_8 network under his or her existing Washington individual
health

_9 benefit plan; and (ii) his or her health care provider
is part of

10 another carrier's provider network; and (iii)
application for a

11 health benefit plan under that carrier's provider
network

12 individual coverage is made within ninety days of his or
her

13 provider leaving the previous carrier's provider
network. ((The

14 carrier must credit the period of coverage the person
was

15 continuously covered under the immediately preceding
health plan

16 toward the waiting period of the new health plan.))
For the

17 person previously enrolled in a group health benefit
plan, the

18 carrier must credit the aggregate of all periods of
preceding

19 coverage not separated by more than sixty-three days
toward the

20 waiting period of the new health plan. For the
person previously

21 enrolled in an individual health benefit plan other
than a

22 catastrophic health plan or a plan that provided
equivalent or

23 greater overall benefit coverage than the coverage
the individual

24 seeks to purchase, the carrier must credit the period
of coverage

25 the person was continuously covered under the immediately

26 preceding health plan. For the purposes of this
subsection (3), a

27 preceding health plan includes an employer-provided
self-funded

28 health plan and plans of the Washington state health
insurance

29 pool.

30 (4) Every health carrier shall waive any preexisting
condition

31 waiting period in its individual plans for a person who
is an

32 eligible individual as defined in section 2741(b) of the
federal

33 health insurance portability and accountability act of
1996 (42

34 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).

35 (5) Subject to the provisions of subsections (1)
through (4) of

36 this section, nothing contained in this section requires
a health

37 carrier to amend a health plan to provide new benefits
in its

SB 5817 p. 20

_1 existing health plans. In addition, nothing in this
section

_2 requires a carrier to waive benefit limitations not
related to an

_3 individual or group's preexisting conditions or health
history.

_4 Sec. 8. RCW
48.43.018 and 2000 c 80 s 4 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Except as provided in (a) through (c) of this
subsection, a

_7 health carrier may require any person applying for an
individual

_8 health benefit plan to complete the standard health
questionnaire

_9 designated under chapter 48.41 RCW.

10 (a) If a person is seeking an individual health
benefit plan

11 due to his or her change of residence from one
geographic area in

12 Washington state to another geographic area in
Washington state

13 where his or her current health plan is not offered,
completion of

14 the standard health questionnaire shall not be a
condition of

15 coverage if application for coverage is made within
ninety days of

16 relocation.

17 (b) If a person is seeking an individual health
benefit plan:

18 (i) Because a health care provider with whom he or
she has an

19 established care relationship and from whom he or she
has received

20 treatment within the past twelve months is no longer
part of the

21 carrier's provider network under his or her existing
Washington

22 individual health benefit plan; and

23 (ii) His or her health care provider is part of
another

24 carrier's provider network; and

25 (iii) Application for a health benefit plan under
that

26 carrier's provider network individual coverage is made
within

27 ninety days of his or her provider leaving the previous
carrier's

28 provider network; then completion of the standard health

29 questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage.

30 (c) If a person is seeking an individual health
benefit plan

31 due to his or her having exhausted continuation coverage
provided

32 under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq., completion of the
standard

33 health questionnaire shall not be a condition of
coverage if

34 application for coverage is made within ninety days of
exhaustion

35 of continuation coverage. A health carrier shall
accept an

36 application without a standard health questionnaire
from a person

37 currently covered by such continuation coverage if
application is

p. 21 SB
5817

_1 made within ninety days prior to the date the
continuation

_2 coverage would be exhausted and the effective date of
the

_3 individual coverage applied for is the date the
continuation

_4 coverage would be exhausted, or within ninety days
thereafter.

_5 (2) If, based upon the results of the standard
health

_6 questionnaire, the person qualifies for coverage under
the

_7 Washington state health insurance pool, the following
shall apply:

_8 (a) The carrier may decide not to accept the
person's

_9 application for enrollment in its individual health
benefit plan;

10 and

11 (b) Within fifteen business days of receipt of a
completed

12 application, the carrier shall provide written notice of
the

13 decision not to accept the person's application for
enrollment to

14 both the person and the administrator of the Washington
state

15 health insurance pool. The notice to the person shall
state that

16 the person is eligible for health insurance provided by
the

17 Washington state health insurance pool, and shall
include

18 information about the Washington state health insurance
pool and

19 an application for such coverage. If the carrier
does not provide

20 or postmark such notice within fifteen business days,
the

21 application is deemed approved.

22 (3) If the person applying for an individual health
benefit

23 plan: (a) Does not qualify for coverage under the
Washington state

24 health insurance pool based upon the results of the
standard

25 health questionnaire; (b) does qualify for coverage
under the

26 Washington state health insurance pool based upon the
results of

27 the standard health questionnaire and the carrier elects
to accept

28 the person for enrollment; or (c) is not required to complete
the

29 standard health questionnaire designated under this
chapter under

30 subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, the carrier
shall accept

31 the person for enrollment if he or she resides within
the

32 carrier's service area and provide or assure the
provision of all

33 covered services regardless of age, sex, family
structure,

34 ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic location,
employment

35 status, socioeconomic status, other condition or
situation, or the

36 provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The commissioner may
grant a

37 temporary exemption from this subsection if, upon
application by a

38 health carrier, the commissioner finds that the
clinical,

SB 5817 p. 22

_1 financial, or administrative capacity to serve existing
enrollees

_2 will be impaired if a health carrier is required to
continue

_3 enrollment of additional eligible individuals.

_4 Sec. 9. RCW
48.43.025 and 2000 c 79 s 23 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) For group health benefit plans for groups other
than small

_7 groups, no carrier may reject an individual for health
plan

_8 coverage based upon preexisting conditions of the
individual and

_9 no carrier may deny, exclude, or otherwise limit
coverage for an

10 individual's preexisting health conditions; except that
a carrier

11 may impose a three-month benefit waiting period for
preexisting

12 conditions for which medical advice was given, or for
which a

13 health care provider recommended or provided treatment((,
or for

14 which a prudent layperson would have sought advice or
treatment,))

15 within three months before the effective date of
coverage. Any

16 preexisting condition waiting period or limitation
relating to

17 pregnancy as a preexisting condition shall be imposed
only to the

18 extent allowed in the federal health insurance
portability and

19 accountability act of 1996.

20 (2) For group health benefit plans for small groups,
no carrier

21 may reject an individual for health plan coverage based
upon

22 preexisting conditions of the individual and no carrier
may deny,

23 exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's

24 preexisting health conditions. Except that a carrier
may impose a

25 nine-month benefit waiting period for preexisting
conditions for

26 which medical advice was given, or for which a health
care

27 provider recommended or provided treatment((, or for
which a

28 prudent layperson would have sought advice or
treatment,)) within

29 six months before the effective date of coverage. Any
preexisting

30 condition waiting period or limitation relating to
pregnancy as a

31 preexisting condition shall be imposed only to the
extent allowed

32 in the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act

33 of 1996.

34 (3) No carrier may avoid the requirements of this
section

35 through the creation of a new rate classification or the

36 modification of an existing rate classification. A new
or changed

37 rate classification will be deemed an attempt to avoid
the

p. 23 SB
5817

_1 provisions of this section if the new or changed
classification

_2 would substantially discourage applications for coverage
from

_3 individuals or groups who are higher than average health
risks.

_4 These provisions apply only to individuals who are
Washington

_5 residents.

_6 Sec. 10. RCW
48.44.017 and 2000 c 79 s 29 are each amended to read

_7 as follows:

_8 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

_9 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

10 (a) "Claims" means the cost to the health
care service

11 contractor of health care services, as defined in RCW
48.43.005,

12 provided to a contract holder or paid to or on behalf of
a

13 contract holder in accordance with the terms of a health
benefit

14 plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.005. This includes
capitation

15 payments or other similar payments made to providers for
the

16 purpose of paying for health care services for an
enrollee.

17 (b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The
liability for claims which

18 have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for
claims

19 which have not been reported but which may reasonably be
expected;

20 (iii) active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims
reserves

21 whether for a specific liability purpose or not.

22 (c) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as
defined in RCW

23 48.43.005, plus any rate credits or recoupments less any
refunds,

24 for the applicable period, whether received before,
during, or

25 after the applicable period.

26 (d) "Incurred claims expense" means claims
paid during the

27 applicable period plus any increase, or less any
decrease, in the

28 claims reserves.

29 (e) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims
expense as a percentage

30 of earned premiums.

31 (f) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life
reserves; and (ii)

32 additional reserves whether for a specific liability
purpose or

33 not.

34 (2) A health care service contractor shall file, for

35 informational purposes only, a notice of its schedule of
rates for

36 its individual contracts with the commissioner prior to
use.

37 (3) A health care service contractor shall file with
the notice

SB 5817 p. 24

_1 required under subsection (2) of this section supporting

_2 documentation of its method of determining the rates
charged. The

_3 commissioner may request only the following supporting

_4 documentation:

_5 (a) A description of the health care service
contractor's rate-

_6 making methodology;

_7 (b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred
claims which

_8 includes the experience data, assumptions, and
justifications of

_9 the health care service contractor's projection;

10 (c) The percentage of premium attributable in
aggregate for

11 nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted
community rates

12 charged; and

13 (d) A certification by a member of the American
academy of

14 actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner,
that the

15 adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably
expected to

16 result in a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss
ratio

17 standard established in subsection (7) of this section.

18 (4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise
impede the

19 implementation of the filed rates.

20 (5) By the last day of May each year any health care
service

21 contractor ((providing)) issuing or renewing
individual health

22 benefit plans in this state during the preceding
calendar year

23 shall file for review by the commissioner supporting
documentation

24 of its actual loss ratio for its individual health
benefit plans

25 offered or renewed in this state in aggregate for
the preceding

26 calendar year. The filing shall include aggregate earned
premiums,

27 aggregate incurred claims, and a certification by
a member of the

28 American academy of actuaries, or other person approved
by the

29 commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been
calculated in

30 accordance with accepted actuarial principles.

31 (a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period
beginning with the

32 date the filing is ((delivered to)) received
by the commissioner,

33 the filing shall be deemed approved unless prior thereto
the

34 commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio.

35 (b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of
the actual

36 loss ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the
grounds

37 for contesting the calculation to the health care
service

38 contractor.

p. 25 SB
5817

_1 (c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the
actual loss

_2 ratio shall upon written demand of either the
commissioner or the

_3 health care service contractor be submitted to hearing
under

_4 chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

_5 (6) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding
calendar year is

_6 less than the loss ratio standard established in
subsection (7) of

_7 this section, a remittance is due and the following
shall apply:

_8 (a) The health care service contractor shall calculate
a

_9 percentage of premium to be remitted to the Washington
state

10 health insurance pool by subtracting the actual loss
ratio for the

11 preceding year from the loss ratio established in
subsection (7)

12 of this section.

13 (b) The remittance to the Washington state health
insurance

14 pool is the percentage calculated in (a) of this
subsection,

15 multiplied by the premium earned from each enrollee in
the

16 previous calendar year. Interest shall be added to the
remittance

17 due at a five percent annual rate calculated from the
end of the

18 calendar year for which the remittance is due to the
date the

19 remittance is made.

20 (c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall

21 be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be
used as

22 directed by the pool board of directors.

23 (d) Any remittance required to be issued under this
section

24 shall be issued within thirty days after the actual loss
ratio is

25 deemed approved under subsection (5)(a) of this section
or the

26 determination by an administrative law judge under
subsection

27 (5)(c) of this section.

28 (7) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall
be seventy-

29 four percent minus the premium tax rate applicable to
the health

30 care service contractor's individual health benefit
plans under

31 RCW 48.14.0201.

32 Sec. 11. RCW
48.46.062 and 2000 c 79 s 32 are each amended to read

33 as follows:

34 (1) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this

35 section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

36 (a) "Claims" means the cost to the health
maintenance

37 organization of health care services, as defined in RCW
48.43.005,

SB 5817 p. 26

_1 provided to an enrollee or paid to or on behalf of the
enrollee in

_2 accordance with the terms of a health benefit plan, as
defined in

_3 RCW 48.43.005. This includes capitation payments or
other similar

_4 payments made to providers for the purpose of paying for
health

_5 care services for an enrollee.

_6 (b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The
liability for claims which

_7 have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for
claims

_8 which have not been reported but which may reasonably be
expected;

_9 (iii) active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims
reserves

10 whether for a specific liability purpose or not.

11 (c) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as
defined in RCW

12 48.43.005, plus any rate credits or recoupments less any
refunds,

13 for the applicable period, whether received before,
during, or

14 after the applicable period.

15 (d) "Incurred claims expense" means claims
paid during the

16 applicable period plus any increase, or less any
decrease, in the

17 claims reserves.

18 (e) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims
expense as a percentage

19 of earned premiums.

20 (f) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life
reserves; and (ii)

21 additional reserves whether for a specific liability
purpose or

22 not.

23 (2) A health maintenance organization shall file,
for

24 informational purposes only, a notice of its schedule of
rates for

25 its individual agreements with the commissioner prior to
use.

26 (3) A health maintenance organization shall file
with the

27 notice required under subsection (2) of this section
supporting

28 documentation of its method of determining the rates
charged. The

29 commissioner may request only the following supporting

30 documentation:

31 (a) A description of the health maintenance
organization's rate-

32 making methodology;

33 (b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred
claims which

34 includes the experience data, assumptions, and
justifications of

35 the health maintenance organization's projection;

36 (c) The percentage of premium attributable in
aggregate for

37 nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted
community rates

38 charged; and

p. 27 SB
5817

_1 (d) A certification by a member of the American
academy of

_2 actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner,
that the

_3 adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably
expected to

_4 result in a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss
ratio

_5 standard established in subsection (7) of this section.

_6 (4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise
impede the

_7 implementation of the filed rates.

_8 (5) By the last day of May each year any health
maintenance

_9 organization ((providing)) issuing or renewing
individual health

10 benefit plans in this state during the preceding
calendar year

11 shall file for review by the commissioner supporting
documentation

12 of its actual loss ratio for its individual health
benefit plans

13 offered or renewed in the state in aggregate for
the preceding

14 calendar year. The filing shall include aggregate
earned premiums,

15 aggregate incurred claims, and a certification by
a member of the

16 American academy of actuaries, or other person approved
by the

17 commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been calculated
in

18 accordance with accepted actuarial principles.

19 (a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period
beginning with the

20 date the filing is ((delivered to)) received
by the commissioner,

21 the filing shall be deemed approved unless prior thereto
the

22 commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio.

23 (b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of
the actual

24 loss ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the
grounds

25 for contesting the calculation to the health maintenance

26 organization.

27 (c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the
actual loss

28 ratio shall, upon written demand of either the
commissioner or the

29 health maintenance organization, be submitted to hearing
under

30 chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

31 (6) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding
calendar year is

32 less than the loss ratio standard established in
subsection (7) of

33 this section, a remittance is due and the following
shall apply:

34 (a) The health maintenance organization shall
calculate a

35 percentage of premium to be remitted to the Washington
state

36 health insurance pool by subtracting the actual loss
ratio for the

37 preceding year from the loss ratio established in subsection
(7)

38 of this section.

SB 5817 p. 28

_1 (b) The remittance to the Washington state health
insurance

_2 pool is the percentage calculated in (a) of this
subsection,

_3 multiplied by the premium earned from each enrollee in
the

_4 previous calendar year. Interest shall be added to the
remittance

_5 due at a five percent annual rate calculated from the
end of the

_6 calendar year for which the remittance is due to the
date the

_7 remittance is made.

_8 (c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall

_9 be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be
used as

10 directed by the pool board of directors.

11 (d) Any remittance required to be issued under this
section

12 shall be issued within thirty days after the actual loss
ratio is

13 deemed approved under subsection (5)(a) of this section
or the

14 determination by an administrative law judge under
subsection

15 (5)(c) of this section.

16 (7) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall
be seventy-

17 four percent minus the premium tax rate applicable to
the health

18 maintenance organization's individual health benefit
plans under

19 RCW 48.14.0201.

20 Sec. 12. RCW
70.47.060 and 2000 c 79 s 34 are each amended to read

21 as follows:

22 The administrator has the following powers and
duties:

23 (1) To design and from time to time revise a
schedule of

24 covered basic health care services, including physician
services,

25 inpatient and outpatient hospital services, prescription
drugs and

26 medications, and other services that may be necessary
for basic

27 health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that

28 funds are available, offer as basic health plan services
chemical

29 dependency services, mental health services and organ
transplant

30 services; however, no one service or any combination of
these

31 three services shall increase the actuarial value of the
basic

32 health plan benefits by more than five percent excluding

33 inflation, as determined by the office of financial
management.

34 All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any
participating

35 managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan

36 shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in

37 return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule
of services

p. 29 SB
5817

_1 shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health
care and

_2 shall include all services necessary for prenatal,
postnatal, and

_3 well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for
subsidized

_4 enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal and
postnatal

_5 services through the medical assistance program under
chapter

_6 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such
services

_7 except to the extent that such services are necessary
over not

_8 more than a one-month period in order to maintain
continuity of

_9 care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care
provider.

10 The schedule of services shall also include a separate
schedule of

11 basic health care services for children, eighteen years
of age and

12 younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees
who

13 choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only
for their

14 dependent children. In designing and revising the
schedule of

15 services, the administrator shall consider the
guidelines for

16 assessing health services under the mandated benefits
act of 1984,

17 RCW 48.47.030, and such other factors as the
administrator deems

18 appropriate.

19 (2)(a) To design and implement a structure of
periodic premiums

20 due the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is
based upon

21 gross family income, giving appropriate consideration to
family

22 size and the ages of all family members. The enrollment
of children

23 shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who

24 are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic
premiums shall

25 be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as

26 individuals pursuant to subsection (9) of this section
and to the

27 share of the cost of the plan due from subsidized
enrollees

28 entering the plan as employees pursuant to subsection
(10) of this

29 section.

30 (b) To determine the periodic premiums due the
administrator

31 from nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from
nonsubsidized

32 enrollees shall be in an amount equal to the cost
charged by the

33 managed health care system provider to the state for the
plan plus

34 the administrative cost of providing the plan to those
enrollees

35 and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

36 (c) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with
the prior

37 approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or
any other

SB 5817 p. 30

_1 amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollee, by

_2 arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism
acceptable

_3 to the administrator.

_4 (d) To develop, as an offering by every health
carrier

_5 providing coverage identical to the basic health
plan, as

_6 configured on January 1, 2001, a basic health plan
model plan with

_7 uniformity in enrollee cost-sharing requirements.

_8 (3) To design and implement a structure of enrollee
cost-

_9 sharing due a managed health care system from subsidized
and

10 nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure shall discourage

11 inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care
services, and

12 may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other
cost-sharing

13 mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as
to

14 constitute a barrier to appropriate utilization of
necessary

15 health care services.

16 (4) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for
subsidies so

17 as to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for
such

18 purposes. Whenever the administrator finds that there
is danger of

19 such an overexpenditure, the administrator shall close
enrollment

20 until the administrator finds the danger no longer
exists.

21 (5) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized
enrollees,

22 as defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy
provided to

23 persons who qualify may be based on the lowest cost
plans, as

24 defined by the administrator.

25 (6) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development
of the

26 delivery of services and availability of the plan to
residents of

27 the state, subject to the limitations contained in RCW
70.47.080

28 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

29 (7) To solicit and accept applications from managed
health care

30 systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as
eligible

31 basic health care providers under the plan for either
subsidized

32 enrollees, or nonsubsidized enrollees, or both. The
administrator

33 shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health care
services

34 are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a
selection

35 of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In

36 adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care

37 systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator

38 shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health

p. 31 SB
5817

_1 care services and the differences in local availability
of health

_2 care resources, along with other resources, within and
among the

_3 several areas of the state. Contracts with participating
managed

_4 health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan
enrollees

_5 who become eligible for medical assistance may, at their
option,

_6 continue to receive services from their existing
providers within

_7 the managed health care system if such providers have
entered into

_8 provider agreements with the department of social and
health

_9 services.

10 (8) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf
of

11 subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees, deposit them in
the basic

12 health plan operating account, keep records of enrollee
status,

13 and authorize periodic payments to managed health care
systems on

14 the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the

15 respective managed health care systems.

16 (9) To accept applications from individuals residing
in areas

17 served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their
spouses and

18 dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington
basic health

19 plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, to establish

20 appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be

21 necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a
reasonable

22 schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of
any

23 enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income
for

24 sliding scale premiums. Funds received by a family as
part of

25 participation in the adoption support program authorized
under RCW

26 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be
counted

27 toward a family's current gross family income for the
purposes of

28 this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income
or income

29 changes accurately, the administrator shall have the
authority

30 either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by
the state

31 or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred
percent of the

32 amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee
incorrectly

33 reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules
to define the

34 appropriate application of these sanctions and the
processes to

35 implement the sanctions provided in this subsection,
within

36 available resources. No subsidy may be paid with
respect to any

37 enrollee whose current gross family income exceeds twice
the

38 federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110, who
is a

SB 5817 p. 32

_1 recipient of medical assistance or medical care services
under

_2 chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment

_3 for no apparent good cause, the administrator may
establish

_4 appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to
such

_5 individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

_6 (10) To accept applications from business owners on
behalf of

_7 themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent
children,

_8 as subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in
an area

_9 served by the plan. The administrator may require all
or the

10 substantial majority of the eligible employees of such
businesses

11 to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures
necessary to

12 facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan
and into a

13 managed health care system. The administrator may
require that a

14 business owner pay at least an amount equal to what the
employee

15 pays after the state pays its portion of the subsidized
premium

16 cost of the plan on behalf of each employee enrolled in
the plan.

17 Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare
who wish

18 to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care

19 coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in

20 the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to

21 be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount

22 negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed

23 health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative

24 cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

25 (11) To determine the rate to be paid to each
participating

26 managed health care system in return for the provision
of covered

27 basic health care services to enrollees in the system.
Although the

28 schedule of covered basic health care services will be
the same or

29 actuarially equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates
negotiated

30 with participating managed health care systems may vary
among the

31 systems. In negotiating rates with participating
systems, the

32 administrator shall consider the characteristics of the

33 populations served by the respective systems, economic

34 circumstances of the local area, the need to conserve
the

35 resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other

36 factors the administrator finds relevant.

37 (12) To monitor the provision of covered services to
enrollees

38 by participating managed health care systems in order to
assure

p. 33 SB
5817

_1 enrollee access to good quality basic health care, to
require

_2 periodic data reports concerning the utilization of
health care

_3 services rendered to enrollees in order to provide
adequate

_4 information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and
records

_5 of participating managed health care systems to assure
compliance

_6 with the purposes of this chapter. In requiring reports
from

_7 participating managed health care systems, including
data on

_8 services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to

_9 minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems
and to the

10 plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such
reporting

11 requirements with other state agencies, such as the
insurance

12 commissioner and the department of health, to minimize
duplication

13 of effort.

14 (13) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on
private

15 employer-based health care coverage and to take
appropriate

16 measures consistent with state and federal statutes that
will

17 discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

18 (14) To develop a program of proven preventive
health measures

19 and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and
consistent

20 with this chapter.

21 (15) To provide, consistent with available funding,
assistance

22 for rural residents, underserved populations, and
persons of

23 color.

24 (16) In consultation with appropriate state and
local

25 government agencies, to establish criteria defining
eligibility

26 for persons confined or residing in government-operated

27 institutions.

28 (17) To administer the premium discounts provided
under RCW

29 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with
the

30 Washington state health insurance pool.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5817 p. 34