BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
74.09.510 and 1997 c 59 s 14 and 1997 c 58 s 201 are

_7 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

_8 Medical assistance may be provided in accordance
with

_9 eligibility requirements established by the department,
as defined

10 in the social security Title XIX state plan for
mandatory

11 categorical­ly needy persons and: (1) Individuals who
would be

12 eligible for cash assistance except for their
institutional

13 status; (2) individuals who are under twenty-one years
of age, who

14 would be eligible for medicaid, but do not qualify as
dependent

15 children and who are in (a) foster care, (b) subsidized
adoption,

16 (c) a nursing facility or an intermediate care facility
for the

17 mentally retarded, or (d) inpatient psychiatric
facilities; (3)

18 the aged, blind, and disabled who: (a) Receive only a
state

p. 1 2SSB
5820

_1 supplement, or (b) would not be eligible for cash assistance
if

_2 they were not institutionalized; (4) categorically
eligible

_3 individu­als who meet the income and resource
requirements of the

_4 cash assistance programs; (5) individuals who are
enrolled in

_5 managed health care systems, who have otherwise lost
eligibility

_6 for medical assistance, but who have not completed a
current six-

_7 month enrollment in a managed health care system, and
who are

_8 eligible for federal financial participation under Title
XIX of

_9 the social security act; (6) children and pregnant women
allowed

10 by federal statute for whom funding is appropriated; (7)
other

11 individuals eligible for medical services under RCW
74.09.035 and

12 74.09.700 for whom federal financial participation is
available

13 under Title XIX of the social security act; ((and))
(8) persons

14 allowed by section 1931 of the social security act for
whom

15 funding is appropriated; and (9) women who are: (a)
Under sixty-

16 five years of age; (b) have been screened for breast
and cervical

17 cancer under the national breast and cervical health
program

18 administered by the department of health or tribal
entity and have

19 been identified as needing treatment for breast or
cervical

20 cancer; and (c) are not otherwise covered by health

21 insurance. Medical assistance provided under this
subsection is

22 limited to the period during which the woman requires
treatment

23 for breast or cervical cancer, and is subject to any
conditions or

24 limitations specified in the omnibus appropriations
act.

25 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

26 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

27 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

28 takes effect July 1, 2001.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

2SSB 5820 p. 2