BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

The compensation for
all unlicensed direct care workers who provide state-funded long-term care
services through contract with the department of social and health services
under the medicaid personal care program, community options program entry
system, or chore services, whose hourly wage as of June 30, 2001, is nine
dollars or less per hour, shall receive an increase of one dollar per hour
starting July 1, 2001. The compensation for all unlicensed direct care workers
who provide state-funded long-term care services as employees of home care
agencies, adult family homes, boarding homes, nursing homes, and adult day
health, whose hourly wage as of June 30, 2001, is nine dollars or less per
hour, shall receive an increase of one dollar per hour starting July 1, 2001.
The total sum of this increase shall go directly to pay for worker wages and
shall not be used for any other purposes.

As used in this
section, "direct care worker" means a person whose duties include
assisting with activities of daily living for a functionally disabled person as
defined in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

The compensation for
all unlicensed direct care workers who provide state-funded long-term care
services through contract with the department of social and health services
authorized under this chapter, whose hourly wage is nine dollars or less per
hour as of June 30, 2001, shall receive an increase of one dollar per hour
starting July 1, 2001. The total sum of this increase shall go directly to pay
for worker wages and shall not be used to pay for any other purposes.

As used in
this section, "direct care worker" means a person whose duties
include assisting with activities of daily living for a functionally disabled
person as defined in chapter 74.39A RCW. For the purposes of this section, a
direct care worker may be an individual provider or a person employed in any of
the following programs authorized under this chapter: Intensive tenant
support, regular tenant support, supportive living, group homes, alternative
living, family support, attendant care, or respite care.

---
END ---