BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.30.020 and 1965 c
8 s 43.30.020 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of this
chapter, except where a different interpretation is required by the context:

(1)
"Department" means the department of natural resources;

(2) "Board"
means the board of natural resources;

(3)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the department of natural
resources;

(4)
"Supervisor" means ((the)) one or more supervisors
of natural resources;

(5) "Agency"
and "state agency" means any branch, department, or unit of the state
government, however designated or constituted;

(6)
"Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.

--- END ---