BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.020 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following goals are
adopted to guide the development and adoption of comprehensive plans and
development regulations of those counties and cities that are required or
choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in
order of priority and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:

(1) Urban growth.
Encourage development in urban areas where adequate public facilities and
services exist or can be provided in an efficient manner.

(2) Reduce sprawl.
Reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low-density development.

(3) Transportation.
Encourage efficient multimodal transportation systems that are based on
regional priorities and coordinated with county and city comprehensive plans.

(4) Housing. Encourage
the availability of affordable housing to all economic segments of the
population of this state, promote a variety of residential densities and
housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing stock.

(5) Economic
development. Encourage economic development throughout the state that is
consistent with adopted comprehensive plans, promote economic opportunity for
all citizens of this state, especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged
persons, and encourage growth in areas experiencing insufficient economic
growth, all within the capacities of the state's natural resources, public
services, and public facilities.

(6) Property rights.
Private property shall not be taken for public use without just compensation
having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be protected from
arbitrary and discriminatory actions.

(7) Permits.
Applications for both state and local government permits should be processed in
a timely and fair manner to ensure predictability.

(8) Natural resource
industries. Maintain and enhance natural resource-based industries, including
productive timber, agricultural, and fisheries industries. Encourage the
conservation of productive forest lands and productive agricultural lands, and
discourage incompatible uses.

(9) Open space and
recreation. ((Encourage)) Maintain and enhance the retention of
open space and development of recreational opportunities, conserve fish and
wildlife habitat, increase access to natural resource lands and water, and
develop parks.

(10) Environment.
Protect the environment and enhance the state's high quality of life, including
air and water quality, and the availability of water.

(11) Citizen
participation and coordination. Encourage the involvement of citizens in the
planning process and ensure coordination between communities and jurisdictions
to reconcile conflicts.

(12) Public facilities and
services. Ensure that those public facilities and services necessary to
support development shall be adequate to serve the development at the time the
development is available for occupancy and use without decreasing current
service levels below locally established minimum standards.

(13) Historic
preservation. Identify and encourage the preservation of lands, sites, and
structures, that have historical or archaeological significance.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998
c 286 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county that is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city within such
county, shall adopt development regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to
assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may
not prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and
shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development regulations
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of
lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in accordance
with best management practices, of these designated lands for the production of
food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Such
regulations shall provide that active recreation, together with essential
facilities such as backstops and goals, may be permitted on or adjacent to such
designated agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands provided that:

(a) Active
recreational uses shall be designed to restrict physical trespass on adjacent
properties;

(b) Buildings
associated with recreational uses shall be limited to restroom facilities,
picnic shelters, storage, or maintenance facilities for equipment used on-site;

(c) Any soil
surfaces temporarily disturbed through construction activities shall be
restored in a manner consistent with agricultural uses; however, driveways and
parking may be constructed;

(d) Access to
recreational uses shall be designed to minimize impact on the surrounding
agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands whenever feasible; and

(e) Although
recreational use of the subject lands may be long term, the recreational use
may be changed at a subsequent date if the county or city declares after proper
study that a critical shortage of agricultural soils exists and initiates a
process to relocate any recreational uses off the subject property with due
compensation.

Counties and cities
shall require that all plats, short plats, development permits, and building
permits issued for development activities on, or within five hundred feet of,
lands designated as agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource
lands, contain a notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a variety
of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with residential
development for certain periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral
resource lands shall also inform that an application might be made for
mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing,
stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.

(2) Each county and
city shall adopt development regulations that protect critical areas that are
required to be designated under RCW 36.70A.170. For counties and cities that
are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development
regulations shall be adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder
of the counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on or
before March 1, 1992.

(3) Such counties and
cities shall review these designations and development regulations when
adopting their comprehensive plans under RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing
development regulations under RCW 36.70A.120 and may alter such designations
and development regulations to insure consistency.

(4) Forest
land and agricultural land located within urban growth areas shall not be
designated by a county or city as forest land or agricultural land of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170 unless the city or county has
enacted a program authorizing transfer or purchase of development rights.

---
END ---