BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the purpose of this
act to promote cooperative labor relations between the University of Washington
and the employees who provide instructional services who are enrolled as
students at the university by extending collective bargaining rights as provided
for in this chapter and using the orderly procedures administered by the public
employment relations commission. However, the legislature intends that there
will be no reduction of educational opportunities for students enrolled at the
university. To achieve this end the legislature intends that pursuant to
chapter 41.56 RCW, the university will exclusively bargain in good faith over
all matters within the scope of bargaining with the exclusive bargaining
representative of employees as defined in section 2 of this act.

The legislature
recognizes the importance of the shared governance practices developed at the
University of Washington. The legislature does not intend to restrict, limit,
or prohibit the exercise of the functions of the faculty in any shared
governance mechanisms or practices, including the faculty senate, faculty
councils, and faculty codes of the University of Washington; nor does the
legislature intend to restrict, limit, or prohibit the exercise of the
functions of the graduate and professional student senate, the associated
students of the University of Washington, or any other student organization in
matters outside the scope of bargaining covered by chapter 41.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter shall apply to the University of
Washington with respect to employees of the University of Washington who are
enrolled in an academic program and are in a classification under (a) through
(f) of this subsection on any University of Washington campus, including a
branch campus. The employees in (a) through (f) of this subsection constitute
an appropriate bargaining unit:

(a) Predoctoral
instructors;

(b) Predoctoral
lecturers;

(c) Predoctoral
teaching assistants;

(d) Predoctoral
teaching associates I and II;

(e) Tutors, readers,
and graders in all academic units and tutoring centers; and

(f) All employees
enrolled in an academic program whose duties and responsibilities are
substantially equivalent to those employees in (a) through (e) of this
subsection.

(2) Provisions of
collective bargaining agreements related to compensation are subject to the
restrictions under RCW 41.56.201(2)(c) and (3).

(3) The University of
Washington is not obligated pursuant to this chapter to bargain over:

(a) The ability to
terminate the employment of any individual if the individual is not meeting
academic requirements as determined by the university;

(b) The number of
students to be admitted to a particular class or class section;

(c) The academic
calendar; and

(d) The amount of
tuition or fees. Tuition and fee remission and waiver, however, shall be
within the scope of bargaining.

(4) Any funds obligated
pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement under this chapter shall come
from administrative cost savings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---