BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27.031 and 1995 c
343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, there shall be in effect in all counties and cities
the state building code which shall consist of the following codes which are
hereby adopted by reference:

(1) ((Uniform)) The
International Building Code and ((Uniform Building Code Standards)) the
International Residential Code, published by the International ((Conference
of Building Officials)) Code Council Inc.;

(2) ((Uniform)) The
International Mechanical Code, ((including Chapter 13, Fuel Gas Piping,
Appendix B,)) published by the International ((Conference of Building
Officials)) Code Council Inc.;

(3) The ((Uniform))
International Fire Code ((and Uniform Fire Code Standards)),
published by the International ((Fire Code Institute)) Code Council
Inc.: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in this code,
participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from carrying
hand-held candles;

(4) Except as provided
in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards,
published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical
Officials: PROVIDED, That chapters 11 and 12 of such code are not adopted; and

(5) The rules ((and
regulations)) adopted by the council establishing standards for making
buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by the physically handicapped
or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160.

In case of conflict
among the codes enumerated in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, the first named code shall govern over those following.

The codes enumerated in
this section shall be adopted by the council as provided in RCW 19.27.074.

The
council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request of a local
official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated codes.

--- END ---