BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that maintaining the viability of health care service delivery throughout the
state of Washington is a primary goal of state health policy. The legislature
also finds that many hospitals located in Washington are operated by public
hospital districts authorized under chapter 70.44 RCW, which are municipal
corporations governed by publicly elected commissioners and supported by
property taxes levied on the property within the districts. The legislature
declares that public hospital districts should be permitted to use their tax
and other limited financial resources in the most efficient manner possible and
that it is not cost-effective, practical, or desirable to provide quality
health and hospital care services in areas served by public hospital districts
in competition with one another. It is the intent of this act to foster the
development of cooperative and collaborative arrangements among public hospital
districts by specifically authorizing cooperative agreements and contracts for
these entities under the interlocal cooperation act.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.44.450 and 1992 c
161 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other
powers granted to public hospital districts by chapter 39.34 RCW, ((rural))
public hospital districts may enter into cooperative agreements and contracts
with other ((rural)) public hospital districts in order to provide for
the health care needs of the people served by the hospital districts. These
agreements and contracts are specifically authorized to include:

(1) Allocation of
health care services among the different facilities owned and operated by the
districts;

(2) Combined purchases
and allocations of medical equipment and technologies;

(3) Joint agreements
and contracts for health care service delivery and payment with public and
private entities; and

(4) Other
cooperative arrangements consistent with the intent of chapter 161, Laws of
1992. The provisions of chapter 39.34 RCW shall apply to the development and
implementation of the cooperative contracts and agreements.

---
END ---