BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 77.15.192 (Definitions) and 2001 c 1
s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 713);

(2) RCW 77.15.194 (Unlawful traps) and 2001
c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 713);

(3) RCW 77.15.196 (Unlawful poison) and 2001
c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 713);

(4) RCW 77.15.198 (Violation of RCW
77.15.194 or 77.15.196--Penalty) and 2001 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 713);

(5) Section 1, chapter 1, Laws
of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 713) (uncodified); and

(6) Section 6, chapter 1, Laws
of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 713) (uncodified).

---
END ---