BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.73.250 and 1999 c
337 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All of the state's
ambulance and aid services shall make epinephrine available to their emergency
medical technicians in their emergency care supplies. The emergency medical
technician may administer epinephrine to a patient of any age upon the
presentation of evidence of a prescription for epinephrine or to a patient
under eighteen years of age:

(a) Upon the request of
the patient or his or her parent or guardian; or

(b) Upon the request of
a person who presents written authorization from the patient or his or her
parent or guardian making such a request.

(2) Any emergency
medical technician, emergency medical service, or medical program director
acting in good faith and in compliance with the provisions of this section
shall not be liable for any civil damages arising out of the furnishing or
administration of epinephrine.

(3) Nothing in this
section authorizes the administration of epinephrine by a first responder.

(((4) This section
shall expire December 31, 2001.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

Public school districts
may provide for the administration of epinephrine to students who suffer an
anaphylaxis allergic reaction when the students are in the custody of the
school district, pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW, if the epinephrine is provided
in compliance with:

(1) Rules adopted under
section 4 of this act by the state nursing care quality assurance commission,
and the instructions of a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse
practitioner issued under the rules; and

(2) Written policies of
the school district that are adopted to implement this section and are
developed in accordance with chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a school
employee provides for the administration of epinephrine to a student under
chapter 18.79 RCW and this chapter in substantial compliance with: (a) Rules
adopted by the state nursing care quality assurance commission and the
instructions of a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner
issued under such rules, and (b) written policies of the school district, then
the employee, the employee's school district and school of employment shall not
be liable in any criminal action or for civil damages in their individual,
marital, governmental, corporate, or other capacity as a result of providing
epinephrine.

(2) To be eligible to
administer epinephrine, an employee not licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, shall
file, without coercion by the employer, a voluntary written, current, and
unexpired letter of intent stating the employee's willingness to administer
epinephrine in compliance with established guidelines. If a public school
employee who is not licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW chooses not to file a
letter under this section, the employee shall not be subject to any employer
reprisal or disciplinary action for refusing to file a letter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In accordance with
the rules adopted by the commission, public school districts may provide for
the administration of epinephrine to students suffering an anaphylaxis allergic
reaction when the students are in the custody of the school district.

(2) After consultation
with staff of the superintendent of public instruction, the commission shall
adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, that provide for the
following and such other matters as the commission deems necessary to the
proper implementation of this section:

(a) A requirement for a
written, current, and unexpired request from a parent, legal guardian, or other
person having legal control over the student that the school district provide
for the administration of epinephrine to the student;

(b) A requirement for a
written, current, and unexpired request from a physician licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW that administering epinephrine to a student be provided for
during the hours when school is in session or the hours when the student is
under the supervision of school officials;

(c) A requirement for
written, current, and unexpired instructions from an advanced registered nurse
practitioner or a registered nurse licensed under this chapter regarding
administration of epinephrine that include: (i) A designation of the school
district employee or employees who may administer the epinephrine, and (ii) a
description of the nature and extent of any required supervision; and

(d) The
nature and extent of acceptable training that shall: (i) Be provided by a
physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or registered nurse licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, or this chapter, and (ii) be required of
school district employees who administer the epinephrine to the student under
this section, except that a licensed practical nurse licensed under this
chapter is exempt from training.

---
END ---