BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Over the past decade, the
mission of public education in the state of Washington has changed dramatically.
No longer is it enough for the state to ensure that all children have access to
a quality education. In the new knowledge-based economy, the state must create
a system of schools that provides every child the opportunity to achieve high
standards as every child is capable of achieving high standards.

Washingtonians are
committed to helping raise student achievement across the state. The
legislature, educators, parents, and citizens have taken great strides in
creating a standards-based system that holds schools accountable for results.
Over the years, new programs have been added to the common school code with the
intent of helping schools and educators. Regardless of the intent, many of the
rules that govern school districts and schools may not be helping educators to
raise student achievement. Instead, some of the rules may actually hinder
their efforts.

As Washington continues
to implement education reform using standards, assessments, and accountability,
the governance of the common school system must be analyzed in its entirety.
There must be an examination of whether Title 28A RCW serves children or the
system. To that end, all of Title 28A RCW except for chapter 28A.655 RCW,
academic achievement and accountability, is repealed effective September 1,
2004. Before the repeal of Title 28A RCW becomes effective, a new school code
will be enacted that will take effect on the first day of the 2004-05 school
year. The new structure must be carefully designed by parents, educators, and
elected leaders working together to achieve better schools.

In order to examine
Title 28A RCW, school districts and schools must be given the ability to
determine which rules help them provide individual learning environments for
all children, so that all children can achieve high standards. Education laws
must create a system that focuses on outcomes and achievement rather than
program and activity requirements.

Education laws also
must give school districts and schools the ability to redesign or modify the
teacher compensation system. In its current form, the teacher compensation
system often fails to attract and keep top talent in two critical ways. First,
often it does not offer teachers sustained opportunities for professional
growth and career advancement. Second, it does not provide competitive
compensation.

To begin this process
of rewriting the common school code, this act proposes that local school
districts that seek to implement new strategies and structures be allowed to
innovate in the operation and management of schools. Two demonstration
programs will be developed in partnership with education leaders.

The flexibility grant
program will grant waivers to school districts and schools for most state
school rules governing public education, thereby granting more flexibility in
the use of state funds to participating school districts. In exchange for this
flexibility, school districts and schools will be responsible for increased
accountability for student achievement.

The alternative compensation
system grant program will provide state funding to school districts that
voluntarily join with their teachers to design and potentially implement a new
compensation system based on teacher career paths. A teacher compensation
system should be based on professional knowledge, skills, and performance, and
provide teachers with real opportunities for professional recognition and
growth. The goal is to support quality teaching in all of Washington's
classrooms and use the talents and skills of expert educators in mentor or
leadership roles.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The flexibility grant
program is hereby created. The purpose of this statewide competitive grant
program is to provide selected school districts and schools the flexibility
they need to increase student achievement and create high achieving schools.
The goal of this program is to increase student achievement in Washington
state. The program is designed to give significant autonomy to school
districts and schools, and to hold these school districts and schools
accountable for results. Each participating school district shall negotiate a
performance contract between the school district and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Each of these school districts shall
also negotiate performance contracts between the school district and the
schools within their school district. Schools meeting the terms of their
performance agreements will continue to operate under this new system, as
provided for in this chapter. Schools that meet or exceed their goals for
student achievement shall receive a building-based financial reward.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Each school district
and school that receives a flexibility grant under this chapter is exempt from
this title and rules adopted under this title, except as otherwise provided in
this chapter and in the school's approved performance contract. However, this
chapter does not prohibit school districts and schools from electing to comply
with one or more laws or rules governing school districts and school district
boards of directors.

(2) Each school
district and school that receives a flexibility grant shall:

(a) Comply with state
and federal health, safety, and civil rights laws applicable to school
districts;

(b) Participate in
nationally normed standardized achievement tests as required in RCW 28A.230.230
and the elementary, middle school, and high school standards and assessment
examinations as required in RCW 28A.655.060;

(c) Employ certificated
instructional staff as required in RCW 28A.410.010. However, a school that
receives a flexibility grant may hire noncertificated instructional staff of
unusual competence and in exceptional cases as specified in RCW 28A.150.260;

(d) Comply with the
employee record check requirements in RCW 28A.400.303;

(e) Report enrollment,
personnel, and other data necessary for the calculation of state apportionment
payments and be subject to school district financial and audit requirements except
as provided in this subsection:

(i) The district may
request to pool state general apportionment, categorical, and grant revenues,
excluding special education revenues, in a single program and make a single
consolidated plan and application to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction for program approval. If approved, the pooled revenues shall not
be subject to recovery or recapture by the state if the plan is followed;

(ii) The district may
pool state revenues in Title I schoolwide programs as permitted by the federal
elementary education and secondary education act; and

(iii) The district
shall receive full state funding without reduction due to the following
conditional funding requirements of the state operating appropriations act:

(A) Demonstration of
actual K-4 staff ratio;

(B) Demonstration of
actual vocational staff ratio;

(C) Compliance with
vocational indirect expenditure limit;

(D) Demonstration of
maximizing federal medicaid billing for special education students; and

(E) Compliance in
filing truancy petitions; and

(f) Comply with the
annual performance report under RCW 28A.655.110.

(3) Each school
district and school that receives a flexibility grant shall operate under its
new system unless it fails to meet the terms of its performance contract with
the superintendent of public instruction. School districts and schools that do
not meet the terms of their performance contracts are subject to all rules
applicable to school districts and schools, as determined by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The alternative
compensation system grant program is hereby created. The purpose of this
statewide competitive grant program is to provide selected school districts and
schools with assistance in developing an alternative compensation system.
School districts and schools that receive an alternative compensation system
grant shall design a new system for compensating teachers based on a career
ladder model that will attract, support, and retain the best teachers to help
create high achieving schools. Recipients of alternative compensation system
design grants must complete their design project by July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. To help school districts
and schools with deregulation and designing alternative compensation systems
under this chapter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall contract with a technical assistance team of experts for the duration of
the grant periods. This technical assistance team will be selected by the
governor and the superintendent of public instruction. The responsibilities of
the team include, but are not limited to:

(1) Assisting the
governor and the office of the superintendent of public instruction in planning
a statewide student achievement conference for grant applicants who receive a
planning grant for either or both grant programs. The statewide conference
shall provide technical assistance to applicants, including but not limited to,
providing background research, discussions of systems reforms, and presentation
of findings from other programs;

(2) Helping planning
grant recipients write their applications for either or both grant programs;
and

(3) Providing technical
assistance to grant recipients to implement their proposals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1)(a) Each school
district interested in learning more about either or both the flexibility grant
program and the alternative compensation system grant program shall submit an
application for a planning grant to the superintendent of public instruction.
School districts will be notified by October 1, 2001, of the timelines for
applying for planning grants. The purpose of planning grants is to enable
school districts to develop their applications for flexibility grants and
alternative compensation system grants.

(b) Planning grant
recipients shall be selected by representatives from the governor's office and
the office of the superintendent of public instruction from funds appropriated
by the legislature for this purpose. Grants shall be awarded on the basis of
the level of interest and commitment from the school district and the need for
financial assistance. Districts shall demonstrate the level of interest and
commitment of parents, teachers, classified staff, principals, local bargaining
units, and other affected entities in their communities to apply for a
flexibility grant or an alternative compensation system grant, or both.
Priority in awarding planning grants shall be given to school districts
applying for both grant programs. Funds appropriated through this chapter for
planning grants under this section shall be administered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

(2) Recipients of
planning grants shall attend the statewide student achievement conference
developed under section 5 of this act.

(3) After school
districts have attended the statewide student achievement conference, the
school districts may submit an application for either or both the flexibility
implementation grant or the alternative compensation system design grant.

(4) Applications for
the flexibility implementation grants and the alternative compensation system
design grants shall be reviewed and rated by the independent expert review
panel created in section 9 of this act. The governor and the superintendent of
public instruction shall make awards based on recommendations of the review
panel and on availability of funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) Each school district
that applies for state funds through the flexibility grant program shall submit
an application to the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) Flexibility grant
applicants shall provide a detailed description of their deregulation
implementation plan. Application requirements include but are not limited to a
description of:

(a) How the school
district will plan for contracting with every school in the district,
specifying how the district will ensure and assist with high student
achievement results in each of its schools;

(b) How the district
and each of its schools will address and document progress of all students and
student subpopulations including but not limited to gender, race, ethnicity,
migrant children, limited English proficient children, children with
disabilities, and economically disadvantaged children;

(c) What rules the
schools in the district will be required to comply with by the school district;

(d) The minimum
performance requirements the school district will require of the participating
schools, including performance requirements for subpopulations in (b) of this
subsection;

(e) How the school
district will support participating schools that are having difficulty meeting
their performance contracts;

(f) A proposed budget
for designing and implementing their plan;

(g) How the school
district will reward schools that meet or exceed their student achievement
goals; and

(h) How the district
will comply with the performance contract entered into with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

(3) Each school
district that receives a grant under this section shall set aside a portion of
the grant award to reward schools that meet or exceed their student achievement
goals. The amount of the rewards shall be determined by the school district
and specified in the grant application. These rewards shall be building based.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Each school district
that applies for state funds through the alternative compensation system grant
program shall submit an application to the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) Each alternative
compensation system grant applicant shall provide a detailed description of its
plan to create an alternative compensation system in its school district.
Application requirements include but are not limited to:

(a) The goals the
school district has in designing its particular system;

(b) A description of
the process the school district will use to design the system;

(c) The school
district's level of commitment including the level of commitment of parents,
teachers, classified staff, principals, the local bargaining unit, and other
affected entities in their communities; and

(d) The willingness of
the school district to work with others to design a system that can be
implemented statewide with some local variations.

(3) Applications for
grants for system design shall be reviewed and rated by the review panel
created under section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The governor and the
superintendent of public instruction shall select a panel of experts to review
and evaluate school district proposals. This review panel shall make
recommendations to the governor and the superintendent of public instruction on
the award of grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Each school district that
is selected for an implementation or design grant under this chapter shall
participate in an evaluation process required in each grant contract. The
governor's office and the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall select the evaluator through a competitive bidding process. Evaluation
costs shall be paid for by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction from funds appropriated for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The governor and the
superintendent of public instruction shall convene a task force of six to eight
persons to coordinate the process of rewriting the common school code. Before
selecting members, the governor and the superintendent of public instruction
shall solicit input from the legislature. Members of the task force shall
represent at least the following groups: Parents, teachers, classified staff,
principals, superintendents, school boards, local bargaining units, and the
business community. In making its recommendations and proposing legislation,
the task force shall consider input from school districts and schools receiving
grants under this chapter and the results of the evaluations required under
this chapter. Staff of the governor's office, appropriate legislative
committees, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
assist the task force. Recommendations and proposed legislation shall be
prepared by January 1, 2004, and shall reflect the experiences of the participating
school districts and schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. This chapter expires
September 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.150.010 (Public schools) and 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.055;

(2) RCW 28A.150.020 (Common schools) and 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.060;

(3) RCW 28A.150.030 (School day) and 1971
ex.s. c 161 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.010;

(4) RCW 28A.150.040 (School
year--Beginning--End) and 1990 c 33 s 101, 1982 c 158 s 5, 1977 ex.s. c 286 s
1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 22, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.020;

(5) RCW 28A.150.050 (School holidays) and 1989
c 233 s 11, 1985 c 189 s 2, 1984 c 92 s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 24 s 2, 1973 c
32 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 13;

(6) RCW 28A.150.060 (Certificated employee)
and 1990 c 33 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 17, 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 21, &
1973 1st ex.s. c 105 s 1;

(7) RCW 28A.150.070 (General public school
system--Administration) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.020;

(8) RCW 28A.150.080 (Superintendent of the
school district) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.100;

(9) RCW 28A.150.100 (Basic education
certificated instructional staff--Definition--Ratio to students) and 1990 c 33
s 103 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 203;

(10) RCW 28A.150.200 (Basic Education
Act--Program contents--As meeting constitutional requirements) and 1990 c 33 s
104 & 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 1;

(11) RCW 28A.150.205 (Definition) and 1992 c
141 s 502;

(12) RCW 28A.150.210 (Basic Education
Act--Goal) and 1993 c 336 s 101 & 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 2;

(13) RCW 28A.150.211 (Values and traits
recognized) and 1994 c 245 s 10;

(14) RCW 28A.150.220 (Basic Education
Act--Program requirements--Program accessibility--Rules) and 1993 c 371 s 2,
1992 c 141 s 503, 1990 c 33 s 105, 1982 c 158 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 1, &
1977 ex.s. c 359 s 3;

(15) RCW 28A.150.230 (Basic Education
Act--District school directors as accountable for proper operation of
district--Scope--Responsibilities) and 1994 c 245 s 9, 1991 c 61 s 1, 1990 c 33
s 106, 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 7, & 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 18;

(16) RCW 28A.150.240 (Basic Education
Act--Certificated teaching and administrative staff as accountable for
classroom teaching--Scope--Responsibilities--Penalty) and 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 5
& 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 19;

(17) RCW 28A.150.250 (Annual basic education
allocation of funds according to average FTE student
enrollment--Student/teacher ratio standard) and 1990 c 33 s 107, 1987 1st ex.s.
c 2 s 201, 1986 c 144 s 1, 1983 c 3 s 30, 1982 c 158 s 3, 1982 c 158 s 2, 1980
c 154 s 12, 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 4, 1975 1st ex.s. c 211 s
1, 1973 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 1, 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 9, & 1973 c 46 s 2;

(18) RCW 28A.150.260 (Annual basic education
allocation of funds according to average FTE student enrollment--Procedure to
determine distribution formula--Submittal to legislature--Enrollment, FTE
student, certificated and classified staff, defined) and 1997 c 13 s 2, 1995 c
77 s 3, 1992 c 141 s 507, 1992 c 141 s 303, 1991 c 116 s 10, 1990 c 33 s 108,
1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 202, 1985 c 349 s 5, 1983 c 229 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 3,
1979 c 151 s 12, 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 5, & 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 14;

(19) RCW 28A.150.270 (Annual basic education
allocation of funds according to average FTE student enrollment--Procedure for
crediting portion for school building purposes) and 1985 c 7 s 89 & 1980 c
154 s 13;

(20) RCW 28A.150.275 (Annual basic education
allocation for students in technical colleges) and 1995 c 77 s 4 & 1993 c 223
s 1;

(21) RCW 28A.150.280 (Reimbursement for
acquisition of approved transportation equipment--Method) and 1993 c 111 s 1;

(22) RCW 28A.150.290 (State superintendent to
make rules and regulations--Unforeseen conditions or actions to be
recognized--Paperwork limited) and 1992 c 141 s 504, 1990 c 33 s 111, 1981 c
285 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 6, 1973 1st ex.s. c 78 s 1, 1972 ex.s. c 105 s 4,
1971 c 46 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 3 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.170;

(23) RCW 28A.150.295 (General public school
system--Maintained) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.010;

(24) RCW 28A.150.300 (Corporal punishment
prohibited--Adoption of policy) and 1993 c 68 s 1;

(25) RCW 28A.150.305 (Alternative educational
service providers--Student eligibility) and 1997 c 265 s 6;

(26) RCW 28A.150.350 (Part time
students--Defined--Enrollment authorized--Reimbursement for costs--Funding
authority recognition--Rules, regulations) and 1990 c 33 s 112, 1985 c 441 s 5,
1977 ex.s. c 359 s 8, 1972 ex.s. c 14 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 217 s 4;

(27) RCW 28A.150.360 (Adjustments to meet
emergencies) and 1995 c 335 s 101, 1990 c 33 s 113, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.41.150;

(28) RCW 28A.150.370 (Additional programs for
which legislative appropriations must or may be made) and 1995 c 335 s 102,
1995 c 77 s 5, 1990 c 33 s 114, 1982 1st ex.s. c 24 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 359
s 7;

(29) RCW 28A.150.380 (Appropriations by
legislature) and 2001 c 3 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 728), 1995 c 335 s 103,
1990 c 33 s 115, 1980 c 6 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.050;

(30) RCW 28A.150.390 (Appropriations for
special education programs) and 1995 c 77 s 6, 1994 c 180 s 8, 1993 c 149 s 9,
1990 c 33 s 116, 1989 c 400 s 2, 1980 c 87 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 11;

(31) RCW 28A.150.400 (Apportionment factors to
be based on current figures--Rules and regulations) and 1990 c 33 s 117, 1972
ex.s. c 26 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.055;

(32) RCW 28A.150.410 (Basic education
certificated instructional staff--Salary allocation schedule--Limits on
post-graduate credits) and 1997 c 141 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 118, 1989 1st ex.s. c 16
s 1, 1987 3rd ex.s. c 1 s 4, & 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 204;

(33) RCW 28A.150.420 (Reimbursement for classes
provided outside regular school year) and 1989 c 233 s 10;

(34) RCW 28A.150.500 (Educational agencies
offering vocational education programs--Local advisory committees--Advice on
current job needs) and 1991 c 238 s 76; and

(35) RCW 28A.150.510 (Release of education
records to department of social and health services) and 2000 c 88 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.155.010 (Purpose) and 1995 c 77 s
7, 1990 c 33 s 120, & 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.155.020 (Administrative section or
unit for the education of children with disabling conditions--"Children
with disabilities" and "appropriate education" defined--Approval
when child under jurisdiction of juvenile court) and 1995 c 77 s 8, 1990 c 33 s
121, 1985 c 341 s 4, 1984 c 160 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 2 s 2,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.13.010;

(3) RCW 28A.155.030 (Division administrative
officer--Appointment--Duties) and 1995 c 77 s 9, 1990 c 33 s 122, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 52, & 1972 ex.s. c 10 s 1;

(4) RCW 28A.155.040 (Authority of
districts--Participation of department of social and health services) and 1995
c 77 s 10, 1990 c 33 s 123, 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.13.030;

(5) RCW 28A.155.050 (Aid for children unable
to attend school--Apportionment--Allocations from state excess funds) and 1995
c 77 s 11, 1990 c 33 s 124, 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 5, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.13.040;

(6) RCW 28A.155.060 (District authority to
contract with approved agencies--Approval standards) and 1995 c 77 s 12, 1990 c
33 s 125, & 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 6;

(7) RCW 28A.155.070 (Services to children of
preschool age with disabilities--Apportionment--Allocations from state excess
cost funds) and 1995 c 77 s 13, 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.13.050;

(8) RCW 28A.155.080 (Appeal from
superintendent's denial of educational program) and 1995 c 77 s 14, 1990 c 33 s
126, & 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 8;

(9) RCW 28A.155.090 (Superintendent of public
instruction's duty and authority) and 1995 c 77 s 15, 1990 c 33 s 127, 1985 c
341 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 9;

(10) RCW 28A.155.100 (Sanctions applied to
noncomplying districts) and 1990 c 33 s 128 & 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 12;

(11) RCW 28A.155.105 (Braille
instruction--Definitions) and 1996 c 135 s 2;

(12) RCW 28A.155.115 (Braille
instruction--Assessment--Provision in student's curriculum) and 1996 c 135 s 3;

(13) RCW 28A.155.140 (Curriculum-based
assessment procedures for programs for children with handicapping conditions)
and 1991 c 116 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 131, & 1987 c 398 s 1; and

(14) RCW 28A.155.160 (Assistive
devices--Transfer for benefit of children with disabilities--Record, inventory)
and 1997 c 104 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.160.010 (Operation of student
transportation program--Responsibility of local district--Scope--Transporting
of elderly--Insurance) and 1990 c 33 s 132, 1986 c 32 s 1, 1983 1st ex.s. c 61
s 1, 1981 c 265 s 10, 1980 c 122 s 2, 1973 c 45 s 1, 1971 c 24 s 3, 1969 ex.s.
c 153 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.24.055;

(2) RCW 28A.160.020 (Authorization for private
school students to ride buses--Conditions) and 1990 c 33 s 133 & 1981 c 307
s 1;

(3) RCW 28A.160.030 (Authorizing individual
transportation or other arrangements) and 1981 c 265 s 11, 1977 c 80 s 2, 1971
ex.s. c 66 s 10, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.24.100;

(4) RCW 28A.160.040 (Lease of buses to
transport children with disabilities and elderly--Limitation) and 1995 c 77 s
16, 1973 c 45 s 2, & 1971 c 78 s 1;

(5) RCW 28A.160.050 (Lease of buses to
transport children with disabilities and elderly--Directors to authorize) and
1990 c 33 s 134 & 1971 c 78 s 2;

(6) RCW 28A.160.060 (Lease of buses to
transport children with disabilities and elderly--Lease at local
level--Criteria) and 1971 c 78 s 3;

(7) RCW 28A.160.070 (Lease of buses to
transport children with disabilities and elderly--Elderly persons
defined--Program limitation) and 1990 c 33 s 135 & 1973 c 45 s 3;

(8) RCW 28A.160.080 (School buses, rental or
lease for emergency purposes--Authorization) and 1990 c 33 s 136 & 1971 c
24 s 1;

(9) RCW 28A.160.090 (School buses, rental or
lease for emergency purposes--Board to determine district policy--Conditions if
rent or lease) and 1995 c 399 s 20, 1990 c 33 s 137, 1986 c 266 s 21, 1985 c 7
s 88, 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 1, & 1971 c 24 s 2;

(10) RCW 28A.160.100 (School buses, transport
of general public to interscholastic activities--Limitations) and 1990 c 33 s
138 & 1980 c 91 s 1;

(11) RCW 28A.160.110 (School buses,
authorization for parent, guardian or custodian of a student to
ride--Limitations) and 1980 c 122 s 1;

(12) RCW 28A.160.115 (Bus routes) and 1990 c
241 s 11;

(13) RCW 28A.160.120 (Agreements with other
governmental entities for transportation of public or other noncommon school
purposes--Limitations) and 1974 ex.s. c 93 s 1;

(14) RCW 28A.160.130 (Transportation vehicle
fund--Deposits in--Use--Rules for establishment and use) and 1991 c 114 s 2,
1990 c 33 s 139, & 1981 c 265 s 7;

(15) RCW 28A.160.140 (Contract for pupil
transportation services with private nongovernmental entity--Competitive bid
procedures) and 1990 c 33 s 140 & 1987 c 141 s 2;

(16) RCW 28A.160.150 (Student transportation
allocation--Operating costs, determination and funding) and 1996 c 279 s 1,
1990 c 33 s 141, 1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 2, & 1981 c 265 s 1;

(17) RCW 28A.160.160 (Student transportation
allocation--Definitions) and 1996 c 279 s 2, 1995 c 77 s 17, 1990 c 33 s 142,
1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 3, & 1981 c 265 s 2;

(18) RCW 28A.160.170 (Student transportation
allocation--District's annual report to superintendent) and 1990 c 33 s 143,
1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 4, & 1981 c 265 s 3;

(19) RCW 28A.160.180 (Student transportation
allocation--Allocation rates, adjustment--District-owned passenger
cars--Report) and 1996 c 279 s 3, 1995 c 77 s 18, 1990 c 33 s 144, 1985 c 59 s
1, 1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 5, 1982 1st ex.s. c 24 s 2, & 1981 c 265 s 4;

(20) RCW 28A.160.190 (Student transportation
allocation--Notice--Revised eligible student data, when--Allocation payments,
amounts, when) and 1990 c 33 s 145, 1985 c 59 s 2, 1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 6,
1982 1st ex.s. c 24 s 3, & 1981 c 265 s 5;

(21) RCW 28A.160.195 (Vehicle
acquisition--School bus categories--Competitive
specifications--Purchase--Reimbursement--Rules) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 10 s 1;

(22) RCW 28A.160.200 (Vehicle
acquisition--Reimbursement schedule--Maintenance and operation--Depreciation
schedule) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 10 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 146, 1987 c 508 s 4, &
1981 c 265 s 6; and

(23) RCW 28A.160.210 (School bus drivers,
training and qualifications--Rules and regulations for) and 1989 c 178 s 20,
1981 c 200 s 1, 1979 c 158 s 89, & 1969 ex.s. c 153 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.165.010 (Intent) and 1989 c 233 s
1 & 1987 c 478 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.165.012 (Program created) and 1987
c 478 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.165.030 (Definitions) and 1999 c
78 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 148, & 1987 c 478 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.165.040 (Application for state
funds--Needs assessment‑-Plan) and 1990 c 33 s 149, 1989 c 233 s 2, &
1987 c 478 s 4;

(5) RCW 28A.165.050 (Identification of
students--Coordination of use of funds) and 1987 c 478 s 5;

(6) RCW 28A.165.060 (Services or activities
under program) and 1989 c 233 s 3 & 1987 c 478 s 6;

(7) RCW 28A.165.070 (Eligibility for
funds--Distribution of funds--Development of allocation formula) and 1995 1st
sp.s. c 13 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 520, 1990 c 33 s 150, & 1987 c 478 s 7;

(8) RCW 28A.165.080 (Monitoring) and 1990 c 33
s 151 & 1987 c 478 s 8; and

(9) RCW 28A.165.090 (Rules) and 1990 c 33 s
152 & 1987 c 478 s 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 28A.175.010 (Educational progress
information--Reporting requirements--Rules--Reports to legislature) and 1991 c
235 s 4 & 1986 c 151 s 1, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective September 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.180.010 (Transitional bilingual
instruction program--Short title--Purpose) and 1990 c 33 s 163, 1984 c 124 s 1,
& 1979 c 95 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.180.020 (Transitional bilingual
instruction program--Annual report by superintendent of public instruction) and
1984 c 124 s 8;

(3) RCW 28A.180.030 (Transitional bilingual
instruction program--Definitions) and 1990 c 33 s 164, 1984 c 124 s 2, &
1979 c 95 s 2;

(4) RCW 28A.180.040 (Transitional bilingual
instruction program--School board duties) and 1984 c 124 s 3 & 1979 c 95 s
3;

(5) RCW 28A.180.060 (Transitional bilingual
instruction program--Guidelines and rules) and 1990 c 33 s 165, 1984 c 124 s 5,
& 1979 c 95 s 5; and

(6) RCW 28A.180.080 (Transitional bilingual
instruction program--Budget request for--Allocation of moneys,
priorities--English language skills test) and 1995 c 335 s 601, 1990 c 33 s
167, & 1979 c 95 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.185.010 (Program--Duties of
superintendent of public instruction) and 1984 c 278 s 12;

(2) RCW 28A.185.020 (Funding) and 1990 c 33 s
168 & 1984 c 278 s 14;

(3) RCW 28A.185.030 (Programs--Authority of
local school districts‑‑Selection of students) and 1984 c 278 s 13;
and

(4) RCW 28A.185.040 (Contracts with University
of Washington for education of highly capable students at early entrance
program or transition school--Allocation of funds--Rules) and 1990 c 33 s 169,
1989 c 233 s 9, & 1987 c 518 s 222.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.190.010 (Educational program for
juveniles in detention facilities) and 1996 c 84 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 170, &
1983 c 98 s 3;

(2) RCW 28A.190.020 (Educational programs for
residential school residents--"Residential school" defined) and 1990
c 33 s 171 & 1979 ex.s. c 217 s 1;

(3) RCW 28A.190.030 (Educational programs for
residential school residents--School district to conduct--Scope of duties and
authority) and 1995 c 77 s 19, 1990 c 33 s 172, 1985 c 341 s 13, 1984 c 160 s 3,
& 1979 ex.s. c 217 s 2;

(4) RCW 28A.190.040 (Educational programs for
residential school residents--Duties and authority of DSHS and residential
school superintendent) and 1990 c 33 s 173 & 1979 ex.s. c 217 s 3;

(5) RCW 28A.190.050 (Educational programs for
residential school residents--Contracts between school district and
DSHS--Scope) and 1990 c 33 s 174 & 1979 ex.s. c 217 s 4; and

(6) RCW 28A.190.060 (Educational programs for
residential school residents--DSHS to give notice when need for reduction of
staff--Liability upon failure) and 1990 c 33 s 175 & 1979 ex.s. c 217 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.193.005 (Intent--Findings) and
1998 c 244 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.193.010 (Operation of program by
school district or educational service district) and 1998 c 244 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.193.020 (Solicitation for
education provider--Selection of provider--Operation of program by educational
service district) and 1998 c 244 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.193.030 (Duties and authority of
education provider--Continuation in program by students age eighteen) and 1998
c 244 s 4;

(5) RCW 28A.193.040 (Education
providers--Additional authority and limitations) and 1998 c 244 s 5;

(6) RCW 28A.193.050 (Required support of
education programs) and 1998 c 244 s 6;

(7) RCW 28A.193.060 (Contract between
education providers and department of corrections) and 1998 c 244 s 7;

(8) RCW 28A.193.070 (Education site closures
or reduction in services--Notice to the superintendent of public instruction
and education providers--Liability for failure to provide notice--Alternative
dispute resolution) and 1998 c 244 s 8;

(9) RCW 28A.193.080 (Allocation of
money--Accountability requirements--Rules) and 1998 c 244 s 9;

(10) RCW 28A.193.900 (Effective date--1998 c
244 ss 1-9 and 11-15) and 1998 c 244 s 17; and

(11) RCW 28A.193.901 (Severability--1998 c 244)
and 1998 c 244 s 19.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.195.010 (Private
schools--Extension programs for parents to teach children in their
custody--Scope of state control) and 1993 c 336 s 1101 & 1990 c 33 s 176;

(2) RCW 28A.195.020 (Private schools--Rights
recognized) and 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 3 & 1971 ex.s. c 215 s 5;

(3) RCW 28A.195.030 (Private schools--Actions
appealable under Administrative Procedure Act) and 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 4 &
1971 ex.s. c 215 s 6;

(4) RCW 28A.195.040 (Private schools--Board
rules for enforcement--Racial segregation or discrimination prohibited) and
1990 c 33 s 177, 1983 c 3 s 29, 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c 215 s
7;

(5) RCW 28A.195.050 (Private school advisory
committee) and 1984 c 40 s 1 & 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 6;

(6) RCW 28A.195.060 (Private schools must
report attendance) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 70, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 111, &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.48.055;

(7) RCW 28A.195.070 (Official transcript
withholding--Transmittal of information) and 1997 c 266 s 5; and

(8) RCW 28A.195.080 (Record
checks--Findings--Authority to require) and 1999 c 187 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.200.010 (Home-based
instruction--Duties of parents) and 1995 c 52 s 1, 1993 c 336 s 1103, 1990 c 33
s 178, & 1985 c 441 s 2; and

(2) RCW 28A.200.020 (Home-based
instruction--Certain decisions responsibility of parent unless otherwise
specified) and 1990 c 33 s 179 & 1985 c 441 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.205.010 ("Education
center," "basic academic skills," defined--Certification as
education center and withdrawal thereof) and 1999 c 348 s 2, 1993 c 211 s 1,
1990 c 33 s 180, 1983 c 3 s 38, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.205.020 (Common school
dropouts--Reimbursement) and 1999 c 348 s 3, 1997 c 265 s 7, 1993 c 211 s 2,
1990 c 33 s 181, 1979 ex.s. c 174 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.205.030 (Reentry of prior dropouts
into common schools, rules--Eligibility for GED test) and 1993 c 218 s 2, 1993
c 211 s 3, 1990 c 33 s 182, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.205.040 (Fees--Rules--Priority for
payment--Review of records) and 1999 c 348 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 183, 1979 ex.s. c
174 s 2, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 4;

(5) RCW 28A.205.050 (Rules) and 1995 c 335 s
201, 1993 c 211 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 184, & 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 5;

(6) RCW 28A.205.070 (Allocation of
funds--Criteria--Duties of superintendent) and 1993 c 211 s 6, 1990 c 33 s 185,
& 1985 c 434 s 3;

(7) RCW 28A.205.080 (Legislative
findings--Distribution of funds--Cooperation with school districts) and 1997 c
265 s 8, 1993 c 211 s 7, 1990 c 33 s 186, & 1987 c 518 s 220; and

(8) RCW 28A.205.090 (Inclusion of education
centers program in biennial budget request--Quarterly plans--Funds--Payment)
and 1993 c 211 s 8, 1990 c 33 s 187, & 1985 c 434 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.210.010 (Contagious diseases,
limiting contact--Rules and regulations) and 1971 c 32 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.31.010;

(2) RCW 28A.210.020 (Visual and auditory
screening of pupils--Rules and regulations) and 1971 c 32 s 2 & 1969 ex.s.
c 223 s 28A.31.030;

(3) RCW 28A.210.030 (Visual and auditory
screening of pupils--Record of screening--Forwarding of records,
recommendations and data) and 1991 c 3 s 289, 1990 c 33 s 188, 1971 c 32 s 3,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.31.040;

(4) RCW 28A.210.040 (Visual and auditory screening
of pupils--Rules and regulations, forms used in screenings, distribution) and
1990 c 33 s 189 & 1973 c 46 s 1;

(5) RCW 28A.210.060 (Immunization
program--Purpose) and 1990 c 33 s 190, 1984 c 40 s 3, & 1979 ex.s. c 118 s
1;

(6) RCW 28A.210.070 (Immunization
program--Definitions) and 1990 c 33 s 191, 1985 c 49 s 2, 1984 c 40 s 4, &
1979 ex.s. c 118 s 2;

(7) RCW 28A.210.080 (Immunization
program--Attendance of child conditioned upon presentation of alternative
proofs) and 1990 c 33 s 192, 1985 c 49 s 1, & 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 3;

(8) RCW 28A.210.090 (Immunization
program--Exemptions from on presentation of alternative certifications) and
1991 c 3 s 290, 1990 c 33 s 193, 1984 c 40 s 5, & 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 4;

(9) RCW 28A.210.100 (Immunization
program--Source of immunizations‑-Written records) and 1990 c 33 s 194,
1984 c 40 s 7, & 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 6;

(10) RCW 28A.210.110 (Immunization
program--Administrator's duties upon receipt of proof of immunization or
certification of exemption) and 1991 c 3 s 291, 1990 c 33 s 195, & 1979
ex.s. c 118 s 7;

(11) RCW 28A.210.120 (Immunization
program--Prohibiting child's presence, when--Notice to parent, guardian or
adult in loco parentis, contents) and 1990 c 33 s 196, 1985 c 49 s 3, 1984 c 40
s 8, & 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 8;

(12) RCW 28A.210.130 (Immunization
program--Superintendent of public instruction to provide information) and 1990
c 33 s 197 & 1985 c 49 s 4;

(13) RCW 28A.210.140 (Immunization
program--State board of health rules, contents) and 1990 c 33 s 198, 1984 c 40
s 9, & 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 9;

(14) RCW 28A.210.150 (Immunization
program--Superintendent of public instruction by rule to adopt procedures for
verifying records) and 1985 c 49 s 5;

(15) RCW 28A.210.160 (Immunization
program--State board of education rules, contents) and 1990 c 33 s 199 &
1979 ex.s. c 118 s 10;

(16) RCW 28A.210.170 (Immunization
program--Department of social and health services' rules, contents) and 1990 c
33 s 200 & 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 11;

(17) RCW 28A.210.180 (Screening program for
scoliosis--Purpose) and 1991 c 86 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 201, 1985 c 216 s 1, &
1979 c 47 s 1;

(18) RCW 28A.210.190 (Screening program for
scoliosis--Definitions) and 1991 c 86 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 202, 1985 c 216 s 2,
& 1979 c 47 s 2;

(19) RCW 28A.210.200 (Screening program for
scoliosis--Examination of children--Personnel making examinations, training
for) and 1991 c 86 s 3, 1990 c 33 s 203, 1985 c 216 s 3, & 1979 c 47 s 3;

(20) RCW 28A.210.210 (Screening program for
scoliosis--Records--Parents or guardians notification, contents) and 1990 c 33
s 204, 1985 c 216 s 4, & 1979 c 47 s 4;

(21) RCW 28A.210.220 (Screening program for
scoliosis--Distribution of rules, records and forms) and 1990 c 33 s 205 &
1979 c 47 s 5;

(22) RCW 28A.210.240 (Screening program for
scoliosis--Pupils exempt, when) and 1985 c 216 s 5 & 1979 c 47 s 6;

(23) RCW 28A.210.250 (Screening program for
scoliosis--Sanctions against school officials failing to comply) and 1990 c 33
s 207 & 1979 c 47 s 7;

(24) RCW 28A.210.260 (Public and private
schools--Administration of oral medication by--Conditions) and 2000 c 63 s 1,
1994 sp.s. c 9 s 720, & 1982 c 195 s 1;

(25) RCW 28A.210.270 (Public and private
schools--Administration of oral medication by--Immunity from
liability--Discontinuance, procedure) and 2000 c 63 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 208, &
1982 c 195 s 2;

(26) RCW 28A.210.280 (Catheterization of public
and private school students) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 721 & 1988 c 48 s 2;

(27) RCW 28A.210.290 (Catheterization of public
and private school students--Immunity from liability) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 722,
1990 c 33 s 209, & 1988 c 48 s 3;

(28) RCW 28A.210.300 (School physician or
school nurse may be employed) and 1975 c 43 s 20 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.60.320; and

(29) RCW 28A.210.310 (Prohibition on use of
tobacco products on school property) and 1997 c 9 s 1 & 1989 c 233 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.215.010 (Authority of school
boards) and 1995 c 335 s 104 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.34.010;

(2) RCW 28A.215.020 (Allocations of state or
federal funds--Regulations by state board) and 1995 c 335 s 308, 1990 c 33 s
210, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.34.020;

(3) RCW 28A.215.030 (Allocations pending receipt
of federal funds) and 1995 c 335 s 309, 1990 c 33 s 211, & 1969 ex.s. c 223
s 28A.34.040;

(4) RCW 28A.215.040 (Establishment and
maintenance discretionary) and 1995 c 335 s 105, 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 45,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.34.050;

(5) RCW 28A.215.050 (Additional
authority--Contracts with private and public entities--Charges--Transportation
services) and 1995 c 335 s 310, 1990 c 33 s 212, & 1987 c 487 s 1;

(6) RCW 28A.215.100 (Intent) and 1994 c 166 s
1 & 1985 c 418 s 1;

(7) RCW 28A.215.110 (Definitions) and 1999 c
350 s 1, 1994 c 166 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 213, 1988 c 174 s 2, & 1985 c 418 s 2;

(8) RCW 28A.215.120 (Department of community,
trade, and economic development to administer program--Admission and funding)
and 1994 c 166 s 4, 1988 c 174 s 3, & 1985 c 418 s 3;

(9) RCW 28A.215.130 (Approved early childhood
programs--Entities eligible to conduct--Use of funds--Requirements for
applicants) and 1994 c 166 s 5, 1988 c 174 s 4, & 1985 c 418 s 4;

(10) RCW 28A.215.140 (Advisory
committee--Composition) and 1988 c 174 s 5 & 1985 c 418 s 5;

(11) RCW 28A.215.150 (Rules) and 1994 c 166 s
6, 1988 c 174 s 6, 1987 c 518 s 101, & 1985 c 418 s 6;

(12) RCW 28A.215.160 (Review of
applications--Award of funds) and 1994 c 166 s 8, 1988 c 174 s 7, & 1985 c
418 s 7;

(13) RCW 28A.215.170 (Early childhood
educational and assistance services--Report to governor) and 1995 c 335 s 501,
1994 c 166 s 9, 1988 c 174 s 8, & 1985 c 418 s 8;

(14) RCW 28A.215.180 (State
support--Priorities--Program funding levels) and 1994 c 166 s 10, 1990 c 33 s
214, 1987 c 518 s 102, & 1985 c 418 s 9;

(15) RCW 28A.215.190 (Expenses of advisory
committee--Reimbursement) and 1985 c 418 s 10;

(16) RCW 28A.215.200 (Authority to solicit
gifts, grants, and support) and 1994 c 166 s 11, 1990 c 33 s 215, 1988 c 174 s
9, & 1985 c 418 s 11;

(17) RCW 28A.215.900 (Short title--1985 c 418)
and 1985 c 418 s 13;

(18) RCW 28A.215.904 (Contingency--Effective
date--1985 c 418) and 1985 c 418 s 12;

(19) RCW 28A.215.906 (Severability--1985 c 418)
and 1985 c 418 s 14; and

(20) RCW 28A.215.908 (Severability--1988 c 174)
and 1988 c 174 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.220.010 (Legislative declaration)
and 1977 c 76 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.220.020 (Definitions) and 1990 c
33 s 218, 1979 c 158 s 195, 1977 c 76 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 1, & 1963 c
39 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.220.030 (Administration of
program--Powers and duties of school officials) and 2000 c 115 s 9, 1979 c 158
s 196, 1977 c 76 s 3, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 2, & 1963 c 39 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.220.040 (Fiscal
support--Reimbursement to school districts--Enrollment fees--Deposit) and 2000
c 115 s 10, 1984 c 258 s 331, 1977 c 76 s 4, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 6, 1967 ex.s. c
147 s 5, & 1963 c 39 s 8;

(5) RCW 28A.220.050 (Information on proper use
of left-hand lane) and 1986 c 93 s 4;

(6) RCW 28A.220.060 (Information on effects of
alcohol and drug use) and 1991 c 217 s 2;

(7) RCW 28A.220.070 (Rules) and 2000 c 115 s
11; and

(8) RCW 28A.220.900 (Purpose) and 1991 c 217 s
1, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 7, & 1963 c 39 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.225.005 (Compulsory education,
requirements--Informing students and parents annually) and 1992 c 205 s 201;

(2) RCW 28A.225.010 (Attendance
mandatory--Age--Exceptions) and 1998 c 244 s 14, 1996 c 134 s 1, 1990 c 33 s
219, 1986 c 132 s 1, 1985 c 441 s 1, 1980 c 59 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 201 s 4, 1973
c 51 s 1, & 1972 ex.s. c 10 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.225.015 (Attendance mandatory--Six
or seven year olds--Unexcused absences--Petition) and 1999 c 319 s 6;

(4) RCW 28A.225.020 (School's duties upon
child's failure to attend school) and 1999 c 319 s 1, 1996 c 134 s 2, 1995 c
312 s 67, 1992 c 205 s 202, 1986 c 132 s 2, & 1979 ex.s. c 201 s 1;

(5) RCW 28A.225.025 (Community truancy boards)
and 1999 c 319 s 5, 1996 c 134 s 9, & 1995 c 312 s 66;

(6) RCW 28A.225.030 (Petition to juvenile
court for violations by a parent or child--School district responsibilities)
and 1999 c 319 s 2, 1996 c 134 s 3, 1995 c 312 s 68, 1992 c 205 s 203, 1990 c
33 s 220, 1986 c 132 s 3, & 1979 ex.s. c 201 s 2;

(7) RCW 28A.225.031 (Alcohol or controlled
substances testing--Authority to order) and 1997 c 68 s 3;

(8) RCW 28A.225.035 (Petition to juvenile
court--Contents--Court action--Referral to community truancy board--Transfer of
jurisdiction upon relocation) and 1999 c 319 s 3 & 1997 c 68 s 1;

(9) RCW 28A.225.060 (Custody and disposition
of child absent from school without excuse) and 1995 c 312 s 73, 1990 c 33 s
223, 1979 ex.s. c 201 s 5, 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 52, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.27.070;

(10) RCW 28A.225.080 (Employment permits) and
1990 c 33 s 225 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.27.090;

(11) RCW 28A.225.090 (Court
orders--Penalties--Parents' defense) and 2000 c 162 s 15, 2000 c 162 s 6, 2000
c 61 s 1, 1999 c 319 s 4, 1998 c 296 s 39, & 1997 c 68 s 2;

(12) RCW 28A.225.095 (Authority of court
commissioners and family law commissioners to hear cases under this chapter)
and 1995 c 312 s 71;

(13) RCW 28A.225.110 (Fines applied to support
of schools) and 1995 c 312 s 75, 1990 c 33 s 228, 1987 c 202 s 191, 1969 ex.s.
c 199 s 54, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.27.104;

(14) RCW 28A.225.115 (Educational
services--Funding for children referred to community truancy board) and 1996 c
134 s 11;

(15) RCW 28A.225.140 (Enforcing officers not
personally liable for costs) and 1990 c 33 s 231 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.27.130;

(16) RCW 28A.225.151 (Reports) and 1996 c 134 s
5 & 1995 c 312 s 72;

(17) RCW 28A.225.160 (Qualification for
admission to district's schools--Fees for preadmission screening) and 1999 c
348 s 5, 1986 c 166 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 4, 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 14, &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.190;

(18) RCW 28A.225.170 (Children on United States
reservations, admission to schools--United States authorities to cooperate) and
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.210;

(19) RCW 28A.225.200 (Education of pupils in
another district--Limitation as to state apportionment--Exemption) and 1990 c
33 s 234, 1988 c 268 s 6, 1979 ex.s. c 140 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 111,
1969 ex.s. c 176 s 141, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.225;

(20) RCW 28A.225.210 (Admission of district
pupils tuition free) and 1990 c 33 s 235, 1983 c 3 s 37, 1969 c 130 s 9, &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.230;

(21) RCW 28A.225.215 (Enrollment of children
without legal residences) and 1989 c 118 s 1;

(22) RCW 28A.225.220 (Adults, children from
other districts, agreements for attending school--Tuition) and 1995 c 335 s
602, 1995 c 52 s 2, 1993 c 336 s 1008, 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 201, 1969 c 130 s
10, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.240;

(23) RCW 28A.225.225 (Applications from
nonresident students or students receiving home-based instruction to attend
district school--Acceptance and rejection standards--Notification) and 1999 c
198 s 2, 1997 c 265 s 3, 1995 c 52 s 3, 1994 c 293 s 1, & 1990 1st ex.s. c
9 s 203;

(24) RCW 28A.225.230 (Appeal from certain
decisions to deny student's request to attend nonresident district--Procedure)
and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 204, 1990 c 33 s 236, 1977 c 50 s 1, & 1975 1st
ex.s. c 66 s 1;

(25) RCW 28A.225.240 (Apportionment credit) and
1975 1st ex.s. c 66 s 2;

(26) RCW 28A.225.250 (Cooperative programs
among school districts--Rules) and 1995 c 335 s 603 & 1969 c 130 s 11;

(27) RCW 28A.225.260 (Reciprocity exchanges
with other states) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.250;

(28) RCW 28A.225.270 (Intradistrict enrollment
options policies) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 205;

(29) RCW 28A.225.280 (Transfer students'
eligibility for extracurricular activities) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 206;

(30) RCW 28A.225.290 (Enrollment options
information booklet) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207;

(31) RCW 28A.225.300 (Enrollment options
information to parents) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 208;

(32) RCW 28A.225.310 (Attendance in school
district of choice--Impact on existing cooperative arrangements) and 1990 1st
ex.s. c 9 s 209; and

(33) RCW 28A.225.330 (Enrolling students from
other districts--Requests for information and permanent records--Withheld
transcripts, effect--Immunity from liability--Notification to teachers and
security personnel--Rules) and 1999 c 198 s 3 & 1997 c 266 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
29. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.230.010 (Course content
requirements--Duties of school district boards of directors) and 1990 c 33 s
237 & 1984 c 278 s 2;

(2) RCW 28A.230.020 (Common school
curriculum--Fundamentals in conduct) and 1991 c 116 s 6, 1988 c 206 s 403, 1987
c 232 s 1, 1986 c 149 s 4, 1969 c 71 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.05.010;

(3) RCW 28A.230.030 (Students taught in
English language--Exception) and 1969 c 71 s 4;

(4) RCW 28A.230.040 (Physical education in
grades one through eight) and 1984 c 52 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.05.030;

(5) RCW 28A.230.050 (Physical education in
high schools) and 1985 c 384 s 3, 1984 c 52 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.05.040;

(6) RCW 28A.230.060 (Waiver of course of study
in Washington's history and government) and 1991 c 116 s 7, 1969 ex.s. c 57 s
2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.05.050;

(7) RCW 28A.230.070 (AIDS education in public
schools--Limitations‑-Program adoption--Model curricula--Student's
exclusion from participation) and 1994 c 245 s 7 & 1988 c 206 s 402;

(8) RCW 28A.230.080 (Prevention of child abuse
and neglect--Written policy--Participation in and establishment of programs)
and 1990 c 33 s 238 & 1987 c 489 s 6;

(9) RCW 28A.230.090 (High school graduation
requirements or equivalencies--Reevaluation and report by state board of
education--Credit for courses taken before attending high school--Postsecondary
credit equivalencies) and 1997 c 222 s 2 & 1993 c 371 s 3;

(10) RCW 28A.230.100 (Rules implementing RCW
28A.230.090 to be adopted--Temporary exemptions--Special
alterations--Competency testing) and 1991 c 116 s 8, 1990 c 33 s 239, &
1985 c 384 s 1;

(11) RCW 28A.230.120 (High school
diplomas--Issuance--Option to receive final transcripts--Notice) and 1984 c 178
s 2;

(12) RCW 28A.230.130 (Program to help students
meet minimum entrance requirements at baccalaureate-granting institutions--Exceptions)
and 1991 c 116 s 9, 1988 c 172 s 2, & 1984 c 278 s 16;

(13) RCW 28A.230.140 (United States
flag--Procurement, display, exercises--National anthem) and 1981 c 130 s 1
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.030;

(14) RCW 28A.230.150 (Temperance and Good
Citizenship Day--Aids in programming) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.090;

(15) RCW 28A.230.160 (Educational activities in
observance of Veterans' Day) and 1990 c 33 s 241, 1985 c 60 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c
120 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 45, & 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 12;

(16) RCW 28A.230.170 (Study of constitutions
compulsory--Rules to implement) and 1985 c 341 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.02.080;

(17) RCW 28A.230.180 (Educational and career
opportunities in the military, student access to information on, when) and 1980
c 96 s 1;

(18) RCW 28A.230.190 (Third grade achievement
test) and 1999 c 373 s 201, 1998 c 319 s 202, 1997 c 262 s 5, 1990 c 101 s 6,
1985 c 403 s 1, 1984 c 278 s 8, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 98 s 1;

(19) RCW 28A.230.193 (Sixth grade achievement
test) and 1999 c 373 s 301;

(20) RCW 28A.230.195 (Test or assessment
scores--Adjustments to instructional practices--Notification to parents) and
1999 c 373 s 603 & 1992 c 141 s 401;

(21) RCW 28A.230.230 (Annual assessment of
ninth grade students--Inventory for high school and beyond for use by eighth
grade students) and 1999 c 373 s 401 & 1990 c 101 s 2;

(22) RCW 28A.230.250 (Coordination of
procedures and content of assessments) and 1999 c 373 s 602 & 1990 c 101 s
4; and

(23) RCW 28A.230.260 (Annual report to the
legislature) and 1990 c 101 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
30. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.235.010 (Superintendent of public
instruction authorized to receive and disburse federal funds) and 1987 c 193 s
1;

(2) RCW 28A.235.020 (Payment of costs--Federal
food services revolving fund--Disbursements) and 1990 c 33 s 242 & 1987 c
193 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.235.030 (Rules) and 1987 c 193 s
3;

(4) RCW 28A.235.040 (Acquisition authorized)
and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.010;

(5) RCW 28A.235.050 (Contracts for--Other law
applicable to) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.020;

(6) RCW 28A.235.060 (Advancement of costs from
revolving fund moneys--Reimbursement by school district to include transaction
expense) and 1990 c 33 s 243 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.030;

(7) RCW 28A.235.070 (Revolving fund created)
and 1985 c 341 s 10, 1979 ex.s. c 20 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.040;

(8) RCW 28A.235.080 (Revolving
fund--Administration of fund--Use--School district requisition as prerequisite)
and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.050;

(9) RCW 28A.235.090 (Revolving
fund--Depositories for fund, bond or security for--Manner of payments from
fund) and 1990 c 33 s 244 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.060;

(10) RCW 28A.235.100 (Rules) and 1993 c 333 s
5, 1990 c 33 s 245, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.070;

(11) RCW 28A.235.110 (Suspension of laws,
rules, inconsistent herewith) and 1990 c 33 s 246 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.30.080;

(12) RCW 28A.235.120 (Lunchrooms--Establishment
and operation--Personnel--Agreements) and 1997 c 13 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 247, 1979
ex.s. c 140 s 3, 1979 c 58 s 1, 1973 c 107 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.58.136;

(13) RCW 28A.235.130 (Milk for children at
school expense) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.31.020;

(14) RCW 28A.235.140 (School breakfast
programs) and 1993 c 333 s 1 & 1989 c 239 s 2;

(15) RCW 28A.235.145 (School breakfast and
lunch programs--Use of state funds) and 1993 c 333 s 2;

(16) RCW 28A.235.150 (School breakfast and
lunch programs--Grants to increase participation--Increased state support) and
1993 c 333 s 3; and

(17) RCW 28A.235.155 (Federal summer food
service program--Administration of funds--Grants) and 1993 c 333 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
31. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.300.010 (Election--Term of office)
and 1990 c 33 s 250 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.03.010;

(2) RCW 28A.300.020 (Assistant
superintendents, deputy superintendent, assistants--Terms for exempt personnel)
and 1996 c 25 s 2 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.03.020;

(3) RCW 28A.300.030 (Assistance of educational
service district boards and superintendents--Scope) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
46 & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 29;

(4) RCW 28A.300.035 (Assistance of
certificated or classified employee--Reimbursement for substitute) and 1994 c
113 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 147, & 1973 1st ex.s. c 3 s 1;

(5) RCW 28A.300.040 (Powers and duties) and
1999 c 348 s 6, 1992 c 198 s 6, 1991 c 116 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 251, 1982 c 160 s
2, 1981 c 249 s 1, 1977 c 75 s 17, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 47, 1971 ex.s. c 100
s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 102, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.03.030;

(6) RCW 28A.300.050 (Assistance to state board
for activities involving professional educator excellence) and 1990 c 33 s 252
& 1987 c 525 s 227;

(7) RCW 28A.300.060 (Studies and adoption of
classifications for school district budgets--Publication) and 1991 c 116 s 3,
1990 c 33 s 253, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 23, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1;

(8) RCW 28A.300.065 (Classification and
numbering system of school districts) and 1999 c 315 s 202;

(9) RCW 28A.300.070 (Receipt of federal funds
for school purposes--Superintendent of public instruction to administer) and
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.100;

(10) RCW 28A.300.080 (Vocational agriculture
education--Intent) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 34 s 1;

(11) RCW 28A.300.090 (Vocational agriculture
education--Service area established--Duties) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 34 s 2;

(12) RCW 28A.300.100 (Vocational agriculture
education--Superintendent to adopt rules) and 1990 c 33 s 254 & 1983 1st
ex.s. c 34 s 3;

(13) RCW 28A.300.115 (Holocaust
instruction--Preparation and availability of instructional materials) and 1992
c 24 s 1;

(14) RCW 28A.300.118 (College credit program
information--Notification to schools and parents) and 2000 c 126 s 1;

(15) RCW 28A.300.120 (Administrative
hearing--Contract to conduct authorized--Final decision) and 1985 c 225 s 1;

(16) RCW 28A.300.130 (Center for the improvement
of student learning--Educational improvement and research--Clearinghouse for
academic achievement and accountability commission and for information
regarding educational improvement and parental involvement programs) and 1999 c
388 s 401, 1996 c 273 s 5, 1993 c 336 s 501, & 1986 c 180 s 1;

(17) RCW 28A.300.135 (Center for the
improvement of student learning account) and 1993 c 336 s 502;

(18) RCW 28A.300.150 (Information on child
abuse and neglect prevention curriculum--Superintendent's duties) and 1994 c
245 s 8 & 1987 c 489 s 2;

(19) RCW 28A.300.160 (Development of
coordinated primary prevention program for child abuse and neglect--Office as
lead agency) and 1995 c 399 s 21 & 1987 c 489 s 3;

(20) RCW 28A.300.164 (Energy information
program) and 1990 c 301 s 2;

(21) RCW 28A.300.170 (State general
fund--Estimates for state support to public schools, from) and 1980 c 6 s 2
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.040;

(22) RCW 28A.300.175 (Recovery of payments to
recipients of state money--Basis--Resolution of audit findings--Rules) and 1997
c 167 s 1;

(23) RCW 28A.300.190 (Coordination of video
telecommunications programming in schools) and 1990 c 208 s 8;

(24) RCW 28A.300.220 (Cooperation with work
force training and education coordinating board) and 1991 c 238 s 78;

(25) RCW 28A.300.230 (Findings--Integration of
vocational and academic education) and 1991 c 238 s 140;

(26) RCW 28A.300.235 (Development of model
curriculum integrating vocational and academic education) and 1991 c 238 s 141;

(27) RCW 28A.300.240 (International student
exchange) and 1991 c 128 s 11;

(28) RCW 28A.300.250 (Participation in federal
nutrition programs--Superintendent's duties) and 1991 c 366 s 402;

(29) RCW 28A.300.270 (Violence prevention
training) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 602;

(30) RCW 28A.300.275 (Alternative school
start-up grants--School safety grants--Report to legislative committees) and
1999 sp.s. c 12 s 1;

(31) RCW 28A.300.280 (Conflict resolution
program) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 611;

(32) RCW 28A.300.290 (Effective reading
programs--Identification) and 1996 c 273 s 1;

(33) RCW 28A.300.295 (Identified
programs--Grants for in-service training and instructional materials) and 1999
c 78 s 2 & 1996 c 273 s 2;

(34) RCW 28A.300.300 (Effective reading
programs--Information--Development and implementation of strategies) and 1998 c
245 s 11 & 1996 c 273 s 4;

(35) RCW 28A.300.310 (Second grade reading
assessment--Selection of reading passages--Costs) and 1999 c 373 s 101 &
1997 c 262 s 2;

(36) RCW 28A.300.320 (Second grade reading
assessment--Pilot projects--Assessment selection--Assessment results) and 1999
c 373 s 102, 1998 c 319 s 201, & 1997 c 262 s 3;

(37) RCW 28A.300.330 (Primary grade reading
grant program) and 1997 c 262 s 4;

(38) RCW 28A.300.340 (Primary grade reading
grant program--Timelines--Rules) and 1997 c 262 s 7;

(39) RCW 28A.300.350 (Excellence in mathematics
training program) and 1999 c 347 s 2;

(40) RCW 28A.300.360 (Grants for programs and
services--Truant, at-risk, and expelled students) and 1999 c 319 s 7;

(41) RCW 28A.300.370 (World War II oral history
project) and 2000 c 112 s 2;

(42) RCW 28A.300.380 (Career and technical
student organizations--Support services) and 2000 c 84 s 2;

(43) RCW 28A.300.390 (Washington civil
liberties public education program--Findings) and 2000 c 210 s 1;

(44) RCW 28A.300.395 (Washington civil
liberties public education program--Intent) and 2000 c 210 s 2;

(45) RCW 28A.300.400 (Washington civil
liberties public education program--Definition) and 2000 c 210 s 3;

(46) RCW 28A.300.405 (Washington civil
liberties public education program--Created--Purpose) and 2000 c 210 s 4;

(47) RCW 28A.300.410 (Washington civil
liberties public education program--Grants--Acceptance of gifts, grants, or
endowments) and 2000 c 210 s 5;

(48) RCW 28A.300.412 (Washington civil
liberties public education program--Report) and 2000 c 210 s 6; and

(49) RCW 28A.300.415 (Washington civil
liberties public education program--Short title) and 2000 c 210 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
32. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.305.010 (Composition of board) and
1992 c 56 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 257, 1988 c 255 s 1, 1980 c 179 s 1, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.010;

(2) RCW 28A.305.020 (Call and notice of
elections) and 1990 c 33 s 258, 1988 c 255 s 2, 1981 c 38 s 1, & 1969 ex.s.
c 223 s 28A.04.020;

(3) RCW 28A.305.030 (Elections in new
congressional districts--Call and conduct of--Member terms--Transitional
measures to reduce number of members from each district) and 1992 c 56 s 3,
1990 c 33 s 259, 1982 1st ex.s. c 7 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.030;

(4) RCW 28A.305.040 (Declarations of
candidacy--Qualifications of candidates--Members restricted from service on
local boards--Forfeiture of office) and 1990 c 33 s 260, 1982 1st ex.s. c 7 s
2, 1980 c 179 s 4, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 49, 1971 c 48 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.04.040;

(5) RCW 28A.305.050 (Qualifications of
voters--Ballots--Voting instructions--Candidates' biographical data) and 1990 c
33 s 261, 1988 c 255 s 3, 1981 c 38 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.050;

(6) RCW 28A.305.060 (Election
procedure--Certificate) and 1990 c 33 s 262, 1981 c 38 s 3, 1980 c 179 s 5,
1975 c 19 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 25, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.060;

(7) RCW 28A.305.070 (Action to contest
election--Grounds--Procedure) and 1980 c 179 s 6 & 1975 c 19 s 1;

(8) RCW 28A.305.080 (Terms of office) and 1992
c 56 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 263, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.070;

(9) RCW 28A.305.090 (Vacancies, filling) and
1990 c 33 s 264 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.080;

(10) RCW 28A.305.100 (Superintendent as ex
officio member and chief executive officer of board) and 1982 c 160 s 1 &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.090;

(11) RCW 28A.305.110 (Executive
director--Secretary of board) and 1996 c 25 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 265, 1982 c 160 s
3, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.100;

(12) RCW 28A.305.120 (Meetings--Compensation
and travel expenses of members) and 1984 c 287 s 60, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s
67, 1973 c 106 s 13, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.110;

(13) RCW 28A.305.130 (Powers and duties
generally) and 1997 c 13 s 5, 1996 c 83 s 1, 1995 c 369 s 9, 1991 c 116 s 11,
& 1990 c 33 s 266;

(14) RCW 28A.305.140 (Waiver from provisions of
RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 authorized) and 1990 c 33 s 267 & 1985
c 349 s 6;

(15) RCW 28A.305.145 (Application process for
waivers under RCW 28A.305.140) and 1993 c 336 s 302;

(16) RCW 28A.305.160 (Rules incorporating due
process guarantees of pupils--Informal due process procedures when suspension
of students) and 1996 c 321 s 2, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 97 s 1, & 1971 ex.s.
c 268 s 2;

(17) RCW 28A.305.170 (Rules and regulations
accepting national guard high school career training) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 262
s 1;

(18) RCW 28A.305.190 (Eligibility to take
general educational development test) and 1993 c 218 s 1, 1991 c 116 s 5, &
1973 c 51 s 2;

(19) RCW 28A.305.200 (Seal) and 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.04.140;

(20) RCW 28A.305.210 (Assistance of educational
service district boards and superintendents--Scope) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
51 & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 30;

(21) RCW 28A.305.220 (Development of
standardized high school transcripts--School districts to inform students of
importance) and 1984 c 178 s 1;

(22) RCW 28A.305.280 (Forum for education
issues) and 1994 c 222 s 1; and

(23) RCW 28A.305.285 (Forum for education
issues--Task force) and 1997 c 222 s 3 & 1994 c 222 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
33. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.310.010 (Purpose) and 1988 c 65 s
1, 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 1, &
1969 ex.s. c 176 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.310.020 (Changes in number of,
boundaries--Initiating, hearings, considerations--Superintendent's duties) and
1994 sp.s. c 6 s 513, 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 522, 1990 c 33 s 270, 1977 ex.s. c 283
s 2, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.310.030 (ESD
board--Members--Number, from board-member districts--Board-member district
boundaries, determination of, changes in) and 1990 c 33 s 271, 1977 ex.s. c 283
s 14, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 3, 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 3,
& 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.310.040 (ESD board--Members--Terms)
and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 5 & 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 4;

(5) RCW 28A.310.050 (ESD
board--Members--Terms, when nine member board) and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 19, 1975
1st ex.s. c 275 s 6, & 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 5;

(6) RCW 28A.310.060 (ESD
board--Members--Terms, begin when--Vacancies, filling of) and 1977 ex.s. c 283
s 20, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 7, & 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 6;

(7) RCW 28A.310.070 (ESD
board--Members--Restriction on other service) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 8
& 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 7;

(8) RCW 28A.310.080 (ESD
board--Members--Elections, calling and notice of) and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 15;

(9) RCW 28A.310.090 (ESD board--Members--Elections,
filing of declarations of candidacy) and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 16;

(10) RCW 28A.310.100 (ESD
board--Members--Elections, procedure--Certification of results) and 1980 c 179
s 7 & 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 17;

(11) RCW 28A.310.110 (ESD
board--Members--Elections, contest of) and 1990 c 33 s 272 & 1977 ex.s. c
283 s 18;

(12) RCW 28A.310.120 (ESD board--Return to
seven member board) and 1990 c 33 s 273, 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 21, 1975 1st ex.s.
c 275 s 9, 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 8, & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 4;

(13) RCW 28A.310.130 (ESD board--Vacation of
board member position because of failure to attend meetings) and 1975 1st ex.s.
c 275 s 10 & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 5;

(14) RCW 28A.310.140 (School district to be
entirely within single educational service district) and 1990 c 33 s 274, 1975
1st ex.s. c 275 s 11, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 6, & 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 4;

(15) RCW 28A.310.150 (ESD board--Members,
qualification, oath, bond--Organization--Quorum) and 1990 c 33 s 275, 1977
ex.s. c 283 s 22, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 12, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 7, & 1969
ex.s. c 176 s 5;

(16) RCW 28A.310.160 (ESD board--Reimbursement
of members for expenses) and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 3, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s
68, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 13, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 8, & 1969 ex.s. c 176 s
6;

(17) RCW 28A.310.170 (ESD superintendent--Appointment,
procedure--Term, salary, discharge--ESD superintendent review committee) and
1985 c 341 s 7 & 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 4;

(18) RCW 28A.310.180 (ESD board--Compliance
with rules and regulations--Depository and distribution center--Cooperative
service programs, joint purchasing programs, and direct student service
programs including pupil transportation) and 1990 c 33 s 276, 1988 c 65 s 2,
1987 c 508 s 3, 1982 c 46 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 66 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 16, &
1971 ex.s. c 282 s 11;

(19) RCW 28A.310.190 (ESD board--Teachers'
institutes, directors' meetings--Cooperation with state
supervisor--Certification of data) and 1995 c 77 s 20, 1990 c 33 s 277, 1983 c
56 s 2, 1981 c 103 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 17, & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 12;

(20) RCW 28A.310.200 (ESD board--District
budgets--Meetings--Personnel approval--Employee bonds--School district boundary
transcripts--Acquisition and disposal of property--Cooperative and
informational services--Bylaws, rules--Contractual authority) and 1993 c 298 s
1;

(21) RCW 28A.310.210 (ESD board--Payment of
member expenses--Payment of dues into state-wide association of board members,
restrictions) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 19 & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 14;

(22) RCW 28A.310.220 (ESD board--Delegation of
powers and duties to superintendent) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 20, 1974 ex.s.
c 75 s 9, & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 15;

(23) RCW 28A.310.230 (Assistant superintendents
and other personnel--Appointment, salaries, duties) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
21, 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 10, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 16, & 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 10;

(24) RCW 28A.310.240 (Employee leave policy
required) and 1997 c 13 s 6, 1990 c 33 s 279, & 1989 c 208 s 1;

(25) RCW 28A.310.250 (Certificated employees of
district--Contracts of employment--Nonrenewal of contracts--Notice) and 1996 c
201 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 280, 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 7, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 22, 1974
ex.s. c 75 s 11, 1971 c 48 s 6, & 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 19;

(26) RCW 28A.310.260 (Certificated employees of
district--Adverse change in contract status--Notice--Probable
cause--Review--Appeal) and 1990 c 33 s 281, 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 8, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 23, 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 12, 1971 c 48 s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 34 s
20;

(27) RCW 28A.310.270 (ESD superintendent's
powers and duties--Chief executive officer) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 24, 1974
ex.s. c 75 s 13, 1972 ex.s. c 3 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 17, & 1969 ex.s. c
176 s 11;

(28) RCW 28A.310.280 (ESD superintendent's
powers and duties--Records and reports) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 25 &
1974 ex.s. c 75 s 14;

(29) RCW 28A.310.290 (ESD superintendent's
powers and duties--Oaths and affirmations) and 1990 c 33 s 282, 1975 1st ex.s.
c 275 s 26, & 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 15;

(30) RCW 28A.310.300 (ESD superintendent's
powers and duties--Generally) and 1998 c 244 s 13, 1990 c 33 s 283, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 27, & 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 16;

(31) RCW 28A.310.310 (Headquarters
office--Records transferred, state board duties) and 1990 c 33 s 284, 1985 c
341 s 8, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 28, 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 17, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 18,
& 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 12;

(32) RCW 28A.310.320 (ESD superintendents,
employees--Travel expenses and subsistence--Advance payment) and 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 34 s 69, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 29, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 19, & 1969
ex.s. c 176 s 13;

(33) RCW 28A.310.330 (Budgeting procedures for
districts) and 1990 c 33 s 285, 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 12, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
30, & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 20;

(34) RCW 28A.310.340 (Identification of core
services for budget purposes--Generally) and 1990 c 33 s 286 & 1977 ex.s. c
283 s 9;

(35) RCW 28A.310.350 (Identification of core
services for budget purposes--Specific services listed) and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s
10;

(36) RCW 28A.310.360 (Identification of core
services for budget purposes--Formula utilized for ESD's biennial budget
request) and 1990 c 33 s 287 & 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 11;

(37) RCW 28A.310.370 (District budget--State
funds, allocation of--District general expense fund--Created, deposits,
expenditures) and 1983 c 56 s 4, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 31, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s
22, & 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 14;

(38) RCW 28A.310.390 (District budget
request--Procedure for approval) and 1990 c 33 s 288, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
33, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 21, & 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 17;

(39) RCW 28A.310.400 (Legal services) and 1975
1st ex.s. c 275 s 35 & 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 23;

(40) RCW 28A.310.410 (Ex officio treasurer of
district) and 1990 c 33 s 289, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 36, & 1969 ex.s. c
176 s 21;

(41) RCW 28A.310.420 (County or intermediate
district superintendent and board employees to terminate or transfer employment‑-Benefits
retained) and 1990 c 33 s 290 & 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 22;

(42) RCW 28A.310.430 (Local school district
superintendents to advise board and superintendent) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
37, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 28, & 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 23;

(43) RCW 28A.310.440 (ESD as
self-insurer--Authority) and 1982 c 191 s 9;

(44) RCW 28A.310.460 (Contracts to lease
building space and portable buildings and lease or have maintained security
systems, computers and other equipment) and 1990 c 33 s 291, 1987 c 508 s 2,
& 1977 ex.s. c 210 s 2;

(45) RCW 28A.310.470 (Delegation to ESD of SPI
program, project or service--Contract) and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 5;

(46) RCW 28A.310.480 (Delegation to ESD of
state board of education program, project or service--Contract) and 1977 ex.s.
c 283 s 6; and

(47) RCW 28A.310.490 (ESD employee attendance
incentive program--Remuneration or benefit plan for unused sick leave) and 1997
c 13 s 7, 1991 c 92 s 1, 1989 c 69 s 1, 1985 c 341 s 9, & 1980 c 182 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.315.005 (Governance structure) and
1999 c 315 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.315.015 (Purpose--Policy) and 1999
c 315 s 101;

(3) RCW 28A.315.025 (Definitions) and 1990 c
33 s 293, 1985 c 385 s 1, 1983 c 3 s 33, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 78, 1971 c 48 s
25, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.020;

(4) RCW 28A.315.035 (Organization of school
districts) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 88, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 124, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.130;

(5) RCW 28A.315.045 (Reorganization) and 1999
c 315 s 201;

(6) RCW 28A.315.055 (Conflicting or
incorrectly described school district boundaries) and 1999 c 315 s 203;

(7) RCW 28A.315.065 (District boundary
changes--Submission to county auditor) and 1999 c 315 s 204;

(8) RCW 28A.315.075 (Effect of 1999 c
315--Existing provisions not affected) and 1999 c 315 s 205;

(9) RCW 28A.315.085 (Personnel and
supplies--Reimbursement) and 1999 c 315 s 206;

(10) RCW 28A.315.095 (Regional
committees--Powers and duties) and 1999 c 315 s 301;

(11) RCW 28A.315.105 (Regional
committees--Created) and 1985 c 385 s 2 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.030;

(12) RCW 28A.315.115 (Regional
committees--Membership limitation) and 1985 c 385 s 3, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
79, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 115, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.031;

(13) RCW 28A.315.125 (Regional
committees--Election of members--Qualifications) and 1993 c 416 s 2, 1990 c 33
s 295, 1985 c 385 s 4, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 1;

(14) RCW 28A.315.135 (Regional
committees--Vacancies) and 1985 c 385 s 5, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 81, 1969
ex.s. c 176 s 117, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.033;

(15) RCW 28A.315.145 (Regional committees--Terms
of members) and 1993 c 416 s 3, 1990 c 33 s 296, 1985 c 385 s 6, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.034;

(16) RCW 28A.315.155 (Regional
committees--Members' expenses reimbursed) and 1985 c 385 s 7, 1969 ex.s. c 176
s 118, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.035;

(17) RCW 28A.315.165 (Regional
committees--Organization, meetings, quorum) and 1990 c 33 s 297, 1985 c 385 s
8, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 82, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 119, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.57.040;

(18) RCW 28A.315.175 (State board--Powers and
duties) and 1999 c 315 s 302;

(19) RCW 28A.315.185 (Annual training) and 1999
c 315 s 303;

(20) RCW 28A.315.195 (Transfer of territory by
petition--Requirements--Rules--Costs) and 1999 c 315 s 401;

(21) RCW 28A.315.205 (Transfer of territory by
petition--Regional committee responsibilities--Rules--Appeals) and 1999 c 315 s
402;

(22) RCW 28A.315.215 (Transfer of territory by
agreement or order--Approval--Order) and 1999 c 315 s 403;

(23) RCW 28A.315.225 (Dissolution and
annexation of certain districts--Annexation of nondistrict property) and 1999 c
315 s 501;

(24) RCW 28A.315.235 (Consolidation--Petition)
and 1999 c 315 s 601;

(25) RCW 28A.315.245 (Adjustment of assets and
liabilities) and 1999 c 315 s 701;

(26) RCW 28A.315.255 (Adjustment of
indebtedness) and 1999 c 315 s 702;

(27) RCW 28A.315.265 (Adjustment of bonded
indebtedness--Order--Special elections) and 1999 c 315 s 703;

(28) RCW 28A.315.275 (Notice of elections) and
1999 c 315 s 704;

(29) RCW 28A.315.285 (Special
election--Determination--Order--Certification) and 1999 c 315 s 705;

(30) RCW 28A.315.295 (Rejection of proposal)
and 1999 c 315 s 706;

(31) RCW 28A.315.305 (School district
organizational changes--Corporate existence--Payment of bonded
indebtedness--Levy authority) and 1999 c 315 s 707;

(32) RCW 28A.315.315 (Appeal) and 1990 c 33 s
305, 1983 c 3 s 34, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.120; and

(33) RCW 28A.315.901 (Part headings and
captions not law--1999 c 315) and 1999 c 315 s 808.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.320.010 (Corporate powers) and
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.010;

(2) RCW 28A.320.015 (School boards of
directors--Powers--Notice of adoption of policy) and 1992 c 141 s 301;

(3) RCW 28A.320.020 (Liability for debts and
judgments) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.020;

(4) RCW 28A.320.025 (School district name
change) and 1999 c 101 s 1;

(5) RCW 28A.320.030 (Gifts, conveyances, etc.,
for scholarship and student aid purposes, receipt and administration) and 1974
ex.s. c 8 s 1;

(6) RCW 28A.320.035 (Contracting out--Board's
powers and duties--Goods and services) and 1997 c 267 s 1;

(7) RCW 28A.320.040 (Bylaws for board and
school government) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.110;

(8) RCW 28A.320.050 (Reimbursement of expenses
of directors, other school representatives, and superintendent
candidates--Advancing anticipated expenses) and 1977 c 73 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 26
s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.310;

(9) RCW 28A.320.060 (Officers, employees or
agents of school districts or educational service districts, insurance to
protect and hold personally harmless) and 1990 c 33 s 330, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275
s 116, & 1972 ex.s. c 142 s 2;

(10) RCW 28A.320.070 (School district as
self-insurer--Authority) and 1982 c 191 s 10;

(11) RCW 28A.320.080 (Commencement
exercises--Lip reading instruction--Joint purchasing, including issuing interest
bearing warrants and agreements with private schools--Budgets) and 1995 c 77 s
21, 1990 c 33 s 331, 1986 c 77 s 1, 1983 c 125 s 1, 1981 c 308 s 1, 1979 ex.s.
c 66 s 2, 1971 c 26 s 1, 1969 c 53 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.107;

(12) RCW 28A.320.090 (Preparing and
distributing information on district's instructional program, operation and
maintenance--Limitation) and 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 11;

(13) RCW 28A.320.100 (Actions against officers,
employees or agents of school districts and educational service
districts--Defense, costs, fees--Payment of obligation) and 1990 c 33 s 332,
1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 115, & 1972 ex.s. c 142 s 1;

(14) RCW 28A.320.110 (Information and research
services) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 112, 1971 ex.s. c 93 s 4, 1969 ex.s. c 176
s 142, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.530;

(15) RCW 28A.320.120 (Cooperation with
technical colleges--Jurisdiction over property--Administrative charges--Discrimination
against employees of technical colleges prohibited--Dispute resolution) and
1991 c 238 s 142;

(16) RCW 28A.320.130 (Weapons
incidents--Reporting) and 1993 c 347 s 2;

(17) RCW 28A.320.135 (Telecommunication
devices--Limits on possession--Policies) and 1997 c 266 s 10;

(18) RCW 28A.320.140 (Schools with special
standards--Dress codes) and 1997 c 266 s 14 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 612;

(19) RCW 28A.320.155 (Criminal history record
information--School volunteers) and 1999 c 21 s 1;

(20) RCW 28A.320.230 (Instructional
materials--Instructional materials committee) and 1989 c 371 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c
134 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 109, 1971 c 48 s 29, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.58.103;

(21) RCW 28A.320.240 (Operation and stocking of
libraries) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.104;

(22) RCW 28A.320.300 (Investment of funds,
including funds received by ESD--Authority--Procedure) and 1999 c 18 s 1, 1990
c 33 s 335, 1982 c 191 s 5, & 1975 c 47 s 1;

(23) RCW 28A.320.310 (Investment of building
funds--Restrictions) and 1999 c 18 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 336, 1985 c 7 s 95, &
1971 c 8 s 4;

(24) RCW 28A.320.320 (Investment of funds of
district--Service fee) and 1999 c 18 s 3, 1983 c 66 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223
s 28A.58.440;

(25) RCW 28A.320.330 (School funds
enumerated--Deposits--Uses) and 1990 c 33 s 337, 1983 c 59 s 13, 1982 c 191 s
6, & 1981 c 250 s 2;

(26) RCW 28A.320.400 (Elections--Qualifications
of electors--Voting place) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.520;

(27) RCW 28A.320.410 (Elections--Elections to
be conducted according to Title 29 RCW) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.521;

(28) RCW 28A.320.420 (Special meetings of
voters--Authorized--Purpose) and 1982 c 158 s 4 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.58.370;

(29) RCW 28A.320.430 (Special meetings of
voters--Place, notice, procedure, record) and 1990 c 33 s 338 & 1969 ex.s.
c 223 s 28A.58.380;

(30) RCW 28A.320.440 (Special meetings of
voters--Directors to follow electors' decision) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.58.390;

(31) RCW 28A.320.500 (Summer and/or other
student vacation period programs--Authorized--Tuition and fees) and 1990 c 33 s
339 & 1974 ex.s. c 161 s 1; and

(32) RCW 28A.320.510 (Night schools, summer
schools, meetings, use of facilities for) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.105.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.323.010 (Joint school
districts--Defined--Designation) and 1990 c 33 s 309, 1973 c 47 s 1, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.230;

(2) RCW 28A.323.020 (School districts in two
or more educational service districts--Change or adjustment of districts) and
1985 c 385 s 25, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 95, 1973 c 47 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s
131, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.240;

(3) RCW 28A.323.030 (School districts in two
or more educational service districts--Proposed change or adjustment--Procedure
when one committee does not approve or fails to act--Temporary committee) and
1990 c 33 s 310, 1985 c 385 s 26, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 96, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s
132, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.245;

(4) RCW 28A.323.040 (Joint school
districts--Administration--County to which joint school district considered as
belonging) and 1973 c 47 s 3 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.250;

(5) RCW 28A.323.050 (Joint school
districts--Elections for director) and 1990 c 33 s 311, 1983 c 56 s 6, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 97, 1973 c 47 s 4, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 133, & 1969 ex.s. c 223
s 28A.57.255;

(6) RCW 28A.323.060 (Joint school
districts--Directors--Vacancies) and 1990 c 33 s 312, 1973 c 47 s 5, 1971 c 53
s 3, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 134, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.260;

(7) RCW 28A.323.070 (Joint school
districts--Powers and duties) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.270;

(8) RCW 28A.323.080 (Joint school
districts--Assessed valuation--Certification) and 1990 c 33 s 313 & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.280;

(9) RCW 28A.323.090 (Joint school districts--Levy
of tax) and 1983 c 56 s 7, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 98, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 135,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.290; and

(10) RCW 28A.323.100 (Joint school
districts--Levy of tax--Remittance to district treasurer) and 1994 c 301 s 3,
1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 99, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 136, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.57.300.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.325.010 (Fees for optional
noncredit extracurricular events--Disposition) and 1977 ex.s. c 170 s 1 &
1975 1st ex.s. c 284 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.325.020 (Associated student
bodies--Powers and responsibilities affecting) and 1984 c 98 s 1, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 284 s 3, & 1973 c 52 s 1; and

(3) RCW 28A.325.030 (Associated student body
program fund--Fund-raising activities--Nonassociated student body program fund
moneys) and 2000 c 157 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 340, 1984 c 98 s 2, 1982 c 231 s 1,
1977 ex.s. c 160 s 1, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 284 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.330.010 (Board president, vice
president or president pro tempore--Secretary) and 1990 c 33 s 341 & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.030;

(2) RCW 28A.330.020 (Certain board elections,
manner and vote required--Selection of personnel, manner) and 1997 c 13 s 8,
1990 c 33 s 342, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.040;

(3) RCW 28A.330.030 (Duties of president) and
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.050;

(4) RCW 28A.330.040 (Duties of vice president)
and 1990 c 33 s 343 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.060;

(5) RCW 28A.330.050 (Duties of superintendent
as secretary of the board) and 1990 c 33 s 344 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.59.070;

(6) RCW 28A.330.060 (Superintendent's bond and
oath) and 1990 c 33 s 345, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 117, 1971 c 48 s 33, &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.080;

(7) RCW 28A.330.070 (Office of board--Records
available for public inspection) and 1989 c 232 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.59.100;

(8) RCW 28A.330.080 (Payment of
claims--Signing of warrants) and 1990 c 33 s 346 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.59.110;

(9) RCW 28A.330.090 (Auditing committee and
expenditures) and 1990 c 33 s 347, 1983 c 56 s 9, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 118,
1971 c 48 s 34, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.150;

(10) RCW 28A.330.100 (Additional powers of
board) and 1995 c 335 s 503, 1995 c 77 s 22, 1991 c 116 s 17, 1990 c 33 s 348,
& 1983 c 2 s 7;

(11) RCW 28A.330.110 (Insurance reserve--Funds)
and 1983 c 59 s 16, 1982 c 191 s 12, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.185;

(12) RCW 28A.330.200 (Organization of
board--Assumption of superintendent's duties by board member, when) and 1990 c
33 s 349, 1988 c 187 s 2, 1975 c 43 s 14, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.010;

(13) RCW 28A.330.210 (Notice to ESD
superintendent of change of chairman or superintendent) and 1990 c 33 s 350
& 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 11;

(14) RCW 28A.330.220 (Attorney may be employed)
and 1990 c 33 s 351, 1975 c 43 s 19, & 1971 c 8 s 5;

(15) RCW 28A.330.230 (Drawing and issuance of
warrants) and 1990 c 33 s 352, 1983 c 56 s 10, 1975 c 43 s 21, & 1973 c 111
s 1; and

(16) RCW 28A.330.240 (Employment contracts) and
1989 c 263 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.335.010 (School buildings,
maintenance, furnishing and insuring) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.102;

(2) RCW 28A.335.020 (School closures--Policy
of citizen involvement required--Summary of effects--Hearings--Notice) and 1983
c 109 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.335.030 (Emergency school closures
exempt from RCW 28A.335.020) and 1990 c 33 s 353 & 1983 c 109 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.335.040 (Surplus school property,
rental, lease, or use of--Authorized--Limitations) and 1991 c 116 s 12;

(5) RCW 28A.335.050 (Surplus school property,
rental, lease or use of--Joint use--Compensation--Conditions generally) and
1990 c 33 s 355 & 1980 c 115 s 3;

(6) RCW 28A.335.060 (Surplus school
property--Rental, lease or use of--Disposition of moneys received from) and
1989 c 86 s 2, 1983 c 59 s 15, 1982 c 191 s 4, 1981 c 250 s 4, & 1980 c 115
s 4;

(7) RCW 28A.335.070 (Surplus school property,
rental, lease or use of--Existing contracts not impaired) and 1990 c 33 s 356
& 1980 c 115 s 5;

(8) RCW 28A.335.080 (Surplus school property,
rental, lease or use of--Community use not impaired) and 1990 c 33 s 357 &
1980 c 115 s 6;

(9) RCW 28A.335.090 (Conveyance and
acquisition of property--Management--Appraisal) and 1995 c 358 s 1, 1990 c 33 s
358, 1981 c 306 s 3, 1980 c 115 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.040;

(10) RCW 28A.335.100 (School district
associations, right to mortgage or convey money security interest in
association property--Limitations) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 23 s 1;

(11) RCW 28A.335.110 (Real property--Annexation
to city or town) and 1971 c 69 s 3;

(12) RCW 28A.335.120 (Real
property--Sale--Notice of and hearing on--Appraisal required--Broker or real
estate appraiser services--Real estate sales contracts, limitation) and 1995 c
358 s 2, 1991 c 116 s 13, 1984 c 103 s 1, 1981 c 306 s 4, 1979 ex.s. c 16 s 1,
1975 1st ex.s. c 243 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.045;

(13) RCW 28A.335.130 (Real property--Sale--Use
of proceeds) and 1983 c 59 s 14, 1981 c 250 s 3, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 80 s 1,
& 1975 1st ex.s. c 243 s 2;

(14) RCW 28A.335.140 (Expenditure of funds on
county, city building authorized--Conditions) and 1971 ex.s. c 238 s 3;

(15) RCW 28A.335.150 (Permitting use and rental
of playgrounds, athletic fields or athletic facilities) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.58.048;

(16) RCW 28A.335.155 (Use of buildings for
youth programs--Limited immunity) and 1999 c 316 s 2;

(17) RCW 28A.335.160 (Joint educational
facilities, services or programs--Rules) and 1995 c 335 s 604, 1990 c 33 s 359,
& 1969 c 130 s 12;

(18) RCW 28A.335.170 (Contracts to lease
building space and portable buildings, rent or have maintained security
systems, computers, and other equipment, and provide pupil transportation
services) and 1999 c 386 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 360, 1987 c 141 s 1, 1985 c 7 s 93,
1982 c 191 s 3, & 1977 ex.s. c 210 s 1;

(19) RCW 28A.335.180 (Surplus texts and other
educational aids, notice of availability--Student priority as to texts) and
1997 c 264 s 1, 1997 c 104 s 1, 1991 c 116 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 361, 1981 c 306 s
1, & 1977 ex.s. c 303 s 1;

(20) RCW 28A.335.190 (Advertising for
bids--Competitive bid procedures--Telephone or written quotation solicitation,
limitations--Emergencies) and 2000 c 138 s 201, 1995 1st sp.s. c 10 s 3, 1994 c
212 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 362, 1985 c 324 s 1, 1980 c 61 s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c
26 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 49 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.135;

(21) RCW 28A.335.200 (Conditional sales
contracts for acquisition of property or property rights) and 1970 ex.s. c 42 s
11 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.550;

(22) RCW 28A.335.205 (Assistive
devices--Transfer for benefit of children with disabilities--Record, inventory)
and 1997 c 104 s 2;

(23) RCW 28A.335.210 (Purchase of works of
art--Procedure) and 1983 c 204 s 7, 1982 c 191 s 2, & 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 5;

(24) RCW 28A.335.220 (Eminent domain) and 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.070;

(25) RCW 28A.335.230 (Vacant school plant
facilities--Lease by contiguous district, when required--Eligibility for
matching funds) and 1987 c 112 s 1;

(26) RCW 28A.335.240 (Schoolhouses, teachers'
cottages--Purchase of realty for district purposes) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.60.181;

(27) RCW 28A.335.250 (School property used for
public purposes) and 1975 c 43 s 16 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.190;

(28) RCW 28A.335.260 (School property used for
public purposes--Community buildings) and 1990 c 33 s 363, 1975 c 43 s 17,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.200;

(29) RCW 28A.335.270 (School property used for
public purposes--Special state commission to pass on plans) and 1990 c 33 s 364
& 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 12;

(30) RCW 28A.335.280 (School property used for
public purposes--Limit on expenditures) and 1990 c 33 s 365 & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.60.220;

(31) RCW 28A.335.290 (Housing for
superintendent--Authorized--Limitation) and 1984 c 40 s 10 & 1975 1st ex.s.
c 41 s 1;

(32) RCW 28A.335.300 (Playground matting) and
1991 c 297 s 18; and

(33) RCW 28A.335.320 (Enhanced 911
service--Common and public school service required) and 1995 c 243 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.340.010 (Increased curriculum
programs and opportunities) and 1990 c 33 s 366 & 1988 c 268 s 2;

(2) RCW 28A.340.020
(Eligibility--Participation) and 1990 c 33 s 367 & 1988 c 268 s 3;

(3) RCW 28A.340.030 (Application--Review by
the superintendent of public instruction) and 1990 c 33 s 368 & 1988 c 268
s 4;

(4) RCW 28A.340.040 (Adoption of salary
schedules--Computation of fringe benefits) and 1990 c 33 s 369 & 1988 c 268
s 5;

(5) RCW 28A.340.060 (Rules) and 1990 c 33 s
371 & 1988 c 268 s 8; and

(6) RCW 28A.340.070 (Allocation of state funds
for technical assistance--Contracting with agencies for technical assistance)
and 1988 c 268 s 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
41. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.343.010 (Director candidates in
undivided districts--Indication of term sought--How elected) and 1990 c 33 s
317 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.334;

(2) RCW 28A.343.020 (Certain school
districts--Election for formation of new school district) and 1991 c 363 s 22
& 1991 c 288 s 3;

(3) RCW 28A.343.030 (Certain school
districts--Election to authorize division in school districts not already
divided into directors' districts) and 1991 c 363 s 23, 1991 c 288 s 4, 1990 c
161 s 6, 1985 c 385 s 28, 1979 ex.s. c 183 s 3, 1975 c 43 s 9, 1973 2nd ex.s. c
21 s 3, 1971 c 67 s 8, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.344;

(4) RCW 28A.343.040 (Division or redivision of
district into director districts) and 1991 c 288 s 1;

(5) RCW 28A.343.050 (Dissolution of directors'
districts) and 1990 c 161 s 3, 1990 c 33 s 326, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s
9;

(6) RCW 28A.343.060 (District boundary
changes--Submission to county auditor) and 1991 c 288 s 9;

(7) RCW 28A.343.070 (Map and record of
directors' districts) and 1990 c 33 s 324, 1985 c 385 s 29, 1975 1st ex.s. c
275 s 106, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 140, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.390;

(8) RCW 28A.343.300 (Directors--Terms--Number)
and 1991 c 363 s 20, 1980 c 35 s 1, & 1980 c 47 s 1;

(9) RCW 28A.343.310 (Terms for directors in
divided districts) and 1990 c 161 s 7, 1990 c 33 s 325, & 1969 ex.s. c 223
s 28A.57.410;

(10) RCW 28A.343.320 (Declarations of
candidacy--Positions as separate offices) and 1990 c 161 s 4, 1990 c 59 s 98,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.314;

(11) RCW 28A.343.330 (Ballots--Form) and 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.316;

(12) RCW 28A.343.340 (When
elected--Eligibility) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.318;

(13) RCW 28A.343.350 (Residency) and 1999 c 194
s 1;

(14) RCW 28A.343.360 (Oath of office) and 1990
c 33 s 314, 1988 c 187 s 1, 1986 c 167 s 16, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.57.322;

(15) RCW 28A.343.370 (Vacancies) and 1991 c 60
s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 100, 1971 c 53 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 156, &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.326;

(16) RCW 28A.343.380 (Meetings) and 1990 c 33 s
315, 1983 c 3 s 35, 1975 c 43 s 6, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.324;

(17) RCW 28A.343.390 (Quorum--Failure to attend
meetings) and 1994 c 223 s 5 & 1971 c 53 s 4;

(18) RCW 28A.343.400 (Compensation--Waiver) and
1987 c 307 s 2;

(19) RCW 28A.343.600 (Certain first class
districts--Staggered terms) and 1990 c 33 s 318, 1969 c 131 s 11, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.336;

(20) RCW 28A.343.610 (First class districts
having city with population of 400,000 people or more--Directors' terms) and
1991 c 363 s 21 & 1979 ex.s. c 183 s 10;

(21) RCW 28A.343.620 (First class districts
containing no former first class district--Number and terms of directors) and
1991 c 363 s 24, 1990 c 33 s 320, 1980 c 35 s 3, 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 6, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 102, & 1971 c 67 s 3;

(22) RCW 28A.343.630 (First class districts
containing only one former first class district--Number and terms of directors)
and 1991 c 363 s 25, 1990 c 33 s 321, 1980 c 35 s 4, 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 7,
& 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 6;

(23) RCW 28A.343.640 (First class districts
containing more than one former first class district--Number and terms of
directors) and 1991 c 363 s 26, 1990 c 33 s 322, 1980 c 35 s 5, & 1980 c 47
s 2;

(24) RCW 28A.343.650 (New first class district
having city with population of 400,000 people or more--Number and terms of
directors) and 1991 c 363 s 27, 1990 c 33 s 323, 1980 c 35 s 6, & 1980 c 47
s 3;

(25) RCW 28A.343.660 (First class districts
having city with population of 400,000 people or more--Boundaries of director
districts‑-Candidate eligibility--Declaration of candidacy--Primary
limited to district voters--Terms of directors) and 1991 c 363 s 28 & 1991
c 288 ss 5, 6;

(26) RCW 28A.343.670 (First class districts
having city with population of 400,000 people or more--Initial director
district boundaries--Appointments to fill vacancies for new director
districts--Director district numbers) and 1995 c 335 s 106; and

(27) RCW 28A.343.680 (New second class
districts--Number and terms of directors) and 1990 c 33 s 316, 1980 c 35 s 2,
1979 ex.s. c 126 s 5, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
42. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.345.010 (Association created) and
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.010;

(2) RCW 28A.345.020 (Membership) and 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.020;

(3) RCW 28A.345.030 (Powers of association)
and 1991 c 66 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 372, 1989 c 325 s 1, 1983 c 187 s 1, 1979 c 151
s 13, 1974 ex.s. c 101 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 184 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.61.030;

(4) RCW 28A.345.040 (Coordination of
policies--Report) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.040;

(5) RCW 28A.345.050 (Association
dues--Payment) and 1983 c 187 s 2, 1969 c 125 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.61.050;

(6) RCW 28A.345.060 (Audit of staff
classifications and employees' salaries--Contract with department of
personnel--Copies) and 1986 c 158 s 3 & 1983 c 187 s 4; and

(7) RCW 28A.345.902 (Effective date--1983 c
187) and 1983 c 187 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
43. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.350.010 (Registering warrants--All
districts) and 1990 c 33 s 373, 1975 c 43 s 27, 1973 c 111 s 2, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.010;

(2) RCW 28A.350.020 (Registering
warrants--Second class districts) and 1990 c 33 s 374, 1975 c 43 s 28, &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.020;

(3) RCW 28A.350.030 (Auditing accounts--All
districts) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.030;

(4) RCW 28A.350.040 (Auditor to draw and issue
warrants--Second class districts) and 1990 c 33 s 375, 1975 c 43 s 29, 1973 c 111
s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.040;

(5) RCW 28A.350.050 (Teacher must qualify
before warrant drawn and issued or registered--All districts) and 1973 c 72 s
1, 1971 c 48 s 45, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.050;

(6) RCW 28A.350.060 (Liability of auditor for
warrants exceeding budget--All districts) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 31
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.66.070; and

(7) RCW 28A.350.070 (Orders for warrants not
transferable--Second class districts) and 1975 c 43 s 30 & 1969 ex.s. c 223
s 28A.66.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
44. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.400.010 (Employment of
superintendent--Superintendent's qualifications, general powers, term, contract
renewal) and 1990 c 33 s 376, 1985 c 7 s 94, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 10,
& 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 10;

(2) RCW 28A.400.020 (Directors' and
superintendents' signatures filed with auditor) and 1990 c 33 s 377 & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.140;

(3) RCW 28A.400.030 (Superintendent's duties)
and 1991 c 116 s 14, 1990 c 33 s 378, 1983 c 56 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 30,
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 30, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 110, 1971 c 48 s 30,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.150;

(4) RCW 28A.400.100 (Principals and vice
principals--Employment of‑-Qualifications--Duties) and 1977 ex.s. c 272 s
1;

(5) RCW 28A.400.110 (Principal to assure
appropriate student discipline--Building discipline standards--Classes to
improve classroom management skills) and 1997 c 266 s 12, 1990 c 33 s 379, 1980
c 171 s 2, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 97 s 3;

(6) RCW 28A.400.200 (Salaries and compensation
for employees--Minimum amounts--Limitations--Supplemental contracts) and 1997 c
141 s 2 & 1993 c 492 s 225;

(7) RCW 28A.400.205 (Cost-of-living increases
for employees) and 2001 c 4 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 732);

(8) RCW 28A.400.206 (Cost-of-living
increases--Duty of state) and 2001 c 4 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 732);

(9) RCW 28A.400.210 (Employee attendance
incentive program--Remuneration or benefit plan for unused sick leave) and 2000
c 231 s 1, 1997 c 13 s 9, 1992 c 234 s 12, 1991 c 92 s 2, 1989 c 69 s 2, &
1983 c 275 s 2;

(10) RCW 28A.400.212 (Employee attendance
incentive program--Effect of early retirement) and 1993 c 519 s 14, 1993 c 86 s
8, & 1992 c 234 s 13;

(11) RCW 28A.400.220 (Employee salary or
compensation--Limitations respecting) and 1989 c 11 s 5 & 1982 1st ex.s. c
10 s 1;

(12) RCW 28A.400.230 (Deposit of cumulative
total of earnings of group of employees--Authorized--Conditions) and 1973 c 111
s 5;

(13) RCW 28A.400.240 (Deferred compensation
plan for district employees--Limitations) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 205 s 1 &
1974 ex.s. c 11 s 1;

(14) RCW 28A.400.250 (Tax deferred annuities)
and 1984 c 228 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 113, 1971 c 48 s 31, 1969 c 97 s 2,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.560;

(15) RCW 28A.400.260 (Pension benefits or
annuity benefits for certain classifications of employees--Procedure) and 1972
ex.s. c 27 s 1;

(16) RCW 28A.400.270 (Employee
benefit--Definitions) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 4;

(17) RCW 28A.400.275 (Employee
benefits--Contracts) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5;

(18) RCW 28A.400.280 (Employee
benefits--Employer contributions) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 6;

(19) RCW 28A.400.285 (Contracts for services
performed by classified employees) and 1997 c 267 s 2 & 1993 c 349 s 1;

(20) RCW 28A.400.300 (Hiring and discharging of
employees--Seniority and leave benefits, transfers between school districts)
and 1997 c 13 s 10 & 1990 c 33 s 382;

(21) RCW 28A.400.303 (Record checks for
employees) and 1992 c 159 s 2;

(22) RCW 28A.400.305 (Record check
information--Access--Rules) and 1996 c 126 s 5;

(23) RCW 28A.400.306 (Fingerprints accepted by
the state patrol--Fingerprints forwarded to the federal bureau of
investigation--Conditions) and 1995 c 335 s 504 & 1992 c 159 s 9;

(24) RCW 28A.400.310 (Law against
discrimination applicable to districts' employment practices) and 1997 c 13 s
11 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.050;

(25) RCW 28A.400.315 (Employment contracts) and
1990 c 8 s 6;

(26) RCW 28A.400.320 (Crimes against
children--Mandatory termination of classified employees--Appeal) and 1990 c 33
s 383 & 1989 c 320 s 3;

(27) RCW 28A.400.330 (Crimes against
children--Contractor employees--Termination of contract) and 1989 c 320 s 4;

(28) RCW 28A.400.340 (Notice of discharge to
contain notice of right to appeal if available) and 1991 c 102 s 1;

(29) RCW 28A.400.350 (Liability, life, health,
health care, accident, disability, and salary insurance authorized--When
required--Premiums) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 18, 1995 c 126 s 1, & 1993 c
492 s 226;

(30) RCW 28A.400.360 (Liability insurance for
officials and employees authorized) and 1973 c 125 s 1;

(31) RCW 28A.400.370 (Mandatory insurance
protection for employees) and 1971 ex.s. c 269 s 1;

(32) RCW 28A.400.380 (Leave sharing program)
and 1997 c 13 s 12, 1990 c 23 s 4, & 1989 c 93 s 6;

(33) RCW 28A.400.391 (Insurance for retired and
disabled employees‑-Application--Rules) and 1993 c 386 s 2 & 1992 c
152 s 1;

(34) RCW 28A.400.395 (Insurance for retired
employees and their dependents--Method of payment of premium) and 1992 c 152 s
3;

(35) RCW 28A.400.400 (District contributions to
the public employees' and retirees' insurance account) and 1994 c 153 s 11; and

(36) RCW 28A.400.410 (Payment to the public
employees' and retirees' insurance account) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
45. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.405.030 (Must teach morality and
patriotism) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.110;

(2) RCW 28A.405.040 (Disqualification for
failure to emphasize patriotism) and 1990 c 33 s 384 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.67.030;

(3) RCW 28A.405.050 (Noncompliance with RCW
28A.405.040--Penalties) and 1991 c 115 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 385, & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.67.035;

(4) RCW 28A.405.060 (Course of study and
regulations--Enforcement--Withholding salary warrant for failure) and 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 132, 1971 c 48 s 49, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.060;

(5) RCW 28A.405.070 (Job sharing) and 1995 c
335 s 701 & 1989 c 206 s 1;

(6) RCW 28A.405.100 (Minimum criteria for the
evaluation of certificated employees, including
administrators--Procedure--Scope--Penalty) and 1997 c 278 s 1, 1994 c 115 s 1,
1990 c 33 s 386, 1985 c 420 s 6, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 3, 1975 1st ex.s. c
288 s 22, & 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 22;

(7) RCW 28A.405.110 (Evaluations--Legislative
findings) and 1985 c 420 s 1;

(8) RCW 28A.405.120 (Training for evaluators)
and 1995 c 335 s 401 & 1985 c 420 s 3;

(9) RCW 28A.405.130 (Training in evaluation
procedures required) and 1985 c 420 s 4;

(10) RCW 28A.405.140 (Assistance for teacher
may be required after evaluation) and 1993 c 336 s 403, 1990 c 33 s 387, &
1985 c 420 s 5;

(11) RCW 28A.405.200 (Annual salary schedules
as basis for salaries of certificated employees) and 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 1;

(12) RCW 28A.405.210 (Conditions and contracts
of employment--Determination of probable cause for nonrenewal of
contracts--Nonrenewal due to enrollment decline or revenue
loss--Notice--Opportunity for hearing) and 1996 c 201 s 1 & 1990 c 33 s
390;

(13) RCW 28A.405.220 (Conditions and contracts
of employment--Nonrenewal of provisional employees--Notice--Procedure) and 1996
c 201 s 2, 1992 c 141 s 103, 1990 c 33 s 391, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s
1;

(14) RCW 28A.405.230 (Conditions and contracts
of employment--Transfer of administrator to subordinate certificated
position--Notice‑-Procedure) and 1996 c 201 s 3, 1990 c 33 s 392, &
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 9;

(15) RCW 28A.405.240 (Conditions and contracts
of employment--Supplemental contracts, when--Continuing contract provisions not
applicable to) and 1990 c 33 s 393, 1985 c 341 s 15, & 1969 ex.s. c 283 s
2;

(16) RCW 28A.405.250 (Certificated employees,
applicants for certificated position, not to be discriminated against--Right to
inspect personnel file) and 1990 c 33 s 394 & 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 21;

(17) RCW 28A.405.300 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee--Determination of probable
cause--Notice--Opportunity for hearing) and 1990 c 33 s 395, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s.
c 114 s 2, 1973 c 49 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 13, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.58.450;

(18) RCW 28A.405.310 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract--Hearings--Procedure)
and 1990 c 33 s 396, 1987 c 375 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 7 s 1, & 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 114 s 5;

(19) RCW 28A.405.320 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of
contract--Appeal from--Notice--Service--Filing--Contents) and 1990 c 33 s 397,
1969 ex.s. c 34 s 14, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.460;

(20) RCW 28A.405.330 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract--Appeal
from--Certification and filing with court of transcript) and 1990 c 33 s 398
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.470;

(21) RCW 28A.405.340 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of
contract--Appeal from--Scope) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 6, 1969 ex.s. c 34
s 15, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.480;

(22) RCW 28A.405.350 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract--Appeal
from--Costs, attorney's fee and damages) and 1990 c 33 s 399, 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 114 s 7, 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 16, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.490;

(23) RCW 28A.405.360 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of
contract--Appellate review) and 1988 c 202 s 26, 1971 c 81 s 71, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.500;

(24) RCW 28A.405.370 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of
contract--Appeal from--Other statutes not applicable) and 1990 c 33 s 400 &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.510;

(25) RCW 28A.405.380 (Adverse change in
contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of
contract--Appeal from--Direct judicial appeal, when) and 1990 c 33 s 401,
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 8, 1973 c 49 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 18;

(26) RCW 28A.405.400 (Payroll deductions
authorized for employees) and 1991 c 116 s 18 & 1972 ex.s. c 39 s 1;

(27) RCW 28A.405.410 (Payroll deductions
authorized for certificated employees--Savings) and 1990 c 33 s 402 & 1972
ex.s. c 39 s 2;

(28) RCW 28A.405.460 (Lunch period for
certificated employees) and 1995 c 335 s 702, 1991 c 116 s 15, & 1969 ex.s.
c 223 s 28A.58.275;

(29) RCW 28A.405.465 (Use of classified
personnel to supervise in noninstructional activities) and 1997 c 13 s 13 &
1991 c 116 s 16;

(30) RCW 28A.405.470 (Crimes against
children--Mandatory termination of certified employees--Appeal) and 1990 c 33 s
405 & 1989 c 320 s 5; and

(31) RCW 28A.405.900 (Certain certificated
employees exempt from chapter provisions) and 1990 c 33 s 404 & 1972 ex.s.
c 142 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
46. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.410.010 (Certification--State
board duty--Rules and regulations--Record check--Superintendent of public
instruction as administrator) and 1992 c 159 s 3 & 1992 c 60 s 2;

(2) RCW 28A.410.020 (Requirements for
admission to teacher preparation programs--Rules) and 1996 c 309 s 1, 1991 c
116 s 20, 1988 c 251 s 4, & 1987 c 525 s 202;

(3) RCW 28A.410.025
(Qualifications--Certificate or permit required) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.67.010;

(4) RCW 28A.410.032 (Qualifications--Teachers
of visually impaired‑-Rules) and 1996 c 135 s 4;

(5) RCW 28A.410.035
(Qualifications--Coursework on issues of abuse) and 1990 c 90 s 1;

(6) RCW 28A.410.040 (Initial-level
certificates) and 1992 c 141 s 101 & 1990 c 33 s 406;

(7) RCW 28A.410.050 (Baccalaureate and masters
degree equivalency requirements for vocational instructors--Rules) and 1992 c
141 s 102, 1989 c 29 s 2, & 1987 c 525 s 215;

(8) RCW 28A.410.060 (Fee for
certification--Disposition) and 1990 c 33 s 407, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92 s 3,
& 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 17;

(9) RCW 28A.410.070 (Registration of
certificates) and 1983 c 56 s 12, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92 s 4, 1975 1st ex.s. c
275 s 135, 1971 c 48 s 50, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.70.130;

(10) RCW 28A.410.080 (School year--For
certification or qualification purposes) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.025;

(11) RCW 28A.410.090 (Revocation or suspension
of certificate or permit to teach--Investigation by superintendent of public
instruction‑-Mandatory revocation for crimes against children) and 1996 c
126 s 2, 1992 c 159 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 408, 1989 c 320 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275
s 137, 1974 ex.s. c 55 s 2, 1971 c 48 s 51, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.70.160;

(12) RCW 28A.410.095 (Violation or
noncompliance--Investigatory powers of superintendent of public
instruction--Court orders--Contempt) and 1992 c 159 s 5;

(13) RCW 28A.410.100 (Revocation of authority
to teach--Hearings and appeals) and 1992 c 159 s 6, 1990 c 33 s 409, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 138, 1971 c 48 s 52, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.70.170;

(14) RCW 28A.410.105 (Certificate or permit
suspension--Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship) and 1996
c 293 s 27;

(15) RCW 28A.410.106 (Certificate or permit
suspension--Noncompliance with support order--Reissuance) and 1997 c 58 s 842;

(16) RCW 28A.410.110 (Limitation on
reinstatement after revocation‑-Reinstatement prohibited for crimes
against children) and 1990 c 33 s 410, 1989 c 320 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.70.180;

(17) RCW 28A.410.120 (Professional
certification not to be required of superintendents, deputy or assistant
superintendents) and 1990 c 33 s 411 & 1975 1st ex.s. c 254 s 3;

(18) RCW 28A.410.200 (Washington professional
educator standards board--Creation--Membership--Executive director) and 2000 c
39 s 102;

(19) RCW 28A.410.210 (Washington professional
educator standards board--Powers and duties) and 2000 c 39 s 103;

(20) RCW 28A.410.220 (Washington professional
educator standards board--Basic skills assessment--Assessment of subject
knowledge--Administration of section--Rule-making authority) and 2000 c 39 s
201;

(21) RCW 28A.410.230 (Washington professional
educator standards board--Review of proposed assessments before implementation)
and 2000 c 39 s 202; and

(22) RCW 28A.410.240 (Washington professional
educator standards board--Reports) and 2000 c 39 s 203.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
47. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.415.010 (Center for improvement of
teaching--Improvement of teaching coordinating council--Teachers' institutes
and workshops) and 1991 c 285 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 414, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c
15 s 18;

(2) RCW 28A.415.020 (Credit on salary schedule
for approved in-service training, continuing education, and internship) and
1995 c 284 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 415, & 1987 c 519 s 1;

(3) RCW 28A.415.023 (Credit on salary schedule
for approved in-service training, continuing education, or internship--Course
content--Rules) and 1997 c 90 s 1;

(4) RCW 28A.415.025 (Internship clock
hours--Rules) and 1995 c 284 s 3;

(5) RCW 28A.415.030 (In-Service Training Act
of 1977--Purpose) and 1977 ex.s. c 189 s 1;

(6) RCW 28A.415.040 (In-Service Training Act
of 1977--Administration of funds--Rules--Requirements for local
districts--In-service training task force) and 1987 c 525 s 301, 1985 c 214 s
1, 1979 c 149 s 10, & 1977 ex.s. c 189 s 2;

(7) RCW 28A.415.060 (Credits for educational
staff associates to fulfill continuing education requirements) and 1991 c 155 s
1;

(8) RCW 28A.415.100 (Student teaching
centers--Legislative recognition--Intent) and 1991 c 258 s 1;

(9) RCW 28A.415.105 (Definitions) and 1995 c
335 s 403 & 1991 c 258 s 2;

(10) RCW 28A.415.125 (Network of student teaching
centers) and 1991 c 258 s 6;

(11) RCW 28A.415.130 (Allocation of funds for
student teaching centers) and 1991 c 258 s 7;

(12) RCW 28A.415.135 (Alternative means of
teacher placement) and 1991 c 258 s 8;

(13) RCW 28A.415.140 (Field experiences) and
1991 c 258 s 9;

(14) RCW 28A.415.145 (Rules) and 1991 c 258 s
10;

(15) RCW 28A.415.200 (Minority teacher
recruitment program--Intent) and 1989 c 146 s 1;

(16) RCW 28A.415.205 (Minority teacher
recruitment program) and 1991 c 238 s 75 & 1989 c 146 s 2;

(17) RCW 28A.415.250 (Teacher assistance
program--Provision for mentor teachers) and 1993 c 336 s 401, 1991 c 116 s 19,
1990 c 33 s 403, 1987 c 507 s 1, & 1985 c 399 s 1;

(18) RCW 28A.415.260 (Pilot program using
full-time mentor teachers) and 1998 c 245 s 12 & 1993 c 336 s 402;

(19) RCW 28A.415.270 (Principal internship
support program) and 1996 c 233 s 1 & 1993 c 336 s 404;

(20) RCW 28A.415.280 (Superintendent and
program administrator internship support program) and 1996 c 233 s 2 & 1993
c 336 s 405;

(21) RCW 28A.415.300 (Rules) and 1993 c 336 s
407;

(22) RCW 28A.415.310 (Paraprofessional training
program) and 1993 c 336 s 408; and

(23) RCW 28A.415.330 (Professional development
institutes--Managing disruptive students) and 1999 c 166 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
48. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.500.010 (Local effort assistance
funds--Purpose--Not basic education allocation) and 1999 c 317 s 1, 1997 c 259
s 4, 1993 c 410 s 1, 1992 c 49 s 2, & 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 102;

(2) RCW 28A.500.020 (Definitions) and 1999 c
317 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.500.030 (Allocation of state
matching funds--Determination) and 1999 c 317 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.500.040 (Distribution of funds)
and 1999 c 317 s 4; and

(5) RCW 28A.500.900 (Effective date--1999 c
317) and 1999 c 317 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
49. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.505.010 (Definitions) and 1983 c
59 s 1 & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.505.020 (Districts must utilize
methods of revenue and expenditure recognition) and 1990 c 33 s 416, 1983 c 59
s 2, 1980 c 18 s 1, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.505.030 (District fiscal year) and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.505.040 (Budget--Notice of
completion--Copies--Review by educational service districts) and 1995 c 121 s 1
& 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 4;

(5) RCW 28A.505.050 (Budget--Notice of meeting
to adopt) and 1995 c 121 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 417, 1983 c 59 s 3, & 1975-'76
2nd ex.s. c 118 s 5;

(6) RCW 28A.505.060 (Budget--Hearing and
adoption of--Copies filed with ESD's) and 1990 c 33 s 418, 1983 c 59 s 4, &
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 6;

(7) RCW 28A.505.070 (Budget review
committee--Members--Review of budget, limitations) and 1990 c 33 s 419 &
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 7;

(8) RCW 28A.505.080 (Budget--Disposition of
copies) and 1984 c 128 s 8, 1983 c 59 s 5, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 8;

(9) RCW 28A.505.090 (Budget--Format,
classifications, mandatory) and 1983 c 59 s 6 & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s
9;

(10) RCW 28A.505.100 (Budget--Contents--Display
of salaries) and 1990 c 33 s 420, 1983 c 59 s 7, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118
s 10;

(11) RCW 28A.505.110 (Budget--Including
receivables collectible in future years--Limitations) and 1990 c 33 s 421, 1983
c 59 s 8, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 11;

(12) RCW 28A.505.120 (Withholding state funds
upon district noncompliance--Notice of) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 12;

(13) RCW 28A.505.130 (Budget--Requirements for
balancing estimated expenditures) and 1983 c 59 s 9 & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c
118 s 13;

(14) RCW 28A.505.140 (Rules and regulations for
budgetary procedures--Review when superintendent determines budget
irregularity--Revised budget, state board's financial plan until adoption) and
1990 c 33 s 422, 1983 c 59 s 10, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 14;

(15) RCW 28A.505.150 (Budgeted expenditures as
appropriations--Interim expenditures--Transfer between budget
classes--Liability for nonbudgeted expenditures) and 1990 c 33 s 423 &
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 15;

(16) RCW 28A.505.160 (Appropriations lapse at
end of fiscal year--Exception) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 16;

(17) RCW 28A.505.170 (First class school
districts--Emergency or additional appropriation resolutions--Procedure) and
1990 c 33 s 424, 1984 c 128 s 9, 1983 c 59 s 11, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118
s 17;

(18) RCW 28A.505.180 (Second class school
districts--Additional appropriation resolutions--Procedure) and 1990 c 33 s
425, 1984 c 128 s 10, 1983 c 59 s 12, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 18;

(19) RCW 28A.505.200 (Repayment of federal
moneys--Federal disallowance determination) and 1990 c 103 s 1; and

(20) RCW 28A.505.210 (Student achievement
funds--Use and accounting of funds--Public hearing--Report) and 2001 c 3 s 3
(Initiative Measure No. 728).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
50. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.510.250 (By state superintendent)
and 1990 c 33 s 426, 1982 c 136 s 1, 1981 c 282 s 1, 1981 c 5 s 32, 1980 c 6 s
5, 1979 ex.s. c 237 s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 27, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
67, 1974 ex.s. c 89 s 1, 1972 ex.s. c 146 s 1, & 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 15;

(2) RCW 28A.510.260 (Distribution by ESD
superintendent) and 1990 c 33 s 427, 1983 c 56 s 5, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 68,
1969 ex.s. c 176 s 109, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.48.030; and

(3) RCW 28A.510.270 (County treasurer's
duties) and 1991 c 245 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 428, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 28,
1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 73, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 114, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.48.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
51. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.515.300 (Permanent common school
fund--Sources--Use) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.40.010;

(2) RCW 28A.515.310 (Certain losses to
permanent common school fund or other state educational funds as funded debt
against state) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.40.020; and

(3) RCW 28A.515.320 (Common school
construction fund--Sources--Use‑-Excess moneys in, availability,
repayment) and 1996 c 186 s 503, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 58, 1991 c 76 s 2, 1981 c
158 s 6, 1981 c 4 s 1, 1980 c 6 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.40.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
52. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.520.010 (Distribution of forest
reserve funds--Procedure--Proportional county area distribution, when) and 1990
c 33 s 429, 1985 c 311 s 1, & 1982 c 126 s 1; and

(2) RCW 28A.520.020 (Distribution of forest
reserve funds--Revolving account created--Use--Apportionments from--As affects
basic education allocation) and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 113, 1990 c 33 s 430, 1985 c
311 s 2, & 1982 c 126 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
53. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.525.010 (Statement of intent) and
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.050;

(2) RCW 28A.525.020 (Duties of state board of
education) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.060;

(3) RCW 28A.525.030 (Modernization of existing
school facilities) and 1995 c 77 s 23, 1980 c 154 s 17, & 1969 ex.s. c 223
s 28A.47.073;

(4) RCW 28A.525.040 (Portable buildings or
classrooms) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.075;

(5) RCW 28A.525.050 (Applications for
aid--Rules and regulations--Recommendations) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.080;

(6) RCW 28A.525.055 (New construction--Eligibility
for state assistance--Inventory assessment exclusion) and 1994 c 219 s 11;

(7) RCW 28A.525.060
(Manual--Contents--Preparation and revision) and 1990 c 33 s 431, 1979 c 141 s
36, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.090;

(8) RCW 28A.525.070 (State superintendent to
assist districts and state board) and 1985 c 136 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.47.100;

(9) RCW 28A.525.080 (Federal grants--Rules and
regulations) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.120;

(10) RCW 28A.525.090 (Construction management
techniques--Rules--Use--Information and training) and 1999 c 313 s 2;

(11) RCW 28A.525.120 (1967 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Authorized--Sale,
conditions‑-Form, terms, etc.) and 1990 c 33 s 440, 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 26,
1969 c 77 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.784;

(12) RCW 28A.525.122 (1967 bond issue for construction,
modernization of school plant facilities--Common school building construction
account--Created--Proceeds from bond sale deposited in--Use) and 1990 c 33 s
441 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.785;

(13) RCW 28A.525.124 (1967 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Bonds not general
obligation of state--Bonds, interest on, source for payment of--Pledge) and
1990 c 33 s 442 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.786;

(14) RCW 28A.525.126 (1967 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Common school building
bond redemption fund of 1967--Created--Use--Transfer of funds to--Prior charge
against certain common school construction fund moneys) and 1990 c 33 s 443,
1969 c 77 s 5, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.787;

(15) RCW 28A.525.128 (1967 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Legislature may provide
additional means of revenue--General credit of state not pledged) and 1990 c 33
s 444, 1969 c 77 s 6, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.788;

(16) RCW 28A.525.130 (1967 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Bonds are negotiable,
legal investment and security) and 1990 c 33 s 445 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.47.789;

(17) RCW 28A.525.132 (1967 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Allotment of funds
appropriated from common school building construction account or common school
construction fund--Local responsibility--Duties, rules and regulations of state
board of education) and 1990 c 33 s 446 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.790;

(18) RCW 28A.525.134 (1967 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Appropriations to state
board of education--Allocation of, limitations) and 1990 c 33 s 447 & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.791;

(19) RCW 28A.525.140 (1969 bond issue for construction,
modernization of school plant facilities--Authorized--Sale, conditions‑-Form,
terms) and 1990 c 33 s 448, 1985 ex.s. c 4 s 11, 1974 ex.s. c 108 s 1, 1971
ex.s. c 4 s 1, & 1969 c 13 s 1;

(20) RCW 28A.525.142 (1969 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Proceeds from bond sale
deposited in common school building construction account--Use) and 1969 c 13 s
2;

(21) RCW 28A.525.144 (1969 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Bonds not general
obligation of state--Bonds, interest on, source of payment of--Pledge) and 1990
c 33 s 449, 1974 ex.s. c 108 s 2, & 1969 c 13 s 3;

(22) RCW 28A.525.146 (1969 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Common school building
bond redemption fund of 1967--Use--Transfer of funds to--Prior charge against
certain common school construction fund moneys) and 1990 c 33 s 450, 1971 ex.s.
c 4 s 2, & 1969 c 13 s 4;

(23) RCW 28A.525.148 (1969 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Legislature may provide
additional means of revenue) and 1990 c 33 s 451, 1974 ex.s. c 108 s 3, 1971
ex.s. c 4 s 3, & 1969 c 13 s 5;

(24) RCW 28A.525.150 (1969 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Bonds are negotiable,
legal investment and security) and 1969 c 13 s 6;

(25) RCW 28A.525.152 (1969 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Allotment of funds
appropriated from common school building construction account--Local
responsibility--Duties of state board of education) and 1990 c 33 s 452 &
1969 c 13 s 7;

(26) RCW 28A.525.154 (1969 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Appropriations to state
board of education--Allocation of, limitations) and 1990 c 33 s 453 & 1969
c 13 s 8;

(27) RCW 28A.525.156 (Bonds authorized under
RCW 28A.525.120 through 28A.525.154 may be refunded--Security) and 1990 c 33 s
454 & 1974 ex.s. c 108 s 4;

(28) RCW 28A.525.158 (Rescinding authority to
issue balance of bonds authorized under RCW 28A.525.140 through 28A.525.154)
and 1979 ex.s. c 241 s 13;

(29) RCW 28A.525.160 (1969 appropriation for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities) and 1969 ex.s. c 244 s
1;

(30) RCW 28A.525.162 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities by state board--Local school
district participation--Computing state matching percentage--Rules) and 1995 c
77 s 24, 1990 c 33 s 455, 1989 c 321 s 1, 1980 c 154 s 18, 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 1,
1970 ex.s. c 42 s 5, & 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 2;

(31) RCW 28A.525.164 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Duties of board) and 1990 c 33 s
456, 1989 c 321 s 2, 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 3;

(32) RCW 28A.525.166 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Basis of state aid for school
plant) and 1997 c 369 s 9, 1990 c 33 s 457, 1989 c 321 s 3, 1975 1st ex.s. c 98
s 1, 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 4;

(33) RCW 28A.525.168 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Taxable valuation and percentage of
state assistance to be used in determining eligibility) and 1990 c 33 s 458
& 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 5;

(34) RCW 28A.525.170 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Additional allotment
authorized--Effect of allotment on future disbursements to district) and 1990 c
33 s 459, 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 6;

(35) RCW 28A.525.172 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Application by district for state
assistance--Studies and surveys by state board) and 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 7;

(36) RCW 28A.525.174 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Manual, other materials to guide
and provide information to district) and 1990 c 33 s 460, 1979 c 141 s 39, 1974
ex.s. c 56 s 5, & 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 8;

(37) RCW 28A.525.176 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--State board to provide district
with consultatory, advisory service) and 1990 c 33 s 461, 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 6,
& 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 9;

(38) RCW 28A.525.178 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Modifiable basic or standard plans
for school buildings) and 1990 c 33 s 462, 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 7, & 1969
ex.s. c 244 s 10;

(39) RCW 28A.525.180 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Appropriation to be reduced by
amount of federal funds made available for school construction except to
federally affected areas) and 1990 c 33 s 463, 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 8, & 1969
ex.s. c 244 s 11;

(40) RCW 28A.525.182 (Allotment of
appropriations for school plant facilities--Permissible allocations) and 1990 c
33 s 464 & 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 12;

(41) RCW 28A.525.190 (Board limited when
prioritizes construction) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 98 s 2;

(42) RCW 28A.525.200 (Specific RCW sections
enumerated governing allocation and distribution of funds for school plant
facilities) and 1990 c 33 s 465, 1985 c 136 s 2, & 1977 ex.s. c 227 s 1;

(43) RCW 28A.525.210 (1984 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Intent) and 1984 c 266
s 1;

(44) RCW 28A.525.212 (1984 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Authorized--Sale) and
1985 ex.s. c 3 s 1 & 1984 c 266 s 2;

(45) RCW 28A.525.214 (1984 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Proceeds deposited in
common school construction fund--Use) and 1990 c 33 s 466 & 1984 c 266 s 3;

(46) RCW 28A.525.216 (1984 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Proceeds--Administered
by state board of education) and 1990 c 33 s 467 & 1984 c 266 s 4;

(47) RCW 28A.525.218 (1984 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--State general
obligation bond fund utilized for payment of principal and
interest--Committee's and treasurer's duties--Form and condition of bonds) and
1990 c 33 s 468, 1985 ex.s. c 3 s 2, & 1984 c 266 s 5;

(48) RCW 28A.525.220 (1984 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Legislature may provide
additional means for payment) and 1990 c 33 s 469 & 1984 c 266 s 6;

(49) RCW 28A.525.222 (1984 bond issue for
construction, modernization of school plant facilities--Bonds as legal
investment for public funds) and 1990 c 33 s 470 & 1984 c 266 s 7;

(50) RCW 28A.525.230 (Bonds
authorized--Amount--As compensation for sale of timber--Sale, conditions) and
1990 c 33 s 471, 1985 ex.s. c 4 s 12, & 1980 c 141 s 1;

(51) RCW 28A.525.240 (Bond anticipation
notes--Authorized--Payment) and 1990 c 33 s 472 & 1980 c 141 s 2;

(52) RCW 28A.525.250 (Form, terms, conditions,
sale and covenants of bonds and notes) and 1980 c 141 s 3;

(53) RCW 28A.525.260 (Disposition of proceeds
from sale of bonds and notes--Use) and 1990 c 33 s 473 & 1980 c 141 s 4;

(54) RCW 28A.525.270 (State general obligation
bond retirement fund utilized for payment of bond principal and interest--Procedure)
and 1990 c 33 s 474 & 1980 c 141 s 5;

(55) RCW 28A.525.280 (Bonds as legal investment
for public funds) and 1990 c 33 s 475 & 1980 c 141 s 6;

(56) RCW 28A.525.290 (Chapter provisions as
limited by other statutes, covenants and proceedings) and 1990 c 33 s 476 &
1980 c 141 s 7;

(57) RCW 28A.525.300 (Proceeds from sale of
bonds as compensation for sale of timber from trust lands) and 1990 c 33 s 477
& 1980 c 141 s 8; and

(58) RCW 28A.525.310 (Proceeds from
voter-approved bonds, voter-approved levies, and other funding--Use for
installment purchase contracts and leases with options to purchase) and 1999 c
386 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
54. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.530.010 (Directors may borrow
money, issue bonds) and 1999 c 386 s 3, 1991 c 114 s 3, 1984 c 186 s 10, 1983 c
167 s 21, 1980 c 170 s 1, 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 7, 1969 c 142 s 2, & 1969 ex.s.
c 223 s 28A.51.010;

(2) RCW 28A.530.020 (Bond
issuance--Election--Resolution to specify purposes) and 1996 c 48 s 1, 1990 c
33 s 478, 1984 c 186 s 11, 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 9, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.51.020;

(3) RCW 28A.530.030 (Disposition of bond
proceeds--Capital projects fund) and 1984 c 186 s 12, 1983 c 167 s 24, 1979
ex.s. c 257 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.070;

(4) RCW 28A.530.040 (Refunding former issues
without vote of the people) and 1984 c 186 s 13, 1983 c 167 s 25, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.180;

(5) RCW 28A.530.050 (Holder to notify
treasurer--Redemption) and 1990 c 33 s 479, 1983 c 167 s 26, & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.51.190;

(6) RCW 28A.530.060 (Expense of county treasurer)
and 1990 c 33 s 480 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.200;

(7) RCW 28A.530.070 (Exchange of warrants for
bonds) and 1983 c 167 s 27 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.220; and

(8) RCW 28A.530.080 (Additional authority to
contract indebtedness) and 1999 c 314 s 2 & 1991 c 114 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
55. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.535.010 (Authority to validate
indebtedness) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.010;

(2) RCW 28A.535.020 (Resolution providing for
election--Vote required to validate) and 1996 c 48 s 2, 1995 c 111 s 1, 1990 c
33 s 481, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.020;

(3) RCW 28A.535.030 (Notice of election) and
1990 c 33 s 482 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.030;

(4) RCW 28A.535.040 (Manner and result of
election) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.040;

(5) RCW 28A.535.050 (Authority to borrow,
issue bonds) and 1984 c 186 s 14, 1983 c 167 s 28, 1975 c 43 s 2, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.050;

(6) RCW 28A.535.060 (Exchange of warrants for
bonds) and 1990 c 33 s 483, 1983 c 167 s 30, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.52.060;

(7) RCW 28A.535.070 (Notice to county
treasurer of authority to issue bonds--Annual levy for payment of interest and
principal on bonds--Penalty against officer for expenditures in excess of
revenues) and 1985 c 7 s 90 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.070; and

(8) RCW 28A.535.080 (Validating indebtedness
proceedings after merger) and 1990 c 33 s 484 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.52.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
56. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.540.010 (High school facilities
defined) and 1985 c 385 s 31 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.005;

(2) RCW 28A.540.020 (Plan for nonhigh district
to provide capital funds in aid of high school district) and 1985 c 385 s 32
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.010;

(3) RCW 28A.540.030 (Factors to be considered
in preparation of plan) and 1985 c 385 s 33, 1985 c 7 s 91, & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.56.020;

(4) RCW 28A.540.040 (Public hearing--Notice)
and 1985 c 385 s 34, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 74, 1971 c 48 s 21, & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.030;

(5) RCW 28A.540.050 (Review by state
board--Approval--Revised plan) and 1990 c 33 s 485, 1985 c 385 s 35, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 275 s 75, 1971 c 48 s 22, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.040;

(6) RCW 28A.540.060 (Bond, excess levy,
elections--Use of proceeds) and 1985 c 7 s 92, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 76, 1971
c 48 s 23, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.050;

(7) RCW 28A.540.070 (Rejection by voters of
nonhigh districts--Additional elections--Revised plan--Annexation proposal) and
1990 c 33 s 486, 1985 c 385 s 36, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 77, 1971 c 48 s 24,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.060;

(8) RCW 28A.540.080 (Failure of nonhigh
districts to submit proposal to vote within time limits--Annexation procedure)
and 1990 c 33 s 487, 1985 c 385 s 37, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.070;

(9) RCW 28A.540.090 (Nonhigh districts, time
of levy and issuance of bonds) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.075;

(10) RCW 28A.540.100 (Validation of proceedings
under 1955 act, when) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.170; and

(11) RCW 28A.540.110 (Designation of high
school district nonhigh district students shall attend--Effect when attendance
otherwise) and 1989 c 321 s 4 & 1981 c 239 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
57. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.545.010 (School district
divisions--High and nonhigh) and 1983 c 3 s 31 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.44.045;

(2) RCW 28A.545.020 (Reimbursement not a
tuition charge) and 1983 c 3 s 32 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.44.095;

(3) RCW 28A.545.030 (Purposes) and 1990 c 33 s
488 & 1981 c 264 s 1;

(4) RCW 28A.545.040 ("Student residing in
a nonhigh school district" defined) and 1995 c 77 s 25, 1990 c 33 s 489,
& 1981 c 264 s 2;

(5) RCW 28A.545.050 (Amounts due from nonhigh
districts) and 1985 c 341 s 11 & 1981 c 264 s 3;

(6) RCW 28A.545.060 (Enrollment data for
computation of amounts due) and 1990 c 33 s 490 & 1981 c 264 s 4;

(7) RCW 28A.545.070 (Superintendent's annual
determination of estimated amount due--Process) and 1990 c 33 s 491 & 1981
c 264 s 5;

(8) RCW 28A.545.080 (Estimated amount due paid
in May and November installments) and 1990 c 33 s 492 & 1981 c 264 s 6;

(9) RCW 28A.545.090 (Assessing nonhigh school
lesser amount--Notice of) and 1990 c 33 s 493 & 1981 c 264 s 7;

(10) RCW 28A.545.100 (Amount due reflects cost
of education and transportation of students) and 1995 c 77 s 26, 1990 c 33 s
494, 1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 7, & 1981 c 264 s 8; and

(11) RCW 28A.545.110 (Rules to effect purposes
and implement provisions) and 1990 c 33 s 495 & 1981 c 264 s 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
58. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.600.010 (Government of schools,
pupils, employees, rules for--Due process guarantees--Enforcement) and 1997 c
265 s 4, 1990 c 33 s 496, 1979 ex.s. c 173 s 2, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 97 s 2,
1975 1st ex.s. c 254 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 268 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.58.101;

(2) RCW 28A.600.020 (Government of schools,
pupils, and employees--Exclusion of student by teacher--Written disciplinary
procedures--Appropriate disciplinary action) and 1997 c 266 s 11, 1990 c 33 s
497, 1980 c 171 s 1, & 1972 ex.s. c 142 s 5;

(3) RCW 28A.600.025 (Students' rights of
religious expression--Duty of superintendent of public instruction to inform
school districts) and 1998 c 131 s 2;

(4) RCW 28A.600.030 (Grading policies--Option
to consider attendance) and 1990 c 33 s 498 & 1984 c 278 s 7;

(5) RCW 28A.600.035 (Policies on secondary
school access and egress) and 1995 c 312 s 82;

(6) RCW 28A.600.040 (Pupils to comply with
rules and regulations) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.200;

(7) RCW 28A.600.050 (State honors awards
program established--Purpose) and 1985 c 62 s 1;

(8) RCW 28A.600.060 (State honors awards
program--Areas included) and 1993 c 371 s 4, 1991 c 116 s 22, & 1985 c 62 s
2;

(9) RCW 28A.600.070 (State honors awards
program--Rules) and 1991 c 116 s 23 & 1985 c 62 s 3;

(10) RCW 28A.600.080 (State honors awards
program--Materials--Recognition by business and industry encouraged) and 1985 c
62 s 4;

(11) RCW 28A.600.100 (Washington scholars'
program--Purpose) and 1990 c 33 s 499, 1985 c 341 s 14, & 1981 c 54 s 1;

(12) RCW 28A.600.110 (Washington scholars'
program--Established--Scope) and 1994 c 234 s 4, 1988 c 210 s 4, 1987 c 465 s
1, & 1981 c 54 s 2;

(13) RCW 28A.600.120 (Washington scholars'
program--Administration‑-Cooperation with other agencies) and 1985 c 370
s 32 & 1981 c 54 s 3;

(14) RCW 28A.600.130 (Washington scholars'
program--Planning committee--Composition--Duties) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1,
1990 c 33 s 500, 1985 c 370 s 33, & 1981 c 54 s 4;

(15) RCW 28A.600.140 (Washington scholars'
program--Principal's association to submit names to board) and 1990 c 33 s 501,
1985 c 370 s 34, & 1981 c 54 s 5;

(16) RCW 28A.600.150 (Washington scholars'
program--Selection of scholars and scholars-alternates--Notification
process--Certificates--Awards ceremony) and 1999 c 159 s 2, 1985 c 370 s 35,
& 1981 c 54 s 6;

(17) RCW 28A.600.160 (Educational pathways) and
1998 c 225 s 2;

(18) RCW 28A.600.200 (Interschool athletic and
other extracurricular activities for students, regulation of--Delegation,
conditions) and 1990 c 33 s 502 & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 32 s 1;

(19) RCW 28A.600.210 (School locker
searches--Findings) and 1989 c 271 s 244;

(20) RCW 28A.600.220 (School locker
searches--No expectation of privacy) and 1990 c 33 s 503 & 1989 c 271 s
245;

(21) RCW 28A.600.230 (School locker
searches--Authorization--Limitations) and 1999 c 167 s 3 & 1989 c 271 s
246;

(22) RCW 28A.600.240 (School locker
searches--Notice and reasonable suspicion requirements) and 1990 c 33 s 504
& 1989 c 271 s 247;

(23) RCW 28A.600.300 (High school students'
options--Definition) and 1994 c 205 s 1 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 401;

(24) RCW 28A.600.310 (High school students'
options--Enrollment in institutions of higher education--Transmittal of funds)
and 1994 c 205 s 2, 1993 c 222 s 1, & 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 402;

(25) RCW 28A.600.320 (High school students'
options--Information on enrollment) and 1994 c 205 s 3 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 9
s 403;

(26) RCW 28A.600.330 (High school students'
options--Maximum terms of enrollment for high school credit) and 1994 c 205 s 4
& 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 404;

(27) RCW 28A.600.340 (High school students'
options--Enrolled students not displaced) and 1994 c 205 s 5 & 1990 1st
ex.s. c 9 s 405;

(28) RCW 28A.600.350 (High school students'
options--Enrollment for secondary and postsecondary credit) and 1994 c 205 s 6
& 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 406;

(29) RCW 28A.600.360 (High school students'
options--Enrollment in postsecondary institution--Determination of high school
credits--Application toward graduation requirements) and 1994 c 205 s 7 &
1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 407;

(30) RCW 28A.600.370 (High school students'
options--Postsecondary credit) and 1994 c 205 s 8 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s
408;

(31) RCW 28A.600.380 (High school students'
options--School district not responsible for transportation) and 1994 c 205 s 9
& 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 409;

(32) RCW 28A.600.385 (High school students'
options--Cooperative agreements with community colleges in Oregon and Idaho)
and 1998 c 63 s 2;

(33) RCW 28A.600.390 (High school students'
options--Rules) and 1994 c 205 s 10 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 410;

(34) RCW 28A.600.400 (High school students'
options--Existing agreements not affected) and 1994 c 205 s 11 & 1990 1st
ex.s. c 9 s 412;

(35) RCW 28A.600.410 (Alternatives to
suspension--Encouraged) and 1992 c 155 s 1;

(36) RCW 28A.600.415 (Alternatives to
suspension--Community service encouraged--Information provided to school
districts) and 1992 c 155 s 2;

(37) RCW 28A.600.420 (Firearms on school
premises, transportation, or facilities--Penalty--Exemptions) and 1997 c 265 s
5, 1995 c 335 s 304, & 1995 c 87 s 2;

(38) RCW 28A.600.455 (Gang activity--Suspension
or expulsion) and 1997 c 266 s 2;

(39) RCW 28A.600.460 (Classroom
discipline--Policies--Classroom placement of student offenders--Data on
disciplinary actions) and 1997 c 266 s 9; and

(40) RCW 28A.600.475 (Exchange of information
with law enforcement and juvenile court officials--Notification of parents and
students) and 1998 c 269 s 11 & 1992 c 205 s 120.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
59. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.605.010 (Removing child from
school grounds during school hours) and 1997 c 411 s 1 & 1975 1st ex.s. c
248 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.605.020 (Parents' access to
classroom or school sponsored activities--Limitation) and 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 8;
and

(3) RCW 28A.605.030 (Student education
records--Parental review--Release of records--Procedure) and 1997 c 119 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
60. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.620.010 (Purposes) and 1990 c 33 s
510; and

(2) RCW 28A.620.020 (Restrictions--Classes on
parenting skills and child abuse prevention encouraged) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s
603, 1985 c 344 s 2, 1979 ex.s. c 120 s 2, & 1973 c 138 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
61. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.623.010 (Nonprofit program for
elderly--Purpose) and 1990 c 33 s 511 & 1973 c 107 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.623.020 (Nonprofit program for
elderly--Authorized--Restrictions) and 1990 c 33 s 512 & 1973 c 107 s 3;
and

(3) RCW 28A.623.030 (Nonprofit program for
certain children and students--Conditions and restrictions) and 1979 c 58 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
62. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.625.010 (Short title) and 1995 c
335 s 107, 1990 c 33 s 513, & 1986 c 147 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.625.020 (Recipients--Awards) and
1991 c 255 s 1;

(3) RCW 28A.625.030 (Washington State Christa
McAuliffe award for teachers) and 1991 c 255 s 2 & 1986 c 147 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.625.042 (Certificates--Recognition
awards) and 1994 c 279 s 4;

(5) RCW 28A.625.050 (Rules) and 1995 c 335 s
108, 1991 c 255 s 8, 1990 c 33 s 516, 1988 c 251 s 2, & 1986 c 147 s 5;

(6) RCW 28A.625.100 (Board of directors of a
school district may establish) and 1986 c 143 s 1;

(7) RCW 28A.625.110 (Awards) and 1990 c 33 s
519, 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 207, & 1986 c 143 s 2;

(8) RCW 28A.625.150 (Award program) and 1990 c
33 s 520, 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 210, & 1985 c 399 s 2;

(9) RCW 28A.625.200 (Findings and intent) and
1989 c 66 s 1 & 1984 c 265 s 1;

(10) RCW 28A.625.210 (Mathematics, engineering,
and science achievement program--Establishment and administration through
University of Washington--Goals) and 1990 c 286 s 1, 1989 c 66 s 2, & 1984
c 265 s 2;

(11) RCW 28A.625.220 (Mathematics, engineering,
and science achievement program--Coordinator--Staff) and 1984 c 265 s 3;

(12) RCW 28A.625.230 (Coordinator to develop
selection standards) and 1984 c 265 s 4;

(13) RCW 28A.625.240 (Local program centers)
and 1990 c 33 s 521 & 1984 c 265 s 5;

(14) RCW 28A.625.350 (Short title) and 1990 1st
ex.s. c 10 s 1;

(15) RCW 28A.625.360 (Excellence in teacher
preparation award established) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 10 s 2;

(16) RCW 28A.625.370 (Award for teacher
educator) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 10 s 3;

(17) RCW 28A.625.380 (Rules) and 1990 1st ex.s.
c 10 s 4;

(18) RCW 28A.625.390 (Educational
grant--Eligibility--Award) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 10 s 5; and

(19) RCW 28A.625.900 (Severability--1990 1st
ex.s. c 10) and 1990 1st ex.s. c 10 s 10.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
63. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.630.400 (Paraeducator associate of
arts degree) and 1995 c 335 s 202, 1995 c 77 s 27, 1991 c 285 s 2, & 1989 c
370 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.630.810 (Rules) and 1989 c 233 s
17;

(3) RCW 28A.630.820 (Intent) and 1992 c 180 s
1 & 1991 c 265 s 1;

(4) RCW 28A.630.825 (Special services
demonstration projects--Duties of the superintendent of public instruction) and
1998 c 245 s 13, 1994 c 13 s 4, & 1991 c 265 s 2;

(5) RCW 28A.630.830 (Selection advisory
committee--Duties) and 1996 c 288 s 26, 1994 c 13 s 5, & 1991 c 265 s 3;

(6) RCW 28A.630.835 (School districts' duties)
and 1995 c 77 s 28 & 1991 c 265 s 4;

(7) RCW 28A.630.840 (Special services
demonstration project funding) and 1995 c 77 s 29, 1994 c 13 s 6, 1992 c 180 s
2, & 1991 c 265 s 5;

(8) RCW 28A.630.845 (Demonstration projects
that reduce percentage of students labeled disabled--Funding) and 1995 c 77 s
30, 1994 c 13 s 1, & 1992 c 180 s 3;

(9) RCW 28A.630.850 (Expiration date of RCW
28A.630.820 through 28A.630.845) and 1994 c 13 s 2 & 1991 c 265 s 7;

(10) RCW 28A.630.853 (Effective date--1994 c
13) and 1994 c 13 s 7; and

(11) RCW 28A.630.881 (School-to-work transition
project--Findings--Intent--Outreach--Technical assistance) and 1997 c 58 s 304.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
64. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.635.010 (Abusing or insulting
teachers, liability for‑-Penalty) and 1990 c 33 s 536, 1984 c 258 s 314,
1969 ex.s. c 199 s 55, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.010;

(2) RCW 28A.635.020 (Willfully disobeying
school administrative personnel or refusing to leave public property,
violations, when--Penalty) and 1997 c 266 s 6, 1981 c 36 s 1, & 1975-'76
2nd ex.s. c 100 s 1;

(3) RCW 28A.635.030 (Disturbing school, school
activities or meetings--Penalty) and 1984 c 258 s 315, 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 57,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.060;

(4) RCW 28A.635.040 (Examination
questions--Disclosing--Penalty) and 1984 c 258 s 316, 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 58,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.070;

(5) RCW 28A.635.050 (Certain corrupt practices
of school officials‑-Penalty) and 1990 c 33 s 537, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s
143, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 150, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.090;

(6) RCW 28A.635.060 (Defacing or injuring
school property--Liability of pupil, parent, or guardian--Withholding grades,
diploma, or transcripts--Suspension and restitution--Voluntary work program as
alternative--Rights protected) and 1997 c 266 s 13, 1994 c 304 s 1, 1993 c 347 s
3, 1989 c 269 s 6, 1982 c 38 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.120;

(7) RCW 28A.635.070 (Property, failure of
officials or employees to account for--Mutilation by--Penalties) and 1990 c 33
s 538, 1984 c 258 s 317, 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 60, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.87.130;

(8) RCW 28A.635.080 (Director's connivance to
employ uncertified teachers--Liability) and 1990 c 33 s 539 & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.87.135;

(9) RCW 28A.635.090 (Interference by force or
violence--Penalty) and 1996 c 321 s 3, 1990 c 33 s 540, 1988 c 2 s 1, &
1971 c 45 s 3;

(10) RCW 28A.635.100 (Intimidating any
administrator, teacher, classified employee, or student by threat of force or
violence unlawful) and 1990 c 33 s 541, 1988 c 2 s 2, & 1971 c 45 s 4;

(11) RCW 28A.635.110 (Violations under RCW
28A.635.090 and 28A.635.100--Disciplinary authority exception) and 1990 c 33 s
542, 1988 c 2 s 3, & 1971 c 45 s 5; and

(12) RCW 28A.635.120 (Violations under RCW
28A.635.090 and 28A.635.100--Penalty) and 1990 c 33 s 543 & 1971 c 45 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
65. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.640.010 (Purpose--Discrimination
prohibited) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 1;

(2) RCW 28A.640.020 (Regulations, guidelines
to eliminate discrimination--Scope--Sexual harassment policies) and 1994 c 213
s 1 & 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.640.030 (Administration) and 1975
1st ex.s. c 226 s 3;

(4) RCW 28A.640.040 (Civil relief for
violations) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 4;

(5) RCW 28A.640.050
(Enforcement--Superintendent's orders, scope) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 5; and

(6) RCW 28A.640.900 (Chapter supplementary)
and 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
66. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.645.010 (Appeals--Notice
of--Scope--Time limitation) and 1990 c 33 s 544, 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 40, 1969
ex.s. c 34 s 17, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.88.010;

(2) RCW 28A.645.020 (Transcript filed,
certified) and 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 41;

(3) RCW 28A.645.030 (Appeal to be heard de
novo and expeditiously) and 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 42; and

(4) RCW 28A.645.040 (Certified copy of
decision to county assessor when school district boundaries changed) and 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.88.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
67. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.650.005 (Findings--Intent) and
1993 c 336 s 701;

(2) RCW 28A.650.010 (Definitions) and 1993 c
336 s 702;

(3) RCW 28A.650.015 (Education technology
plan--Educational technology advisory committee) and 1995 c 335 s 507, 1994 c
245 s 2, & 1993 c 336 s 703;

(4) RCW 28A.650.020 (Regional educational
technology support centers--Advisory councils) and 1993 c 336 s 705;

(5) RCW 28A.650.025 (Distribution of funds for
regional educational technology support centers) and 1993 c 336 s 706;

(6) RCW 28A.650.030 (Distribution of funds to
expand the education state-wide network) and 1993 c 336 s 707;

(7) RCW 28A.650.035 (Education technology
account) and 1993 c 336 s 708; and

(8) RCW 28A.650.040 (Rules) and 1993 c 336 s
709.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
68. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.690.010 (Compact entered
into--Terms) and 1990 c 33 s 545 & 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 4;

(2) RCW 28A.690.020 (Superintendent as
"designated state official", compact administrator--Board to approve
text of contracts) and 1990 c 33 s 546 & 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 5; and

(3) RCW 28A.690.030 (True copies of contracts
filed in office of superintendent--Publication) and 1990 c 33 s 547 & 1969
ex.s. c 283 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
69. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.900 RCW to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2004:

(1) RCW 28A.900.030 (Continuation of existing
law) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.98.030;

(2) RCW 28A.900.040 (Provisions to be
construed in pari materia) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.98.040;

(3) RCW 28A.900.050 (Title, chapter, section
headings not part of law) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.98.050;

(4) RCW 28A.900.060 (Invalidity of part of
title not to affect remainder) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.98.060;

(5) RCW 28A.900.070 ("This code"
defined) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.98.070;

(6) RCW 28A.900.080 (Effective date--1969
ex.s. c 223) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.98.080;

(7) RCW 28A.900.100 (Purpose--1990 c 33) and
1990 c 33 s 1;

(8) RCW 28A.900.101 (Statutory
references--1990 c 33) and 1990 c 33 s 2;

(9) RCW 28A.900.102 (Severability--1990 c 33)
and 1990 c 33 s 603;

(10) RCW 28A.900.103 (Subheadings not law--1990
c 33) and 1990 c 33 s 3; and

(11) RCW 28A.900.105 (Effect of repeal--1995 c
335) and 1995 c 335 s 801.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
70. Sections 1 through 12 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 71. Sections 13 through 69 of
this act expire September 30, 2004.

---
END ---