BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
19.27.031 and 1995 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there
shall be in

_7 effect in all counties and cities the state building
code which

_8 shall consist of the following codes which are hereby
adopted by

_9 reference:

10 (1) ((Uniform Building Code and Uniform Building
Code

11 Standards, published by the International Conference
of Building

12 Officials;

13 (2) Uniform Mechanical Code, including Chapter 13,
Fuel Gas

14 Piping, Appendix B, published by the International
Conference of

15 Building Officials;

16 (3) The Uniform Fire Code and Uniform Fire Code
Standards,

17 published by the International Fire Code Institute))
International

p. 1 SB
5839

_1 Building Code and the International Residential Code,
published by

_2 the International Code Council;

_3 (2) International Mechanical Code and
International Fuel Gas

_4 Code, published by the International Code Council;

_5 (3) International Fire Code, published by the
International

_6 Code Council: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding
any wording in this

_7 code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be
precluded

_8 from carrying hand- held candles;

_9 (4) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform
Plumbing

10 Code and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by
the

11 International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical
Officials:

12 PROVIDED, That chapters 11 and 12 of such code are not
adopted;

13 and

14 (5) The rules and regulations adopted by the council

15 establishing standards for making buildings and
facilities

16 accessible to and usable by the physically handicapped
or elderly

17 persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160.

18 The codes referenced in subsections (1) through
(5) of this

19 section that are adopted by the state, counties, or
cities of

20 Washington shall not be amended to be more
restrictive than these

21 enumerated model codes.

22 In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in
subsections

23 (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first named
code shall

24 govern over those following.

25 The codes enumerated in this section shall be
adopted by the

26 council as provided in RCW 19.27.074.

27 The council may issue opinions relating to the codes
at the

28 request of a local official charged with the duty to
enforce the

29 enumerated codes.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5839 p. 2