BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.010 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that uncoordinated and unplanned growth, together with a lack of common goals
expressing the public's interest in the conservation and the wise use of our
lands, pose a threat to the environment, sustainable economic development, and
the health, safety, and high quality of life enjoyed by residents of this
state. The legislature also finds that private property rights should be
protected. It is in the public interest that citizens, communities, local
governments, and the private sector cooperate and coordinate with one another
in comprehensive land use planning. Further, the legislature finds that it is
in the public interest that economic development programs be shared with
communities experiencing insufficient economic growth.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.020 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following goals are
adopted to guide the development and adoption of comprehensive plans and
development regulations of those counties and cities that are required or
choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in
order of priority and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:

(1) Urban growth.
Encourage development in urban areas where adequate public facilities and
services exist or can be provided in an efficient manner.

(2) Reduce sprawl.
Reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land ((into sprawling,
low-density development)).

(3) Transportation.
Encourage efficient multimodal transportation systems that are based on
regional priorities and coordinated with county and city comprehensive plans.

(4) Housing. Encourage
the availability of affordable housing to all economic segments of the
population of this state, promote a variety of residential densities and
housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing stock.

(5) Economic
development. Encourage economic development throughout the state that is
consistent with adopted comprehensive plans, promote economic opportunity for
all citizens of this state, ((especially for)) including
unemployed and ((for)) disadvantaged persons, and encourage growth in
areas experiencing insufficient economic growth((, all within the capacities
of the state's natural resources, public services, and public facilities)).

(6) Property rights.
Private property shall not be taken for public use without just compensation
having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be protected from
arbitrary and discriminatory actions.

(7) Permits.
Applications for both state and local government permits should be processed in
a timely and fair manner to ensure predictability. Counties and cities
shall issue permits for single-family residential construction within seven
business days of application. Counties and cities shall issue permits for
multifamily construction within thirty days of application. Counties and
cities shall issue permits for short-subdivision applications within thirty
days of application and subdivision applications within ninety days of
application.

(8) Natural resource
industries. Maintain ((and enhance)) natural resource-based industries,
including productive timber, agricultural, and fisheries industries. Encourage
the conservation of productive forest lands and productive agricultural lands((,
and discourage incompatible uses)).

(9) Open space and
recreation. Encourage the retention of open space and development of
recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat, increase access
to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks.

(10) Environment.
Protect the environment from hazards and nuisances and ((enhance))
maintain the state's high quality of life, including air and water
quality, and the availability of water.

(11) Citizen
participation and coordination. Encourage the involvement of citizens in the
planning process and ensure coordination between ((communities)) property
owners and jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.

(12) Public facilities
and services. Ensure that those public facilities and services necessary to
support development shall be ((adequate)) planned to ((serve))
provide services to the development at the time the development is
available for occupancy ((and use without decreasing current service levels
below locally established minimum standards)). A city that operates
public facilities and services shall serve within its service area if service
is technically feasible and in compliance with local regulations.

A city that provides
water or sewer service outside the corporate boundaries of the city shall not
require, as a condition of providing water or sewer service, the property owner
who has requested water or sewer service to agree to:

(a) Lot sizes
different from those required by the jurisdiction with zoning authority over
the property; or

(b) Other
development or design requirements not required by the local government with
jurisdiction over the property.

(13) Historic
preservation. Identify and encourage the preservation of lands, sites, and
structures, that have historical or archaeological significance.

(14) Equal
protection of property owners' rights. Property owners have the prospective
right to those existing uses of similar adjacent properties within the same
zoning designation.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997
c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adopt a
comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use
plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal
products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not
subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish
in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.

(3) "City"
means any city or town, including a code city.

(4) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means
a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a
county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Critical
areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands,
limited to the United States army corps of engineers' definition of wetlands,
as now existing or subsequently amended under its authority, under section 401
of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344; (b) areas with a documented
critical ((recharging)) recharge effect ((on)) that is
necessary for the health and sanitation of aquifers used for potable water;
(c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas as limited in chapter 77.55
RCW; (d) frequently flooded areas no larger than areas within one
hundred year flood plains under Title 86 RCW; and (e) geologically
hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7) "Development
regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on
development or land use activities by a county or city, ((including, but not
limited to,)) zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline
master programs, shoreline management act provisions, or official
controls, ((planned unit development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and
binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments thereto)) each
with their own separate approval processes. A development regulation ((does
not)) includes ((a)) the decision to approve a project
permit application, ((as defined in)) notwithstanding RCW
36.70B.020, even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or
ordinance of the legislative body of the county or city.

(8) "Forest
land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term
commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically
managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise
tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term
commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is primarily
devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land
that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the
following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9) "Geologically
hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to
erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the
siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with
public health or safety concerns. The county or city has the burden of
proving geologically hazardous areas exist and cannot safely support
development. The cost of this burden shall not be borne by the property owner.

(10) "Long-term
commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and
soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in
consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12) "Public
facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road
lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary
sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and schools.

(13) "Public
services" include fire protection and suppression, law enforcement, public
health, education, and recreation((, environmental protection, and
other governmental services)).

(14) "Rural
character" refers to the patterns of land use and development established
by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a) In which open
space, the natural landscape, and vegetation ((predominate over)) occur
more frequently than the built environment;

(b) That foster
traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both
live and work in rural areas;

(c) That provide visual
landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;

(d) That are compatible
with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;

(e) That reduce the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low‑density
development;

(f) That generally do
not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g) That are consistent
with the protection of natural surface water flows and ground water and surface
water recharge and discharge areas.

(15) "Rural
development" refers to development outside the urban growth area and
outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses and
residential densities, including clustered residential development, at levels
that ((are consistent with)) consider the preservation of rural
character and the requirements of the rural element. Rural development does
not refer to agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural
areas.

(16) "Rural
governmental services" or "rural services" include those public
services and public facilities historically and typically delivered at an
intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include domestic water systems,
fire and police protection services, transportation and public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with rural development and
normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services ((do)) may
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(17) "Service
area" means a specific geographic area serviced or for which service is
planned by a purveyor.

(18) "Urban
growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location
of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to ((such a degree as to
be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other
agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural
uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW
36.70A.170)) provide for housing, business, and commerce, which
typically requires urban governmental services. A pattern of more
intensive rural development, as provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban
growth. ((When allowed to spread over wide areas, urban growth typically
requires urban governmental services.)) "Characterized by urban
growth" refers to land ((having)) that: (a) Has urban
growth located on it, or ((to land)) is located in relationship
to an area with urban growth on it ((as to be appropriate for urban growth));
or (b) is so located in relationship to facilities, infrastructure, and
services as to make urban growth on the land feasible through public or private
extensions of service.

(((18))) (19)
"Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19))) (20)
"Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and
typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer
systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police
protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with urban areas ((and normally not associated with rural areas)).

(((20))) (21)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands are limited to wetlands under the United States army corps
of engineers' definition under section 401 of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1344, as now existing or hereafter amended. Wetlands do not include
those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites,
including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined
swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990,
that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road,
street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to mitigate conversion of
wetlands.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department of ecology
shall expeditiously and summarily waive the water quality certification process
of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341, as now existing or hereafter
amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Land developing under
this chapter is exempt from RCW 76.09.050. For the purposes of this section, "land
developing" means the division or platting of land in preparation for
development or the actual building, constructing, or erecting of residences or
commercial buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Critical areas shall be
regulated only for the limited purpose of protecting the public's health and
safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Development regulations
shall only be adopted for the limited purpose of protecting the public's health
and safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Geologically hazardous
areas are not restricted from development activities unless a city or county
meets its burden to prove that the identified geologic conditions preclude the
safe siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Outside an established
urban growth area, if a project applicant has an approved water system and an
approval for sewer or a septic tank system, the city or county shall issue
permits necessary for building single-family residences.

Sec. 10. RCW 36.70A.050 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
definitions provided in RCW 36.70A.030, the department shall adopt guidelines,
under chapter 34.05 RCW, no later than September 1, 1990, and shall amend
these guidelines to conform to this chapter by December 31, 2001, to guide
the classification of: (a) Agricultural lands; (b) forest lands; (c) mineral
resource lands; and (d) critical areas. The department shall consult with the
department of agriculture regarding guidelines for agricultural lands, the
department of natural resources regarding forest lands and mineral resource
lands, and the department of ecology regarding critical areas.

(2) In carrying out its
duties under this section, the department shall consult with interested parties,
including but not limited to: (a) Representatives of cities; (b)
representatives of counties; (c) representatives of developers; (d)
representatives of builders; (e) representatives of owners of agricultural
lands, forest lands, and mining lands; (f) representatives of local economic
development officials; (g) representatives of environmental organizations; (h)
representatives of special districts; (i) representatives of the governor's
office and federal and state agencies; and (j) representatives of Indian
tribes. In addition to the consultation required under this subsection, the
department shall conduct public hearings in the various regions of the state.
The department shall consider the public input obtained at such public hearings
when adopting the guidelines.

(3) The guidelines
under subsection (1) of this section shall ((be minimum guidelines that))
apply to all jurisdictions((, but also shall allow for regional differences
that exist in Washington state)). The intent of these guidelines is to
assist counties and cities in designating the classification of agricultural
lands, forest lands, mineral resource lands, and critical areas under RCW
36.70A.170. Counties and cities may not designate lands as resource lands
or critical areas that do not qualify under the guidelines.

(4) The guidelines
established by the department under this section regarding classification of
forest lands shall not be inconsistent with guidelines adopted by the
department of natural resources.

Sec. 11. RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998
c 286 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county that is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city within such
county, shall adopt development regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to
assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may
not prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and
shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development regulations
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. ((Such regulations shall assure that the use of
lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in accordance
with best management practices, of these designated lands for the production of
food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals.))
Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats, development
permits, and building permits issued for development activities on, or within
five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural lands, forest lands, or
mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the subject property is within or
near designated agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on
which a variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The notice
for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application might be made
for mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing,
stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.

(2) Each county and
city shall adopt development regulations that protect critical areas from
hazards and health and safety risks that are required to be designated
under RCW 36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be adopted on or
before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the counties and cities, such
development regulations shall be adopted on or before March 1, 1992, but
cities and counties shall amend their development regulations to conform with
this chapter by December 1, 2001.

(3) Such counties and
cities shall review these designations and development regulations when
adopting their comprehensive plans under RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing
development regulations under RCW 36.70A.120 ((and may alter such
designations and development regulations to insure consistency)).

(4) Forest land and
agricultural land located within urban growth areas shall not be designated by
a county or city as forest land or agricultural land of long-term commercial
significance under RCW 36.70A.170 ((unless the city or county has enacted a
program authorizing transfer or purchase of development rights)).

Sec. 12. RCW 36.70A.070 and 1998
c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive plan
of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives,
principles, and standards used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan
shall be an internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted and
amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.

Each comprehensive plan
shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the following:

(1) A land use element
designating the proposed general distribution and general location and extent
of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture, timber production,
housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation
airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. ((The
land use element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall provide for
protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used for public water
supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage,
flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and
provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges
that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or waters entering
Puget Sound.))

(2) A housing element
ensuring the vitality and character of established residential neighborhoods
that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of existing and projected housing
needs; (b) includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of housing,
including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient land for
housing((, including, but not limited to, government-assisted housing,
housing for low-income families, manufactured housing, multifamily housing, and
group homes and foster care facilities)); and (d) makes adequate provisions
for existing and projected needs of all economic segments of the community,
except that counties and cities shall not require private projects to include
low-income housing as a condition of issuing a permit or granting a land-use
approval.

(3) A capital
facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing capital
facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and capacities of
the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for such capital
facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new
capital facilities; and (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance
such capital facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly
identifies sources of public money for such purposes((; and (e) a
requirement to reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital facilities plan
element are coordinated and consistent)).

(4) A utilities element
consisting of the general location, proposed location, and capacity of all
existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to, electrical
lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5) Rural element.
Counties shall include a rural element ((including lands that are not
designated for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources)).
The following provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a) Growth management
act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances vary from county to
county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and uses, a county may
consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written record explaining how
the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.

(b) Rural development.
The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry, and agriculture in
rural areas, including the development of less than ten single-family
residential units by a property owner. The rural element shall provide for
a variety of rural densities, uses, essential public facilities, and rural
governmental services needed to serve the permitted densities and uses. In
order to achieve a variety of rural densities and uses, counties may provide
for clustering, density transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements,
and other innovative techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural
densities and uses that are not characterized by urban growth and that are
consistent with rural character.

(c) Measures governing
rural development. The rural element shall include measures that apply to
rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as established
by the county, by:

(i) Containing or
otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii) Assuring visual
compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural area;

(iii) Reducing the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density
development in the rural area;

(iv) ((Protecting))
Preserving critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface
water and ground water resources; and

(v) Protecting against
conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d) Limited areas of
more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements of this
subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this subsection
(5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more intensive rural
development, including necessary public facilities and public services to serve
the limited area as follows:

(i) Rural development
consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of existing commercial,
industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline
development, villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads
developments. A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but
shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection.
An industrial area is not required to be principally designed to serve the
existing and projected rural population;

(ii) The
intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational ((or)), tourist, or residential
uses, that rely on a rural location and setting((, but that do not include
new residential development)). A small-scale recreation ((or)),
tourist, or residential use is not required to be principally designed
to serve the existing and projected rural population. Public services and
public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation
((or)), tourist, or residential use ((and shall be
provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl));

(iii) The
intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential uses
or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Public services and public facilities shall
be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated nonresidential use ((and
shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl));

(iv) A county shall
adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or uses of more
intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this subsection.
((Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the
logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new
pattern of low-density sprawl.)) Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and ((contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that)) may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The
county shall establish the ((logical)) outer boundary of an area of more
intensive rural development. In establishing the ((logical)) outer
boundary the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the character of
existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B) physical boundaries such as
bodies of water, streets and highways, and land forms and contours, (C) the
prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide
public facilities and public services ((in a manner that does not permit
low-density sprawl));

(v) For purposes of (d)
of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one that was in
existence:

(A) On July 1, 1990, in
a county that was initially required to plan under all of the provisions of
this chapter;

(B) On the date the
county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a county that is
planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2);
or

(C) On the date the
office of financial management certifies the county's population as provided in
RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of
this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e) Exception. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural area a major
industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise specifically
permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6) A transportation
element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use element.

(a) The transportation
element shall include the following subelements:

(i) Land use
assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii) Estimated traffic
impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting from land use
assumptions to assist the department of transportation in monitoring the
performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the facilities, and
to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation
facilities;

(iii) Facilities and
services needs, including:

(A) An inventory of
air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services, including
transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define existing
capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning. This
inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B) Level of service
standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes to serve as a
gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should be regionally
coordinated;

(C) For state-owned
transportation facilities, level of service standards for highways, as
prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the performance of the
system. The purposes of reflecting level of service standards for state
highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the
system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination
between the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the department of transportation's six-year investment program. The ((concurrency
requirements of)) transportation strategies adopted under (b) of
this subsection do not apply to transportation facilities and services of
statewide significance ((except for counties consisting of islands whose
only connection to the mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these
island counties, state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in
meeting the concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection));

(D) Specific actions ((and
requirements)), by using motor vehicle excise tax and gas tax funds,
for bringing into compliance locally owned transportation facilities or
services that are below an established level of service standard;

(E) Forecasts of
traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan to provide
information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future growth;

(F) Identification of
state and local system needs to meet current and future demands. Identified
needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be consistent with the
statewide multimodal transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv) Finance,
including:

(A) An analysis of
funding capability to judge needs against probable funding resources;

(B) A multiyear
financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive plan, the
appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year street,
road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems. The
multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year improvement
program developed by the department of transportation as required by RCW
47.05.030;

(C) If probable funding
falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of how additional funding
will be raised((, or how land use assumptions will be reassessed)) to
ensure that level of service standards will be met;

(v) Intergovernmental
coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts of the
transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation systems of
adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi) Demand-management
strategies.

(b) After adoption of
the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or who choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances ((which
prohibit development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards adopted
in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless transportation
improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of development are made
concurrent with the development. These)) that provide strategies that
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing programs,
demand management, and other transportation systems management strategies. ((For
the purposes of this subsection (6) "concurrent with the development"
shall mean that improvements or strategies are in place at the time of
development, or that a financial commitment is in place to complete the
improvements or strategies within six years.))

(c) The transportation
element described in this subsection (6), and the six-year plans required by
RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW 35.58.2795 for public
transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state, must be consistent.

Sec. 13. RCW 36.70A.110 and 1997
c 429 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county that is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall designate an urban
growth area or areas within which urban growth shall be encouraged ((and
outside of which growth can occur only if it is not urban in nature)).
Each city that is located in such a county shall be included within an urban
growth area. An urban growth area may include more than a single city. An
urban growth area ((may)) shall include territory that is located
outside of a city ((only if such territory already is characterized by urban
growth whether or not the urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to
territory already characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully
contained community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350)) when a county
determines that territory is necessary to provide an adequate land supply to
expand the urban growth boundaries beyond the boundaries of existing cities.
However, a county's designated urban growth areas shall be at least large
enough to accommodate all projected growth and all growth that actually
occurs. Cities and counties shall designate urban growth areas that favor
expansive delineation of these areas.

(2) ((Based upon the
growth management population projection made for the county by the office of
financial management,)) The county and each city within the county
shall include areas and densities sufficient to permit the urban growth that is
projected to occur in the county or city for the succeeding twenty-year
period. The office of financial management may be a source for which
counties base their population forecasts. Counties may add their own
calculations to the office of financial management's population projections.
Each urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall include greenbelt
and open space areas. An urban growth area determination may include a
reasonable land market supply factor and shall permit a range of urban
densities and uses. In determining this market factor, cities and counties may
consider local circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion in their
comprehensive plans to make many choices about accommodating growth.

Within one year of July
1, 1990, each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin consulting with each city located within its
boundaries and each city shall propose the location of an urban growth area.
Within sixty days of the date the county legislative authority of a county
adopts its resolution of intention or of certification by the office of
financial management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city located
within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach agreement with each city
on the location of an urban growth area within which the city is located. If
such an agreement is not reached with each city located within the urban growth
area, the county shall justify in writing why it so designated the area an
urban growth area. A city may object formally with the department over the
designation of the urban growth area within which it is located. Where
appropriate, the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including
the use of mediation services. This section is intended to establish only a
minimum standard for the size of urban growth areas. This section neither
limits the discretion of counties to include an ample land supply within urban
growth areas nor compels counties to limit or disregard existing property rights.

(3)(a) Urban
growth should be located ((first)) in areas already characterized by
urban growth that have adequate existing public facility and service capacities
to serve such development, ((second)) in areas already characterized by
urban growth that will be served adequately by a combination of both existing
public facilities and services and any additional needed public facilities and
services that are provided by either public or private sources, and ((third))
in the remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350. This chapter does not limit the common law duty of a public
utility, whether publicly or privately owned, to make service available to all
within its franchise area and within areas as to which a public utility has
held itself out as a provider of service. "Public utility," as used
in this subsection, refers to a private entity or municipal or quasi-municipal
corporation that provides electricity, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, water,
telephone, cable television, communications services, or natural gas to the
public.

(b) In addition to
(a) of this subsection, a city that provides water or sewer service outside the
corporate boundaries of the city shall not require, as a condition of providing
water or sewer service, the property owner who has requested water or sewer service
to agree to:

(i) Lot sizes
different from those required by the jurisdiction with zoning authority over
the property; or

(ii) Other
development or design requirements not required by the local government with
jurisdiction over the property.

(4) In general, cities
are the units of local government most appropriate to provide urban
governmental services. In general, it is not appropriate that urban
governmental services be extended to or expanded in rural areas except in those
limited circumstances shown to be necessary to protect basic public health and
safety and the environment and when such services are financially supportable
at rural densities ((and do not permit urban development)).

(5) On or before
October 1, 1993, each county that was initially required to plan under RCW
36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development regulations designating interim urban
growth areas under this chapter. Within three years and three months of the
date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its resolution of
intention or of certification by the office of financial management, all other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this
chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only occur after
public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and RCW 36.70A.110. Such action may be
appealed to the appropriate growth management hearings board under RCW
36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall be adopted at the time of
comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.

(6) Each county shall
include designations of urban growth areas in its comprehensive plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. (1) A county or city that
downzones any property, in the course of planning, bears the burden of proving,
by clear and convincing evidence, that the downzone is justified by reference
to the common law standards governing downzones and is indispensable to
government achieving compliance with this chapter.

(2) The standard set
forth in subsection (1) of this section applies to a downzone regardless of
whether that downzone is quasi-judicial or legislative in nature.

(3) A county or city
proposing a downzone shall give timely notice of the proceedings to each
affected property owner and shall provide each individual property owner with a
separate quasi-judicial hearing in accordance with local procedure.
Commencement of a downzone proceeding against a property owner must be by
written petition, setting forth in full detail the facts, circumstances, and
theories upon which the entity's claim is based. The county or city shall not
prove any ground for the downzone not specifically pled.

(4) A proceeding for a
downzone shall not be commenced within five years of the determination of
another downzone proceeding relating to the same property.

(5) A property owner
who prevails in a proceeding under this section shall recover reasonable attorneys'
fees, expert witness fees, and costs.

Sec. 15. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each comprehensive
land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to continuing review
and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. Not later than
September 1, 2002, and at least every ((five)) two years
thereafter, a county or city shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure that the
plan and regulations are complying with the requirements of this chapter. The
review and evaluation required by this subsection may be combined with the
review required by subsection (3) of this section.

Any amendment or
revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this chapter, and
any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and implement
the comprehensive plan.

(2)(a) Each county and
city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments or
revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the
county or city no more frequently than once every year except that amendments
may be considered more frequently under the following circumstances:

(i) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii) The adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in
chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii) The amendment of
the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently
with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county
or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that
conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with
the court.

(3) Each county that
designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, at least every
((ten)) five years, its designated urban growth area or areas,
and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated
portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the
county, each city located within an urban growth area shall review the densities
permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth
occurring within the county has located within each city and the unincorporated
portions of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating
urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by
the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the urban
growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to
occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period. The review required
by this subsection may be combined with the review and evaluation required by
RCW 36.70A.215.

Sec. 16. RCW 36.70A.140 and 1995
c 347 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county and city
that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish and
broadly disseminate to the public a public participation program identifying
procedures providing for early ((and continuous)) public participation
in the development and amendment of comprehensive land use plans and
development regulations implementing such plans. The procedures shall provide
for broad dissemination of proposals and alternatives, opportunity for written
comments, public meetings after effective notice, provision for open
discussion, communication programs, information services, and consideration of
and response to public comments. In enacting legislation in response to the
board's decision pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300 declaring part or all of a comprehensive
plan or development regulation invalid, the county or city shall provide for
public participation that is appropriate and effective under the circumstances
presented by the board's order. Errors in exact compliance with the
established program and procedures shall not render the comprehensive land use
plan or development regulations invalid if the spirit of the program and
procedures is observed.

Sec. 17. RCW 36.70A.160 and 1992
c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county and city
that is required or chooses to prepare a comprehensive land use plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall identify open space corridors within and between urban growth
areas. They shall include lands useful for recreation, wildlife habitat,
trails, and connection of critical areas as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.
Identification of a corridor under this section by a county or city shall not
restrict the use or management of lands within the corridor for agricultural or
forest purposes. Restrictions on the use or management of such lands for
agricultural or forest purposes imposed after identification solely to maintain
or enhance the value of such lands as a corridor may occur only if the county
or city acquires sufficient interest to prevent development of the lands or to
control the resource development of the lands. The requirement for acquisition
of sufficient interest does not include those corridors regulated by the interstate
commerce commission, under provisions of 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1247(d), 16 U.S.C. Sec.
1248, or 43 U.S.C. Sec. 912. ((Nothing in this section shall be interpreted
to alter the authority of the state, or a county or city, to regulate land use
activities.)) Private property shall not be taken for public use without
just compensation having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be
protected from arbitrary and discriminatory actions.

The city or county may
acquire by donation or purchase the fee simple or lesser interests in these
open space corridors using funds authorized by RCW 84.34.230 or other sources.

Sec. 18. RCW 36.70A.210 and 1998
c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes that counties are regional governments within their boundaries, and
cities are primary providers of urban governmental services within urban growth
areas. For the purposes of this section, a "countywide planning
policy" is a written policy statement or statements used solely for
establishing a countywide framework from which county and city comprehensive
plans are developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as required in
RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the
land-use powers of cities.

(2) The legislative
authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt a countywide
planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in whole or in part
within the county as follows:

(a) No later than sixty
calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority of each county that
as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
convene a meeting with representatives of each city located within the county
for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a countywide planning policy. In other counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this meeting shall be
convened no later than sixty days after the date the county adopts its
resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management.

(b) The process and
framework for adoption of a countywide planning policy specified in (a) of this
subsection shall determine the manner in which the county and the cities agree
to all procedures and provisions including but not limited to desired planning
policies, deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration
thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.

(c) If a county fails
for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of cities as required
in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately impose any appropriate
sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d) If there is no
agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or chose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no agreement within one
hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its resolution of intention
or was certified by the office of financial management in any other county that
is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first
inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department of community, trade, and
economic development to mediate any disputes that preclude agreement. If
mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that will lead to
agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or cities for failure to reach an agreement
as provided in this section. The governor shall specify the reason or reasons
for the imposition of any sanction.

(e) No later than July
1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was required or chose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months
after the date the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified
by the office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall
adopt a countywide planning policy according to the process provided under this
section and that is consistent with the agreement pursuant to (b) of this
subsection, and after holding a public hearing or hearings on the proposed
countywide planning policy.

(3) A countywide
planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a) Policies to
implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b) Policies for
promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of urban services
to such development;

(c) Policies for siting
public capital facilities of a countywide or statewide nature, including
transportation facilities of statewide significance as defined in RCW
47.06.140;

(d) Policies for
countywide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e) Policies that
consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all economic
segments of the population ((and parameters for its distribution));

(f) Policies for joint
county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g) Policies for
countywide economic development and employment; and

(h) An analysis of the
fiscal impact.

(4) Federal agencies
and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the countywide planning
policy adoption process. Adopted countywide planning policies shall be adhered
to by state agencies.

(5) Failure to adopt a
countywide planning policy that meets the requirements of this section may
result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a county or city within
the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or
sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to adopt a
countywide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are
fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a countywide planning
policy.

(6) Cities and the
governor may appeal an adopted countywide planning policy to the growth
management hearings board within sixty days of the adoption of the countywide
planning policy.

(7) Multicounty
planning policies shall be adopted by two or more counties, each with a
population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with contiguous urban areas
and may be adopted by other counties, according to the process established
under this section or other processes agreed to among the counties and cities
within the affected counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec. 19. RCW 36.70A.350 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

A county required or
choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 may establish a process as part of its
urban growth areas, that are designated under RCW 36.70A.110, for reviewing
proposals to authorize new fully contained communities located outside of the
initially designated urban growth areas.

(1) A new fully
contained community may be approved in a county planning under this chapter if
criteria including but not limited to the following are met:

(a) New infrastructure
is provided for ((and impact fees are established consistent with the
requirements of RCW 82.02.050));

(b) Transit-oriented
site planning and traffic demand management programs are implemented;

(c) Buffers are
provided between the new fully contained communities and adjacent urban
development;

(d) A mix of uses is
provided to offer jobs, housing, and services to the residents of the new
community;

(e) Affordable housing
is provided within the new community for a broad range of income levels;

(f) Environmental
protection has been addressed and provided for;

(g) Development
regulations are established to ensure urban growth will not occur in adjacent
nonurban areas;

(h) Provision is made
to mitigate impacts on designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral
resource lands;

(i) The plan for the
new fully contained community is consistent with the development regulations
established for the protection of critical areas by the county pursuant to RCW
36.70A.170.

(2) New fully contained
communities may be approved outside established urban growth areas only if a
county reserves a portion of the twenty-year population projection and offsets
the urban growth area accordingly for allocation to new fully contained
communities that meet the requirements of this chapter. Any county electing to
establish a new community reserve shall do so no more often than once every
five years as a part of the designation or review of urban growth areas
required by this chapter. The new community reserve shall be allocated on a
project-by-project basis, only after specific project approval procedures have
been adopted pursuant to this chapter as a development regulation. When a new
community reserve is established, urban growth areas designated pursuant to
this chapter shall accommodate the unreserved portion of the twenty-year
population projection.

Final approval of an
application for a new fully contained community shall be considered an adopted
amendment to the comprehensive plan prepared pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070
designating the new fully contained community as an urban growth area.

Sec. 20. RCW 36.70A.370 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state attorney
general shall establish by October 1, 1991, an orderly, consistent process,
including a checklist if appropriate, that better enables state agencies and
local governments to evaluate proposed regulatory or administrative actions to
assure that such actions do not result in an unconstitutional taking of private
property. It is not the purpose of this section to ((expand or)) reduce
the scope of private property protections provided in the state and federal
Constitutions. The attorney general shall review and update the process at
least on an annual basis to maintain consistency with changes in case law.

(2) Local governments
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and state agencies
shall utilize the process established by subsection (1) of this section to
assure that proposed regulatory or administrative actions do not result in an
unconstitutional taking of private property.

(3) The attorney
general, in consultation with the Washington state bar association, shall
develop a continuing education course to implement this section.

(((4) The process
used by government agencies shall be protected by attorney client privilege.
Nothing in this section grants a private party the right to seek judicial
relief requiring compliance with the provisions of this section.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. It is necessary that the
procedures established in this chapter ensure that all applicable permit
processes, approvals, and reviews are processed concurrently, rather than
consecutively. The lead environmental agency or counties and cities shall
establish by rule or ordinance an expedited appeals process by which an
applicant may appeal any failure by any permit agency, county, or city to take
timely action on the issuance or denial of a permit or land-use approval or
subdivision of land in accordance with the time limits established under this
chapter. If the decision maker finds that the time limits under appeal have
been violated without good cause, the decision maker shall establish a date
certain by which the permit agency shall act on the permit application and provide
for the full reimbursement of any filing or permit processing fees paid by the
applicant to the local government or agency for the permit application under
appeal.

Sec. 22. RCW 36.70A.390 and 1992
c 207 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A county or city
governing body that adopts a moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning
ordinance, or interim official control without holding a public hearing on the
proposed moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim
official control, shall hold a public hearing on the adopted moratorium,
interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or interim official control
within at least sixty days of its adoption, whether or not the governing body
received a recommendation on the matter from the planning commission or
department. If the governing body does not adopt findings of fact justifying
its action before this hearing, then the governing body shall do so immediately
after this public hearing. A moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning
ordinance, or interim official control adopted under this section may be
effective for not longer than six months, but may be effective for up to one
year if a work plan is developed for related studies providing for such a
longer period. A moratorium, interim zoning map, interim zoning ordinance, or
interim official control may be renewed for one or more six-month periods if a
subsequent public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior to each
renewal.

This section does not
apply to the designation of ((critical areas,)) agricultural lands,
forest lands, and mineral resource lands, under RCW 36.70A.170, and the
conservation of these lands and protection of these areas under RCW 36.70A.060,
prior to such actions being taken in a comprehensive plan adopted under RCW
36.70A.070 and implementing development regulations adopted under RCW
36.70A.120, if a public hearing is held on such proposed actions.

Sec. 23. RCW 76.09.050 and 1997 c
173 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
establish by rule which forest practices shall be included within each of the
following classes:

Class I: Minimal or
specific forest practices that have no direct potential for damaging a public
resource and that may be conducted without submitting an application or a
notification except that when the regulating authority is transferred to a
local governmental entity, those Class I forest practices that involve timber
harvesting or road construction within "urban growth areas,"
designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, are processed as Class IV forest
practices, but are not subject to environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;

Class II: Forest
practices which have a less than ordinary potential for damaging a public
resource that may be conducted without submitting an application and may begin
five calendar days, or such lesser time as the department may determine, after
written notification by the operator, in the manner, content, and form as
prescribed by the department, is received by the department. However, the work
may not begin until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have
been received by the department. Class II shall not include forest practices:

(a) On lands platted
after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW or on lands that have
or are being converted to another use;

(b) Which require
approvals under the provisions of the hydraulics act, RCW ((75.20.100)) 77.55.100;

(c) Within
"shorelines of the state" as defined in RCW 90.58.030;

(d) Excluded from Class
II by the board; or

(e) Including timber
harvesting or road construction within "urban growth areas,"
designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, which are Class IV;

Class III: Forest
practices other than those contained in Class I, II, or IV. A Class III
application must be approved or disapproved by the department within thirty
calendar days from the date the department receives the application. However,
the applicant may not begin work on that forest practice until all forest
practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have been received by the
department;

Class IV: Forest
practices other than those contained in Class I or II: (a) On lands platted
after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW, (b) on lands that have
or are being converted to another use, (c) on lands which, pursuant to RCW
76.09.070 ((as now or hereafter amended)), are not to be reforested
because of the likelihood of future conversion to urban development, (d) except
on those lands involving timber harvesting or road construction on lands that
are contained within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW, where the forest landowner provides: (i) A written
statement of intent signed by the forest landowner not to convert to a use
other than commercial forest product operations for ten years, accompanied by
either a written forest management plan acceptable to the department or documentation
that the land is enrolled under the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW; or (ii) a
conversion option harvest plan approved by the local governmental entity and
submitted to the department as part of the application, and/or (e) which have a
potential for a substantial impact on the environment and therefore require an
evaluation by the department as to whether or not a detailed statement must be
prepared pursuant to the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.
Such evaluation shall be made within ten days from the date the department
receives the application: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to
prevent any local or regional governmental entity from determining that a
detailed statement must be prepared for an action pursuant to a Class IV forest
practice taken by that governmental entity concerning the land on which forest
practices will be conducted. A Class IV application must be approved or
disapproved by the department within thirty calendar days from the date the
department receives the application, unless the department determines that a
detailed statement must be made, in which case the application must be approved
or disapproved by the department within sixty calendar days from the date the
department receives the application, unless the commissioner of public lands,
through the promulgation of a formal order, determines that the process cannot
be completed within such period. However, the applicant may not begin work on
that forest practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW
76.09.065 have been received by the department.

Forest practices under
Classes I, II, and III are exempt from the requirements for preparation of a
detailed statement under the state environmental policy act.

(2) Except for those
forest practices being regulated by local governmental entities as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, no Class II, Class III, or Class IV forest practice
shall be commenced or continued after January 1, 1975, unless the department
has received a notification with regard to a Class II forest practice or
approved an application with regard to a Class III or Class IV forest practice
containing all information required by RCW 76.09.060 ((as now or hereafter
amended)). However, in the event forest practices regulations necessary
for the scheduled implementation of this chapter and RCW 90.48.420 have not
been adopted in time to meet such schedules, the department shall have the
authority to regulate forest practices and approve applications on such terms
and conditions consistent with this chapter and RCW 90.48.420 and the purposes
and policies of RCW 76.09.010 until applicable forest practices regulations are
in effect.

(3) Except for those
forest practices being regulated by local governmental entities as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, if a notification or application is delivered in
person to the department by the operator or the operator's agent, the
department shall immediately provide a dated receipt thereof. In all other
cases, the department shall immediately mail a dated receipt to the operator.

(4) Except for those
forest practices being regulated by local governmental entities as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, forest practices shall be conducted in accordance
with the forest practices regulations, orders and directives as authorized by
this chapter or the forest practices regulations, and the terms and conditions
of any approved applications.

(5) Except for those
forest practices being regulated by local governmental entities as provided
elsewhere in this chapter, the department of natural resources shall notify the
applicant in writing of either its approval of the application or its
disapproval of the application and the specific manner in which the application
fails to comply with the provisions of this section or with the forest
practices regulations. Except as provided otherwise in this section, if the
department fails to either approve or disapprove an application or any portion
thereof within the applicable time limit, the application shall be deemed
approved and the operation may be commenced: PROVIDED, That this provision
shall not apply to applications which are neither approved nor disapproved
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That if seasonal field conditions prevent the department from being
able to properly evaluate the application, the department may issue an approval
conditional upon further review within sixty days: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
department shall have until April 1, 1975, to approve or disapprove an
application involving forest practices allowed to continue to April 1, 1975,
under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. Upon receipt of any
notification or any satisfactorily completed application the department shall
in any event no later than two business days after such receipt transmit a copy
to the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife, and to the county, city,
or town in whose jurisdiction the forest practice is to be commenced. Any
comments by such agencies shall be directed to the department of natural
resources.

(6) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, if the county, city, or
town believes that an application is inconsistent with this chapter, the forest
practices regulations, or any local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 ((as
now or hereafter amended)), it may so notify the department and the
applicant, specifying its objections.

(7) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, the department shall not
approve portions of applications to which a county, city, or town objects if:

(a) The department
receives written notice from the county, city, or town of such objections
within fourteen business days from the time of transmittal of the application
to the county, city, or town, or one day before the department acts on the
application, whichever is later; and

(b) The objections
relate to lands either:

(i) Platted after
January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW; or

(ii) On lands that have
or are being converted to another use.

The department shall
either disapprove those portions of such application or appeal the county,
city, or town objections to the appeals board. If the objections related to
subparagraphs (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection are based on local authority
consistent with RCW 76.09.240 ((as now or hereafter amended)), the
department shall disapprove the application until such time as the county,
city, or town consents to its approval or such disapproval is reversed on
appeal. The applicant shall be a party to all department appeals of county,
city, or town objections. Unless the county, city, or town either consents or
has waived its rights under this subsection, the department shall not approve portions
of an application affecting such lands until the minimum time for county, city,
or town objections has expired.

(8) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, in addition to any rights
under the above paragraph, the county, city, or town may appeal any department
approval of an application with respect to any lands within its jurisdiction.
The appeals board may suspend the department's approval in whole or in part
pending such appeal where there exists potential for immediate and material
damage to a public resource.

(9) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, appeals under this section
shall be made to the appeals board in the manner and time provided in RCW
76.09.220(8). In such appeals there shall be no presumption of correctness of
either the county, city, or town or the department position.

(10) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, the department shall,
within four business days notify the county, city, or town of all
notifications, approvals, and disapprovals of an application affecting lands
within the county, city, or town, except to the extent the county, city, or
town has waived its right to such notice.

(11) For those forest
practices regulated by the board and the department, a county, city, or town
may waive in whole or in part its rights under this section, and may withdraw
or modify any such waiver, at any time by written notice to the department.

(12) This section
does not apply to land development proceeding under Title 36 RCW.

(13) For the
purposes of this section, "land development" means the division or
platting of land in preparation for development or the actual building,
constructing, or erecting of residences or commercial buildings.

Sec. 24. RCW 36.70B.010 and 1995
c 347 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
and declares the following:

(1) As the number of
environmental laws and development regulations has increased for land uses and
development, so has the number of required local land use permits, each with
its own separate approval process.

(2) The increasing
number of local and state land use permits and separate environmental review
processes required by agencies has generated continuing potential for conflict,
overlap, and duplication between the various permit and review processes.

(3) This regulatory
burden has significantly added to the cost and time needed to obtain local and
state land use permits and has made it difficult for the public to know how and
when to provide timely comments on land use proposals that require multiple
permits and have separate environmental review processes.

(4) The legislature
therefore finds minimizing lengthy, costly, and burdensome appeals and permit
processes to be of great importance as well as to promote clear vesting of
property and development rights.

Sec. 25. RCW 36.70B.020 and 1995
c 347 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1) "Closed record
appeal" means an administrative appeal on the record to a local government
body or officer, including the legislative body, following an open record
hearing on a project permit application when the appeal is on the record with
no or limited new evidence or information allowed to be submitted and only
appeal argument allowed.

(2) "Local
government" means a county, city, or town.

(3) "Open record
hearing" means a hearing, conducted by a single hearing body or officer
authorized by the local government to conduct such hearings, that creates the
local government's record through testimony and submission of evidence and
information, under procedures prescribed by the local government by ordinance
or resolution. ((An open record hearing may be held prior to a local
government's decision on a project permit to be known as an "open record
predecision hearing." An open record hearing may be held on an appeal, to
be known as an "open record appeal hearing," if no open record
predecision hearing has been held on the project permit.))

(4) "Project
permit" ((or "project permit application")) means any
land use or environmental permit or license required from a local government
for a project action, including ((but not limited to)) building permits,
subdivisions, binding site plans, planned unit developments, conditional uses,
shoreline substantial development permits, and site plan review((,
permits or approvals required by critical area ordinances, site-specific
rezones)) authorized by a comprehensive plan ((or subarea plan, but
excluding the adoption or amendment of a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, or
development regulations except as otherwise specifically included in this
subsection)).

(5) "Public
meeting" means an informal meeting, hearing, workshop, or other public
gathering of people to obtain comments from the public or other agencies on a
proposed project permit prior to the local government’s decision. A public
meeting ((may include, but)) is ((not)) limited to((, a design
review or architectural control board meeting, a special review district or
community council meeting, or)) a scoping meeting on a draft environmental
impact statement. A public meeting does not include an open record hearing.
The proceedings at a public meeting may be recorded and a report ((or
recommendation)) may be included in the local government’s project permit
application file.

(6) "Separate
approval process" means a distinct permit or review process required by
state, local, or other agencies, including but not limited to land use permits
and environmental reviews.

Sec. 26. RCW 36.70B.040 and 1997
c 429 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A proposed
project's consistency with a local government's development regulations adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW, or, in the absence of applicable development
regulations, the appropriate elements of the comprehensive plan adopted under
chapter 36.70A RCW shall be decided by the local government during project
review by consideration of:

(a) The type of land
use;

(b) The level of
development, such as units per acre or other measures of density; and

(c) Infrastructure,
including public facilities and services needed to serve the development((;
and

(d) The
characteristics of the development, such as development standards)).

(2) ((In deciding
whether a project is consistent, the determinations made pursuant to RCW
36.70B.030(2) shall be controlling.

(3))) For purposes of this section, the term
"consistency" shall include all terms used in ((this chapter and))
chapter 36.70A RCW to refer to performance in accordance with ((this chapter
and)) chapter 36.70A RCW((, including but not limited to compliance,
conformity, and consistency.

(4) Nothing in this
section requires documentation, dictates an agency's procedures for considering
consistency, or limits a city or county from asking more specific or related
questions with respect to any of the four main categories listed in subsection
(1)(a) through (d) of this section.

(5) The department
of community, trade, and economic development is authorized to develop and
adopt by rule criteria to assist local governments planning under RCW
36.70A.040 to analyze the consistency of project actions. These criteria shall
be jointly developed with the department of ecology)).

Sec. 27. RCW 36.70B.060 and 1995
c 347 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

Not later than March 31,
1996, each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish by
ordinance or resolution an integrated and consolidated project permit process
that ((may)) shall be included in its development regulations.
((In addition to the elements required by RCW 36.70B.050,)) The
process shall include the following elements:

(1) A determination of
completeness to the applicant as required by ((RCW 36.70B.070)) each
separate approval process;

(2) A notice of
application to the public and agencies with jurisdiction ((as required by
RCW 36.70B.110));

(3) Except as provided
in RCW 36.70B.140, an optional consolidated project permit review process as
provided in RCW 36.70B.120. The review process shall provide for no more than
one consolidated open record hearing and one closed record appeal((. If an
open record predecision hearing is provided prior to the decision on a project
permit, the process shall not allow a subsequent open record appeal hearing));

(4) Provision allowing
for any required public meeting or required open record hearing to be
combined with any ((public meeting or)) open record hearing that may be
held on the project by another local((,)) or state((,
regional, federal, or other)) agency, in accordance with provisions of RCW
((36.70B.090 and)) 36.70B.110;

(5) ((A single
report stating all the decisions made as of the date of the report on all
project permits included in the consolidated permit process that do not require
an open record predecision hearing and any recommendations on project permits
that do not require an open record predecision hearing. The report shall state
any mitigation required or proposed under the development regulations or the
agency's authority under RCW 43.21C.060. The report may be the local permit. If
a threshold determination other than a determination of significance has not
been issued previously by the local government, the report shall include or
append this determination;

(6) Except for the
appeal of a determination of significance as provided in RCW 43.21C.075, if a
local government elects to provide an appeal of its threshold determinations or
project permit decisions, the local government shall provide for no more than
one consolidated open record hearing on such appeal. The local government need
not provide for any further appeal and may provide an appeal for some but not
all project permit decisions. If an appeal is provided after the open record
hearing, it shall be a closed record appeal before a single decision-making
body or officer;

(7))) A notice of decision as required by RCW
36.70B.130 ((and issued within the time period provided in RCW 36.70B.080
and 36.70B.090));

(((8))) (6)
Completion of project review by the local government, including environmental
review and public review and any appeals to the local government((, within
any applicable time periods under RCW 36.70B.090)); and

(((9))) (7)
Any other provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter or
chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec. 28. RCW 36.70B.070 and 1995
c 347 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within twenty-eight
days after receiving a project permit application, a local government planning
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall mail or provide in person a written determination
to the applicant, stating either:

(a) That the
application is complete; or

(b) That the
application is incomplete and what is necessary to make the application
complete.

To the extent known by
the local government, the local government shall identify other agencies of
local, state, or federal governments that may have jurisdiction over some
aspect of the application.

(2) A project permit
application is complete ((for purposes of this section)) when it meets
the procedural submission requirements of the local government and is
sufficient for continued processing even though additional information may be
((required)) requested or project modifications may be undertaken
subsequently. ((The determination of completeness shall not preclude the
local government from requesting additional information or studies either at
the time of the notice of completeness or subsequently if new information is
required or substantial changes in the proposed action occur.

(3) The
determination of completeness may include the following as optional
information:

(a) A preliminary
determination of those development regulations that will be used for project
mitigation;

(b) A preliminary
determination of consistency, as provided under RCW 36.70B.040; or

(c) Other
information the local government chooses to include.

(4))) Additional requested information shall be
of a clarifying nature and based on requirements of the underlying development
regulations.

(3)(a) An
application shall be deemed complete ((under this section)) if the local
government does not provide a written determination to the applicant that the
application is incomplete as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(b) Within fourteen
days after an applicant has submitted to a local government additional
information identified by the local government as being necessary for a
complete application, the local government shall notify the applicant whether
the application is complete or what ((additional)) information ((is
necessary)) was not included under the original written determination
provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Sec. 29. RCW 36.70B.110 and 1997
c 429 s 48 and 1997 c 396 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) Not later than
April 1, 1996, a local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall provide a
notice of application to the public and the departments and agencies with
jurisdiction as provided in this section. If a local government has made a
threshold determination under chapter 43.21C RCW concurrently with the notice
of application, the notice of application may be combined with the threshold
determination and the scoping notice for a determination of significance.
Nothing in this section prevents a determination of significance and scoping
notice from being issued prior to the notice of application. Nothing in this
section or this chapter prevents a lead agency, when it is a project proponent
or is funding a project, from conducting its review under chapter 43.21C RCW or
from allowing appeals of procedural determinations prior to submitting a
project permit application.

(2) The notice of
application shall be provided within fourteen days after the determination of
completeness as provided in RCW 36.70B.070 and, except as limited by the
provisions of subsection (((4))) (3)(b) of this section, shall
include the following in whatever sequence or format the local government deems
appropriate:

(a) The date of
application, the date of the notice of completion for the application, and the
date of the notice of application;

(b) A description of
the proposed project action and a list of the project permits included in the
application ((and, if applicable, a list of any studies requested under RCW
36.70B.070 or 36.70B.090));

(c) The identification
of other permits not included in the application ((to the extent known by
the local government));

(d) The identification
of existing environmental documents that evaluate the proposed project, and, if
not otherwise stated on the document providing the notice of application, such
as a city land use bulletin, the location where the application and any studies
can be reviewed;

(e) A statement of the
public comment period, which shall be not less than fourteen nor more than
thirty days following the date of notice of application, and statements of the
right of any person to comment on the application, receive notice of and
participate in any hearings, request a copy of the decision once made, and any
appeal rights. A local government may accept public comments at any time ((prior
to the closing of the record of an open record predecision hearing, if any, or,
if no open record predecision hearing is provided,)) prior to the decision
on the project permit;

(f) The date, time,
place, and type of hearing, if applicable and scheduled at the date of notice
of the application; and

(g) A statement of ((the
preliminary determination, if one has been made at the time of notice, of))
those development regulations that will be used for project mitigation ((and
of consistency as provided in RCW 36.70B.030(2); and

(h) Any other
information determined appropriate by the local government.

(3) If an open
record predecision hearing is required for the requested project permits, the
notice of application shall be provided at least fifteen days prior to the open
record hearing.

(4))) required in chapter 43.21C RCW.

(3) A local
government shall use reasonable methods to give the notice of application to
the public and agencies with jurisdiction and ((may)) shall use
its existing notice procedures. ((A local government may use different
types of notice for different categories of project permits or types of project
actions. If a local government by resolution or ordinance does not specify its
method of public notice, the local government shall use the methods provided
for in (a) and (b) of this subsection. Examples of reasonable methods to
inform the public are:

(a) Posting the
property for site-specific proposals;

(b) Publishing
notice, including at least the project location, description, type of permit(s)
required, comment period dates, and location where the notice of application
required by subsection (2) of this section and the complete application may be
reviewed, in the newspaper of general circulation in the general area where the
proposal is located or in a local land use newsletter published by the local government;

(c) Notifying public
or private groups with known interest in a certain proposal or in the type of
proposal being considered;

(d) Notifying the
news media;

(e) Placing notices
in appropriate regional or neighborhood newspapers or trade journals;

(f) Publishing
notice in agency newsletters or sending notice to agency mailing lists, either
general lists or lists for specific proposals or subject areas; and

(g) Mailing to
neighboring property owners.

(5))) (4) A notice of application shall not
be required for project permits that are categorically exempt under chapter
43.21C RCW((, unless an open record predecision hearing is required or an
open record appeal hearing is allowed on the project permit decision)).

(((6))) (5)
A local government shall integrate the permit procedures in this section with
its environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW as follows:

(a) Except for a
threshold determination and except as otherwise expressly allowed in this
section, the local government may not issue until the expiration of the public
comment period on the notice of application.

(b) ((If an open
record predecision hearing is required, the local government shall issue its
threshold determination at least fifteen days prior to the open record
predecision hearing.

(c))) Comments shall be as specific as possible.

(((d))) (c)
A local government is not required to provide for administrative appeals of its
threshold determination. If provided, an administrative appeal shall be filed
within fourteen days after notice that the determination has been made and is
appealable. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, the appeal
hearing on a determination of nonsignificance shall be consolidated with any
open record hearing on the project permit.

(((7))) (6)
At the request of the applicant, a local government ((may)) shall
combine any hearing on a project permit with any hearing that may be held by
another local((,)) or state((, regional, federal, or other))
agency((,)) if((:

(a))) the hearing is held within the
geographic boundary of the local government((; and

(b) The joint
hearing can be held within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70B.090 or the
applicant agrees to the schedule in the event that additional time is needed in
order to combine the hearings)).
All agencies of the state of Washington, including municipal corporations and
counties participating in a combined hearing, are hereby authorized to issue
joint hearing notices and develop a joint format, select a mutually acceptable
hearing body or officer, and take such other actions as may be necessary to
hold joint hearings consistent with each of their respective statutory
obligations.

(((8))) (7)
All state and local agencies shall cooperate to the fullest extent possible
with the local government in holding a joint hearing if requested to do so, as
long as:

(a) The agency is not
expressly prohibited by statute from doing so;

(b) Sufficient notice
of the hearing is given to meet each of the agencies' adopted notice
requirements as set forth in statute, ordinance, or rule; and

(c) The agency has
received the necessary information about the proposed project from the
applicant to hold its hearing at the same time as the local government hearing.

(((9))) (8)
A local government is not required to provide for administrative appeals. If
provided, an administrative appeal of the project decision and of any
environmental determination issued at the same time as the project decision,
shall be filed within fourteen days after the notice of the decision or after
other notice that the decision has been made and is appealable. The local
government shall extend the appeal period for an additional seven days, if
state or local rules adopted pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW allow public
comment on a determination of nonsignificance issued as part of the appealable
project permit decision.

(((10))) (9)
The applicant for a project permit is deemed to be a participant in any comment
period, open record hearing, or closed record appeal.

(((11))) (10)
Each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt procedures for
administrative interpretation of its development regulations.

Sec. 30. RCW 36.70B.120 and 1995
c 347 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each local
government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish a permit review
process that provides for the integrated and consolidated review and decision
on two or more project permits relating to a proposed project action, including
a single application review and approval process covering all project permits
requested by an applicant for all or part of a project action and a designated
permit coordinator. If an applicant elects the consolidated permit review
process, the determination of completeness, notice of application, and notice
of final decision must include all project permits being reviewed through the
consolidated permit review process.

(2) Consolidated permit
review may provide different procedures for different categories of project
permits, but if a project action requires project permits from more than one
category, the local government shall provide for consolidated permit review
with a single open record hearing and no more than one closed record appeal as
provided in RCW 36.70B.060. Each local government shall determine which
project permits are subject to an open record hearing and a closed record
appeal. Examples of categories of project permits include but are not limited
to:

(a) Proposals that are
categorically exempt from chapter 43.21C RCW, such as construction permits,
that do not require environmental review or public notice;

(b) Permits that
require environmental review((, but no open record predecision hearing));
and

(c) Permits that
require a threshold determination and an open record predecision hearing and
may provide for a closed record appeal to a hearing body or officer or to the
local government legislative body.

(3) A local government
may provide by ordinance or resolution for the same or a different decision
maker or hearing body or officer for different categories of project permits.
In the case of consolidated project permit review, the local government shall
specify which decision makers shall make the decision or recommendation,
conduct the hearing, or decide the appeal to ensure that consolidated permit
review occurs as provided in this section. The consolidated permit review may
combine an open record predecision hearing on one or more permits with an open
record appeal hearing on other permits. In such cases, the local government by
ordinance or resolution shall specify which project permits, if any, shall be
subject to a closed record appeal.

Sec. 31. RCW 36.70B.130 and 1996
c 254 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A local government
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall provide a notice of decision that also
includes a statement of any threshold determination made under chapter 43.21C
RCW and the procedures for administrative appeal, if any. The notice of
decision may be a copy of the report or decision on the project permit
application. The notice shall be provided to the applicant and to any person
who, prior to the rendering of the decision, requested notice of the decision
or submitted substantive comments on the application. The local government
shall provide for notice of its decision as provided in RCW 36.70B.110(((4)))
(3), which shall also state that affected property owners may request a
change in valuation for property tax purposes notwithstanding any program of
revaluation. The local government shall provide notice of decision to the
county assessor's office of the county or counties in which the property is
situated.

Sec. 32. RCW 36.70B.140 and 1995
c 347 s 418 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A local government
by ordinance or resolution ((may)) shall exclude the following
project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 ((through 36.70B.090)),
36.70B.070, and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Landmark designations,
street vacations, or other approvals relating to the use of public areas or
facilities, or other project permits, whether administrative or quasi-judicial,
that the local government by ordinance or resolution has determined present
special circumstances that warrant a review process different from that
provided in RCW 36.70B.060 ((through 36.70B.090)), 36.70B.070,
and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130.

(2) A local government
by ordinance or resolution also ((may)) shall exclude the
following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 and 36.70B.110
through 36.70B.130: Lot line or boundary adjustments and building and other
construction permits, or similar administrative approvals, categorically exempt
from environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW, or for which environmental
review has been completed in connection with other project permits.

Sec. 33. RCW 36.70B.160 and 1995
c 347 s 420 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each local
government ((is encouraged to)) shall adopt further project
review provisions to ((provide prompt, coordinated review and)) ensure
accountability to applicants and the public((, including)) and provide
expedited, coordinated review ((for project permit applications))
for projects that are consistent with adopted development regulations ((and
within the capacity of system-wide infrastructure improvements)).

(2) Nothing in this
chapter is intended or shall be construed to prevent a local government from ((requiring))
allowing a preapplication conference or a public ((meeting)) hearing
by rule, ordinance, or resolution.

(3) Each local
government shall adopt procedures to monitor and enforce permit decisions and
conditions.

(4) Nothing in this
chapter modifies any independent statutory authority for a government agency to
appeal a project permit issued by a local government.

Sec. 34. RCW 36.70B.170 and 1995
c 347 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A local government
may enter into a development agreement with a person having ownership or
control of real property within its jurisdiction. A city may enter into a
development agreement for real property outside its boundaries as part of a
proposed annexation or a service agreement. A development agreement must set
forth the development standards and other provisions that shall apply to and
govern and vest the development, use, and mitigation of the development of the
real property for the duration specified in the agreement. A development
agreement shall be consistent with applicable development regulations adopted
by a local government planning under chapter 36.70A RCW.

(2) RCW 36.70B.170
through 36.70B.190 and section 501, chapter 347, Laws of 1995 do not affect the
validity of a contract rezone, concomitant agreement, annexation agreement, or
other agreement in existence on July 23, 1995, or adopted under separate
authority, that includes some or all of the development standards provided in
subsection (3) of this section.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "development standards" includes, but is not limited
to:

(a) Project elements
such as permitted uses, residential densities, and nonresidential densities and
intensities or building sizes;

(b) The amount and
payment of impact fees imposed or agreed to in accordance with any applicable
provisions of state law, any reimbursement provisions, other financial
contributions by the property owner, inspection fees, or dedications;

(c) Mitigation
measures, development conditions, and other requirements under chapter 43.21C
RCW;

(d) Design standards
such as maximum heights, setbacks, drainage and water quality requirements,
landscaping, and other development features;

(e) Affordable housing;

(f) Parks and open
space preservation;

(g) Phasing;

(h) Review procedures
and standards for implementing decisions;

(i) A build-out or
vesting period for applicable standards; and

(j) Any other
appropriate development requirement or procedure.

(4) The execution of a
development agreement is a proper exercise of county and city police power and
contract authority. A development agreement may obligate a party to fund or
provide services, infrastructure, or other facilities. The execution of a
development agreement may not be deemed an admission by the person having
ownership or control of real property that such execution is a voluntary act.
A development agreement shall reserve authority to impose new or different
regulations to the extent required by a serious threat to public health and
safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 36.70B.030 (Project review--Required
elements--Limitations) and 1995 c 347 s 404;

(2) RCW 36.70B.080 (Development
regulations--Requirements) and 1995 c 347 s 410, 1995 c 347 s 409, & 1994 c
257 s 3; and

(3) 1998 c 286 s 9 & 1995
c 347 s 411 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. Sections 4 through 9, 14,
and 21 of this act are each added to chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 39. This act is remedial in
nature and applies retroactively to July 1, 1990, and thereafter.

---
END ---