BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
10.14.020 and 1999 c 27 s 4 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions

_7 in this section apply throughout this chapter.

_8 (1) "Unlawful harassment" means a knowing
and willful course of

_9 conduct directed at a specific person which seriously
alarms,

10 annoys, harasses, or is detrimental to such person, and
which

11 serves no legitimate or lawful purpose. The course of
conduct shall

12 be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer
substantial

13 emotional distress, and shall actually cause substantial
emotional

14 distress to the petitioner, or, when the course of
conduct ((is

15 contact by a person over age eighteen that))
would cause a

16 reasonable parent to fear for the well-being of their
child.

17 (2) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of
conduct composed of

18 a series of acts over a period of time, however short,
evidencing

p. 1 SB
5842

_1 a continuity of purpose. "Course of conduct"
includes, in addition

_2 to any other form of communication, contact, or conduct,
the

_3 sending of an electronic communication.
Constitutionally protected

_4 activity is not included within the meaning of
"course of

_5 conduct."

_6 Sec. 2. RCW
10.14.040 and 1995 c 292 s 2 and 1995 c 127 s 2 are

_7 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

_8 There shall exist an action known as a petition for
an order

_9 for protection in cases of unlawful harassment.

10 (1) A petition for relief shall allege the existence
of

11 harassment and shall be accompanied by an affidavit made
under

12 oath stating the specific facts and circumstances from
which

13 relief is sought.

14 (2) A petition for relief may be made regardless of
whether or

15 not there is a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or
other

16 action between the parties.

17 (3) All court clerks' offices shall make available
simplified

18 forms and instructional brochures. Any assistance or
information

19 provided by clerks under this section does not
constitute the

20 practice of law and clerks are not responsible for
incorrect

21 information contained in a petition.

22 (4) Filing fees are set in RCW 36.18.020, but no
filing fee may

23 be charged for a petition filed in an existing action or
under an

24 existing cause number brought under this chapter in the

25 jurisdiction where the relief is sought. Forms and
instructional

26 brochures shall be provided free of charge.

27 (5) A person is not required to post a bond to
obtain relief in

28 any proceeding under this section.

29 (6) The parent or guardian of a child under age
eighteen may

30 petition for an order of protection to restrain a person
((over

31 age eighteen)) from contact with that child upon
a showing that

32 contact with the person to be enjoined is detrimental to
the

33 welfare of the child.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5842 p. 2