BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.502 and 1998 c
213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the
person drives a vehicle within this state:

(a) And the person has,
within two hours after driving, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as
shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b) While the person is
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or

(c) While the person is
under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any
drug.

(2) The fact that a
person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use
a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against a
charge of violating this section.

(3) It is an
affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section which
the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of driving and before
the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the
defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.08 or more within two hours after
driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the
defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in
the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4) Analyses of blood
or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged driving may be
used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged driving, a person had an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration
above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or
affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section.

(5) A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor punishable pursuant to RCW 46.61.5055 except
that a person is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW
if the person drives while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug as defined by this section and has previously been convicted of driving or
being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug on two or more prior occasions within a seven-year period,
or the person has a previous conviction of felony driving or being in actual
physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), or vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520).

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.504 and 1998 c
213 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person has actual physical
control of a vehicle within this state:

(a) And the person has,
within two hours after being in actual physical control of the vehicle, an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b) While the person is
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or

(c) While the person is
under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any
drug.

(2) The fact that a
person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use
a drug under the laws of this state does not constitute a defense against any
charge of violating this section. No person may be convicted under this
section if, prior to being pursued by a law enforcement officer, the person has
moved the vehicle safely off the roadway.

(3) It is an
affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section which
the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of being in actual
physical control of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of
the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to
be 0.08 or more within two hours after being in such control. The court shall
not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the
prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the
defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4) Analyses of blood
or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged being in
actual physical control of a vehicle may be used as evidence that within two
hours of the alleged being in such control, a person had an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration
above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or
affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section.

(5) A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor punishable pursuant to RCW 46.61.5055 except
that a person is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW
if the person is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by this section and has
been previously convicted of being in physical control of a motor vehicle or
driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug on two or more occasions within a seven-year period, or the person has a
previous conviction of felony driving or being in actual physical control while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), or vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520).

Sec. 3. RCW 46.61.5055 and 1999
c 324 s 5, 1999 c 274 s 6, and 1999 c 5 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person who is convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within
seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of
the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that
the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial
risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not
less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than two days nor more than one year. Two consecutive days of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may order not
less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay
the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which
the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2) Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person who is convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within
seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed
shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic
home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Five
hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment for
not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment
and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of not
less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five thousand dollars.
Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3) A person who is
convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two or more
prior offenses within seven years, or who has a previous conviction of
felony driving or being in actual physical control while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), or
vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), is guilty of a class C felony and shall
be punished ((as follows:

(a) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i) By imprisonment
for not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one hundred twenty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and
one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of
not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. One
thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b) In the case of a
person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of
the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is
no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) By imprisonment
for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one year and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. One hundred
twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum
sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension
or deferral is based; and

(ii) By a fine of
not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720)) pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4) In exercising its
discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the
court shall particularly consider the following:

(a) Whether the
person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or
damage to another or another's property; and

(b) Whether the person
was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers at
the time of the offense.

(5) An offender
punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment and
treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6) The license,
permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs must:

(a) If the person's
alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the
person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test
result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has
been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or denied by the
department for ninety days;

(ii) Where there has
been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for two years; or

(iii) Where there have
been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for three years;

(b) If the person's
alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or if by reason of the person's
refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i) Where there has
been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for one year;

(ii) Where there has
been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for nine hundred days; or

(iii) Where there have
been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the
department for four years.

For purposes of this
subsection, the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under
RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.

(7) After expiration of
any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license,
permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall place
the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW
46.20.355.

(8)(a) In addition to
any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section,
whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court shall also
suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding
five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i)
Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive
and proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a motor
vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more
within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of
his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a
law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose
conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device on the probationer's motor
vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions
that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon
violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.

(b) For each violation
of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii) or (a)(i) and (iii)
of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined
for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(c) For each incident
involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this
subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be
suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or
privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the
finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify the
department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(9) A court may waive
the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:

(a) The offender does
not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an
electronic home monitoring system;

(b) The offender does
not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c) The court
determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the
conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever the mandatory
minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver
is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive
consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to,
additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever the
combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence
would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail
portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or
alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination
does not exceed three hundred sixty-five days.

(10) An offender
serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term
has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail
administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW
9.94A.150(4).

(11) For purposes of
this section:

(a) A "prior
offense" means any of the following:

(i) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii) A conviction for
a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug;

(v) A conviction for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally
filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local
ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi) An out-of-state
conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii),
(iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this state;

(vii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii) A deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of
RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the
deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520
or 46.61.522; and

(b) "Within seven
years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within seven
years of the arrest for the current offense.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.524 and 2000 c
28 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person convicted
under RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or 46.61.522(1)(b) or of a felony violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall, as a condition of community ((supervision))
custody imposed under RCW 9.94A.383 or community placement imposed under
RCW 9.94A.660, complete a diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or drug
dependency agency approved by the department of social and health services or a
qualified probation department, as defined under RCW 46.61.516 that has been
approved by the department of social and health services. This report shall be
forwarded to the department of licensing. If the person is found to have an
alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, the person shall complete
treatment in a program approved by the department of social and health services
under chapter 70.96A RCW. If the person is found not to have an alcohol or
drug problem that requires treatment, he or she shall complete a course in an
information school approved by the department of social and health services
under chapter 70.96A RCW. The convicted person shall pay all costs for any evaluation,
education, or treatment required by this section, unless the person is eligible
for an existing program offered or approved by the department of social and
health services. Nothing in chapter 348, Laws of 1991 requires the addition of
new treatment or assessment facilities nor affects the department of social and
health services use of existing programs and facilities authorized by law.

(2) As provided for
under RCW 46.20.285, the department shall revoke the license, permit to drive,
or a nonresident privilege of a person convicted of vehicular homicide under
RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522. The department shall
determine the eligibility of a person convicted of vehicular homicide under RCW
46.61.520(1)(a) or vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522(1)(b) to receive a
license based upon the report provided by the designated alcoholism treatment
facility or probation department, and shall deny reinstatement until
satisfactory progress in an approved program has been established and the
person is otherwise qualified.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2000 c
225 s 5, 2000 c 119 s 17, and 2000 c 66 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Felony
driving or physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.5055(3))

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.360 and 2000 c
28 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The offender score is
measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The offender score
rules are as follows:

The offender score is
the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to the nearest whole
number.

(1) A prior conviction
is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing for the offense for
which the offender score is being computed. Convictions entered or sentenced
on the same date as the conviction for which the offender score is being
computed shall be deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning
of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2) Class A and sex
prior felony convictions shall always be included in the offender score. Class
B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score, if since the last date of release from confinement (including
full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or
entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in
the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a
conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not
be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
five consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Serious traffic convictions shall not be
included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender spent five
years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results
in a conviction. This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.

(3) Out-of-state
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no
clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall
be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant
federal statute.

(4) Score prior
convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal solicitations,
and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions for completed
offenses.

(5)(a) In the case of
multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the offender score,
count all convictions separately, except:

(i) Prior offenses
which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the same criminal
conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields the highest
offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with respect to
other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or
prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether
those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a),
and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The current
sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses were not the same
criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or in separate
counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments, or
informations;

(ii) In the case of
multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1, 1986, for the
purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult convictions served
concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the
same date as one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.

(b) As used in this
subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that: (i) The latter
sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii) the concurrent
relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent
timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or parole revocation
on the former offense.

(6) If the present
conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the present
conviction were for a completed offense. When these convictions are used as
criminal history, score them the same as a completed crime.

(7) If the present
conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by subsection (11) or
(12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior felony conviction
and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point
for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8) If the present
conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in subsection (9), (10),
(11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each prior adult and
juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent
felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.

(9) If the present
conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points for prior adult
and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two points for each prior
adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each
prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(10) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in subsection (8) of
this section; however count two points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11) If the present
conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for each adult or
juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide ((or)),
Vehicular Assault, or Felony Driving or Physical Control of a Motor Vehicle
While Under the Influence of Intoxicating Liquor or any Drug; for each
felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile
prior conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and
1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12) If the present
conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each adult prior felony
drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile drug offense. All
other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this section
if the current drug offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this section
if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13) If the present
conviction is for Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW 72.66.060,
Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or Escape from
Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and juvenile
prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14) If the present conviction
is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior
convictions as one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.

(15) If the present
conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count priors as in subsection
(7) of this section; however, count two points for each adult and juvenile
prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary
2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16) If the present
conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections (7) through
(15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile
prior sex offense conviction.

(17) If the present
conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was under community
placement, add one point.

Sec. 7. RCW 9.94A.650 and 2000 c
28 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
applies to offenders who have never been previously convicted of a felony in
this state, federal court, or another state, and who have never participated in
a program of deferred prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a
felony that is not:

(a) Classified as a
violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter;

(b) Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled
substance classified in Schedule I or II that is a narcotic drug or
flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV;

(c) Manufacture, delivery,
or possession with intent to deliver a methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and
salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2); ((or))

(d) The selling for
profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in
Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana; or

(e) Felony driving
under the influence contrary to RCW 46.61.502 or felony being in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence contrary to RCW
46.61.504.

(2) In sentencing a
first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a sentence within the
standard sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up to ninety
days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract by the
county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section, which, in
addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include requirements that the
offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a) Devote time to a
specific employment or occupation;

(b) Undergo available
outpatient treatment for up to the period specified in subsection (3) of this
section, or inpatient treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement
for that offense;

(c) Pursue a
prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;

(e) Report as directed
to a community corrections officer; or

(f) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or
perform community service work.

(3) The terms and
statuses applicable to sentences under subsection (2) of this section are:

(a) For sentences
imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes committed before July 1, 2000, up
to one year of community supervision. If treatment is ordered, the period of
community supervision may include up to the period of treatment, but shall not
exceed two years; and

(b) For crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year of community custody unless
treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community custody may include
up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years. Any term of
community custody imposed under this section is subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2) and (3).

(4) The
department shall discharge from community supervision any offender sentenced
under this section before July 25, 1999, who has served at least one year of
community supervision and has completed any treatment ordered by the court.

---
END ---