BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF
THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.220.030 and 2000
c 115 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent
of public instruction is authorized to establish a section of traffic safety
education, and through such section shall: Define a "realistic level of
effort" required to provide an effective traffic safety education course,
establish a level of driving competency required of each student to
successfully complete the course, and ensure that an effective statewide
program is implemented and sustained, administer, supervise, and develop the
traffic safety education program and shall assist local school districts in the
conduct of their traffic safety education programs. The superintendent shall
adopt necessary rules and regulations governing the operation and scope of the
traffic safety education program; and each school district shall submit a
report to the superintendent on the condition of its traffic safety education
program: PROVIDED, That the superintendent shall monitor the quality of the
program and carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2) The board of
directors of any school district maintaining a secondary school which includes
any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, may establish and maintain a traffic
safety education course. The board of directors shall provide the program
only to students maintaining a grade point average of 2.0 or its equivalent.
If a school district elects to offer a traffic safety education course and has
within its boundaries a private accredited secondary school which includes any
of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, at least one class in traffic safety
education shall be given at times other than regular school hours if there is
sufficient demand therefor.

(3) The board of
directors of a school district, or combination of school districts, may
contract with any drivers' school licensed under the provisions of chapter
46.82 RCW to teach the laboratory phase of the traffic safety education
course. Instructors provided by any such contracting drivers' school must be
properly qualified teachers of traffic safety education under the joint
qualification requirements adopted by the superintendent of public instruction
and the director of licensing.

(4) The superintendent
shall establish a required minimum number of hours of continuing traffic safety
education for traffic safety education instructors. The superintendent may
phase in the requirement over not more than five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.220 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Each school
district shall be reimbursed from funds appropriated for traffic safety
education.

(b) The superintendent
of public instruction shall determine the per-pupil reimbursement amount for
the traffic safety education course to be funded by the state for students
eligible for free or reduced-price lunches. Each school district offering an
approved standard traffic safety education course shall be reimbursed or
granted an amount up to the level established by the superintendent of public
instruction as may be appropriated.

(c) The superintendent
of public instruction may provide per-pupil reimbursements for eligible
students to school districts only where all the traffic educators have
satisfied the continuing education requirement of RCW 28A.220.030(4).

(2) The board of
directors of any school district or combination of school districts shall
establish a traffic safety education fee, which fee when imposed shall be
required to be paid by any duly enrolled student in any such school district
before or while enrolled in a traffic safety education course. To the extent
funds are appropriated, the school board shall waive all or a portion of the
fees for students eligible for free or reduced-price lunches. Traffic safety
education fees collected by a school district shall be deposited with the
county treasurer to the credit of such school district, to be used to pay costs
of the traffic safety education course.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.220.900 and 1991
c 217 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the
purpose of this ((act)) chapter to ((provide the financial
assistance necessary to enable)) establish standards for each high
school district ((to offer)) offering a course in traffic safety
education and by that means to develop in the youth of this state a knowledge
of the motor vehicle laws, an acceptance of personal responsibility on the
public highways, and an understanding of the causes and consequences of traffic
accidents, with an emphasis on the consequences, both physical and legal, of
the use of drugs or alcohol in relation to operating a motor vehicle. The
course in traffic safety education shall further provide to the youthful
drivers of this state training in the skills necessary for the safe operation
of motor vehicles.

---
END ---