BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that the individualized treatment required for constitutional civil
commitment includes the realistic possibility of release to a less restrictive
alternative than total confinement in appropriate cases. The legislature finds
that most persons civilly committed under chapter 71.09 RCW who become eligible
for release to a less restrictive alternative do not have appropriate housing
and that the lack of housing may unduly restrict the person's ability to move
to a less restrictive alternative placement. The legislature also finds that
these facilities are essential public facilities, are subject to public protest
upon siting, and that some cities and counties have imposed moratoriums on
zoning and permitting processes. The legislature further finds that this
reaction hampers its ability and the ability of the department of social and
health services to comply with constitutional and statutory requirements and
with court orders to create housing for less restrictive alternative
placements. The legislature, therefore, intends to provide statewide guidance
for the siting of less restrictive alternative housing for persons placed on
less restrictive alternative placements under chapter 71.09 RCW.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to:

(a) Enhance public
safety and maximize the potential for successful treatment of sexually violent
predators through the tightly managed use of less restrictive alternatives in
community-based secure community transition facilities;

(b) Maximize the safety
of communities in which secure community transition facilities are located and
ensure public input into secure community transition facilities by enabling
community participation in decisions involving these essential public
facilities;

(c) Comply with federal
court orders and require the siting of less restrictive alternative housing
facilities and to preclude the possibility that the department of social and
health services would be unable to site a facility due to local moratoriums and
requirements;

(d) Require the
department to work with local jurisdictions to address specific local concerns
and develop zoning requirements and development regulations that balance the
need for siting with public safety; and

(e) Improve public
safety by strengthening the safeguards in placement, oversight, and monitoring
of the persons released to a less restrictive alternative in a secure community
transition facility, and by establishing minimum standards for the siting and
operation of secure community transition facilities.

(3) The legislature
finds that community participation in siting and oversight is vital to the
success of secure community transition facilities for less restrictive
alternatives.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.09.020 and 1995 c
216 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) (("Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged with
a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or
personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(2) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.)) "Department"
means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less
restrictive than total confinement.

(3) "Likely to
engage in predatory acts of sexual violence" means that the person more
probably than not will engage in such acts. Such likelihood must be evidenced
by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined at the time the petition
is filed under RCW 71.09.030.

(4) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.

(5)
"Predatory" means acts directed towards strangers or individuals with
whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of
victimization.

(((5))) (6)
"Recent overt act" means any act that has either caused harm of a
sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm.

(((6))) (7)
"Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility"
means an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the
public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment center.
Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and private schools,
school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public
parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and
community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, and public
libraries.

(8)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the
secretary's designee.

(9) "Secure
facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly confined under
the provisions of this chapter. A secure facility is a facility that provides
supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total confinement
setting. Secure facilities include the special commitment center and any
similar facility for males or females designated as a secure facility by the
secretary.

(10) "Secure
community transition facility" means a residential facility for persons
civilly committed and conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative
under this chapter. A secure community transition facility has supervision,
security, and either provides or ensures the provision of sex offender
treatment services. Secure community transition facilities include but are not
limited to any step-down facility and any community-based housing established
under this chapter and operated by the secretary or under contract with the
secretary.

(11)
"Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or
after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the
first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child
in the first or second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree,
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child
under age fourteen, incest against a child under age fourteen, or child
molestation in the first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at
any time prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent
offense as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would be a
sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in
the first or second degree, assault in the first or second degree, assault of a
child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree,
burglary in the first degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment,
which act, either at the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently
during civil commitment proceedings pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, has been
determined beyond a reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that
term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28
RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(((7) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less
restrictive than total confinement.

(8)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or his
or her designee.))

(12) "Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged
with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or
personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(13) "Step-down
facility" means any secure community transition facility that provides
residence for more than five persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
adopt rules that balance the average response time of emergency services to the
general area of the proposed facility against the proximity of the proposed
site to risk potential activities and facilities in existence at the time the
site is listed for consideration.

(2) In balancing the
competing criteria of proximity and response time the rule shall endeavor to
achieve an average law enforcement response time not greater than five minutes
and in no case shall the rule permit location of a facility adjacent to,
immediately across a street or parking lot from, or within the line of sight of
a risk potential activity or facility in existence at the time a site is listed
for consideration. "Within the line of sight" means that it is possible
to reasonably visually distinguish and recognize individuals.

(3) The rule shall
require that great weight be given to sites that are the farthest removed from
any risk potential activity.

(4) The rule shall
specify how distance from the location is measured and any variations in the
measurement based on the size of the property within which a proposed facility
is to be located.

(5) The rule shall
establish a method to analyze and compare the criteria for each site in terms
of public safety and security, site characteristics, and program components.
In making a decision regarding a site following the analysis and comparison,
the secretary shall give priority to public safety and security
considerations. The analysis and comparison of the criteria are to be
documented and made available at the public hearings prescribed in section 7 of
this act.

(6) The rule shall
contain a schedule of monetary penalties for contractors operating secure
community transition facilities, not to exceed the total compensation set forth
in the contract, and include provisions for termination of all contracts with a
service provider that has repeated or serious violations of section 9 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. By December 1, 2001, the
secretary of the department of social and health services shall determine and
report to the legislature whether there is a significant group of potential
locations that are outside of a five-minute law enforcement response time zone
that are more than two miles from any risk potential activities and whether, in
the secretary's judgment, the legislature should require the rule to be revised
to permit consideration of these properties.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary shall
establish criteria for the siting of secure community transition facilities
which shall include at least the following minimum requirements:

(1) Any real property
listed for consideration for the location of or use as a secure community
transition facility must meet all of the following criteria:

(a) The proximity and
response time criteria established under section 3 of this act;

(b) The site or
building is available for lease for the anticipated use period or for purchase;

(c) Security monitoring
services and appropriate back-up systems are available and reliable;

(d) Appropriate mental
health and sex offender treatment providers must be available within a
reasonable commute; and

(e) Appropriate
permitting for a secure community transition facility must be possible under
the zoning code of the local jurisdiction.

(2) For sites which
meet the criteria of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
analyze and compare the criteria in subsections (3) through (5) of this section
using the method established in section 3 of this act.

(3) Public safety and
security criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Whether limited
visibility between the facility and adjacent properties can be achieved prior
to placement of any person;

(b) The distance from,
and number of, risk potential activities and facilities, as measured using the
rules adopted under section 3 of this act;

(c) The existence of or
ability to establish barriers between the site and the risk potential
facilities and activities;

(d) Suitability of the
buildings to be used for the secure community transition facility with regard
to existing or feasibly modified features; and

(e) The availability of
electronic monitoring that allows a resident's location to be determined with
specificity.

(4) Site
characteristics criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Reasonableness of
rental, lease, or sale terms including length and renewability of a lease or
rental agreement;

(b) Traffic and access
patterns associated with the real property;

(c) Feasibility of
complying with zoning requirements within the necessary time frame; and

(d) A contractor or
contractors are available to install, monitor, and repair the necessary
security and alarm systems.

(5) Program
characteristics criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Reasonable
proximity to available medical, mental health, sex offender, and chemical
dependency treatment providers and facilities;

(b) Suitability of the
location for programming, staffing, and support considerations;

(c) Proximity to
employment, educational, vocational, and other treatment plan components; and

(d) In facilities
housing five or fewer residents, a minimum staffing ratio of one staff per
resident during normal waking hours and two awake staff during normal sleeping
hours. In no case shall all staff on a shift be persons classified as entry or
trainee level staff.

(6) Unless otherwise
ordered by the court, at least one staff member, or other court-authorized and
department-approved person must escort each resident when the resident leaves
the site for appointments, employment, or other approved activities. Escorting
persons must supervise the resident closely and maintain close proximity to the
resident.

(7) For purposes of
this section "available" or "availability" of qualified
treatment providers includes provider qualifications and willingness to provide
services, average commute time, and cost of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

Security systems for
secure community transition facilities housing five or fewer residents shall
meet the following minimum qualifications:

(1)(a) The security
panel must be a commercial grade panel with tamper-proof switches and a
key-lock to prevent unauthorized access.

(b) There must be an
emergency electrical supply system which shall include a battery back-up system
and a generator.

(2) The system must
include personal panic devices for all staff.

(3) The security system
must be capable of being monitored and signaled either by telephone through
either a land or cellular telephone system or by private radio network in the
event of a total dial-tone failure or through equivalent technologies.

(4) The department
shall issue photo-identification badges to all staff which must be worn at all
times.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the
department of social and health services operates, or the secretary enters a
contract to operate, a secure community transition facility, the secure
community transition facility may be operated only after the public
notification and opportunities for review and comment as required by this
section.

(2) The secretary shall
establish a process for early and continuous public participation in establishing
or relocating secure community transition facilities. The process shall
include, at a minimum, public meetings in the local communities affected, as
well as opportunities for written and oral comments, in the following manner:

(a) If there are more
than three sites initially selected as potential locations and the selection
process by the secretary or a service provider reduces the number of possible
sites for a secure community transition facility to no fewer than three, the
secretary or the chief operating officer of the service provider shall notify
the public of the possible siting and hold at least two public hearings in each
community where a secure community transition facility may be sited.

(b) When the secretary
or service provider has determined the secure community transition facility's
location, the secretary or the chief operating officer of the service provider
shall hold at least one additional public hearing in the community where the
secure community transition facility will be sited.

(c) When the secretary
has entered negotiations with a service provider and only one site is under
consideration, then at least two public hearings shall be held.

(d) To provide adequate
notice of, and opportunity for interested persons to comment on, a proposed
location, the secretary or the chief operating officer of the service provider
shall provide at least fourteen days' advance notice of the meeting to all
newspapers of general circulation in the community, all radio and television
stations generally available to persons in the community, any school district
in which the secure community transition facility would be sited or whose
boundary is within two miles of a proposed secure community transition
facility, any library district in which the secure community transition
facility would be sited, local business or fraternal organizations that request
notification from the secretary or agency, and any person or property owner
within a one-half mile radius of the proposed secure community transition
facility. Before initiating this process, the department of social and health
services shall contact local government planning agencies in the communities
containing the proposed secure community transition facility. The department
of social and health services shall coordinate with local government agencies
to ensure that opportunities are provided for effective citizen input and to
reduce the duplication of notice and meetings.

(3) Except as otherwise
provided by law, this section applies only to secure community transition
facilities sited after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
develop a process with local governments that allows each community in which a
secure community transition facility is located to establish operational
advisory boards for the secure community transition facilities. The department
of social and health services may conduct community awareness activities to
publicize this opportunity. The operational advisory boards developed under
this section shall be implemented following the decision to locate a secure
community transition facility in a particular community.

(2) The operational
advisory boards may review and make recommendations regarding the security and
operations of the secure community transition facility and conditions or
modifications necessary with relation to any person who the secretary proposes
to place in the secure community transition facility.

(3) The operational
advisory boards, their members, and any agency represented by a member shall
not be liable in any cause of action as a result of its recommendations unless
the advisory board acts with gross negligence or bad faith in making a
recommendation.

(4) Members of a board
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
adopt a violation reporting policy for persons conditionally released to less
restrictive alternative placements in secure community transition facilities.
The policy shall require written documentation by the department of social and
health services and service providers of all violations of conditions set by
the department of social and health services, the department of corrections, or
the court and establish criteria for returning a violator to the special
commitment center or a step-down facility. Any conditionally released person
who commits a serious violation of conditions shall be returned to the special
commitment center and the court shall be notified immediately and the court
shall initiate proceedings under RCW 71.09.098 to revoke or modify the less
restrictive alternative placement unless the department makes a good cause
showing why proceedings should not be initiated. For the purposes of this
section, "serious violation" includes but is not limited to:

(a) The commission of
any criminal offense;

(b) Any unlawful use or
possession of a controlled substance; and

(c) Any violation of
conditions targeted to address the person's documented pattern of offense that
increases the risk to public safety.

When a person is released
to a less restrictive alternative in a secure community transition facility
under this chapter and is under the supervision of the department of
corrections, notice of any violation of the person's conditions of release must
also be made to the department of corrections.

(2) Whenever the
secretary contracts with a service provider to operate a secure community
transition facility, the contract shall include a requirement that the service
provider must report to the department of social and health services any known
violation of conditions committed by any resident of the secure community
transition facility.

(3) The secretary shall
document in writing all violations, penalties, actions by the department of
social and health services to remove persons from a secure community transition
facility, and contract terminations. The secretary shall give great weight to
a service provider's record of violations, penalties, actions by the department
of social and health services or the department of corrections to remove
persons from a secure community transition facility, and contract terminations
in determining to execute, renew, or renegotiate a contract with a service
provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) On or before
September 1, 2002, the legislative authority of each county in the state shall
adopt a countywide planning policy to establish the process for siting and to
provide for an equitable distribution of secure community transition facilities
as defined in RCW 71.09.020 within the county and the cities located in whole
or in part within the county. The countywide planning policy required by this
section shall be adopted in cooperation with the cities located in whole or in
part within the county. Counties planning under the growth management act may
integrate the planning policy required in the section with their growth
management act planning process.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall be notified by each county of its intent to
begin the countywide planning policy process required by this section and the
department shall be invited to participate in this process.

(3) The countywide
planning policy required by this section shall, at a minimum, address the
following:

(a) The location of
existing secure community transition facilities;

(b) The social,
economic, and other impacts of the existing secure community transition
facilities on the communities in which they are located and the incremental
impacts of siting additional secure community transition facilities in these
communities;

(c) A proposed
allocation for the siting of future secure community transition facilities
among the county and the cities located in whole or in part within the county;
and

(d) Coordination of
development regulations, including but not limited to zoning regulations and
design standards, to ensure that the proposed allocation of future secure
community transition facilities can be achieved.

(4) The countywide
planning policy required by this section shall:

(a) Be consistent with
the siting criteria established pursuant to sections 3 and 5 through 7 of this
act;

(b) Require any local
conditional use permit or other development application process not to exceed
sixty days in length and provide for an appeal process.

(5) Within six months
of the date the countywide planning policy required by subsection (1) of this
section is adopted, the county and each city within the county shall adopt
development regulations implementing the policy adopted under this section
through appropriate revisions to their comprehensive plan and development
regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

Counties planning under
this chapter must adopt a countywide planning policy for the siting of secure
community transition facilities that complies with the timelines and
requirements of section 10 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 36.70A.200 and 1998
c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The comprehensive
plan of each county and city that is planning under this chapter shall include
a process for identifying and siting essential public facilities. Essential
public facilities include those facilities that are typically difficult to
site, such as airports, state education facilities and state or regional
transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local
correctional facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient
facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, ((and))
group homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.

(2) The office of
financial management shall maintain a list of those essential state public
facilities that are required or likely to be built within the next six years.
The office of financial management may at any time add facilities to the list.
No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may preclude the siting
of essential public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this act
shall operate to restrict a court's authority to make less restrictive
alternative placements to a committed person's individual residence. A
court-ordered less restrictive alternative placement to a committed person's
individual residence is not a less restrictive placement to a secure community
transition facility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---