BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No
telecommunications company may charge a customer any fees related to the
provision of long-distance telecommunications services associated with a local
exchange telephone number after the customer has canceled local exchange
service for that telephone number.

(2) It shall be a
complete defense to payment of any charge or fee related to the provision of
long-distance telecommunications services associated with a local exchange
telephone number that the customer had canceled local exchange service for that
telephone number.

(3) Upon the
cancellation of local exchange telephone service associated with a particular
telephone number for any reason, including the transfer of service to a new
telephone number, a local exchange telecommunications company shall notify the
customer that it is not legally responsible for notifying the customer's long-distance
telecommunications company that the local exchange service has been canceled or
transferred. The commission may prescribe the form and content of the notice
in rule.

(4) Nothing in this
section shall be construed to prohibit a local exchange telecommunications
company from notifying a customer's long-distance telecommunications company
that local exchange service has been canceled or transferred to another
telephone number.

(5)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a long-distance
telecommunications company from charging a reasonable fee to cancel or transfer
long-distance service to a new telephone number.

--- END ---