BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 62A.3-522 and 2000 c
215 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to sending
a notice of dishonor to the drawer of the check under RCW 62A.3-520, the person
sending notice shall execute an affidavit certifying service of the notice by
mail. The affidavit of service by mail must be attached to a copy of the
notice of dishonor and must be substantially in the following form:

AFFIDAVIT
OF SERVICE BY MAIL

I,
. . . . . ., hereby certify that on the
. . . . . . day of
. . . . . ., 20. . ., a copy of the foregoing
Notice was served on . . . . . . by mailing via the
United States Postal Service, postage prepaid, at
. . . . . ., Washington.

Dated: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Signature)

Failure to attach
the affidavit of service to the notice of dishonor, or to provide or mail a
copy within one business day of receiving a written request from the drawer or
drawer's representative, shall operate as a forfeiture of any right to
interest, collection costs, or attorneys' fees on the part of the person enforcing
the check.

The person
enforcing the check shall retain the affidavit with the check but shall file a
copy of the affidavit with the clerk of the court in which an action on the
check is commenced.

--- END ---