BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is credited
against the tax imposed under this chapter twenty‑five percent of the
value of materials or labor and services donated for the provision in this
state of low‑cost housing to low‑income buyers. In the case of
materials, the value of the donation is determined using the definition of
"value" in RCW 82.12.010(1) (a) and (b). In the case of labor and
services, the value of the donation is determined by the allocation of the cost
method using generally accepted accounting standards. The donation must be
made to a nonprofit organization that devotes a majority of its resources to
the development, rehabilitation, or preservation of affordable housing. The
department of community, trade, and economic development shall make available
to prospective donors a list of nonprofit organizations that qualify as
nonprofit organizations devoting a majority of their resources to the
development, rehabilitation, or preservation of affordable housing.

(2) For the purposes of
this section, the term "affordable housing" means residential housing
for purchase and occupancy by a low‑income household or residential
housing for rental occupancy by a low‑income household.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, the term "low‑income household" means a single
person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is
less than eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household
size, for the county where the residential housing is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of tangible personal property that
becomes an ingredient or component of a low‑cost housing residence for
sale to a low‑income buyer, or charges made for labor and services used
in the constructing of a residence of low‑cost housing for sale to a low‑income
buyer, but only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate
in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a
copy of the exemption certificate for the seller's files.

(2) If the residence is
not sold to a low‑income buyer by a seller who has claimed the exemption,
the amount of taxes for which an exemption has been taken is immediately due.
If the department finds that a person who is not eligible for the exemption has
not paid the tax, the department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
the taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed
at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
assessed retroactively to the date the tax exemption was taken, and accrue
until the taxes for which an exemption has been claimed are repaid.

(3) The seller must
maintain records documenting that the low-cost housing has been sold to a low‑income
buyer.

(4) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Low‑cost
housing" means a primary residence that has a listed sales price of no
more than two‑thirds the median sales price for residential property in
the county where the housing is located, adjusted annually.

(b) "Low‑income
buyer" means a natural person or persons purchasing low‑cost housing
with a federal adjusted gross income for their household of no more than eighty
percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the housing is located, calculated in a manner consistent with
section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of tangible personal property
that becomes an ingredient or component of a residence constructed as low‑cost
housing for sale to a low‑income buyer.

(2) If the residence is
not sold to a low‑income buyer by a seller who has claimed the exemption,
the amount of taxes for which an exemption has been taken shall be immediately
due. If the department finds that a person who is not eligible for the
exemption has not paid the tax, the department shall assess interest, but not
penalties, on the taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax
exemption was taken, and shall accrue until the taxes for which an exemption
has been claimed are repaid.

(3) The seller must
maintain records documenting that the low-cost housing has been sold to a low‑income
buyer.

(4) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Low‑cost
housing" means a primary residence that has a listed sales price of no
more than two‑thirds the median sales price for residential property in
the county where the housing is located, adjusted annually.

(b) "Low‑income
buyer" means a natural person or persons purchasing low‑cost housing
with federal adjusted gross income for their household of no more than eighty
percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the housing is located, calculated in a manner consistent with
section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed
under this chapter does not apply to sales of low‑cost housing to low‑income
buyers.

(2) For the purpose of
this section:

(a) "Low‑cost
housing" means a primary residence that has a listed sales price of no
more than two‑thirds the median sales price for residential property in
the county where the housing is located, adjusted annually.

(b) "Low‑income
buyer" means a natural person or persons purchasing low‑cost housing
with federal adjusted gross income for their household of no more than eighty
percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the housing is located, calculated in a manner consistent with
section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---