BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_6 Sec. 1. RCW
77.70.400 and 1998 c 245 s 154 are each amended to

_7 read as follows:

_8 The department, with input from Dungeness crab‑-coastal
fishery

_9 licensees and processors, shall prepare a resource plan
to achieve

10 even-flow harvesting and long-term stability of the
coastal

11 Dungeness crab resource. The plan may include pot
limits, further

12 reduction in the number of vessels, individual quotas,
trip

13 limits, area quotas, or other measures as determined by
the

14 department. The provisions of such a resource plan
that are

15 designed to effect a gear reduction or effort
reduction based upon

16 historical landing criteria are subject to the
provisions of RCW

17 77.70.390 with respect to the consideration of
extenuating

18 circumstances.

p. 1 SB
5850

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. For the purposes of
determining the number

_2 of shellfish pots assigned to a Washington Dungeness
crab-coastal

_3 fishery license, if the Dungeness crab-coastal fishery
license is

_4 held by a person whose vessel was lost due to sinking or
fire in

_5 any one of the three qualifying seasons, then the
department of

_6 fish and wildlife shall go back one more season from
December 1,

_7 1995, to September 15, 1996, and use this season
poundage to

_8 determine the number of pots granted to the license
holder as an

_9 exception to WAC 220-52-040(14).

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5850 p. 2