BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
declares that racial profiling is the illegal use of race or ethnicity as a
factor in deciding to stop and question, take enforcement action, arrest, or
search a person or vehicle with or without a legal basis under the United
States Constitution or Washington state Constitution.

(2) The legislature
recognizes that the president of the United States has issued an executive
order stating that stopping or searching individuals on the basis of race is
not an effective law enforcement policy, that it is inconsistent with
democratic ideals, especially the commitment to equal protection under the law
for all persons, and that it is neither legitimate nor defensible as a strategy
for public protection. The order also instructs the law enforcement agencies
within the departments of justice, treasury, and interior to collect race,
ethnicity, and gender data on the people they stop or arrest.

(3) The legislature
finds that the Washington state patrol has been in the process of collecting
data on traffic stops and analyzing the data to determine if the patrol has any
areas in its enforcement of traffic laws where minorities are being treated in
a discriminatory manner. The legislature further finds that the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs has recently passed a resolution
condemning racial profiling and has reaffirmed local law enforcement agencies'
commitment to ensuring the public safety and the protection of civil liberties
for all persons. The association also restated its goal of implementing policing
procedures that are fair, equitable, and constitutional.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Local law
enforcement agencies shall comply with the recommendations of the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs regarding racial profiling, as set
forth under (a) through (f) of this subsection. Local law enforcement agencies
shall:

(a) Adopt a written
policy designed to condemn and prevent racial profiling;

(b) Review and audit
their existing procedures, practices, and training to ensure that they do not
enable or foster the practice of racial profiling;

(c) Continue training
to address the issues related to racial profiling. Officers should be trained
in how to better interact with persons they stop so that legitimate police
actions are not misperceived as racial profiling;

(d) Ensure that they
have in place a citizen complaint review process that can adequately address
instances of racial profiling. The process must be accessible to citizens and
must be fair. Officers found to be engaged in racial profiling must be held
accountable through the appropriate disciplinary procedures within each
department;

(e) Work with the
minority groups in their community to appropriately address the issue of racial
profiling; and

(f) Within fiscal
constraints, collect demographic data on traffic stops and analyze that data to
ensure that racial profiling is not occurring.

(2) The Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall coordinate with the criminal
justice training commission to ensure that issues related to racial profiling
are addressed in basic law enforcement training and offered in regional
training for in-service law enforcement officers at all levels.

(3) Local law
enforcement agencies shall report all information required under this section
to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, in cooperation with the
criminal justice training commission, shall report to the legislature by
December 31, 2002, and each December 31st thereafter, on the progress and
accomplishments of each local law enforcement agency in the state in meeting
the requirements and goals set forth in section 2 of this act.

---
END ---