BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature
recognizes that according to a 1999 Gallup Poll, a majority of Americans, black
and white, believed that police actively engage in the practice of racial
profiling. Eighty-one percent of those questioned said they disapprove of the
practice.

(2) In A Resource
Guide on Racial Profiling Data Collection Systems published by the United
States department of justice in November 2000, "racial profiling"
means any police-initiated action that relies on the race, ethnicity, or
national origin rather than the behavior of an individual or information that
leads the police to a particular individual who has been identified as being,
or having been, engaged in criminal activity. It is the intent of the
legislature to make information on this practice available, in a usable format,
to policymakers and law enforcement agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning July 1,
2002, every law enforcement agency in this state shall provide an annual report
to the criminal justice training commission, on forms provided by the
commission, including the following information:

(a) The number of
individuals stopped for routine traffic enforcement, whether or not a citation
or warning was issued;

(b) Identifying
characteristics of the individual stopped, including the race or ethnicity,
approximate age, and gender;

(c) The nature of the
alleged traffic infraction or violation that led to the stop;

(d) Whether a search
was instituted as a result of the stop;

(e) The legal basis for
the search, including whether consent was obtained, whether a canine unit was
alerted, and whether there was probable cause or reasonable suspicion to
suspect a crime or violation of law; and

(f) Whether an arrest
was made, or a written citation issued, as a result of either the stop or the
search.

(2) The criminal
justice training commission, in cooperation with affected law enforcement
agencies, shall compile the information required under subsection (1) of this
section in a manner that is of value in guiding legislative policies, assisting
the sheriffs, police chiefs, prosecuting attorneys, and municipal attorneys, as
well as benefiting crime and delinquency prevention efforts.

(3) Data
acquired under this section shall not contain any information that may reveal
the identity of any individual who is stopped.

(4) The
information required under subsection (1) of this section shall be reported to
the commission with codes used to identify areas of patrol within the
jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency. The coding system shall be known
only by the reporting law enforcement agency.

---
END ---