BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.31.020 and 1998 c
340 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The gain-sharing
increase amount shall be the amount of increase, rounded to the nearest cent,
that can be fully funded in actuarial present value by the amount of
extraordinary investment gains, if any. The amount of extraordinary investment
gains shall be calculated as follows:

(a) One-half of the sum
of the value of the net assets held in trust for pension benefits in the
teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 fund at the close of the previous state fiscal year;

(b) Multiplied by the
amount which the compound average of investment returns on those assets over
the previous four state fiscal years exceeds ((ten)) eight
percent.

(2) The
gain-sharing increase amount for July 1998, as provided for in RCW 41.31.010,
is ten cents.

--- END ---