BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.31.010 and 1998 c
340 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning July 1, 1998,
and on January 1, 2002, and on each January 1st ((of
even-numbered years)) thereafter, the annual increase amount as defined in
RCW 41.32.010 and 41.40.010 shall be increased by the gain-sharing increase
amount, if any. The monthly retirement allowance of a person in receipt of the
benefit provided in RCW 41.32.489 or 41.40.197 shall immediately be adjusted to
reflect any increase.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.31A.020 and 1998
c 341 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On January 1, 2002,
and on each January 1st ((of even-numbered years)) thereafter,
the member account of a person meeting the requirements of this section shall
be credited by the extraordinary investment gain amount.

(2) The following
persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this
section:

(a) Any member of the
teachers' retirement system plan 3 or the Washington school employees'
retirement system plan 3 who earned service credit during the twelve-month
period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the distribution
and had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member account on
August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution; or

(b) Any person in
receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875 or 41.35.680; or

(c) Any person who is a
retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who:

(i) Completed ten
service credit years; or

(ii) Completed five
service credit years, including twelve service months after attaining age
fifty-four; or

(d) Any teacher who is
a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service
credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.32.817; or

(e) Any classified
employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who has completed
five service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan 3
under RCW 41.35.510; or

(f) Any person who had
a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member account on August
31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and who:

(i) Completed ten service
credit years; or

(ii) Completed five
service credit years, including twelve service months after attaining age
fifty-four; or

(g) Any teacher who had
a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member account on August
31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and who has completed
five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or

(h) Any classified
employee who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member
account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and
who has completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510.

(3) The extraordinary
investment gain amount shall be calculated as follows:

(a) One-half of the sum
of the value of the net assets held in trust for pension benefits in the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund and the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund at the close of
the previous state fiscal year not including the amount attributable to member
accounts;

(b) Multiplied by the
amount which the compound average of investment returns on those assets over
the previous four state fiscal years exceeds ten percent;

(c) Multiplied by the
proportion of:

(i) The sum of the
service credit on August 31st of the previous year of all persons eligible for
the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section; to

(ii) The sum of the
service credit on August 31st of the previous year of:

(A) All persons
eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section;

(B) Any person who
earned service credit in the teachers' retirement system plan 2 or the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 during the twelve-month
period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the
distribution;

(C) Any person in
receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765 or 41.35.420; and

(D) Any person with
five or more years of service in the teachers' retirement system plan 2 or the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2;

(d) Divided
proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(1) of this section on the basis of their service credit total on August 31st
of the previous year.

(4) The
legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future
and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
distribution not granted prior to that time.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.31A.020 and 2000
c 247 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On January 1, 2004,
and on each January 1st ((of even-numbered years)) thereafter,
the member account of a person meeting the requirements of this section shall
be credited by the extraordinary investment gain amount.

(2) The following
persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this
section:

(a) Any member of the
teachers' retirement system plan 3, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 3, or the public employees' retirement system plan 3 who earned
service credit during the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st
immediately preceding the distribution and had a balance of at least one
thousand dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution; or

(b) Any person in
receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875, 41.35.680, or 41.40.820; or

(c) Any person who is a
retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who:

(i) Completed ten
service credit years; or

(ii) Completed five
service credit years, including twelve service months after attaining age
fifty-four; or

(d) Any teacher who is
a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service
credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.32.817; or

(e) Any classified
employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who has completed
five service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan 3
under RCW 41.35.510; or

(f) Any public employee
who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.40.010(29) and who has completed five
service credit years by March 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795; or

(g) Any person who had
a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member account on August
31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and who:

(i) Completed ten
service credit years; or

(ii) Completed five
service credit years, including twelve service months after attaining age
fifty-four; or

(h) Any teacher who had
a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member account on August
31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and who has completed
five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or

(i) Any classified
employee who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member
account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and
who has completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510; or

(j) Any public employee
who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member account on
August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and who has
completed five service credit years by March 1, 2002, and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795.

(3) The extraordinary
investment gain amount shall be calculated as follows:

(a) One-half of the sum
of the value of the net assets held in trust for pension benefits in the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund, and the public
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund at the close of the
previous state fiscal year not including the amount attributable to member
accounts;

(b) Multiplied by the
amount which the compound average of investment returns on those assets over
the previous four state fiscal years exceeds ten percent;

(c) Multiplied by the
proportion of:

(i) The sum of the
service credit on August 31st of the previous year of all persons eligible for
the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section; to

(ii) The sum of the
service credit on August 31st of the previous year of:

(A) All persons
eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section;

(B) Any person who
earned service credit in the teachers' retirement system plan 2, the Washington
school employees' retirement system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 during the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st
immediately preceding the distribution;

(C) Any person in
receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765, 41.35.420, or 41.40.630; and

(D) Any person with
five or more years of service in the teachers' retirement system plan 2, the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2, or the public employees'
retirement system plan 2;

(d) Divided
proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section on the basis of their service credit total on August 31st of
the previous year.

(4) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this distribution not granted
prior to that time.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.31A.040 and 2000
c 247 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On June 1, 2003,
the member account of a person meeting the requirements of this section shall
be credited by the 2000 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount ((and)),
the 2002 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount, and the 2003
retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount.

(2) The following
persons shall be eligible for the benefits provided in subsection (1) of this
section:

(a) Any public employee
who earned service credit during the twelve-month period from September 1st to
August 31st immediately preceding the distribution and who transferred to plan
3 under RCW 41.40.795; or

(b) Any public employee
in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.40.820 and who has completed five
service credit years by September 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.40.795; or

(c) Any public employee
who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who has completed five
service credit years by September 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.40.795; or

(d) Any public employee
who has a balance of at least one thousand dollars in either his or her member
account or in plan 2 accumulated contributions and who has completed five
service credit years by September 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.40.795.

(3) The 2000
retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as
follows:

(a) An amount equal to
the average benefit per year of service paid in 2000 to members of the
teachers' retirement system plan 3 under section 309, chapter 341, Laws of
1998;

(b) Distributed to
persons eligible for the benefit in subsection (1) of this section on the basis
of their service credit total on July 1, 1999.

(4) The 2002
retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as
follows:

(a) An amount equal to
the average benefit per year of service paid in 2002 to members of the
teachers' retirement system plan 3 and the school employees' retirement system
plan 3 under RCW 41.31A.020;

(b) Distributed to
persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section on
the basis of their service credit total on July 1, 2001.

(5) The 2003
retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as
follows:

(a) An amount equal
to the average benefit per year of service paid in 2003 to members of the
teachers' retirement system plan 3 and the school employees' retirement system
plan 3 under RCW 41.31A.020;

(b) Distributed to
persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section on
the basis of their service credit total on July 1, 2002.

(6) The
legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future
and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
distribution not granted prior to that time.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Section 2 of this act
expires January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 3 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Section 4 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---