BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
43.88C.010 and 2000 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) The caseload forecast council is hereby
created. The council

_7 shall consist of two individuals appointed by the
governor and

_8 four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the
chairperson of

_9 each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate
and house

10 of representatives. The chair of the council shall be
selected from

11 among the four caucus appointees. The council may
select such other

12 officers as the members deem necessary.

13 (2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast
supervisor to

14 supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As
used in

15 this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload
forecast supervisor.

16 (3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five
members of

17 the council is required for any decisions regarding
employment of

18 the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall
terminate after

p. 1 SB
5857

_1 each term of three years. At the end of the first year
of each

_2 three-year term the council shall consider extension of
the

_3 supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the
compensation

_4 of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient
to

_5 accomplish the purposes of this section.

_6 (4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the
preparation

_7 of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four
members,

_8 the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW

_9 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a
forecast before a

10 date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall
submit the

11 forecast without approval and the forecast shall have
the same

12 effect as if approved by the council.

13 (5) A council member who does not cast an
affirmative vote for

14 approval of the official caseload forecast may request,
and the

15 supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based
on

16 assumptions specified by the member.

17 (6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall
serve

18 without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed
for travel

19 expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while
attending sessions

20 of the council or on official business authorized by the
council.

21 Nonlegislative members of the council shall be
reimbursed for

22 travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

23 (7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter,
means the number of

24 persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and
require the

25 services of public assistance programs, state
correctional

26 institutions, state correctional noninstitutional
supervision,

27 state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common
school

28 system, long-term care, developmental disabilities,
medical

29 assistance, foster care, and adoption support.

30 (8) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
the

31 definitions provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this
chapter.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5857 p. 2