BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
78.44.085 and 1997 c 413 s 1 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) An applicant for a public or private reclamation
permit

_7 shall pay ((an)) a nonrefundable
application fee to the department

_8 before being granted a surface mining permit. The
amount of the

_9 application fee shall be ((six)) one thousand
two hundred

10 ((fifty)) dollars.

11 (2) After June 30, ((1993)) 2001, each
public or private permit

12 holder shall pay an annual permit fee of ((six)) one
thousand two

13 hundred ((fifty)) dollars. The annual permit fee
shall be payable

14 to the department on the first anniversary of the permit
date and

15 each year thereafter. Annual fees paid by a county for
mines used

16 exclusively for public works projects and having less
than seven

17 acres of disturbed area per mine shall not exceed one
thousand

18 dollars. Annual fees are waived for all mines used
primarily for

p. 1 SB
5860

_1 public works projects if the mines are owned and
primarily

_2 operated by counties with 1993 populations of less than
twenty

_3 thousand persons, and if each mine has less than seven
acres of

_4 disturbed area.

_5 (3) Appeals from any determination of the department
shall not

_6 stay the requirement to pay any annual permit fee.
Failure to pay

_7 the annual fee may constitute grounds for an order to
suspend

_8 surface mining or cancellation of the reclamation permit
as

_9 provided in this chapter.

10 (4) All fees collected by the department shall be
deposited

11 into the surface mining reclamation account.

12 (5) If the department delegates enforcement
responsibilities to

13 a county, city, or town, the department may allocate
funds

14 collected under this section to the county, city, or
town.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5860 p. 2