BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 76.01 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of natural resources may sell or exchange the light industrial
facilities and land in Thurston county, known as the Lacey compound, which was
acquired as an administrative site. This land and the facilities may be sold
or exchanged for other lands and facilities in Thurston county, or counties
adjacent to Thurston county, for use as an administrative site. The property
may be exchanged for public or private property. The department is authorized
to accept cash or expend cash from appropriated funds in order to balance a
proposed exchange. Alternatively, the department may sell all or part of the
Lacey compound at public auction or under RCW 79.01.009 and use the proceeds to
either purchase or construct, or both, administrative site facilities that may
include land, improvements, and other capital investments necessary to support
a replacement light industrial site. The sale or exchange must be for at least
market value. Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to Title 39 RCW, as applicable, and must comply with all
other applicable laws and rules. Proceeds received from the sale or exchange
of the Lacey compound must be deposited into the park land trust revolving fund
to be used to acquire a replacement administrative site. Funds received from
the exchange or sale that are not used to either replace or construct, or both,
the administrative site must be deposited pursuant to RCW 76.01.030 or into the
appropriate trust account as determined by the department.

--- END ---