BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds and
declares that taxpayers should not bear the cost of a private association's
selection of its own nominees for public or private office.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In no circumstance
may state, county, city, or town public funds be spent on a primary if a public
declaration of party affiliation is required before a voter may participate in
the primary election.

(2) Each political
party participating in the primary shall reimburse the state and counties for
the political party's proportional share of the cost of the primary.

(3) A political party
must post a bond of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars for a September
primary held before a gubernatorial election, five hundred thousand dollars for
a September primary in an even-numbered year where the governor is not elected,
one hundred thousand dollars for any other statewide primary, or twenty-five
thousand dollars for any other primary, before the names of that political
party's candidates may be printed on the primary ballot.

When the actual cost of
the primary is tabulated, if the political party's proportional share of the
cost is less than the bond the costs will be deducted from the bond and the
rest refunded to the party. If the political party's proportional costs are
more than the bond the political party must reimburse the state, county, or
city for the costs not covered by the bond. A political party may not
participate in future primaries until it has paid in full its proportional
share of the costs of the primary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In this chapter a
"public declaration of party affiliation" includes, but is not
limited to, requiring voters to register their party affiliation, requiring a
public declaration of affiliation so a voter may participate in the primary,
requiring a voter to sign a pledge to support the political parties before a
voter may participate in a primary, registering a voter with a party when the
voter selects a political party's ballot at a primary, or recording a voter's
choice of party ballot at the primary.

(2) The
costs of primaries include, but are not limited to, the cost of printing
ballots, distributing ballots, printing voters' pamphlets, canvassing,
mandatory recounts, candidate filings, certification of primary candidates,
publishing the notice of the primary, compensating election officials, vote
tallying system tests, transporting voting equipment to polling places, use and
operation of polling places, voting supplies, and counting ballots.

---
END ---