BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) A vehicle
immobilization device is an apparatus that has been approved by the Washington
state patrol and is designed and manufactured to render a vehicle immobile.

(b) Vehicle
immobilization means the removal of a vehicle to the registered owner's
residence, other property, or to a location specified by ordinance or rule and
the placement of a vehicle immobilization device on the vehicle for the
impoundment periods authorized in RCW 46.55.120.

(c) A vehicle
immobilized under this section must be stored, while immobilized, at a location
specified by ordinance or rule, or on private property with the consent of the
owner of the property if the owner of the property is not the owner of the
vehicle.

(2) Any local
government ordinance or state agency rule that authorizes impoundment and
redemption of vehicles as provided in RCW 46.55.113 and 46.55.120 may allow
vehicle immobilization in lieu of impoundment when the driver has been arrested
for a violation of RCW 46.20.342. Vehicle immobilization is an alternative to
impoundment by a registered tow truck operator authorized by RCW 46.55.120.
The redemption rights and hearing procedures provided in RCW 46.55.120 apply to
vehicle immobilization. The local government ordinance or state agency rule
shall provide that the owner or driver of the vehicle be given the option of
impoundment under RCW 46.55.120 or vehicle immobilization under this section.

(3) The immobilized
vehicle may be released only after all rental and towing fees, including any
fees for rental of, and for damage to, the vehicle immobilization device, have
been paid. Release may be made only to a person who would qualify to redeem
the vehicle under RCW 46.55.120.

(4)(a) A local ordinance
or state agency rule may provide that if the vehicle immobilization device on a
vehicle is damaged, removed, or rendered inoperative, the vehicle may be
immediately impounded and held for an additional period of time, not to exceed
the maximum time for which the vehicle could have been held initially by a
registered tow truck operator under RCW 46.55.120.

(b) A
local ordinance may provide criminal penalties for damaging, unlawfully
removing, or rendering inoperative a vehicle immobilization device used to
immobilize a vehicle under this section.

--- END ---