BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to strike a balance between public safety concerns, especially in prosecutions
involving the victimization of infants and young children, and the need to
maintain adequate safeguards against the introduction of unreliable confessions,
admissions, or other statements of those accused of crimes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 10.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In criminal and
juvenile offense proceedings where independent proof of the corpus delicti is
absent, and the alleged victim of the crime is incompetent to testify or is
otherwise legally unavailable to testify, a lawfully obtained and otherwise
admissible confession, admission, or other statement of the defendant shall be
admissible into evidence if there is substantial independent evidence that
would tend to establish the trustworthiness of the confession, admission, or
other statement of the defendant.

(2) In determining
whether there is substantial independent evidence that the confession,
admission, or other statement of the defendant is trustworthy, the court shall
consider, but is not limited to:

(a) Whether there is
any evidence corroborating or contradicting the facts set out in the statement;

(b) The character of the
witness reporting the statement;

(c) The number of
witnesses to the statement;

(d) Whether a record of
the statement was made and the timing of the making of the record in relation
to the making of the statement; and/or

(e) The relationship
between the witness and the defendant.

(3) Where the court
finds that the confession, admission, or other statement of the defendant is
sufficiently trustworthy to be admitted, the court shall issue a written order
setting forth the rationale for admission.

(4) Nothing
in this section may be construed to prevent the defendant from arguing to the
jury or judge in a bench trial that the statement is not trustworthy or that
the evidence is otherwise insufficient to convict.

---
END ---