BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The state of
Washington is affected by national, regional, and statewide changes that are
transforming the nature of the electric power industry;

(2) Washington has a
long tradition of energy policies that support energy efficiency and renewable
energy development. These policies have reduced air and water pollution and
protected the environment, stimulated economic development, made homes more
comfortable, reduced the energy burden of low-income households, reduced
operating costs for businesses, and made industries more competitive;

(3) The Washington
state electricity system study, commissioned by the 55th legislature through
chapter 300, Laws of 1998, confirmed that changes in the electric industry have
had the unintended consequence of shortening utility planning horizons and
reducing incentives for electric utilities to invest in energy conservation and
renewable energy resources;

(4) The study also
found that there are significant energy conservation resources that cost the
same or less than the least costly new electric generation options and that
while some nonhydroelectric renewable energy resources may not be
cost-effective in the short term, they provide significant environmental and
energy system benefits to warrant development;

(5) The study also
found that investment in low-income energy services is declining and unstable,
although the percent of Washington's population below the poverty level has
increased and low-income households pay a significantly higher percent of their
incomes for energy than nonlow-income households;

(6) The rise in natural
gas prices increases the cost-effectiveness of conservation investments in gas
heated homes and raises the need for low-income energy services for gas utility
customers;

(7) Washington electric
ratepayers will benefit from resource planning and acquisition that hedges
against future fuel price risk by ensuring that utilities rely on a diverse
portfolio of resources to generate electricity;

(8) Fuel diversity
benefits, environmental benefits, and economic benefits from renewable energy
resources accrue to the public at large, and therefore all consumers and retail
suppliers have an equal obligation to support a minimum amount of these
resources in the state's electric resource portfolio;

(9) Washington's claim
to the benefits of the federal Columbia river power system is being challenged
in congress. The state's ability to preserve these benefits for the citizens
of Washington depends in part on demonstrating that we are managing the system wisely
and using its benefits efficiently;

(10) It is in the
interest of Washington's economy and environment to have a competitively
neutral and nonbypassable investment standard that will ensure delivery of
cost-effective energy conservation and provide low-income households with
energy efficiency services; and

(11) It is in the
interest of Washington's ratepayers to have a performance standard that will
diversify energy resources and secure development of new nonhydroelectric
renewable energy resources to:

(a) Provide a stable
economic environment for the continued productivity and advancement of
renewable energy resources and technologies;

(b) Secure their
inherent public benefits while ensuring that electricity from renewable energy
resources is provided at a price based on market competition among these
resources; and

(c) Create a stable
policy that will enable long-term financing and contracts and therefore lower
the costs of these renewable energy resources for consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Auditor"
means the office of the state auditor.

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state utilities and transportation
commission.

(3)
"Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility formed
under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an
irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under
chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or association formed under chapter
24.06 RCW, a port district formed under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district
formed under Title 57 RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing
electricity to one or more retail electric customers in the state.

(4)
"Department" means the Washington state department of community,
trade, and economic development.

(5) "Direct
service customer" means any end-user of electricity that obtains
electricity directly from the transmission grid and not through a distribution
utility, including those customers defined in section 3(8) of the Pacific
Northwest electric power planning and conservation act, P.L. 96-501.

(6) "Distribution
utility" means any investor-owned or consumer-owned utility that owns,
operates, or manages any distribution plant for hire within this state.

(7) "Eligible
renewable energy resource" means electricity generation facilities or fuel
cells fueled by: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d)
methane gas from landfills, sewage treatment plants, or animal wastes; or (e)
biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field
residues or dedicated energy crops that does not include (i) wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper chrome arsenic; (ii) municipal solid waste; (iii)
tires; (iv) construction and demolition debris; or (v) waste byproducts of pulp
and paper mills.

(8) "Governing
body" means the board of directors, city council, or the commissioners of
any consumer-owned utility.

(9) "Investment
standard" means a nonbypassable competitively neutral charge on all
end-use electricity customers and direct service customers to fund investment
in energy conservation, renewable energy research and development, and
low-income energy services.

(10)
"Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in distributing
electricity to more than one retail electric customer in the state.

(11) "Low
income" means a household meeting the income eligibility guidelines
determined by the department.

(12) "Low-income
energy assistance" means financial support provided to low-income
households for their energy bills in order to make them affordable. Energy
assistance may take the form of energy education as well as special rates, cash
assistance, percentage of income or bill payment plans, or other similar
mechanisms or charges.

(13) "Low-income
energy efficiency services" includes energy-related repairs,
weatherization, health and safety measures, installation of energy-efficient
appliances and fixtures for low-income residences, and investment in new
construction of low-income households that exceed the state energy code, as
well as energy education, for the purpose of enhancing energy efficiency.

(14) "Low-income
energy services" refers to the combination of low-income energy efficiency
services and provision of low-income energy assistance.

(15) "Performance
standard" means the percentage of electricity generation sold to
Washington consumers that must be derived from eligible renewable energy
resources under section 10 of this act.

(16) "Renewable
energy credit" means a tradable certificate of proof of one kilowatt-hour
of electricity generated from an eligible renewable energy resource.

(17) "Retail
electricity supplier" means a seller of electricity to Washington retail
electric consumers and direct service industries located in Washington for
ultimate consumption.

(18) "Total annual
revenues from the retail sale of electricity services in the state" means
the total amount of revenues spent each year by Washington end-users for
electricity services including distribution, transmission, generation,
ancillary services, metering and billing, transition charges, and other types
of costs included in consumer-owned utility or investor-owned utility electric
rates on the effective date of this section.

(19) "Total annual
revenues from the retail sale of natural gas services in the state" means
the total amount of revenues spent each year by Washington end-users for
natural gas services including distribution, ancillary services, metering and billing,
transition charges, and other types of costs included in consumer-owned utility
or investor-owned utility natural gas rates on the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Beginning July 1,
2002, and each year from July 1st to June 30th thereafter, a minimum annual
statewide energy conservation, renewable energy research and development, and
low-income energy services investment standard for investor-owned utilities,
consumer-owned utilities, and direct service customers is established equal to
at least three percent of the total annual revenues from the retail sale of
electricity services in the state.

(2) Each Washington
electricity distribution utility shall annually allocate at least three percent
of the total annual revenues from the retail sale of electricity to consumers
within its distribution service territory toward meeting this standard.
Nothing in this chapter limits distribution utilities from exceeding this
standard.

(3) Each direct service
customer shall annually allocate at least three percent of its total
expenditures for electric services toward meeting this standard. Nothing in
this chapter limits direct service customers from exceeding this standard.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The appropriate
nonbypassable collection mechanism to comply with the electric investment
standard and allocation determination outlined in this chapter must be
determined by the commission for all distribution utilities under its jurisdiction.
The mechanism must be nonbypassable for all customers regardless of energy
supplier.

(2) All consumer-owned
utilities will determine the appropriate nonbypassable collection mechanism to
comply with the electric investment standard and allocation determination
outlined in this chapter. The mechanism must be nonbypassable for all
customers regardless of energy supplier.

(3) Any distribution
utility that qualifies as a low density discount customer with the Bonneville
power administration may, at its option, adopt a minimum standard less than the
amount it is projected to collect under section 3 of this act, except that in
no case may such a distribution utility spend less, on average, than one and
one-half percent of revenues during the first five years after the effective
date of this section.

(4) Each direct service
customer shall annually forward to the distribution utility in the service
territory where the company is located an amount equal to the amount specified
in section 3(3) of this act, less those funds qualifying under section 5(3) of
this act. In determining its total annual expenditures for retail electric
services, the direct service customer shall either rely on consumption and
total revenue data from the 1994 report "Generation and Sales Statistics
from the Bonneville Power Administration" or provide documentation to the
department showing expenditure data for the most recent annual period ending
June 30th. If a direct service customer chooses to provide expenditure data to
the department, from that time forward, the customer may no longer rely on 1994
data. Documentation provided to the department is considered proprietary
information and is not subject to chapter 42.17 RCW. The department may report
such information only in the aggregate for all direct service customers in the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Funds collected for
the electric investment standard must be allocated for the following purposes:

(a) Energy conservation
measures, including but not limited to local conservation and regional market
transformation efforts;

(b) Research,
development, and demonstration projects related to energy efficiency and new
nonhydroelectric renewable energy resources, including local and regional
renewable energy projects; and

(c) Low-income energy
efficiency services.

(2) The funds collected
by investor-owned utilities and consumer-owned utilities under the minimum
investment standard shall be expended as follows:

(a) 49.5 percent of the
funds must be invested in cost-effective conservation, including local energy
efficiency market transformation activities;

(b) 14 percent of the
funds must be invested in cost-effective regional energy efficiency market
transformation activities. Distribution utilities contributing to the
northwest energy efficiency alliance through their Bonneville power
administration rates will be credited an equivalent amount;

(c) 14 percent of the
funds must be forwarded to the department for administering programs that
provide low-income energy efficiency services. These funds may be distributed
through the statewide network of weatherization assistance program providers
for weatherization of residences occupied by low-income households;

(d) 18 percent of the
funds must be forwarded to the department for administering programs that
provide low-income energy assistance. These funds may be distributed through
the statewide network of low-income assistance program providers or equivalent
local government entities for helping qualifying households pay their energy
bills;

(e) Up to 4 percent of
the funds may be devoted to research, development, and demonstration of
eligible renewable energy resources and energy efficiency technologies; otherwise,
these funds will be used to capture additional cost-effective conservation; and

(f) .5 percent of the
funds shall be forwarded to the department to fund its responsibilities set
forth in this section and sections 9 and 16 of this act.

(3)(a) Direct service
customers and any end-use customer of a distribution utility that uses large
amounts of electricity (defined as > 10 aMW per facility) may receive credit
for up to 49.5 percent of the minimum standard for the funds that it
contributes to the distribution utility for local installation of energy
efficiency measures, if the customer invests these funds in documented
cost-effective conservation investments made in the customer's facilities.
This credit does not include the customer's contribution to low-income energy
efficiency service costs. If an independent audit determines there is no
available conservation measure at the site that would have a simple payback of
one and one-half to ten years, the customer must receive the full credit of
49.5 percent of the minimum standard.

(i) The department will
confirm that energy savings from the package of energy conservation measures
implemented by a direct service customer has a cost less than or equal to the
customer's avoided costs and each individual measure has simple payback greater
than eighteen months. Upon determination, a customer may apply for a credit
for those costs from the local distribution utility to which they send their
funds.

(ii) The distribution
utility will confirm that energy savings from the package of energy
conservation measures implemented by an end-use customer under (a) of this
subsection has a cost less than or equal to the customer's avoided costs and
each individual measure has simple payback greater than eighteen months. Upon
determination, a customer may receive a credit for those costs from its
distribution utility.

(b) A direct service
customer contributing to the northwest energy efficiency alliance through its
Bonneville power administration rates is eligible for a credit for up to
fourteen percent of the minimum standard.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Beginning July 1,
2002, and each year from July 1st to June 30th thereafter, a minimum annual
statewide energy conservation and low-income energy services investment
standard for investor-owned utilities and consumer-owned utilities is
established equal to at least two percent of the total annual revenues from the
retail sale of natural gas services in the state.

(2) Each Washington
natural gas distribution utility that provides gas services within two or more
counties shall annually allocate at least two percent of the total annual
revenues from the retail sale of natural gas to consumers within its
distribution service territory toward meeting this standard. Nothing in this
chapter limits distribution utilities from exceeding this standard.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The appropriate
nonbypassable collection mechanism to comply with the natural gas investment
standard and allocation determination outlined in this chapter must be
determined by the commission for all distribution utilities under its
jurisdiction. The mechanism must be nonbypassable for all customers regardless
of energy supplier.

(2) All consumer-owned
utilities must determine the appropriate nonbypassable collection mechanism to
comply with the natural gas investment standard and allocation determination
outlined in this chapter. The mechanism must be nonbypassable for all
customers regardless of energy supplier.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) Funds collected for
the natural gas investment standard shall be allocated for the following
purposes:

(a) Energy conservation
measures, including but not limited to local conservation and regional market
transformation efforts; and

(b) Low-income energy
services.

(2) The funds collected
by investor-owned utilities and consumer-owned utilities under the minimum
natural gas investment standard must be expended as follows:

(a) 48.5 percent of the
funds must be invested in cost-effective conservation, including local and
regional energy efficiency market transformation activities;

(b) 20 percent of the
funds shall be forwarded to the department for administering programs that
provide low-income energy efficiency services. These funds may be distributed
through the statewide network of weatherization assistance program providers
for weatherization of residences occupied by low-income households;

(c) 26 percent of the
funds shall be forwarded to the department for administering programs that
provide low-income energy assistance. These funds may be distributed through
the statewide network of low-income assistance program providers or equivalent
local government entity for helping qualifying households pay their energy
bills;

(d) Up to 5 percent of
the funds may be devoted to research, development, and demonstration of energy
efficient gas technologies; otherwise, these funds will be used to capture
additional cost-effective conservation; and

(e) .5 percent of the
funds shall be forwarded to the department to fund its responsibilities set
forth in this section and sections 9 and 16 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) On or before October
1, 2003, and annually thereafter, each investor-owned utility must demonstrate
to the commission compliance with the minimum annual electric investment
standard created in section 3 of this act and the minimum annual gas investment
standard created in section 6 of this act, as applicable, for the annual period
ending the previous June 30th.

(2) On or before
October 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, each consumer-owned utility must
demonstrate to the auditor, or by independent audit, compliance with the
minimum annual electric investment standard created in section 3 of this act
and the minimum annual gas investment standard created in section 6 of this
act, as applicable, for the annual period ending the previous June 30th.

(3) On or before
October 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, each direct service customer must
demonstrate to the auditor, or by independent audit, compliance with the
minimum annual electric investment standard created in section 3 of this act
for the annual period ending the previous June 30th.

(4) Consumer-owned
distribution utilities may demonstrate their compliance with the minimum
electric investment standard "in the aggregate" by participating in
collaborative/consortia efforts with other Washington consumer-owned
distribution utilities.

(5) If the auditor or
commission determines, within sixty days after receipt of utility compliance
filing, that a utility has failed to collect funds to meet the applicable
minimum investment standards for the previous reporting period, the
distribution utility must immediately implement a tariff to collect a uniform
nonbypassable charge. The tariff must collect revenue equivalent to achieving
the minimum investment standards as if implemented according to section 3 of
this act for electric utilities or section 6 of this act for natural gas
utilities.

(6) If by July 1, 2004,
and annually thereafter, the auditor or commission determines that a utility's
compliance filing shows that less than ninety percent of funds collected to
meet the minimum electric utility investment standard have been allocated for
the purposes described in section 5 of this act, and if the department has
allocated more than ninety percent of the total funds forwarded to the
department under section 5 of this act for administering programs that provide
low-income energy efficiency services, the unallocated utility funds may be
forwarded to the department for additional investment in low-income energy
efficiency programs. Otherwise, unallocated funds must be carried over for
expenditure by the utility in the following year.

(7) If by July 1, 2004,
and annually thereafter, the auditor or commission determines that a utility's
compliance filing shows that less than ninety percent of funds collected to
meet the minimum gas utility investment standard have been allocated for the
purposes described in section 8 of this act, and if the department has
allocated more than ninety percent of the total funds forwarded to the
department under section 8 of this act for administering programs that provide
low-income energy efficiency services, the unallocated utility funds may be
forwarded to the department for additional investment in low-income energy
efficiency programs. Otherwise, unallocated funds must be carried over for
expenditure by the utility in the following year.

(8) An investor-owned
distribution utility's expenses for the conservation (excluding low-income
energy efficiency services) portion of the funds must be for cost-effective
conservation (based on avoided generation, transmission and distribution costs,
and associated environmental externality costs) and approved and verified by
the commission.

(9) A consumer-owned
utility's expenses for the conservation portion of the funds (excluding
low-income energy efficiency services) must be for cost-effective conservation
(based on avoided generation, transmission and distribution costs, and
associated environmental externality costs) and approved and verified by the
governing body.

(10) The department
must convene a group of stakeholders, including the commission, to advise it
concerning the development of criteria for energy conservation, market
transformation, low-income energy services, program implementation guidelines
that qualify toward the minimum annual investment standards, and a dispute
resolution process to address distribution utility or direct service customer
complaints on findings of failure to comply with program implementation
guidelines. The department will consider all existing and appropriate criteria
and guidelines where applicable, and may rely on work of regional power
planning committees in determining criteria and guidelines. The commission has
the final authority to approve criteria and program implementation guidelines
for the investor-owned utilities. The department must adopt rules for reporting
energy conservation expenditures and energy savings as applicable.

(11) In the event that
a consumer-owned utility fails to satisfy the program implementation guidelines
developed in subsection (10) of this section, the department must issue a warning
to the noncomplying utility and provide technical assistance to the utility to
improve program effectiveness. After two consecutive years of unacceptable
programs, the department must assume program responsibility and distribute
funds for the noncomplying utility in accordance with the allocation formulas
set forth in section 5 of this act for electric utilities, or as set forth in
section 8 of this act for gas utilities, except that the funds to be used for
conservation, excluding low-income energy services, may, at the discretion of
the department, be competitively bid to an energy service provider, to an
energy conservation nonprofit organization, or to the noncomplying utility to
be spent on energy conservation projects in the noncomplying utility's service
territory until such time as the noncompliance is remedied. During this period
of interim administration, the department may not make any commitments of
greater than three years for the conservation funding it is administering.

(12) In the event that
an investor-owned utility fails to satisfy the program implementation
guidelines developed in subsection (10) of this section, the commission must
issue a warning to the noncomplying utility and notify the department, which
must provide technical assistance to the utility to improve program
effectiveness. After two consecutive years of unacceptable programs, the
department must assume program responsibility and distribute funds for the
noncomplying utility in accordance with the allocation formulas set forth in
section 5 of this act for electric utilities or section 8 of this act for gas
utilities, except that the funds to be used for conservation, excluding
low-income energy services, may, at the discretion of the department, be
competitively bid to an energy service provider, to an energy conservation
nonprofit organization, or to the noncomplying utility to be spent on energy
conservation projects in the noncomplying utility's service territory until
such time as the noncompliance is remedied. During this period of interim
administration, the department may not make any commitments of greater than
three years for the local conservation funding it is administering.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The renewable energy
performance standard consists of the following:

(1) The required annual
percentage of each retail electricity supplier's total kilowatt-hours sold to
retail customers in Washington from eligible renewable energy resources must
equal five percent by calendar year 2003, ten percent by 2005, increase by at
least one percent in each succeeding calendar year up to twenty percent by
2015, and remain at twenty percent each year thereafter.

(2) In facilities that
use multiple fuels, only the electricity generated by an eligible renewable
energy resource is eligible for renewable energy credits unless the use of
nonqualifying fuels is below a minimum level established by the department.

(3) Full requirement
customers, as defined by the Bonneville power administration, are allowed to
meet the standard by paying a higher rate to the Bonneville power
administration to purchase eligible renewable energy resources or credits.

(4) Any distribution
utility that qualifies as a low density discount customer with the Bonneville
power administration may, at its option, meet the minimum standard through a
capacity basis, as defined by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The department must
convene a group of stakeholders, including the commission, by January 1, 2002,
to advise it on the development of criteria for renewable energy credits,
program implementation guidelines that qualify purchases toward the minimum performance
standard, rules for reporting renewable energy resource purchases under
Washington's fuel mix disclosure law, chapter 19.29A RCW, and a dispute
resolution process to address distribution utility or direct service customer
complaints on findings of failure to comply with program implementation
guidelines. The department must consider all existing and appropriate criteria
and guidelines where applicable, and may rely on the work of regional power
planning committees in determining criteria and guidelines. The commission has
the final authority to approve criteria and program implementation guidelines
for the investor-owned utilities. The department or its duly authorized agent
shall:

(1) Inspect and
register renewable energy credits, certify and audit output, and verify
transactions;

(2) Impose and collect
a fee on renewable energy credit applicants to cover the administrative costs
of carrying out its duties and purposes related to the renewable energy
performance standard under sections 10 through 16 of this act;

(3) Enforce this
chapter, including the imposition of administrative penalties; and

(4) Adopt rules to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. (1) On or before March
30, 2004, and on or before March 30th of each year thereafter, each retail
electricity supplier must submit to the department an application that contains
evidence of ownership of sufficient renewable energy credits to satisfy the
renewable energy performance standard for the previous calendar year.

(2) A renewable energy
credit that is not used to satisfy the required annual percentage under section
10 of this act for the year in which it was issued may be carried forward for
use in following years.

(3) Each retail electricity
supplier must include the required annual percentage of eligible renewable
energy resources under the renewable energy performance standard for
electricity products sold to end-use Washington customers.

(4) In meeting the
performance standard, a retail electricity supplier may include renewable
energy credits for which the installation or operation of the renewable energy
resource is required under federal law but may not include credits for which
the installation or operation of the renewable energy resource is required
under the laws of another state even if the installation or operation is also
required under federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. Renewable energy credits
may be sold or exchanged by the person to whom the credits are issued or by any
other person who acquires the credits. A sale or exchange of renewable energy
credits is not valid unless it is recorded with the department within ninety
days after the conclusion of the sale or exchange. The renewable energy and
other environmental attributes associated with an eligible renewable energy
kilowatt-hour may only be sold or transferred through the renewable energy
credit, and that credit is only eligible to satisfy the required annual
percentage requirement of section 10 of this act one time.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. (1) In the event that a
utility fails to satisfy the program implementation guidelines developed in
sections 10 through 13 of this act, the department must issue a warning to the
noncomplying utility and provide technical assistance to the utility to improve
program effectiveness. After two consecutive years of unacceptable programs,
the department must assume program responsibility, assess the investment level
required to meet the requirement, and distribute funds from the noncomplying
utility to a qualified nonprofit organization investing in new eligible
renewable energy resources. The department may not find that the organization
is a qualifying organization unless the organization is exempt from federal
taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. During this
period of interim administration, the department may not make any commitments
of greater than three years for the funding it is administering.

(2) The department may
impose an administrative penalty against a retail electricity supplier for
violating a provision of sections 10 through 13 of this act. The
administrative penalty for failure to produce and receive approval of the
required number of renewable energy credits is an amount equal to two times the
estimated market value of a renewable energy credit for each credit that a
retail electricity supplier fails to acquire and retire. A penalty imposed
under this section does not diminish the liability of a retail electricity
supplier for the same violation under any other applicable provision of the
law. The department or its designee must use all proceeds from these payments
to purchase the lowest cost renewable energy credits available in the market.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. If the federal government
enacts a renewable energy requirement that establishes a lower percentage than
Washington's renewable energy performance standard for any given calendar year,
the incremental amount from Washington's renewable energy performance standard
for eligible resources as defined in section 2 of this act must be added to the
federal renewable energy requirement. If the federal renewable energy
requirement is the same or higher than the Washington renewable energy
performance standard in any given calendar year for eligible resources as
defined in section 2 of this act, then the department must include in its
annual report to the legislature under section 16 of this act a recommendation
to modify or phase out the state renewable performance standard when the
federal renewable energy requirement takes effect, provided that the
department, after a public process, determines that the state's goals will be
satisfied by the federal requirement and that investments made to satisfy the
state renewable energy performance standard will not be placed in jeopardy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. (1) On or before December
1, 2004, and biennially thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the
legislature on the accomplishments of the investment and performance standards
created in this chapter, including unachieved cost-effective conservation
opportunities, and make recommendations for revisions to the standards. The
commission may initiate rule-making proceedings based on the results of these
reports to modify requirements imposed on investor-owned utilities.

(2) On or before
January 1, 2015, the department shall: (a) Review and recommend continuation
or modification of the minimum investment standards based on an assessment of
the effectiveness of the standards, market conditions, and unachieved
opportunities; and (b) review and recommend modification of the minimum
performance standard based on an assessment of its effectiveness and market
conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. Sections 1 through 16 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---