BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that cable operators collect personal information about their subscribers as a
necessary part of providing cable service. This information may reflect the
subscriber's intimate life, including personal, political, and religious
beliefs and interests, as well as financial status. The legislature further
finds that cable subscribers desire and expect this information to be kept
private, and used only as necessary to provide cable service. The legislature
declares that it is a matter of public interest to ensure that individuals'
privacy is protected, and finds the provisions of this chapter necessary to
protect the privacy of cable subscribers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Cable
operator" means any person or group of persons who provides cable service
over a cable system and directly or through one or more affiliates owns a
significant interest in such cable system, or who otherwise controls or is
responsible for, through any arrangement, the management and operation of such
a cable system.

(2) "Cable
service" means programming, in any combination, or any other service
provided by a cable operator on or in connection with a cable system, except
for cable telephone and internet services.

(3) "Cable
system" means all or part of the facilities owned, rented, leased, or
otherwise controlled by a cable operator. This includes plant, facilities,
equipment, and closed signal transmission paths; switches, software, hardware,
and other processing equipment; antennas, cables, amplifiers, towers, microwave
links, studios, and real and personal property; and any and all conductors,
home terminals, converters, remote control units, and all associated equipment
or facilities, the purposes of which include distributing cable service or
programming or producing, receiving, amplifying, storing, processing, or
distributing voice, data, video, multimedia, or other forms of electronic,
optical, or other signals.

(4) "Personally
identifiable information" means information that can be associated with a
particular individual through one or more identifiers or other information or
circumstances.

(5)
"Programming" means the video, audio, voice, data, multimedia, or
other material or programs prepared for or capable of transmission on a cable
system.

(6)
"Subscriber" means any person who is lawfully receiving, for any
purpose or reason, any cable service whether or not a fee is paid, including
each such person in a multiple unit building, except for purposes of reporting
or cost allocation, where equivalent subscriber basis may be used.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A cable operator shall
not collect personally identifiable information concerning any subscriber
without the prior written or electronic consent of the subscriber concerned,
unless the information is necessary to provide requested cable service to the
subscriber. A cable operator shall not observe or record, or allow any third
party to observe or record, the viewing habits or communications of subscribers
over the cable system except:

(1) For collecting
personally identifiable information necessary to render, or conduct a
legitimate business activity related to, a cable service provided by the cable
operator; or

(2) To detect
unauthorized reception of cable communications.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) A cable operator
shall not disclose personally identifiable information concerning any
subscriber unless:

(a) The disclosure is
required by state or federal law;

(b) The subscriber has
provided written consent to the disclosure;

(c) The disclosure is
necessary to provide cable service to the subscriber;

(d) The disclosure is
made pursuant to a court order authorizing such disclosure, if the subscriber
is notified of such order by the person to whom the order is directed; or

(e) The disclosure is
limited to names and addresses of subscribers and the cable operator has
provided the subscriber the opportunity to prohibit or limit such disclosure.
At the time of entering into an agreement to provide any cable service, a cable
operator shall provide to each subscriber a self-addressed, postage-paid
postcard that clearly and conspicuously informs the subscriber that the mailing
of the postcard will prohibit or limit the disclosure of the subscriber's name
and address.

(2) A cable operator
shall not reveal, directly or indirectly, to any third party which cable
services an individual subscriber receives, or the extent or nature of any
viewing or other use of a cable service by a subscriber. However, this section
shall not be construed to prohibit references to programming tiers and other
general descriptions of cable services that do not directly or indirectly
disclose subscriber viewing preferences.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The legislature finds
that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A subscriber whose
personally identifiable information is collected or disclosed in violation of
this chapter may collect damages of one thousand dollars, or actual damages,
whichever is greater.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---