BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that vocational training in the prisons directly contributes to the reduction
of offender recidivism. The legislature finds that the cost of vocational
programs is offset by more than double the savings to the state in avoided
criminal prosecutions and incarceration. It further finds that the savings to
the criminal justice system are only a fraction of the social and victim costs
avoided when a person released from prison does not reoffend. Therefore, the
legislature finds that the interest of public safety is best served by a
comprehensive approach to offender basic and vocational education. Therefore,
the legislature intends to secure the position of the existing offender
education programs in the department of corrections while seeking appropriate
means to achieve cost savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
maintain a continuum of work and educational programs to include basic
education, vocational education, and other appropriate work and education
programs, within available funds.

When seeking a
reduction in an educational or vocational program that is cost-effective in
reducing recidivism or effective in meeting penological objectives, the
department must present, in addition to the amount of the reduction requested,
the cost of replacing any goods or services produced by the program, the cost
to the department in increased offender management or other penological
objectives, and the estimated state cost of increased recidivism attributable
to the reduction.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.09.460 and 1998 c
244 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
intends that all inmates be required to participate in department-approved
education programs, work programs, or both, unless exempted under subsection
(4) of this section. Eligible inmates who refuse to participate in available
education or work programs available at no charge to the inmates shall lose
privileges according to the system established under RCW 72.09.130. Eligible
inmates who are required to contribute financially to an education or work
program and refuse to contribute shall be placed in another work program.
Refusal to contribute shall not result in a loss of privileges. The
legislature recognizes more inmates may agree to participate in education and
work programs than are available. The department must make every effort to
achieve maximum public benefit by placing inmates in available and appropriate
education and work programs and may not eliminate entire program categories
in which inmates are required to participate by this section.

(2) The department
shall provide access to a program of education to all offenders who are under
the age of eighteen and who have not met high school graduation or general
equivalency diploma requirements in accordance with chapter 28A.193 RCW. The
program of education established by the department and education provider under
RCW 28A.193.020 for offenders under the age of eighteen must provide each
offender a choice of curriculum that will assist the inmate in achieving a high
school diploma or general equivalency diploma. The program of education may
include but not be limited to basic education, prevocational training, work
ethic skills, conflict resolution counseling, substance abuse intervention, and
anger management counseling. The curriculum may balance these and other
rehabilitation, work, and training components.

(3) The department
shall, to the extent possible and considering all available funds, prioritize
its resources to meet the following goals for inmates in the order listed:

(a) Achievement of
basic academic skills through obtaining a high school diploma or its equivalent
and achievement of vocational skills necessary for purposes of work programs
and for an inmate to qualify for work upon release;

(b) Additional work and
education programs based on assessments and placements under subsection (5) of
this section; and

(c) Other work and
education programs as appropriate.

(4) The department
shall establish, by rule, objective medical standards to determine when an
inmate is physically or mentally unable to participate in available education
or work programs. When the department determines an inmate is permanently
unable to participate in any available education or work program due to a medical
condition, the inmate is exempt from the requirement under subsection (1) of
this section. When the department determines an inmate is temporarily unable
to participate in an education or work program due to a medical condition, the
inmate is exempt from the requirement of subsection (1) of this section for the
period of time he or she is temporarily disabled. The department shall
periodically review the medical condition of all temporarily disabled inmates
to ensure the earliest possible entry or reentry by inmates into available
programming.

(5) The department
shall establish, by rule, standards for participation in department-approved
education and work programs. The standards shall address the following areas:

(a) Assessment. The
department shall assess all inmates for their basic academic skill levels using
a professionally accepted method of scoring reading, math, and language skills
as grade level equivalents. The department shall determine an inmate's education
history, work history, and vocational or work skills. The initial assessment
shall be conducted, whenever possible, within the first thirty days of an
inmate's entry into the correctional system, except that initial assessments
are not required for inmates who are sentenced to life without the possibility
of release, assigned to an intensive management unit within the first thirty
days after entry into the correctional system, are returning to the
correctional system within one year of a prior release, or whose physical or
mental condition renders them unable to complete the assessment process. The
department shall track and record changes in the basic academic skill levels of
all inmates reflected in any testing or assessment performed as part of their
education programming;

(b) Placement. The
department shall follow the policies set forth in subsection (1) of this
section in establishing criteria for placing inmates in education and work
programs. The department shall, to the extent possible, place all inmates
whose composite grade level score for basic academic skills is below the eighth
grade level in a combined education and work program. The placement criteria
shall include at least the following factors:

(i) An inmate's release
date and custody level, except an inmate shall not be precluded from
participating in an education or work program solely on the basis of his or her
release date;

(ii) An inmate's
education history and basic academic skills;

(iii) An inmate's work
history and vocational or work skills;

(iv) An inmate's
economic circumstances, including but not limited to an inmate's family support
obligations; and

(v) Where applicable,
an inmate's prior performance in department-approved education or work
programs;

(c) Performance and
goals. The department shall establish, and periodically review, inmate
behavior standards and program goals for all education and work programs.
Inmates shall be notified of applicable behavior standards and program goals
prior to placement in an education or work program and shall be removed from
the education or work program if they consistently fail to meet the standards
or goals;

(d) Financial
responsibility. (i) The department shall establish a formula by which inmates,
based on their ability to pay, shall pay all or a portion of the costs or
tuition of certain programs. Inmates shall, based on the formula, pay a
portion of the costs or tuition of participation in:

(A) Second and
subsequent vocational programs associated with an inmate's work programs; and

(B) An associate of
arts or baccalaureate degree program when placement in a degree program is the
result of a placement made under this subsection;

(ii) Inmates shall pay
all costs and tuition for participation in:

(A) Any postsecondary academic
degree program which is entered independently of a placement decision made
under this subsection; and

(B) Second and
subsequent vocational programs not associated with an inmate's work program.

Enrollment in any
program specified in (d)(ii) of this subsection shall only be allowed by
correspondence or if there is an opening in an education or work program at the
institution where an inmate is incarcerated and no other inmate who is placed
in a program under this subsection will be displaced; and

(e) Notwithstanding any
other provision in this section, an inmate sentenced to life without the
possibility of release:

(i) Shall not be
required to participate in education programming; and

(ii) May receive not
more than one postsecondary academic degree in a program offered by the
department or its contracted providers.

If an inmate sentenced
to life without the possibility of release requires prevocational or vocational
training for a work program, he or she may participate in the training subject
to this section.

(6) The department
shall coordinate education and work programs among its institutions, to the
greatest extent possible, to facilitate continuity of programming among inmates
transferred between institutions. Before transferring an inmate enrolled in a
program, the department shall consider the effect the transfer will have on the
inmate's ability to continue or complete a program. This subsection shall not
be used to delay or prohibit a transfer necessary for legitimate safety or
security concerns.

(7) Before construction
of a new correctional institution or expansion of an existing correctional
institution, the department shall adopt a plan demonstrating how cable,
closed-circuit, and satellite television will be used for education and training
purposes in the institution. The plan shall specify how the use of television
in the education and training programs will improve inmates' preparedness for
available work programs and job opportunities for which inmates may qualify
upon release.

(8) The department
shall adopt a plan to reduce the per-pupil cost of instruction by, among other
methods, increasing the use of volunteer instructors and implementing
technological efficiencies. The plan shall be adopted by December 1996 and
shall be transmitted to the legislature upon adoption. The department shall,
in adoption of the plan, consider distance learning, satellite instruction,
video tape usage, computer-aided instruction, and flexible scheduling of
offender instruction.

(9) Following completion
of the review required by section 27(3), chapter 19, Laws of 1995 1st sp. sess.
the department shall take all necessary steps to assure the vocation and
education programs are relevant to work programs and skills necessary to
enhance the employability of inmates upon release.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The department of
corrections and the Washington state board for community and technical colleges
shall collaborate to find ways to implement distance learning programs and
distance learning courses within programs, including the appropriate use of intranets,
in the prisons. The department and the board shall consider ways to overcome
traditional and technical barriers to distance learning and whether
implementation of distance learning programs is cost-effective and shall report
to the legislature by December 1, 2001.

---
END ---