BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.14.020 and 1999 c
132 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The value of new
housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements qualifying
under this chapter is exempt from ad valorem property taxation, for ten
successive years beginning January 1 of the year immediately following the
calendar year of issuance of the certificate of tax exemption eligibility.
However, the exemption does not include the value of land or nonhousing-related
improvements not qualifying under this chapter. When a governing authority
adopts guidelines pursuant to RCW 84.14.030(2) and the qualifying dwelling
units are or will be segregated into separate tax parcels for sale as
condominiums or another form of individual ownership, the exemption may, at the
local governing authority's discretion, be limited to those dwelling units that
meet the local low-income or moderate-income occupancy requirements.

(2) In the case of
rehabilitation of existing buildings, the exemption does not include the value
of improvements constructed prior to the submission of the application required
under this chapter. The incentive provided by this chapter is in addition to
any other incentives, tax credits, grants, or other incentives provided by law.

(3) This chapter does
not apply to increases in assessed valuation made by the assessor on
nonqualifying portions of building and value of land nor to increases made by
lawful order of a county board of equalization, the department of revenue, or a
county, to a class of property throughout the county or specific area of the
county to achieve the uniformity of assessment or appraisal required by law.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.14.030 and 1997 c
429 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

An owner of property
making application under this chapter must meet the following requirements:

(1) The new or
rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must be located in a residential targeted
area as designated by the city;

(2) The multiple-unit
housing must meet the guidelines as adopted by the governing authority that may
include height, density, public benefit features, number and size of proposed
development, parking, low-income or moderate-income occupancy requirements, and
other adopted requirements indicated necessary by the city. The required amenities
should be relative to the size of the project and tax benefit to be obtained.
The governing authority may also elect by guideline whether, in the case of
qualifying dwelling units that are or will be segregated into separate tax
parcels for sale as condominiums or another form of individual ownership, the
exemption will be limited to those dwelling units that meet the local
low-income or moderate-income occupancy requirements;

(3) The new, converted,
or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must provide for a minimum of fifty
percent of the space for permanent residential occupancy. In the case of
existing occupied multifamily development, the multifamily housing must also
provide for a minimum of four additional multifamily units. Existing multifamily
vacant housing that has been vacant for twelve months or more does not have to
provide additional multifamily units;

(4) New construction
multifamily housing and rehabilitation improvements must be completed within
three years from the date of approval of the application;

(5) Property proposed
to be rehabilitated must be vacant at least twelve months before submitting an
application and fail to comply with one or more standards of the applicable
state or local building or housing codes on or after July 23, 1995; and

(6) The applicant must
enter into a contract with the city approved by the governing body under which
the applicant has agreed to the implementation of the development on terms and
conditions satisfactory to the governing authority.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.14.110 and 1995 c
375 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If improvements
have been exempted under this chapter, the improvements continue to be exempted
and may not be converted to another use for at least ten years from date
of issuance of the certificate of tax exemption. If the owner intends to
convert the multifamily development to another use or intends or anticipates
that the multifamily development may no longer qualify for the exemption under
this chapter or guidelines adopted by the governing authority pursuant to RCW
84.14.030, the owner shall notify the assessor and the governing
authority within sixty days of the change in use or other event
terminating qualification for the exemption. If, after a certificate of
tax exemption has been filed with the county assessor the city or assessor or
agent discovers that a portion of the property is changed or will be changed to
a use that is other than residential or that housing or amenities no longer meet
the requirements as previously approved or agreed upon by contract between the
governing authority and the owner and that the multifamily housing, or a
portion of the housing, no longer qualifies for the exemption, the tax
exemption must be canceled and the following must occur:

(a) Additional real
property tax must be imposed upon the value of the nonqualifying improvements
in the amount that would normally be imposed, plus a penalty must be imposed
amounting to twenty percent. This additional tax is calculated based upon the
difference between the property tax paid and the property tax that would have
been paid if it had included the value of the nonqualifying improvements dated
back to the date that the improvements were converted to a nonmultifamily use;

(b) The tax must
include interest upon the amounts of the additional tax at the same statutory
rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on which the
additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the improvements had
been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter; and

(c) The additional tax
owed together with interest and penalty must become a lien on the land and
attach at the time the property or portion of the property is removed from
multifamily use or the amenities no longer meet applicable requirements, and
has priority to and must be fully paid and satisfied before a recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the
land may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon expiration
of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by law for
foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes. An additional tax
unpaid on its due date is delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid,
interest must be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad
valorem property taxes.

(2) Upon a
determination that a tax exemption is to be canceled for a reason stated in
this section, the governing authority shall notify the record owner of the
property as shown by the tax rolls by mail, return receipt requested, of the
determination to cancel the exemption. The owner may appeal the determination
to the governing authority within thirty days by filing a notice of appeal with
the clerk of the governing authority, which notice must specify the factual and
legal basis on which the determination of cancellation is alleged to be
erroneous. The governing authority or a hearing examiner or other official
authorized by the governing authority may hear the appeal. At the hearing, all
affected parties may be heard and all competent evidence received. After the
hearing, the deciding body or officer shall either affirm, modify, or repeal
the decision of cancellation of exemption based on the evidence received. An
aggrieved party may appeal the decision of the deciding body or officer to the
superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

(3) Upon
determination by the governing authority or authorized representative to
terminate an exemption, the county officials having possession of the
assessment and tax rolls shall correct the rolls in the manner provided for
omitted property under RCW 84.40.080. The county assessor shall make such a
valuation of the property and improvements as is necessary to permit the
correction of the rolls. The owner may appeal the valuation to the county
board of equalization under chapter 84.48 RCW. If there has been a failure to
comply with this chapter, the property must be listed as an omitted assessment
for assessment years beginning January 1 of the calendar year in which the
noncompliance first occurred, but the listing as an omitted assessment may not
be for a period more than three calendar years preceding the year in which the
failure to comply was discovered.

---
END ---