BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Advanced
social work" means the application of social work theory and methods
including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment, psychotherapy under the
supervision of a licensed independent clinical social worker, case management,
consultation, advocacy, counseling, and community organization.

(2)
"Applicant" means a person who completes the required application,
pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age, and meets any
background check requirements and uniform disciplinary act requirements.

(3)
"Committee" means the Washington state mental health counselors,
marriage and family therapists, and social workers committee.

(4)
"Department" means the department of health.

(5) "Disciplining
authority" means the department.

(6) "Independent
clinical social work" means the diagnosis and treatment of emotional and
mental disorders based on knowledge of human development, the causation and
treatment of psychopathology, psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social
work practice as defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include
but are not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.

(7) "Marriage and
family therapy" means the diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional
disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or behavioral, within the context of
relationships, including marriage and family systems. Marriage and family
therapy involves the professional application of psychotherapeutic and family
systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to individuals,
couples, and families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and
mental disorders.

(8) "Mental health
counseling" means the application of principles of human development,
learning theory, psychotherapy, group dynamics, and etiology of mental illness
and dysfunctional behavior to individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations,
for the purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but is not
limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental and emotional
disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model of mental health.

(9)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A person must not
represent himself or herself as a licensed advanced social worker, licensed
independent clinical social worker, licensed mental health counselor, or
licensed marriage and family therapist, or other like terms without applying
for licensure, meeting the required qualifications, and being licensed by the department,
unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice of
marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work by an
individual otherwise regulated under this title and performing services within
the authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice of
marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work by an
individual employed by the government of the United States or state of
Washington while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of
the United States or state of Washington;

(3) The practice of
marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work by a person
who is a regular student in an educational program approved by the secretary,
and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of
instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision
of the instructor;

(4) The practice of
marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work by a
person issued a temporary permit by the secretary;

(5) The practice of
marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work under the
auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. In addition to any other
authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter. Any rules adopted shall
be in consultation with the committee;

(2) Establish all
licensing, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and
procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Issue licenses to
applicants who have met the education, training, and examination requirements
for licensure and to deny a license to applicants who do not meet the
requirements. The department shall consult with the committee on all
disciplinary matters;

(5) Hire clerical,
administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this
chapter, and hire individuals licensed under this chapter to serve as examiners
for any practical examinations;

(6) Administer and
supervise the grading and taking of examinations for applicants for licensure;

(7) Determine which
states have credentialing requirements substantially equivalent to those of
this state, and issue licenses to individuals credentialed in those states
without examinations;

(8) Implement and
administer a program for consumer education in consultation with the committee;

(9) Adopt rules
implementing a continuing education program in consultation with the committee;

(10) Maintain the
official record of all applicants and licensees; and

(11) Establish by rule
the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The secretary shall keep
an official record of all proceedings. A part of the record shall consist of a
register of all applicants for licensing under this chapter and the results of
each application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The Washington state
mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers
committee is established.

(1) The committee shall
be comprised of nine members. Two members shall be licensed mental health
counselors. Two members shall be licensed marriage and family therapists. One
member shall be a licensed independent clinical social worker, and one member
shall be a licensed advanced social worker. Three members must be consumers
and represent the public at large and may not be licensed mental health care
providers.

(2) Three members shall
be appointed for a term of one year, three members shall be appointed for a
term of two years, and three members shall be appointed for a term of three
years. Subsequent members shall be appointed for terms of three years. A
person must not serve as a member for more than two consecutive terms.

(3)(a) Each member must
be a resident of the state of Washington.

(b) Each member must
not hold an office in a professional association for mental health, social
work, or marriage and family therapy and must not be employed by the state of
Washington.

(c) Each professional
member must have been actively engaged as a mental health counselor, marriage
and family therapist, or social worker for five years immediately preceding
appointment.

(d) The consumer
members must represent the general public and be unaffiliated directly or
indirectly with the professions licensed under this chapter.

(4) The secretary shall
appoint the committee members.

(5) Committee members
are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on the department's
disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith.

(6) Committee members
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, including travel
expenses in carrying out his or her authorized duties in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) The committee shall
elect a chair and vice-chair.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The disciplining
authority has the following authority:

(1) To adopt, amend,
and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary to carry out this chapter. Any
rules shall be developed in consultation with the committee;

(2) To investigate all
complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct as defined in this chapter and
to hold hearings as provided in this chapter;

(3) To issue subpoenas
and administer oaths in connection with any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;

(4) To take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in any
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(5) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(6) To take emergency
action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or limitation
of the licensee's practice pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;

(7) To use a presiding
officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3) or the office of administrative
hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct hearings. The
disciplining authority shall make the final decision regarding disposition of
the license unless the disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the
final decision to the presiding officer;

(8) To use licensed
members of the committee to direct investigations;

(9) To enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(10) To contract with
licensees or other persons or organizations to provide services necessary for
the monitoring and supervision of licensees who are placed on probation, whose
professional activities are restricted, or who are for any authorized purpose
subject to monitoring by the disciplining authority;

(11) To adopt standards
of professional conduct or practice in consultation with the committee;

(12) To grant or deny
license applications based upon the uniform disciplinary act, and in the event
of a finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose any sanction against a license applicant or license holder provided by
this chapter and the uniform disciplinary act;

(13) To designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(14) To establish
panels consisting of three or more members of the committee to perform any duty
or authority within the department's jurisdiction under this chapter;

(15) To review and
audit the records of health facilities in which a licensee's practice privilege
or employment is terminated or restricted. Each health facility shall produce
and make accessible to the disciplining authority the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall not be
subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action pursuant
to RCW 70.41.200(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) The secretary shall
issue a license to any applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
secretary that the applicant meets the following education and experience
requirements for the applicant's practice area.

(a) Licensed social
work classifications:

(i) Licensed advanced
social worker:

(A) Graduation from a
master's or doctorate social work educational program accredited by the council
on social work education and approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards;

(B) Successful
completion of an approved examination;

(C) Successful
completion of a supervised experience requirement. The experience requirement
consists of a minimum of three thousand two hundred hours of experience by a
licensed social worker who has been licensed at least two years. Of those
hours, fifty hours must include direct supervision by a licensed advanced
social worker or licensed independent clinical social worker; the other forty
hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner.
Forty hours must be in one-to-one supervision and fifty hours may be in
one-to-one supervision or group supervision. Distance supervision is limited
to forty supervision hours. Eight hundred hours must be in direct client
contact; and

(D) Successful
completion of continuing education requirements of thirty-six hours, with six
in professional ethics.

(ii) Licensed
independent clinical social worker:

(A) Graduation from a
master's or doctorate level social work educational program accredited by the
council on social work education and approved by the secretary based upon
nationally recognized standards;

(B) Successful
completion of an approved examination;

(C) Successful
completion of a supervised experience requirement. The experience requirement
consists of a minimum of four thousand hours of experience, of which one
thousand hours must be direct client contact, over a three-year period as a
licensed social worker, licensed master level social worker, or licensed
advanced social worker, with supervision of at least one hundred thirty hours
by a licensed mental health practitioner. Of the total supervision, seventy
hours must be with an independent clinical social worker; the other sixty hours
may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner. Sixty
hours must be in one-to-one supervision and seventy hours may be in one-to-one
supervision or group supervision. Distance supervision is limited to sixty
supervision hours; and

(D) Successful
completion of continuing education requirements of thirty-six hours, with six
in professional ethics.

(b) Licensed mental
health counselor:

(i) Graduation from a
master's or doctoral level educational program in mental health counseling or a
related discipline from a college or university approved by the secretary based
upon nationally recognized standards;

(ii) Successful
completion of an approved examination;

(iii) Successful
completion of a supervised experience requirement. The experience requirement
consists of a minimum of thirty-six months full-time counseling or three
thousand hours of postgraduate mental health counseling under the supervision
of a qualified licensed mental health counselor in an approved setting. The
three thousand hours of required experience includes a minimum of one hundred
hours spent in immediate supervision with the qualified licensed mental health
counselor, and includes a minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of direct
counseling with individuals, couples, families, or groups; and

(iv) Successful
completion of continuing education requirements of thirty-six hours, with six
in professional ethics.

(c) Licensed marriage
and family therapist:

(i) Graduation from a
master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in marriage and family
therapy or graduation from an educational program in an allied field equivalent
to a master's degree or doctoral degree in marriage and family therapy approved
by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;

(ii) Successful passage
of an approved examination;

(iii) Successful
completion of a supervised experience requirement. The experience requirement
consists of a minimum of two calendar years of full-time marriage and family
therapy. Of the total supervision, one hundred hours must be with a licensed
marriage and family therapist with at least five years' clinical experience;
the other one hundred hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner. Total experience requirements include:

(A) A minimum of three
thousand hours of experience, one thousand hours of which must be direct client
contact; at least five hundred hours must be gained in diagnosing and treating
couples and families; plus

(B) At least two
hundred hours of qualified supervision with a supervisor. At least one hundred
of the two hundred hours must be one-on-one supervision, and the remaining
hours may be in one-on-one or group supervision.

Applicants who have
completed a master's program accredited by the commission on accreditation for
marriage and family therapy education of the American association for marriage
and family therapy may be credited with five hundred hours of direct client
contact and one hundred hours of formal meetings with an approved supervisor;
and

(iv) Successful
completion of continuing education requirements of thirty-six hours, with six
in professional ethics.

(2) The department
shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the
criteria.

(3) In addition,
applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial of a license or issuance
of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A person licensed under
this chapter must provide clients at the commencement of any program of
treatment with accurate disclosure information concerning the practice, in
accordance with rules adopted by the department, including the right of clients
to refuse treatment, the responsibility of clients to choose the provider and
treatment modality which best suits their needs, and the extent of
confidentiality provided by this chapter. The disclosure information must also
include the license holder's professional education and training, the
therapeutic orientation of the practice, the proposed course of treatment where
known, financial requirements, and such other information as required by rule.
The disclosure must be acknowledged in writing by the client and license
holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The date and location
of examinations shall be established by the secretary. Applicants who have
been found by the secretary to meet the other requirements for licensure shall
be scheduled for the next examination following the filing of the application.
The secretary shall establish by rule the examination application deadline.

(2) The secretary or
the secretary's designees shall examine each applicant, by means determined
most effective, on subjects appropriate to the scope of practice, as
applicable. Such examinations shall be limited to the purpose of determining
whether the applicant possesses the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to
practice competently.

(3) The examination
papers, all grading of the papers, and the grading of any practical work shall
be preserved for a period of not less than one year after the secretary has
made and published the decisions. All examinations shall be conducted under
fair and wholly impartial methods.

(4) The secretary may
approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or
association of licensing agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the
licensing requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Applications for
licensing shall be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary
may require any information and documentation which reasonably relates to the
need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for licensing
provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall pay
a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee shall accompany
the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Any person certified for
more than one year under chapter 18.19 RCW and has met the applicable
experience and education requirements is eligible for a license as an advanced
social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a marriage and family
therapist, or a mental health counselor under this chapter without taking the
examination. Any person who is a certified social worker and has been licensed
for less than a year may become licensed if the additional supervision and
experience requirements are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. An applicant holding a
credential in another state may be licensed to practice in this state without
examination if the secretary determines that the other state's credentialing
standards are substantially equivalent to the licensing standards in this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The secretary shall
establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a
license. Failure to renew shall invalidate the license and all privileges
granted by the license. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three
years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the
secretary by taking continuing education courses, or meeting other standards
determined by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. This chapter shall not be
construed as permitting the administration or prescription of drugs or in any
way infringing upon the practice of medicine and surgery as defined in chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW, or in any way infringing upon the practice of psychology as
defined in chapter 18.83 RCW, or restricting the scope of the practice of
counseling for those registered under chapter 18.19 RCW, or restricting the
scope of practice of persons licensed under this chapter.

Sec. 16. RCW 18.19.010 and 1987 c
512 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The qualifications and
practices of counselors in this state are virtually unknown to potential
clients. Beyond the regulated practices of psychiatry and psychology, there
are a considerable variety of disciplines, theories, and techniques employed by
other counselors under a number of differing titles. The legislature
recognizes the right of all counselors to practice their skills freely, consistent
with the requirements of the public health and safety, as well as the right of
individuals to choose which counselors best suit their needs and purposes.
This chapter shall not be construed to require or prohibit that individual or
group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier, health care service
contractor, or health maintenance organization provide benefits or coverage for
services and supplies provided by a person registered ((or certified))
under this chapter.

Sec. 17. RCW 18.19.020 and 1991 c
3 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) (("Certified
marriage and family therapist" means a person certified to practice
marriage and family therapy pursuant to RCW 18.19.130.

(2) "Certified
mental health counselor" means a person certified to practice mental
health counseling pursuant to RCW 18.19.120.

(3) "Certified
social worker" means a person certified to practice social work pursuant
to RCW 18.19.110.

(4))) "Client" means an individual who
receives or participates in counseling or group counseling.

(((5))) (2)
"Counseling" means employing any therapeutic techniques, including
but not limited to social work, mental health counseling, marriage and family
therapy, and hypnotherapy, for a fee that offer, assist or attempt to assist an
individual or individuals in the amelioration or adjustment of mental,
emotional, or behavioral problems, and includes therapeutic techniques to
achieve sensitivity and awareness of self and others and the development of
human potential. For the purposes of this chapter, nothing may be construed to
imply that the practice of hypnotherapy is necessarily limited to counseling.

(((6))) (3)
"Counselor" means an individual, practitioner, therapist, or analyst
who engages in the practice of counseling to the public for a fee, including
for the purposes of this chapter, hypnotherapists.

(((7))) (4)
"Department" means the department of health.

(((8))) (5)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the secretary's
designee.

Sec. 18. RCW 18.19.030 and 1991 c
3 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

No person may, for a
fee or as a part of his or her position as an employee of a state agency,
practice counseling without being registered to practice by the department
under this chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040. ((No person may
represent himself or herself as a certified social worker, certified mental
health counselor, or certified marriage and family therapist without being so
certified by the department under this chapter.))

Sec. 19. RCW 18.19.040 and 1987 c
512 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
may be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice of a
profession by a person who is either registered, certified, licensed, or
similarly regulated under the laws of this state and who is performing services
within the person's authorized scope of practice, including any attorney
admitted to practice law in this state when providing counseling incidental to
and in the course of providing legal counsel;

(2) The practice of
counseling by an employee or trainee of any federal agency, or the practice of
counseling by a student of a college or university, if the employee, trainee,
or student is practicing solely under the supervision of and accountable to the
agency, college, or university, through which he or she performs such functions
as part of his or her position for no additional fee other than ordinary
compensation;

(3) The practice of
counseling by a person without a mandatory charge;

(4) The practice of
counseling by persons offering services for public and private nonprofit
organizations or charities not primarily engaged in counseling for a fee when
approved by the organizations or agencies for whom they render their services;

(5) Evaluation,
consultation, planning, policy-making, research, or related services conducted
by social scientists for private corporations or public agencies;

(6) The practice of
counseling by a person under the auspices of a religious denomination, church,
or organization, or the practice of religion itself;

(7) Counselors whose
residency is not Washington state from providing up to ten days per quarter of
training or workshops in the state, as long as they don't hold themselves out
to be registered ((or certified)) in Washington state.

Sec. 20. RCW 18.19.050 and 1991 c
3 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any
other authority provided by law, the secretary has the following authority:

(a) To adopt rules, in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this chapter;

(b) To set all ((certification,))
registration((,)) and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and
to collect and deposit all such fees in the health professions account
established under RCW 43.70.320;

(c) To establish forms
and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(d) To hire clerical,
administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement this chapter;

(e) To issue a
registration to any applicant who has met the requirements for registration; and

(f) ((To set
educational, ethical, and professional standards of practice for certification;

(g) To prepare and
administer or cause to be prepared and administered an examination for all
qualified applicants for certification;

(h) To establish criteria
for evaluating the ability and qualifications of persons applying for a
certificate, including standards for passing the examination and standards of
qualification for certification to practice;

(i) To evaluate and
designate those schools from which graduation will be accepted as proof of an
applicant's eligibility to receive a certificate and to establish standards and
procedures for accepting alternative training in lieu of such graduation;

(j) To issue a
certificate to any applicant who has met the education, training, and conduct
requirements for certification;

(k) To set
competence requirements for maintaining certification; and

(l))) To develop a dictionary of recognized
professions and occupations providing counseling services to the public
included under this chapter.

(2) The uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of ((certifications
and)) registrations and the discipline of ((certified practitioners and))
registrants under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining
authority under this chapter. The absence of educational or training
requirements for counselors registered under this chapter or the counselor's
use of nontraditional nonabusive therapeutic techniques shall not, in and of
itself, give the secretary authority to unilaterally determine the training and
competence or to define or restrict the scope of practice of such individuals.

(3) The department
shall publish and disseminate information in order to educate the public about
the responsibilities of counselors and the rights and responsibilities of
clients established under this chapter. ((Solely for the purposes of
administering this education requirement, the secretary shall assess an
additional fee for each registration and certification application and renewal,
equal to five percent of the fee. The revenue collected from the assessment
fee may be appropriated by the legislature for the department's use in
educating consumers pursuant to this section. The authority to charge the
assessment fee shall terminate on June 30, 1994.))

Sec. 21. RCW 18.19.060 and 1987 c
512 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons registered ((or
certified)) under this chapter shall provide clients at the commencement of
any program of treatment with accurate disclosure information concerning their
practice, in accordance with guidelines developed by the department, that will
inform clients of the purposes of and resources available under this chapter,
including the right of clients to refuse treatment, the responsibility of
clients for choosing the provider and treatment modality which best suits their
needs, and the extent of confidentiality provided by this chapter. The
disclosure information provided by the counselor, the receipt of which shall be
acknowledged in writing by the counselor and client, shall include any relevant
education and training, the therapeutic orientation of the practice, the proposed
course of treatment where known, any financial requirements, and such other
information as the department may require by rule. The disclosure information
shall also include a statement that registration of an individual under this
chapter does not include a recognition of any practice standards, nor
necessarily imply the effectiveness of any treatment.

Sec. 22. RCW 18.19.080 and 1991 c
3 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall
keep an official record of all proceedings, a part of which record shall
consist of a register of all applicants for registration ((or certification))
under this chapter, with the result of each application.

Sec. 23. RCW 18.19.180 and 1991 c
3 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

An individual
registered ((or certified)) under this chapter shall not disclose the
written acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to RCW 18.19.060
nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in a
professional capacity when that information was necessary to enable the
individual to render professional services to those persons except:

(1) With the written
consent of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's
personal representative, other person authorized to sue, or the beneficiary of an
insurance policy on the person's life, health, or physical condition;

(2) That a person
registered ((or certified)) under this chapter is not required to treat
as confidential a communication that reveals the contemplation or commission of
a crime or harmful act;

(3) If the person is a
minor, and the information acquired by the person registered ((or certified))
under this chapter indicates that the minor was the victim or subject of a
crime, the person registered ((or certified)) may testify fully upon any
examination, trial, or other proceeding in which the commission of the crime is
the subject of the inquiry;

(4) If the person
waives the privilege by bringing charges against the person registered ((or
certified)) under this chapter;

(5) In response to a
subpoena from a court of law or the secretary. The secretary may subpoena only
records related to a complaint or report under chapter 18.130 RCW; or

(6) As required under
chapter 26.44 RCW.

Sec. 24. RCW 18.19.190 and 1987 c
512 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not
be construed as permitting the administration or prescription of drugs or in
any way infringing upon the practice of medicine and surgery as defined in
chapter 18.71 RCW, or in any way infringing upon the practice of psychology as
defined in chapter 18.83 RCW, or restricting the scope of the practice of
counseling for those registered ((or certified)) under this chapter.

Sec. 25. RCW 18.120.020 and 2000
c 93 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Applicant
group" includes any health professional group or organization, any
individual, or any other interested party which proposes that any health
professional group not presently regulated be regulated or which proposes to
substantially increase the scope of practice of the profession.

(2)
"Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process
by which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual who
(a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that regulatory
entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title or
designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.

(3) "Grandfather
clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute applicable to
practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health profession prior to the
effective date of the regulatory statute which exempts the practitioners from
meeting the prerequisite qualifications set forth in the regulatory statute to
perform prescribed occupational tasks.

(4) "Health
professions" means and includes the following health and health-related
licensed or regulated professions and occupations: Podiatric medicine and
surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental
hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW; dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism
under chapter 18.30 RCW; dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing
instruments under chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW;
embalming and funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under
chapter 18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter 18.55
RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;
pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine under chapters 18.71 and
18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter 18.73 RCW; physical therapy under
chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists
under chapter 18.83 RCW; registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW;
occupational therapists licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary
technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care assistants under chapter
18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108 RCW; acupuncturists
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW; persons registered ((or certified))
under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as mental health counselors,
marriage and family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 15 of this act); dietitians and nutritionists certified
by chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW; and
nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW.

(5) "Inspection"
means the periodic examination of practitioners by a state agency in order to
ascertain whether the practitioners' occupation is being carried out in a
fashion consistent with the public health, safety, and welfare.

(6) "Legislative
committees of reference" means the standing legislative committees
designated by the respective rules committees of the senate and house of
representatives to consider proposed legislation to regulate health professions
not previously regulated.

(7)
"License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean
permission to engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful
in the state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed health professional
tasks and for the use of a particular title.

(8) "Professional
license" means an individual, nontransferable authorization to carry on a
health activity based on qualifications which include: (a) Graduation from an
accredited or approved program, and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying
examination or series of examinations.

(9)
"Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved knowledge and
skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a specified health
profession.

(10) "Public
member" means an individual who is not, and never was, a member of the
health profession being regulated or the spouse of a member, or an individual
who does not have and never has had a material financial interest in either the
rendering of the health professional service being regulated or an activity
directly related to the profession being regulated.

(11)
"Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency setting forth
the name and address of the practitioner; the location, nature and operation of
the health activity to be practiced; and, if required by the regulatory entity,
a description of the service to be provided.

(12) "Regulatory
entity" means any board, commission, agency, division, or other unit or
subunit of state government which regulates one or more professions,
occupations, industries, businesses, or other endeavors in this state.

(13) "State
agency" includes every state office, department, board, commission,
regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where provided by law,
programs and activities involving less than the full responsibility of a state
agency.

Sec. 26. RCW 18.130.040 and 1999
c 335 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter
applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having
jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary
has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing
opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Naturopaths
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii) Midwives licensed
under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv) Ocularists
licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v) Massage operators
and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi) Dental hygienists
licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii) Acupuncturists
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii) Radiologic
technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84
RCW;

(ix) Respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x) Persons registered
((or certified)) under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi) Persons
licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and
social workers under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act);

(xii) Persons
registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(((xii))) (xiii)
Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(((xiii))) (xiv)
Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(((xiv))) (xv)
Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(((xv))) (xvi)
Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(((xvi))) (xvii)
Sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(((xvii))) (xviii)
Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(((xviii))) (xix)
Persons registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under
RCW 18.48.020;

(((xix))) (xx)
Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;

(((xx))) (xxi)
Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; and

(((xxi))) (xxii)
Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW.

(b) The boards and
commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric
medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv) The board of
hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of
examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry
board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing
licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii) The board of
pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under
chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The medical
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing
licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of
physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of
occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The nursing care
quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing
licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii) The examining
board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter
18.83 RCW; and

(xiv) The veterinary
board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3) In addition to the
authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the authority
to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria established in
this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section.
This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license
conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW
18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4) All disciplining
authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent application
of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining
authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 27. RCW 5.60.060 and 1998 c
72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A husband shall not
be examined for or against his wife, without the consent of the wife, nor a
wife for or against her husband without the consent of the husband; nor can
either during marriage or afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined
as to any communication made by one to the other during marriage. But this
exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one against the
other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by one
against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding against a spouse if
the marriage occurred subsequent to the filing of formal charges against the
defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by said
husband or wife against any child of whom said husband or wife is the parent or
guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW: PROVIDED,
That the spouse of a person sought to be detained under chapter 70.96A or 71.05
RCW may not be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by the court prior
to being called as a witness.

(2)(a) An attorney or
counselor shall not, without the consent of his or her client, be examined as
to any communication made by the client to him or her, or his or her advice
given thereon in the course of professional employment.

(b) A parent or
guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal charge may not be examined as
to a communication between the child and his or her attorney if the
communication was made in the presence of the parent or guardian. This
privilege does not extend to communications made prior to the arrest.

(3) A member of the
clergy or a priest shall not, without the consent of a person making the
confession, be examined as to any confession made to him or her in his or her
professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to
which he or she belongs.

(4) Subject to the
limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or 71.05.250, a physician or surgeon or
osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not,
without the consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil action as to
any information acquired in attending such patient, which was necessary to
enable him or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:

(a) In any judicial proceedings
regarding a child's injury, neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and

(b) Ninety days after
filing an action for personal injuries or wrongful death, the claimant shall be
deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the physician-patient
privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes a waiver of the
privilege as to all physicians or conditions, subject to such limitations as a
court may impose pursuant to court rules.

(5) A public officer
shall not be examined as a witness as to communications made to him or her in
official confidence, when the public interest would suffer by the disclosure.

(6)(a) A peer support
group counselor shall not, without consent of the law enforcement officer
making the communication, be compelled to testify about any communication made
to the counselor by the officer while receiving counseling. The counselor must
be designated as such by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the Washington
state patrol, prior to the incident that results in counseling. The privilege
only applies when the communication was made to the counselor while acting in
his or her capacity as a peer support group counselor. The privilege does not
apply if the counselor was an initial responding officer, a witness, or a party
to the incident which prompted the delivery of peer support group counseling
services to the law enforcement officer.

(b) For purposes of
this section, "peer support group counselor" means a:

(i) Law enforcement
officer, or civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, who has received
training to provide emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer
who needs those services as a result of an incident in which the officer was
involved while acting in his or her official capacity; or

(ii) Nonemployee
counselor who has been designated by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the
Washington state patrol to provide emotional and moral support and counseling
to an officer who needs those services as a result of an incident in which the
officer was involved while acting in his or her official capacity.

(7) A sexual assault
advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any
communication made by the victim to the sexual assault advocate.

(a) For purposes of this
section, "sexual assault advocate" means the employee or volunteer
from a rape crisis center, victim assistance unit, program, or association,
that provides information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling, or support to
victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the victim to accompany the
victim to the hospital or other health care facility and to proceedings
concerning the alleged assault, including police and prosecution interviews and
court proceedings.

(b) A sexual assault
advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the consent of the
victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of
serious physical injury or death of the victim or another person. Any sexual
assault advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and
communications under this section shall have immunity from any liability,
civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action. In any
proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this section,
the good faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed the confidential
communication shall be presumed.

(8) A licensed
mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or social worker shall
not be examined as to any communications made by his or her client to the
licensed mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or social
worker in the course of the professional relationship without the consent of
his or her client. This privilege is limited by the mental health counselor,
marriage and family therapist, or social worker's duty to mandatorily report
abuse and neglect under chapter 26.44 RCW or abuse, neglect, or financial
exploitation of a vulnerable adult under chapter 74.34 RCW. This privilege is
limited by the mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or
social worker's duty to warn of and protect from a client's threatened violent
behavior if the client communicated a serious threat of physical violence
against a reasonably identifiable victim or victims. This privilege is subject
to the limitations of RCW 70.96A.140 and 71.05.250. Communications remain
confidential and privileged even under circumstances where the client's parent,
legal custodian, or legal guardian, in the case of a minor, is present at the
time of the communication. A mental health counselor, marriage and family
therapist, and social worker must make reasonable efforts by the minor's third
visit to notify a minor's parent or legal guardian that he or she is working
with the minor.

Sec. 28. RCW 9A.44.010 and 1997 c
392 s 513 and 1997 c 112 s 37 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Sexual
intercourse" (a) has its ordinary meaning and occurs upon any penetration,
however slight, and

(b) Also means any
penetration of the vagina or anus however slight, by an object, when committed
on one person by another, whether such persons are of the same or opposite sex,
except when such penetration is accomplished for medically recognized treatment
or diagnostic purposes, and

(c) Also means any act
of sexual contact between persons involving the sex organs of one person and
the mouth or anus of another whether such persons are of the same or opposite
sex.

(2) "Sexual
contact" means any touching of the sexual or other intimate parts of a
person done for the purpose of gratifying sexual desire of either party or a
third party.

(3) "Married"
means one who is legally married to another, but does not include a person who
is living separate and apart from his or her spouse and who has filed in an
appropriate court for legal separation or for dissolution of his or her
marriage.

(4) "Mental
incapacity" is that condition existing at the time of the offense which
prevents a person from understanding the nature or consequences of the act of
sexual intercourse whether that condition is produced by illness, defect, the
influence of a substance or from some other cause.

(5) "Physically
helpless" means a person who is unconscious or for any other reason is
physically unable to communicate unwillingness to an act.

(6) "Forcible
compulsion" means physical force which overcomes resistance, or a threat,
express or implied, that places a person in fear of death or physical injury to
herself or himself or another person, or in fear that she or he or another
person will be kidnapped.

(7) "Consent"
means that at the time of the act of sexual intercourse or sexual contact there
are actual words or conduct indicating freely given agreement to have sexual
intercourse or sexual contact.

(8) "Significant
relationship" means a situation in which the perpetrator is:

(a) A person who
undertakes the responsibility, professionally or voluntarily, to provide
education, health, welfare, or organized recreational activities principally
for minors;

(b) A person who in the
course of his or her employment supervises minors; or

(c) A person who
provides welfare, health or residential assistance, personal care, or organized
recreational activities to frail elders or vulnerable adults, including a
provider, employee, temporary employee, volunteer, or independent contractor
who supplies services to long-term care facilities licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and home health,
hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW, but not including a consensual sexual partner.

(9) "Abuse of a
supervisory position" means a direct or indirect threat or promise to use
authority to the detriment or benefit of a minor.

(10)
"Developmentally disabled," for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(c) and
9A.44.100(1)(c), means a person with a developmental disability as defined in
RCW 71A.10.020.

(11) "Person with
supervisory authority," for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1) (c) or (e) and
9A.44.100(1) (c) or (e), means any proprietor or employee of any public or
private care or treatment facility who directly supervises developmentally
disabled, mentally disordered, or chemically dependent persons at the facility.

(12) "Mentally
disordered person" for the purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(e) and
9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person with a "mental disorder" as defined in
RCW 71.05.020.

(13) "Chemically
dependent person" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e)
means a person who is "chemically dependent" as defined in RCW
70.96A.020(4).

(14) "Health care
provider" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.100 means a person who
is, holds himself or herself out to be, or provides services as if he or she
were: (a) A member of a health care profession under chapter 18.130 RCW; or
(b) registered ((or certified)) under chapter 18.19 RCW or licensed
under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act), regardless of
whether the health care provider is licensed, certified, or registered by the
state.

(15)
"Treatment" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.100 means the
active delivery of professional services by a health care provider which the
health care provider holds himself or herself out to be qualified to provide.

(16) "Frail elder
or vulnerable adult" means a person sixty years of age or older who has
the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself.
"Frail elder or vulnerable adult" also includes a person found
incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW, a person over eighteen years of age who
has a developmental disability under chapter 71A.10 RCW, a person admitted to a
long-term care facility that is licensed or required to be licensed under
chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and a person receiving services
from a home health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

Sec. 29. RCW 18.100.050 and 1999
c 128 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An individual or
group of individuals duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render
the same professional services within this state may organize and become a
shareholder or shareholders of a professional corporation for pecuniary profit
under the provisions of Title 23B RCW for the purpose of rendering professional
service. One or more of the legally authorized individuals shall be the
incorporators of the professional corporation.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, registered architects and registered engineers
may own stock in and render their individual professional services through one
professional service corporation.

(3) Licensed health
care professionals, providing services to enrolled participants either directly
or through arrangements with a health maintenance organization registered under
chapter 48.46 RCW or federally qualified health maintenance organization, may
own stock in and render their individual professional services through one
professional service corporation.

(4) Professionals may
organize a nonprofit nonstock corporation under this chapter and chapter 24.03
RCW to provide professional services, and the provisions of this chapter
relating to stock and referring to Title 23B RCW shall not apply to any such
corporation.

(5)(a) Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed
or certified pursuant to chapters 18.06, 18.19, 18.-- (sections 1 through 15
of this act), 18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.53,
18.55, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.64, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.79, 18.83, 18.89, 18.108, and
18.138 RCW may own stock in and render their individual professional services
through one professional service corporation and are to be considered, for the
purpose of forming a professional service corporation, as rendering the
"same specific professional services" or "same professional services"
or similar terms.

(b) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are regulated
under chapters 18.59 and 18.74 RCW may own stock in and render their individual
professional services through one professional service corporation formed for
the sole purpose of providing professional services within their respective
scope of practice.

(c) Formation of a
professional service corporation under this subsection does not restrict the
application of the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, or
applicable health care professional statutes under Title 18 RCW, including but
not limited to restrictions on persons practicing a health profession without
being appropriately credentialed and persons practicing beyond the scope of their
credential.

Sec. 30. RCW 18.205.090 and 1998
c 243 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's
satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Completion of an
educational program approved by the secretary or successful completion of
alternate training that meets established criteria;

(b) Successful
completion of an approved examination, based on core competencies of chemical
dependency counseling; and

(c) Successful
completion of an experience requirement that establishes fewer hours of
experience for applicants with higher levels of relevant education. In meeting
any experience requirement established under this subsection, the secretary may
not require more than one thousand five hundred hours of experience in chemical
dependency counseling for applicants who are licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW
or under chapter 18.79 RCW as advanced registered nurse practitioners.

(2) The secretary shall
establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.

(3) Applicants are
subject to the grounds for denial of a certificate or issuance of a conditional
certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(4) Certified chemical
dependency professionals shall not be required to be registered under chapter
18.19 RCW or licensed under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this
act).

Sec. 31. RCW 25.05.510 and 1998 c
103 s 1103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person or group
of persons licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional
services, as defined in RCW 18.100.030, within this state may organize and
become a member or members of a limited liability partnership under the
provisions of this chapter for the purposes of rendering professional service.
Nothing in this section prohibits a person duly licensed or otherwise legally
authorized to render professional services in any jurisdiction other than this
state from becoming a member of a limited liability partnership organized for
the purpose of rendering the same professional services. Nothing in this
section prohibits a limited liability partnership from rendering professional
services outside this state through individuals who are not duly licensed or
otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this
state.

(2)(a) Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed
or certified pursuant to chapters 18.06, 18.19, 18.-- (sections 1 through 15
of this act), 18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.53,
18.55, 18.64, 18.79, 18.83, 18.89, 18.108, and 18.138 RCW may join and render
their individual professional services through one limited liability
partnership and are to be considered, for the purpose of forming a limited
liability partnership, as rendering the "same specific professional
services" or "same professional services" or similar terms.

(b) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed
pursuant to chapters 18.57 and 18.71 RCW may join and render their individual
professional services through one limited liability partnership and are to be
considered, for the purpose of forming a limited liability partnership, as
rendering the "same specific professional services" or "same
professional services" or similar terms.

(c) Formation of a
limited liability partnership under this subsection does not restrict the
application of the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, or any
applicable health care professional statutes under Title 18 RCW, including but
not limited to restrictions on persons practicing a health profession without
being appropriately credentialed and persons practicing beyond the scope of
their credential.

Sec. 32. RCW 25.15.045 and 1999 c
128 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person or group
of persons licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional
services within this or any other state may organize and become a member or
members of a professional limited liability company under the provisions of
this chapter for the purposes of rendering professional service. A
"professional limited liability company" is subject to all the
provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW that apply to a professional corporation, and
its managers, members, agents, and employees shall be subject to all the
provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW that apply to the directors, officers,
shareholders, agents, or employees of a professional corporation, except as
provided otherwise in this section. Nothing in this section prohibits a person
duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services
in any jurisdiction other than this state from becoming a member of a
professional limited liability company organized for the purpose of rendering
the same professional services. Nothing in this section prohibits a
professional limited liability company from rendering professional services
outside this state through individuals who are not duly licensed or otherwise
legally authorized to render such professional services within this state.
Persons engaged in a profession and otherwise meeting the requirements of this
chapter may operate under this chapter as a professional limited liability
company so long as each member personally engaged in the practice of the
profession in this state is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to
practice the profession in this state and:

(a) At least one
manager of the company is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to
practice the profession in this state; or

(b) Each member in
charge of an office of the company in this state is duly licensed or otherwise
legally authorized to practice the profession in this state.

(2) If the company's
members are required to be licensed to practice such profession, and the
company fails to maintain for itself and for its members practicing in this
state a policy of professional liability insurance, bond, or other evidence of
financial responsibility of a kind designated by rule by the state insurance
commissioner and in the amount of at least one million dollars or a greater
amount as the state insurance commissioner may establish by rule for a licensed
profession or for any specialty within a profession, taking into account the
nature and size of the business, then the company's members are personally
liable to the extent that, had the insurance, bond, or other evidence of
responsibility been maintained, it would have covered the liability in
question.

(3) For purposes of
applying the provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW to a professional limited liability
company, the terms "director" or "officer" means manager,
"shareholder" means member, "corporation" means
professional limited liability company, "articles of incorporation"
means certificate of formation, "shares" or "capital stock"
means a limited liability company interest, "incorporator" means the
person who executes the certificate of formation, and "bylaws" means
the limited liability company agreement.

(4) The name of a
professional limited liability company must contain either the words
"Professional Limited Liability Company," or the words
"Professional Limited Liability" and the abbreviation
"Co.," or the abbreviation "P.L.L.C." or "PLLC"
provided that the name of a professional limited liability company organized to
render dental services shall contain the full names or surnames of all members
and no other word than "chartered" or the words "professional
services" or the abbreviation "P.L.L.C." or "PLLC."

(5) Subject to the
provisions in article VII of this chapter, the following may be a member of a
professional limited liability company and may be the transferee of the
interest of an ineligible person or deceased member of the professional limited
liability company:

(a) A professional
corporation, if its shareholders, directors, and its officers other than the
secretary and the treasurer, are licensed or otherwise legally authorized to
render the same specific professional services as the professional limited
liability company; and

(b) Another
professional limited liability company, if the managers and members of both
professional limited liability companies are licensed or otherwise legally
authorized to render the same specific professional services.

(6)(a) Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed
or certified pursuant to chapters 18.06, 18.19, 18.-- (sections 1 through 15
of this act), 18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.53,
18.55, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.64, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.79, 18.83, 18.89, 18.108, and
18.138 RCW may own membership interests in and render their individual
professional services through one limited liability company and are to be
considered, for the purpose of forming a limited liability company, as
rendering the "same specific professional services" or "same
professional services" or similar terms.

(b) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are regulated
under chapters 18.59 and 18.74 RCW may own membership interests in and render
their individual professional services through one limited liability company
formed for the sole purpose of providing professional services within their
respective scope of practice.

(c)
Formation of a limited liability company under this subsection does not
restrict the application of the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130
RCW, or any applicable health care professional statutes under Title 18 RCW,
including but not limited to restrictions on persons practicing a health
profession without being appropriately credentialed and persons practicing
beyond the scope of their credential.

Sec. 33. RCW 48.43.087 and 1996 c
304 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
this section:

(a) "Health
carrier" includes disability insurers regulated under chapter 48.20 or
48.21 RCW, health care services contractors regulated under chapter 48.44 RCW,
plans operating under the health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW, the
basic health plan operating under chapter 70.47 RCW, the state health insurance
pool operating under chapter 48.41 RCW, insuring entities regulated under this
chapter, and health maintenance organizations regulated under chapter 48.46
RCW.

(b)
"Intermediary" means a person duly authorized to negotiate and
execute provider contracts with health carriers on behalf of mental health care
practitioners.

(c) Consistent with
their lawful scopes of practice, "mental health care practitioners"
includes only the following: Any generally recognized medical specialty of
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW who provide mental
health services, advanced practice psychiatric nurses as authorized by the
nursing care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW,
psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, ((social workers, marriage
and family therapists, and mental health)) counselors ((certified))
under chapter 18.19 RCW, and mental health counselors, marriage and family
therapists, and social workers licensed under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1
through 15 of this act).

(d) "Mental health
services" means outpatient services.

(2) Consistent with
federal and state law and rule, no contract between a mental health care
practitioner and an intermediary or between a mental health care practitioner
and a health carrier that is written, amended, or renewed after June 6, 1996,
may contain a provision prohibiting a practitioner and an enrollee from
agreeing to contract for services solely at the expense of the enrollee as
follows:

(a) On the exhaustion
of the enrollee's mental health care coverage;

(b) During an appeal or
an adverse certification process;

(c) When an enrollee's
condition is excluded from coverage; or

(d) For any other
clinically appropriate reason at any time.

(3) If a mental health
care practitioner provides services to an enrollee during an appeal or adverse
certification process, the practitioner must provide to the enrollee written
notification that the enrollee is responsible for payment of these services,
unless the health carrier elects to pay for services provided.

(4) This section does
not apply to a mental health care practitioner who is employed full time on the
staff of a health carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. A new section is added
to chapter 70.02 RCW to read as follows:

Mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers licensed under
chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act) are subject to this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
35. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
36. Sections 1 through 15 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
37. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 18.19.070 (Council established--Membership--Qualifications‑-Removal--Vacancy--Duties
and powers--Compensation) and 1996 c 191 s 4, 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 501, 1991 c 3 s
22, & 1987 c 512 s 7;

(2) RCW 18.19.110 (Certification of social
workers) and 1991 c 3 s 26 & 1987 c 512 s 12;

(3) RCW 18.19.120 (Certification of mental
health counselors--Practice defined--Continuing education) and 1995 c 183 s 1,
1991 c 3 s 27, & 1987 c 512 s 13;

(4) RCW 18.19.130 (Certification of marriage
and family therapists‑-Practice defined) and 1993 c 259 s 1, 1991 c 3 s
28, & 1987 c 512 s 14;

(5) RCW 18.19.140 (Applications for
certification) and 1991 c 3 s 29 & 1987 c 512 s 17;

(6) RCW 18.19.150 (Examination of applicants
for certification) and 1991 c 3 s 30 & 1987 c 512 s 16;

(7) RCW 18.19.160 (Certification of persons
credentialed out-of-state--Temporary retirement of certified persons) and 1991
c 3 s 31 & 1987 c 512 s 19; and

(8) RCW 18.19.170 (Renewal of
certificates--Continuing education) and 1998 c 32 s 1, 1996 c 191 s 6, 1991 c 3
s 32, & 1987 c 512 s 15.

---
END ---