BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.44.042 and 1996 c
116 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as expressly
provided in this section for nonliftable steering axles on a refuse collection
vehicle, and subject to the maximum gross weights specified in RCW
46.44.041, it is unlawful to operate any vehicle upon the public highways with
a gross weight, including load, upon any tire concentrated upon the surface of
the highway in excess of six hundred pounds per inch width of such tire. An
axle manufactured after July 31, 1993, carrying more than ten thousand pounds
gross weight must be equipped with four or more tires. Effective January 1,
1997, an axle carrying more than ten thousand pounds gross weight must have
four or more tires, regardless of date of manufacture. Instead of the four or
more tires per axle requirements of this section, an axle may be equipped with
two tires limited to five hundred pounds per inch width of tire. This section
does not apply to vehicles operating under oversize or overweight permits, or
both, issued under RCW 46.44.090, while carrying a nonreducible load.

The following equipment
may operate at six hundred pounds per inch width of tire: (1) Except for a
refuse collection vehicle, a nonliftable steering axle or axles on the
power unit; (2) a tiller axle on fire fighting apparatus; (3) a rear booster
trailing axle equipped with two tires on a ready-mix concrete transit truck;
and (4) a straddle trailer manufactured before January 1, 1996, equipped with
single-tire axles or a single axle using a walking beam supported by two in-line
single tires and used exclusively for the transport of fruit bins between
field, storage, and processing. A straddle trailer manufactured after January
1, 1996, meeting this use criteria may carry five hundred fifteen pounds per
inch width of tire on sixteen and one-half inch wide tires. The maximum
wheel load for a nonliftable steering axle on a refuse collection vehicle is
the load limit of the tire as certified by the state patrol.

For the purpose of this
section, the width of tire in case of solid rubber or hollow center cushion
tires, so long as the use thereof may be permitted by the law, shall be
measured between the flanges of the rim. For the purpose of this section, the
width of tires in case of pneumatic tires shall be the maximum overall normal
inflated width as stipulated by the manufacturer when inflated to the pressure
specified and without load thereon.

The
department of transportation, under rules adopted by the transportation
commission with respect to state highways, and a local authority, with respect
to a public highway under its jurisdiction, may extend the weight table in RCW
46.44.041 to one hundred fifteen thousand pounds. However, the extension must
be in compliance with federal law, and vehicles operating under the extension
must be in full compliance with the 1997 axle and tire requirements under this
section.

--- END ---