BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. DEFINITIONS. The following words or
terms shall have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise.

(1)
"Committee" means the fire alarm advisory committee. The advisory
committee consists of eight members and shall be advisory to the state director
of fire protection. Membership is as follows: Two members must be fire alarm
contractors, one member must be a fire alarm certificate of competency member,
one member must be a certified fire alarm technician, one member must be an
active member of the Washington state association of fire chiefs, one member
must be an active member of the Washington state fire marshals association, one
member must be a building or electrical code official who is professionally
competent in fire alarm system plan review and inspection, and one member must
be a member of the public not associated with the fire alarm industry. The
state director of fire protection is a nonvoting member.

(2) "Director of
fire protection" means the officer appointed under RCW 43.43.938.

(3) "Fire alarm
certificate of competency holder" or "certificate of competency
holder" means an individual who holds a national institute for
certification in engineering technologies level 2 fire alarm technician
classification certification, or has satisfactorily met the qualifications and
has received a certificate of competency from the state director of fire
protection under this chapter.

(4) "Fire alarm
system contractor" means a person or organization that offers to undertake
the preparation of technical drawings, design, sale, construction, addition,
alteration, modification, repair, test, inspection, service, or maintenance of
a fire alarm system, its parts or related equipment, or any part of such a
system.

(5) "Fire alarm
system technician" means a person who has met the qualification
requirements adopted by rule, and has been certified to engage in installing,
connecting, altering, repairing, or adding to a fire alarm system or a
journeyman electrician who has successfully completed the fire alarm training
element.

(6) "Fire alarm
system trainee" means a person who is learning the fire alarm installation
trade and may work in the fire alarm trade if under the direct supervision of a
certified fire alarm system technician. All individuals learning the fire
alarm trade shall obtain a fire alarm training certificate from the state
director of fire protection. An annual fee shall be charged. The amount of
the fee shall be set by rule. The holder of the fire alarm training
certificate shall renew the certificate annually. At the time of renewal, the
holder shall provide the state director of fire protection with an accurate
list of the training certificate holder's employers in the fire alarm industry
for the previous year, and the number of hours worked for each employer. Any
person who has been issued a fire alarm training certificate, may work under
the direct supervision and control of a fire alarm system technician.
Supervision shall consist of the person being on the same job site. A
certified fire alarm system technician shall be on the same job as the trainee
for one hundred percent of each working day. The ratio of fire alarm trainees
to certified fire alarm system technicians on a job site shall not be more than
two trainees to each fire alarm system technician. The fire alarm trainee
shall at all times carry an identification card containing identifying
information as prescribed by the state director of fire protection and shall be
produced on demand by a state, city, or county official. The state director of
fire protection shall supply this card at a fee which shall be related to the
cost of producing the card.

(7) "Fire alarm
system" means a system or portion of a combination system consisting of
components and circuits arranged to monitor and annunciate the status of fire
alarm or supervisory signal‑initiating devices and to initiate the
appropriate response to those signals as set forth in national fire protection
association 72 ‑ 1996.

(8) "Fire alarm
system contractor's license" means the license issued by the state
director of fire protection to a fire alarm system contractor, upon an
application being approved, the fee being paid, the required bond being
secured, and the satisfactory completion of the requirements of this chapter.
The license shall be issued in the name of the fire alarm system contractor
with the name or names of the certificate of competency holder noted thereon.

(9) "General
electrical contractor license" means the license issued under RCW
19.28.041 to grant the holder the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the
business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry electric
current, and installing or maintaining equipment, or installing or maintaining
material to fasten or insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by
electric current.

(10)
"Inspection" means a visual examination of a fire alarm system or
portion of the system to verify that the system appears to be in operating
condition and is free from physical damage and complies with the applicable
statutes and regulations adopted by the state director of fire protection.

(11)
"Installation" means the initial placement of fire alarm system
equipment or the extension, modification, or alteration of equipment or
software after the initial placement.

(12) "Journeyman
electrician" means a person who has been issued a journeyman electrician
certificate of competency by the state department of labor and industries.

(13) "Limited fire
alarm certificate of competency holder" means a person with limited
certification restricted to working on premises or that part of the premises,
actually owned or leased, and occupied by, the limited certificate holder's
employer. A limited fire alarm certificate of competency holder is limited to working
on the properties owned or leased by the limited fire alarm certificate of
competency holder's employer, to the level of competence, as certified and
documented to the fire protection bureau by the limited certificate holder's
employer.

(14) "Maintenance"
means to maintain in the condition of repair that provides performance as
originally planned.

(15)
"Organization" means a corporation, partnership, firm, or other
business association; governmental entity; or any other legal or commercial
entity.

(16) "Person"
means a natural person, including an owner, manager, partner, officer,
employee, or occupant.

(17)
"Service" means to repair.

(18) "Specialty
electrical contractor license" means the license issued under RCW
19.28.041 to grant the holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry
on the business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electrical current, and installing or maintaining equipment, or installing or
maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or equipment to be
operated by electric current as expressly allowed by the license.

(18)
"Testing" means periodic inspections and tests required to keep the
fire alarm system and its component parts in an operative condition at all
times as set forth in national fire protection association 72 ‑ 1996.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. LOCAL GOVERNMENT LICENSES
AND PERMIT REQUIREMENTS. A municipality or county may not enact an order,
ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring a fire alarm system contractor to
obtain a fire alarm contractor license from the municipality or county.
However, a municipality or county or the state may require a fire alarm system
contractor to obtain a permit and pay a fee for the installation of a fire
alarm system and require the installation of such systems to conform with the
building code, fire code, local amendments, or other construction requirements
of the municipality or county, but may not impose financial responsibility
requirements other than proof of a valid license.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. EXEMPTIONS FROM CHAPTER.
This chapter does not apply to:

(1) United States,
state, and local government employees; building officials, fire marshals, or
fire inspectors; or insurance inspectors when acting in their official
capacities;

(2) A person or
organization acting under court order;

(3) A person or organization
that sells or supplies products or materials to a licensed fire alarm system
contractor;

(4) A registered
professional fire protection engineer acting solely in a professional capacity;
or

(5) An owner or
occupant of a single‑family residence performing his or her own
installation in that residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. STATE DIRECTOR OF FIRE
PROTECTION‑-DUTIES. (1) This chapter shall be administered by the state
director of fire protection.

(2) The state director
of fire protection has the authority and the duty to establish necessary rules
for:

(a) The administration
and enforcement of this chapter;

(b) Setting reasonable
fees for licenses, certificates, testing, plan review, inspection, and other
aspects necessary for the administration of this chapter;

(c) Conducting
investigations of complaints to determine if any infractions of this chapter or
the regulations developed under this chapter have occurred;

(d) Working with the
fire alarm advisory board consisting of fire alarm system contractors and other
related officials;

(e) Assigning a
certificate number to each certificate of competency holder; and

(f) Adopting rules
necessary to implement and administer a program which requires the affixation
of a seal any time a fire alarm system is designed, installed, maintained,
inspected, or tested. The seal shall include the certificate number of the
certificate of competency holder who, in whole or in part, designed, installed,
maintained, inspected, or tested the fire alarm system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. CONTRACTOR LICENSE. (1)
To become a licensed fire alarm system contractor under this chapter, a person
or firm must comply with the following requirements of the state director of fire
protection. The contractor shall:

(a) Be or have in his
or her full‑time employ a holder of a valid certificate of competency;

(b) Comply with the
minimum insurance requirements of this chapter;

(c) Make application to
the state director of fire protection for a license and pay the fees required;

(d) Show evidence of
the required bond being held;

(e) Post each license
issued under this chapter in a conspicuous place in the fire alarm system
contractor's place of business; and

(f) Prominently display
the license number on all bids, advertisements, proposals, offers, and
installation drawings for fire alarm systems.

(2)(a) If the
certificate of competency holder leaves the employment of the fire alarm system
contractor, the contractor shall notify the state director of fire protection
within thirty days.

(b) If the certificate
of competency holder leaves the employment of the fire alarm system contractor,
the contractor has thirty days to submit a new application identifying another
certificate of competency holder. If an application is not received and a new
license issued, the state director of fire protection shall revoke the license
of the fire alarm system contractor.

(3)(a) All licensed
fire alarm system contractors shall annually, on dates and for an amount
established by rule, secure from the state director of fire protection a
renewal license upon payment of a fee. Application for renewal shall be upon a
form prescribed by the state director of fire protection and the license holder
shall furnish the information required by the director.

(b) Failure of any
license holder to secure a renewal license within sixty days after the due date
is sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend the
license.

(c) The state director
of fire protection may, upon the receipt of payment of all delinquent fees
including a late charge, restore a license that has been suspended for failure
to pay the renewal fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. ACTIONS AGAINST FIRE
ALARM SYSTEM CONTRACTORS‑-GROUNDS‑-APPEAL. (1) The state director
of fire protection may refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke the
privilege of a licensed fire alarm system contractor to engage in the fire
alarm system business or, in lieu thereof, impose monetary penalties as adopted
by rule for any of the following reasons:

(a) Gross incompetence
or gross negligence in the preparation of technical drawings, design, sale,
construction, installation, repair, inspection, testing, maintenance, addition,
alteration, modification, or servicing of a fire alarm system or its parts or
related equipment;

(b) Conviction of a
felony;

(c) Fraudulent or
dishonest practices while engaging in the fire alarm system business;

(d) Use of false
evidence or misrepresentation in an application for a fire alarm system contractor's
license;

(e) Permitting his or
her license to be used in connection with the preparation of any technical
drawings which have not been prepared by him or her personally or under his or
her immediate supervision or in violation of this chapter; or

(f) Knowingly violating
this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter.

(2) The state director
of fire protection shall permanently revoke the license of a fire alarm system
contractor who engages in the fire alarm system business while suspended.

(3) The state director
of fire protection has the power, in case of serious noncompliance with this
chapter, to revoke or suspend for a period determined by the director any fire
alarm system contractor's license issued under this chapter. The state director
of fire protection shall notify the fire alarm system contractor by certified
mail. A revocation or suspension is effective twenty days after the holder
receives the notice. An appeal may be filed within twenty days after notice of
the revocation or suspension is given by certified mail sent to the address of
the holder of the fire alarm system contractor's license as shown on the
application for the fire alarm system contractor's license, and shall be
effected by filing a written notice of appeal with the state director of fire
protection. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. CERTIFICATE OF COMPETENCY
HOLDER. (1) Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall fulfill the
requirements established by the state director of fire protection.

(2) To become a
certificate of competency holder under this chapter, an applicant must have
successfully passed an examination administered by the state director of fire
protection. A certificate of competency holder can satisfy this examination
requirement by presenting a copy of his or her current certificate from the
national institute for certification in engineering technologies showing that
the applicant has achieved the classification of fire alarm systems technician
level 2. This examination requirement is mandatory except as otherwise
provided in this chapter.

(3) All bids,
advertisements, proposals, offers, installation drawings, final acceptance test
forms, and inspection or testing forms for fire alarm systems must prominently
display the fire alarm system contractor's certificate of competency holder's
stamp.

(4) The fire alarm
certificate of competency holder shall at all times carry an identification
card containing identifying information as prescribed by the state director of
fire protection and shall be produced on demand by a state, city, or county
fire official. The state director of fire protection shall supply this card at
a fee which is related to the cost of producing the card.

(5) The fire alarm
system contractor's certificate of competency holder must be present during the
final acceptance tests of fire alarm systems designed by the holder.

(6) The initial
certificate of competency or license fee shall be prorated based upon the
portion of the year the certificate of competency or license is in effect,
prior to renewal on January 1st.

(7) In no case shall a
certificate of competency holder be employed full time by more than one fire
alarm system contractor.

(8) If the certificate
of competency holder leaves the employment of the fire alarm system contractor,
the certificate of competency holder shall notify the state director of fire
protection within thirty days.

(9) A certificate of
competency or license issued under this chapter is not transferable.

(10) All certificate of
competency holders shall annually, on dates and for an amount established by
rule, secure from the state director of fire protection a renewal certificate
of competency upon payment of a fee. Application for renewal shall be upon a
form prescribed by the state director of fire protection and the certificate
holder shall furnish the information required by the director.

(11) Failure of any
certificate of competency holder to secure a renewal certificate of competency
within sixty days after the due date is sufficient cause for the state director
of fire protection to suspend the certificate of competency.

(12) The state director
of fire protection may, upon the receipt of payment of all delinquent fees
including a late charge, restore a certificate of competency that has been
suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. EXCEPTION TO THE REQUIRED
CERTIFICATE OF COMPETENCY PERSONAL. For one year after the effective date of
this section a company may list at least one individual attempting to qualify
for a certificate of competency. An individual has one year to obtain this
certificate and comply with this chapter. If after one year the company is
unable to provide for the requirement of certificate of competency holder, all
operations pertaining to the installation of fire alarm system contracting
shall cease.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. VOLUNTARY RELINQUISHMENT
OF CERTIFICATE OF COMPETENCY. A certificate of competency holder may
voluntarily surrender the certificate of competency to the state director of
fire protection and be relieved of the annual renewal fee. After surrendering
the certificate of competency, he or she may not be known as a certificate of
competency holder and shall cease operations. Within two years from the time
of surrender of the certificate of competency, he or she may qualify for a
certificate of competency, without examination, by the payment of the required
fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she must apply as a new
applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. ACTIONS AGAINST
CERTIFICATE OF COMPETENCY HOLDER‑-GROUNDS‑-APPEAL. (1) The state
director of fire protection may refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or
revoke the privilege of a fire alarm certificate of competency holder to engage
in the fire alarm system business or, in lieu thereof, impose monetary
penalties as adopted by rule for any of the following reasons:

(a) Gross incompetence
or gross negligence in the preparation of technical drawings, design, sale,
construction, installation, repair, inspection, testing, maintenance, addition,
alteration, modification, or servicing of a fire alarm system or its parts or
related equipment;

(b) Conviction of a
felony;

(c) Fraudulent or
dishonest practices while engaging in the fire alarm system business;

(d) Use of false
evidence or misrepresentation in an application for a license or certificate of
competency;

(e) Permitting his or
her license to be used in connection with the preparation of any technical
drawings which have not been prepared by him or her personally or under his or
her immediate supervision or in violation of this chapter; or

(f) Knowingly violating
this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter.

(2) The state director
of fire protection shall permanently revoke the license of a certificate of
competency holder who engages in the fire alarm system business while the
certificate of competency is suspended.

(3) The state director
of fire protection has the power, in case of serious noncompliance with this
chapter, to revoke or suspend for a period determined by the director any fire
alarm certificate of competency issued under this chapter. The state director
of fire protection shall notify the certificate of competency holder by
certified mail. A revocation or suspension is effective twenty days after the
holder receives the notice. Any revocation or suspension is subject to review
by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of a
revocation or suspension until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall
be filed within twenty days after notice of the revocation or suspension is
given by certified mail sent to the address of the holder of the license or
certificate as shown on the application for the license or certificate of
competency holder, and shall be effected by filing a written notice of appeal
with the state director of fire protection, accompanied by a certified check
for two hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the holder of the license
or certificate of competency if the decision of the agency is not sustained by
the board. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. CERTIFIED FIRE ALARM
SYSTEM TECHNICIAN. (1) Every applicant for certification as a fire alarm
system technician shall fulfill the requirements established by the state
director of fire protection.

(2) To become a
certified fire alarm system technician under this chapter, an applicant must
have satisfactorily passed an examination administered by the state director of
fire protection. A fire alarm system technician can satisfy the examination
requirement by presenting a copy of his or her current certificate from the
national institute for certification in engineering technologies showing that
the applicant has achieved the classification of fire alarm systems technician
level 2. This examination requirement is mandatory except as otherwise
provided in this chapter.

(3) The certified fire
alarm system technician shall at all times carry an identification card
containing identifying information as prescribed by the state director of fire
protection and shall be produced on demand by a state, city, or county fire
official. The state director of fire protection shall supply this card at a
fee which is related to the cost of producing the card.

(4) A fire alarm system
technician certification issued under this chapter is not transferable.

(5) All certified fire
alarm system technicians that desire to continue shall annually, on dates and
for an amount established by rule, secure from the state director of fire
protection a renewal fire alarm system technician certificate upon payment of a
fee. Application for renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state
director of fire protection and the certificate holder shall furnish the
information required by the director.

(6) Failure of any fire
alarm system technician certificate holder to secure a renewal certificate of
competency within sixty days after the due date is sufficient cause for the
state director of fire protection to suspend the fire alarm system technician
certificate.

(7) The state director
of fire protection may, upon the receipt of payment of all delinquent fees
including a late charge, restore a fire alarm system technician certificate
that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.

(8) For one year after
the effective date of this section a company may list individuals attempting to
qualify for a fire alarm system technician certificate with the director of
fire protection. These individuals have one year to obtain this certificate
and comply with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. VOLUNTARY RELINQUISHMENT
OF FIRE ALARM SYSTEM TECHNICIAN CERTIFICATE. A fire alarm system technician
certificate holder may voluntarily surrender a fire alarm system technician
certificate to the state director of fire protection and be relieved of the annual
renewal fee. After surrendering the fire alarm system technician certificate,
he or she may not be known as a certified fire alarm system technician and
shall cease operations. Within two years from the time of surrender of the
fire alarm system technician certificate, he or she may qualify for a fire
alarm system technician certificate, without examination, by the payment of the
required fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she must apply as a new
applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. FIRE ALARM SYSTEM
TECHNICIAN CERTIFICATE HOLDER‑-GROUNDS‑-APPEAL. (1) The state
director of fire protection may refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or
revoke the privilege of a fire alarm system technician certificate holder to
engage in the fire alarm system business or, in lieu thereof, impose monetary
penalties as adopted by rule for any of the following reasons:

(a) Gross incompetence
or gross negligence in the construction, installation, repair, inspection,
testing, maintenance, addition, alteration, modification, or servicing of a
fire alarm system or its parts or related equipment;

(b) Conviction of a
felony;

(c) Fraudulent or
dishonest practices while engaging in the fire alarm system business;

(d) Use of false evidence
or misrepresentation in an application for a license or fire alarm system
technician certificate; or

(e) Knowingly violating
this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter.

(2) The state director
of fire protection shall permanently revoke the certificate of a fire alarm
system technician who engages in the fire alarm system business while the fire
alarm system technician certificate is suspended.

(3) The state director
of fire protection has the power, in case of serious noncompliance with this chapter,
to revoke or suspend for a period determined by the director any fire alarm
system technician certificate issued under this chapter. The state director of
fire protection shall notify the fire alarm system technician certificate
holder by certified mail. A revocation or suspension is effective twenty days
after the holder receives the notice. Any revocation or suspension is subject
to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect
of a revocation or suspension until the board makes its decision. The appeal
shall be filed within twenty days after notice of the revocation or suspension
is given by certified mail sent to the address of the holder of the license or
certificate as shown on the application for the license or fire alarm system
technician certificate, and shall be effected by filing a written notice of
appeal with the state director of fire protection, accompanied by a certified
check for two hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the holder of the
license or fire alarm system technician certificate if the decision of the
agency is not sustained by the board. The hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. FIRE ALARM SYSTEM
CONTRACTOR'S LICENSE FUND CREATED. The fire alarm system contractor's license
fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
license and certificate fees and charges or from the money generated by the
rules and local regulations adopted under this chapter shall be deposited into
the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for purposes authorized
under this chapter. Only the state director of fire protection, or the
director's designee, may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. LOCAL GOVERNMENT
REGULATION‑-APPLICATION TO STATE AND GOVERNMENT CONTRACTORS. (1) This
chapter does not limit the power of a municipality, county, or the state to
regulate the quality and character of work performed by contractors through a
system of permits, fees, and inspections that are designed to assure compliance
with and aid in the implementation of state and local building laws or to
enforce other local laws for the protection of the public health and safety.
This chapter does not limit the power of the municipality, county, or the state
to adopt any system of permits requiring submission for approval by the
municipality, county, or the state of technical drawings and specifications for
work to be performed by contractors before commencement of the work. The
official authorized to issue approval must require evidence of a valid fire
alarm system contractor's license.

(2) This chapter
applies to any fire alarm system contractor performing work for any
municipality, county, or the state. Officials of any municipality, county, or
the state are required to determine compliance with this chapter before
awarding any contracts for the installation, repair, service, alteration,
fabrication, addition, or inspection of a fire alarm system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. SURETY BOND‑-SECURITY
DEPOSIT‑-VENUE AND TIME LIMIT FOR ACTIONS UPON BONDS‑-LIMIT OF
LIABILITY OF SURETY‑-PAYMENT OF CLAIMS. (1) Before granting a license
under this chapter, the director of fire protection shall require that the
applicant file with the state director of fire protection a surety bond issued
by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW in a form
acceptable to the director of fire protection running to the state of
Washington in the penal sum of four thousand dollars. The bond shall be
conditioned that the applicant will pay all purchasers of fire alarm systems
with whom the applicant has a contract for the applicant to install, inspect,
maintain, or service a fire alarm system, and who have obtained a judgment
against the applicant for the breach of such a contract. The term
"purchaser" means an owner of property who has entered into a
contract for the installation of a fire alarm system on that property, or a
contractor who contracts to install, inspect, maintain, or service such a
system with an owner of property and subcontracts the work to the applicant.
No other person, including, but not limited to, persons who supply labor,
materials, or rental equipment to the applicant, has any rights against the
bond.

(2) In lieu of the
surety bond required by this section the applicant may file with the director
of fire protection a deposit consisting of cash or other security acceptable to
the director of fire protection in an amount equal to the penal sum to the
required bond. The director of fire protection may adopt rules necessary for
the proper administration of the security.

(3) Before granting
renewal of a fire alarm system contractor's license to any applicant, the
director of fire protection shall require that the applicant file with the
director satisfactory evidence that the surety bond or cash deposit is in full
force.

(4) Any purchaser of a
fire alarm system having a claim against the license for the breach of a
contract for the licensee to install, inspect, maintain, or service a fire
alarm system may bring suit upon such bond in superior court of the county in
which the work was done or of any county in which jurisdiction of the license
may be had. Any such action must be brought not later than one year after the
expiration of the licensee's license or renewal license then in effect at the
time of the alleged breach of contract.

(5) The bond shall be
considered one continuous obligation, and the surety upon the bond shall not be
liable in aggregate or cumulative amount exceeding four thousand dollars regardless
of the number of years the bond is in effect, or whether it is reinstated,
renewed, reissued, or otherwise continued, and regardless of the year in which
any claim accrued. The bond shall not be liable for any liability of the
licensee for tortuous acts, whether or not such liability is imposed by statute
or common law, or is imposed by contract. The bond shall not be a substitute
or supplemental to any liability or other insurance required by law or by the
contract.

(6) If the surety
desires to make payment without awaiting court action against it, the amount of
the bond shall be reduced to the extent of any payment made by the surety in
good faith under the bond. Any payment shall be based on final judgments
received by the surety.

(7) Claims against the
bond shall be satisfied from the bond in the following order:

(a) Claims by a
purchase of a fire alarm system for the breach of a contract for the licensee
to install, inspect, maintain, or service a fire alarm system;

(b) Any court costs,
interest, and attorneys' fees the plaintiff may be entitled to recover by
contract, statute, or court rule. A condition precedent to the surety being
liable to any claimant is a final judgment against the licensee, unless the
surety desires to make payment without awaiting court action. In the event of
a dispute regarding the apportionment of the bond proceeds among claimants, the
surety may bring an action for interpleader against all claimants upon the
bond.

(8) Any purchaser of a fire
alarm system having an unsatisfied final judgment against the licensee for the
breach of a contract for the licensee to install, inspect, maintain, or service
a fire alarm system may execute upon the security held by the director of fire
protection by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied final judgment by
registered or certified mail upon the director within one year of the date of
entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of such certified copy,
the director shall pay or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of
the court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied
judgment. The priority of payment by the director shall be the order of
receipt by the director, but the director shall have no liability for payment
in excess of the amount of the deposit.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. UNLICENSED OPERATIONS‑-PENALTY.
Any person who offers to contract for the preparation of technical drawings,
sale, installation, repair, construction, inspection, testing, maintenance,
addition, alteration, design, modification, or servicing of a fire alarm system
or its parts or related equipment in any occupancy, except an owner‑occupied
single‑family dwelling, without first obtaining a fire alarm system
contractor's license from the state of Washington, is guilty of a civil
offense. This section does not create any criminal liability for a prime
contractor or an owner of an occupancy unless it is proved that the prime
contractor or owner had actual knowledge of an illegal construction,
installation, or maintenance of a fire alarm system by a fire alarm system
contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. ENFORCEMENT‑-CIVIL
PROCEEDINGS. Civil proceedings to enforce this chapter may be brought by the
attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of any county where a violation
occurs on his or her own motion or at the request of the state director of fire
protection.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. PROSPECTIVE APPLICATION.
This chapter applies prospectively only and not retroactively. A municipal or
county order, ordinance, rule, or regulation that is in effect on the effective
date of this section is not invalid because of the provisions of this chapter.
This chapter does not prohibit municipalities or counties from adopting
stricter guidelines that will assure the proper installation of fire alarm
systems within their jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. Sections 1 through 21 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---