BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 2.70 RCW

_5 to read as follows:

_6 The director of the office of public defense shall,
after

_7 consultation with the Washington association of criminal
defense

_8 lawyers and the Washington defender's association,
prepare and

_9 issue a request for proposal for services for the
establishment of

10 a capital defense assistance center which shall be a
nonprofit

11 corporation or an office within an existing public
defender

12 association.

13 The request for proposal shall request information
concerning

14 the experience, training, and certification of the
proposed

15 service providers. The selection of the service
provider shall

16 not be based upon cost alone.

17 The capital defense assistance center shall: (1)
Assist trial

18 and appellate counsel defending persons accused of
capital

p. 1 SB
5881

_1 offenses as sole or associate counsel; and (2) conduct
training

_2 for defense counsel toward certification under the
Superior Court

_3 Special Proceedings Rules - Criminal.

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The sum of one hundred
thousand

_5 dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated

_6 from the general fund to the office of public defense
for the

_7 fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, to carry out the
purposes of

_8 this act.

_9 (2) The sum of two hundred thirty‑five
thousand dollars, or as

10 much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general

11 fund to the office of public defense for the fiscal year
ending

12 June 30, 2003, to carry out the purposes of this act.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5881 p. 2