BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to expedite the minimization of the risk of employees incurring
musculoskeletal disorders. The legislature recognizes that prior to the
adoption of the state's ergonomics rule, musculoskeletal disorder injuries were
reduced more than twenty-eight percent over a seven-year period through
voluntary efforts by employers and employees, and that more research,
information, and education on reducing musculoskeletal disorders will greatly
facilitate further reduction of these disorders. The legislature recognizes
that both employers and employees have a number of existing incentives, both
monetary and nonmonetary, to reduce musculoskeletal disorders, but that most
employers and employees are not informed about what practices, products, and
equipment are known to reduce these disorders. The legislature recognizes the
wide diversity in cost estimates to comply with the state's rules, and the need
to carefully analyze the costs to comply with the rules by employers and
government agencies and the need to determine how to maximize reduction of
musculoskeletal disorders in the most cost-effective way. The legislature
further recognizes that there are many questions and concerns about
implementation of the state's rules. Therefore, the legislature wishes to
accelerate ergonomics awareness education. The legislature also wants to
ensure that pilot demonstration projects for various industries, as contained
in the department's implementation plan for the agency's rules to reduce musculoskeletal
disorder, are carried out for key industries; that alternative musculoskeletal
disorder reduction techniques can be tried; that certain information is
obtained from all projects; and that the projects are initiated and completed
so information to reduce injuries can be distributed as soon as possible, and
the legislature and all interested parties can review the results of the
projects. The legislature also wishes to have the joint legislative audit and
review committee review the rules adopted by the department of labor and
industries, and the results of the pilot demonstration projects, and make
recommendations regarding the rules, alternatives to the rules, and the need
for implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
directs the department to accelerate the dissemination of ergonomics awareness
education to employers and employees to the maximum extent possible within
existing resources. The department shall make any necessary adjustments to the
use of their resources to produce musculoskeletal disorder prevention and
awareness education for employers and employees that is written, on-line, or
available through other media, as determined to be cost-effective by the
department, at the earliest date possible for use on a voluntary basis. The
department shall obtain input from employers and employees from large and small
businesses and units of government in preparing these materials.

(2) The department
shall carry out comprehensive pilot demonstration projects on the technological
and economic feasibility of implementing the rules adopted on May 26, 2000, by
the director of the department of labor and industries and codified as WAC 296-62-05101
through 296-62-05176. The department shall, at the earliest date possible and
within existing resources, establish pilot demonstration projects for
industries first required to come into compliance with the rule. Demonstration
projects for each of these industries shall include at least five employers
with twenty-five or fewer employees, five employers with twenty-five to fifty
employees, and five employers with over fifty employees, who volunteer to
participate and who shall not be subject to any enforcement action as a result
of the project. The department may establish more than one pilot demonstration
project for each industry as it deems necessary. The pilot demonstration
projects for these industries shall be completed, to the maximum extent
possible, by July 1, 2003. The goal of each pilot demonstration project shall
be:

(a) To test the
implementation of the rule as adopted and based on a set of draft practices
agreed to by the participants with the advice of the department, and to report
at a minimum on the following:

(i) The cost of
implementation including but not limited to monetary expenditures, both direct
and indirect, and time for participating employers;

(ii) The ease of
implementation and any implementation problems participants identify;

(iii) Any
recommendations participants have to modify the rule;

(iv) The cost to the
department to provide necessary technical assistance to employers to assist
participants to implement the rule; and

(v) The effectiveness
of the rule in reducing musculoskeletal disorders; and

(b) The results of
allowing some participants, if they choose, to test alternatives to the rule in
an effort to reduce musculoskeletal disorders and to provide the following
information on each alternative tried:

(i) A clear description
of the alternative;

(ii) The cost of
implementation including but not limited to monetary expenditures, both direct
and indirect, and time for participating employers;

(iii) The ease of
implementation and any implementation problems participants identify;

(iv) Any
recommendations participants have to modify the alternative;

(v) The cost to the
department to provide necessary technical assistance to employers to assist
them in implementing the alternative; and

(vi) The effectiveness of
the alternative in reducing musculoskeletal disorders.

(3) To the extent
possible within existing resources, the department of labor and industries
shall provide periodic information to the industries identified in subsection
(2) of this section and any other industries deemed appropriate by the
department on practices, equipment, and products that have been identified by
the department as being effective in reducing musculoskeletal disorders.

(4) This section
expires June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 44.28 RCW to read as follows:

The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct a review of the rule as adopted and
the results of all demonstration projects arranged by the department to assess
and make recommendations, including but not limited to:

(1) Review of the
literature regarding the scientific justification for the rules, the
expectation that the rules will reduce musculoskeletal disorders, and the
degree to which the rules would reduce injury;

(2) The accuracy of the
cost-benefit analyses prepared for the department rule;

(3) The ease of
understanding and complying with the rule, identification of ambiguities and
difficulties encountered during the demonstration projects to implement the
rule, and recommendations to maximize understanding and minimize ambiguities
and confusion for employers in complying with the rule;

(4) Ease of
implementation of the rule based on the results of the pilot projects and recommendations
on how to facilitate easier implementation and reduce costs while maintaining
or increasing the reduction of musculoskeletal disorders;

(5) Results of any
demonstration projects using alternative methods to reduce musculoskeletal
disorders and the cost-effectiveness of each of the alternatives;

(6) Expected
musculoskeletal disorder reductions as a result of the rule and any
alternatives to the rule that were the subject of a demonstration project;

(7) Costs to comply
with the rule and any alternative methods to reduce musculoskeletal disorders,
based on the result of the demonstration projects; and

(8) Any other analysis,
finding, or recommendation the committee deems useful in assessing
effectiveness in reducing musculoskeletal disorders.

The committee shall
report its finding by January 1st of each calendar year and shall issue a
complete report by January 1, 2004.

Funding for this
program will be taken from the reserves of the medical aid fund that are in
excess of actuarial needs.

This section expires
June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

The department may
adopt rules regarding the prevention of musculoskeletal disorders, also known
as ergonomics rules, however, such rules shall provide for implementation no
earlier than:

(1) July 1, 2005, for
all employers in Standard Industrial Classification codes 078, 152, 174, 175,
176, 177, 242, 421, 451, 541, 805, and 836 who employ fifty or more annual
full-time equivalents in Washington state, and for the Washington state
department of labor and industries;

(2) July 1, 2006, for
the remaining employers in Standard Industrial Classification codes 078, 152,
174, 175, 176, 177, 242, 421, 451, 541, 805, and 836, and all other employers
who employ fifty or more annual full-time equivalents in Washington state;

(3) July 1, 2007, for
all other employers employing eleven to forty-nine annual full-time equivalents
in Washington state; and

(4) July 1, 2008, for
all other employers employing ten or fewer annual full-time equivalents in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The director, in
consultation with the WISHA advisory committee, shall establish a program to
provide safety and health impact grants to prevent injuries and illnesses, save
lives, and educate Washington employees and employers about work place hazards
and safe work place practices. The intent of sections 5 through 11 of this act
is to benefit, in the broadest sense possible, Washington workers and
employers, especially those who are in small business and may lack the injury
and illness prevention resources that larger companies may possess. The
department may use appropriated industrial insurance funds to accomplish the
purpose of sections 5 through 11 of this act. Funding for this program will be
taken from the reserves of the medical aid fund that are in excess of actuarial
needs.

(2) Using a competitive
application process, the department shall award up to five million dollars per
year in safety and health impact grants to trade associations, business
associations, employers, employee organizations, labor unions, and groups of
employees. The grants may include: (a) Education and training grants to implement
safety and health and to provide practical information, curricula, materials,
and methods intended for use by employers and employees in reducing work place
hazards; (b) technical innovation grants to develop engineering and other
technical solutions to injury and illness problems; or (c) best practice grants
for the application of hazard control. The department shall attempt to ensure
that best practice grants, in particular, are adequately represented in the
final awarding of grants. In addition, the department shall make reasonable
efforts to ensure that not less than twenty percent of the grant funds are used
to assist small employers and employees in small businesses to improve safety
and health in small firms.

(3) Applicants for
grants may form partnerships with educational institutions and other
organizations. Applicants for grants may form partnerships with self-insured
employers if the product of the grant will significantly benefit employees and
employers who belong to the state industrial insurance fund.

(4) Any materials,
designs, or equipment developed under these grants will be in the public domain
and shall not be copyrighted or patented. Any materials or designs developed
under these grants shall be provided to the department at no charge as a
condition of grant receipt.

(5) Grants shall not be
used to support or develop specific legislative or regulatory initiatives.

(6) The department
shall not use information contained in a grant application for inspection
activity or to establish a recognized hazard for enforcement or citation
purposes. The department shall not use the results of a grant to establish
that the grantee is subject to citation or penalty for violation of a safety
and health rule.

(7) All grants shall
contain an accountability component that shall evaluate the impact on work
place safety with results that are reported back to the safety and health impact
grant review committee. The department shall cooperate in providing available
data required to assist the grant recipients in measuring the impact.

(8) In order to
encourage the broadest level of participation, no grant application shall be
approved that proposes work that cannot be completed during the current
application year or biennium. Applicants that seek additional funding in
subsequent years will be eligible to submit new applications only if they have
successfully completed the work for which they were previously funded, and
these new applications will compete with all other applicants.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The director shall
appoint a safety and health impact grant review committee that will be a
subcommittee of the WISHA advisory committee. The review committee is composed
of nine members: Four members representing employees, each appointed from a
list of at least three names per position, submitted by recognized statewide
organizations of employees; four members representing employers, each appointed
from a list of at least three names per position, submitted by recognized
statewide organizations of employers; and one ex officio member, without a
vote, who shall represent the department. The committee chair shall be chosen
by the review committee and shall alternate between business and labor. The
committee members shall serve three-year renewable terms.

(2) Business and labor
members of the safety and health impact grant review committee are entitled to expenses
as provided under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The safety and
health impact grant review committee shall:

(a) Prepare requests
for proposals which shall include specific criteria and the weight to be given
to each of the criteria in awarding grants;

(b) Receive, review,
and process grant applications;

(c) Identify, by
two-thirds majority vote, grant applications that merit funding and forward
those applications to the director;

(d) Identify, by
two-thirds majority vote, funded grants that meet criteria for suspension or
revocation and forward those grants to the director; and

(e) Provide written
notification to those grant applicants that do not merit funding explaining the
reasons for denial.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The safety and health
impact grant review committee, in cooperation with the director, shall develop
grant application procedures and approval criteria. The director shall ensure
the proper administrative support to successfully monitor grant recipients for
compliance with grant criteria and all other procedures under the grant
program. The director in cooperation with the safety and health impact grant
review committee shall implement procedures and criteria for grant approval,
including procedures for suspension or revocation of grants to recipients
failing to comply with grant criteria established under the authority of this
section.

(2) The director shall
approve only those grant applications and their recommended acceptance
conditions as forwarded by the safety and health impact grant review committee,
unless the director has a compelling and substantive reason to reject an
application, whereupon the director shall provide written explanation for the
denial to the review committee. The safety and health impact grant review
committee shall review any grant applications rejected by the director and may
advise the director to reconsider. The director shall consider the advice, if
given, and shall approve the grant application with any conditions presented by
the safety and health impact grant review committee. The director may reject
that advice only for a compelling and substantive reason. If the director
rejects that advice, the safety and health impact grant review committee may
refer the application to the WISHA advisory committee. The WISHA advisory
committee shall review the application and may advise the director to
reconsider.

(3) The director may
revoke or suspend an issued grant if advised by the safety and health impact
grant review committee that the recipient is not in compliance with grant
criteria or procedures. The director may suspend an issued grant without the
advice of the safety and health impact grant review committee only for a
compelling and substantive reason and the suspension recommendation shall be
presented to the safety and health impact grant review committee for its
consideration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. For purposes of the
2001-2003 time frame, the director shall approve one grant application of up to
one million dollars per year, and its recommended acceptance conditions as
forwarded by the safety and health impact grant review committee, that is
selected by the employee representatives of the review committee, unless the
director has a compelling and substantive reason to reject the application,
whereupon the director shall provide written explanation for the denial to the
review committee. This grant shall be above and beyond the funding authorized
in section 5(2) of this act. The entire review committee, by the normal
two-thirds vote, shall forward such a grant proposal if the grant meets all
other criteria and accountability requirements. The specified time frame in
this section shall be determinative for meeting the grant duration requirements
in section 5(8) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The department and the
safety and health impact grant review committee will present an annual review
regarding the activities of the safety and health impact grant program to the
WISHA advisory committee, the workers' compensation advisory committee, and
make it available to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature.
Based on a recommendation of the WISHA advisory committee, the workers' compensation
advisory committee shall make a biennial recommendation to the director
concerning an appropriate budget for the program and the maximum amount of
individual grant awards.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The director and representatives
from the WISHA advisory committee shall perform a comprehensive review of the
grant program which shall include, but not be limited to, reported outcomes,
injury reduction, and safety awareness and shall issue a report to the
legislature by December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective July 1, 2005:

(1) Section 5 of this
act;

(2) Section 6 of this
act;

(3) Section 7 of this
act;

(4) Section 8 of this
act;

(5) Section 9 of this
act; and

(6) Section 10 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Sections 5 through 11 of
this act are each added to chapter 49.17 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1 through 4 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---