BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that water supply availability is an important consideration in planning for
future population growth, but that presently there is inadequate integration of
the information relating to existing water resources and current and forecasted
water use demands into the forecasts of population growth and growth management
planning to accommodate the forecasted growth. The legislature further finds
that public and private municipal water suppliers having a duty to serve new
growth within their service areas should have a greater role in the regional
growth management planning activities that will determine the location of new
growth for which adequate water service will be expected.

Therefore, the
legislature intends to better integrate water supply availability information
and water service planning into growth management planning and related land use
and infrastructure planning and programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.62 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The office of
financial management shall consider water supply availability in determining
growth management population planning projections under RCW 43.62.035.

(2) To assist the
office in obtaining information necessary to consider water supply availability
under this section, the department of ecology and the department of health
shall use maximum effort to provide timely information regarding existing
surface and ground water resources, watershed-level water resource assessments
prepared under chapter 90.82 RCW, and other information relating to water
resources and present and forecasted water use demands.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.62.035 and 1997 c
429 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial
management shall determine the population of each county of the state annually
as of April 1st of each year and on or before July 1st of each year shall file
a certificate with the secretary of state showing its determination of the
population for each county. The office of financial management also shall
determine the percentage increase in population for each county over the
preceding ten-year period, as of April 1st, and shall file a certificate with
the secretary of state by July 1st showing its determination. At least once
every five years or upon the availability of decennial census data, whichever
is later, the office of financial management shall prepare twenty-year growth
management planning population projections required by RCW 36.70A.110 for each
county that adopts a comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and shall review
these projections with such counties and the cities in those counties before
final adoption. Beginning with revised projections issued after July 1,
2001, the office shall incorporate consideration of water supply availability
using the information compiled as authorized by section 2 of this act. The
county and its cities may provide to the office such information as they deem
relevant to the office's projection, and the office shall consider and comment
on such information before adoption. Each projection shall be expressed as a
reasonable range developed within the standard state high and low projection.
The middle range shall represent the office's estimate of the most likely
population projection for the county. If any city or county believes that a
projection will not accurately reflect actual population growth in a county, it
may petition the office to revise the projection accordingly. The office shall
complete the first set of ranges for every county by December 31, 1995.

A comprehensive plan
adopted or amended before December 31, 1995, shall not be considered to be in
noncompliance with the twenty-year growth management planning population
projection if the projection used in the comprehensive plan is in compliance
with the range later adopted under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

In the
development and amendment of comprehensive plans under this chapter and in the
development of regional policies under RCW 36.70A.210, counties and cities
shall ensure full consideration of water supply service plans, water resource
availability information, and water use demand forecasts by the departments of
ecology and health and by municipal water service providers with a service area
within the geographic extent of the comprehensive plans and regional policies.

---
END ---