BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that when experts or professional persons for the state examine a defendant
under chapter 10.77 RCW, the use of multiple evaluators rarely results in
differing reports. The legislature also finds that the requirement of at least
two experts or professional persons may place a barrier to conducting
evaluations in local jails in some jurisdictions because of the strain it
places on staffing resources at the state hospital. The legislature further
finds that when evaluations cannot be done in the local jail there is
additional pressure placed on state hospital capacity and less time to restore
competency. Consequently, the legislature intends to remove the double
staffing barrier in those cases where the parties agree that the state needs
only one evaluator.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.77.060 and 2000 c
74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Whenever a
defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of insanity, or there is reason to
doubt his or her competency, the court on its own motion or on the motion of
any party shall either appoint or request the secretary to designate at least
two qualified experts or professional persons, one of whom shall be approved by
the prosecuting attorney, to examine and report upon the mental condition of
the defendant. Upon agreement of the parties, the court may designate one
expert or professional person to conduct the examination and report on the
mental condition of the defendant. At least one of the experts or
professional persons appointed shall be a developmental disabilities
professional if the court is advised by any party that the defendant may be
developmentally disabled. For purposes of the examination, the court may order
the defendant committed to a hospital or other suitably secure public or
private mental health facility for a period of time necessary to complete the
examination, but not to exceed fifteen days from the time of admission to the
facility.

(b) When a defendant is
ordered to be committed for inpatient examination under this subsection (1),
the court may delay granting bail until the defendant has been evaluated for
competency or sanity and appears before the court. Following the evaluation,
in determining bail the court shall consider: (i) Recommendations of the
expert or professional persons regarding the defendant's competency, sanity, or
diminished capacity; (ii) whether the defendant has a recent history of one or
more violent acts; (iii) whether the defendant has previously been acquitted by
reason of insanity or found incompetent; (iv) whether it is reasonably likely
the defendant will fail to appear for a future court hearing; and (v) whether
the defendant is a threat to public safety.

(2) The court may
direct that a qualified expert or professional person retained by or appointed
for the defendant be permitted to witness the examination authorized by
subsection (1) of this section, and that the defendant shall have access to all
information obtained by the court appointed experts or professional persons.
The defendant's expert or professional person shall have the right to file his
or her own report following the guidelines of subsection (3) of this section.
If the defendant is indigent, the court shall upon the request of the defendant
assist him or her in obtaining an expert or professional person.

(3) The report of the
examination shall include the following:

(a) A description of
the nature of the examination;

(b) A diagnosis of the
mental condition of the defendant;

(c) If the defendant
suffers from a mental disease or defect, or is developmentally disabled, an
opinion as to competency;

(d) If the defendant
has indicated his or her intention to rely on the defense of insanity pursuant
to RCW 10.77.030, an opinion as to the defendant's sanity at the time of the
act;

(e) When directed by
the court, an opinion as to the capacity of the defendant to have a particular
state of mind which is an element of the offense charged;

(f) An opinion as to
whether the defendant should be evaluated by a county designated mental health
professional under chapter 71.05 RCW, and an opinion as to whether the
defendant is a substantial danger to other persons, or presents a substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security,
unless kept under further control by the court or other persons or
institutions.

(4) The
secretary may execute such agreements as appropriate and necessary to implement
this section.

---
END ---