BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Certain transactions by
institutions of higher education that are conducted in compliance with federal
regulations governing research are currently exempt from certain laws governing
ethics in public service. The legislature intends to clarify that the
exemption in RCW 42.52.030(2) also applies to technology transfer licensing
agreements and that provisions of RCW 42.52.120(2) relating to open and
competitive bidding do not apply to transactions exempt under RCW
42.52.030(2). The purpose of this act is to eliminate uncertainties arising
from the current ethics provisions with regard to technology transfer licensing
agreements, and in so doing, to ensure that Washington institutions of higher
education remain competitive with other states' institutions of higher
education in the areas of technology transfer and economic development.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.52.030 and 1996 c
213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or
state employee, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
may be beneficially interested, directly or indirectly, in a contract, sale,
lease, purchase, or grant that may be made by, through, or is under the supervision
of the officer or employee, in whole or in part, or accept, directly or
indirectly, any compensation, gratuity, or reward from any other person
beneficially interested in the contract, sale, lease, purchase, or grant.

(2) No officer or
employee of an institution of higher education or of the Spokane
intercollegiate research and technology institute, except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, may be beneficially interested, directly or
indirectly, in a contract or grant that may be made by, through, or is under
the supervision of the officer or employee, in whole or in part, or accept,
directly or indirectly, any compensation, gratuity, or reward from any other
person beneficially interested in the contract or grant, including sponsored
research and technology transfer agreements, unless the institution of
higher education or the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology
institute has in effect a written administrative process to identify and
manage, reduce, or eliminate conflicting interests with respect to such
transactions ((as adopted pursuant)) that conforms to the
national science investigator financial disclosure (GPM 510) 1995 and the
public health service regulations, 42 C.F.R. Part 50 and 45 C.F.R. Subtitle A
as each of those regulations existed on June 6, 1996, and the state employee or
state officer has complied with such ((policy)) administrative
process.

(3) No state officer or
state employee may participate in a transaction involving the state in his or
her official capacity with a person of which the officer or employee is an
officer, agent, employee, or member, or in which the officer or employee owns a
beneficial interest, except that an officer or employee of an institution of
higher education or the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology
institute may serve as an officer, agent, employee, or member, or on the board
of directors, board of trustees, advisory board, or committee or review panel
for any nonprofit institute, foundation, or fundraising entity; and may serve
as a member of an advisory board, committee, or review panel for a governmental
or other nonprofit entity.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.52.120 and 1997 c
318 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or
state employee may receive any thing of economic value under any contract or
grant outside of his or her official duties. The prohibition in this
subsection does not apply where ((the state officer or state employee has
complied with RCW 42.52.030(2) or)) each of the following conditions are
met:

(a) The contract or
grant is bona fide and actually performed;

(b) The performance or
administration of the contract or grant is not within the course of the
officer's or employee's official duties, or is not under the officer's or
employee's official supervision;

(c) The performance of
the contract or grant is not prohibited by RCW 42.52.040 or by applicable laws
or rules governing outside employment for the officer or employee;

(d) The contract or
grant is neither performed for nor compensated by any person from whom such
officer or employee would be prohibited by RCW 42.52.150(4) from receiving a
gift;

(e) The contract or
grant is not one expressly created or authorized by the officer or employee in
his or her official capacity;

(f) The contract or
grant would not require unauthorized disclosure of confidential information.

(2) In addition to
satisfying the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a state officer
or state employee may have a beneficial interest in a grant or contract or a
series of substantially identical contracts or grants with a state agency only
if:

(a) The contract or
grant is awarded or issued as a result of an open and competitive bidding
process in which more than one bid or grant application was received; or

(b) The contract or
grant is awarded or issued as a result of an open and competitive bidding or
selection process in which the officer's or employee's bid or proposal was the
only bid or proposal received and the officer or employee has been advised by
the appropriate ethics board, before execution of the contract or grant, that
the contract or grant would not be in conflict with the proper discharge of the
officer's or employee's official duties; or

(c) The process for
awarding the contract or issuing the grant is not open and competitive, but the
officer or employee has been advised by the appropriate ethics board that the
contract or grant would not be in conflict with the proper discharge of the
officer's or employee's official duties.

(3) A state officer or
state employee awarded a contract or issued a grant in compliance with
subsection (2) of this section shall file the contract or grant with the
appropriate ethics board within thirty days after the date of execution;
however, if proprietary formulae, designs, drawings, or research are included
in the contract or grant, the proprietary formulae, designs, drawings, or
research may be deleted from the contract or grant filed with the appropriate
ethics board.

(4) This section does
not prevent a state officer or state employee from receiving compensation
contributed from the treasury of the United States, another state, county, or
municipality if the compensation is received pursuant to arrangements entered
into between such state, county, municipality, or the United States and the
officer's or employee's agency. This section does not prohibit a state officer
or state employee from serving or performing any duties under an employment
contract with a governmental entity and does not apply to a state officer or
state employee who has complied with RCW 42.52.030(2).

(5) As
used in this section, "officer" and "employee" do not
include officers and employees who, in accordance with the terms of their
employment or appointment, are serving without compensation from the state of
Washington or are receiving from the state only reimbursement of expenses
incurred or a predetermined allowance for such expenses.

---
END ---