BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 65.16.020 and 1961 c
279 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The qualifications of a
legal newspaper are that such newspaper shall have been published regularly, at
least once a week, in the English language, as a newspaper of general circulation,
in the city or town where the same is published at the time of application for
approval, for at least six months prior to the date of such application; shall
be compiled either in whole or in part in an office maintained at the place of
publication; shall contain news of general interest as contrasted with news of
interest primarily to an organization, group or class; shall have a policy
to print law enforcement notifications for level III sex and kidnapping
offenders residing in the paper's county of publication; and shall hold a
((second class mailing permit)) periodical class or standard class
mailing permit: PROVIDED, That a newspaper holding a standard class mailing
permit has printed legal notices of the federal government for a period of at
least two years prior to application, is distributed by the United States
postal service to at least twenty percent of households within its primary
circulation area, and is published within fifteen miles of an international
border: PROVIDED, That in case of the consolidation of two or more
newspapers, such consolidated newspaper shall be considered as qualified if
either or any of the papers so consolidated would be a qualified newspaper at
the date of such legal publication, had not such consolidation taken place:
PROVIDED, That this section shall not disqualify as a legal newspaper any
publication which, prior to June 8, 1961, was adjudged a legal newspaper, so
long as it continues to meet the requirements under which it qualified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---