BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
endorses the shoreline management act guidelines adopted by the department in
November 2000.

Cities and counties
that are in an evolutionarily significant unit with salmonid species listed as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq.) by the national marine fisheries service must follow
"path B" of the guidelines.

Cities and
counties that are in an evolutionarily significant unit with salmonid species
listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act (16
U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) by the national marine fisheries service must update
their shoreline master plans within two years of the date of adoption of the
guidelines.

--- END ---