BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.22.175 and 1996 c
245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other charge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of
one dollar per instrument for each document recorded. Revenue generated
through this surcharge shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for
deposit in the archives and records management account. These funds shall be
used solely for providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and
storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government
records and access to those records through the regional branch archives
of the division of archives and records management. ((This section
shall expire June 30, 2001.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The division of
archives and records management shall establish a competitive process to
solicit and prioritize project proposals for potential funding by surplus funds
from the auditor surcharge and tax warrant surcharge revenues. Application for
specific projects may be made by local government agencies only. The state
archivist shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and evaluation
criteria.

(2) The advisory
committee established under RCW 40.14.027 will review proposals and establish a
prioritized list of projects to be considered for funding by September 1st of
each odd-numbered year, beginning in 2001. The evaluation of proposals and
development of the prioritized list must be developed through open public
meetings. Funding for projects will be granted according to the ranking of
each application on the prioritized list and projects will be funded only to
the extent that funds are available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. 1996 c 245 s 2
(uncodified) is repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2001.

---
END ---