BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.22.175 and 1996 c
245 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other charge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of
((one)) two dollars per instrument for each document
recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in the archives and records
management account. These funds shall be used solely for providing records
scheduling, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival preservation,
cataloging, and indexing for state and local government records and
access to those records through the regional branch archives of the
division of archives and records management. ((This section shall
expire June 30, 2001.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2001.

---
END ---