BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that small scale

_5 prospecting and mining is an important part of the
heritage of the

_6 state. The legislature further finds that small scale
prospecting

_7 and mining provide economic benefits to the state, and
help to

_8 meet the national security demand and industrial demand
for

_9 minerals. The legislature further finds that it is
critical that

10 small scale miners and prospectors be allowed access to
open

11 public lands in the state. The legislature further
finds that

12 mineral prospecting and mining activities can be
conducted in a

13 manner that is consistent with fish habitat and
fish-life

14 population. Now, therefore, the legislature declares
that small

15 scale prospecting and mining must not be unreasonably

16 regulated. The legislature further declares that small
scale

17 prospecting and mining must not be unfairly limited or
obstructed

18 from access to open public lands. The legislature
further declares

p. 1 SB
5895

_1 that all restrictions or regulations of small scale
prospecting

_2 and mining activities must be based on sound scientific
evidence

_3 and applicable documentation supporting the need for
such

_4 restrictions.

_5 Sec. 2. RCW
77.55.100 and 2000 c 107 s 16 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) In the event that any person or government
agency desires

_8 to construct any form of hydraulic project or perform
other work

_9 that will use, divert, obstruct, or change the natural
flow or bed

10 of any of the salt or fresh waters of the state, such
person or

11 government agency shall, before commencing construction
or work

12 thereon and to ensure the proper protection of fish
life, secure

13 the approval of the department as to the adequacy of the
means

14 proposed for the protection of fish life. This approval
shall not

15 be unreasonably withheld.

16 (2)(a) The department shall grant or deny approval
of a

17 standard permit within forty-five calendar days of the
receipt of

18 a complete application and notice of compliance with any

19 applicable requirements of the state environmental
policy act,

20 made in the manner prescribed in this section.

21 (b) The applicant may document receipt of
application by filing

22 in person or by registered mail. A complete application
for

23 approval shall contain general plans for the overall
project,

24 complete plans and specifications of the proposed
construction or

25 work within the mean higher high water line in salt
water or

26 within the ordinary high water line in fresh water, and
complete

27 plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life.

28 (c) The forty-five day requirement shall be
suspended if:

29 (i) After ten working days of receipt of the
application, the

30 applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a
timely

31 field evaluation of the proposed project;

32 (ii) The site is physically inaccessible for
inspection; or

33 (iii) The applicant requests delay. Immediately
upon

34 determination that the forty-five day period is
suspended, the

35 department shall notify the applicant in writing of the
reasons

36 for the delay.

SB 5895 p. 2

_1 (d) For purposes of this section, "standard
permit" means a

_2 written permit issued by the department when the
conditions under

_3 subsections (3) and (5)(b) of this section are not met.

_4 (3)(a) The department may issue an expedited written
permit in

_5 those instances where normal permit processing would
result in

_6 significant hardship for the applicant or unacceptable
damage to

_7 the environment. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall

_8 issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for
work to

_9 repair existing structures, move obstructions, restore
banks,

10 protect property, or protect fish resources. Expedited
permit

11 requests require a complete written application as
provided in

12 subsection (2)(b) of this section and shall be issued
within

13 fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete
written

14 application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid
for up to

15 sixty days from the date of issuance.

16 (b) For the purposes of this subsection,
"imminent danger"

17 means a threat by weather, water flow, or other natural
conditions

18 that is likely to occur within sixty days of a request
for a

19 permit application.

20 (c) The department may not require the provisions of
the state

21 environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met
as a

22 condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.

23 (d) The department or the county legislative
authority may

24 determine if an imminent danger exists. The county
legislative

25 authority shall notify the department, in writing, if it

26 determines that an imminent danger exists.

27 (4) Approval of a standard permit is valid for a
period of up

28 to five years from date of issuance. The permittee must
demonstrate

29 substantial progress on construction of that portion of
the

30 project relating to the approval within two years of the
date of

31 issuance. If the department denies approval, the
department shall

32 provide the applicant, in writing, a statement of the
specific

33 reasons why and how the proposed project would adversely
affect

34 fish life. Protection of fish life shall be the only
ground upon

35 which approval may be denied or conditioned. Chapter 34.05
RCW

36 applies to any denial of project approval, conditional
approval,

37 or requirements for project modification upon which
approval may

38 be contingent.

p. 3 SB
5895

_1 (5)(a) In case of an emergency arising from weather
or stream

_2 flow conditions or other natural conditions, the
department,

_3 through its authorized representatives, shall issue
immediately,

_4 upon request, oral approval for removing any
obstructions,

_5 repairing existing structures, restoring stream banks,
or to

_6 protect property threatened by the stream or a change in
the

_7 stream flow without the necessity of obtaining a written
approval

_8 prior to commencing work. Conditions of an oral
approval to protect

_9 fish life shall be established by the department and
reduced to

10 writing within thirty days and complied with as provided
for in

11 this section. Oral approval shall be granted
immediately, upon

12 request, for a stream crossing during an emergency
situation.

13 (b) For purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110,
"emergency"

14 means an immediate threat to life, the public, property,
or of

15 environmental degradation.

16 (c) The department or the county legislative
authority may

17 declare and continue an emergency when one or more of
the criteria

18 under (b) of this subsection are met. The county
legislative

19 authority shall immediately notify the department if it
declares

20 an emergency under this subsection.

21 (6) The department shall, at the request of a
county, develop

22 five-year maintenance approval agreements, consistent
with

23 comprehensive flood control management plans adopted
under the

24 authority of RCW 86.12.200, or other watershed plan
approved by a

25 county legislative authority, to allow for work on
public and

26 private property for bank stabilization, bridge repair,
removal of

27 sand bars and debris, channel maintenance, and other
flood damage

28 repair and reduction activity under agreed-upon
conditions and

29 times without obtaining permits for specific projects.

30 (7) This section shall not apply to the construction
of any

31 form of hydraulic project or other work which diverts
water for

32 agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes
authorized

33 under or recognized as being valid by the state's water
codes, or

34 when such hydraulic project or other work is associated
with

35 streambank stabilization to protect farm and
agricultural land as

36 defined in RCW 84.34.020. These irrigation or stock
watering

37 diversion and streambank stabilization projects shall be
governed

38 by RCW 77.55.110.

SB 5895 p. 4

_1 A landscape management plan approved by the
department and the

_2 department of natural resources under RCW 76.09.350(2),
shall

_3 serve as a hydraulic project approval for the life of
the plan if

_4 fish are selected as one of the public resources for
coverage

_5 under such a plan.

_6 (8) For the purposes of this section and RCW
77.55.110, "bed"

_7 means the land below the ordinary high water lines of
state

_8 waters. This definition does not include irrigation
ditches,

_9 canals, storm water run-off devices, or other artificial

10 watercourses except where they exist in a natural
watercourse that

11 has been altered by man.

12 (9) The phrase "to construct any form of
hydraulic project or

13 perform other work" does not include the act of
driving across an

14 established ford. Driving across streams or on wetted
stream beds

15 at areas other than established fords requires approval.
Work

16 within the ordinary high water line of state waters to
construct

17 or repair a ford or crossing requires approval.

18 (10) This section does not apply to small scale
prospecting and

19 mining activities, which include the use of pans,
sluice boxes,

20 concentrators, and minirocker boxes for the discovery
and recovery

21 of minerals.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5895