BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.73.170 and 2000 c
92 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On or before
December 31, ((2002)) 2004, a person in this state who has been
((sentenced to death or life imprisonment without possibility of release or
parole)) convicted of a felony and is currently serving a term of
imprisonment and who has been denied postconviction DNA testing may submit
a request to the county prosecutor in the county where the conviction was
obtained for postconviction DNA testing, if DNA evidence was not admitted
because the court ruled DNA testing did not meet acceptable scientific
standards or DNA testing technology was not sufficiently developed to test the
DNA evidence in the case. On and after January 1, ((2003)) 2005,
a person must raise the DNA issues at trial or on appeal.

(2) The prosecutor
shall screen the request. The request shall be reviewed based upon the
likelihood that the DNA evidence would demonstrate innocence on a more probable
than not basis. Upon determining that testing should occur and the evidence
still exists, the prosecutor shall request DNA testing by the Washington state
patrol crime laboratory. Contact with victims shall be handled through
victim/witness divisions.

(3) A person denied a
request made pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section has a right to
appeal his or her request within thirty days of denial of the request by the
prosecutor. The appeal shall be to the attorney general's office. If the
attorney general's office determines that it is likely that the DNA testing
would demonstrate innocence on a more probable than not basis, then the
attorney general's office shall request DNA testing by the Washington state
patrol crime laboratory.

(4) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, any biological material that has been secured in
connection with a criminal case prior to the effective date of this act may not
be destroyed before January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 10.73 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in
this act may be construed to create a new or additional cause of action in any
court. Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit any rights offenders
might otherwise have to court access under any other statutory or
constitutional provision.

---
END ---