BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the growing and
processing of food and agricultural products is the dominant industry
in Washington state and a major employer in rural Washington. The
legislature also finds that agriculture is a critical component of
Washington's international trade industry, accounting for billions of
dollars in exports every year.

The legislature further finds that the export market for
Washington's agricultural products has dropped significantly in recent
years and that such a drop has negatively impacted the economy in
Washington's agricultural regions. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to enhance Washington's international trade of agricultural
products by increasing funding for the Washington state department of
agriculture's international marketing program in an effort to promote
marketing of Washington's products and to assist the agricultural
industry in efforts to reduce trade barriers that stand in the way of
trade in new and emerging markets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. There is created a market development and
promotion matching fund program within the Washington state department
of agriculture. The purpose of the program is to allow the department
of agriculture and the agricultural industry to combine funds in order
to enhance access to markets that are growth sales areas for the
industry's product. The goal of the program is to expose buyers to
Washington's diverse agricultural products. The agriculture industry
may bring in buying missions, perform trade promotions in various
markets, hire overseas contractors, and perform other marketing
functions that help it target the correct buyer and market for its
product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the
department of agriculture for the purposes of the marketing development
and promotion matching fund program created in section 2 of this act.

(2) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department of agriculture
for the purposes of the marketing development and promotion matching
fund program created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The legislature finds that trade
barriers have become an increasingly important issue in the
agricultural arena. Further, the world trade organization highlighted
the need for "a fair and level playing field." The legislature finds
that both large and small commodity groups need adequate resources to
address trade barrier issues.

(2) There is created within the department of agriculture a trade
barrier matching fund program to assist agriculture industries in
fighting trade barriers. The purpose of the program is to allow the
department of agriculture and the agricultural industry to combine
funds in order to address trade barriers issues impacting the
agricultural industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the
department of agriculture for the purposes of the trade barrier
matching fund program created in section 4 of this act.

(2) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department of agriculture
for the purposes of the trade barrier matching fund program created in
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The Washington state department of
agriculture finds that there is a need for an eastern Washington trade
specialist, along with administrative support. The goal of this
specialist is to allow the department of agriculture to provide greater
service and work more in-depth with all agricultural groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) The sum of one hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general
fund to the department of agriculture for the purposes of section 6 of
this act.

(2) The sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the department of agriculture
for the purposes of section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The department of agriculture shall provide
a biennial report to the legislature of each of the activities that
received funding assistance under this chapter and the results of each
of those activities. The report shall include an estimate of the
amount of increased sales of state-produced agricultural products, and
the amount of state, commodity commission, and other funds that were
utilized for each activity. The report shall be transmitted to the
secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives by December 15th of each even-numbered year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. The department of agriculture may adopt
rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. Sections 1, 2, 4, 6, 8, and 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---