BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
90.03.386 and 1991 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Within service areas established pursuant
to chapters 43.20

_7 and 70.116 RCW, the department of ecology and the
department of

_8 health shall coordinate approval procedures to ensure
compliance

_9 and consistency with the approved water system plan.

10 (2) The place of use for municipal water
suppliers under this

11 subsection shall be the water service areas in the
municipal water

12 supplier's water system plan approved under chapter
43.20 RCW or

13 coordinated water system plan approved under chapter
70.116 RCW,

14 as either plan may be amended from time to time. The
purpose of use

15 shall be designated as municipal. As used in this
subsection,

16 "municipal water supplier" means a purveyor
as defined in RCW

17 70.116.030 that has an approved water system plan
under chapter

p. 1 SB
5899

_1 43.20 or 70.116 RCW and meets at least one of the
following

_2 conditions:

_3 (a) Is a municipal corporation; or

_4 (b) Owns or operates an expanding public water
system that is

_5 entitled or obligated to serve existing and
additional customers

_6 and uses within one or more approved water service
areas to the

_7 extent such customers and uses are allowed under
applicable land

_8 use plans.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5899 p. 2