BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
90.03.330 and 1987 c 109 s 89 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Upon a showing satisfactory to the
department that any

_7 appropriation has been perfected in accordance with the
provisions

_8 of this chapter, it shall be the duty of the department
to issue

_9 to the applicant a certificate stating such facts in a
form to be

10 prescribed by him, and such certificate shall thereupon
be

11 recorded with the department. Any original water right
certificate

12 issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded
with the

13 department and thereafter, at the expense of the party
receiving

14 the same, be by the department transmitted to the county
auditor

15 of the county or counties where the distributing system
or any

16 part thereof is located, and be recorded in the office
of such

17 county auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to the
owner

18 thereof.

p. 1 SB
5900

_1 (2) An appropriation evidenced by any water right
certificate

_2 issued before the effective date of this section and
held by a

_3 municipal water supplier shall be considered a certificated
water

_4 right in good standing where:

_5 (a) The water has been actually used; or

_6 (b) The water is needed for reasonably
anticipated future

_7 needs.

_8 (3) As used in this subsection, "municipal
water supplier"

_9 means a purveyor as defined in RCW 70.116.030 that
has an approved

10 water system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW or a
coordinated water

11 system plan approved under chapter 70.116 RCW, as
either plan may

12 be amended from time to time and meets at least one
of the

13 following conditions:

14 (a) Is a municipal corporation; or

15 (b) Owns or operates an expanding public water
system that is

16 entitled or obligated to serve existing and
additional customers

17 and uses within one or more approved water service
areas to the

18 extent such customers and uses are allowed under
applicable land

19 use plans.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5900 p. 2