BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.66.030 and 1961 c
11 s 15.66.030 are each amended to read as follows:

Marketing orders may be
made for any one or more of the following purposes:

(1) To establish plans
and conduct programs for advertising and sales promotion, to maintain present
markets or to create new or larger markets for any agricultural commodity grown
in the state of Washington;

(2) To provide for
carrying on research studies to find more efficient methods of production,
processing, handling and marketing of any agricultural commodity;

(3) To provide for
improving standards and grades by defining, establishing and providing labeling
requirements with respect to the same;

(4) To investigate and
take necessary action to prevent unfair trade practices;

(5) To provide
information or communicate on matters pertaining to the production, processing,
marketing, or uses of an agricultural commodity produced in Washington state to
any elected official or officer or employee of any agency;

(6) To provide
marketing information and services for producers of an agricultural commodity;

(7) To provide
information and services for meeting resource conservation objectives of
producers of an agricultural commodity;

(8) To engage in
cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign marketing of food products of an
agricultural commodity; and

(9) To provide for
commodity-related education and training.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.66.110 and 1961 c
11 s 15.66.110 are each amended to read as follows:

Every marketing order
shall establish a commodity commission composed of not less than five nor more
than thirteen members. In addition, the director shall be an ex officio member
of each commodity commission. Commission members shall be citizens and
residents of this state if required by the marketing order, and
over the age of ((twenty-five years)) eighteen. The term of
office of commission members shall be three years with the terms rotating so
than one-third of the terms will commence as nearly as practicable each year.
However, the first commission shall be selected, one-third for a term of one
year, one-third for a term of two years, and one-third for a term of three
years, as nearly as practicable. No less than two-thirds of the
commission members shall be elected by the affected producers and such elected
members shall all be affected producers. The remaining ((one-third)) members
shall be appointed by the commission and shall be either affected producers,
others active in matters relating to the affected commodity or persons not so
related.

Sec. 3. RCW 15.66.140 and 1985 c
261 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Every marketing
commission shall have such powers and duties in accordance with provisions of
this chapter as may be provided in the marketing order and shall have the
following powers and duties:

(1) To elect a chairman
and such other officers as determined advisable;

(2) To adopt, rescind
and amend rules and regulations reasonably necessary for the administration and
operation of the commission and the enforcement of its duties under the
marketing order;

(3) To administer,
enforce, direct and control the provisions of the marketing order and of this
chapter relating thereto;

(4) To employ and
discharge at its discretion such administrators and additional personnel,
attorneys, advertising and research agencies and other persons and firms that
it may deem appropriate and pay compensation to the same;

(5) To acquire personal
property and purchase or lease office space and other necessary real
property and transfer and convey the same;

(6) To institute and
maintain in its own name any and all legal actions, including actions by injunction,
mandatory injunction or civil recovery, or proceedings before administrative
tribunals or other governmental authorities necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter and of the marketing order;

(7) To keep accurate
records of all its receipts and disbursements, which records shall be open to
inspection and audit by the state auditor or private auditor designated by
the state auditor at least every five years;

(8) Borrow money and
incur indebtedness;

(9) Make necessary
disbursements for routine operating expenses;

(10) To expend funds
for commodity-related education, training, and leadership programs as each
commission deems expedient;

(11) To work
cooperatively with other local, state, and federal agencies; universities; and
national organizations for the purposes provided in the commission's marketing
order;

(12) To enter into
contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether
federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes provided in the
commission's marketing order. Personal service contracts must comply with
chapter 39.29 RCW;

(13) To accept and
expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private
persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in
the commission's marketing order;

(14) To enter into
contracts or agreements for research in the production, processing, marketing,
use, or distribution of an affected commodity;

(15) To retain in
emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal
actions on behalf of a commission. The retention of a private attorney is
subject to review by the office of the attorney general;

(16) To engage in
appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of
the commission authorized by the marketing order;

(17) To participate
in international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other
proceedings relating to the production, manufacture, regulation, distribution,
sale, or use of affected commodities including activities authorized under RCW
42.17.190, including the reporting of those activities to the public disclosure
commission; and

(18) Such other
powers and duties that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 15.65.040 and 1961 c
256 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It is hereby declared
to be the policy of this chapter:

(1) To aid agricultural
producers in preventing economic waste in the marketing of their agricultural
commodities and in developing more efficient methods of marketing agricultural
products.

(2) To enable
agricultural producers of this state, with the aid of the state:

(a) To develop, and
engage in research for developing, better and more efficient production,
marketing, and utilization of agricultural products;

(b) To establish
orderly marketing of agricultural commodities;

(c) To provide
for uniform grading and proper preparation of agricultural commodities for
market;

(d) To provide
methods and means (including, but not limited to, public relations and
promotion) for the maintenance of present markets and for the development of
new or larger markets, both domestic and foreign, for agricultural commodities
produced within this state and for the prevention, modification, or
elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of such agricultural
commodities to market;

(e) To eliminate
or reduce economic waste in the marketing and/or use of agricultural
commodities;

(f) To restore
and maintain adequate purchasing power for the agricultural producers of this
state;

(g) To provide
information or communicate on matters pertaining to the production, processing,
marketing, or uses of an agricultural commodity produced in Washington state to
any elected official or officer or employee of any agency;

(h) To provide
marketing information and services for producers of an agricultural commodity;

(i) To provide
information and services for meeting resource conservation objectives of
producers of an agricultural commodity;

(j) To engage in
cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign marketing of food products of an
agricultural commodity;

(k) To provide for
commodity-related education and training; and

(((g))) (l) To
accomplish all the declared policies of this chapter.

(3) To protect the
interest of consumers by assuring a sufficient pure and wholesome supply of
agricultural commodities of good quality at all seasons and times.

Sec. 5. RCW 15.65.230 and 1961 c
256 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

((The)) A
producer member((s)) of each ((such)) commodity board ((shall))
must be a practical producer((s)) of the affected
commodity and ((shall)) must be a citizen((s and)),
resident((s)) of this state, and over the age of ((twenty-five))
eighteen years((, each of whom is and has)). Each producer
board member must be and have been actually engaged in producing such a
commodity within the state of Washington for a period of five years and ((has))
have, during that period, derived a substantial portion of his or
her income therefrom and ((who is)) not be engaged in
business, directly or indirectly, as a handler or other dealer. ((The))
A handler member((s)) of ((such)) each board ((shall))
must be a practical handler((s)) of the affected commodity
and ((shall)) must be a citizen((s and)),
resident((s)) of this state, and over the age of twenty-five
years((, each of whom is and has)). Each handler board member must
be and have been, either individually or as an officer or employee of a
corporation, firm, partnership, association, or cooperative, actually
engaged in handling such a commodity within the state of Washington for
a period of five years and ((has)) have, during that period,
derived a substantial portion of his or her income therefrom. The
qualification of a member((s)) of the board as ((herein))
set forth in this section must continue during ((their)) the
term((s)) of office.

Sec. 6. RCW 15.65.280 and 1985 c
261 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The powers and duties
of the board shall be:

(1) To elect a chairman
and such other officers as it deems advisable;

(2) To advise and
counsel the director with respect to the administration and conduct of such
marketing agreement or order;

(3) To recommend to the
director administrative rules, regulations and orders and amendments thereto
for the exercise of his powers in connection with such agreement or order;

(4) To advise the
director upon any and all assessments provided pursuant to the terms of such
agreement or order and upon the collection, deposit, withdrawal, disbursement
and paying out of all moneys;

(5) To assist the
director in the collection of such necessary information and data as the
director may deem necessary in the proper administration of this chapter;

(6) To administer the
order or agreement as its administrative board if the director designates it so
to do in such order or agreement;

(7) To work
cooperatively with other local, state, and federal agencies; universities; and
national organizations for the purposes provided in the board's marketing
order;

(8) To enter into
contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether
federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes provided in the board's
marketing order. Personal service contracts must comply with chapter 39.29
RCW;

(9) To accept and
expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private
persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in
the board's marketing order;

(10) To retain in
emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal
actions on behalf of a board. The retention of a private attorney is subject
to review by the office of the attorney general;

(11) To engage in
appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of
the board authorized by the marketing order;

(12) To enter into
contracts or agreements for research in the production, processing, marketing,
use, or distribution of an affected commodity;

(13) To participate
in international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other
proceedings relating to the production, manufacture, regulation, distribution,
sale, or use of affected commodities including activities authorized under RCW
42.17.190, including the reporting of those activities to the public disclosure
commission; and

(14) To perform
such other duties as the director may prescribe in the marketing agreement or
order.

Any agreement or order
under which the commodity board administers the order or agreement shall (if so
requested by the affected producers within the affected area in the proposal or
promulgation hearing) contain provisions whereby the director reserves the
power to approve or disapprove every order, rule or directive issued by the
board, in which event such approval or disapproval shall be based on whether or
not the director believes the board's action has been carried out in
conformance with the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

A commodity commission
may establish foundations using commission funds as grant money when the
foundation benefits the commodity for which the commission was established.
Commission funds may be used for the purposes authorized in the marketing
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

A commodity commission
may establish foundations using commission funds as grant money when the
foundation benefits the commodity for which the commission was established.
Commission funds may be used for the purposes authorized in the marketing
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added to
chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each board member
of a commodity commission established under this chapter may be compensated
pursuant to RCW 43.03.230.

(2) Board members and
employees of a commodity commission established under this chapter and its
employees may be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out
the provisions of this chapter, as defined under the commodity commission's
marketing order. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced in the marketing
order, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) Approval for
compensation and travel expenses shall be as defined in the commodity
commission's marketing order.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each board member
of a commodity commission established under this chapter may be compensated
pursuant to RCW 43.03.230.

(2) Board members and
employees of a commodity commission established under this chapter and its
employees may be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out
the provisions of this chapter, as defined under the commodity commission's
marketing order. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced in the marketing
order, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) Approval for
compensation and travel expenses shall be as defined in the commodity
commission's marketing order.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.03.230 and 1984 c
287 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any agricultural
commodity commission established pursuant to Title 15 or 16 RCW shall be
identified as a class two group for purposes of compensation.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, each member of a class two group is eligible to
receive compensation in an amount not to exceed ((thirty-five)) one
hundred dollars for each day during which the member attends an official
meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the
chairperson of the group. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of
service under this section if the person (a) occupies a position, normally
regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal government,
Washington state government, or Washington state local government; and (b)
receives any compensation from such government for working that day.

(3)
Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it is authorized
under the law dealing in particular with the specific group to which the member
belongs or dealing in particular with the members of that specific group.

---
END ---