BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.71.310 and 1998 c
132 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall enter into a contract with the entity to implement an impaired physician
program. The commission may enter into a contract with the entity for up to
six years in length. The impaired physician program may include any or all of
the following:

(a) Entering into
relationships supportive of the impaired physician program with professionals
who provide either evaluation or treatment services, or both;

(b) Receiving and
assessing reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in
cases of verified impairment, or in cases where there is reasonable cause to
suspect impairment;

(d) Upon reasonable
cause, referring suspected or verified impaired physicians for evaluation or
treatment;

(e) Monitoring the
treatment and rehabilitation of impaired physicians including those ordered by
the commission;

(f) Providing
monitoring and continuing treatment and rehabilitative support of physicians;

(g) Performing such
other activities as agreed upon by the commission and the entity; and

(h) Providing
prevention and education services.

(2) A
contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by
a surcharge of not less than twenty-five and not more than
thirty-five dollars per year on each license renewal or issuance of a new
license to be collected by the department of health from every physician and
surgeon licensed under this chapter in addition to other license fees. These
moneys shall be placed in the impaired physician account to be used solely for
the implementation of the impaired physician program.

--- END ---