BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this
title shall apply to conservation districts governed under chapter 89.08 RCW,
unless a conservation district chooses to have its elections governed under
this title.

(2) A conservation
district choosing to have its elections governed under this title shall:

(a) Still be governed
by other nonelection provisions of chapter 89.08 RCW;

(b) Still be governed
by RCW 89.08.160(2); and

(c) Remain solely
responsible for the costs of holding elections under this title.

(3) Any conservation
district choosing to have its elections governed under this title shall make
the choice in time to provide appropriate prior notice to any affected county
auditors.

(4) Candidates and
conservation district supervisors in districts that choose to have their
elections governed under this title are subject to chapter 42.17 RCW.
Candidates and conservation district supervisors in districts whose elections
are governed under chapter 89.08 RCW are exempted from the requirements of
chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 89.08.160 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 184 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the
commission finds the project practicable, it shall appoint two supervisors, one
of whom shall be a landowner or operator of a farm, who shall be qualified by
training and experience to perform the specialized skilled services required of
them. They, with the three elected supervisors, two of whom shall be
landowners or operators of a farm, shall constitute the governing board of the
district.

(2) In all
subsequent appointments, at least one appointed supervisor shall be a landowner
or operator of a farm. In all subsequent elections, at least two elected
supervisors shall be landowners or operators of farms.

(3) The two
appointed supervisors shall file with the secretary of state a sworn
application, reciting that a petition was filed with the commission for the
creation of the district; that all required proceedings were had thereon; that
they were appointed by the commission as such supervisors; and that the
application is being filed to complete the organization of the district. It
shall contain the names and residences of the applicants, a certified copy of
their appointments, the name of the district, the location of the office of the
supervisors and the term of office of each applicant.

(4) The
application shall be accompanied by a statement of the commission, reciting
that a petition was filed, notice issued, and hearing held thereon as required;
that it determined the need for the district and defined the boundaries
thereof; that notice was given and an election held on the question of creating
the district; that a majority vote favored the district, and that the
commission had determined the district practicable; and shall set forth the
boundaries of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 89.08 RCW to read as follows:

Instead of providing
for the election of supervisors under section 1 of this act or under this
chapter, the board of supervisors may adopt a resolution requesting that the
legislative authority in the county or counties in which the district is
located appoint district electors to serve as elected supervisors on the
board. If requested to appoint supervisors under this section, the legislative
authority shall appoint persons to serve as elected supervisors as the terms of
current elected supervisors expire. In making the appointments, the
legislative authority shall ensure that at least two of the elected supervisors
are landowners or operators of farms. If a district is located in more than
one county, the legislative authority of the counties in which the district is
located shall cooperate to jointly appoint the elected supervisors. Conservation
district supervisors in districts that choose to have their supervisors
appointed under this section are exempted from the requirements of chapter
42.17 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 89.08.020 and 1999 c
305 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, as used in this chapter:

(1)
"Commission" and "state conservation commission" mean((s))
the agency created hereunder. All former references to "state soil and
water conservation committee", "state committee" or
"committee" shall be deemed to be references to the "state
conservation commission"((;)).

(2)
"District", or "conservation district" means a governmental
subdivision of this state and a public body corporate and politic, organized in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess., for
the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions set forth in
this chapter. All districts created under chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex.
sess. shall be known as conservation districts and shall have all the powers
and duties set out in chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. All references
in chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. to "districts", or
"soil and water conservation districts" shall be deemed to be
reference to "conservation districts"((;)).

(3)
"Board" and "supervisors" mean the board of supervisors of
a conservation district((;)).

(4) "Land
occupier" or "occupier of land" includes any person, firm,
political subdivision, government agency, municipality, public or private
corporation, copartnership, association, or any other entity whatsoever which
holds title to, or is in possession of, any lands lying within a district
organized under the provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.,
whether as owner, lessee, renter, tenant, or otherwise((;)).

(5)
"District elector" or "voter" means a registered voter in
the county where the district is located who resides within the district
boundary or in the area affected by a petition((;)).

(6) "Due
notice" means a notice published at least twice, with at least six days
between publications, in a publication of general circulation within the
affected area, or if there is no such publication, by posting at a reasonable
number of public places within the area, where it is customary to post notices
concerning county and municipal affairs. Any hearing held pursuant to due
notice may be postponed from time to time without a new notice((;)).

(7)
"Renewable natural resources", "natural resources" or
"resources" includes land, air, water, vegetation, fish, wildlife,
wild rivers, wilderness, natural beauty, scenery and open space((;)).

(8)
"Conservation" includes conservation, development, improvement,
maintenance, preservation, protection and use, and alleviation of floodwater
and sediment damages, and the disposal of excess surface waters.

(9) "Farm
and agricultural land" means either (a) land in any contiguous ownership
of twenty or more acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses; (b) any parcel
of land five acres or more but less than twenty acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses, which has produced a gross income from agricultural uses
equivalent to one hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification under
this chapter; or (c) any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted
primarily to agricultural uses which has produced a gross income of one
thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five calendar years
preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter.
Agricultural lands shall also include farm woodlots of less than twenty and
more than five acres and the land on which appurtenances necessary to
production, preparation or sale of the agricultural products exist in
conjunction with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands shall
also include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not contiguous,
but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming operations being
conducted on land qualifying under this section as "farm and agricultural
lands".

(10) "Elected
supervisor" means a member of the board of supervisors who is not
appointed by the conservation commission and who is either (a) elected under
section 1 of this act or under this chapter, or (b) appointed under section 3
of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---