BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

The state
consents to the jurisdiction of the federal courts in actions brought by a
tribe pursuant to the Indian gaming regulatory act of 1988 or seeking
enforcement of a state/tribal compact adopted under the Indian gaming
regulatory act, conditioned upon the tribe entering into such a compact and
providing similar consent. This limited waiver of sovereign immunity shall not
extend to actions other than those expressly set forth herein.

--- END ---