BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that when the basic education act was enacted in 1977, digital technology as an
instructional tool was not available. The legislature further finds that
computers and access to vast amounts of information over the internet are
becoming increasingly important tools for teaching and learning in classrooms
throughout the state of Washington. The legislature further finds that there
are large discrepancies in access to technology in different school districts
in the state and even in various schools within the same school district. The
legislature intends to study the application of technology in schools and
school districts across the state, what technology is currently available in
the schools, how the technology is funded, the differences in use and access
among districts, and the future requirements for technology in the schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The technology in
education task force is created. The technology in education task force shall
develop recommendations about the use of technology and recommendations about
funding technology in the schools after conducting a study. The study shall
focus on the application of technology in grades three through twelve. The
study shall be completed not later than November 1, 2002, and the
recommendations shall be submitted to the education and fiscal committees of
the house of representatives and the senate. The study shall include but not be
limited to:

(1) The technology
currently available in schools and school districts. Technology includes but
is not limited to computers, local area networks, and access to electronic
media on the internet;

(2) Methods school
districts are using currently to fund technology and recommendations for the
future;

(3) Plans to update the
technology including any replacement schedules;

(4) Training in the use
of technology;

(5) Integration of
technology into the curriculum;

(6) The different uses
of technology in upper elementary grades, middle school, and high school; and

(7) Applications of
technology in schools in other states and how that technology is funded.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The technology in
education task force shall consist of the following voting members or their
designees: The governor; one member from each major caucus of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate; one member from each major caucus of
the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; the superintendent of public instruction; the chair of the
information services board; one representative of the community and technical
colleges, appointed by the state board for community and technical colleges; one
educational service district superintendent, one school district
superintendent, one principal, and one teacher, each appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction; two representatives appointed by the
higher education coordinating board; and three representatives of the computer
or digital technology industry and three members of the general public, each
appointed by the governor. The superintendent of public instruction and the
governor, or their designees, shall cochair the task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This act expires December
1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---