BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the current financial responsibility laws for vessels and facilities are
in need of update and revision. These changes are necessary due to the
increased risks of spills, the length of time that has passed since the current
standards were put in place, the recent changes that have occurred in federal
statutory and case law, the comparative standards of other western states, and
the recent experiences of other states with spills. The legislature intends
that, whenever possible, the standards set for Washington state provide the
highest level of protection consistent with other western states and to
ultimately achieve a more uniform system of financial responsibility on the
Pacific Coast.

Sec. 2. RCW 88.40.011 and 2000 c
69 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Cargo
vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other than a tank vessel
or a passenger vessel, of three hundred or more gross tons, including but not
limited to, commercial fish processing vessels and freighters.

(2) "Bulk"
means material that is stored or transported in a loose, unpackaged liquid,
powder, or granular form capable of being conveyed by a pipe, bucket, chute, or
belt system.

(3) "Covered
vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or passenger vessel.

(4)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(5)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(6)(a)
"Facility" means any structure, group of structures, equipment,
pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near the navigable
waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from a tank vessel or
pipeline, that is used for producing, storing, handling, transferring,
processing, or transporting oil in bulk.

(b) A facility does not
include any: (i) Railroad car, motor vehicle, or other rolling stock while
transporting oil over the highways or rail lines of this state; (ii) retail
motor vehicle motor fuel outlet; (iii) facility that is operated as part of an
exempt agricultural activity as provided in RCW 82.04.330; (iv) underground
storage tank regulated by the department or a local government under chapter
90.76 RCW; or (v) marine fuel outlet that does not dispense more than three
thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is not a covered vessel, in a single
transaction.

(7) "Hazardous
substances" means any substance listed as of March 1, 2001, in
Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted ((August 14, 1989,)) under
section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L. 99‑499. The
following are not hazardous substances for purposes of this chapter:

(a) Wastes listed as
F001 through F028 in Table 302.4; ((and))

(b) Wastes listed as
K001 through K136 in Table 302.4; and

(c) The noncompound
metals antimony, arsenic, beryllium, cadmium, chromium, copper, lead, nickel,
selenium, silver, thallium, and zinc, when in solid form in a particle larger
than one hundred micrometers (0.004 inches) in diameter.

(8) (("Inland
barge" means any barge operating on the waters of the state and certified
by the coast guard as an inland barge.

(9))) "Navigable waters of the state"
means those waters of the state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are
subject to the ebb and flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been
used in the past, or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate,
interstate, or foreign commerce.

(((10))) (9)
"Oil" or "oils" means any naturally occurring liquid
hydrocarbons at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the earth,
including condensate and natural gasoline, and any fractionation thereof,
including, but not limited to, crude oil, petroleum, gasoline, fuel oil, diesel
oil, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with wastes other than dredged
spoil. Oil does not include any substance listed as of March 1, 2001,
in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted ((August 14, 1989,)) under
section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L. 99‑499.

(((11))) (10)
"Offshore facility" means any facility located in, on, or under any
of the navigable waters of the state, but does not include a facility any part
of which is located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than
submerged land.

(((12))) (11)
"Onshore facility" means any facility any part of which is located
in, on, or under any land of the state, other than submerged land, that because
of its location, could reasonably be expected to cause substantial harm to the
environment by discharging oil into or on the navigable waters of the state or
the adjoining shorelines.

(((13))) (12)(a)
"Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a vessel, any person
owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the vessel; (ii) in the case of an
onshore or offshore facility, any person owning or operating the facility; and
(iii) in the case of an abandoned vessel or onshore or offshore facility, the
person who owned or operated the vessel or facility immediately before its
abandonment.

(b)
"Operator" does not include any person who owns the land underlying a
facility if the person is not involved in the operations of the facility.

(((14))) (13)
"Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or more gross tons
with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons carrying passengers for
compensation.

(((15))) (14)
"Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating craft
of any kind.

(((16))) (15)
"Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil into the waters of the
state.

(((17))) (16)
"Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or adapted to carry,
or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo residue, and that:

(a) Operates on the
waters of the state; or

(b) Transfers oil in a
port or place subject to the jurisdiction of this state.

(((18))) (17)
"Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds, streams, inland
waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries, tidal flats, beaches and
lands adjoining the seacoast of the state, sewers, and all other surface waters
and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the state of Washington.

Sec. 3. RCW 88.40.020 and 2000 c
69 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any ((inland))
barge that transports hazardous substances in bulk as cargo, using any port or
place in the state of Washington or the navigable waters of the state shall
establish evidence of financial responsibility in the amount of the greater of
((one)) five million dollars, or ((one)) three
hundred ((fifty)) dollars per gross ton of such vessel.

(b) The director by
rule may establish a lesser standard of financial responsibility for barges,
transporting hazardous substances, of three hundred gross tons or less. The
standard shall set the level of financial responsibility based on the quantity
of cargo and type of cargo the barge is capable of carrying.

(2)(a) Except as
provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection or subsection (5) of this
section, a tank vessel that carries oil as cargo in bulk shall demonstrate
financial responsibility to pay at least five hundred million dollars. The
amount of financial responsibility required under this subsection is seven
hundred fifty million dollars after January 1, 2002, and one billion dollars
after January 1, 2004.

(b) The director by
rule may establish a lesser standard of financial responsibility for tank
vessels or barges of three hundred gross tons or less. The standard shall
set the level of financial responsibility based on the quantity of cargo the tank
vessel or barge is capable of carrying. The director shall not set the standard
for tank vessels or barges of three hundred gross tons or less below
that required under federal law.

(c) The owner or
operator of a tank vessel who is a member of an international protection and
indemnity mutual organization and is covered for oil pollution risks up to the
amounts required under this section is not required to demonstrate financial
responsibility under this chapter. The director ((may)) shall
require the owner or operator of a tank vessel to prove membership in such an
organization.

(3)(a) A cargo
vessel or passenger vessel that carries more than six thousand five hundred
barrels of oil as fuel shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay ((the
greater of at least six hundred dollars per gross ton or five hundred thousand)),
except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, at least three hundred
million dollars.

(b) A cargo vessel
or passenger vessel, as defined in RCW 88.40.011, that carries: (i) Between
one and ten barrels of oil shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at
least two million dollars; (ii) between eleven and fifty barrels of oil shall
demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at least five million dollars;
(iii) between fifty-one and five hundred barrels of oil shall demonstrate
financial responsibility to pay at least ten million dollars; (iv) between five
hundred one and one thousand barrels of oil shall demonstrate financial
responsibility to pay at least twenty million dollars; and (v) between one
thousand one and six thousand five hundred barrels of oil shall demonstrate
financial responsibility to pay at least twenty million dollars for the first
one thousand barrels and five million for each additional one thousand barrels.

(c) The owner or
operator of a cargo or passenger vessel who is a member of an international
protection and indemnity mutual organization and is covered for oil pollution
risks up to the amounts required under this section is not required to
demonstrate financial responsibility under this chapter. The director shall require
the owner or operator of a tank vessel to prove membership in such an
organization.

(4) The documentation
of financial responsibility shall demonstrate the ability of the document
holder to meet state and federal financial liability requirements for the
actual costs for removal of oil or hazardous substance spills, for
natural resource damages, for civil penalties and fines imposed, for removal
of shipwrecks and ship debris from the lands and waters of the state, and for
necessary expenses related to a spill, or substantial threat of a spill,
involving oil or a hazardous substance.

(5) The department may
by rule set a lesser amount of financial responsibility for a tank vessel,
cargo vessel, or passenger vessel that meets safety performance or other
standards ((for construction, propulsion, equipment, and personnel))
established by the department. The department shall require as a minimum level
of financial responsibility under this subsection the same level of financial responsibility
required under federal law.

(6) This section shall
not apply to a covered vessel owned or operated by the federal government or by
a state or local government.

(7) The department
shall review the statutory financial responsibility requirements established in
this section and make recommendations regarding the sufficiency of the
requirements to the legislature and the governor at least every five years with
the first report due November 1, 2005.

Sec. 4. RCW 88.40.025 and 1991 c
200 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An onshore
or offshore facility shall demonstrate financial responsibility in an amount
determined by the department, and established in rule by January 1, 2004,
as necessary to compensate the state and affected counties and cities for
damages that might occur during a reasonable worst case spill of oil from that
facility into the navigable waters of the state and for civil penalties and
fines imposed. The department shall consider such matters as: (a) The
amount of oil that could be spilled into the navigable waters from the
facility((,)); (b) the cost of cleaning up the spilled oil((,));
(c) the frequency of operations at the facility((,)); (d) the
amount of civil penalties and fines that could be imposed; (e) the damages
that could result from the spill; and (f) the commercial
availability and affordability of financial responsibility for both large
and small facilities.

(2) This section
shall not apply to an onshore or offshore facility owned or operated by the
federal government or by the state or local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. To assist the department
in determining the proper levels of financial responsibility for onshore and
offshore facilities, as required under RCW 88.40.025, the department shall
contract for an independent economic analysis regarding adequate levels of
financial responsibility. The analysis shall include consideration of the
matters identified in RCW 88.40.025. The analysis shall be completed and
delivered to the legislature and governor by September 1, 2002.

Sec. 6. RCW 88.40.040 and 2000 c
69 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The department
shall deny entry to the waters of the state to any vessel that does not meet
the financial responsibility requirements of this chapter)) It is
unlawful for any vessel required to have financial responsibility under this
chapter to enter or operate on Washington waters without meeting the requirements
of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, except when necessary to
avoid injury to the vessel's crew or passengers. Any vessel owner or
operator that does not meet the financial responsibility requirements of this
chapter and any rules prescribed thereunder or the federal oil pollution act of
1990 shall be reported by the department to the United States coast guard.

(2) The
department shall enforce section 1016 of the federal oil pollution act of 1990
as authorized by section 1019 of the federal act.

---
END ---