BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.14.140 and 1998 c
258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient cause" shall be defined
as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of five or more consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a
result of:

(a) Drought, or other
unavailability of water;

(b) Active service in
the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(c) Nonvoluntary
service in the armed forces of the United States;

(d) The operation of
legal proceedings;

(e) Federal or state
agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights which preclude or
reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(f) Federal laws
imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through the
voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas;

(g) Temporarily
reduced water need for irrigation use where such reduction is due to varying
weather conditions including but not limited to precipitation and temperature,
so long as the water user's diversion and delivery facilities are maintained in
good operating condition consistent with beneficial use of the full amount of
the water right. The burden is on the water user to prove that the weather
conditions are significantly different from average conditions such that they
resulted in the reduction of water use;

(h) Water
conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river basin water
enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is reallocated in
accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;

(i) Reliance by an
irrigation water user on the transitory presence of return flows in lieu of
diversion or withdrawal of water from the primary source of supply, if such
return flows are measured or reliably estimated using a scientific methodology
accepted as reliable by the director of the department of ecology; or

(j) Crop rotation.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there shall be no
relinquishment of any water right:

(a) If such right is
claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW and annual
license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b) If such right is
used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time of drought or
other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion facilities are
maintained in good operating condition for the use of such reserve or standby
water supply;

(c) If such right is
claimed for a determined future development to take place either within fifteen
years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use of the water right,
whichever date is later;

(d) If such right is
claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter 90.03 RCW;

(e) If such waters are
not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
or

(f) If such right or
portion of the right is leased to another person for use on land other than the
land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial
use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of
the right has been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.42.080 and 1993 c
98 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state may
acquire all or portions of existing water rights, by purchase, gift, or other
appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any person or entity or
combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust water
rights.

(2) The department may
enter into leases, contracts, or such other arrangements with other persons or
entities as appropriate, to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter may be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) Trust water rights
may be acquired by the state on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) The provisions of
RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 apply to transfers of water rights under this
section.

(5) No funds may be
expended for the purchase of water rights by the state pursuant to this section
unless specifically appropriated for this purpose by the legislature.

(6) Trust water
rights may be expressly conditioned by the grantor to include all or portions
of existing water rights as trust water rights on a temporary basis as a result
of temporarily reduced water need where such reduction is due to varying
weather conditions, including but not limited to precipitation and temperature,
or the presence of water from a source not within the control of the water user,
so long as the water user's diversion and delivery facilities are maintained in
good operating condition consistent with beneficial use of the full amount of
the water right.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---