BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to expedite the issuance of final water right certificates, superseding
certificates, or certificates of change by providing for certification of
individuals qualified to assist those who hold permits for development of water
rights and those who have approval for change or transfer of existing water
rights to complete the necessary proof of examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By June 30, 2002,
the department must adopt rules to establish certification procedures,
qualifications, and fees for certified water rights examiners, and any other
requirements not established by law for fulfilling the functions of certified
water rights examiners.

(2) Certified water
rights examiners must be certified by the department to perform the following
functions:

(a) To carry out the
proof examination of a permitted water right development as a prerequisite to
the issuance of a final water right certificate. The examiner must provide a
report and detailed map to the department as to that examination; and

(b) To carry out the
proof examination for a change or transfer of an existing water right or water
right claim and to provide a report and detailed map to the department as to
that examination as a prerequisite to the issuance of a superseding certificate
or certificate of change.

(3) The department must
develop and administer a written examination for purposes of certifying water
rights examiners. An examination fee in an amount established by the
department's rule required by subsection (1) of this section must be paid in
advance of testing. The certification is valid for one year, renewable upon
payment of a renewal fee prior to the expiration of the one-year period.
Examiners in good standing are not required to retest to receive a
certification renewal. Former examiners whose certifications have lapsed for
more than one year are required to retake the examination to be recertified.
The department's denial of certification or a renewal may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230.

(4) The department
shall establish and from time to time update by rule the amount of fees charged
for the examination, certification, certificate renewal, and training of water
right examiners. The department shall set the fees at a sufficient level to
defray all costs of administering the program to license and regulate water
right examiners. Fees collected under this section shall be credited by the
state treasurer to the state reclamation revolving account established in RCW
89.16.020. The fees must be allocated and expended by the director for the
administration of the licensed water rights examiner program.

(5) The department may
issue an order suspending or revoking the certificate of any certified water
right examiner for good cause, including illegal acts, misrepresentation of the
facts associated with a proof examination and report, or gross incompetence.
The department's order may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board
under RCW 43.21B.230.

(6) The department must
keep a record of any complaints it receives or irregularities it observes
regarding individual certified water rights examiners. The department must
inform the examiner if a complaint is received or an irregularity is observed
and permit the examiner to provide a written explanation to the department.
The records must be made available to any person who requests them. The
department must investigate complaints that allege or irregularities that
indicate a breach of law.

(7) Each examiner may
set his or her own fees for services offered.

(8) The department must
retain a list of all active certified water rights examiners and the geographic
areas of the state in which each has indicated a willingness to work. The list
must be provided to any person who requests it and must be posted
electronically by the department.

(9) The department must
provide at least one day of continuing education training per year for water
rights examiners. Examiners are required to attend the department's training
session or attend an alternative training opportunity of at least one day's
duration provided by a third party and approved by the department. The
department must provide timely information to licensed examiners regarding
changes in water resource laws, rules, policies, court decisions, and
procedures.

(10) Proof
examinations, opinions, or other actions taken by certified water rights
examiners are not binding on the department, nor are they prima facie evidence
in any legal proceeding.

(11) The
department and officers or employees of the department may not be found liable
for damages alleged to have arisen from the actions or inactions of the
department, its officers, or employees under this section.

---
END ---