BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.50.020 and 1995 c
69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter((;)).

(2)
"Application" means any request for approval of a particular site or
sites filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires((;)).

(3) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation,
association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal
corporation, government agency, public utility district, or any other entity,
public or private, however organized((;)).

(4) "Site"
means any proposed or approved location of an energy facility((;)).

(5)
"Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant and
the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines, in effect as
of the date of certification, which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040
as now or hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or concurrent with
the construction or operation of any energy facility((;)).

(6) "Associated
facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or other related and
supporting facilities connecting an energy plant with the existing energy
supply, processing, or distribution system, including, but not limited to,
communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment, instrumentation,
and other types of ancillary transmission equipment, off-line storage or
venting required for efficient operation or safety of the transmission system
and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the
inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and
new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages in excess of
200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest power grid:
PROVIDED, That common carrier railroads or motor vehicles shall not be
included((;)).

(7) "Transmission
facility" means any of the following together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Crude or refined
petroleum or liquid petroleum product transmission pipeline of the following
dimensions: A pipeline larger than six inches minimum inside diameter between
valves for the transmission of these products with a total length of at least
fifteen miles; or

(b) Natural gas,
synthetic fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas transmission pipeline of the
following dimensions: A pipeline larger than fourteen inches minimum inside
diameter between valves, for the transmission of these products, with a total
length of at least fifteen miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a
distribution facility, except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by
the United States federal power commission((;)).

(8) "Independent
consultants" means those persons who have no financial interest in the
applicant's proposals and who are retained by the council to evaluate the applicant's
proposals, supporting studies, or to conduct additional studies((;)).

(9) "Thermal power
plant" means, for the purpose of certification, any electrical generating
facility using any fuel, including nuclear materials, for distribution of
electricity by electric utilities((;)).

(10) "Energy
facility" means an energy plant or transmission facilities: PROVIDED,
That the following are excluded from the provisions of this chapter:

(a) Facilities for the
extraction, conversion, transmission or storage of water, other than water
specifically consumed or discharged by energy production or conversion for
energy purposes; and

(b) Facilities operated
by and for the armed services for military purposes or by other federal
authority for the national defense((;)).

(11)
"Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council created
by RCW 80.50.030((;)).

(12) "Counsel for
the environment" means an assistant attorney general or a special
assistant attorney general who shall represent the public in accordance with
RCW 80.50.080((;)).

(13)
"Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding exploratory
work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars((;)).

(14) "Energy
plant" means the following facilities together with their associated facilities:

(a) Any stationary
thermal power plant with generating capacity ((of two)): (i) Of
three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum
continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at
average ambient temperature and pressure((, and)); and (ii) from one
hundred thousand up to three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts when alternative
jurisdiction is sought under RCW 80.50.060;

(b) Floating
thermal power plants of fifty thousand kilowatts or more, including associated
facilities;

(((b))) (c)
Facilities which will have the capacity to receive liquified natural gas in the
equivalent of more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas
per day, which has been transported over marine waters;

(((c))) (d)
Facilities which will have the capacity to receive more than an average of
fifty thousand barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum or liquified
petroleum gas which has been or will be transported over marine waters, except
that the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities
unless occasioned by such new facility construction;

(((d))) (e)
Any underground reservoir for receipt and storage of natural gas as defined in
RCW 80.40.010 capable of delivering an average of more than one hundred million
standard cubic feet of natural gas per day; ((and

(e))) (f) Facilities capable of processing
more than twenty-five thousand barrels per day of petroleum into refined
products; and

(g) Facilities that
exclusively use renewable resources with a generating capacity of at least one
thousand kilowatts when alternative jurisdiction is sought under RCW 80.50.060.

(15) "Land use
plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element thereof adopted by a
unit of local government pursuant to chapter((s)) 35.63, 35A.63, ((or))
36.70, or 36.70A RCW((;)).

(16) "Zoning
ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local government regulating the
use of land and adopted pursuant to chapter((s)) 35.63, 35A.63, ((or))
36.70, or 36.70A RCW, or Article XI of the state Constitution.

(17) "Renewable
resource" means: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d)
landfill gas; or (e) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood,
forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.

Sec. 2. RCW 80.50.030 and 1996 c
186 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created
and established the energy facility site evaluation council.

(2)(a) The ((chairman))
chair of the council shall be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate, shall have a vote on matters before the council, shall
serve for a term coextensive with the term of the governor, and is removable
for cause. The ((chairman)) chair may designate a member of the
council to serve as acting ((chairman)) chair in the event of the
((chairman's)) chair's absence. The ((chairman)) chair
is a "state employee" for the purposes of chapter 42.52 RCW and
shall receive a salary as determined under RCW 43.03.040. As applicable,
when attending meetings of the council, members may receive reimbursement for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and are
eligible for compensation under RCW 43.03.250.

(b) The ((chairman))
chair or a designee shall execute all official documents, contracts, and
other materials on behalf of the council. The Washington state department of
community, trade, and economic development shall provide all administrative and
staff support for the council. The director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development has supervisory authority over the staff of the
council and shall employ such personnel as are necessary to implement this
chapter. Not more than three such employees may be exempt from chapter 41.06
RCW.

(3) The council shall
consist of the directors, administrators, or their designees, of the following
departments, agencies, commissions, and committees or their statutory
successors:

(a) Department of
ecology;

(b) Department of fish
and wildlife;

(c) ((Department of
health;

(d) Military
department;

(e))) Department of community, trade, and economic
development;

(((f))) (d)
Utilities and transportation commission; and

(((g))) (e)
Department of natural resources((;

(h) Department of
agriculture;

(i) Department of
transportation)).

(4) The directors,
administrators, or their designees, of the following departments or their
statutory successors, may participate as councilmembers at their own discretion
provided they elect to participate no later than sixty days after the
application is filed:

(a) Department of
agriculture;

(b) Department of
transportation;

(c) Military
department; and

(d) Department of
health.

(5) The
appropriate county legislative authority of every county wherein an application
for a proposed site is filed shall appoint a member or designee as a voting member
to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council
only at such times as the council considers the proposed site for the county
which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve until there
has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.

(((5))) (6)
The city legislative authority of every city within whose corporate limits an
energy plant is proposed to be located shall appoint a member or designee as a
voting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit
with the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site
for the city which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall
serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site.

(((6))) (7)
For any port district wherein an application for a proposed port facility is
filed subject to this chapter, the port district shall appoint a member or
designee as a nonvoting member to the council. The member or designee so
appointed shall sit with the council only at such times as the council
considers the proposed site for the port district which he or she represents,
and such member or designee shall serve until there has been a final acceptance
or rejection of the proposed site. The provisions of this subsection shall not
apply if the port district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or
association with any other person.

Sec. 3. RCW 80.50.040 and 1990 c
12 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The council shall have
the following powers:

(1) To adopt,
promulgate, amend, or rescind suitable rules and regulations, pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and the
policies and practices of the council in connection therewith;

(2) To adopt rules
concerning time limits for any action required or authorized by this chapter;

(3) To develop
and apply environmental and ecological guidelines in relation to the type,
design, location, construction, and operational conditions of certification of
energy facilities subject to this chapter;

(((3))) (4)
To establish rules of practice for the conduct of public hearings pursuant to
the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, as found in chapter 34.05
RCW;

(((4))) (5)
To prescribe the form, content, and necessary supporting documentation for site
certification;

(((5))) (6)
To receive applications for energy facility locations and to investigate the
sufficiency thereof;

(((6))) (7)
To make and contract, when applicable, for independent studies of sites
proposed by the applicant;

(((7))) (8)
To conduct hearings on the proposed location of the energy facilities;

(((8))) (9)
To prepare written reports to the governor which shall include: (a) A
statement indicating whether the application is in compliance with the
council's guidelines, (b) criteria specific to the site and transmission line
routing, (c) a council recommendation as to the disposition of the application,
and (d) a draft certification agreement when the council recommends approval of
the application;

(((9))) (10)
To prescribe the means for monitoring of the effects arising from the
construction and the operation of energy facilities to assure continued
compliance with terms of certification and/or permits issued by the council
pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or subsection (((12))) (13) of this
section: PROVIDED, That any on-site inspection required by the council shall
be performed by other state agencies pursuant to interagency agreement:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the council ((shall)) may retain authority
for determining compliance relative to monitoring;

(((10))) (11)
To integrate its site evaluation activity with activities of federal agencies
having jurisdiction in such matters to avoid unnecessary duplication;

(((11))) (12)
To present state concerns and interests to other states, regional
organizations, and the federal government on the location, construction, and
operation of any energy facility which may affect the environment, health, or
safety of the citizens of the state of Washington;

(((12))) (13)
To issue permits in compliance with applicable provisions of the federally
approved state implementation plan adopted in accordance with the Federal Clean
Air Act, as now existing or hereafter amended, for the new construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement or operation of energy facilities: PROVIDED,
That such permits shall become effective only if the governor approves an
application for certification and executes a certification agreement pursuant
to this chapter: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all such permits be conditioned
upon compliance with all provisions of the federally approved state
implementation plan which apply to energy facilities covered within the provisions
of this chapter; and

(((13))) (14)
To serve as an interagency coordinating body for energy-related issues.

Sec. 4. RCW 80.50.060 and 1977
ex.s. c 371 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall apply to the construction of energy facilities which
includes the new construction of energy facilities and the reconstruction or
enlargement of existing energy facilities where the net increase in physical
capacity or dimensions resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets
or exceeds those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (((17),
as now or hereafter amended)) (14). No construction of such energy
facilities may be undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
after July 15, 1977, without first obtaining certification in the manner
provided in this chapter.

(2) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply to normal maintenance and repairs which do not
increase the capacity or dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7)
and (((17), as now or hereafter amended)) (14).

(3) Applications for
certification of energy facilities made prior to July 15, 1977 shall continue
to be governed by the applicable provisions of law in effect on the day
immediately preceding July 15, 1977 with the exceptions of RCW 80.50.190 and
80.50.071 which shall apply to such prior applications and to site
certifications prospectively from July 15, 1977.

(4) Applications for
certification shall be upon forms prescribed by the council and shall be
supported by such information and technical studies as the council may require.

(5) As an
alternative to any other process required by state or local law, applicants may
elect to use the siting process established in this chapter for the siting of
stationary thermal power plants and energy facilities that exclusively use
renewable resources with generating capacities from less than three hundred
fifty thousand to one hundred thousand kilowatts. In addition, applicants may
elect to use the siting process established in this chapter for energy
facilities that exclusively use renewable resources with a generating capacity
from less than one hundred thousand to one thousand kilowatts.

Sec. 5. RCW 80.50.090 and 1989 c
175 s 173 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council shall
conduct a public hearing in the county of the proposed site ((within sixty
days of)) as soon as practicable after receipt of an application for
site certification: PROVIDED, That the place of such public hearing shall be
as close as practical to the proposed site.

(2) The council ((must))
shall conduct a public hearing to determine ((at the initial public
hearing)) whether or not the proposed site is consistent and in compliance
with city, county, or regional land use plans or zoning
ordinances and other applicable state and local siting standards. If it
is determined that the proposed site does conform with existing land use plans
or zoning ordinances in effect as of the date of the application, the county or
regional planning authority shall not thereafter change such land use plans or
zoning ordinances so as to affect the proposed site.

(3) Prior to the
issuance of a council recommendation to the governor under RCW 80.50.100 a
public hearing, conducted as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05
RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, shall be held. At such public hearing
any person shall be entitled to be heard in support of or in opposition to the
application for certification.

(4) Additional public
hearings shall be held as deemed appropriate by the council in the exercise of
its functions under this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 80.50.100 and 1989 c
175 s 174 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
council shall report to the governor its recommendations as to the approval or
rejection of an application for certification within ((twelve)) nine
months of receipt by the council of such an application, or such later time as
is mutually agreed by the council and the applicant. Pursuant to RCW
34.05.476, the council's report to the governor shall be based on the
administrative record developed during the public hearing held under RCW
80.50.090(3), along with the environmental impact statement prepared under RCW
43.21C.030, and relevant information presented at other public hearings held by
the council under this chapter. If the council recommends approval of an
application for certification, it shall also submit a draft certification
agreement with the report. The council shall include conditions in the draft
certification agreement to implement the provisions of this chapter((,
including, but not limited to, conditions to protect state or local
governmental or community interests affected by the construction or operation
of the energy facility, and conditions designed to recognize the purpose of
laws or ordinances, or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, that are
preempted or superseded pursuant to RCW 80.50.110 as now or hereafter amended)).
Any condition that constitutes a variance to an otherwise applicable state or
local standard must be based on a finding that the variance will adequately
protect against the harm sought to be prevented by the state or local standard
being varied.

(b) If a draft
certification recommends the use of public property, the council's report to
the governor shall state the views of state agencies or local governments with
authority over the public property.

(2) Within ((sixty))
thirty days of receipt of the council's report the governor shall take
one of the following actions:

(a) Approve the
application and execute the draft certification agreement; or

(b) Reject the
application; or

(c) Direct the council
to reconsider certain aspects of the draft certification agreement.

The council shall
reconsider such aspects of the draft certification agreement by reviewing the
existing record of the application or, as necessary, by reopening the
adjudicative proceeding for the purposes of receiving additional evidence.
Such reconsideration shall be conducted expeditiously. The council shall
resubmit the draft certification to the governor incorporating any amendments
deemed necessary upon reconsideration within forty-five days of receipt of
such direction for reconsideration. Within ((sixty)) thirty
days of receipt of such draft certification agreement, the governor shall
either approve the application and execute the certification agreement or
reject the application. The certification agreement shall be binding upon
execution by the governor and the applicant.

(3) The rejection of an
application for certification by the governor shall be final as to that
application but shall not preclude submission of a subsequent application for
the same site on the basis of changed conditions or new information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No city or county
comprehensive plan or zoning ordinance may preclude the siting of energy
facilities.

(2) The council may
adopt standards by rule to guide cities and counties in determining whether a
particular comprehensive plan or zoning ordinance provision may have a
preclusionary effect on the siting of one or more types of energy facilities.

Sec. 8. RCW 80.50.110 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If any provision of
this chapter is in conflict with any other provision, limitation, or
restriction which is now in effect under any other law of this state, or any
rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, this chapter shall govern and
control and such other law or rule or regulation promulgated thereunder shall
be deemed superseded for the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, the state hereby preempts the
regulation and certification of the location, construction, and operational
conditions of certification of the energy facilities included under RCW
80.50.060 as now or hereafter amended.

(3)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt the authority of state
agencies or local governments regarding the management or use of public
property proposed for the siting of energy facilities.

---
END ---