BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to provide an incentive for water distribution businesses to help reduce their
customers' use of water through measures such as distributing shower flow
restrictors, toilet tank water displacement devices, and leak detection dye
tablets; providing water-efficient fixtures at no cost, giving a rebate for
customer-purchased fixtures, or arranging for suppliers to provide fixtures at
a reduced price; providing plants for low-water demand landscaping, moisture
sensors, flow timers, low-volume sprinklers, and drip irrigation systems; and
utilizing conservation pricing and billings that show percentage
increase/decrease in water use over the same period from the previous year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax
under this chapter, there shall be deducted from the gross income those amounts
expended to improve customers' efficiency of water use or to otherwise reduce
the use of water by customers when the expenditures are implementing elements
of the conservation plan within a state approved water system plan.

(2) This chapter does
not apply to amounts received for water services supplied by an entity that
holds a permit under RCW 90.46.030 when the water supplied is reclaimed water
as defined in RCW 90.46.010.

(3) The office of
financial management, in consultation with the departments of revenue, health,
and ecology, must evaluate the reduction in water use and the long-term revenue
impacts of the deductions and exclusions authorized by this section, and report
its findings by October 1, 2001, to the legislature's standing committees with
jurisdiction over water resources and the legislative fiscal committees.

(4) This
section expires June 30, 2003.

---
END ---