BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Transfer of water
rights issued as family farm permits under this chapter may be approved as
authorized under this section and under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100
or chapter 90.80 RCW as applicable.

(2) A water right
issued as a family farm permit that is in compliance with this chapter may be
transferred to other land:

(a) For use for agricultural
irrigation purposes as authorized by RCW 90.66.060; or

(b) For any purpose of
use that is a beneficial use of water if the transfer is seasonal or temporary,
except that use for agricultural irrigation purposes shall be as authorized by
RCW 90.66.060.

(3) If, prior to the
application for transfer, the place of use of a water right issued as a family
farm permit is located within the boundaries of a city or town or within the
boundaries of an urban growth area designated under chapter 36.70A RCW, the
water right may be transferred and, following transfer, may be used for any
purpose of use that is a beneficial use of water, except that use for
agricultural irrigation purposes shall be as authorized by RCW 90.66.060.

(4) If, prior to the
application for transfer, the place of use of a water right issued as a family
farm permit is not located within the boundaries of a city or town or within
the boundaries of an urban growth area designated under chapter 36.70A RCW, the
water right may be transferred and, following transfer, may be used for any
purpose of use that is a beneficial use of water, if the point of diversion or
withdrawal is located within the boundaries of a city or town or within the
boundaries of an urban growth area designated under chapter 36.70A RCW and the
diversion or withdrawal is from the same source of supply, except that use for
agricultural irrigation purposes shall be as authorized by RCW 90.66.060.

(5) If a portion of the
water governed by a water right established under the authority of a family
farm permit is made surplus to the beneficial uses exercised under the right
through the implementation of practices or technologies, including but not
limited to conveyance practices or technologies, which are more efficient or
more water-use efficient than those under which the right was perfected, the
right to use the surplus water may be transferred to any purpose of use that is
a beneficial use of water. Nothing in this subsection authorizes: A transfer
of the portion of a water right that is necessary for the production of crops
historically grown under the right; or a transfer of a water right or a portion
of a water right that has not been perfected through beneficial use before the
transfer. Water right transfers approved under this subsection must be
consistent with the provisions of RCW 90.03.380(1).

(6) The authority
granted by this section to transfer or alter the purpose of use of a water
right established under the authority of a family farm permit shall not be
construed as limiting in any manner the authority granted by RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.390, or 90.44.100 to alter other elements of such a water right.

(7) For any transfer
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the provisions of section 4 of
this act shall be recorded with the county auditor of the county where the land
from which the water right has been transferred is located.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.66.060 and 1979 c
3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to ((withdraw))
use water ((for use)) for the irrigation of agricultural lands
under authority of a family farm permit shall have no time limit ((but)),
shall be conditioned upon the land being irrigated complying with the
definition of a family farm as defined at the time the permit is issued((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)), and may be transferred as authorized by
section 1 of this act.

(2) If the
acquisition by any person of land and water rights by gift, devise, bequest, or
by way of bona fide satisfaction of a debt, would otherwise cause land being
irrigated pursuant to a family farm permit to lose its status as a family farm,
such acquisition shall be deemed to have no effect upon the status of family
farm water permits pertaining to land held or acquired by the person acquiring
such land and water rights if all lands held or acquired are again in
compliance with the definition of a family farm within five years from the date
of such acquisition.

(((2))) (3)
If the department determines that water is being ((withdrawn)) used
under a family farm permit ((for use)) on land not in conformity with
the definition of a family farm, the department shall notify the holder of such
family farm permit by personal service of such fact and the permit shall be
suspended two years from the date of receipt of notice unless the person having
a controlling interest in said land satisfies the department that such land is
again in conformity with the definition of a family farm. The department may,
upon a showing of good cause and reasonable effort to attain compliance on the
part of the person having the controlling interest in such land, extend the two
year period prior to suspension. If conformity is not achieved prior to five
years from the date of notice, the ((rights of withdrawal)) water
right issued as a family farm permit shall be canceled.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.66 RCW to read as follows:

A water right issued as
a family farm permit, a publicly owned land permit, or a public water entity
permit that is in compliance with this chapter is entitled to be issued a water
right certificate as authorized by RCW 90.03.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
RCW 90.44.050, land from which a water right issued as a family farm permit
under chapter 90.66 RCW has been transferred must obtain a permit to make any
withdrawal of public ground water that was not in existence on July 1, 2001.

---
END ---