BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
that this act improve the scientific basis for making decisions in site
selection for wetlands mitigation projects.

The legislature further
intends that this act maximize the cost-effectiveness of public and private
investment in compensatory wetland mitigation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature finds
that wetlands are important aquatic resources that provide many valuable
functions such as flood control, ground water recharge, water filtration, water
purification, and erosion control. These functions make them important to
protect property and property values, promote quality neighborhoods, and to
protect and enhance wildlife and the wetlands' associated ecosystems.

When impacts to wetlands
are permitted, the creation, restoration, or enhancement of other wetlands are
generally required. The legislature further finds that recent studies of the
effectiveness of compensatory wetland mitigation projects show that over
seventy percent are failing. The principal reasons stem from failure during
the permitting process to adequately investigate the practical relationships
between the proposed project and the local water resources that will be
associated with it. There has also been a finding that, frequently, the
original wetland functioned better than the mitigated wetland, such that a net
loss of wetland area and functions frequently occurs in spite of the mitigation
project.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.82.070 and 1998 c
247 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Watershed planning
under this chapter shall address water quantity in the management area by
undertaking an assessment of water supply and use in the management area and
developing strategies for future use.

(1) The assessment
shall include:

(a) An estimate of the
surface and ground water present in the management area;

(b) An estimate of the
surface and ground water available in the management area, taking into account
seasonal and other variations;

(c) An estimate of the
water in the management area represented by claims in the water rights claims
registry, water use permits, certificated rights, existing minimum instream
flow rules, federally reserved rights, and any other rights to water;

(d) An estimate of the
surface and ground water actually being used in the management area;

(e) An estimate of the
water needed in the future for use in the management area;

(f) An identification
of the location of areas where aquifers are known to recharge surface bodies of
water ((and)), the location of areas known to provide for the
recharge of aquifers from the surface, and the relationship between these
aquifers and nearby surface and ground water; and

(g) An estimate of the
surface and ground water available for further appropriation, taking into
account the minimum instream flows adopted by rule or to be adopted by rule
under this chapter for streams in the management area including the data
necessary to evaluate necessary flows for fish.

(2) Strategies for
increasing water supplies in the management area, which may include, but are
not limited to, increasing water supplies through water conservation, water
reuse, the use of reclaimed water, voluntary water transfers, aquifer recharge
and recovery, additional water allocations, or additional water storage and
water storage enhancements. The objective of these strategies is to supply
water in sufficient quantities to satisfy the minimum instream flows for fish
and to provide water for future out-of-stream uses for water identified in
subsection (1)(e) and (g) of this section and to ensure that adequate water
supplies are available for agriculture, energy production, and population and
economic growth under the requirements of the state's growth management act,
chapter 36.70A RCW. These strategies, in and of themselves, shall not be
construed to confer new water rights. The watershed plan must address the
strategies required under this subsection.

(3) The assessment
may include an identification of the location of areas where wetlands exist,
areas that provide the potential for wetlands restoration, and areas with
potential for use in wetlands mitigation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.74 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
ecology shall review wetlands compensatory mitigation projects and evaluate the
adequacy of hydrological information presented by a project proponent to
determine the likelihood of success of the project.

(2) The department may
require a hydrological assessment of the site.

(3) The hydrological
assessment must be sufficiently detailed to demonstrate that the mitigation
site will attain a hydrologic regime to meet the goals presented in the
proponent's compensatory mitigation project.

(4) The hydrological
assessment should identify the relationship between the proponent's
compensatory wetlands mitigation project and the site's existing ground water
and surface water.

(5) If a
proposed wetlands compensation project targets specific functions, the
hydrological assessment must demonstrate that the site will achieve a
hydrologic regime needed to develop and support these functions.

---
END ---