BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
9.94A.390 and 2000 c 28 s 8 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 The court may impose a sentence outside the standard
sentence

_7 range for an offense if it finds, considering the
purpose of this

_8 chapter, that there are substantial and compelling
reasons

_9 justifying an exceptional sentence. Whenever a sentence
outside

10 the standard sentence range is imposed, the court shall
set forth

11 the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact
and

12 conclusions of law. A sentence outside the standard
sentence

13 range shall be a determinate sentence.

14 If the sentencing court finds that an exceptional
sentence

15 outside the standard sentence range should be imposed,
the

16 sentence is subject to review only as provided for in
RCW

17 9.94A.210(4).

18 A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1)
and (2)

19 governing whether sentences are to be served
consecutively or

p. 1 SB
5916

_1 concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the
limitations

_2 in this section, and may be appealed by the offender or
the state

_3 as set forth in RCW 9.94A.210 (2) through (6).

_4 The following are illustrative factors which the
court may

_5 consider in the exercise of its discretion to impose an

_6 exceptional sentence. The following are illustrative
only and are

_7 not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional
sentences.

_8 (1) Mitigating Circumstances

_9 (a) To a significant degree, the victim was an
initiator,

10 willing participant, aggressor, or provoker of the
incident.

11 (b) Before detection, the defendant compensated, or
made a good

12 faith effort to compensate, the victim of the criminal
conduct for

13 any damage or injury sustained.

14 (c) The defendant committed the crime under duress,
coercion,

15 threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a
complete

16 defense but which significantly affected his or her
conduct.

17 (d) The defendant, with no apparent predisposition
to do so,

18 was induced by others to participate in the crime.

19 (e) The defendant's capacity to appreciate the
wrongfulness of

20 his or her conduct, or to conform his or her conduct to
the

21 requirements of the law, was significantly impaired.
Voluntary

22 use of drugs or alcohol is excluded.

23 (f) The offense was principally accomplished by
another person

24 and the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere
concern

25 for the safety or well-being of the victim.

26 (g) The operation of the multiple offense policy of
RCW

27 9.94A.400 results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly

28 excessive in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in

29 RCW 9.94A.010.

30 (h) The defendant or the defendant's children
suffered a

31 continuing pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the
victim of

32 the offense and the offense is a response to that abuse.

33 (2) Aggravating Circumstances

34 (a) The defendant's conduct during the commission of
the

35 current offense manifested deliberate cruelty to the
victim.

36 (b) The defendant knew or should have known that the
victim of

37 the current offense was particularly vulnerable or
incapable of

SB 5916 p. 2

_1 resistance due to extreme youth, advanced age,
disability, or ill

_2 health.

_3 (c) The current offense was a violent offense, and
the

_4 defendant knew that the victim of the current offense
was

_5 pregnant.

_6 (d) The current offense was a major economic offense
or series

_7 of offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of
the

_8 following factors:

_9 (i) The current offense involved multiple victims or
multiple

10 incidents per victim;

11 (ii) The current offense involved attempted or
actual monetary

12 loss substantially greater than typical for the offense;

13 (iii) The current offense involved a high degree of

14 sophistication or planning or occurred over a lengthy
period of

15 time; or

16 (iv) The defendant used his or her position of
trust,

17 confidence, or fiduciary responsibility to facilitate
the

18 commission of the current offense.

19 (e) The current offense was a major violation of the
Uniform

20 Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA),
related to

21 trafficking in controlled substances, which was more
onerous than

22 the typical offense of its statutory definition: The
presence of

23 ANY of the following may identify a current offense as a
major

24 VUCSA:

25 (i) The current offense involved at least three
separate

26 transactions in which controlled substances were sold,

27 transferred, or possessed with intent to do so;

28 (ii) The current offense involved an attempted or
actual sale

29 or transfer of controlled substances in quantities
substantially

30 larger than for personal use;

31 (iii) The current offense involved the manufacture
of

32 controlled substances for use by other parties;

33 (iv) The circumstances of the current offense reveal
the

34 offender to have occupied a high position in the drug
distribution

35 hierarchy;

36 (v) The current offense involved a high degree of

37 sophistication or planning, occurred over a lengthy
period of

38 time, or involved a broad geographic area of
disbursement; or

p. 3 SB
5916

_1 (vi) The offender used his or her position or status
to

_2 facilitate the commission of the current offense,
including

_3 positions of trust, confidence or fiduciary
responsibility (e.g.,

_4 pharmacist, physician, or other medical professional).

_5 (f) The current offense included a finding of sexual
motivation

_6 pursuant to RCW 9.94A.127.

_7 (g) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of
sexual abuse

_8 of the same victim under the age of eighteen years
manifested by

_9 multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time.

10 (h) The current offense involved domestic violence,
as defined

11 in RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the following was
present:

12 (i) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of

13 psychological, physical, or sexual abuse of the victim
manifested

14 by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time;

15 (ii) The offense occurred within sight or sound of
the victim's

16 or the offender's minor children under the age of
eighteen years;

17 or

18 (iii) The offender's conduct during the commission
of the

19 current offense manifested deliberate cruelty or
intimidation of

20 the victim.

21 (i) The operation of the multiple offense policy of
RCW

22 9.94A.400 results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too

23 lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in

24 RCW 9.94A.010.

25 (j) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or
prior

26 unscored foreign criminal history results in a
presumptive

27 sentence that is clearly too lenient in light of the
purpose of

28 this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

29 (k) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child
victim of

30 rape.

31 (l) The defendant knew that the victim of the
current offense

32 was a youth who was not residing with a legal custodian
and the

33 defendant established or promoted the relationship for
the primary

34 purpose of victimization.

35 (m) The current offense is a vehicular assault or
vehicular

36 homicide and the person injured or killed was within
a roadway

37 construction zone as defined in RCW 46.61.527.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 5916 p. 4