BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.14.100 and 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every employer
subject to the provisions of this title shall:

(a) Post and
keep posted in a conspicuous place or places in and about his or her
place or places of business a reasonable number of typewritten or printed
notices of compliance substantially identical to a form prescribed by the
director, stating that such employer is subject to the provisions of this
title. Such notice shall advise whether the employer is self-insured or has
insured with the department, and shall designate a person or persons on the
premises to whom report of injury shall be made; and

(b) Within thirty
days of hire, using a form prescribed by the department, or a substantially
identical form, notify workers of the process for filing a claim under this
title. The notice must specify their right to receive health services from a
provider of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010 and 51.36.015.

(2) Any employer who
has failed to open an account with the department or qualify as a self-insurer
shall not post or permit to be posted on or about his or her place of
business or premises any notice of compliance with this title and any willful
violation of this subsection by any officer or supervisory employee of an
employer ((shall be)) is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 2. RCW 51.28.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 350 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any
accident occurs to any worker it shall be the duty of ((such)):

(a) The worker
or someone in his or her behalf to forthwith report such accident to his or her
employer, superintendent, or ((foreman or forewoman)) supervisor
in charge of the work((,)); and ((of))

(b) The employer
on receiving the report of the accident to:

(i) At once
report such accident and the injury resulting therefrom to the department
pursuant to RCW 51.28.025((, as now or hereafter amended,)) where the
worker has received treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized, disabled
from work, or has died as the apparent result of such accident and injury;
and

(ii) Notify the
worker of his or her right to receive health services from a provider of the
worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010 and 51.36.015.

(2) Upon receipt
of such notice of accident, the department shall immediately forward to the
worker or his or her beneficiaries or dependents notification, in nontechnical
language, of their rights under this title. The notice must specify the
worker's right to receive health services from a provider of the worker's
choice under RCW 51.36.010 and 51.36.015.

Sec. 3. RCW 51.28.020 and 1984 c
159 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Where a
worker is entitled to compensation under this title he or she shall file with
the department or his or her ((self-insuring)) self-insured
employer, as the case may be, his or her application for such, together with
the certificate of the physician who attended him or her((, and it shall be
the duty of)). An application form developed by the department shall
include a notice specifying the worker's right to receive health services from
a provider of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010 and 51.36.015.

(b) The
physician ((to)) who attended the injured worker shall inform the
injured worker of his or her rights under this title and ((to)) lend all
necessary assistance in making this application for compensation and such proof
of other matters as required by the rules of the department without charge to
the worker. The department shall provide physicians with a manual which
outlines the procedures to be followed in applications for compensation
involving occupational diseases, and which describes claimants' rights and
responsibilities related to occupational disease claims.

(2) If
application for compensation is made to a ((self-insuring)) self-insured
employer, he or she shall forthwith send a copy ((thereof)) of the
application to the department.

Sec. 4. RCW 51.28.080 and 1985 c
338 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

An employer shall be
promptly notified by the department when it has determined that a worker of
that employer is entitled to compensation under RCW 51.32.090. Notification
shall include, in nontechnical language, an explanation of the employer's
rights under this title and shall specify the worker's right to receive
health services from a provider of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010 and
51.36.015.

Sec. 5. RCW 51.36.010 and 1986 c
58 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the
occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to compensation under ((the
provisions of)) this title, he or she shall receive proper and necessary
medical and surgical services at the hands of a physician, or other health
services provider acting within the scope of his or her practice, of ((his
or her)) the worker's own choice, if conveniently located, and
proper and necessary hospital care and services during the period of his or her
disability from such injury((, but the same)). An employer may not
direct a worker to a particular provider or kind of provider except as
necessary to provide emergency or first-aid treatment and care to the worker at
the time of injury or while transporting the worker to a medical facility.

(2) The benefits
authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall be limited in point
of duration as follows:

In the case of
permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond the date when compensation
shall be awarded him or her, except when the worker returned to work before
permanent partial disability award is made, in such case not to extend beyond
the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of
temporary disability not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to
him or her shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned
to his or her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be continued
if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by the supervisor of
industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her more complete recovery; in
case of a permanent total disability not to extend beyond the date on which a
lump sum settlement is made with him or her or he or she is placed upon the
permanent pension roll: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial
insurance, solely in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and
surgical treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when such
medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the supervisor of
industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or provide for the
administration of medical and therapeutic measures including payment of
prescription medications, but not including those controlled substances
currently scheduled by the state board of pharmacy as Schedule I, II, III, or
IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, which are necessary to alleviate
continuing pain which results from the industrial injury. In order to authorize
such continued treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial
insurance issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.

(3) The
supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee, or a
self-insurer, in his or her sole discretion, may authorize inoculation or other
immunological treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted
in probable exposure of the worker to a potential infectious occupational
disease. Authorization of such treatment does not bind the department or
self-insurer in any adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's
beneficiary for an occupational disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. By January 1, 2002, the
department of labor and industries must develop the forms required under
sections 1 and 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 and 3 of this
act take effect January 1, 2002.

---
END ---