BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to
subsection (4) of this section, the legislative authority of any county may
impose an additional excise tax on the purchase and sale of real property in
the county at the rate of one-half of one percent of the selling price. The
proceeds of the tax shall be used exclusively for the development of affordable
housing including acquisition, building, rehabilitation, and maintenance and
operation of housing for very low, low, and moderate income persons and those
with special needs.

(2) Revenues generated
from the tax imposed under this section shall be placed in an affordable
housing account administered by the county. Disbursements from the account
shall be made following a competitive grant and loan process. The county
legislative authority shall determine a mechanism for receiving grant and loan
applications, and criteria by which the applications shall be approved and
funded. Eligible recipients of grants and loans from the account shall be
private nonprofit, affordable housing providers, the housing authority for the
county, or other housing programs conducted or funded by a public agency, or by
a public agency in partnership with a private nonprofit entity.

(3) The taxes imposed
under this section shall be imposed in the same manner and on the same
occurrences, and are subject to the same conditions, as the taxes under chapter
82.45 RCW, except that the tax shall be the obligation of both the purchaser
and the seller, as determined by the county legislative authority, with at
least one-half of the obligation being that of the purchaser. The county may
enforce the obligation through an action of debt against the purchaser or
seller or may foreclose the lien on the property in the same manner prescribed
for the foreclosure of mortgages. The imposition of the tax is effective
thirty days after the election at which the tax is authorized.

(4)(a) No tax may be
imposed under this section unless approved by a majority of the voters of the
county voting, for a specified period and for a specified maximum rate. This
vote must follow either:

(i) The adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority proposing this action; or

(ii) The filing of a
petition proposing this action with the county auditor, signed by county voters
at least equal in number to ten percent of the total number of voters in the
county who voted in the preceding general election.

(b) The ballot
proposition shall be submitted to the voters of the county at the next general
election occurring at least sixty days after a petition is filed, or at any
special election prior to this general election called for this purpose by the
county legislative authority.

(5) A plan
for the expenditure of the proceeds of the tax imposed by this section shall be
prepared by the county legislative authority at least sixty days before the
election if the proposal is initiated by resolution of the county legislative
authority, or within six months after the tax has been authorized by the voters
if the proposal is initiated by petition. Prior to the adoption of this plan,
the elected officials of cities located within the county shall be consulted
and at least one public hearing shall be held to obtain public comment. The
proceeds of the tax shall be expended in conformance with this plan.

--- END ---