BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes the potential for additional water storage as a solution to the
water supply needs of the state. Last year the legislature created a task
force to examine the role of increased water storage in providing water
supplies to meet the needs of fish, population growth, and economic
development, and to enhance the protection of people's lives and their property
and the protection of aquatic habitat through flood control facilities. One
solution discussed by the task force to address the state's water supply
problem is to store water when there is excess runoff and stream flow, and
deliver or release it during the low flow period when it is needed. The task
force discussed the need for assessments of potential site locations for water
storage projects. The legislature intends this act to assist in obtaining the
assessments relating to water storage.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.82.070 and 1998 c
247 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Watershed planning
under this chapter shall address water quantity in the management area by
undertaking an assessment of water supply and use in the management area and
developing strategies for future use.

(1) The assessment
shall include:

(a) An estimate of the
surface and ground water present in the management area;

(b) An estimate of the
surface and ground water available in the management area, taking into account
seasonal and other variations;

(c) An estimate of the
water in the management area represented by claims in the water rights claims
registry, water use permits, certificated rights, existing minimum instream
flow rules, federally reserved rights, and any other rights to water;

(d) An estimate of the
surface and ground water actually being used in the management area;

(e) An estimate of the
water needed in the future for use in the management area;

(f) An identification
of the location of areas where aquifers are known to recharge surface bodies of
water and areas known to provide for the recharge of aquifers from the surface;
and

(g) An estimate of the
surface and ground water available for further appropriation, taking into
account the minimum instream flows adopted by rule or to be adopted by rule
under this chapter for streams in the management area including the data
necessary to evaluate necessary flows for fish.

(2) Strategies for
increasing water supplies in the management area, which may include, but are
not limited to, increasing water supplies through water conservation, water
reuse, the use of reclaimed water, voluntary water transfers, aquifer recharge
and recovery, additional water allocations, or additional water storage and
water storage enhancements. The objective of these strategies is to supply
water in sufficient quantities to satisfy the minimum instream flows for fish
and to provide water for future out-of-stream uses for water identified in
subsection (1)(e) and (g) of this section and to ensure that adequate water
supplies are available for agriculture, energy production, and population and
economic growth under the requirements of the state's growth management act,
chapter 36.70A RCW. These strategies, in and of themselves, shall not be
construed to confer new water rights. The watershed plan must address the
strategies required under this subsection.

(3) The
assessment may include the identification of potential site locations for water
storage projects. The potential site locations may be for either large or
small projects and cover the full range of possible alternatives. The possible
alternatives include off-channel storage, underground storage, the enlargement
or enhancement of existing storage, and on-channel storage.

---
END ---