BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.05.035 and 1999
c 249 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall:

(a) Manage timber and
land under its jurisdiction to maintain and enhance aesthetic and recreational
values;

(b) Apply modern
conservation practices to maintain and enhance aesthetic, recreational, and
ecological resources; and

(c) Designate and
preserve certain forest areas throughout the state as natural forests or
natural areas for interpretation, study, and preservation purposes.

(2) Trees may be
removed from state parks:

(a) When hazardous to
persons, property, or facilities;

(b) As part of a park
maintenance or development project, or conservation practice;

(c) As part of a road
or utility easement; or

(d) When damaged by a
catastrophic forest event.

(3) Tree removal under
subsection (2) of this section shall be done by commission personnel, unless
the personnel lack necessary expertise. Except in emergencies and when
feasible, significant trees shall be removed only after they have been marked
or appraised by a professional forester. The removal of significant trees from
a natural forest may take place only after a public hearing has been held,
except in emergencies.

(4) When feasible,
felled timber shall be left on the ground for natural purposes or used for park
purposes including, but not limited to, building projects, trail mulching, and firewood.
In natural forest areas, first consideration shall be given to leaving timber
on the ground for natural purposes.

(5) The commission may
issue permits to individuals under RCW 4.24.210 and 79A.05.090 for the removal
of wood debris from state parks for personal firewood use.

(6) Only timber that
qualifies for cutting or removal under subsection (2) of this section may be
sold. Timber shall be sold only when surplus to the needs of the park.

(7) Net revenue derived
from timber sales shall be deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship
account created in RCW 79A.05.215.

(8) The
commission shall adopt rules that require a record check of job applicants,
volunteers, and independent contractors who will work with children or
vulnerable adults, or who will be responsible for collecting or disbursing cash
or processing credit card transactions, through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of
investigation. A permanent employee of the commission, employed as of the
effective date of this section, is exempt from the provisions of this
subsection.

--- END ---