BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 28B.35

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 The board of trustees of Eastern Washington
University may

_7 offer doctorate level degrees in physical therapy
subject to

_8 review and approval by the higher education coordinating
board.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5921