BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature intends to assure that appeals of water right decisions regarding
water rights subject to a general stream adjudication are governed by an
appeals process that is efficient and eliminates unnecessary duplication, while
fully preserving the rights of all affected parties.

--- END ---