BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this
chapter is to allow all state or local governmental entities that award
contracts for publicly funded projects to select contractors by the lowest
responsible bidder method.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A state or local
governmental entity that awards contracts for publicly funded projects may
examine, on projects where the scope of work is unusual, complex, or
specialized, general contractors and electrical, mechanical, and heating,
ventilation, and air conditioning subcontractors bidding on a project to
determine if the low bidding contractor meets responsibility criteria.

(2) The governmental
entity's contracting officer must make an affirmative determination of
responsibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) When requested,
contractors and affected subcontractors are required to submit information,
under oath, in the form of a questionnaire to the governmental entity to assist
the governmental entity in making a determination as to whether the contractor
or subcontractor is a responsible bidder. If the information is not provided,
or the information that is provided is false on a material point, then the
bidder will be ruled not responsible.

(2) All information
submitted on the questionnaire is subject to public inspection. The required
information must be submitted with the bid, or within forty-eight hours after
the submission of the bid.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Governmental entities may
create their own questionnaire, required under section 3 of this act, or use a
questionnaire created by the Washington state department of general
administration or the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. In the presence of
information clearly indicating that the prospective contractor is not a
responsible bidder, the governmental entity or the entity's contracting
officer shall make a determination that the bidder is not a responsible
bidder. Both the governmental entity and the contracting officer are immune
from any suit or litigation brought on behalf of a bidder found to be not
responsible.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. In determining lowest
responsible bidder, in addition to price, the governmental entity awarding the
contract must consider the following elements:

(1) The ability,
capacity, and skill of the bidder to perform the contract or provide the
service required;

(2) The reputation,
experience, and references of the bidder;

(3) Whether the bidder
can perform the contract within the time specified;

(4) The quality of
performance of previous contracts or services;

(5) The previous and
existing compliance by the bidder with laws relating to the contract or
services; and

(6) The specific
experience and ability of the bidder to manage unique project requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The state or local
governmental entity shall provide the opportunity for a contractor to appeal
the decision. Should the state or local governmental entity affirm its finding
that the contractor is not responsible, the contractor must be given the option
to withdraw its bid. The decision of the governmental entity is final. The
governmental entity must issue the contractor a letter stating its
determination that the contractor is not a responsible bidder for this
particular job. The process must be repeated for the second low bidder to
establish an affirmative determination of responsibility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

---
END ---