BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
39.12.050 and 1985 c 15 s 3 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Any contractor or subcontractor who files a
false statement

_7 or fails to file any statement or record required to be
filed

_8 under this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter,

_9 shall, after a determination to that effect has been
issued by the

10 director after hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW, forfeit
as a civil

11 penalty the sum of five hundred dollars for each false
filing or

12 failure to file, and shall not be permitted to bid, or
have a bid

13 considered, on any public works contract until the
penalty has

14 been paid in full to the director. The civil penalty
under this

15 subsection shall not apply to a violation determined by
the

16 director to be an inadvertent filing or reporting
error. Civil

17 penalties shall be deposited in the public works
administration

18 account.

p. 1 SB
5926

_1 To the extent that a contractor or subcontractor has
not paid

_2 wages at the rate due pursuant to RCW 39.12.020, and a
finding to

_3 that effect has been made as provided by this
subsection, such

_4 unpaid wages shall constitute a lien against the bonds
and

_5 retainage as provided in RCW 18.27.040, ((19.28.120))
19.28.041,

_6 39.08.010, and 60.28.010.

_7 (2) If a contractor or subcontractor is found to
have violated

_8 the provisions of subsection (1) of this section for a
second time

_9 within a five year period, the contractor or
subcontractor shall

10 be subject to the sanctions prescribed in subsection (1)
of this

11 section and shall not be allowed to bid on any public
works

12 contract for one year. The one year period shall run
from the date

13 of notice by the director of the determination of

14 noncompliance. When an appeal is taken from the
director's

15 determination, the one year period shall commence from
the date of

16 the final determination of the appeal.

17 The director shall issue his or her findings that a
contractor

18 or subcontractor has violated the provisions of this
subsection

19 after a hearing held subject to the provisions of
chapter 34.05

20 RCW.

21 Sec. 2. RCW
39.12.065 and 1994 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read

22 as follows:

23 (1) Upon complaint by an interested party, the
director of

24 labor and industries shall cause an investigation to be
made to

25 determine whether there has been compliance with this
chapter and

26 the rules adopted hereunder, and if the investigation
indicates

27 that a violation may have occurred, a hearing shall be
held in

28 accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The director shall
issue a

29 written determination including his or her findings
after the

30 hearing. A judicial appeal from the director's
determination may be

31 taken in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with the
prevailing

32 party entitled to recover reasonable costs and attorneys
fees.

33 A complaint concerning nonpayment of the prevailing
rate of

34 wage shall be filed with the department of labor and
industries no

35 later than thirty days from the acceptance date of the
public

36 works project. The failure to timely file such a
complaint shall

37 not prohibit a claimant from pursuing a private right of
action

SB 5926 p. 2

_1 against a contractor or subcontractor for unpaid
prevailing

_2 wages. The remedy provided by this section is not
exclusive and is

_3 concurrent with any other remedy provided by law.

_4 (2) To the extent that a contractor or subcontractor
has not

_5 paid the prevailing rate of wage under a determination
issued as

_6 provided in subsection (1) of this section, the director
shall

_7 notify the agency awarding the public works contract of
the amount

_8 of the violation found, and the awarding agency shall
withhold, or

_9 in the case of a bond, the director shall proceed
against the bond

10 in accordance with the applicable statute to recover,
such amount

11 from the following sources in the following order of
priority

12 until the total of such amount is withheld:

13 (a) The retainage or bond in lieu of retainage as
provided in

14 RCW 60.28.010;

15 (b) If the claimant was employed by the contractor or

16 subcontractor on the public works project, the bond
filed by the

17 contractor or subcontractor with the department of labor
and

18 industries as provided in RCW 18.27.040 and ((19.28.120))

19 19.28.041;

20 (c) A surety bond, or at the contractor's or
subcontractor's

21 option an escrow account, running to the director in the
amount of

22 the violation found; and

23 (d) That portion of the progress payments which is
properly

24 allocable to the contractor or subcontractor who is
found to be in

25 violation of this chapter. Under no circumstances shall
any portion

26 of the progress payments be withheld that are properly
allocable

27 to a contractor, subcontractor, or supplier, that is not
found to

28 be in violation of this chapter.

29 The amount withheld shall be released to the
director to

30 distribute in accordance with the director's
determination.

31 (3) A contractor or subcontractor that is found, in
accordance

32 with subsection (1) of this section, to have violated
the

33 requirement to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall be
subject to

34 a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars or
an amount

35 equal to twenty percent of the total prevailing wage
violation

36 found on the contract, whichever is greater, and shall
not be

37 permitted to bid, or have a bid considered, on any
public works

38 contract until such civil penalty has been paid in full
to the

p. 3 SB
5926

_1 director. If a contractor or subcontractor is found to
have

_2 participated in a violation of the requirement to pay
the

_3 prevailing rate of wage for a second time within a
five-year

_4 period, the contractor or subcontractor shall be subject
to the

_5 sanctions prescribed in this subsection and as an
additional

_6 sanction shall not be allowed to bid on any public works
contract

_7 for two years. Civil penalties shall be deposited in
the public

_8 works administration account. If a previous or
subsequent

_9 violation of a requirement to pay a prevailing rate of
wage under

10 federal or other state law is found against the
contractor or

11 subcontractor within five years from a violation under
this

12 section, the contractor or subcontractor shall not be
allowed to

13 bid on any public works contract for two years. A
contractor or

14 subcontractor shall not be barred from bidding on any
public works

15 contract if the contractor or subcontractor relied upon
written

16 information from the department to pay a prevailing rate
of wage

17 that is later determined to be in violation of this
chapter. The

18 civil penalty and sanctions under this subsection shall
not apply

19 to a violation determined by the director to be an
inadvertent

20 filing or reporting error. To the extent that a
contractor or

21 subcontractor has not paid the prevailing wage rate
under a

22 determination issued as provided in subsection (1) of
this

23 section, the unpaid wages shall constitute a lien
against the

24 bonds and retainage as provided herein and in RCW
18.27.040,

25 ((19.28.120)) 19.28.041, 39.08.010, and
60.28.010.

26 Sec. 3. RCW
39.12.080 and 1993 c 404 s 2 are each amended to read

27 as follows:

28 The public works administration account is created
in the state

29 treasury. The department of labor and industries shall
deposit in

30 the account all moneys received from fees or civil
penalties

31 collected under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.065, and
39.12.070.

32 Appropriations from the account, not including moneys
transferred

33 to the general fund pursuant to RCW 39.12.070, may be
made only

34 for the purposes of administration of this chapter,
including, but

35 not limited to, the performance of adequate wage
surveys, and for

36 the investigation and enforcement of all alleged
violations of

SB 5926 p. 4

_1 this chapter as provided for in this chapter and
chapters 49.48

_2 and 49.52 RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5926