BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.042 and 1999 c
143 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)
shall not apply to any person under the age of eighteen years who is:

(1) In attendance at a
hunter's safety course or a firearms safety course;

(2) Engaging in
practice in the use of a firearm or target shooting at an established range
authorized by the governing body of the jurisdiction in which such range is
located or any other area where the discharge of a firearm is not prohibited;

(3) Engaging in an
organized competition involving the use of a firearm, or participating in or
practicing for a performance by an organized group that uses firearms as a part
of the performance;

(4) Hunting or trapping
under a valid license issued to the person under Title 77 RCW, and if the
person is under fourteen years of age the person must be under the supervision
of a parent, guardian, or other adult approved for the purpose by the parent or
guardian;

(5) In an area where
the discharge of a firearm is permitted, is not trespassing, and the person
either: (a) Is at least fourteen years of age, has been issued a hunter safety
certificate, and is using a lawful firearm other than a pistol; or (b) is under
the supervision of a parent, guardian, or other adult approved for the purpose
by the parent or guardian;

(6) Traveling with any
unloaded firearm in the person's possession to or from any activity described
in subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section;

(7) On real property
under the control of his or her parent, other relative, or legal guardian and
who has the permission of the parent or legal guardian to possess a firearm;

(8) At his or her
residence and who, with the permission of his or her parent or legal guardian,
possesses a firearm for the purpose of exercising the rights specified in RCW
9A.16.020(3); or

(9) Is a
member of the armed forces of the United States, national guard, or organized
reserves, when on duty.

--- END ---