BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
acknowledges Article I, section 32 of the state Constitution "A frequent
recurrence to fundamental principles is essential to the security of individual
right and the perpetuity of free government."

The legislature
recognizes Article I, section 1 of the state Constitution "All political
power is inherent in the people, and governments derive their just powers from
the consent of the governed, and are established to protect and maintain
individual rights."

It is the intent of the
legislature that:

(1) All legislation
shall be measured by provisions of the Constitutions as currently written or
amended; and

(2) Elected officials,
entrusted with the duty to protect individual rights and the perpetuity of free
government, shall clarify, through all legislation, the constitutional purpose
and limitation of all agencies, and shall hold those agencies accountable to
the protection of individual rights as embodied in the Constitutions and the
intent of the legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. No governmental agency or
department shall impose any penalty upon a citizen without first providing the
citizen with the specific statute language which the citizen has violated and
informing the citizen of the citizen's legal rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act shall be known
and may be cited as the Washington state governmental accountability act of
2001.

---
END ---