BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.44.030 and 1999 c
267 s 20 and 1999 c 176 s 30 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When any
practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner, law enforcement officer,
professional school personnel, registered or licensed nurse, social service
counselor, psychologist, pharmacist, licensed or certified child care providers
or their employees, employee of the department, juvenile probation officer,
placement and liaison specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE
center staff, or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered
abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be
made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.

(b) The reporting
requirement also applies to department of corrections personnel who, in the
course of their employment, observe offenders or the children with whom the
offenders are in contact. If, as a result of observations or information
received in the course of his or her employment, any department of corrections
personnel has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or
neglect, he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in RCW
26.44.040.

(c) The reporting
requirement shall also apply to any adult who has reasonable cause to believe
that a child who resides with them, has suffered severe abuse, and is able or
capable of making a report. For the purposes of this subsection, "severe
abuse" means any of the following: Any single act of abuse that causes
physical trauma of sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause
death; any single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than one act of
physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep bruising, significant
external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or unconsciousness.

(d) The report must be
made at the first opportunity, but in no case longer than forty-eight hours
after there is reasonable cause to believe that the child has suffered abuse or
neglect. The report must include the identity of the accused if known.

(2) The reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the discovery
of abuse or neglect that occurred during childhood if it is discovered after
the child has become an adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to
believe other children are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the
accused, the reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section does
apply.

(3) Any other person
who has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect
may report such incident to the proper law enforcement agency or to the
department of social and health services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(4) The department,
upon receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to
this chapter, involving a child who has died or has had physical injury or
injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means or who has
been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare
is endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency
within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the department. In all
other cases, the department shall notify the law enforcement agency within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the department. If the
department makes an oral report, a written report must also be made to the
proper law enforcement agency within five days thereafter.

(5) Any law enforcement
agency receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant
to this chapter, involving a child who has died or has had physical injury or
injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means, or who has
been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing
as provided in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney
for appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement agency shall
also notify the department of all reports received and the law enforcement
agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
twenty-four hours. In all other cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify
the department within seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law
enforcement agency.

(6) Any county
prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under subsection (5) of this
section shall notify the victim, any persons the victim requests, and the local
office of the department, of the decision to charge or decline to charge a
crime, within five days of making the decision.

(7) The department may
conduct ongoing case planning and consultation with those persons or agencies
required to report under this section, with consultants designated by the
department, and with designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if
the client information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving
child protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under this
section if the department determines it is in the best interests of the child.
Information considered privileged by statute and not directly related to
reports required by this section must not be divulged without a valid written
waiver of the privilege.

(8) Any case referred
to the department by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on
the basis of an expert medical opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual
assault has occurred and that the child's safety will be seriously endangered
if returned home, the department shall file a dependency petition unless a
second licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert medical
opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a second physician, the
department may make the selection. If a physician finds that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect but that such abuse or neglect does not constitute
imminent danger to the child's health or safety, and the department agrees with
the physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home while
the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy parenting
deficiencies.

(9) Persons or agencies
exchanging information under subsection (7) of this section shall not further
disseminate or release the information except as authorized by state or federal
statute. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

(10) Upon receiving
reports of alleged abuse or neglect, the department or law enforcement agency
may interview children. The interviews may be conducted on school premises, at
day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at other suitable locations
outside of the presence of parents. The interviews shall be audio recorded
by recording device when required by RCW 26.44.035. Parental notification
of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point in the investigation
that will not jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of
the investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third party to be
present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to
accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or
law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party
in any interview so long as the presence of the third party will not jeopardize
the course of the investigation.

(11) Upon receiving a
report of alleged child abuse and neglect, the department or investigating law
enforcement agency shall have access to all relevant records of the child in
the possession of mandated reporters and their employees.

(12) The department
shall maintain investigation records and conduct timely and periodic reviews of
all cases constituting abuse and neglect. The department shall maintain a log
of screened-out nonabusive cases.

(13) The department
shall use a risk assessment process when investigating alleged child abuse and
neglect referrals. The department shall present the risk factors at all
hearings in which the placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance
abuse must be a risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated
for this purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.

The department shall
provide annual reports to the legislature on the effectiveness of the risk
assessment process.

(14) Upon receipt of a
report of alleged abuse or neglect the law enforcement agency may arrange to
interview the person making the report and any collateral sources to determine
if any malice is involved in the reporting.

(15) The department
shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address, and telephone number
of each person making a report of abuse or neglect under this section. The
department shall provide assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the
identification of persons reporting under this section. If the department is
unable to learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes there is a
serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the report indicates
conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is about to occur, in which
the child is the victim; or (c) the department has, after investigation, a
report of abuse or neglect that has been founded with regard to a member of the
household within three years of receipt of the referral.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.44.035 and 1999 c
389 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the department
or a law enforcement agency responds to a complaint of alleged child abuse or
neglect and discovers that another agency has also responded to the complaint,
the agency shall notify the other agency of their presence, and the agencies
shall coordinate the investigation and keep each other apprised of progress.

(2) The department, each
law enforcement agency, each county prosecuting attorney, each city attorney,
and each court shall make as soon as practicable a written record and shall
maintain records of all incidents of suspected child abuse reported to that
person or agency.

(3) Every employee of
the department who conducts an interview of any person involved in an
allegation of abuse or neglect shall retain his or her original written records
or notes setting forth the content of the interview unless the notes were
entered into the electronic system operated by the department which is designed
for storage, retrieval, and preservation of such records.

(4) ((Written)) Interviews
of children disclosing sexual abuse shall be audio recorded by recording
device, unless waived by management on a case-by-case basis, or because the
child objected to being audio recorded.

(5) In cases in
which audio recording has been waived, records involving child sexual abuse
shall, at a minimum, be a written, near verbatim record for the
disclosure interview. The near verbatim record shall be produced within
fifteen calendar days of the disclosure interview, unless waived by management
on a case-by-case basis.

(((5)))
(6) Records kept under this section shall be identifiable by means of an
agency code for child abuse.

---
END ---