BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
ordinary house dust typically contains pesticides, carcinogens, lead, cadmium,
bacteria, mold, dust mites, and animal dander, and that the connection between
these pollutants and some common childhood diseases and injuries such as
asthma, allergies, lead poisoning, birth defects, learning disabilities, and
even cancer has been well-established. Studies have indicated that a greater
exposure to toxic chemicals and allergens occurs in the home environment than
in the outdoor environment, due to the greater amount of time spent indoors.
Public health agencies and nongovernmental health organizations have begun
public education programs regarding cleaning methods and other measures that
families may use to reduce exposure to these pollutants. However, greater
state technical and financial assistance is needed for these programs to reach
more households.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall develop informational materials that address methods of
reducing exposure to indoor air pollutants in the home environment. The
department may distribute these materials, including posting on the
department's electronic web page, and make them available for distribution
through local health jurisdictions and nongovernmental organizations. For
purposes of this section, such pollutants include smoke, dust mites, mold,
pesticides, and carcinogens. The informational materials shall include
recommendations on cleaning methods, furnishings, and home design features that
help to reduce such exposure.

---
END ---