BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.410.010 and 1992
c 159 s 3 and 1992 c 60 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The state
board of education shall establish, publish, and enforce rules ((and
regulations)) determining eligibility for and certification of personnel
employed in the common schools of this state, including certification for
emergency or temporary, substitute or provisional duty and under such
certificates or permits as the board shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed
by law. The rules shall require that the initial application for certification
shall require a record check of the applicant through the Washington state
patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of
investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check shall include a
fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification
fingerprint card. The superintendent of public instruction may waive the
record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the two years
before application.

(b) In
establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American
sign language the state board shall consult with the national association of
the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the
Washington state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of
sign language instructors.

(2) The
superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such
rules ((and regulations)) and have the power to issue any certificates
or permits and revoke the same in accordance with board rules ((and
regulations)).

(3) The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop and maintain an internet web
site that explains the various methods to attain teacher certification in
Washington state. The web site shall include, but not be limited to, the entry
requirements for each method, and a proposed timeline for completing each
method.

--- END ---