BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.505 and 1993 c 487 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:

(a) No judgment of forfeiture of property in a civil forfeiture
proceeding under this section by the state or any of its political
subdivisions shall be allowed or entered until and unless the owner of
the property is convicted of a criminal violation of this chapter or an
equivalent crime in another jurisdiction and the state demonstrates by
clear and convincing evidence that the property was instrumental in
committing or facilitating the crime or the property is proceeds of
that crime. The value of the property forfeited under the provisions
of this subsection shall be substantially proportional to the specific
conduct for which the owner of the property has been convicted.

(b) In a civil forfeiture proceeding if a financial institution
claiming an interest in the property demonstrates that it holds an
interest, its interest shall not be subject to forfeiture. In a civil
forfeiture proceeding if a person claiming an interest in the property,
other than a financial institution or a defendant who has been charged
with or convicted of a crime involving that property, demonstrates that
the person has an interest in the property, that person's interest
shall not be subject to forfeiture unless:

(1) The forfeiting agency proves by clear and convincing evidence
that the person took the property or the interest with the intent to
defeat the forfeiture; or

(2) A conviction under subsection (a) of this section is later
obtained against the person.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section, if, following notice as required in this section, no person
claims an interest in the seized property or if the property is
contraband, a judgment of forfeiture may be allowed and entered without
a criminal conviction as provided in subsection (i) of this section.

(d) Nothing in this section may be construed to affect the
temporary seizure of property for evidentiary, forfeiture, or
protective purposes, or to alter the power of the governor to remit
fines or forfeitures under Article III, section 11 of the Washington
Constitution.

(e) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture ((and no
property right exists in them)) in accordance with subsections (a),
(b), (c), and (d) of this section:

(1) All controlled substances which have been manufactured,
distributed, dispensed, acquired, or possessed in violation of this
chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, and all hazardous chemicals, as
defined in RCW 64.44.010, used or intended to be used in the
manufacture of controlled substances;

(2) All raw materials, products, and equipment of any kind which
are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding,
processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any controlled
substance in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;

(3) All property which is used, or intended for use, as a container
for property described in ((paragraphs)) (1) or (2) of this subsection;

(4) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels,
which are used, or intended for use, in any manner to facilitate the
sale, delivery, or receipt of property described in ((paragraphs)) (1)
or (2) of this subsection, except that((:

(i) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture
under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in
charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation
of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;

(ii) No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by
reason of any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have
been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(iii))) no conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section
if used in the receipt of only an amount of marijuana for which
possession constitutes a misdemeanor under RCW 69.50.401(e)((;

(iv) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide
security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if
the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission; and

(v) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested under this
chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW the conveyance in which the
person is arrested may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is seized
or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the owner's
arrest));

(5) All books, records, and research products and materials,
including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data which are used, or
intended for use, in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or
69.52 RCW;

(6) All drug paraphernalia;

(7) All moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, or other
tangible or intangible property of value furnished or intended to be
furnished by any person in exchange for a controlled substance in
violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, all tangible
or intangible personal property, proceeds, or assets acquired in whole
or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of
exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW,
and all moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended
to be used to facilitate any violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41
or 69.52 RCW((. A forfeiture of money, negotiable instruments,
securities, or other tangible or intangible property encumbered by a
bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured
party if, at the time the security interest was created, the secured
party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
No personal property may be forfeited under this paragraph, to the
extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission
which that owner establishes was committed or omitted without the
owner's knowledge or consent)); and

(8) All real property, including any right, title, and interest in
the whole of any lot or tract of land, and any appurtenances or
improvements which are being used with the knowledge of the owner for
the manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivery, importing, or
exporting of any controlled substance, or which have been acquired in
whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of
exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW,
if such activity is not less than a class C felony and a substantial
nexus exists between the commercial production or sale of the
controlled substance and the real property. However:

(i) ((No property may be forfeited pursuant to this subsection, to
the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or
omission committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(ii))) The bona fide gift of a controlled substance, legend drug,
or imitation controlled substance shall not result in the forfeiture of
real property;

(((iii))) (ii) The possession of marijuana shall not result in the
forfeiture of real property unless the marijuana is possessed for
commercial purposes, the amount possessed is five or more plants or one
pound or more of marijuana, and a substantial nexus exists between the
possession of marijuana and the real property. In such a case, the
intent of the offender shall be determined by the preponderance of the
evidence, including the offender's prior criminal history, the amount
of marijuana possessed by the offender, the sophistication of the
activity or equipment used by the offender, and other evidence which
demonstrates the offender's intent to engage in commercial activity;
and

(((iv))) (iii) The unlawful sale of marijuana or a legend drug
shall not result in the forfeiture of real property unless the sale was
forty grams or more in the case of marijuana or one hundred dollars or
more in the case of a legend drug, and a substantial nexus exists
between the unlawful sale and the real property((; and

(v) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a bona fide
security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if
the secured party, at the time the security interest was created,
neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission)).

(((b))) (f) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under
this chapter may be seized by any board inspector or law enforcement
officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court having
jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property shall include
the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property
seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise
conveyed ((until ninety days after seizure or)) until a judgment of
forfeiture is entered((, whichever is later: PROVIDED, That)).
However, real property seized under this section may be transferred or
conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or
deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest.

The board or law enforcement agency is not liable for damages for
loss of or injury to the seized personal or real property unless the
damage could have been avoided by the exercise of such care in regard
to the personal or real property as a reasonably careful person would
exercise under like circumstances.

(g) Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:

(1) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;

(2) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this chapter;

(3) A board inspector or law enforcement officer has probable cause
to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to
health or safety; or

(4) The board inspector or law enforcement officer has probable
cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used
in violation of this chapter.

(((c))) (h) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (((b)))
(f) or (g) of this section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed
commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose
authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within
fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized
and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right
or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the
seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of
notice of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules
of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default
judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by
substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith
effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is
incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to
believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. Notice of
seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has
been perfected by filing a financing statement in accordance with
chapter ((62A.9)) 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title, shall be made
by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at
the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of
title. The notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any
method authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to
service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by
mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen day
period following the seizure.

(((d))) (i) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement
agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to
possession of items specified in subsection (((a))) (e)(4), (((a)))(7),
or (((a)))(8) of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in
the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real
property, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community
property interest in real property of a person whose spouse committed
a violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be
forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.

(((e))) (j) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement
agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to
possession of items specified in subsection (((a))) (e)(2), (((a)))(3),
(((a)))(4), (((a)))(5), (((a)))(6), (((a)))(7), or (((a)))(8) of this
section within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal
property and ninety days in the case of real property, the person or
persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to
the claim or right. The hearing shall be before the chief law
enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law enforcement
officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state agency
as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before the chief
law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law
judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person
asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of
competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter involving personal
property may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil
procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process
against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that
operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in
accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after
the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement
agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The
court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the district court
when the aggregate value of personal property is within the
jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the
seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW.
In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or
articles involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment
for costs and reasonable attorney's fees. ((In cases involving
personal property, the burden of producing evidence shall be upon the
person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have
the lawful right to possession of the property. In cases involving
real property, the burden of producing evidence shall be upon the law
enforcement agency. The burden of proof)) If the seizing agency fails
to show by clear and convincing evidence that the seized ((real))
property is subject to forfeiture ((shall be upon the law enforcement
agency.)), the seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
article or articles to the claimant ((upon a determination by the
administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present
lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of items
specified in subsection (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7),
or (a)(8) of this section)).

(((f))) (k) When property is forfeited under this chapter the board
or seizing law enforcement agency ((may)) shall:

(1) ((Retain it for official use or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state release such property to such agency
for the exclusive use of enforcing the provisions of this chapter;

(2))) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and
which is not harmful to the public;

(((3) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety
to take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in
accordance with law; or

(4) Forward it to the drug enforcement administration for
disposition.

(g)(1) When property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall)) (2)
Keep a record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a
description of the property, the disposition of the property, the value
of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds
realized from disposition of the property((.));

(((2) Each seizing agency shall)) (3) Retain records of forfeited
property for at least seven years((.));

(((3) Each seizing agency shall)) (4) File a report including a
copy of the records of forfeited property with the state treasurer each
calendar quarter. (((4))) The quarterly report need not include a
record of forfeited property that is still being held for use as
evidence during the investigation or prosecution of a case or during
the appeal from a conviction;

(5) Destroy any property that is harmful to the public, required to
be destroyed by law, or otherwise not appropriate for sale to the
public;

(6) Report the nature and disposition of all property and proceeds
seized for forfeiture or forfeited to the state auditor. The state
auditor shall annually perform a statewide audit of seizures and
forfeitures as authorized under this section. The audit shall be
performed in conjunction with routine audits of local governments as
provided under RCW 43.09.260. The state auditor shall annually publish
a statewide report on the amount of federal and state seizure and
forfeiture funds received and expended in the violence reduction and
drug enforcement account in total and by each local government for the
current year and the previous three years. The report shall also
disclose the beginning and ending balances in the violence reduction
and drug enforcement account attributable to seizures and forfeitures.
The state auditor's report shall include a report on statewide
compliance with this section and RCW 69.50.520, including an
identification of best practices, instances of noncompliance, and
recommendations to the legislature.

(((h))) (l)(1)(i) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency
shall remit to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of
the net proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding
calendar year. Money remitted shall be deposited in the violence
reduction and drug enforcement ((and education)) account under RCW
69.50.520.

(ii) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit
to the state treasurer an amount equal to forty-five percent of the net
proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year.
Money remitted shall be deposited in the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 to be used by the state or any
of its political subdivisions exclusively for drug treatment, unless
another disposition is specially provided by law.

(iii) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall remit
to the state treasurer an amount equal to forty-five percent of the net
proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year.
Money remitted shall be deposited in the public safety and education
account under RCW 43.08.250 to be used by the state exclusively for the
state crime laboratory, unless another disposition is specifically
provided by law.

(2) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the
forfeitable interest in the property after deducting: (i) The cost of
satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is
subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after
deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions
paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid
landlord's claim for damages under subsection (((n))) (r) of this
section; (ii) any foreclosed liens, security interest, and contracts in
the order of their priority; and (iii) actual and reasonable expenses
related to the costs of the forfeiture proceeding, including attorneys'
fees, storage, maintenance, management, and disposition of the property
incurred in connection with the sale of any forfeited property in an
amount not to exceed twenty-five percent of the total proceeds in any
single forfeiture.

(3) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The
value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the
property at the time of seizure, determined when possible by reference
to an applicable commonly used index, such as the index used by the
department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A seizing
agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to
determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the
value of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal.
The value of destroyed ((property and retained firearms or)) illegal
property is zero.

(((i))) (m) Forfeited property and net proceeds ((not required to
be paid to the state treasurer shall be retained by the seizing law
enforcement agency exclusively for the expansion and improvement of
controlled substances related law enforcement activity. Money retained
under this section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding
sources)), including shared property or proceeds obtained from the
federal government, shall be disposed of or distributed according to
the following:

(1) Any sale of forfeited property shall be conducted in a
commercially reasonable manner. Property or proceeds forfeited under
this section shall be distributed or applied as required by subsection
(l) of this section.

(2) The state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions
shall take all necessary steps to obtain shared property or proceeds
from the United States department of justice resulting from a
forfeiture. Any property or proceeds received from the United States
department of justice by the state of Washington or any of its
political subdivisions shall be applied as provided in (1) of this
subsection.

(3) Neither the state of Washington, its political subdivisions,
nor any forfeiting agency shall transfer forfeiture proceedings to the
federal government unless a state court has affirmatively found that:

(i) The activity giving rise to the forfeiture is interstate in
nature and sufficiently complex to justify the transfer;

(ii) The seized property may only be forfeited under federal law;
or

(iii) Pursuing forfeiture under state law would unduly burden the
state forfeiting agencies.

(((j))) (n) Controlled substances listed in Schedule I, II, III,
IV, and V that are possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in
violation of this chapter are contraband and shall be seized and
summarily forfeited to the state. Controlled substances listed in
Schedule I, II, III, IV, and V, which are seized or come into the
possession of the board, the owners of which are unknown, are
contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the board.

(((k))) (o) Species of plants from which controlled substances in
Schedules I and II may be derived which have been planted or cultivated
in violation of this chapter, or of which the owners or cultivators are
unknown, or which are wild growths, may be seized and summarily
forfeited to the board.

(((l))) (p) The failure, upon demand by a board inspector or law
enforcement officer, of the person in occupancy or in control of land
or premises upon which the species of plants are growing or being
stored to produce an appropriate registration or proof that he or she
is the holder thereof constitutes authority for the seizure and
forfeiture of the plants.

(((m))) (q) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real
property, the court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor
of the county in which the property is located. Orders for the
forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the superior court,
subject to court rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing
agency in the county auditor's records in the county in which the real
property is located.

(((n))) (r) A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from the
sale of assets ((seized and forfeited)) under subsection (((f)(2))) (m)
of this section, only if:

(l) A law enforcement officer, while acting in his or her official
capacity, directly caused damage to the complaining landlord's property
while executing a search of a tenant's residence; and

(2) The landlord has applied any funds remaining in the tenant's
deposit, to which the landlord has a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to
cover the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer prior to
asserting a claim under the provisions of this section;

(i) Only if the funds applied under (2) of this subsection are
insufficient to satisfy the damage directly caused by a law enforcement
officer, may the landlord seek compensation for the damage by filing a
claim against the governmental entity under whose authority the law
enforcement agency operates within thirty days after the search;

(ii) Only if the governmental entity denies or fails to respond to
the landlord's claim within sixty days of the date of filing, may the
landlord collect damages under this subsection by filing within thirty
days of denial or the expiration of the sixty-day period, whichever
occurs first, a claim with the seizing law enforcement agency. The
seizing law enforcement agency must notify the landlord of the status
of the claim by the end of the thirty-day period. Nothing in this
section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the sixty-day or
thirty-day period.

(3) For any claim filed under (2) of this subsection, the law
enforcement agency shall pay the claim unless the agency provides
substantial proof that the landlord either:

(i) Knew or consented to actions of the tenant in violation of this
chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW; or

(ii) Failed to respond to a notification of the illegal activity,
provided by a law enforcement agency under RCW 59.18.075, within seven
days of receipt of notification of the illegal activity.

(((o))) (s) The landlord's claim for damages under subsection
(((n))) (r) of this section may not include a claim for loss of
business and is limited to:

(1) Damage to tangible property and clean-up costs;

(2) The lesser of the cost of repair or fair market value of the
damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer;

(3) The proceeds from the sale of the specific tenant's property
((seized and forfeited)) under subsection (((f)(2))) (m) of this
section; and

(4) The proceeds available after the seizing law enforcement agency
satisfies any bona fide security interest in the tenant's property and
costs related to sale of the tenant's property as provided by
subsection (((h)(2))) (m) of this section.

(((p))) (t) Subsections (((n))) (r) and (((o))) (s) of this section
do not limit any other rights a landlord may have against a tenant to
collect for damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies a
landlord's claim under subsection (((n))) (r) of this section, the
rights the landlord has against the tenant for damages directly caused
by a law enforcement officer under the terms of the landlord and
tenant's contract are subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

(u) For the purposes of this section:

(1) "Contraband" means personal property, articles, or things,
including but not limited to controlled substances or drug
paraphernalia and illegal firearms, that a person is prohibited by
Washington statute or local ordinance from producing, obtaining, or
possessing; and

(2) "Property" means any interest in anything of value, including
the whole of any lot or tract of land and tangible and intangible
personal property, including currency, instruments or securities or any
other kind of privilege, interest, claim, or right whether due or to
become due.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.83.030 and 1992 c 210 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:

(1) Proceeds traceable to or derived from specified unlawful
activity or a violation of RCW 9A.83.020 are subject to seizure and
forfeiture. The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may
file a civil action for the forfeiture of proceeds. Unless otherwise
provided for under this section, no property rights exist in these
proceeds. All right, title, and interest in the proceeds shall vest in
the governmental entity of which the seizing law enforcement agency is
a part upon commission of the act or omission giving rise to forfeiture
under this section.

(2) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this
chapter may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon
process issued by a superior court that has jurisdiction over the
property. Any agency seizing real property shall file a lis pendens
concerning the property. Real property seized under this section shall
not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after
seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is
later. Real property seized under this section may be transferred or
conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or
deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of
personal property without process may be made if:

(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant
issued pursuant to RCW 69.50.502; or

(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this chapter.

(3) A seizure under subsection (2) of this section commences
proceedings for forfeiture. The law enforcement agency under whose
authority the seizure was made shall cause notice of the seizure and
intended forfeiture of the seized proceeds to be served within fifteen
days after the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the
person in charge thereof and any person who has a known right or
interest therein, including a community property interest. Service of
notice of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules
of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default
judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by
substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith
effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is
incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to
believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. The notice of
seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or
court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with
return receipt requested. Service by mail is complete upon mailing
within the fifteen-day period after the seizure.

(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
the property within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of
personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the
property seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property
interest in real property of a person whose spouse committed a
violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be
forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.

(5) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
property within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal
property and ninety days in the case of real property, the person or
persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to
the claim or right. The provisions of RCW 69.50.505(((e))) (j) shall
apply to any such hearing. The seizing law enforcement agency shall
promptly return property to the claimant upon the direction of the
administrative law judge or court.

(6) Disposition of forfeited property shall be made in the manner
provided for in RCW 69.50.505 (((g))) (k) through (((i))) (m) and
(((m))) (q).

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.520 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 917 are each
amended to read as follows:

The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(((h))) (l)(1), 82.08.150(5),
82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989
shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws
of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state
incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated
to reimburse local governments for costs associated with implementing
criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
During the 1999-2001 biennium, funds from the account may also be used
for costs associated with providing grants to local governments in
accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, the design, sitework, and
construction of the special commitment center, the replacement of the
department of corrections' offender-based tracking system, and for
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, 2001, at
least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall
be used for providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190
RCW by the family policy council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---