BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes housing affordability has become a significant problem for a large
portion of society in many parts of Washington state in recent years. The
state has traditionally focused its resources on housing for low-income
populations. Additional funding resources are needed for building operation
and maintenance activities for housing projects affordable to extremely
low-income people, for example farmworkers or people with developmental
disabilities. Affordable rents for extremely low-income people are not
sufficient to cover the cost of building operations and maintenance. In
addition resources are needed at the local level to assist in development and
preservation of affordable low-income housing to address critical local housing
needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, a surcharge of ten dollars per instrument
shall be charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will
be in addition to any other charge authorized by law. The auditor may retain
up to five percent of these funds collected to administer the collection of
these funds. Of the remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated
through this surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who
will deposit the funds into the Washington housing trust account. The office
of community development of the department of community, trade, and economic development
will develop guidelines for the use of these funds to support building
operation and maintenance costs of housing projects or units within housing
projects that are affordable to extremely low-income persons with incomes at or
below thirty percent of the area median income, and that require a supplement
to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses. Sixty percent of the
revenue generated by this surcharge will be retained by the county and be
deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities and towns
for housing projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to
very low-income persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area
median income. The portion of the surcharge retained by a county shall be allocated
to very low-income housing projects or units within such housing projects in
the county and the cities within a county according to an interlocal agreement
between the county and the cities within the county, consistent with countywide
and local housing needs and policies. Permissible uses of these local funds
include:

(a) Acquisition,
construction, or rehabilitation of housing projects or units within housing
projects that are affordable to very low-income persons with incomes at or
below fifty percent of the area median income;

(b) Supporting building
operation and maintenance costs of housing projects or units within housing
projects built with housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income
persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income, and
that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses;
and

(c) Rental assistance
vouchers for housing projects or units within housing projects that are
affordable to very low-income persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of
the area median income, to be administered by a local public housing authority
or other local organization that has an existing rental assistance voucher
program, consistent with the United States department of housing and urban
development's section 8 rental assistance voucher program standards.

(2) The surcharge
imposed in this section does not apply to assignments or substitutions of
previously recorded deeds of trust.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.18.010 and 1999 c
233 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

County auditors or
recording officers shall collect the following fees for their official
services:

For recording
instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less,
five dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or
less, one dollar. The fee for recording multiple transactions contained in one
instrument will be calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing
as required under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or
transaction is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded
document; the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional
pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may be
collected only once and may not be collected for each title or transaction;

For preparing and
certifying copies, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or
less, three dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen
inches or less, one dollar;

For preparing
noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or
less, one dollar;

For administering an
oath or taking an affidavit, with or without seal, two dollars;

For issuing a marriage
license, eight dollars, (this fee includes taking necessary affidavits, filing
returns, indexing, and transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state
registrar of vital statistics) plus an additional five-dollar fee for use and support
of the prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund plus an
additional ten-dollar fee to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and
deposited in the state general fund. The legislature intends to appropriate an
amount at least equal to the revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of
the displaced homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW;

For searching records
per hour, eight dollars;

For recording plats,
fifty cents for each lot except cemetery plats for which the charge shall be
twenty-five cents per lot; also one dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication,
and description: PROVIDED, That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five
dollars per plat;

For recording of
miscellaneous records not listed above, for the first page eight and one-half
by fourteen inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page eight and
one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;

For modernization and
improvement of the recording and indexing system, a surcharge as provided in
RCW 36.22.170.

For recording an
emergency nonstandard document as provided in RCW 65.04.047, fifty dollars, in
addition to all other applicable recording fees.

For recording
instruments, a surcharge as provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

The office
of community development of the department of community, trade, and economic
development is directed to conduct a statewide housing market analysis by
region. The purpose of the analysis is to identify areas of greatest need for
the appropriate investment of state affordable housing funds, using vacancy
data and other appropriate measures of need for low-income housing. The
analysis shall be completed by September 2003, and updated every two years
thereafter.

---
END ---