BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The department of
retirement systems, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
department of personnel, and the health care authority shall jointly develop
publications for use during the 2001‑03 biennium to explain options for,
and implications of, postretirement employment for members and retirees of the
teachers' retirement system plan 1 and the public employees' retirement system
plan 1.

(2) The publications
shall address such issues as: (a) Health insurance coverage upon reemployment;
(b) health benefit options upon termination of postretirement employment; (c)
sick leave, annual leave, and other compensation practices; (d) options for,
and implications of, reentry into active retirement system membership; (e)
hiring procedures for retirees; and (f) collective bargaining rights and
responsibilities.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.405.900 and 1990
c 33 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

Certificated employees
subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.310.250, 28A.405.010 through
28A.405.240, 28A.405.400 through 28A.405.410, 28A.415.250, and 28A.405.900
shall not include those certificated employees hired to replace certificated
employees who have been granted sabbatical, regular, or other leave by school
districts, and shall not include retirees hired for postretirement
employment under the provisions of this act.

It is not the intention
of the legislature that this section apply to any regularly hired certificated
employee or that the legal or constitutional rights of such employee be
limited, abridged, or abrogated.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.32.570 and 1999 c
387 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly benefit reduction over one hundred
percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in
subsequent months.

(2) Any retired teacher
or retired administrator who enters service in any public educational
institution in Washington state and who has satisfied the break in employment
requirement of subsection (1) of this section shall cease to receive pension
payments while engaged in such service((: PROVIDED, That service may be
rendered up to five hundred twenty-five hours per school year without reduction
of pension.

(3) In addition to
the five hundred twenty-five hours of service permitted under subsection (2) of
this section, a retired teacher or retired administrator may also serve only as
a substitute teacher for up to an additional three hundred fifteen hours per
school year without reduction of pension if:

(a) A school
district, which is not a member of a multidistrict substitute cooperative,
determines that it has exhausted or can reasonably anticipate that it will
exhaust its list of qualified and available substitutes and the school board of
the district adopts a resolution to make its substitute teachers who are
retired teachers or retired administrators eligible for the extended service
once the list of qualified and available substitutes has been exhausted. The
resolution by the school district shall state that the services of retired
teachers and retired administrators are necessary to address the shortage of
qualified and available substitutes. The resolution shall be valid only for
the school year in which it is adopted. The district shall forward a copy of
the resolution with a list of retired teachers and retired administrators who
have been employed as substitute teachers to the department and may notify the
retired teachers and retired administrators included on the list of their right
to take advantage of the provisions of this subsection; or

(b) A multidistrict
substitute cooperative determines that the school districts have exhausted or
can reasonably anticipate that they will exhaust their list of qualified and
available substitutes and each of the school boards adopts a resolution to make
their substitute teachers who are retired teachers or retired administrators
eligible for the extended service once the list of qualified and available
substitutes has been exhausted. The resolutions by each of the school
districts shall state that the services of retired teachers and retired
administrators are necessary to address the shortage of qualified and available
substitutes. The resolutions shall be valid only for the school year in which
they are adopted. The cooperative shall forward a copy of the resolutions with
a list of retired teachers and retired administrators who have been employed as
substitute teachers to the department and may notify the retired teachers and
retired administrators included on the list of their right to take advantage of
the provisions of this subsection.

(4) In addition to
the five hundred twenty-five hours of service permitted under subsection (2) of
this section, a retired administrator or retired teacher may also serve as a
substitute administrator up to an additional one hundred five hours per school
year without reduction of pension if a school district board of directors
adopts a resolution declaring that the services of a retired administrator or
retired teacher are necessary because it cannot find a replacement
administrator to fill a vacancy. The resolution shall be valid only for the
school year in which it is adopted. The district shall forward a copy of the
resolution with the name of the retired administrator or retired teacher who
has been employed as a substitute administrator to the department.

(5) In addition to
the five hundred twenty-five hours of service permitted under subsection (2) of
this section and the one hundred five hours permitted under subsection (4) of
this section, a retired principal may also serve as a substitute principal up
to an additional two hundred ten hours per school year without a reduction of
pension if a school district board of directors adopts a resolution declaring
that the services of a retired principal are necessary because it cannot find a
replacement principal to fill a vacancy. The resolution shall be valid only
for the school year in which it is adopted. The district shall forward a copy
of the resolution with the name of the retired principal who has been employed
as a substitute principal to the department.

(6) Subsection (2)
of this section shall apply to all persons governed by the provisions of plan
1, regardless of the date of their retirement, but shall apply only to benefits
payable after June 11, 1986.

(7) Subsection (3)
of this section shall apply to all persons governed by the provisions of plan
1, regardless of the date of their retirement, but shall only apply to benefits
payable after September 1, 1994)),
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five hundred
hours in a school year.

(3) The department
shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the
use of this section for the joint committee on pension policy.

(4) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than five
hundred twenty-five hours per year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.40.037 and 1997 c
254 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2)(a) A retiree
from plan 1 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of
subsection (1) of this section and who enters employment with an employer may
continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service for up to
one thousand five hundred hours of service in a calendar year without a
reduction of pension.

(b) A retiree from
plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of
subsection (1) of this section((,)) may work up to ((five months per))
eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire
fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, without
suspension of his or her benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or
her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not
accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However,
if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.

(4) The department
shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the
use of this section for the joint committee on pension policy.

(5) The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member
or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than five months
in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act expire June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Section 4 of this act
expires December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 41.40 RCW to read as follows:

Upon attainment of age
seventy and one‑half, an employed member may, subject to this section,
apply for the retirement benefit the member is otherwise eligible to receive.
The retirement benefit shall begin to accrue on the first day of the calendar
month following the month that a member applies for a retirement benefit and
has attained age seventy and one-half. The benefit shall be calculated in
accordance with this chapter, except that the member may continue to be
employed. Upon retirement the retiree shall no longer be an active member and
shall not make contributions, nor receive service credit, for future periods of
employment while receiving his or her retirement allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The office of the state
actuary shall review the actuarial impact of the temporary expansion of the
postretirement employment limitations provided by sections 3 and 4 of this
act. No later than July 1, 2003, the state actuary shall prepare a report for
the joint committee on pension policy regarding the fiscal and policy impacts
of this act. The joint committee shall solicit information from the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of personnel, the office
of financial management, the department of retirement systems, and the health
care authority regarding the program impacts of this act and shall report to
the legislative fiscal committees no later than October 1, 2003, on any
proposed changes or improvements to this act. If the state actuary determines
the expansion of postretirement options under sections 3 and 4 of this act has
resulted in increased costs for the state retirement funds, the joint committee
report shall include a proposal for a process to charge those employers who
employ retirees pursuant to an extension of sections 3 and 4 of this act for
the costs incurred by the retirement funds under the extension.

Sec. 9. RCW 41.32.802 and 1997 c
254 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section, may work up to ((five months)) eight hundred sixty-seven
hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement
officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her
benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her
retirement status and immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall
not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.32.860 and 1997 c
254 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except under RCW 41.32.862,
no retiree shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement
allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW
41.40.010 ((or)), 41.32.010, or 41.35.010, or as a law
enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030.

(2) If a retiree's
benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be
reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused the
suspension of benefits. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

Sec. 11. RCW 41.32.862 and 1997 c
254 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section, may work up to ((five months)) eight hundred sixty-seven
hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement
officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her
benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her
retirement status and immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall
not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible.

Sec. 12. RCW 41.35.060 and 1998 c
341 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section
may work up to ((five months)) eight hundred sixty-seven hours
per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as
defined in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.35.030, he or she terminates his or her
retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue
during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire
if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.35.420 or 41.35.680. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered
two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor options
the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be
reinstated.

Sec. 13. RCW 41.40.037 and 1997 c
254 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If a retiree
enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or
her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This
reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from
employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit
reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one
hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent
will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent
months.

(2) A retiree who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section, may work up to ((five months)) eight hundred sixty-seven
hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement
officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her
benefit.

(3) If the retiree opts
to reestablish membership under RCW 41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or
her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not
accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make
contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the
right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However,
if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.

Sec. 14. RCW 41.40.750 and 1998 c
341 s 113 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Effective September
1, 2000, the membership of all plan 2 members currently employed in eligible
positions in a school district or educational service district and all plan 2
service credit for such members, is transferred to the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2. Plan 2 members who have withdrawn their
member contributions for prior plan 2 service may restore contributions and
service credit to the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 as
provided under RCW 41.40.740.

(2)(a) The
membership and previous service credit of a plan 2 member not employed in an
eligible position on September 1, 2000, will be transferred to the Washington
school employees' retirement system plan 2 when he or she becomes employed in
an eligible position. Plan 2 members not employed in an eligible position on
September 1, 2000, who have withdrawn their member contributions for prior plan
2 service may restore contributions and service credit to the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2 as provided under RCW 41.40.740.

(b) The membership
and previous service credit of a plan 2 member last employed by a school
district or educational service district and retired prior to September 1,
2000, will be transferred to the Washington school employees' retirement system
plan 2 if the member opts to reestablish membership.

(3) Members who restore
contributions and service credit under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall have their contributions and service credit transferred to the Washington
school employees' retirement system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. Except for sections 13 of
this act which takes effect December 31, 2004, this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of
the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---