BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature is aware
that an increasing and significant number of Washington residents are seeking
integrative, complementary, and alternative therapies in their health care.
The legislature further recognizes that physicians and osteopathic physicians
and surgeons are increasingly incorporating such therapies into their own
practices. The legislature recognizes that innovative practices that could
benefit patients and improve care should be given reasonable and responsible
degrees of latitude to practice medicine using conventional, integrative,
complementary, and alternative therapies. The legislature finds that abusive
criticism of alternative practitioners and threats to their licensure solely
because they offer their patients an integrated practice should not be
tolerated. Within guidelines which ensure informed consent, all physicians and
osteopathic physicians and surgeons have the right to use any conventional,
integrative, complementary or alternative treatment they determine appropriate
to achieve the best therapeutic outcome. The legislature also finds that patients,
when informed of all of their options and choices, have the right to be treated
by a qualified physician or osteopathic physician and surgeon who is licensed
to practice medicine for any health problem or illness with any conventional,
integrative, complementary, or alternative treatment.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.57.001 and 1996 c
178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Board"
means the Washington state board of osteopathic medicine and surgery;

(2)
"Department" means the department of health;

(3)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health; ((and))

(4) "Osteopathic
medicine and surgery" means the use of any and all methods in the
treatment of disease, injuries, deformities, and all other physical and mental
conditions in and of human beings, including the use of osteopathic
manipulative therapy;

(5)
"Integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine" means the
methods of diagnosis, treatment, or interventions that are not acknowledged to
be conventional but that may be offered by some licensed osteopathic physicians
and surgeons in addition to, or as an alternative to, conventional medicine,
and that provide a reasonable potential to protect, strengthen, or heal the
body or otherwise make therapeutic gains in a patient's health or medical
condition and that are not reasonably outweighed by the risk of such methods;
and

(6)
"Conventional medicine" means those methods of diagnosis, treatment,
or interventions that are offered by most licensed osteopathic physicians and
surgeons as generally accepted methods of routine practice, based upon medical
training, experience, and review of the peer reviewed scientific literature.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.71.010 and 1994
sp.s. c 9 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

The following terms
used in this chapter shall have the meanings set forth in this section unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Commission" means the Washington state medical quality assurance
commission.

(2)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(3) "Resident
physician" means an individual who has graduated from a school of medicine
which meets the requirements set forth in RCW 18.71.055 and is serving a period
of postgraduate clinical medical training sponsored by a college or university
in this state or by a hospital accredited by this state. For purposes of this
chapter, the term shall include individuals designated as intern or medical
fellow.

(4) "Emergency
medical care" or "emergency medical service" has the same
meaning as in chapter 18.73 RCW.

(5)
"Integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine" means the
methods of diagnosis, treatment, or interventions that are not acknowledged to
be conventional but that may be offered by some licensed physicians in addition
to, or as an alternative to, conventional medicine, and that provide a
reasonable potential to protect, strengthen, or heal the body or otherwise make
therapeutic gains in a patient's health or medical condition and that are not
reasonably outweighed by the risk of such methods.

(6) "Conventional
medicine" means those methods of diagnosis, treatment, or interventions
that are offered by most licensed physicians as generally accepted methods of
routine practice, based upon medical training, experience, and review of the
peer reviewed scientific literature.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.71.015 and 1999 c
366 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state
medical quality assurance commission is established, consisting of thirteen
individuals licensed to practice medicine in the state of Washington under this
chapter, at least two of whom shall be physicians, a significant portion of
whose practices includes integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine,
two individuals who are licensed as physician assistants under chapter 18.71A
RCW, and four individuals who are members of the public, at least two of
whom are consumers of integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine.
Each congressional district now existing or hereafter created in the state must
be represented by at least one physician member of the commission. The terms
of office of members of the commission are not affected by changes in
congressional district boundaries. Public members of the commission may not be
a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a
fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the
commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health
services regulated by the commission.

The members of the
commission shall be appointed by the governor. Members of the initial
commission may be appointed to staggered terms of one to four years, and
thereafter all terms of appointment shall be for four years. The governor
shall consider such physician and physician assistant members who are
recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the
state. In appointing the initial members of the commission, it is the intent
of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the existing members of the
board of medical examiners and medical disciplinary board repealed under
section 336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. be appointed to the commission.
No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member shall
hold office until a successor is appointed.

Each member of the
commission must be a citizen of the United States, must be an actual resident
of this state, and, if a physician, must have been licensed to practice
medicine in this state for at least five years.

The commission shall
meet as soon as practicable after appointment and elect officers each year.
Meetings shall be held at least four times a year and at such place as the
commission determines and at such other times and places as the commission
deems necessary. A majority of the commission members appointed and serving
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business.

The affirmative vote of
a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to carry any motion or
resolution, to adopt any rule, or to pass any measure of ordinary business
of the commission except for the revocation of a physician's license. Except
for revoking a physician's license, the commission may appoint panels
consisting of at least three members. A quorum for the transaction of any other
business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum
of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the commission,
with the exception of revocation of a physician's license. The commission
shall utilize a panel consisting of all regular members of the commission when
considering revocation of a physician's license. In order to revoke a
physician's license, a majority of the thirteen regularly appointed commission
members must concur with the decision to revoke.

Each member of the
commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and in
addition thereto shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying
out the duties of the commission in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Any such expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated to the
department of health.

Whenever the governor
is satisfied that a member of a commission has been guilty of neglect of duty,
misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the governor shall file
with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of
removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of
the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.

Vacancies in the
membership of the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by
appointment by the governor within sixty days after the vacancy occurs.

The members of the
commission are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on its
disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith as
members of the commission.

Whenever the workload
of the commission requires, the commission may request that the secretary
appoint pro tempore members of the commission. When serving, pro tempore
members of the commission have all of the powers, duties, and immunities, and
are entitled to all of the emoluments, including travel expenses, of regularly
appointed members of the commission, except that pro tempore members shall
not participate in license revocation decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

The board shall use the
following guidelines to determine whether an osteopathic physician and
surgeon's conduct violates the practice of medicine or RCW 18.130.180(4):

(1) Prior to offering
advice about integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine, the
osteopathic physician and surgeon shall undertake an assessment of the
patient. This assessment shall include but not be limited to conventional
methods of diagnosis and may include nonconventional methods of diagnosis, and
shall be documented in the patient's chart. Such assessment shall include the
following:

(a) Adequate assessment
of the patient's pertinent medical history and medical records;

(b) Documentation as to
whether conventional medical treatment options have been discussed with the
patient, including substances or materials to be used and possible or probable
side effects, and referral input if necessary;

(c) Documentation as to
whether conventional medical options have been tried, and if so, to what
effect, or a statement as to whether conventional options have been refused by
the patient;

(d) If a treatment is
offered which is not considered to be conventional, documentation of at least
a verbal and written informed consent for each treatment plan must be included,
including documentation that the risks and benefits of the use of the treatment
were discussed with the patient or guardian, including substances or materials
to be used and possible or probable side effects, and referral input if
necessary;

(e) Documentation as to
whether the integrative, complementary, or alternative medicine could interfere
with any other ongoing conventional treatment.

(2) The osteopathic
physician and surgeon may offer the patient integrative, complementary, or
alternative medicine pursuant to a documented treatment plan tailored for the
individual needs of the patient by which treatment progress or success can be
evaluated with stated objectives such as pain relief or improved physical or
psychosocial function. Such a documented treatment plan shall consider
pertinent medical history, previous medical records and physical examination,
as well as the need for further testing, consultations, referrals, or the use
of other treatment modalities.

(3) The osteopathic
physician and surgeon may use the integrative, complementary, or alternative
medicine subject to documented periodic review of the patient's care by the
osteopathic physician and surgeon at reasonable intervals in view of the
individual circumstances of the patient in regard to progress toward reaching
treatment objectives which takes into consideration the treatment prescribed,
ordered, or administered, as well as any new information about the etiology of
the complaint.

(4) The osteopathic
physician and surgeon shall keep complete and accurate records of the care
provided including the assessment information in subsection (1) of this
section.

(5) When considering
unprofessional conduct, the board must consider whether alternative methods
have a safety risk for the patient that is unreasonably greater than the
conventional treatment for the patient's medical conditions. The act of not
using, or the absence of the use of, a conventional treatment alone shall not
establish unprofessional conduct if the osteopathic physician and surgeon has
complied with this chapter.

(6) If the requirements
set out in subsections (1) through (4) of this section are met, and if all
treatment is properly documented, the board shall presume such practices are in
conformity with the practice of medicine and not in conflict with RCW
18.130.180(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
use the following guidelines to determine whether a physician's conduct
violates the practice of medicine or RCW 18.130.180(4):

(1) Prior to offering
advice about integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine, the
physician shall undertake an assessment of the patient. This assessment shall
include but not be limited to conventional methods of diagnosis and may include
nonconventional methods of diagnosis, and shall be documented in the patient's
chart. Such assessment shall include the following:

(a) Adequate assessment
of the patient's pertinent medical history and medical records;

(b) Documentation as to
whether conventional medical treatment options have been discussed with the
patient, including substances or materials to be used and possible or probable
side effects, and referral input if necessary;

(c) Documentation as to
whether conventional medical options have been tried, and if so, to what
effect, or a statement as to whether conventional options have been refused by
the patient;

(d) If a treatment is
offered which is not considered to be conventional, documentation of at least
a verbal and written informed consent for each treatment plan must be included,
including documentation that the risks and benefits of the use of the treatment
were discussed with the patient or guardian, including substances or materials
to be used and possible or probable side effects, and referral input if
necessary;

(e) Documentation as to
whether the integrative, complementary, or alternative medicine could interfere
with any other ongoing conventional treatment.

(2) The physician may
offer the patient integrative, complementary, or alternative medicine pursuant
to a documented treatment plan tailored for the individual needs of the patient
by which treatment progress or success can be evaluated with stated objectives
such as pain relief or improved physical or psychosocial function. Such a
documented treatment plan shall consider pertinent medical history, previous
medical records and physical examination, as well as the need for further
testing, consultations, referrals, or the use of other treatment modalities.

(3) The physician may
use the integrative, complementary, or alternative medicine subject to
documented periodic review of the patient's care by the physician at reasonable
intervals in view of the individual circumstances of the patient in regard to
progress toward reaching treatment objectives which takes into consideration
the treatment prescribed, ordered, or administered, as well as any new
information about the etiology of the complaint.

(4) The physician shall
keep complete and accurate records of the care provided including the
assessment information in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) When considering
unprofessional conduct, the commission must consider whether alternative
methods have a safety risk for the patient that is unreasonably greater than
the conventional treatment for the patient's medical conditions. The act of
not using, or the absence of the use of, a conventional treatment alone shall
not establish unprofessional conduct if the physician has complied with this
chapter.

(6) If the requirements
set out in subsections (1) through (4) of this section are met, and if all
treatment is properly documented, the commission shall presume such practices
are in conformity with the practice of medicine and not in conflict with RCW
18.130.180(4).

Sec. 7. RCW 18.130.050 and 1995
c 336 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The disciplining
authority has the following authority:

(1) To adopt, amend,
and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) To investigate all
complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct as defined in this chapter and
to hold hearings as provided in this chapter;

(3) To issue subpoenas
and administer oaths in connection with any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;

(4) To take or cause
depositions to be taken and use other discovery procedures as needed in any
investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;

(5) To compel
attendance of witnesses at hearings;

(6) In the course of
investigating a complaint or report of unprofessional conduct, to conduct
practice reviews;

(7) To take emergency
action ordering summary suspension of a license, or restriction or limitation
of the licensee's practice pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;

(8) To use a presiding
officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3) or the office of administrative
hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct hearings. The
disciplining authority shall make the final decision regarding disposition of
the license unless the disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the
final decision to the presiding officer;

(9) To use individual
members of the boards to direct investigations. However, the member of the
board shall not subsequently participate in the hearing of the case;

(10) To enter into
contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate
enforcement of this chapter;

(11) To contract with
licensees or other persons or organizations to provide services necessary for
the monitoring and supervision of licensees who are placed on probation, whose
professional activities are restricted, or who are for any authorized purpose
subject to monitoring by the disciplining authority;

(12) To adopt standards
of professional conduct or practice;

(13) To grant or deny
license applications, and in the event of a finding of unprofessional conduct
by an applicant or license holder, to impose any sanction against a license
applicant or license holder provided by this chapter;

(14) To designate
individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges;

(15) To establish
panels consisting of three or more members of the board to perform any duty or
authority within the board's jurisdiction under this chapter, other than
those related to an order to revoke a physician's license;

(16) To review and
audit the records of licensed health facilities' or services' quality assurance
committee decisions in which a licensee's practice privilege or employment is
terminated or restricted. Each health facility or service shall produce and
make accessible to the disciplining authority the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall not be
subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action pursuant
to RCW 70.41.200(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 18.130 RCW to read as follows:

A license holder
subject to a final decision regarding disposition of his or her license may
appeal the decision to the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 18.130 RCW to read as follows:

The
disciplinary authorities under chapters 18.57 and 18.71 RCW have the authority
to adopt standards of professional conduct or practice for conventional,
integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine as defined in RCW
18.57.001 and 18.71.010.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.130.060 and 1995
c 336 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
authority specified in RCW 18.130.050, the secretary has the following
additional authority:

(1) To employ such
investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the
enforcement of this chapter;

(2) Upon the request of
a board, to appoint not more than three pro tem members for the purpose of
participating as members of one or more committees of the board in connection
with proceedings specifically identified in the request. Individuals so
appointed must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members of the
board. While serving as board members pro tem, persons so appointed have all
the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments,
including travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of
regular members of the board, except that pro tem members may not
participate in the revocation of a physician's license. The chairperson of
a committee shall be a regular member of the board appointed by the board
chairperson. Committees have authority to act as directed by the board with
respect to all matters concerning the review, investigation, and adjudication
of all complaints, allegations, charges, and matters subject to the
jurisdiction of the board. The authority to act through committees does not
restrict the authority of the board to act as a single body at any phase of
proceedings within the board's jurisdiction. Board committees may make interim
orders and issue final decisions with respect to matters and cases delegated to
the committee by the board. Final decisions may be appealed as provided in
chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act;

(3) To establish fees
to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses, and consultants used in any
investigation and to establish fees to witnesses in any agency adjudicative
proceeding as authorized by RCW 34.05.446;

(4) To conduct
investigations and practice reviews at the direction of the disciplining
authority and to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and take depositions in the
course of conducting those investigations and practice reviews at the direction
of the disciplining authority;

(5) To
have the health professions regulatory program establish a system to recruit
potential public members, to review the qualifications of such potential
members, and to provide orientation to those public members appointed pursuant
to law by the governor or the secretary to the boards and commissions specified
in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b), and to the advisory committees and councils for
professions specified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(a).

Sec. 11. RCW 18.130.180 and 1995
c 336 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The following conduct,
acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder or
applicant under the jurisdiction of this chapter:

(1) The commission of
any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the
practice of the person's profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or
not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is
not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing
disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the
crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation
of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section,
conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has
been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights
guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(2) Misrepresentation
or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license or in reinstatement
thereof;

(3) All advertising
which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(4)(a)
Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in injury to a patient
or which creates an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed. The use of
a nontraditional treatment by itself shall not constitute unprofessional
conduct, provided that it does not result in injury to a patient or create an
unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed.

(b) For osteopathic
physicians and surgeons under chapter 18.57 RCW and physicians under chapter
18.71 RCW, the use of integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine as
defined in RCW 18.71.010 by itself shall not constitute unprofessional conduct,
unless it can be demonstrated that such method has a safety risk for the
patient that is unreasonably greater than the conventional treatment for the
patient's medical conditions. The act of not using, or the absence of the use
of, a conventional treatment alone shall not establish unprofessional conduct
if the osteopathic physician and surgeon has complied with chapter 18.57 RCW or
the physician has complied with chapter 18.71 RCW;

(5) Suspension,
revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice any health
care profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign
jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being
conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(6) The possession,
use, prescription for use, or distribution of controlled substances or legend
drugs in any way other than for legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion
of controlled substances or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or
prescribing controlled substances for oneself;

(7) Violation of any
state or federal statute or administrative rule regulating the profession in
question, including any statute or rule defining or establishing standards of
patient care or professional conduct or practice;

(8) Failure to
cooperate with the disciplining authority by:

(a) Not furnishing any
papers or documents;

(b) Not furnishing in
writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in the
complaint filed with the disciplining authority;

(c) Not responding to
subpoenas issued by the disciplining authority, whether or not the recipient of
the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding; or

(d) Not providing
reasonable and timely access for authorized representatives of the disciplining
authority seeking to perform practice reviews at facilities utilized by the
license holder;

(9) Failure to comply
with an order issued by the disciplining authority or a stipulation for
informal disposition entered into with the disciplining authority;

(10) Aiding or abetting
an unlicensed person to practice when a license is required;

(11) Violations of
rules established by any health agency;

(12) Practice beyond
the scope of practice as defined by law or rule;

(13) Misrepresentation
or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;

(14) Failure to
adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent that the consumer's health
or safety is at risk;

(15) Engaging in a
profession involving contact with the public while suffering from a contagious
or infectious disease involving serious risk to public health;

(16) Promotion for
personal gain of any unnecessary or inefficacious drug, device, treatment,
procedure, or service;

(17) Conviction of any
gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the person's profession.
For the purposes of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which
a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all
proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in
this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(18) The procuring, or
aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal abortion;

(19) The offering,
undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat disease by a secret method,
procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the treating, operating, or prescribing
for any health condition by a method, means, or procedure which the licensee
refuses to divulge upon demand of the disciplining authority;

(20) The willful
betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as recognized by law;

(21) Violation of
chapter 19.68 RCW;

(22) Interference with
an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation of
facts before the disciplining authority or its authorized representative, or by
the use of threats or harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them
from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action,
or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or witness to prevent or
attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a disciplinary
proceeding;

(23) Current misuse of:

(a) Alcohol;

(b) Controlled
substances; or

(c) Legend drugs;

(24) Abuse of a client
or patient or sexual contact with a client or patient;

(25)
Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or subsidy offered by
a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services
intended for patients, in contemplation of a sale or for use in research
publishable in professional journals, where a conflict of interest is
presented, as defined by rules of the disciplining authority, in consultation
with the department, based on recognized professional ethical standards.

---
END ---