BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.60.040 and 1993 c
457 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of criminal impersonation in the first degree if the person:

(a) Assumes a false
identity and does an act in his or her assumed character with intent to defraud
another or for any other unlawful purpose; ((or))

(b) Pretends to be a
representative of some person or organization or a public servant and does an
act in his or her pretended capacity with intent to defraud another or for any
other unlawful purpose; or

(c) Falsely assumes
the identity of an active or retired veteran of the armed forces of the United
States for the purpose of personal gain or to facilitate any unlawful activity.

(2) Criminal
impersonation in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) A person is guilty
of criminal impersonation in the second degree if the person:

(a) Claims to be a law
enforcement officer or creates an impression that he or she is a law
enforcement officer; and

(b) Under circumstances
not amounting to criminal impersonation in the first degree, does an act with
intent to convey the impression that he or she is acting in an official
capacity and a reasonable person would believe the person is a law enforcement
officer.

(4)
Criminal impersonation in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---