BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that Washington requires strong career and technical education programs to meet
the academic and career preparation needs of secondary students. The
legislature further finds that career and technical education programs, including
the vocational skills centers, provide:

(a) Support for
achievement of the certificate of mastery, particularly by students requiring
applied learning opportunities for academic success;

(b) Opportunities for
secondary students to certify competency in the entry-level skills of current
occupations;

(c) Support for special
needs students to fulfill the occupational preparation required for
self-sufficiency in adult life;

(d) Increases in the
number of students who complete high school; and

(e) Assistance with
students' transitions from secondary schools to postsecondary education,
training, and employment.

(2) In order to provide
students with a variety of learning experiences that will assist them in
achieving the higher standards of education reform, school districts currently
offering career and technical education programs shall continue to provide
career and technical education programs and school districts not offering
career and technical education programs are encouraged to begin providing such
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28C.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To ensure high
quality career and technical programs, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall review and approve the plans of local districts for
the delivery of career and technical education. Standards for career and
technical programs shall be established by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. These standards should:

(a) Demonstrate how
career and technical education programs will ensure academic rigor; align with
the state's education reform requirements; ensure preparation for
industry-defined skill standards or certifications, or both; help address the
skills gap of Washington's economy; and maintain strong industry connections
for the design and delivery of career and technical education;

(b) Demonstrate how
secondary career and technical education programs will align with the work
force development councils of Washington state, particularly regarding (i) the
provision of services out-of-school; (ii) the retention of at-risk youth; and
(iii) connection to and use of the labor market information system of the work
source system; and

(c) Demonstrate a
strategy to align the five-year planning requirement under the federal Carl
Perkins act with the state and district vocational program planning
requirements that include:

(i) An assessment of
equipment and technology needs to support the skills training of technical
students;

(ii) An assessment of
industry internships required for teachers to ensure the ability to prepare
students for industry-defined standards or certifications, or both;

(iii) An assessment of
the costs of supporting job shadows, mentors, community service and industry
internships, and other activities for student learning in the community. A
formula for the calculation of the full-time equivalent value of these
activities shall be included in the new program standards; and

(iv) A description of
the leadership activities to be provided for technical education students.

(2) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall recommend a system of funding the
implementation of the standards in this section, including regular equipment
and technology investments.

(3) To ensure high
quality career education programs and services in secondary schools, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction may provide technical assistance to
local districts and develop state guidelines for the delivery of career
guidance in secondary schools.

(4) To ensure
leadership development, the staff of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction may serve as the state advisors to Washington state FFA, Washington
future business leaders of America, Washington DECA, Washington SkillsUSA-VICA,
Washington family, career and community leaders, and Washington technology
students association, and any additional career or technical student
organizations that are formed. Working with the directors or executive secretaries
of these organizations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
may develop tools for the coordination of leadership activities with the
curriculum of technical education programs.

(5) As
used in this section, "career and technical education" means planned
programs of courses and learning experiences that begin with exploration of
career options, support the achievement of the state's academic standards,
promote leadership development, and offer specific preparation in industry-defined
skills and for advanced and continuing education.

---
END ---