BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 11.04.015 and 1974
ex.s. c 117 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The net estate of a
person dying intestate, or that portion thereof with respect to which the
person shall have died intestate, shall descend subject to the provisions of
RCW 11.04.250 and 11.02.070, and shall be distributed as follows:

(1) Share of surviving
spouse. The surviving spouse shall receive the following share:

(a) All of the
decedent's share of the net community estate; and

(b) One-half of the net
separate estate if the intestate is survived by issue; or

(c) Three-quarters of
the net separate estate if there is no surviving issue, but the intestate is
survived by one or more of his or her parents, or by one or more of the
issue of one or more of his or her parents; or

(d) All of the net
separate estate, if there is no surviving issue nor parent nor issue of parent.

(2) Shares of others
than surviving spouse. The share of the net estate not distributable to the
surviving spouse, or the entire net estate if there is no surviving spouse,
shall descend and be distributed as follows:

(a) To the issue of the
intestate; if they are all in the same degree of kinship to the intestate, they
shall take equally, or if of unequal degree, then those of more remote degree
shall take by representation.

(b) If the intestate
not be survived by issue, then to the parent or parents who survive the
intestate, except that a parent who willfully abandoned the intestate and
willfully failed to regularly contribute to the emotional, psychological, or
financial support of the intestate when the intestate was a minor may not
inherit under this section unless the parent resumed the parental relationship
and such parental relationship continued until the death of the child. A
parent who is prohibited from inheriting shall be deemed to have predeceased
the intestate as to property that would have passed to the parent under this
section. For purposes of this subsection, "abandon" means an
expression, either by statement or conduct, of an intent to forgo, for an
extended period, parental rights or responsibilities despite an ability to
exercise such rights and responsibilities.

(c) If the intestate
not be survived by issue or by either parent, then to those issue of the parent
or parents who survive the intestate; if they are all in the same degree of
kinship to the intestate, they shall take equally, or, if of unequal degree,
then those of more remote degree shall take by representation.

(d) If the intestate
not be survived by issue or by either parent, or by any issue of the parent or
parents who survive the intestate, then to the grandparent or grandparents who
survive the intestate; if both maternal and paternal grandparents survive the
intestate, the maternal grandparent or grandparents shall take one-half and the
paternal grandparent or grandparents shall take one-half.

(e) If the
intestate not be survived by issue or by either parent, or by any issue of the
parent or parents or by any grandparent or grandparents, then to those issue of
any grandparent or grandparents who survive the intestate; taken as a group,
the issue of the maternal grandparent or grandparents shall share equally with
the issue of the paternal grandparent or grandparents, also taken as a group;
within each such group, all members share equally if they are all in the same
degree of kinship to the intestate, or, if some be of unequal degree, then
those of more remote degree shall take by representation.

--- END ---