BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act may be known and
cited as Layla's Law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 9.91 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any person who
has received notice that his or her behavior is interfering with the use of a
dog guide or service animal who continues with reckless disregard to interfere
with the use of a dog guide or service animal by obstructing, intimidating, or
otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the dog guide or service animal user or
his or her dog guide or service animal is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, except that for a second or subsequent offense
it is a gross misdemeanor.

(b) Any person who,
with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog to interfere with the use of a
dog guide or service animal by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise
jeopardizing the safety of the dog guide or service animal user or his or her
dog guide or service animal is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW, except that for a second or subsequent offense it is a gross
misdemeanor.

(2)(a) Any person who,
with reckless disregard, injures, disables, or causes the death of a dog guide
or service animal is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b) Any person who,
with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog to injure, disable, or cause the
death of a dog guide or service animal is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) Any person who
intentionally injures, disables, or causes the death of a dog guide or service
animal is guilty of a class C felony.

(4) Any person who
wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized control over a dog guide or service
animal with the intent to deprive the dog guide or service animal user of his
or her dog guide or service animal is guilty of theft in the first degree, RCW
9A.56.030.

(5)(a) In any case in
which the defendant is convicted of a violation of this section, he or she shall
also be ordered to make full restitution for all damages, including incidental
and consequential expenses incurred by the dog guide or service animal user and
the dog guide or service animal which arise out of or are related to the
criminal offense.

(b) Restitution for a
conviction under this section shall include, but is not limited to:

(i) The value of the
replacement of an incapacitated or deceased dog guide or service animal, the
training of a replacement dog guide or service animal, or retraining of the
affected dog guide or service animal and all related veterinary and care
expenses; and

(ii) Medical expenses
of the dog guide or service animal user, training of the dog guide or service
animal user, and compensation for wages or earned income lost by the dog guide
or service animal user.

(6) Nothing in this
section shall affect any civil remedies available for violation of this
section.

(7) For purposes of
this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Dog
guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of guiding blind
persons or a dog trained for the purpose of assisting hearing impaired persons.

(b) "Service
animal" means an animal that is trained for the purposes of assisting or
accommodating a disabled person's sensory, mental, or physical disability.

(c) "Notice"
means a verbal or otherwise communicated warning prescribing the behavior of
another person and a request that the person stop their behavior.

(d)
"Value" means the value to the dog guide or service animal user and
does not refer to cost or fair market value.

---
END ---