BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 28A.225

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 School districts shall adopt and implement policies
allowing,

_7 at each school employee's option, the employee's
children to

_8 attend school where the employee is employed.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 1 SB
5943