BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the operations of the local, state, and federal government and the roles
of individual policymakers are often not understood by citizens. Yet public
understanding of the institutions and processes of government is critical to a
healthy democracy and the building of public trust and confidence in our
elected officials. The legislature further finds that civic education through
our public schools is a vital tool to promote greater understanding of the role
that the voters and policymakers play in a representative democracy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

Each school shall
conduct a civic education day once during the last full week of October in
every odd-numbered year. The purpose of civic education day is to educate
future citizens about the concepts of government and representative democracy,
and to promote civic education. At a minimum, civic education day must
include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A school-wide
assembly lasting not less than one regular class period. The assembly must
include at least one speaker who is an elected official from local, state, or
federal government; and

(2) Voter registration
information and, when appropriate, opportunities for students to register.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
September 1, 2001.

---
END ---