BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide tax exemptions to assist dairy farmers to comply with
the dairy nutrient management act, chapter 90.64 RCW, and to assist public or
private entities to establish and operate anaerobic digesters to treat dairy
nutrients on a regional or on‑farm basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of services rendered in respect to operating, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of dairy nutrient management equipment and
facilities, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of the equipment and facilities. The equipment and
facilities must be used exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a
dairy nutrient management plan as required under chapter 90.64 RCW. This
exemption applies to sales made after the dairy nutrient management plan is
certified under chapter 90.64 RCW.

(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The department
of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons to the department of
revenue. The application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the
department and must contain information regarding the location of the dairy and
other information the department may require.

(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's
files.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
section 3 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Dairy nutrient management equipment and facilities"
means machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and treatment
of dairy manure, such as aerators, agitators, alley scrapers, augers, dams,
gutter cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes, pumps, separators, and tanks. The
term also includes tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of the equipment and facilities, including repair and replacement
parts.

(b) "Eligible person" means a person licensed to produce
milk under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management plan
by December 31, 2003, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
by an eligible person of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component of dairy nutrient management equipment and facilities, as defined
in section 2 of this act. The equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a dairy management plan as
required under chapter 90.64 RCW. This exemption applies to the use of
tangible personal property made after the dairy nutrient management plan is
certified under chapter 90.64 RCW. The exemption certificate and recordkeeping
requirements of section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to services
rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering,
or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of tangible personal property
that becomes an ingredient or component of the anaerobic digester. The
anaerobic digester must be used primarily to treat dairy manure.

(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must
contain information regarding the location of the facility and other
information as the department may require.

(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's
files.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
section 5 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes
manure from cattle into biogas and dried manure using microorganisms in a
decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free container.

(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or
operating an anaerobic digester to treat primarily dairy manure.

(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by
volume or weight.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of anaerobic digesters or tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component of anaerobic digesters to treat primarily dairy manure by an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester, as defined in
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---