BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.36.005 and 1996 c
54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that:

(1) As the number of
people in the state grows and wildlife habitat is altered, people will
encounter wildlife more frequently. As a result, conflicts between humans and
wildlife will also increase. Wildlife is a public resource of significant
value to the people of the state and the responsibility to minimize and resolve
these conflicts is shared by all citizens of the state.

(2) In particular, the
state recognizes the importance of commercial agricultural and horticultural
crop production, rangeland suitable for grazing or browsing of domestic
livestock, and the value of healthy deer and elk populations, which can
damage such crops. The legislature further finds that damage prevention is key
to maintaining healthy deer and elk populations, wildlife-related recreational
opportunities, ((and)) commercially productive agricultural and
horticultural crops, and rangeland suitable for grazing or browsing of domestic
livestock, and that the state, participants in wildlife recreation, and
private landowners and tenants share the responsibility for damage prevention.
Toward this end, the legislature encourages landowners and tenants to
contribute through their land management practices to healthy wildlife
populations and to provide access for related recreation. It is in the best
interests of the state for the department of fish and wildlife to respond
quickly to wildlife damage complaints and to work with these landowners and
tenants to minimize and/or prevent damages and conflicts while maintaining deer
and elk populations for enjoyment by all citizens of the state.

(3) A timely and
simplified process for resolving claims for damages caused by deer and elk for
commercial agricultural ((or)) products, horticultural products,
or rangeland suitable for grazing or browsing of domestic livestock is
beneficial to the claimant and the state.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.36.010 and 1996 c
54 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless otherwise
specified,)) The ((following)) definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1) "Crop"
means a commercially raised horticultural and/or agricultural product and
includes growing or harvested product ((but does not include livestock))
and rangeland forage on privately owned land or on lands leased from any
public agency suitable for grazing or browsing of domestic livestock for at
least a portion of the year. For the purposes of this chapter all parts of
horticultural trees shall be considered a crop and shall be eligible for
claims.

(2)
"Emergency" means an unforeseen circumstance beyond the control of
the landowner or tenant that presents a real and immediate threat to crops,
domestic animals, or fowl.

(3) "Immediate
family member" means spouse, brother, sister, grandparent, parent, child,
or grandchild.

Sec. 3. RCW 77.36.030 and 1996 c
54 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
following limitations and conditions, the owner, the owner's immediate family
member, the owner's documented employee, or a tenant of real property may trap
or kill on that property, without the licenses required under RCW 77.32.010 or
authorization from the director under RCW 77.12.240, wild animals or wild birds
that are damaging crops, domestic animals, or fowl:

(a) Threatened or
endangered species shall not be hunted, trapped, or killed;

(b) Except in an
emergency situation, deer, elk, and protected wildlife shall not be killed
without a permit issued and conditioned by the director or the director's
designee. In an emergency, the department may give verbal permission followed
by written permission to trap or kill any deer, elk, or protected wildlife that
is damaging crops, domestic animals, or fowl; and

(c) On privately owned
cattle ranching lands and on lands leased from any public agency suitable
for grazing or browsing of domestic livestock, the landowner or lessee may
declare an emergency only when the department has not responded within
forty-eight hours after having been contacted by the landowner or lessee
regarding damage caused by wild animals or wild birds. In such an emergency,
the owner or lessee may trap or kill any deer, elk, or other protected wildlife
that is causing the damage but deer and elk may only be killed if such lands
were open to public hunting during the previous hunting season, or the closure
to public hunting was coordinated with the department to protect property and
livestock.

(2) Except for coyotes
and Columbian ground squirrels, wildlife trapped or killed under this section
remain the property of the state, and the person trapping or killing the
wildlife shall notify the department immediately. The department shall dispose
of wildlife so taken within three days of receiving such a notification and in
a manner determined by the director to be in the best interest of the state.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.36.040 and 1996 c
54 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Pursuant to this
section, the director or the director's designee may distribute money
appropriated to pay claims for damages to crops caused by wild deer or elk in
an amount of up to ten thousand dollars per claim. Damages payable under this
section are limited to:

(a) The value of
such commercially raised horticultural or agricultural crops, whether growing
or harvested((, and)); or

(b) Damages to
rangeland livestock forage in excess of ten percent of historic use levels for
privately owned land or on lands leased from any public agency and fenced ranch
or farm units that are specifically limited to hay meadows, pasture meadows,
artificially seeded rangelands, and grazing land that is deferred to seasonal
use. Historic levels must be expressed in average numbers of deer and elk on
the property in question over the previous ten years.

Damages shall be
paid only to the owner of the crop or the lessee of rangeland from a public
agency at the time of damage, without assignment. Damages shall not
include damage to other real or personal property including other vegetation or
animals, damages caused by animals other than wild deer or elk, lost profits,
consequential damages, or any other damages whatsoever. These damages shall
comprise the exclusive remedy for claims against the state for damages caused
by wildlife.

(2) The director may
adopt rules for the form of affidavits or proof to be provided in claims under
this section. The director may adopt rules to specify the time and method of
assessing damage. Except for rangeland, the burden of proving damages
shall be on the claimant. For rangeland, if the director does not agree
with the claimant on normal historic levels or any element of a damage
settlement, the matter must be submitted to arbitration within ten days of
notice by either party. The arbitration panel consists of one arbitrator
chosen by the landowner, one arbitrator chosen by the director, and one
arbitrator chosen by the other two arbitrators. If the two arbitrators cannot
agree within ten days on a third arbitrator, a request by either party must be
made to the superior court of the county in which the damage is located for
appointment of a third impartial arbitrator. The director and landowner
equally share the cost of the use of the third arbitrator. Historic levels or
any other element settled by arbitration may be included in an appeal to a
court of competent jurisdiction, and the court is not bound by the finding of
the arbitration panel. Payment of claims shall remain subject to the other
conditions and limits of this chapter.

(3) If funds are
limited, payments of claims shall be prioritized in the order that the claims
are received. No claim may be processed if:

(a) The claimant did
not notify the department within ten days of discovery of the damage. If the
claimant intends to take steps that prevent determination of damages, such as
harvest of damaged crops, then the claimant shall notify the department as soon
as reasonably possible after discovery so that the department has an
opportunity to document the damage and take steps to prevent additional damage;
or

(b) The claimant did
not present a complete, written claim within sixty days after the damage, or
the last day of damaging if the damage was of a continuing nature.

(4) The director or the
director's designee may examine and assess the damage upon notice. The
department and claimant may agree to an assessment of damages by a neutral
person or persons knowledgeable in horticultural or agricultural practices.
The department and claimant shall share equally in the costs of such third
party examination and assessment of damage.

(5) There shall be no
payment for damages if:

(a) ((The crops are
on lands leased from any public agency;

(b))) The landowner or claimant failed to use or
maintain applicable damage prevention materials or methods furnished by the
department, or failed to comply with a wildlife damage prevention agreement
under RCW 77.12.260;

(((c))) (b)
The director has expended all funds appropriated for payment of such claims for
the current fiscal year; or

(((d))) (c)
The damages are covered by insurance. The claimant shall notify the department
at the time of claim of insurance coverage in the manner required by the
director. Insurance coverage shall cover all damages prior to any payment
under this chapter.

(6) Except for
claims for damages to rangeland livestock forage, when there is a
determination of claim by the director or the director's designee pursuant to
this section, the claimant has sixty days to accept the claim or it is deemed
rejected.

Sec. 5. RCW 77.36.050 and 1996 c
54 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for claims
for damages to rangeland livestock forage, if the claimant does not accept
the director's decision under RCW 77.36.040, or if the claim exceeds ten
thousand dollars, then the claim may be filed with the office of risk
management under RCW 4.92.040(5). The office of risk management shall
recommend to the legislature whether the claim should be paid. If the
legislature approves the claim, the director shall pay it from moneys
appropriated for that purpose. No funds shall be expended for damages under
this chapter except as appropriated by the legislature. Claims for damages
to rangeland livestock forage must be settled under RCW 77.36.040(2).

Sec. 6. RCW 77.36.080 and 1996 c
54 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
pay no more than thirty thousand dollars per fiscal year from the general fund
for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment costs and compromise of
claims unless the legislature declares an emergency. Such money shall be used
to pay animal damage claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW
77.36.040 and the damage occurred in a place where the opportunity to hunt was
restricted or prohibited by a county, municipality, or other public entity
during the season prior to the occurrence of the damage.

(2) The legislature may
declare an emergency, defined for the purposes of this section as any happening
arising from weather, other natural conditions, or fire that causes unusually great
damage to commercially raised agricultural or horticultural crops, or
rangeland forage on privately owned land or on lands leased from any public
agency suitable for grazing or browsing of domestic livestock for at least a
portion of the year by deer or elk. In an emergency, the department may
pay as much as may be subsequently appropriated, in addition to the funds
authorized under subsection (1) of this section, for claims under RCW 77.36.040
and for assessment and compromise of claims. Such money shall be used to pay
animal damage claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040
and the department has expended all funds authorized under RCW 77.36.070 or
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---