BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When exercising its
authority to erect and maintain motorist information sign panels under RCW
47.36.310 and 47.36.320, the department may contract with a private
contractor. The contractor, if selected by the department, must be
incorporated, and maintain an office, in this state.

(2) The contractor, at
no cost to the department, is solely responsible for marketing, administration,
financial management, sign fabrication, installation, and maintenance and is
subject to the provisions of this chapter otherwise applicable to the
department.

(3) Any
contract entered into between the department and a contractor shall require the
contractor to administer, fabricate, install, and maintain community historical
signs authorized for placement by the department at no cost to the department.

(4) The
contractor shall pay the department a minimum of a five-percent royalty on the
revenues collected by the contractor. Revenues collected from the five-percent
royalty shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund and shall be used solely
for the purpose of mobility improvement construction.

--- END ---