BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that over five thousand state residents per year file cases and complaints with
the department of labor and industries alleging they have been denied payment
for work they performed. Each month an average of over one million dollars in
back wages is sought by workers.

The legislature further
finds that the Washington state minimum wage law and wage claim laws do not
require payment of interest on back wages owed and do not authorize adequate
penalties against violators. To improve compliance, the department of labor
and industries should be allowed to assess interest on back wages and impose
civil penalties against employers who are found to be not in compliance with
chapters 49.46 and 49.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 49.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An employer shall
pay each worker all wages due on an established payday for each payroll period.

(2) An employer who
fails to pay wages due as required by this section may be assessed civil
penalties of:

(a) Fifty dollars for
each failure to pay each worker; and

(b) For each subsequent
violation, or any willful or intentional violation, one hundred dollars for
each failure to pay each worker, plus twenty-five percent of the amount of
wages unlawfully withheld.

(3) An employer who
does not pay all wages owed within seventy-two hours of an order issued by the
department under RCW 49.48.040(1)(b) shall, in addition to any other applicable
penalty, be assessed a civil penalty equal to three times the amount of wages
due and not paid.

(4) Upon a finding by
the director that an employer who discharges or in any other manner
discriminates against any employee because such employee has made any complaint
to his or her employer, to the director, or his or her authorized
representatives that he or she has not been paid wages in accordance with this
section, or that the employer has violated this section, or because such
employee has caused to be instituted or is about to cause to be instituted any
proceeding under or related to this section, or because such employee has
testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding, the director may
require an employer who has discharged or discriminated against an employee in
violation of this section to reinstate the employee to the same position with
back pay and interest up to one percent per month.

(5) The director, or
the director's authorized representative, has authority to assess all civil
penalties provided in this section, giving due consideration to the
appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the number of affected employees
of the employer being charged, the gravity of the violation, the size of the
employer's business, the good faith of the employer, and the history of
previous violations.

(6) Civil penalties
imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the director for deposit in the
general fund. Civil penalties may be recovered and other civil remedies
authorized by this chapter may be enforced in a civil action in the name of the
department brought in the superior court of the county where the violation is
alleged to have occurred, or the department may use the procedures for
collection of wages set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 49.46.100 and 1959 c
294 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any employer who
hinders or delays the director or ((his)) the director's
authorized representatives in the performance of ((his)) the
director's duties in the enforcement of this chapter, or refuses to admit
the director or ((his)) the director's authorized representatives
to any place of employment, or fails to make, keep, and preserve any records as
required under the provisions of this chapter, or falsifies any such record, or
refuses to make any record accessible to the director or ((his)) the
director's authorized representatives upon demand, or refuses to furnish a
sworn statement of such record or any other information required for the proper
enforcement of this chapter to the director or ((his)) the director's
authorized representatives upon demand((, or pays or agrees to pay wages at
a rate less than the rate applicable under this chapter, or otherwise violates
any provision of this chapter or of any regulation issued under this chapter))
shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall((, upon conviction
therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor)) be assessed a civil penalty
of not more than one thousand dollars depending on the size of the business and
the gravity of the violation, provided that, before entering a business or any
other establishment to commence an investigation under this section, the
director or the director's authorized representative shall notify the owner,
manager, operator, or person in charge. If access is refused, the director or
the director's authorized representative may obtain an administrative search
warrant from a court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) ((Any)) (a)
An employer who pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate less than the rate
applicable under this chapter or any rule or order adopted under this chapter
may be assessed civil penalties of an amount equal to twenty percent of the
wage violation.

(b) An employer who
willfully or repeatedly pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate less than the
rate applicable under this chapter or a rule or order adopted under this
chapter is in violation of this chapter and shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.

(c) An employer who
fails to pay wages due as required by this chapter may be assessed civil
penalties of:

(i) Fifty dollars
for each failure to pay each worker; and

(ii) For each
subsequent violation, or any willful or intentional violation, one hundred
dollars for each failure to pay each worker, plus twenty-five percent of the
amount of wages unlawfully withheld.

(d) An employer who
does not pay all wages owed within seventy-two hours of an order issued by the
department under RCW 49.48.040(1)(b) shall, in addition to any other applicable
penalty, be assessed a civil penalty equal to three times the amount of wages
due and not paid.

(3) Upon a finding
by the director that an employer who discharges or in any other manner
discriminates against any employee because such employee has made any complaint
to his or her employer, to the director, or his or her authorized
representatives that he or she has not been paid wages in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter, or that the employer has violated any
provision of this chapter, or because such employee has caused to be instituted
or is about to cause to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this
chapter, or because such employee has testified or is about to testify in any
such proceeding ((shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall,
upon conviction therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor)), the
director may require an employer who has discharged or discriminated against an
employee in violation of this chapter to reinstate the employee to the same
position with back pay and interest up to one percent per month.

(4) The director, or
the director's authorized representative, has authority to assess all civil
penalties provided in this section, giving due consideration to the
appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the number of affected employees
of the employer being charged, the gravity of the violation, the size of the
employer's business, the good faith of the employer, and the history of
previous violations.

(5) Civil penalties
imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the director for deposit in the
general fund. Civil penalties may be recovered and other civil remedies
authorized by this chapter may be enforced in a civil action in the name of the
department brought in the superior court of the county where the violation is
alleged to have occurred, or the department may use the procedures for collection
of wages set forth in chapter 49.48 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 49.48.020 and 1971
ex.s. c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, firm, or
corporation which violates any of the provisions of RCW 49.48.010 through 49.48.030
((and)), 49.48.060, and section 2 of this act shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 5. RCW 49.48.040 and 1987 c
172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
labor and industries may:

(a) Conduct investigations
to ensure compliance with this chapter and chapters 39.12 and 49.46 RCW, upon
obtaining information indicating an employer may be committing a violation
under this chapter and chapters 39.12((,)) and 49.46((,
and 49.48 RCW, conduct investigations to ensure compliance with chapters 39.12,
49.46, and 49.48)) RCW;

(b) Order the payment
of all wages owed the workers, including interest of up to one percent per
month on back wages owed, and institute actions necessary for the
collection of the sums determined owed; and

(c) Take assignments of
wage claims and prosecute actions for the collection of wages and interest
of up to one percent per month on back wages owed of persons who are
financially unable to employ counsel when in the judgment of the director of
the department the claims are valid and enforceable in the courts.

(2) Upon being
informed of a wage claim against an employer or former employer, the director
shall, if such claim appears to be just, immediately notify the employer or
former employer, of such claim by mail. If the employer or former employer
fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the director of the
failure to do so, within thirty days, the employer or former employer is liable
to a penalty of twenty percent of that portion of the claim found to be justly
due. The director shall have a cause of action against the employer or former
employer for the recovery of such penalty, and the same may be included in any
subsequent action by the director on the wage claim, or may be exercised
separately after adjustment of such wage claim without court action.

(3) The director
of the department or any authorized representative may, for the purpose of
carrying out RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080: (a) Issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses or parties and the production of books, papers, or
records; (b) administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath; (c) take the
verification of proof of instruments of writing; and (d) take depositions and
affidavits. If assignments for wage claims are taken, court costs shall not be
payable by the department for prosecuting such suits.

(((3))) (4)
The director shall have a seal inscribed "Department of Labor and
Industries‑-State of Washington" and all courts shall take judicial
notice of such seal. Obedience to subpoenas issued by the director or
authorized representative shall be enforced by the courts in any county.

(((4))) (5)
The director or authorized representative shall have free access to all places
and works of labor. Any employer or any agent or employee of such employer who
refuses the director or authorized representative admission therein, or who,
when requested by the director or authorized representative, willfully neglects
or refuses to furnish the director or authorized representative any statistics
or information pertaining to his or her lawful duties, which statistics or
information may be in his or her possession or under the control of the
employer or agent, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(6) An action for
relief under this section shall be commenced within three years after the cause
of action accrues, unless a longer period of time applies under law.

Sec. 6. RCW 49.48.060 and 1971
ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If upon
investigation by the director, after taking assignments of any wage claim under
RCW 49.48.040, it appears to the director that the employer is representing to
((his)) employees that ((he)) the employer is able to pay
wages for their services and that the employees are not being paid for their
services or if the director determines an employer has repeatedly violated
the provisions of this chapter or chapter 39.12 or 49.46 RCW requiring payment
of wages, the director may require the employer to give a bond in such sum
as the director deems reasonable and adequate in the circumstances, with
sufficient surety, conditioned that the employer will for a definite future
period not exceeding six months conduct ((his)) business and pay ((his))
employees in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington.

(2) If within ten days
after demand for such bond the employer fails to provide the same, the director
may commence a suit against the employer in the superior court of appropriate
jurisdiction to compel ((him)) the employer to furnish such bond
or cease doing business until ((he)) the employer has done so.
The employer shall have the burden of proving the amount thereof to be
excessive.

(3) If the court finds
that there is just cause for requiring such bond and that the same is
reasonable, necessary, or appropriate to secure the prompt payment of
the wages of the employees of such employer and ((his)) the
employer's compliance with RCW 49.48.010 through 49.48.080, the court shall
enjoin such employer from doing business in this state until the requirement is
met, or shall make other, and may make further, orders appropriate to compel
compliance with the requirement.

((Upon being
informed of a wage claim against an employer or former employer, the director
shall, if such claim appears to be just, immediately notify the employer or
former employer, of such claim by mail. If the employer or former employer
fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the director of his
failure to do so, within thirty days thereafter, the employer or former
employer shall be liable to a penalty of ten percent of that portion of the
claim found to be justly due. The director shall have a cause of action
against the employer or former employer for the recovery of such penalty, and
the same may be included in any subsequent action by the director on said wage
claim, or may be exercised separately after adjustment of such wage claim
without court action.))

Sec. 7. RCW 49.48.070 and 1935 c
96 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall
be the duty of the director of labor and industries to inquire diligently for
any violations of RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080 and section 2 of this act,
and to institute the actions for penalties herein provided, and to enforce
generally the provisions of RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080 and section 2 of
this act.

---
END ---