BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.535.020 and 1996
c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the board of
directors of any school district shall deem it advisable to validate and ratify
the indebtedness mentioned in RCW 28A.535.010, they shall provide therefor by
resolution, which shall be entered on the records of such school district,
which resolution shall provide for the holding of an election for the purpose
of submitting the question of validating and ratifying the indebtedness so
incurred to the voters of such school district for approval or disapproval, and
if at such election ((three-fifths)) a majority of the voters in
such school district voting at such election shall vote in favor of the
validation and ratification of such indebtedness, then such indebtedness so
validated and ratified and every part thereof existing at the time of the
adoption of said resolution shall thereby become and is hereby declared to be
validated and ratified and a binding obligation upon such school district.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.535.050 and 1984
c 186 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

If the indebtedness of
such school district is validated and ratified, as provided in this chapter, by
((three-fifths)) a majority of the voters voting at such
election, the board of directors of such school district, without any further
vote, may borrow money and issue and sell negotiable bonds therefor in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.52.056 and 1973
1st ex.s. c 195 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

Any municipal
corporation otherwise authorized by law to issue general obligation bonds for
capital purposes may, at an election duly held after giving notice thereof as
required by law, authorize the issuance of general obligation bonds for capital
purposes only, which shall not include the replacement of equipment, and
provide for the payment of the principal and interest of such bonds by annual
levies in excess of the tax limitations contained in RCW 84.52.050 to
84.52.056, inclusive and RCW 84.52.043. Such an election shall not be held
oftener than twice a calendar year, and the proposition to issue any such bonds
and to exceed said tax limitation must receive the affirmative vote of a
three-fifths majority of those voting on the proposition and the total number
of ((persons)) voters voting at such election must constitute not
less than forty percent of the voters in said municipal corporation who voted
at the last preceding general state election, except that a proposition by a
school district to issue such bonds and to pay the principal and interest on
the bonds by annual tax levies shall be authorized by receiving the affirmative
vote of a majority of the voters voting on the proposition.

Any taxing district
shall have the right by vote of its governing body to refund any general
obligation bonds of said district issued for capital purposes only, and to
provide for the interest thereon and amortization thereof by annual levies in
excess of the tax limitations provided for in RCW 84.52.050 to 84.52.056,
inclusive and RCW 84.52.043.

Sec. 4. RCW 39.36.020 and 2000 c
156 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
expressly provided by law or in subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this section,
no taxing district shall for any purpose become indebted in any manner to an
amount exceeding three‑eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable
property in such taxing district without the assent of three‑fifths of
the voters therein voting at an election to be held for that purpose, nor in
cases requiring such assent shall the total indebtedness incurred at any time
exceed one and one-fourth percent on the value of the taxable property therein.

(2)(a)(i) Public
hospital districts are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in such
public hospital districts without the assent of three-fifths of the voters
therein voting at an election held for that purpose.

(ii) Counties, cities,
and towns are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding one and one-half
percent of the value of the taxable property in such counties, cities, or towns
without the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein voting at an election
held for that purpose.

(b) In cases requiring
such assent counties, cities, towns, and public hospital districts are limited
to a total indebtedness of two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable
property therein. However, any county that has assumed the rights, powers,
functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation under
chapter 36.56 RCW may become indebted to a larger amount for its authorized
metropolitan functions, as provided under chapter 35.58 RCW, but not exceeding
an additional three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property
in the county without the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein voting
at an election held for that purpose, and in cases requiring such assent not
exceeding an additional two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable
property in the county.

(3) School districts
are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding three-eighths of one
percent of the value of the taxable property in such district without the
assent of ((three‑fifths)) a majority of the voters therein
voting at an election held for that purpose. In cases requiring such assent
school districts are limited to a total indebtedness of two and one-half percent
of the value of the taxable property therein.

(4) No part of the
indebtedness allowed in this chapter shall be incurred for any purpose other
than strictly county, city, town, school district, township, port district,
metropolitan park district, or other municipal purposes: PROVIDED, That a city
or town, with such assent, may become indebted to a larger amount, but not
exceeding two and one-half percent additional, determined as herein provided,
for supplying such city or town with water, artificial light, and sewers, when
the works for supplying such water, light, and sewers shall be owned and
controlled by the city or town; and a city or town, with such assent, may
become indebted to a larger amount, but not exceeding two and one-half percent
additional for acquiring or developing open space, park facilities, and capital
facilities associated with economic development: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
school district may become indebted to a larger amount but not exceeding two
and one-half percent additional for capital outlays.

(5) Such indebtedness
may be authorized in any total amount in one or more propositions and the
amount of such authorization may exceed the amount of indebtedness which could
then lawfully be incurred. Such indebtedness may be incurred in one or more
series of bonds from time to time out of such authorization but at no time
shall the total general indebtedness of any taxing district exceed the above
limitation.

The term "value of
the taxable property" as used in this section shall have the meaning set
forth in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. RCW 28A.530.020 (Bond
issuance--Election--Resolution to specify purposes) and 1996 c 48 s 1, 1990 c
33 s 478, 1984 c 186 s 11, 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 9, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.51.020 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect if
the proposed amendment to Article VII, section 2 and Article VIII, section 6 of
the state Constitution providing for a simple majority of voters voting to
authorize school district levies and bonds is validly submitted to and is
approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election and certified
by the secretary of state. If the proposed amendment is not approved,
ratified, and certified, this act is void in its entirety.

---
END ---