BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.075 and 2000 c
115 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An intermediate
license authorizes the holder to drive a motor vehicle under the conditions
specified in this section. An applicant for an intermediate license must be at
least sixteen years of age and:

(a) Have possessed a
valid instruction permit for a period of not less than six months;

(b) Have passed a
driver licensing examination administered by the department;

(c) Have passed a
course of driver's education in accordance with the standards established in
RCW 46.20.100;

(d) Present
certification by his or her parent, guardian, or employer to the department
stating (i) that the applicant has had at least fifty hours of driving
experience, ten of which were at night, during which the driver was supervised
by a person at least twenty-one years of age who has had a valid driver's
license for at least three years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been
issued a notice of traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is
pending at the time of the application for the intermediate license;

(e) Not have been
convicted of or found to have committed a traffic violation within the last six
months before the application for the intermediate license; and

(f) Not have been adjudicated
for an offense involving the use of alcohol or drugs during the period the
applicant held an instruction permit.

(2) For the first six
months after the issuance of an intermediate license or until the holder
reaches eighteen years of age, whichever occurs first, the holder of the
license may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying any passengers under
the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's immediate family as
defined in RCW 42.17.020. For the remaining period of the intermediate
license, the holder may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying more than
three passengers who are under the age of twenty who are not members of the
holder's immediate family.

(3) The holder of an
intermediate license may not operate a motor vehicle between the hours of 1
a.m. and 5 a.m. except when the holder is accompanied by ((a parent,
guardian, or)) a licensed driver who is at least twenty-five years of age or
has in his or her possession a note signed by a parent or guardian within the
preceding six months granting permission for the holder to operate a motor
vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m.

(4) It is a traffic
infraction for the holder of an intermediate license to operate a motor vehicle
in violation of the restrictions imposed under this section.

(5) Enforcement of this
section by law enforcement officers may be accomplished only as a secondary
action when a driver of a motor vehicle has been detained for a suspected
violation of this title or an equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.

(6) An intermediate
licensee may drive at any hour without restrictions on the number of passengers
in the vehicle if necessary for agricultural purposes.

(7) An intermediate
licensee may drive at any hour without restrictions on the number of passengers
in the vehicle if, for the twelve-month period following the issuance of the
intermediate license, he or she:

(a) Has not been
involved in an automobile accident; and

(b) Has not been
convicted or found to have committed a traffic offense described in chapter
46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed on an intermediate licensee under
this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.131.398 and 2000
c 115 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective June 30, 2009:

(1) 2000 c 115 s 1
(uncodified);

(2) RCW ((42.20.075))
46.20.075 and 2001 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act) & 2000 c
115 s 2;

(3) RCW 46.20.267 and
2000 c 115 s 3;

(4) The amendment of
RCW 46.20.105 by 2000 c 115 s 5;

(5) The amendment of
RCW 46.20.161 by 2000 c 115 s 6;

(6) The amendment of
RCW 46.20.311 by 2000 c 115 s 7;

(7) The amendment of
RCW 46.20.342 by 2000 c 115 s 8; and

(8) RCW
28A.220.070 and 2000 c 115 s 11.

---
END ---