BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.650 and 2000 c
28 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section
applies to offenders who have never been previously convicted of a felony in
this state, federal court, or another state, and who have never participated in
a program of deferred prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a
felony that is not:

(a) Classified as a
violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter; or

(b) ((Manufacture,
delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled
substance classified in Schedule I or II that is a narcotic drug or
flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV;

(c))) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with
intent to deliver a methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its
isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2)((; or

(d) The selling for
profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in
Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana)).

(2) In sentencing a
first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a sentence within the
standard sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up to ninety
days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract by the
county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section, which, in
addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include requirements that the
offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a) Devote time to a
specific employment or occupation;

(b) Undergo available
outpatient treatment for up to the period specified in subsection (3) of this
section, or inpatient treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement
for that offense;

(c) Pursue a
prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;

(e) Report as directed
to a community corrections officer; or

(f) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or
perform community service work.

(3) The terms and
statuses applicable to sentences under subsection (2) of this section are:

(a) For sentences
imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes committed before July 1, 2000, up
to one year of community supervision. If treatment is ordered, the period of
community supervision may include up to the period of treatment, but shall not
exceed two years; and

(b) For crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year of community custody unless
treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community custody may include
up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years. Any term of
community custody imposed under this section is subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2) and (3).

(4) The
department shall discharge from community supervision any offender sentenced
under this section before July 25, 1999, who has served at least one year of
community supervision and has completed any treatment ordered by the court.

--- END ---