BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known
and cited as the Washington life and disability insurance guaranty association
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. PURPOSE. (1) The purpose
of this chapter is to protect, subject to certain limitations, the persons
specified in section 3(1) of this act against failure in the performance of
contractual obligations, under life and disability insurance policies and
annuity contracts specified in section 3(2) of this act, because of the
impairment or insolvency of the member insurer that issued the policies or
contracts.

(2) To provide this
protection, an association of insurers is created to pay benefits and to
continue coverages as limited by this chapter, and members of the association
are subject to assessment to provide funds to carry out the purpose of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. COVERAGE AND LIMITATIONS.
(1) This chapter provides coverage for the policies and contracts specified in
subsection (2) of this section as follows:

(a) To persons who,
regardless of where they reside, except for nonresident certificate holders
under group policies or contracts, are the beneficiaries, assignees, or payees
of the persons covered under (b) of this subsection;

(b) To persons who are
owners of or certificate holders under the policies or contracts, other than
unallocated annuity contracts and structured settlement annuities, and in each
case who:

(i) Are residents; or

(ii) Are not residents,
but only under all of the following conditions:

(A) The insurer that
issued the policies or contracts is domiciled in this state;

(B) The states in which
the persons reside have associations similar to the association created by this
chapter; and

(C) The persons are not
eligible for coverage by an association in any other state due to the fact that
the insurer was not licensed in the state at the time specified in the state's
guaranty association law;

(c) For unallocated
annuity contracts specified in subsection (2) of this section, (a) and (b) of
this subsection do not apply, and this chapter, except as provided in (e) and
(f) of this subsection, does provide coverage to:

(i) Persons who are the
owners of the unallocated annuity contracts if the contracts are issued to or
in connection with a specific benefit plan whose plan sponsor has its principal
place of business in this state; and

(ii) Persons who are
owners of unallocated annuity contracts issued to or in connection with
government lotteries if the owners are residents;

(d) For structured
settlement annuities specified in subsection (2) of this section, (a) and (b)
of this subsection do not apply, and this chapter, except as provided in (e)
and (f) of this subsection, does provide coverage to a person who is a payee
under a structured settlement annuity, or beneficiary of a payee if the payee
is deceased, if the payee:

(i) Is a resident,
regardless of where the contract owner resides; or

(ii) Is not a resident,
but only under both of the following conditions:

(A)(I) The contract
owner of the structured settlement annuity is a resident; or

(II) The contract owner
of the structured settlement annuity is not a resident, but the insurer that
issued the structured settlement annuity is domiciled in this state; and the
state in which the contract owner resides has an association similar to the
association created by this chapter; and

(B) Neither the payee,
nor beneficiary, nor the contract owner is eligible for coverage by the
association of the state in which the payee or contract owner resides;

(e) This chapter does
not provide coverage to:

(i) A person who is a
payee, or beneficiary, of a contract owner resident of this state, if the
payee, or beneficiary, is afforded any coverage by the association of another
state; or

(ii) A person covered
under (c) of this subsection, if any coverage is provided by the association of
another state to the person; and

(f) This chapter is
intended to provide coverage to a person who is a resident of this state and,
in special circumstances, to a nonresident. In order to avoid duplicate
coverage, if a person who would otherwise receive coverage under this chapter
is provided coverage under the laws of any other state, the person shall not be
provided coverage under this chapter. In determining the application of this
subsection (1)(f) in situations where a person could be covered by the association
of more than one state, whether as an owner, payee, beneficiary, or assignee,
this chapter shall be construed in conjunction with other state laws to result
in coverage by only one association.

(2)(a) This chapter
provides coverage to the persons specified in subsection (1) of this section
for direct, nongroup life, disability, or annuity policies or contracts and
supplemental contracts to any of these, for certificates under direct group
policies and contracts, and for unallocated annuity contracts issued by member
insurers, except as limited by this chapter. Annuity contracts and
certificates under group annuity contracts include but are not limited to
guaranteed investment contracts, deposit administration contracts, unallocated
funding agreements, allocated funding agreements, structured settlement
annuities, annuities issued to or in connection with government lotteries, and
any immediate or deferred annuity contracts. However, any annuity contracts
that are unallocated annuity contracts are subject to the specific provisions
in this chapter for unallocated annuity contracts.

(b) This chapter does
not provide coverage for:

(i) A portion of a
policy or contract not guaranteed by the insurer, or under which the risk is
borne by the policy or contract owner;

(ii) A policy or
contract of reinsurance, unless assumption certificates have been issued
pursuant to the reinsurance policy or contract;

(iii) A portion of a
policy or contract to the extent that the rate of interest on which it is based,
or the interest rate, crediting rate, or similar factor determined by use of an
index or other external reference stated in the policy or contract employed in
calculating returns or changes in value:

(A) Averaged over the
period of four years prior to the date on which the member insurer becomes an
impaired or insolvent insurer under this chapter, whichever is earlier, exceeds
the rate of interest determined by subtracting two percentage points from
Moody's corporate bond yield average averaged for that same four‑year
period or for such lesser period if the policy or contract was issued less than
four years before the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer
under this chapter, whichever is earlier; and

(B) On and after the
date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under
this chapter, whichever is earlier, exceeds the rate of interest determined by
subtracting three percentage points from Moody's corporate bond yield average
as most recently available;

(iv) A portion of a
policy or contract issued to a plan or program of an employer, association, or
other person to provide life, disability, or annuity benefits to its employees,
members, or others, to the extent that the plan or program is self‑funded
or uninsured, including but not limited to benefits payable by an employer,
association, or other person under:

(A) A multiple employer
welfare arrangement as defined in 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1144;

(B) A minimum premium
group insurance plan;

(C) A stop‑loss
group insurance plan; or

(D) An administrative
services only contract;

(v) A portion of a
policy or contract to the extent that it provides for:

(A) Dividends or
experience rating credits;

(B) Voting rights; or

(C) Payment of any fees
or allowances to any person, including the policy or contract owner, in
connection with the service to or administration of the policy or contract;

(vi) A policy or
contract issued in this state by a member insurer at a time when it was not
licensed or did not have a certificate of authority to issue the policy or
contract in this state;

(vii) An unallocated
annuity contract issued to or in connection with a benefit plan protected under
the federal pension benefit guaranty corporation, regardless of whether the
federal pension benefit guaranty corporation has yet become liable to make any
payments with respect to the benefit plan;

(viii) A portion of an
unallocated annuity contract that is not issued to or in connection with a
specific employee, union, or association of natural persons benefit plan or a
government lottery;

(ix) A portion of a
policy or contract to the extent that the assessments required by section 9 of
this act with respect to the policy or contract are preempted by federal or
state law;

(x) An obligation that
does not arise under the express written terms of the policy or contract issued
by the insurer to the contract owner or policy owner, including without
limitation:

(A) Claims based on
marketing materials;

(B) Claims based on
side letters, riders, or other documents that were issued by the insurer
without meeting applicable policy form filing or approval requirements;

(C) Misrepresentations
of or regarding policy benefits;

(D) Extra‑contractual
claims; or

(E) A claim for
penalties or consequential or incidental damages;

(xi) A contractual
agreement that establishes the member insurer's obligations to provide a book
value accounting guaranty for defined contribution benefit plan participants by
reference to a portfolio of assets that is owned by the benefit plan or its
trustee, which in each case is not an affiliate of the member insurer; or

(xii) A portion of a
policy or contract to the extent it provides for interest or other changes in
value to be determined by the use of an index or other external reference
stated in the policy or contract, but which have not been credited to the
policy or contract, or as to which the policy or contract owner's rights are
subject to forfeiture, as of the date the member insurer becomes an impaired or
insolvent insurer under this chapter, whichever is earlier. If a policy's or
contract's interest or changes in value are credited less frequently than
annually, then for purposes of determining the values that have been credited
and are not subject to forfeiture under this subsection (2)(b)(xii), the
interest or change in value determined by using the procedures defined in the
policy or contract will be credited as if the contractual date of crediting
interest or changing values was the date of impairment or insolvency, whichever
is earlier, and will not be subject to forfeiture.

(3) The benefits that
the association may become obligated to cover shall in no event exceed the
lesser of:

(a) The contractual
obligations for which the insurer is liable or would have been liable if it
were not an impaired or insolvent insurer; or

(b)(i) With respect to
one life, regardless of the number of policies or contracts:

(A) Five hundred
thousand dollars in life insurance death benefits, but not more than five
hundred thousand dollars in net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values
for life insurance;

(B) In disability
insurance benefits:

(I) Five hundred
thousand dollars for coverages not defined as disability income insurance or
basic hospital, medical, and surgical insurance or major medical insurance
including any net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values;

(II) Five hundred
thousand dollars for disability income insurance;

(III) Five hundred
thousand dollars for basic hospital medical and surgical insurance or major
medical insurance; or

(C) Five hundred
thousand dollars in the present value of annuity benefits, including net cash
surrender and net cash withdrawal values, except as provided in (ii), (iii),
and (v) of this subsection (3)(b);

(ii) With respect to
each individual participating in a governmental retirement benefit plan
established under section 401, 403(b), or 457 of the United States Internal
Revenue Code covered by an unallocated annuity contract or the beneficiaries of
each such individual if deceased, in the aggregate, one hundred thousand
dollars in present value annuity benefits, including net cash surrender and net
cash withdrawal values;

(iii) With respect to
each payee of a structured settlement annuity, or beneficiary or beneficiaries
of the payee if deceased, five hundred thousand dollars in present value
annuity benefits, in the aggregate, including net cash surrender and net cash
withdrawal values, if any;

(iv) However, in no
event shall the association be obligated to cover more than: (A) An aggregate
of five hundred thousand dollars in benefits with respect to any one life under
(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection (3)(b) except with respect to benefits
for basic hospital, medical, and surgical insurance and major medical insurance
under (i)(B) of this subsection (3)(b), in which case the aggregate liability
of the association shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars with respect
to any one individual; or (B) with respect to one owner of multiple
nongroup policies of life insurance, whether the policy owner is an individual,
firm, corporation, or other person, and whether the persons insured are
officers, managers, employees, or other persons, more than five million dollars
in benefits, regardless of the number of policies and contracts held by the
owner;

(v) With respect to
either: (A) One contract owner provided coverage under subsection (1)(d)(ii)
of this section; or (B) one plan sponsor whose plans own directly or in
trust one or more unallocated annuity contracts not included in (ii) of this
subsection (3)(b), five million dollars in benefits, irrespective of the number
of contracts with respect to the contract owner or plan sponsor. However, in
the case where one or more unallocated annuity contracts are covered contracts
under this chapter and are owned by a trust or other entity for the benefit of
two or more plan sponsors, coverage shall be afforded by the association if the
largest interest in the trust or entity owning the contract or contracts is
held by a plan sponsor whose principal place of business is in this state and
in no event shall the association be obligated to cover more than five million
dollars in benefits with respect to all these unallocated contracts; or

(vi) The limitations
set forth in this subsection are limitations on the benefits for which the
association is obligated before taking into account either its subrogation and
assignment rights or the extent to which those benefits could be provided out of
the assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer attributable to covered
policies. The costs of the association's obligations under this chapter may be
met by the use of assets attributable to covered policies or reimbursed to the
association pursuant to its subrogation and assignment rights.

(4) In performing its
obligations to provide coverage under section 8 of this act, the association is
not required to guarantee, assume, reinsure, or perform, or cause to be
guaranteed, assumed, reinsured, or performed, the contractual obligations of
the insolvent or impaired insurer under a covered policy or contract that do
not materially affect the economic values or economic benefits of the covered
policy or contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. CONSTRUCTION. This
chapter shall be construed to effect the purpose under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Account"
means either of the two accounts created under section 6 of this act.

(2)
"Association" means the Washington life and disability insurance
guaranty association created under section 6 of this act.

(3) "Authorized
assessment" or the term "authorized" when used in the context of
assessments means a resolution by the board of directors has been passed
whereby an assessment will be called immediately or in the future from member
insurers for a specified amount. An assessment is authorized when the
resolution is passed.

(4) "Benefit
plan" means a specific employee, union, or association of natural persons
benefit plan.

(5) "Called
assessment" or the term "called" when used in the context of
assessments means that a notice has been issued by the association to member
insurers requiring that an authorized assessment be paid within the time frame
set forth within the notice. An authorized assessment becomes a called
assessment when notice is mailed by the association to member insurers.

(6)
"Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.

(7) "Contractual
obligation" means an obligation under a policy or contract or certificate
under a group policy or contract, or portion thereof for which coverage is
provided under section 3 of this act.

(8) "Covered
policy" means a policy or contract or portion of a policy or contract for
which coverage is provided under section 3 of this act.

(9) "Extra‑contractual
claims" includes, for example, claims relating to bad faith in the payment
of claims, punitive or exemplary damages, or attorneys' fees and costs.

(10) "Impaired
insurer" means a member insurer which, after the effective date of this
section, is not an insolvent insurer, and is placed under an order of
rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(11) "Insolvent
insurer" means a member insurer which, after the effective date of this
section, is placed under an order of liquidation by a court of competent
jurisdiction with a finding of insolvency.

(12) "Member
insurer" means an insurer licensed, or that holds a certificate of
authority, to transact in this state any kind of insurance for which coverage
is provided under section 3 of this act, and includes an insurer whose license
or certificate of authority in this state may have been suspended, revoked, not
renewed, or voluntarily withdrawn, but does not include:

(a) A health care
service contractor, whether profit or nonprofit;

(b) A health
maintenance organization;

(c) A fraternal benefit
society;

(d) A mandatory state
pooling plan;

(e) A mutual assessment
company or other person that operates on an assessment basis;

(f) An insurance
exchange;

(g) An organization
that has a certificate or license limited to the issuance of charitable gift
annuities under RCW 48.38.010; or

(h) An entity similar
to (a) through (g) of this subsection.

(13) "Moody's
corporate bond yield average" means the monthly average corporates as
published by Moody's investors service, inc., or any successor thereto.

(14) "Owner"
of a policy or contract and "policy owner" and "contract
owner" mean the person who is identified as the legal owner under the
terms of the policy or contract or who is otherwise vested with legal title to
the policy or contract through a valid assignment completed in accordance with
the terms of the policy or contract and properly recorded as the owner on the
books of the insurer. "Owner," "contract owner," and
"policy owner" do not include persons with a mere beneficial interest
in a policy or contract.

(15) "Person"
means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership,
association, governmental body or entity, or voluntary organization.

(16) "Plan
sponsor" means:

(a) The employer in the
case of a benefit plan established or maintained by a single employer;

(b) The employee
organization in the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by an
employee organization; or

(c) In the case of a
benefit plan established or maintained by two or more employers or jointly by
one or more employers and one or more employee organizations, the association,
committee, joint board of trustees, or other similar group of representatives
of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan.

(17)
"Premiums" means amounts or considerations, by whatever name called,
received on covered policies or contracts less returned premiums,
considerations, and deposits and less dividends and experience credits.
"Premiums" does not include amounts or considerations received for
policies or contracts or for the portions of policies or contracts for which
coverage is not provided under section 3(2) of this act, except that assessable
premium shall not be reduced on account of sections 3(2)(b)(iii) of this act
relating to interest limitations and section 3(3)(b) of this act relating to
limitations with respect to one individual, one participant, and one contract
owner. "Premiums" does not include:

(a) Premiums in excess
of five million dollars on an unallocated annuity contract not issued under a
governmental retirement benefit plan, or its trustee, established under section
401, 403(b), or 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code; or

(b) With respect to
multiple nongroup policies of life insurance owned by one owner, whether the
policy owner is an individual, firm, corporation, or other person, and whether
the persons insured are officers, managers, employees, or other persons,
premiums in excess of five million dollars with respect to these policies or
contracts, regardless of the number of policies or contracts held by the owner.

(18)(a) "Principal
place of business" of a plan sponsor or a person other than a natural
person means the single state in which the natural persons who establish policy
for the direction, control, and coordination of the operations of the entity as
a whole primarily exercise that function, determined by the association in its
reasonable judgment by considering the following factors:

(i) The state in which
the primary executive and administrative headquarters of the entity is located;

(ii) The state in which
the principal office of the chief executive officer of the entity is located;

(iii) The state in
which the board of directors, or similar governing person or persons, of the
entity conducts the majority of its meetings;

(iv) The state in which
the executive or management committee of the board of directors, or similar
governing person or persons, of the entity conducts the majority of its
meetings;

(v) The state from
which the management of the overall operations of the entity is directed; and

(vi) In the case of a
benefit plan sponsored by affiliated companies comprising a consolidated
corporation, the state in which the holding company or controlling affiliate
has its principal place of business as determined using the factors in (a)(i)
through (v) of this subsection.

However, in the case of
a plan sponsor, if more than fifty percent of the participants in the benefit
plan are employed in a single state, that state is the principal place of
business of the plan sponsor.

(b) The principal place
of business of a plan sponsor of a benefit plan described in subsection (16)(c)
of this section is the principal place of business of the association,
committee, joint board of trustees, or other similar group of representatives
of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan that, in lieu of a
specific or clear designation of a principal place of business, is the
principal place of business of the employer or employee organization that has
the largest investment in the benefit plan in question.

(19) "Receivership
court" means the court in the insolvent or impaired insurer's state having
jurisdiction over the conservation, rehabilitation, or liquidation of the
insurer.

(20)
"Resident" means a person to whom a contractual obligation is owed
and who resides in this state on the date of entry of a court order that
determines a member insurer to be an impaired insurer or a court order that
determines a member insurer to be an insolvent insurer, whichever occurs
first. A person may be a resident of only one state, which in the case of a
person other than a natural person is its principal place of business.
Citizens of the United States that are either (a) residents of foreign
countries, or (b) residents of United States possessions, territories, or protectorates
that do not have an association similar to the association created by this
chapter, are residents of the state of domicile of the insurer that issued the
policies or contracts.

(21) "Structured
settlement annuity" means an annuity purchased in order to fund periodic
payments for a plaintiff or other claimant in payment for or with respect to
personal injury suffered by the plaintiff or other claimant.

(22) "State"
means a state, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and a United States possession,
territory, or protectorate.

(23) "Supplemental
contract" means a written agreement entered into for the distribution of
proceeds under a life, disability, or annuity policy or contract.

(24) "Unallocated
annuity contract" means an annuity contract or group annuity certificate
which is not issued to and owned by an individual, except to the extent of any
annuity benefits guaranteed to an individual by an insurer under the contract
or certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. CREATION OF THE
ASSOCIATION. (1) There is created a nonprofit unincorporated legal entity to
be known as the Washington life and disability insurance guaranty association
which is composed of the commissioner ex officio and each member insurer. All
member insurers must be and remain members of the association as a condition of
their authority to transact insurance in this state. The association shall
perform its functions under the plan of operation established and approved
under section 10 of this act and shall exercise its powers through a board of
directors established under section 7 of this act. For purposes of
administration and assessment, the association shall maintain two accounts:

(a) The life insurance
and annuity account which includes the following subaccounts:

(i) Life insurance
account;

(ii) Annuity account
which includes annuity contracts owned by a governmental retirement plan, or
its trustee, established under section 401, 403(b), or 457 of the United States
Internal Revenue Code, but otherwise excludes unallocated annuities; and

(iii) Unallocated
annuity account, which excludes contracts owned by a governmental retirement
benefit plan, or its trustee, established under section 401, 403(b), or 457 of
the United States Internal Revenue Code; and

(b) The disability
insurance account.

(2) The association is
under the immediate supervision of the commissioner and is subject to the
applicable provisions of the insurance laws of this state. Meetings or records
of the association may be opened to the public upon majority vote of the board
of directors of the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. BOARD OF DIRECTORS. (1)
The board of directors of the association consists of the commissioner ex
officio and not less than five nor more than nine member insurers serving terms
as established in the plan of operation. The insurer members of the board are
selected by member insurers subject to the approval of the commissioner.

Vacancies on the board
are filled for the remaining period of the term by a majority vote of the
remaining board members, subject to the approval of the commissioner.

(2) In approving
selections or in appointing members to the board, the commissioner shall
consider, among other things, whether all member insurers are fairly
represented.

(3) Members of the
board may be reimbursed from the assets of the association for expenses
incurred by them as members of the board of directors but members of the board
are not otherwise compensated by the association for their services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE
ASSOCIATION. (1) If a member insurer is an impaired insurer, the association
may, in its discretion, and subject to any conditions imposed by the
association that do not impair the contractual obligations of the impaired
insurer and that are approved by the commissioner:

(a) Guaranty, assume,
or reinsure, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, or reinsured, any or all of
the policies or contracts of the impaired insurer; or

(b) Provide such
moneys, pledges, loans, notes, guarantees, or other means as are proper to
effectuate (a) of this subsection and assure payment of the contractual
obligations of the impaired insurer pending action under (a) of this
subsection.

(2) If a member insurer
is an insolvent insurer, the association shall, in its discretion, either:

(a)(i)(A) Guaranty,
assume, or reinsure, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, or reinsured, the
policies or contracts of the insolvent insurer; or

(B) Assure payment of
the contractual obligations of the insolvent insurer; and

(ii) Provide moneys,
pledges, loans, notes, guarantees, or other means reasonably necessary to
discharge the association's duties; or

(b) Provide benefits
and coverages in accordance with the following provisions:

(i) With respect to
life and disability insurance policies and annuities, assure payment of
benefits for premiums identical to the premiums and benefits, except for terms
of conversion and renewability, that would have been payable under the policies
or contracts of the insolvent insurer, for claims incurred:

(A) With respect to
group policies and contracts, not later than the earlier of the next renewal
date under those policies or contracts or forty‑five days, but in no
event less than thirty days, after the date on which the association becomes
obligated with respect to the policies and contracts;

(B) With respect to
nongroup policies, contracts, and annuities not later than the earlier of the
next renewal date, if any, under the policies or contracts or one year, but in
no event less than thirty days, from the date on which the association becomes
obligated with respect to the policies or contracts;

(ii) Make diligent
efforts to provide all known insureds or annuitants, for nongroup policies and
contracts, or group policy owners with respect to group policies and contracts,
thirty days notice of the termination of the benefits provided;

(iii) With respect to
nongroup life and disability insurance policies and annuities covered by the
association, make diligent efforts to make available to each known insured or
annuitant, or owner if other than the insured or annuitant, and with respect to
an individual formerly insured or formerly an annuitant under a group policy
who is not eligible for replacement group coverage, make diligent efforts to
make available substitute coverage on an individual basis in accordance with
the provisions of (b)(iv) of this subsection, if the insureds or annuitants had
a right under law or the terminated policy or annuity to convert coverage to
individual coverage or to continue an individual policy or annuity in force
until a specified age or for a specified time, during which the insurer had no
right unilaterally to make changes in any provision of the policy or annuity or
had a right only to make changes in premium by class;

(iv)(A) The substitute
coverage under (b)(iii) of this subsection, must be offered through a solvent,
admitted insurer. In the alternative, the association in its discretion, and
subject to any conditions imposed by the association and approved by the
commissioner, may reissue the terminated coverage;

(B) Substituted
coverage must be offered without requiring evidence of insurability, and may
not provide for any waiting period or exclusion that would not have applied under
the terminated policy;

(C) The association may
reinsure any reissued policy;

(v) If the association
elects to reissue terminated coverage at a premium rate different from that
charged under the terminated policy, the premium must be set by the association
in accordance with the amount of insurance provided and the age and class of risk,
subject to approval of the domiciliary insurance commissioner and the
receivership court;

(vi) The association's
obligations with respect to coverage under any policy of the impaired or
insolvent insurer or under any reissued policy cease on the date the coverage
or policy is replaced by another similar policy by the policy owner, the
insured, or the association; or

(vii) When proceeding
under this subsection (2)(b) with respect to a policy or contract carrying
guaranteed minimum interest rates, the association shall assure the payment or
crediting of a rate of interest consistent with section 3(2)(b)(iii) of this
act.

(3) Nonpayment of
premiums within thirty‑one days after the date required under the terms
of any guaranteed, assumed, or reissued policy or contract or substitute
coverage terminates the association's obligations under the policy or coverage
under this chapter with respect to the policy or coverage, except with respect
to any claims incurred or any net cash surrender value which may be due in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(4) Premiums due for
coverage after entry of an order of liquidation of an insolvent insurer belong
to and are payable at the direction of the association, and the association is
liable for unearned premiums due to policy or contract owners arising after the
entry of the order.

(5) The protection
provided by this chapter does not apply when any guaranty protection is
provided to residents of this state by the laws of the domiciliary state or
jurisdiction of the impaired or insolvent insurer other than this state.

(6) In carrying out its
duties under subsection (2) of this section, the association may:

(a) Subject to approval
by a court in this state, impose permanent policy or contract liens in connection
with a guarantee, assumption, or reinsurance agreement, if the association
finds that the amounts which can be assessed under this chapter are less than
the amounts needed to assure full and prompt performance of the association's
duties under this chapter, or that the economic or financial conditions as they
affect member insurers are sufficiently adverse to render the imposition of
such permanent policy or contract liens, are in the public interest; and

(b) Subject to approval
by a court in this state, impose temporary moratoriums or liens on payments of
cash values and policy loans, or any other right to withdraw funds held in
conjunction with policies or contracts, in addition to any contractual
provisions for deferral of cash or policy loan value. In addition, in the
event of a temporary moratorium or moratorium charge imposed by the
receivership court on payment of cash values or policy loans, or on any other
right to withdraw funds held in conjunction with policies or contracts, out of
the assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer, the association may defer the
payment of cash values, policy loans, or other rights by the association for
the period of the moratorium or moratorium charge imposed by the receivership
court, except for claims covered by the association to be paid in accordance
with a hardship procedure established by the liquidator or rehabilitator and
approved by the receivership court.

(7) A deposit in this
state, held pursuant to law or required by the commissioner for the benefit of
creditors, including policy owners, not turned over to the domiciliary
liquidator upon the entry of a final order of liquidation or order approving a
rehabilitation plan of an insurer domiciled in this state or in a reciprocal
state, under RCW 48.31.171, shall be promptly paid to the association. The
association is entitled to retain a portion of any amount so paid to it equal
to the percentage determined by dividing the aggregate amount of policy owners
claims related to that insolvency for which the association has provided
statutory benefits by the aggregate amount of all policy owners' claims in this
state related to that insolvency and shall remit to the domiciliary receiver
the amount so paid to the association and not retained under this subsection.
Any amount so paid to the association less the amount not retained by it shall
be treated as a distribution of estate assets under RCW 48.31.185 or similar
provision of the state of domicile of the impaired or insolvent insurer.

(8) If the association
fails to act within a reasonable period of time with respect to an insolvent
insurer, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the commissioner has
the powers and duties of the association under this chapter with respect to the
insolvent insurer.

(9) The association may
render assistance and advice to the commissioner, upon the commissioner's
request, concerning rehabilitation, payment of claims, continuance of coverage,
or the performance of other contractual obligations of an impaired or insolvent
insurer.

(10) The association
has standing to appear or intervene before a court or agency in this state with
jurisdiction over an impaired or insolvent insurer concerning which the
association is or may become obligated under this chapter or with jurisdiction
over any person or property against which the association may have rights
through subrogation or otherwise. Standing extends to all matters germane to
the powers and duties of the association, including, but not limited to,
proposals for reinsuring, modifying, or guaranteeing the policies or contracts
of the impaired or insolvent insurer and the determination of the policies or
contracts and contractual obligations. The association also has the right to
appear or intervene before a court or agency in another state with jurisdiction
over an impaired or insolvent insurer for which the association is or may
become obligated or with jurisdiction over any person or property against whom
the association may have rights through subrogation or otherwise.

(11)(a) A person
receiving benefits under this chapter is deemed to have assigned the rights
under, and any causes of action against any person for losses arising under,
resulting from, or otherwise relating to, the covered policy or contract to the
association to the extent of the benefits received because of this chapter,
whether the benefits are payments of or on account of contractual obligations,
continuation of coverage, or provision of substitute or alternative coverages.
The association may require an assignment to it of such rights and cause of
action by any payee, policy or contract owner, beneficiary, insured, or
annuitant as a condition precedent to the receipt of any right or benefits
conferred by this chapter upon the person.

(b) The subrogation
rights of the association under this subsection have the same priority against
the assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer as that possessed by the person
entitled to receive benefits under this chapter.

(c) In addition to (a)
and (b) of this subsection, the association has all common law rights of
subrogation and any other equitable or legal remedy that would have been
available to the impaired or insolvent insurer or owner, beneficiary, or payee
of a policy or contract with respect to the policy or contracts, including
without limitation, in the case of a structured settlement annuity, any rights
of the owner, beneficiary, or payee of the annuity, to the extent of benefits
received under this chapter, against a person originally or by succession
responsible for the losses arising from the personal injury relating to the
annuity or payment therefor, excepting any such person responsible solely by
reason of serving as an assignee in respect of a qualified assignment under
section 130 of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

(d) If (a) through (c)
of this subsection are invalid or ineffective with respect to any person or
claim for any reason, the amount payable by the association with respect to the
related covered obligations shall be reduced by the amount realized by any
other person with respect to the person or claim that is attributable to the
policies, or portion thereof, covered by the association.

(e) If the association
has provided benefits with respect to a covered obligation and a person
recovers amounts as to which the association has rights as described in this
subsection, the person shall pay to the association the portion of the recovery
attributable to the policies, or portion thereof, covered by the association.

(12) In addition to the
rights and powers elsewhere in this chapter, the association may:

(a) Enter into such
contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and purposes
of this chapter;

(b) Sue or be sued,
including taking any legal actions necessary or proper to recover any unpaid
assessments under section 9 of this act and to settle claims or potential
claims against it;

(c) Borrow money to
effect the purposes of this chapter; any notes or other evidence of
indebtedness of the association not in default are legal investments for
domestic insurers and may be carried as admitted assets;

(d) Employ or retain
such persons as are necessary or appropriate to handle the financial
transactions of the association, and to perform such other functions as become
necessary or proper under this chapter;

(e) Take such legal
action as may be necessary or appropriate to avoid or recover payment of
improper claims;

(f) Exercise, for the
purposes of this chapter and to the extent approved by the commissioner, the
powers of a domestic life or disability insurer, but in no case may the
association issue insurance policies or annuity contracts other than those
issued to perform its obligations under this chapter;

(g) Organize itself as
a corporation or in other legal form permitted by the laws of the state;

(h) Request information
from a person seeking coverage from the association in order to aid the
association in determining its obligations under this chapter with respect to
the person, and the person shall promptly comply with the request; and

(i) Take other
necessary or appropriate action to discharge its duties and obligations under
this chapter or to exercise its powers under this chapter.

(13) The association
may join an organization of one or more other state associations of similar
purposes, to further the purposes and administer the powers and duties of the
association.

(14)(a) At any time
within one year after the coverage date, which is the date on which the
association becomes responsible for the obligations of a member insurer, the
association may elect to succeed to the rights and obligations of the member
insurer, that accrue on or after the coverage date and that relate to contracts
covered, in whole or in part, by the association, under any one or more
indemnity reinsurance agreements entered into by the member insurer as a ceding
insurer and selected by the association. However, the association may not
exercise an election with respect to a reinsurance agreement if the receiver,
rehabilitator, or liquidator of the member insurer has previously and expressly
disaffirmed the reinsurance agreement. The election is effective when notice
is provided to the receiver, rehabilitator, or liquidator and to the affected
reinsurers. If the association makes an election, the following provisions
apply with respect to the agreements selected by the association:

(i) The association is
responsible for all unpaid premiums due under the agreements, for periods both
before and after the coverage date, and is responsible for the performance of
all other obligations to be performed after the coverage date, in each case
which relate to contracts covered, in whole or in part, by the association.
The association may charge contracts covered in part by the association,
through reasonable allocation methods, the costs for reinsurance in excess of
the obligations of the association;

(ii) The association is
entitled to any amounts payable by the reinsurer under the agreements with
respect to losses or events that occur in periods after the coverage date and
that relate to contracts covered by the association, in whole or in part.
However, upon receipt of any such amounts, the association is obliged to pay to
the beneficiary under the policy or contract on account of which the amounts
were paid a portion of the amount equal to the excess of: The amount received
by the association, over the benefits paid by the association on account of the
policy or contract, less the retention of the impaired or insolvent member
insurer applicable to the loss or event;

(iii) Within thirty
days following the association's election, the association and each indemnity
reinsurer shall calculate the net balance due to or from the association under
each reinsurance agreement as of the date of the association's election, giving
full credit to all items paid by either the member insurer, or its receiver,
rehabilitator, or liquidator, or the indemnity reinsurer during the period
between the coverage date and the date of the association's election. Either
the association or indemnity reinsurer shall pay the net balance due the other
within five days of the completion of this calculation. If the receiver,
rehabilitator, or liquidator has received any amounts due the association
pursuant to (a)(ii) of this subsection, the receiver, rehabilitator, or
liquidator shall remit the same to the association as promptly as practicable;
and

(iv) If the
association, within sixty days of the election, pays the premiums due for
periods both before and after the coverage date that relate to contracts
covered by the association, in whole or in part, the reinsurer is not entitled
to terminate the reinsurance agreements, insofar as the agreements relate to
contracts covered by the association, in whole or in part, and is not entitled
to set off any unpaid premium due for periods prior to the coverage date
against amounts due the association.

(b) In the event the
association transfers its obligations to another insurer, and if the
association and the other insurer agree, the other insurer succeeds to the
rights and obligations of the association under (a) of this subsection
effective as of the date agreed upon by the association and the other insurer
and regardless of whether the association has made the election referred to in
(a) of this subsection. However:

(i) The indemnity
reinsurance agreements automatically terminate for new reinsurance unless the
indemnity reinsurer and the other insurer agree to the contrary;

(ii) The obligations
described in (a)(ii) of this subsection no longer apply on and after the date
the indemnity reinsurance agreement is transferred to the third party insurer;
and

(iii) This subsection
(14)(b) does not apply if the association has previously expressly determined
in writing that it will not exercise the election referred to in (a) of this
subsection;

(c) The provisions of
this subsection supersede the provisions of any law of this state or of any
affected reinsurance agreement that provides for or requires any payment of
reinsurance proceeds, on account of losses or events that occur in periods
after the coverage date, to the receiver, liquidator, or rehabilitator of the
insolvent member insurer. The receiver, rehabilitator, or liquidator remains
entitled to any amounts payable by the reinsurer under the reinsurance
agreement with respect to losses or events that occur in periods prior to the
coverage date, subject to applicable setoff provisions; and

(d) Except as set forth
under this subsection, this subsection does not alter or modify the terms and
conditions of the indemnity reinsurance agreements of the insolvent member
insurer. This subsection does not abrogate or limit any rights of any
reinsurer to claim that it is entitled to rescind a reinsurance agreement.
This subsection does not give a policy owner or beneficiary an independent
cause of action against an indemnity reinsurer that is not otherwise set forth
in the indemnity reinsurance agreement.

(15) The board of
directors of the association has discretion and may exercise reasonable
business judgment to determine the means by which the association provides the
benefits of this chapter in an economical and efficient manner.

(16) When the
association has arranged or offered to provide the benefits of this chapter to
a covered person under a plan or arrangement that fulfills the association's
obligations under this chapter, the person is not entitled to benefits from the
association in addition to or other than those provided under the plan or
arrangement.

(17) Venue in a suit
against the association arising under this chapter is in the county in which
liquidation or rehabilitation proceedings have been filed in the case of a
domestic insurer. In other cases, venue is in King county or Thurston county.
The association is not required to give an appeal bond in an appeal that
relates to a cause of action arising under this chapter.

(18) In carrying out
its duties in connection with guaranteeing, assuming, or reinsuring policies or
contracts under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the association may,
subject to approval of the receivership court, issue substitute coverage for a
policy or contract that provides an interest rate, crediting rate, or similar
factor determined by use of an index or other external reference stated in the
policy or contract employed in calculating returns or changes in value by
issuing an alternative policy or contract in accordance with the following provisions:

(a) In lieu of the
index or other external reference provided for in the original policy or
contract, the alternative policy or contract provides for: (i) A fixed
interest rate; (ii) payment of dividends with minimum guarantees; or
(iii) a different method for calculating interest or changes in value;

(b) There is no
requirement for evidence of insurability, waiting period, or other exclusion
that would not have applied under the replaced policy or contract; and

(c) The alternative
policy or contract is substantially similar to the replaced policy or contract
in all other material terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. ASSESSMENTS. (1) For the
purpose of providing the funds necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the
association, the board of directors shall assess the member insurers,
separately for each account, at such time and for such amounts as the board
finds necessary. Assessments are due not less than thirty days after prior
written notice to the member insurers and accrue interest at twelve percent per
annum on and after the due date.

(2) There are two
classes of assessments, as follows:

(a) Class A assessments
are authorized and called for the purpose of meeting administrative and legal
costs and other expenses. Class A assessments may be authorized and called
whether or not related to a particular impaired or insolvent insurer; and

(b) Class B assessments
are authorized and called to the extent necessary to carry out the powers and
duties of the association under section 8 of this act with regard to an
impaired or an insolvent insurer.

(3)(a) The amount of a
class A assessment is determined by the board and may be authorized and called
on a pro rata or nonpro rata basis. If pro rata, the board may provide that it
be credited against future class B assessments. The total of all nonpro rata
assessments may not exceed one hundred fifty dollars per member insurer in any
one calendar year. The amount of a class B assessment may be allocated for
assessment purposes among the accounts pursuant to an allocation formula which
may be based on the premiums or reserves of the impaired or insolvent insurer
or any other standard determined by the board to be fair and reasonable under
the circumstances.

(b) Class B assessments
against member insurers for each account and subaccount must be in the
proportion that the premiums received on business in this state by each
assessed member insurer on policies or contracts covered by each account for
the three most recent calendar years for which information is available
preceding the year in which the insurer became insolvent or, in the case of an
assessment with respect to an impaired insurer, the three most recent calendar
years for which information is available preceding the year in which the
insurer became impaired, bears to premiums received on business in this state
for those calendar years by all assessed member insurers.

(c) Assessments for
funds to meet the requirements of the association with respect to an impaired
or insolvent insurer may not be authorized or called until necessary to
implement the purposes of this chapter. Classification of assessments under
subsection (2) of this section and computation of assessments under this
subsection must be made with a reasonable degree of accuracy, recognizing that
exact determinations are not always possible. The association shall notify
each member insurer of its anticipated pro rata share of an authorized
assessment not yet called within one hundred eighty days after the assessment
is authorized.

(4) The association may
abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member insurer if, in
the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the ability
of the member insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations. In the event an
assessment against a member insurer is abated, or deferred in whole or in part,
the amount by which the assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed
against the other member insurers in a manner consistent with the basis for
assessments set forth in this section. Once the conditions that caused a
deferral have been removed or rectified, the member insurer shall pay all
assessments that were deferred pursuant to a repayment plan approved by the
association.

(5)(a)(i) Subject to
the provisions of (a)(ii) of this subsection, the total of all assessments
authorized by the association with respect to a member insurer for each
subaccount of the life insurance and annuity account and for the health account
may not in one calendar year exceed two percent of that member insurer's
average annual premiums received in this state on the policies and contracts
covered by the subaccount or account during the three calendar years preceding
the year in which the insurer became an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(ii) If two or more
assessments are authorized in one calendar year with respect to insurers that
become impaired or insolvent in different calendar years, the average annual
premiums for purposes of the aggregate assessment percentage limitation in
(a)(i) of this subsection must be equal and limited to the higher of the three‑year
average annual premiums for the applicable subaccount or account as calculated
under this section.

(iii) If the maximum
assessment, together with the other assets of the association in an account,
does not provide in one year in either account an amount sufficient to carry
out the responsibilities of the association, the necessary additional funds
must be assessed as soon thereafter as permitted by this chapter.

(b) The board may
provide in the plan of operation a method of allocating funds among claims,
whether relating to one or more impaired or insolvent insurers, when the
maximum assessment is insufficient to cover anticipated claims.

(c) If the maximum
assessment for a subaccount of the life and annuity account in one year does
not provide an amount sufficient to carry out the responsibilities of the
association, then under subsection (3)(b) of this section, the board shall
access the other subaccounts of the life and annuity account for the necessary
additional amount, subject to the maximum stated in (a) of this subsection.

(6) The board may, by
an equitable method as established in the plan of operation, refund to member
insurers, in proportion to the contribution of each insurer to that account,
the amount by which the assets of the account exceed the amount the board finds
is necessary to carry out during the coming year the obligations of the
association with regard to that account, including assets accruing from
assignment, subrogation, net realized gains, and income from investments. A
reasonable amount may be retained in any account to provide funds for the continuing
expenses of the association and for future losses claims.

(7) Any member insurer
may when determining its premium rates and policy owner dividends, as to any
kind of insurance within the scope of this chapter, consider the amount
reasonably necessary to meet its assessment obligations under this chapter.

(8) The association
shall issue to each insurer paying an assessment under this chapter, other than
a class A assessment, a certificate of contribution, in a form prescribed by
the commissioner, for the amount of the assessment paid. All outstanding
certificates must be of equal dignity and priority without reference to amounts
or dates of issue. A certificate of contribution may be shown by the insurer
in its financial statement as an asset in such form and for such amount, if
any, and period of time as the commissioner may approve.

(9)(a) A member insurer
that wishes to protest all or part of an assessment shall pay when due the full
amount of the assessment as set forth in the notice provided by the
association. The payment is available to meet association obligations during
the pendency of the protest or any subsequent appeal. Payment must be
accompanied by a statement in writing that the payment is made under protest
and setting forth a brief statement of the grounds for the protest.

(b) Within sixty days
following the payment of an assessment under protest by a member insurer, the
association shall notify the member insurer in writing of its determination
with respect to the protest unless the association notifies the member insurer
that additional time is required to resolve the issues raised by the protest.

(c) Within thirty days
after a final decision has been made, the association shall notify the
protesting member insurer in writing of that final decision. Within sixty days
of receipt of notice of the final decision, the protesting member insurer may
appeal that final action to the commissioner.

(d) In the alternative
to rendering a final decision with respect to a protest based on a question
regarding the assessment base, the association may refer protests to the
commissioner for a final decision, with or without a recommendation from the
association.

(e) If the protest or
appeal on the assessment is upheld, the amount paid in error or excess must be
returned to the member company. Interest on a refund due a protesting member
must be paid at the rate actually earned by the association.

(10) The association
may request information of member insurers in order to aid in the exercise of its
power under this section and member insurers shall promptly comply with a
request.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. PLAN OF OPERATION.
(1)(a) The association shall submit to the commissioner a plan of operation and
any amendments necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable, and
equitable administration of the association. The plan of operation and any
amendments are effective upon the commissioner's written approval or unless it
has not been disapproved within thirty days.

(b) If the association
fails to submit a suitable plan of operation within one hundred twenty days
following the effective date of this section or if at any time thereafter the
association fails to submit suitable amendments to the plan, the commissioner
shall, after notice and hearing, adopt reasonable rules as necessary or
advisable to effectuate the provisions of this chapter. The rules continue in
force until modified by the commissioner or superseded by a plan submitted by
the association and approved by the commissioner.

(2) All member insurers
shall comply with the plan of operation.

(3) The plan of
operation must, in addition to requirements enumerated elsewhere in this
chapter:

(a) Establish
procedures for handling the assets of the association;

(b) Establish the
amount and method of reimbursing members of the board of directors under
section 7 of this act;

(c) Establish regular
places and times for meetings including telephone conference calls of the board
of directors;

(d) Establish
procedures for records to be kept of all financial transactions of the
association, its agents, and the board of directors;

(e) Establish the
procedures whereby selections for the board of directors are made and submitted
to the commissioner;

(f) Establish any
additional procedures for assessments under section 9 of this act; and

(g) Contain additional
provisions necessary or proper for the execution of the powers and duties of
the association.

(4) The plan of
operation may provide that any or all powers and duties of the association,
except those under sections 8(12)(c) and 9 of this act, are delegated to a
corporation, association, or other organization which performs or will perform
functions similar to those of this association, or its equivalent, in two or
more states. Such a corporation, association, or organization must be
reimbursed for any payments made on behalf of the association and must be paid
for its performance of any function of the association. A delegation under
this subsection takes effect only with the approval of both the board of
directors and the commissioner, and may be made only to a corporation,
association, or organization which extends protection not substantially less
favorable and effective than that provided by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. DUTIES AND POWERS OF THE
COMMISSIONER. (1) In addition to the duties and powers enumerated elsewhere in
this chapter, the commissioner shall:

(a) Upon request of the
board of directors, provide the association with a statement of the premiums in
this and other appropriate states for each member insurer;

(b) When an impairment
is declared and the amount of the impairment is determined, serve a demand upon
the impaired insurer to make good the impairment within a reasonable time;
notice to the impaired insurer constitutes notice to its shareholders, if any;
the failure of the insurer to promptly comply with such a demand does not
excuse the association from the performance of its powers and duties under this
chapter; and

(c) In any liquidation
or rehabilitation proceeding involving a domestic insurer, be appointed as the
liquidator or rehabilitator.

(2) In addition to the
duties and powers enumerated elsewhere in this chapter, the commissioner may
suspend or revoke, after notice and hearing, the certificate of authority to
transact insurance in this state of any member insurer which fails to pay an
assessment when due or fails to comply with the plan of operation. As an
alternative the commissioner may levy a forfeiture on any member insurer that
fails to pay an assessment when due. The forfeiture may not exceed five
percent of the unpaid assessment per month, but no forfeiture may be less than
one hundred dollars per month.

(3) A final action by
the board of directors of the association may be appealed to the commissioner
by a member insurer if the appeal is taken within sixty days of the member
insurer's receipt of notice of the final action being appealed. A final action
or order of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in a court of
competent jurisdiction in accordance with the laws of this state that apply to
the actions or orders of the commissioner.

(4) The liquidator,
rehabilitator, or conservator of an impaired insurer may notify all interested
persons of the effect of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. PREVENTION OF
INSOLVENCIES. The commissioner shall aid in the detection and prevention of
insurer insolvencies or impairments.

(1) It is the duty of
the commissioner to:

(a) Notify the
commissioners of all the other states, territories of the United States, and
the District of Columbia within thirty days following the action taken or the
date the action occurs, when the commissioner takes any of the following
actions against a member insurer:

(i) Revocation of
license;

(ii) Suspension of
license; or

(iii) Makes a formal
order that the company restrict its premium writing, obtain additional
contributions to surplus, withdraw from the state, reinsure all or any part of
its business, or increase capital, surplus, or any other account for the
security of policy owners or creditors;

(b) Report to the board
of directors when the commissioner has taken any of the actions set forth in
(a) of this subsection or has received a report from any other commissioner
indicating that any such action has been taken in another state. The report to
the board of directors must contain all significant details of the action taken
or the report received from another commissioner;

(c) Report to the board
of directors when the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe from an
examination, whether completed or in process, of any member insurer that the
insurer may be an impaired or insolvent insurer; and

(d) Furnish to the
board of directors the national association of insurance commissioners
insurance regulatory information system ratios and listings of companies not
included in the ratios developed by the national association of insurance
commissioners, and the board may use the information contained therein in
carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this section. The report
and the information must be kept confidential by the board of directors until
such time as made public by the commissioner or other lawful authority.

(2) The commissioner
may seek the advice and recommendations of the board of directors concerning
any matter affecting the duties and responsibilities of the commissioner
regarding the financial condition of member insurers and companies seeking
admission to transact insurance business in this state.

(3) The board of
directors may, upon majority vote, make reports and recommendations to the
commissioner upon any matter germane to the solvency, liquidation,
rehabilitation, or conservation of any member insurer or germane to the
solvency of any company seeking to do an insurance business in this state. The
reports and recommendations are not public documents.

(4) The board of
directors may, upon majority vote, notify the commissioner of any information
indicating a member insurer may be an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(5) The board of
directors may, upon majority vote, make recommendations to the commissioner for
the detection and prevention of insurer insolvencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. CREDITS FOR ASSESSMENTS
PAID‑-TAX OFFSETS. (1) A member insurer may offset against its premium
tax liability to this state an assessment described in section 9(8) of this act
to the extent of twenty percent of the amount of the assessment for each of the
five calendar years following the year in which the assessment was paid. In
the event a member insurer ceases doing business, all uncredited assessments
may be credited against its premium tax liability for the year it ceases doing
business.

(2) Any sums that are
acquired by refund, under section 9(6) of this act, from the association by
member insurers, and that have been offset against premium taxes as provided in
subsection (1) of this section, must be paid by the insurers to the commissioner
and then deposited with the state treasurer for credit to the general fund of
the state of Washington. The association shall notify the commissioner that
refunds have been made.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS.
(1) This chapter does not reduce the liability for unpaid assessments of the
insureds of an impaired or insolvent insurer operating under a plan with
assessment liability.

(2) Records must be
kept of all meetings of the board of directors to discuss the activities of the
association in carrying out its powers and duties under section 8 of this act.
The records of the association with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer
may not be disclosed prior to the termination of a liquidation, rehabilitation,
or conservation proceeding involving the impaired or insolvent insurer, upon
the termination of the impairment or insolvency of the insurer, or upon the
order of a court of competent jurisdiction. This subsection does not limit the
duty of the association to render a report of its activities under section 15
of this act.

(3) For the purpose of
carrying out its obligations under this chapter, the association is a creditor
of the impaired or insolvent insurer to the extent of assets attributable to
covered policies reduced by any amounts to which the association is entitled as
subrogee under section 8(11) of this act. Assets of the impaired or insolvent
insurer attributable to covered policies must be used to continue all covered
policies and pay all contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent
insurer as required by this chapter. Assets attributable to covered policies,
as used in this subsection, are that proportion of the assets which the
reserves that should have been established for such policies bear to the
reserves that should have been established for all policies of insurance
written by the impaired or insolvent insurer.

(4) As a creditor of
the impaired or insolvent insurer as established in subsection (3) of this
section, the association and other similar associations are entitled to receive
a disbursement of assets out of the marshaled assets, from time to time as the
assets become available to reimburse it, as a credit against contractual
obligations under this chapter. If the liquidator has not, within one hundred
twenty days of a final determination of insolvency of an insurer by the
receivership court, made an application to the court for the approval of a
proposal to disburse assets out of marshaled assets to guaranty associations
having obligations because of the insolvency, then the association is entitled
to make application to the receivership court for approval of its own proposal
to disburse these assets.

(5)(a) Prior to the
termination of any liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation proceeding, the
court may take into consideration the contributions of the respective parties,
including the association, the shareholders, and the policy owners of the
insolvent insurer, and any other party with a bona fide interest, in making an
equitable distribution of the ownership rights of the insolvent insurer. In
such a determination, consideration must be given to the welfare of the policy
owners of the continuing or successor insurer.

(b) A distribution to
stockholders, if any, of an impaired or insolvent insurer shall not be made
until and unless the total amount of valid claims of the association with
interest thereon for funds expended in carrying out its powers and duties under
section 8 of this act with respect to the insurer have been fully recovered by
the association.

(6)(a) If an order for
liquidation or rehabilitation of an insurer domiciled in this state has been
entered, the receiver appointed under the order has a right to recover on
behalf of the insurer, from any affiliate that controlled it, the amount of
distributions, other than stock dividends paid by the insurer on its capital
stock, made at any time during the five years preceding the petition for
liquidation or rehabilitation subject to the limitations of (b) through (d) of
this subsection.

(b) A distribution is
not recoverable if the insurer shows that when paid the distribution was lawful
and reasonable, and that the insurer did not know and could not reasonably have
known that the distribution might adversely affect the ability of the insurer
to fulfill its contractual obligations.

(c) Any person who was
an affiliate that controlled the insurer at the time the distributions were
paid is liable up to the amount of distributions received. Any person who was
an affiliate that controlled the insurer at the time the distributions were
declared, is liable up to the amount of distributions which would have been
received if they had been paid immediately. If two or more persons are liable
with respect to the same distributions, they are jointly and severally liable.

(d) The maximum amount
recoverable under this subsection is the amount needed in excess of all other
available assets of the insolvent insurer to pay the contractual obligations of
the insolvent insurer.

(e) If any person
liable under (c) of this subsection is insolvent, all its affiliates that
controlled it at the time the distribution was paid are jointly and severally
liable for any resulting deficiency in the amount recovered from the insolvent
affiliate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. EXAMINATION OF THE
ASSOCIATION‑-ANNUAL REPORT. The association is subject to examination
and regulation by the commissioner. The board of directors shall submit to the
commissioner each year, not later than one hundred eighty days after the
association's fiscal year, a financial report in a form approved by the
commissioner and a report of its activities during the preceding fiscal year.
Upon the request of a member insurer, the association shall provide the member
insurer with a copy of the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. TAX EXEMPTIONS. The
association is exempt from payment of all fees and all taxes levied by this
state or any of its subdivisions, except taxes levied on real property.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. IMMUNITY. There is no
liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against
any member insurer or its agents or employees, the association or its agents or
employees, members of the board of directors, or the commissioner or the
commissioner's representatives, for any action or omission by them in the
performance of their powers and duties under this chapter. Immunity extends to
the participation in any organization of one or more other state associations
of similar purposes and to any such organization and its agents or employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. STAY OF PROCEEDINGS‑-REOPENING
DEFAULT JUDGMENTS. All proceedings in which the insolvent insurer is a party
in any court in this state are stayed sixty days from the date an order of
liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation is final to permit proper legal
action by the association on any matters germane to its powers or duties. As
to judgment under any decision, order, verdict, or finding based on default the
association may apply to have such a judgment set aside by the same court that
made such a judgment and must be permitted to defend against the suit on the
merits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. PROHIBITED ADVERTISEMENT
OF INSURANCE GUARANTY ASSOCIATION ACT IN INSURANCE SALES‑-NOTICE TO
POLICY OWNERS. (1) No person, including an insurer, agent, or affiliate of an
insurer may make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public,
or cause directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated,
circulated, or placed before the public, in any newspaper, magazine, or other
publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster,
or over any radio station or television station, or in any other way, any
advertisement, announcement, or statement, written or oral, which uses the
existence of the insurance guaranty association of this state for the purpose
of sales, solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance covered
by the Washington life and disability insurance guaranty association act.
However, this section does not apply to the Washington life and disability
insurance guaranty association or any other entity which does not sell or
solicit insurance.

(2) Within one hundred
eighty days after the effective date of this section, the association shall
prepare a summary document describing the general purposes and current
limitations of this chapter and complying with subsection (3) of this section.
This document must be submitted to the commissioner for approval. The document
must also be available upon request by a policy owner. The distribution,
delivery, contents, or interpretation of this document does not guarantee that
either the policy or the contract or the owner of the policy or contract is
covered in the event of the impairment or insolvency of a member insurer. The
description document must be revised by the association as amendments to this
chapter may require. Failure to receive this document does not give the policy
owner, contract owner, certificate holder, or insured any greater rights than
those stated in this chapter.

(3) The document
prepared under subsection (2) of this section must contain a clear and
conspicuous disclaimer on its face. The commissioner shall establish the form
and content of the disclaimer. The disclaimer must:

(a) State the name and
address of the life and disability insurance guaranty association and insurance
department;

(b) Prominently warn
the policy or contract owner that the life and disability insurance guaranty
association may not cover the policy or, if coverage is available, it is
subject to substantial limitations and exclusions and conditioned on continued
residence in this state;

(c) State the types of
policies for which guaranty funds provide coverage;

(d) State that the
insurer and its agents are prohibited by law from using the existence of the
life and disability insurance guaranty association for the purpose of sales,
solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance;

(e) State that the
policy or contract owner should not rely on coverage under the life and
disability insurance guaranty association when selecting an insurer;

(f) Explain rights
available and procedures for filing a complaint to allege a violation of any
provisions of this chapter; and

(g) Provide other
information as directed by the commissioner including but not limited to,
sources for information about the financial condition of insurers provided that
the information is not proprietary and is subject to disclosure under chapter
42.17 RCW.

(4) A member insurer
must retain evidence of compliance with subsection (2) of this section for as
long as the policy or contract for which the notice is given remains in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. PROSPECTIVE APPLICATION
AND SAVINGS CLAUSE. (1) This chapter does not apply to any impaired insurer
that was under an order of rehabilitation or conservation, or to any insolvent
insurer that was placed under an order of liquidation, prior to the effective
date of this act.

(2) Any section
repealed in this act pertaining to the powers and obligations of the
association, reinsurance and guaranty of policies, assessments, and premium tax
offsets shall apply to impaired insurers placed under an order of
rehabilitation or conservation, and to insolvent insurers placed under an order
of liquidation, prior to the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. Sections 1 through 21 of
this act are each added to chapter 48.32A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 48.32A.010 (Purpose) and 1994 c 149 s
1, 1990 c 51 s 1, & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 1;

(2) RCW 48.32A.020 (Scope--Obligations of
association) and 1996 c 98 s 1, 1994 c 149 s 2, 1990 c 51 s 2, & 1971 ex.s.
c 259 s 2;

(3) RCW 48.32A.030 (Definitions) and 1996 c
98 s 2, 1994 c 149 s 3, 1990 c 51 s 3, & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 3;

(4) RCW 48.32A.040 (Guaranty association
created) and 1996 c 98 s 3 & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 4;

(5) RCW 48.32A.050 (Powers of the
association) and 1994 c 149 s 4 & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 5;

(6) RCW 48.32A.060 (Reinsurance--Guaranty of
policies--Contracts) and 1994 c 149 s 5, 1990 c 51 s 4, 1975 1st ex.s. c 133 s
2, & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 6;

(7) RCW 48.32A.070 (Duplication of benefits
prohibited) and 1994 c 149 s 6 & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 7;

(8) RCW 48.32A.080 (Guaranty
funds--Assessment of member insurers) and 1994 c 149 s 7, 1990 c 51 s 5,
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 119 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 8;

(9) RCW 48.32A.090 (Certificates of
contribution--Allowance as asset--Offset against premium taxes) and 1997 c 300
s 2, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 902, 1990 c 51 s 6, 1977 ex.s. c 183 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s.
c 133 s 1, & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 9;

(10) RCW 48.32A.100 (Taxation) and 1971 ex.s.
c 259 s 10;

(11) RCW 48.32A.110 (Prohibited use of
chapter) and 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 11;

(12) RCW 48.32A.120 (Recapture of excessive
dividends to affiliates) and 1994 c 149 s 8 & 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 12;

(13) RCW 48.32A.900 (Short title) and 1971
ex.s. c 259 s 13;

(14) RCW 48.32A.910 (Construction--1971 ex.s.
c 259) and 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 14;

(15) RCW 48.32A.920 (Section headings not part
of law) and 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 15;

(16) RCW 48.32A.930 (Severability--1971 ex.s.
c 259) and 1971 ex.s. c 259 s 17; and

(17) RCW 48.32A.931 (Severability--1990 c 51)
and 1990 c 51 s 7.

---
END ---