BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of this
act to clarify that the legislature, when it enacted Senate Bill No. 6865
during the 2000 legislative session, intended to repeal all motor vehicle
excise taxes, including the local motor vehicle excise tax and replace them
with a thirty dollar license fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 35.58.273 (Public transportation
systems--Motor vehicle excise tax authorized--Credits--Public hearing on route
and design--Rules--Sales and use tax on rental cars) and 1998 c 321 s 25, 1992
c 194 s 11, 1991 c 339 s 29, 1991 c 309 s 1, 1990 c 42 s 316, 1987 c 428 s 2,
1979 ex.s. c 175 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 8;

(2) RCW 35.58.274 (Public transportation
systems--Motor vehicles exempt from tax) and 1985 c 7 s 100 & 1969 ex.s. c
255 s 9;

(3) RCW 35.58.275 (Public transportation
systems--Provisions of motor vehicle excise tax chapter applicable) and 1969
ex.s. c 255 s 10;

(4) RCW 35.58.276 (Public transportation
systems--When tax due and payable--Collection) and 1971 ex.s. c 199 s 1 &
1969 ex.s. c 255 s 11;

(5) RCW 35.58.277 (Public transportation
systems--Remittance of tax by county auditor) and 1979 c 158 s 91 & 1969
ex.s. c 255 s 12;

(6) RCW 35.58.278 (Public transportation
systems--Distribution of tax) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 2, 1974 ex.s. c 54 s
1, & 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 13;

(7) RCW 35.58.279 (Public transportation
systems--Crediting and use of tax revenues) and 1981 c 319 s 3, 1979 ex.s. c
175 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 14;

(8) RCW 35.58.2791 (Public transportation
systems--Internal combustion equipment to comply with pollution control
standards) and 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 19; and

(9) RCW 35.58.2792 (Public transportation
systems--Parking facilities to be in conjunction with system stations or
transfer facilities) and 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 20.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act applies retroactively
to January 1, 2000.

---
END ---