BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.24.350 and 1997 c
206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In any action for
damages, whether based on tort or contract or otherwise, a claim or
counterclaim for damages may be litigated in the principal action for malicious
prosecution on the ground that the action was instituted with knowledge that
the same was false, and unfounded, malicious and without probable cause in the
filing of such action, or that the same was filed as a part of a conspiracy to
misuse judicial process by filing an action known to be false and unfounded.

(2) In any action,
claim, or counterclaim brought by a judicial officer, prosecuting authority, or
law enforcement officer for malicious prosecution arising out of the
performance or purported performance of the public duty of such officer, an
arrest or seizure of property need not be an element of the claim, nor do
special damages need to be proved. A judicial officer, prosecuting authority,
or law enforcement officer prevailing in such an action may be allowed an
amount up to one thousand dollars as liquidated damages, together with a
reasonable attorneys' fee, and other costs of suit. A government entity which
has provided legal services to the prevailing judicial officer, prosecuting
authority, or law enforcement officer has reimbursement rights to any award for
reasonable attorneys' fees and other costs, but shall have no such rights to
any liquidated damages allowed.

(3) No action may be
brought against an attorney under this section solely because of that attorney's
representation of a party in a lawsuit.

(4) As used in this
section:

(a) "Judicial
officer" means a justice, judge, magistrate, or other judicial officer of
the state or a city, town, or county.

(b) "Prosecuting
authority" means any officer or employee of the state or a city, town, or
county who is authorized by law to initiate a criminal or civil proceeding on
behalf of the public.

(c) "Law
enforcement officer" means a member of the state patrol, a sheriff or
deputy sheriff, or a member of the police force of a city, town, university,
state college, or port district, or a (("wildlife agent" or
"ex officio wildlife agent")) fish and wildlife officer or ex
officio fish and wildlife officer as defined in RCW 77.08.010.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.70.185 and 1995 c
147 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
enter and inspect any property, lands, or waters, of this state in or on which
any marine species are located or from which such species are harvested,
whether recreationally or for sale or barter, and any land or water of this
state which may cause or contribute to the pollution of areas in or on which
such species are harvested or processed. The department may take any
reasonably necessary samples to determine whether such species or any lot,
batch, or quantity of such species is safe for human consumption.

(2) If the department
determines that any species or any lot, batch, or other quantity of such
species is unsafe for human consumption because consumption is likely to cause
actual harm or because consumption presents a potential risk of substantial
harm, the department may, by order under chapter 34.05 RCW, prohibit or
restrict the commercial or recreational harvest or landing of any marine species
except the recreational harvest of shellfish as defined in chapter 69.30 RCW if
taken from privately owned tidelands.

(3) It is unlawful to
harvest any marine species in violation of a departmental order prohibiting or
restricting such harvest under this section or to possess or sell any marine
species so harvested.

(4) Any person who
sells any marine species taken in violation of this section is subject to the
penalties provided in RCW 69.30.140 and 69.30.150. Any person who harvests or
possesses marine species taken in violation of this section is guilty of a
civil infraction and is subject to the penalties provided in RCW 69.30.150.
Notwithstanding this section, any person who harvests, possesses, sells, offers
to sell, culls, shucks, or packs shellfish is subject to the penalty provisions
of chapter 69.30 RCW. Charges shall not be brought against a person under both
chapter 69.30 RCW and this section in connection with this same action,
incident, or event.

(5) The criminal
provisions of this section are subject to enforcement by fish and wildlife ((enforcement))
officers or ex officio fish and wildlife ((enforcement patrol)) officers
as defined in RCW ((75.08.011)) 77.08.010.

(6) As
used in this section, marine species include all fish, invertebrate or plant
species which are found during any portion of the life cycle of those species
in the marine environment.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.09.200 and 1986 c
100 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall be enforced by all persons having the authority to enforce any of
the laws of this state, including, without limitation, officers of the state
patrol, county sheriffs and their deputies, all municipal law enforcement officers
within their respective jurisdictions, ((state wildlife agents and deputy
wildlife agents)) fish and wildlife officers, state park rangers, ((state
fisheries patrolmen,)) and those employees of the department of natural
resources designated by the commissioner of public lands under RCW 43.30.310,
76.04.035, and 76.04.045.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.10.200 and 1980 c
78 s 131 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter shall be enforced by all persons having the authority to enforce any of
the laws of this state, including, without limitation, officers of the state
patrol, county sheriffs and their deputies, all municipal law enforcement
officers within their respective jurisdictions, fish and wildlife ((agents))
officers, state park rangers, ((state fisheries patrol officers,))
and those employees of the department of natural resources designated by the
commissioner of public lands under RCW 43.30.310, as having police powers to
enforce the laws of this state.

Sec. 5. RCW 69.30.010 and 1995 c
147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When used in this
chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Shellfish" means all varieties of fresh and frozen oysters, mussels,
clams, and scallops, either shucked or in the shell, and any fresh or frozen
edible products thereof.

(2) "Sale"
means to sell, offer for sale, barter, trade, deliver, consign, hold for sale,
consignment, barter, trade, or delivery, and/or possess with intent to sell or
dispose of in any commercial manner.

(3) "Shellfish
growing areas" means the lands and waters in and upon which shellfish are
grown for harvesting in commercial quantity or for sale for human consumption.

(4)
"Establishment" means the buildings, together with the necessary
equipment and appurtenances, used for the storage, culling, shucking, packing
and/or shipping of shellfish in commercial quantity or for sale for human
consumption.

(5) "Person"
means any individual, partnership, firm, company, corporation, association, or
the authorized agents of any such entities.

(6)
"Department" means the state department of health.

(7)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or his or her authorized
representatives.

(8) "Commercial quantity"
means any quantity exceeding: (a) Forty pounds of mussels; (b) one hundred
oysters; (c) fourteen horse clams; (d) six geoducks; (e) fifty pounds of hard
or soft shell clams; or (f) fifty pounds of scallops. The poundage in this
subsection (8) constitutes weight with the shell.

(9) "Fish and
wildlife ((enforcement)) officer" means a ((fisheries patrol
officer or an ex officio fisheries patrol)) fish and wildlife
officer as defined in RCW ((75.08.011 (4) and (5) or a wildlife agent or an ex
officio wildlife agent as defined in RCW 77.08.010 (5) and (6))) 77.08.010.

(10) "Ex
officio fish and wildlife officer" means an ex officio fish and wildlife
officer as defined in RCW 77.08.010.

Sec. 6. RCW 69.30.110 and 1995 c
147 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It is unlawful for any
person to possess a commercial quantity of shellfish or to sell or offer to
sell shellfish in the state which have not been grown, shucked, packed, or
shipped in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Failure of a
shellfish grower to display immediately a certificate of approval issued under
RCW 69.30.050 to an authorized representative of the department, a fish and
wildlife ((enforcement)) officer, or an ex officio fish and wildlife ((enforcement))
officer subjects the grower to the penalty provisions of this chapter, as well
as immediate seizure of the shellfish by the representative or officer.

Failure of a shellfish
processor to display a certificate of approval issued under RCW 69.30.060 to an
authorized representative of the department, a fish and wildlife ((enforcement))
officer, or an ex officio fish and wildlife ((enforcement)) officer
subjects the processor to the penalty provisions of this chapter, as well as
immediate seizure of the shellfish by the representative or officer.

Shellfish seized under
this section shall be subject to prompt disposal by the representative or
officer and may not be used for human consumption. The state board of health
shall develop by rule procedures for the disposal of the seized shellfish.

Sec. 7. RCW 69.30.140 and 1995 c
147 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person
convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of
a gross misdemeanor. A conviction is an unvacated forfeiture of bail or
collateral deposited to secure the defendant's appearance in court, the payment
of a fine, a plea of guilty, or a finding of guilt on a violation of this
chapter, regardless of whether imposition of sentence is deferred or the
penalty is suspended, and shall be treated as a ((violation)) conviction
for purposes of license ((forfeiture)) revocation and suspension of
privileges under RCW ((75.10.120)) 77.15.700(5).

Sec. 8. RCW 70.93.050 and 1980 c
78 s 132 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
designate trained employees of the department to be vested with police powers
to enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter and all rules ((and
regulations)) adopted thereunder. The director shall also have authority
to contract with other state and local governmental agencies having law
enforcement capabilities for services and personnel reasonably necessary to
carry out the enforcement provisions of this chapter. In addition, state
patrol officers, fish and wildlife ((agents)) officers,
fire wardens, deputy fire wardens and forest rangers, sheriffs and marshals and
their deputies, and police officers, and those employees of the department of
ecology and the parks and recreation commission vested with police powers all
shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and all rules ((and regulations))
adopted thereunder and are hereby empowered to issue citations to and/or arrest
without warrant, persons violating any provision of this chapter or any of the
rules ((and regulations)) adopted hereunder. All of the foregoing
enforcement officers may serve and execute all warrants, citations, and other
process issued by the courts in enforcing the provisions of this chapter and
rules ((and regulations)) adopted hereunder. In addition, mailing by
registered mail of such warrant, citation, or other process to his or her
last known place of residence shall be deemed as personal service upon the person
charged.

Sec. 9. RCW 76.04.045 and 1986 c
100 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All Washington
state patrol officers, ((wildlife agents, fisheries patrol)) fish and
wildlife officers, deputy state fire marshals, and state park rangers,
while in their respective jurisdictions, shall be ex officio rangers.

(2) Employees of the
United States forest service, when recommended by their forest supervisor, and
citizens of the state advantageously located may, at the discretion of the
department, be commissioned as rangers and vested with the certain powers and
duties of wardens as specified in this chapter and as directed by the
department.

(3) Rangers shall
receive no compensation for their services except when employed in cooperation
with the state and under the provisions of this chapter and shall not create
any indebtedness or incur any liability on behalf of the state: PROVIDED, That
rangers actually engaged in extinguishing or preventing the spread of fire on forest
land or elsewhere that may endanger forest land shall, when their accounts for
such service have been approved by the department, be entitled to receive
compensation for such services at a rate to be fixed by the department.

(4) The department may
cancel the commission of any ranger or authority granted to any ex officio
ranger who may be incompetent or unwilling to discharge properly the duties of
the office.

Sec. 10. RCW 77.08.010 and 2000 c
107 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this title
or rules adopted under this title, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:

(1)
"Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.

(2)
"Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(3) "Commission"
means the state fish and wildlife commission.

(4) "Person"
means and includes an individual; a corporation; a public or private entity or
organization; a local, state, or federal agency; all business organizations,
including corporations and partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals
acting with a common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative,
or official capacity.

(5) "Fish and
wildlife officer" means a person appointed and commissioned by the
director, with authority to enforce this title and rules adopted pursuant to
this title, and other statutes as prescribed by the legislature. Fish and
wildlife officer includes a person commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a
wildlife agent or a fisheries patrol officer.

(6) "Ex officio
fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned officer of a municipal,
county, state, or federal agency having as its primary function the enforcement
of criminal laws in general, while the officer is in the appropriate
jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish and wildlife officer"
includes special agents of the national marine fisheries service, state parks
commissioned officers, United States fish and wildlife special agents,
department of natural resources enforcement officers, and United States forest
service officers, while the agents and officers are within their respective
jurisdictions.

(7) "To hunt"
and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure, capture, or harass a wild
animal or wild bird.

(8) "To trap"
and its derivatives means a method of hunting using devices to capture wild
animals or wild birds.

(9) "To
fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their
derivatives means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or
shellfish.

(10) "Open
season" means those times, manners of taking, and places or waters
established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or shellfish
that conform to the special restrictions or physical descriptions established
by rule of the commission or that have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt,
fish, take, harvest, or possess by rule of the commission. "Open
season" includes the first and last days of the established time.

(11) "Closed
season" means all times, manners of taking, and places or waters other
than those established by rule of the commission as an open season.
"Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking, or
possession of game animals, game birds, ((or)) game fish, food fish,
or shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or that
have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or
possess by rule of the commission as an open season.

(12) "Closed
area" means a place where the hunting of some or all species of
wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.

(13) "Closed
waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or other body of
water, where fishing ((for game fish)) or harvesting is
prohibited.

(14) "Game
reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild animals and wild
birds is prohibited.

(15) "Bag
limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game birds, or game fish
which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by a person, as specified by
rule of the commission for a particular period of time, or as to size, sex, or
species.

(16)
"Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose members
exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not limited to
mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and invertebrates. The term
"wildlife" does not include feral domestic mammals, old world rats
and mice of the family Muridae of the order Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish,
and marine invertebrates classified as food fish or shellfish by the director.
The term "wildlife" includes all stages of development and the bodily
parts of wildlife members.

(17) "Wild
animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose members exist in
Washington in a wild state and the species Rana catesbeiana (bullfrog). The
term "wild animal" does not include feral domestic mammals or old
world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order Rodentia.

(18) "Wild
birds" means those species of the class Aves whose members exist in
Washington in a wild state.

(19) "Protected
wildlife" means wildlife designated by the commission that shall not be
hunted or fished.

(20) "Endangered
species" means wildlife designated by the commission as seriously
threatened with extinction.

(21) "Game
animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted except as authorized
by the commission.

(22) "Fur-bearing
animals" means game animals that shall not be trapped except as authorized
by the commission.

(23) "Game
birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except as authorized by
the commission.

(24) "Predatory
birds" means wild birds that may be hunted throughout the year as
authorized by the commission.

(25) "Deleterious
exotic wildlife" means species of the animal kingdom not native to
Washington and designated as dangerous to the environment or wildlife of the
state.

(26) "Game
farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised for commercial
purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not include
publicly owned facilities.

(27) "Person of
disability" means a permanently disabled person who is not ambulatory
without the assistance of a wheelchair, crutches, or similar devices.

(28) "Fish"
includes all species classified as game fish or food fish by statute or rule,
as well as all fin fish not currently classified as food fish or game fish if
such species exist in state waters. The term "fish" includes all
stages of development and the bodily parts of fish species.

(29) "Raffle"
means an activity in which tickets bearing an individual number are sold for
not more than twenty-five dollars each and in which a permit or permits are
awarded to hunt or for access to hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the
basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or persons conducting the
raffle.

(30) "Youth"
means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under sixteen years old for
hunting.

(31) "Senior"
means a person seventy years old or older.

(32) "License
year" means the period of time for which a recreational license is valid.
The license year begins April 1st, and ends March 31st.

(33)
"Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.

(34)
"Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater including, but
not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth, lakes, ponds, and
reservoirs.

(35) "State
waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within ordinary high
water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the state.

(36) "Offshore
waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean outside the territorial
boundaries of the state, including the marine waters of other states and
countries.

(37) "Concurrent
waters of the Columbia river" means those waters of the Columbia river
that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state boundary.

(38)
"Resident" means a person who has maintained a permanent place of
abode within the state for at least ninety days immediately preceding an application
for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to continue
residing within the state, and who is not licensed to hunt or fish as a
resident in another state.

(39)
"Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the qualifications
of a resident.

(40)
"Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken except as
authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish" includes
all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish species.

(41)
"Commercial" means related to or connected with buying, selling, or
bartering. ((Fishing for food fish or shellfish with gear unlawful for
fishing for personal use, or possessing food fish or shellfish in excess of the
limits permitted for personal use are commercial activities.))

(42) "To
process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving ((food))
fish, wildlife, or shellfish.

(43) "Personal
use" means for the private use of the individual taking the ((food))
fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.

(44) "Angling
gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable of being held in
hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line operated without rod or reel.

(45)
"Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species of ((food))
fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical area.

(46)
"Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.

(47)
"Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are dependent upon
the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in either an attached or
free floating form, and includes but is not limited to marine aquatic plants in
the classes Chlorophyta, Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.

(48)
"Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or engaging in
sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or deleterious exotic
wildlife.

Sec. 11. RCW 77.12.039 and 2000 c
107 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may accept
money or real property from persons under conditions requiring the use of the
property or money for the protection, rehabilitation, preservation, or
conservation of the state wildlife, ((food)) fish, and shellfish
resources, or in settlement of claims for damages to wildlife, ((food))
fish, and shellfish resources. The director shall only accept real property
useful for the protection, rehabilitation, preservation, or conservation of ((these
fisheries)) fish, shellfish, and wildlife resources.

Sec. 12. RCW 77.12.043 and 1985 c
458 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director may
enter into contracts and agreements with a person to secure ((food))
fish or shellfish or for the construction, operation, and maintenance of
facilities for the propagation of ((food)) fish or shellfish.

(2) The
director may enter into contracts and agreements to procure from private
aquaculturists ((food)) fish or shellfish with which to stock state
waters.

Sec. 13. RCW 77.12.045 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Consistent with federal
law, the commission's authority extends to all areas and waters within the
territorial boundaries of the state, to the offshore waters, and to the
concurrent waters of the Columbia river.

Consistent with federal
law, the commission's authority extends to fishing in offshore waters by
residents of this state.

The commission may
adopt rules consistent with the regulations adopted by the United States
department of commerce for the offshore waters. The commission may adopt rules
consistent with the recommendations or regulations of the Pacific marine
fisheries commission, Columbia river compact, the Pacific salmon commission as
provided in chapter ((75.40)) 77.75 RCW, or the international
Pacific halibut commission.

Sec. 14. RCW 77.12.047 and 2000 c
107 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
adopt, amend, or repeal rules as follows:

(a) Specifying the
times when the taking of wildlife, ((food)) fish, or shellfish is lawful
or unlawful.

(b) Specifying the
areas and waters in which the taking and possession of wildlife, ((food))
fish, or shellfish is lawful or unlawful.

(c) Specifying and
defining the gear, appliances, or other equipment and methods that may be used
to take wildlife, ((food)) fish, or shellfish, and specifying the times,
places, and manner in which the equipment may be used or possessed.

(d) Regulating the importation,
transportation, possession, disposal, landing, and sale of wildlife, ((food))
fish, ((or)) shellfish, or seaweed within the state, whether
acquired within or without the state.

(e) Regulating the
prevention and suppression of diseases and pests affecting wildlife, ((food))
fish, or shellfish.

(f) Regulating the
size, sex, species, and quantities of wildlife, ((food)) fish, or
shellfish that may be taken, possessed, sold, or disposed of.

(g) Specifying the
statistical and biological reports required from ((fishermen)) fishers,
dealers, boathouses, or processors of wildlife, ((food)) fish, or
shellfish.

(h) Classifying species
of marine and freshwater life as food fish or shellfish.

(i) Classifying the
species of wildlife, ((food)) fish, and shellfish that may be used for
purposes other than human consumption.

(j) Regulating the
taking, sale, possession, and distribution of wildlife, fish, shellfish, or
deleterious exotic wildlife.

(k) Establishing
game reserves and closed areas where hunting for wild animals or wild birds may
be prohibited.

(l) Regulating the
harvesting of fish, shellfish, and wildlife in the federal exclusive economic
zone by vessels or individuals registered or licensed under the laws of this
state.

(m) Authorizing
issuance of permits to release, plant, or place fish or shellfish in state
waters.

(n) Governing the
possession of fish, shellfish, or wildlife so that the size, species, or sex
can be determined visually in the field or while being transported.

(o) Other rules
necessary to carry out this title and the purposes and duties of the
department.

(2) Subsections (1)(a),
(b), (c), (d), and (f) of this section do not apply to private tideland owners
and lessees and the immediate family members of the owners or lessees of state
tidelands, when they take or possess oysters, clams, cockles, borers, or
mussels, excluding razor clams, produced on their own private tidelands or
their leased state tidelands for personal use.

"Immediate family
member" for the purposes of this section means a spouse, brother, sister,
grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.

(3) Except for
subsection (1)(g) of this section, this section does not apply to private
sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020. Subsection
(1)(g) of this section does apply to such products.

Sec. 15. RCW 77.12.170 and 2000 c
107 s 216 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is
established in the state treasury the state wildlife fund which consists of
moneys received from:

(a) Rentals or
concessions of the department;

(b) The sale of real or
personal property held for department purposes;

(c) The sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps((, and punchcards)) required
by ((this title)) chapter 77.32 RCW and section 57 of this act,
except annual resident adult saltwater and all shellfish licenses, which shall
be deposited into the state general fund;

(d) Fees for
informational materials published by the department;

(e) Fees for
personalized vehicle license plates as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;

(f) Articles or wildlife
sold by the director under this title;

(g) Compensation for
damage to department property or wildlife losses or contributions, gifts, or
grants received under RCW 77.12.320 or 77.32.380;

(h) Excise tax on
anadromous game fish collected under chapter 82.27 RCW;

(i) The sale of
personal property seized by the department for ((food)) fish, shellfish,
or wildlife violations; and

(j) The department's
share of revenues from auctions and raffles authorized by the commission.

(2) State and county
officers receiving any moneys listed in subsection (1) of this section shall
deposit them in the state treasury to be credited to the state wildlife fund.

Sec. 16. RCW 77.12.177 and 2000 c
107 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in this title, state and county officers receiving the following moneys shall
deposit them in the state general fund:

(a) The sale of
commercial licenses required under this title, except for licenses issued under
((chapter 77.32 RCW)) section 57 of this act; and

(b) Moneys received for
damages to food fish or shellfish.

(2) The director shall
make weekly remittances to the state treasurer of moneys collected by the
department.

(3) All fines and
forfeitures collected or assessed by a district court for a violation of this
title or rule of the department shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62
RCW.

(4) Proceeds from the
sale of food fish or shellfish taken in test fishing conducted by the
department, to the extent that these proceeds exceed the estimates in the
budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts
under RCW 43.79.270 to reimburse the department for unanticipated costs for
test fishing operations in excess of the allowance in the budget approved by
the legislature.

(5) Proceeds from the
sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from state general funded hatcheries
by the department of general administration shall be deposited in the regional
fisheries enhancement group account established in RCW 77.95.090.

(6) Moneys received by
the commission under RCW 77.12.039, to the extent these moneys exceed estimates
in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated
receipts under RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made
only for the specific purpose for which the moneys were received, unless the
moneys were received in settlement of a claim for damages to food fish or
shellfish, in which case the moneys may be expended for the conservation of these
resources.

(7) Proceeds from the
sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery licenses by the department, to the extent
those proceeds exceed estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may
be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under
this subsection shall be made only for herring management, enhancement, and
enforcement.

Sec. 17. RCW 77.12.204 and 2000 c
107 s 217 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of fish
and wildlife shall implement practices necessary to meet the standards
developed under RCW 79.01.295 on agency-owned and managed agricultural and
grazing lands. The standards may be modified on a site-specific basis as
necessary and as determined by the department of fish and wildlife((, for
species that these agencies respectively manage,)) to achieve the goals
established under RCW 79.01.295(1). Existing lessees shall be provided an
opportunity to participate in any site-specific field review. Department
agricultural and grazing leases issued after December 31, 1994, shall be
subject to practices to achieve the standards that meet those developed
pursuant to RCW 79.01.295.

This section shall in
no way prevent the department of fish and wildlife from managing its lands
according to the provisions of RCW ((75.08.012)) 77.04.012,
77.12.210, or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

Sec. 18. RCW 77.12.264 and 2000 c
107 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall
relieve from active duty fish and wildlife officers who are injured in the
performance of their official duties to such an extent as to be incapable of
active service. While relieved from active duty, the employees shall receive
one-half of their salary less any compensation received through the provisions
of RCW 41.40.200, 41.40.220, and ((75.08.206)) 77.12.262.

Sec. 19. RCW 77.12.320 and 1987 c
506 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission may
make agreements with persons, political subdivisions of this state, or the
United States or its agencies or instrumentalities, regarding fish,
shellfish, and wildlife-oriented recreation and the propagation,
protection, conservation, and control of fish, shellfish, and wildlife.

(2) The director may
make written agreements with the owners or lessees of real or personal property
to provide for the use of the property for fish, shellfish, and
wildlife-oriented recreation. The director may adopt rules governing the
conduct of persons in or on the real property.

(3) The director may
accept compensation for fish, shellfish, and wildlife losses or gifts or
grants of personal property for use by the department.

Sec. 20. RCW 77.12.325 and 1980 c
78 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may
cooperate with the Oregon fish and wildlife commission in the adoption of rules
to ((assure)) ensure an annual yield of fish, shellfish, and
wildlife on the Columbia river and to prevent the taking of fish, shellfish,
and wildlife at places or times that might endanger fish, shellfish, and
wildlife.

Sec. 21. RCW 77.12.425 and 1980 c
78 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may
authorize removal, relocation, reconstruction, or other modification of an
inadequate fishway or fish protective device required by RCW ((77.16.210 and))
77.16.220 (as recodified by this act) which device was in existence on
September 1, 1963, without cost to the owner for materials and labor. The
modification may not materially alter the amount of water flowing through the
fishway or fish protective device. Following modification, the fishway or fish
protective device shall be maintained at the expense of the person or
governmental agency owning the obstruction or water diversion device.

Sec. 22. RCW 77.12.455 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may
prohibit the introduction, transportation or transplanting of ((food))
fish, shellfish, organisms, material, or other equipment which in the
commission's judgment may transmit any disease or pests affecting ((food))
fish or shellfish.

Sec. 23. RCW 77.15.080 and 2000 c
107 s 233 are each amended to read as follows:

Based upon articulable
facts that a person is engaged in fishing, harvesting, or hunting
activities, fish and wildlife officers have the authority to temporarily stop
the person and check for valid licenses, tags, permits, stamps, or catch record
cards, and to inspect all fish, shellfish, seaweed, and wildlife in
possession as well as the equipment being used to ensure compliance with the
requirements of this title, and may request the person to write his or her
signature for comparison with the signature on the license. Failure to comply
with the request is prima facie evidence that the person is not the person
named on the license.

Sec. 24. RCW 77.15.090 and 2000 c
107 s 234 are each amended to read as follows:

On a showing of
probable cause that there has been a violation of any fish, seaweed,
shellfish, or wildlife law of the state of Washington, or upon a showing of
probable cause to believe that evidence of such violation may be found at a
place, a court shall issue a search warrant or arrest warrant. Fish and
wildlife officers may execute any such arrest or search warrant reasonably
necessary to their duties under this title and may seize fish, seaweed, shellfish,
and wildlife or any evidence of a crime and the fruits or instrumentalities of
a crime as provided by warrant. The court may have a building, enclosure,
vehicle, vessel, container, or receptacle opened or entered and the contents
examined.

Sec. 25. RCW 77.15.094 and 2000 c
107 s 214 are each amended to read as follows:

Fish and wildlife
officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers may make a reasonable search
without warrant of a vessel, conveyances, vehicles, containers, packages, or
other receptacles for fish, seaweed, shellfish, and wildlife which they
have reason to believe contain evidence of a violation of law or rules adopted
pursuant to this title and seize evidence as needed for law enforcement. This
authority does not extend to quarters in a boat, building, or other property
used exclusively as a private domicile, does not extend to transitory
residences in which a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy, and does
not allow search and seizure without a warrant if the thing or place is
protected from search without warrant within the meaning of Article I, section
7 of the state Constitution. Seizure of property as evidence of a crime does
not preclude seizure of the property for forfeiture as authorized by law.

Sec. 26. RCW 77.15.096 and 1998 c
190 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

Fish and wildlife
officers may inspect without warrant at reasonable times and in a reasonable
manner the premises, containers, fishing equipment, fish, seaweed,
shellfish, and wildlife, and records required by the department of any commercial
fisher or wholesale dealer or fish buyer. Fish and wildlife officers may
similarly inspect without warrant the premises, containers, fishing equipment,
fish, shellfish, and wildlife, and records required by the department of
any shipping agent or other person placing or attempting to place fish,
shellfish, or wildlife into interstate commerce, any cold storage plant
that the department has probable cause to believe contains fish, shellfish,
or wildlife, or of any taxidermist or fur buyer. Fish and wildlife officers
may inspect without warrant the records required by the department of any
retail outlet selling fish, shellfish, or wildlife ((or both)),
and, if the officers have probable cause to believe a violation of this title
or rules of the commission has occurred, they may inspect without warrant the
premises, containers, and fish, shellfish, and wildlife of any retail
outlet selling fish, shellfish, or wildlife ((or both)).

Sec. 27. RCW 77.15.110 and 1998 c
190 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
this chapter, a person acts for commercial purposes if the person:

(a) Acts with intent to
sell, attempted to sell, sold, bartered, attempted to purchase, or purchased
fish, seaweed, shellfish, or wildlife;

(b) Uses gear typical
of that used in commercial fisheries;

(c) Exceeds the bag or
possession limits for personal use by taking or possessing more than three
times the amount of fish, seaweed, shellfish, or wildlife allowed;

(d) Delivers or
attempts to deliver fish, seaweed, shellfish, or wildlife to a person
who sells or resells fish, seaweed, shellfish, or wildlife including any
licensed or unlicensed wholesaler; ((or))

(e) Takes fish or
shellfish using a vessel designated on a commercial fishery license and
gear not authorized in a personal use fishery;

(f) Sells or deals
in raw furs; or

(g) Performs
taxidermy service on fish, shellfish, or wildlife belonging to another person
for a fee or receipt of goods or services.

(2) For purposes of
this chapter, the value of any fish, shellfish, or wildlife may be
proved based on evidence of legal or illegal sales involving the person charged
or any other person, of offers to sell or solicitation of offers to sell by the
person charged or by any other person, or of any market price for the fish,
shellfish, or wildlife including market price for farm-raised game
animals. The value assigned to specific fish, shellfish, or wildlife by
RCW ((77.21.070)) 77.15.420 may be presumed to be the value of
such fish, shellfish, or wildlife. It is not relevant to proof of value
that the person charged misrepresented that the fish, shellfish, or
wildlife was taken in compliance with law if the fish, shellfish, or
wildlife was unlawfully taken and had no lawful market value.

Sec. 28. RCW 77.15.150 and 1998 c
190 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful use of poison or explosives if:

(a) The person lays
out, sets out, or uses a drug, poison, or other deleterious substance that
kills, injures, harms, or endangers fish, shellfish, or wildlife, except
if the person is using the substance in compliance with federal and state laws
and label instructions; or

(b) The person lays
out, sets out, or uses an explosive that kills, injures, harms, or endangers
fish, shellfish, or wildlife, except if authorized by law or permit of
the director.

(2) Unlawful use of
poison or explosives is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 29. RCW 77.15.180 and 1998 c
190 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful interference with fishing or hunting gear in the second degree if
the person:

(a) Takes or releases a
wild animal from another person's trap without permission;

(b) Springs, pulls up,
damages, possesses, or destroys another person's trap without the owner's
permission; or

(c) Interferes with
recreational gear used to take fish or shellfish.

(2) Unlawful
interference with fishing or hunting gear in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.

(3) A person is guilty
of unlawful interference with fishing or hunting gear in the first degree if
the person:

(a) Takes or releases
((food)) fish or shellfish from commercial fishing gear without the
owner's permission; or

(b) Intentionally
destroys or interferes with commercial fishing gear.

(4) Unlawful
interference with fishing or hunting gear in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

(5) A person is not in
violation of unlawful interference with fishing or hunting gear if the person
removes a trap placed on property owned, leased, or rented by the person.

Sec. 30. RCW 77.15.210 and 1998 c
190 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of obstructing the taking of fish or wildlife if the person:

(a) Harasses, drives,
or disturbs fish, shellfish, or wildlife with the intent of disrupting
lawful pursuit or taking thereof; or

(b) Harasses,
intimidates, or interferes with an individual engaged in the lawful taking of
fish, shellfish, or wildlife or lawful predator control with the intent
of disrupting lawful pursuit or taking thereof.

(2) Obstructing the
taking of fish, shellfish, or wildlife is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) It is an
affirmative defense to a prosecution for obstructing the taking of fish,
shellfish, or wildlife that the person charged was:

(a) Interfering with a
person engaged in hunting outside the legally established hunting season; or

(b) Preventing or
attempting to prevent unauthorized trespass on private property.

(4) The person raising
a defense under subsection (3) of this section has the burden of proof by a
preponderance of the evidence.

Sec. 31. RCW 77.15.245 and 2000 c
248 s 1 and 2000 c 107 s 260 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 77.12.240, 77.36.020, 77.36.030, or any other provisions of
law, it is unlawful to take, hunt, or attract black bear with the aid of bait.

(a) Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black bear with the
aid of bait by employees or agents of county, state, or federal agencies while
acting in their official capacities for the purpose of protecting livestock,
domestic animals, private property, or the public safety.

(b) Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to prevent the establishment and operation of
feeding stations for black bear in order to prevent damage to commercial
timberland.

(c) Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from issuing a permit or
memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university, or scientific or
educational institution for the use of bait to attract black bear for
scientific purposes.

(d) As used in this
subsection, "bait" means a substance placed, exposed, deposited,
distributed, scattered, or otherwise used for the purpose of attracting black
bears to an area where one or more persons hunt or intend to hunt them.

(2) Notwithstanding RCW
77.12.240, 77.36.020, 77.36.030, or any other provisions of law, it is unlawful
to hunt or pursue black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or
dogs.

(a) Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black bear, cougar,
bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs by employees or agents of county,
state, or federal agencies while acting in their official capacities for the
purpose of protecting livestock, domestic animals, private property, or the
public safety. A dog or dogs may be used by the owner or tenant of real
property consistent with a permit issued and conditioned by the director.

(b) Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from issuing a permit or
memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university, or scientific or
educational institution for the use of a dog or dogs for the pursuit, capture
and relocation, of black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx for scientific purposes.

(c) Nothing in this subsection
shall be construed to prohibit the director from issuing a permit or memorandum
of understanding to a public agency, university, or scientific or educational
institution for the use of a dog or dogs for the killing of black bear, cougar,
or bobcat, for the protection of a state and/or federally listed threatened or
endangered species.

(3) Notwithstanding
subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall authorize the use of dogs
only in selected areas within a game management unit to address a public safety
need presented by one or more cougar. This authority may only be exercised
after the commission has determined that no other practical alternative to the
use of dogs exists, and after the commission has adopted rules describing the
conditions in which dogs may be used. Conditions that may warrant the use of
dogs within a game management unit include, but are not limited to, confirmed
cougar/human safety incidents, confirmed cougar/livestock and cougar/pet
depredations, and the number of cougar capture attempts and relocations.

(4) A person who
violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the ((director))
department shall revoke the hunting license of a person who violates
subsection (1) or (2) of this section and ((a hunting license shall not be
issued)) order the suspension of wildlife hunting privileges for a
period of five years following the revocation. Following a subsequent
violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section by the same person, a
hunting license shall not be issued to the person at any time.

Sec. 32. RCW 77.15.250 and 1998 c
190 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person is
guilty of unlawfully releasing, planting, or placing fish, shellfish, or
wildlife if the person knowingly releases, plants, or places live fish, shellfish,
wildlife, or aquatic plants within the state, ((except for)) and the
fish, shellfish, or wildlife have not been classified as deleterious wildlife.
This subsection does not apply to a release of game fish into private
waters for which a game fish stocking permit has been obtained, or the
planting of ((food)) fish or shellfish by permit of the commission.

(b) A violation of this
subsection is a gross misdemeanor. In addition, the department shall order the
person to pay all costs the department incurred in capturing, killing, or
controlling the fish, shellfish, aquatic plants, or wildlife released or
its progeny. This does not affect the existing authority of the department to
bring a separate civil action to recover costs of capturing, killing,
controlling the fish, shellfish, aquatic plants, or wildlife released or
their progeny, or restoration of habitat necessitated by the unlawful release.

(2)(a) A person is
guilty of unlawful release of deleterious exotic wildlife if the person
knowingly releases, plants, or places live fish, shellfish, or wildlife
within the state and such fish, shellfish, or wildlife has been classified
as deleterious exotic wildlife by rule of the commission.

(b) A violation of this
subsection is a class C felony. In addition, the department shall also order
the person to pay all costs the department incurred in capturing, killing, or
controlling the fish, shellfish, or wildlife released or its progeny.
This does not affect the existing authority of the department to bring a
separate civil action to recover costs of capturing, killing, controlling the
fish, shellfish, or wildlife released or their progeny, or restoration
of habitat necessitated by the unlawful release.

Sec. 33. RCW 77.15.260 and 1998 c
190 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful trafficking in fish, shellfish, or wildlife in the second
degree if the person traffics in fish, shellfish, or wildlife with a
wholesale value of less than two hundred fifty dollars and:

(a) The fish or
wildlife is classified as game, food fish, shellfish, game fish, or protected
wildlife and the trafficking is not authorized by statute or rule of the
department; or

(b) The fish,
shellfish, or wildlife is unclassified and the trafficking violates any
rule of the department.

(2) A person is guilty
of unlawful trafficking in fish, shellfish, or wildlife in the first
degree if the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this
section and:

(a) The fish,
shellfish, or wildlife has a value of two hundred fifty dollars or more; or

(b) The fish,
shellfish, or wildlife is designated as an endangered species
or deleterious exotic wildlife and such trafficking is not authorized by any
statute or rule of the department.

(3)(a) Unlawful
trafficking in fish, shellfish, or wildlife in the second degree is a
gross misdemeanor.

(b) Unlawful
trafficking in fish, shellfish, or wildlife in the first degree is a
class C felony.

Sec. 34. RCW 77.15.270 and 1998 c
190 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of providing false information regarding fish, shellfish, or wildlife if
the person knowingly provides false or misleading information required by any
statute or rule to be provided to the department regarding the taking,
delivery, possession, transportation, sale, transfer, or any other use of fish,
shellfish, or wildlife.

(2) Providing false
information regarding fish, shellfish, or wildlife is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 35. RCW 77.15.290 and 1998 c
190 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful transportation of fish or wildlife in the second degree if the
person:

(a) Knowingly imports,
moves within the state, or exports fish, shellfish, or wildlife in
violation of any rule of the commission or the director governing the
transportation or movement of fish, shellfish, or wildlife and the
transportation does not involve big game, endangered fish or wildlife,
deleterious exotic wildlife, or fish, shellfish, or wildlife having a
value greater than two hundred fifty dollars; or

(b) Possesses but fails
to affix or notch a big game transport tag as required by rule of the
commission or director.

(2) A person is guilty
of unlawful transportation of fish or wildlife in the first degree if the
person:

(a) Knowingly imports,
moves within the state, or exports fish, shellfish, or wildlife in
violation of any rule of the commission or the director governing the
transportation or movement of fish, shellfish, or wildlife and the
transportation involves big game, endangered fish or wildlife, deleterious
exotic wildlife, or fish, shellfish, or wildlife with a value of two
hundred fifty dollars or more; or

(b) Knowingly
transports shellfish, shellstock, or equipment used in commercial culturing,
taking, handling, or processing shellfish without a permit required by
authority of this title.

(3)(a) Unlawful
transportation of fish or wildlife in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(b) Unlawful
transportation of fish or wildlife in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 36. RCW 77.15.330 and 1998 c
190 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawfully holding a hunting or fishing contest if the person:

(a) Conducts, holds, or
sponsors a hunting contest, a fishing contest involving game fish, or a
competitive field trial using live wildlife without the permit required by RCW
((77.32.211)) 77.65.480; or

(b) Violates any rule
of the commission or the director applicable to a hunting contest, fishing
contest involving game fish, or a competitive field trial using live wildlife.

(2) Unlawfully holding
a hunting or fishing contest is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 37. RCW 77.15.340 and 1998 c
190 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful operation of a game farm if the person (a) operates a game farm
without the license required by RCW ((77.32.211)) 77.65.480; or
(b) violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable to game
farms under RCW 77.12.570, 77.12.580, and 77.12.590.

(2) Unlawful operation
of a game farm is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 38. RCW 77.15.370 and 1998 c
190 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful recreational fishing in the first degree if:

(a) The person takes,
possesses, or retains two times or more than the bag limit or possession limit
of fish or shellfish allowed by any rule of the director or commission setting
the amount of food fish, game fish, or shellfish that can be taken, possessed,
or retained for noncommercial use;

(b) The person fishes
in a fishway; or

(c) The person shoots,
gaffs, snags, snares, spears, dipnets, or stones fish or shellfish in
state waters, or possesses fish or shellfish taken by such means, unless
such means are authorized by express rule of the commission or director.

(2) Unlawful
recreational fishing in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 39. RCW 77.15.380 and 2000 c
107 s 244 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful recreational fishing in the second degree if the person fishes for,
takes, possesses, or harvests fish or shellfish and:

(a) The person does not
have and possess the license or the catch record card required by chapter ((75.25
or)) 77.32 RCW for such activity; or

(b) The action violates
any rule of the commission or the director regarding seasons, bag or possession
limits but less than two times the bag or possession limit, closed areas,
closed times, or any other rule addressing the manner or method of fishing or
possession of fish, except for use of a net to take fish as provided for in RCW
77.15.580.

(2) Unlawful
recreational fishing in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 40. RCW 77.15.390 and 2000 c
107 s 245 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful taking of seaweed if the person takes, possesses, or harvests
seaweed and:

(a) The person does not
have and possess the license required by chapter ((75.25)) 77.32
RCW for taking seaweed; or

(b) The action violates
any rule of the department or the department of natural resources regarding
seasons, possession limits, closed areas, closed times, or any other rule
addressing the manner or method of taking, possessing, or harvesting of
seaweed.

(2) Unlawful taking of
seaweed is a misdemeanor. This does not affect rights of the state to recover
civilly for trespass, conversion, or theft of state-owned valuable materials.

Sec. 41. RCW 77.15.400 and 1999 c
258 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second degree if the person:

(a) Hunts for, takes,
or possesses a wild bird and the person does not have and possess all licenses,
tags, stamps, and permits required under this title;

(b) Maliciously
destroys, takes, or harms the eggs or nests of a ((game [wild])) wild
bird except when authorized by permit;

(c) Violates any rule
of the commission or director regarding seasons, bag or possession limits but
less than two times the bag or possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or
other rule addressing the manner or method of hunting or possession of wild
birds; or

(d) Possesses a wild
bird taken during a closed season for that wild bird or taken from a closed
area for that wild bird.

(2) A person is guilty
of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the first degree if the person takes or
possesses two times or more than the possession or bag limit for ((game
[wild])) wild birds allowed by rule of the commission or director.

(3)(a) Unlawful hunting
of wild birds in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(b) Unlawful hunting of
wild birds in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 42. RCW 77.15.480 and 2000 c
107 s 247 are each amended to read as follows:

Articles or devices
unlawfully used, possessed, or maintained for catching, taking, killing,
attracting, or decoying wildlife, fish, and shellfish are public
nuisances. If necessary, fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and
wildlife officers may seize, abate, or destroy these public nuisances without
warrant or process.

Sec. 43. RCW 77.15.510 and 1998 c
190 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of commercial fish guiding or chartering without a license if:

(a) The person operates
a charter boat and does not hold the charter boat license required for the food
fish taken;

(b) The person acts as
a professional salmon guide and does not hold a professional salmon guide
license; or

(c) The person acts as
a game fish guide and does not hold a ((professional)) game fish guide
license.

(2) Commercial fish guiding
or chartering without a license is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 44. RCW 77.15.550 and 1999 c
258 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of violating commercial fishing area or time in the second degree if the person
acts for commercial purposes and takes, fishes for, possesses, delivers, or
receives ((food)) fish or shellfish:

(a) At a time not
authorized by statute or rule;

(b) From an area that
was closed to the taking of such ((food)) fish or shellfish for
commercial purposes by statute or rule; or

(c) If such fish or
shellfish do not conform to the special restrictions or physical descriptions
established by rule of the department.

(2) A person is guilty
of violating commercial fishing area or time in the first degree if the person
commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section and:

(a) The person acted
with knowledge that the area or time was not open to the taking or fishing of
((food)) fish or shellfish for commercial purposes; and

(b) The violation
involved two hundred fifty dollars or more worth of ((food)) fish or
shellfish.

(3)(a) Violating
commercial fishing area or time in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(b) Violating
commercial fishing area or time in the first degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 45. RCW 77.15.600 and 1999 c
258 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of engaging in commercial wildlife activity without a license if the person:

(a) Deals in raw furs
for commercial purposes and does not hold a fur dealer license required by
chapter ((77.32)) 77.65 RCW; or

(b) Practices taxidermy
for commercial purposes and does not hold a taxidermy license required by
chapter ((77.32)) 77.65 RCW.

(2) Engaging in
commercial wildlife activities without a license is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 46. RCW 77.15.700 and 1998 c
190 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall
impose revocation and suspension of privileges upon conviction in the following
circumstances:

(1) If directed by
statute for an offense;

(2) If the department
finds that actions of the defendant demonstrated a willful or wanton disregard
for conservation of fish or wildlife. Such suspension of privileges may be
permanent;

(3) If a person is
convicted twice within ten years for a violation involving unlawful hunting,
killing, or possessing big game, the department shall order revocation and
suspension of all hunting privileges for two years. RCW ((77.16.020)) 77.12.722
or 77.16.050 as it existed before June 11, 1998, may comprise one of the
convictions constituting the basis for revocation and suspension under this
subsection;

(4) If a person is
convicted three times in ten years of any violation of recreational hunting or
fishing laws or rules, the department shall order a revocation and suspension
of all recreational hunting and fishing privileges for two years;

(5) If a person is
convicted twice within five years of a gross misdemeanor or felony involving
unlawful commercial fish or shellfish harvesting, buying, or selling, the
department shall impose a revocation and suspension of the person's commercial
fishing privileges for one year. A commercial fishery license ((suspended))
revoked under this subsection may not be used by an alternate operator
or transferred during the period of suspension.

Sec. 47. RCW 77.15.730 and 1994 c
264 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receipt of a
report of failure to comply with the terms of a citation issued for a
recreational violation from the licensing authority of a state that is a party
to the wildlife violator compact under RCW ((77.17.010)) 77.75.070,
the department shall suspend the violator's recreational license privileges
under this title until (([there is])) there is satisfactory
evidence of compliance with the terms of the wildlife citation. The department
shall adopt by rule procedures for the timely notification and administrative
review of such suspension of recreational licensing privileges.

(2) Upon receipt of a
report of a conviction for a recreational offense from the licensing authority
of a state that is a party to the wildlife violator compact under RCW ((77.17.010))
77.75.070, the department shall enter such conviction in its records and
shall treat such conviction as if it occurred in the state of Washington for
the purposes of suspension, revocation, or forfeiture of recreational license
privileges.

Sec. 48. RCW 77.16.220 and 1998 c
190 s 122 are each amended to read as follows:

A person shall not
divert water from a lake, river, or stream containing game fish unless the
water diversion device is equipped at or near its intake with a fish guard or screen
to prevent the passage of game fish into the device and, if necessary, with a
means of returning game fish from immediately in front of the fish guard or
screen to the waters of origin. A person who ((is now)) was, on June
11, 1947, otherwise lawfully diverting water from a lake, river, or
stream shall not be deemed guilty of a violation of this section.

Plans for the fish
guard, screen, and bypass shall be approved by the director prior to
construction. The installation shall be approved by the director prior to the
diversion of water.

The director may close
a water diversion device operated in violation of this section and keep it
closed until it is properly equipped with a fish guard, screen, or bypass.

Sec. 49. RCW 77.32.010 and 2000 c
107 s 264 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, a recreational license issued by the director
is required to((:

(a))) hunt for or take wild animals((,
except bullfrogs,)) or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish,
shellfish, and seaweed((, except smelt, albacore, carp, and crawfish;

(b) Practice
taxidermy for profit;

(c) Deal in raw furs
for profit;

(d) Act as a fishing
guide;

(e) Operate a game
farm;

(f) Purchase or sell
anadromous game fish; or

(g) Use
department-managed lands or facilities as provided by rules adopted pursuant to
this title)). A recreational
fishing or shellfish license is not required for carp, smelt, albacore, and
crawfish, and a hunting license is not required for bullfrogs.

(2) A permit issued by
the ((director)) department is required to((:

(a) Conduct, hold,
or sponsor hunting or game fish fishing contests or competitive field trials
using live wildlife;

(b) Collect wild animals,
wild birds, game fish, food fish, shellfish, or protected wildlife for research
or display; or

(c) Stock game fish.

(3) Aquaculture as
defined in RCW 15.85.020 is exempt from the requirements of this section,
except when being stocked in public waters under contract with the department)) park a motor vehicle upon improved
department access facilities.

Sec. 50. RCW 77.32.014 and 2000 c
107 s 265 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Licenses, tags, and stamps issued pursuant to this chapter shall be ((invalid))
revoked and the privileges suspended for any period in which a person is
certified by the department of social and health services or a court of
competent jurisdiction as a person in noncompliance with a support order. Fish
and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers shall enforce
this section through checks of the department of licensing's computer data
base. A listing on the department of licensing's data base that an
individual's license is currently suspended pursuant to RCW 46.20.291(8) shall
be prima facie evidence that the individual is in noncompliance with a support
order. Presentation of a written release issued by the department of social
and health services stating that the person is in compliance with an order
shall serve as prima facie proof of compliance with a support order.

(((2) It is unlawful
to purchase, obtain, or possess a license required by this chapter during any
period in which a license is suspended.))

Sec. 51. RCW 77.32.250 and 2000 c
107 s 269 are each amended to read as follows:

Licenses, permits,
tags, and stamps required by this chapter and raffle tickets authorized under
this chapter shall not be transferred.

((Upon request of a
fish and wildlife officer or ex officio fish and wildlife officer, persons
licensed, operating under a permit, or possessing wildlife under the authority
of this chapter shall produce required licenses, permits, tags, stamps, raffle
tickets, or catch record cards for inspection and write their signatures for
comparison and in addition display their wildlife. Failure to comply with the
request is prima facie evidence that the person has no license or is not the
person named.))

Sec. 52. RCW 77.32.470 and 1998 c
191 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A personal use
saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary, or family fishing weekend
license is required for all persons fifteen years of age or older to fish for,
take, or possess fish taken for personal use from state waters or offshore
waters.

(2) The fees for annual
personal use saltwater, freshwater, or combination licenses are as follows:

(a) A combination
license allows the holder to fish for, take, or possess fish, shellfish,
and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two dollars for nonresidents, and
five dollars for youth.

(b) A saltwater license
allows the holder to fish for, take, or possess fish taken from
saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen dollars for residents,
thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.

(c) A freshwater
license allows the holder to fish for, take, or possess food fish or game fish
species in all freshwater areas. The fee for this license is twenty dollars
for residents, forty dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident
seniors.

(3) A temporary fishing
license is valid for two consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for,
take, or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore waters. The fee
for this temporary fishing license is six dollars for both residents and
nonresidents. This license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day
period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season.

(4) A family fishing
weekend license allows for a maximum of six anglers: One resident and five
youth; two residents and four youth; or one resident, one nonresident, and four
youth. This license allows the holders to fish for, take, or possess
fish taken from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is
twenty dollars. This license is only valid during periods as specified by rule
of the department.

(5) The
commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination licenses for all hunting
and fishing activities at or below a fee equal to the total cost of the
individual license contained within any combination.

Sec. 53. RCW 77.32.535 and 1996 c
101 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

If a private entity has
a private lands wildlife management area agreement in effect with the
department, the commission may authorize the private entity to conduct raffles
for access to hunt for big game animals and wild turkeys to meet the conditions
of the agreement. The private entity shall comply with all applicable rules
adopted under RCW ((77.12.770)) 77.32.530 for the implementation
of raffles; however, raffle hunts conducted pursuant to this section shall not
be counted toward the number of raffle hunts the commission may authorize under
RCW ((77.12.770)) 77.32.530. The director shall establish the
procedures for the hunts, which shall require any participants to obtain any
required license, permit, or tag. Representatives of the department may
participate in the hunt upon the request of the commission to ensure that the
animals to be killed are properly identified.

Sec. 54. RCW 77.44.070 and 1991 c
253 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any agency of state or
federal government, political subdivision of the state, private or public
utility company, corporation, or sports group, or any purchaser of fish under
RCW ((77.18.020)) 77.44.060 may purchase resident game fish from
an aquatic farmer for stocking purposes if permit requirements of this title
and the department have been met.

Sec. 55. RCW 77.55.280 and 1997 c
425 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When a private
landowner is applying for hydraulic project approval under this chapter and
that landowner has entered into a habitat incentives agreement with the
department and the department of natural resources as provided in RCW ((77.12.830))
77.55.300, the department shall comply with the terms of that agreement
when evaluating the request for hydraulic project approval.

Sec. 56. RCW 77.55.290 and 1998 c
249 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to receive
the permit review and approval process created in this section, a fish habitat
enhancement project must meet the criteria under (a) and (b) of this
subsection:

(a) A fish habitat
enhancement project must be a project to accomplish one or more of the
following tasks:

(i) Elimination of
human-made fish passage barriers, including culvert repair and replacement;

(ii) Restoration of an
eroded or unstable stream bank employing the principle of bioengineering,
including limited use of rock as a stabilization only at the toe of the bank,
and with primary emphasis on using native vegetation to control the erosive forces
of flowing water; or

(iii) Placement of
woody debris or other instream structures that benefit naturally reproducing
fish stocks.

The department shall
develop size or scale threshold tests to determine if projects accomplishing
any of these tasks should be evaluated under the process created in this
section or under other project review and approval processes. A project
proposal shall not be reviewed under the process created in this section if the
department determines that the scale of the project raises concerns regarding
public health and safety; and

(b) A fish habitat
enhancement project must be approved in one of the following ways:

(i) By the department
pursuant to chapter ((75.50 or 75.52)) 77.95 or 77.100 RCW;

(ii) By the sponsor of
a watershed restoration plan as provided in chapter 89.08 RCW;

(iii) By the department
as a department-sponsored fish habitat enhancement or restoration project;

(iv) Through the review
and approval process for the jobs for the environment program;

(v) Through the review
and approval process for conservation district-sponsored projects, where the
project complies with design standards established by the conservation
commission through interagency agreement with the United States fish and
wildlife service and the natural resource conservation service;

(vi) Through a formal
grant program established by the legislature or the department for fish habitat
enhancement or restoration; and

(vii) Through other
formal review and approval processes established by the legislature.

(2) Fish habitat
enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection (1) of this section are
expected to result in beneficial impacts to the environment. Decisions
pertaining to fish habitat enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection
(1) of this section and being reviewed and approved according to the provisions
of this section are not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).

(3) Hydraulic project
approval is required for projects that meet the criteria of subsection (1) of
this section and are being reviewed and approved under this section. An
applicant shall use a joint aquatic resource permit application form developed
by the department of ecology permit assistance center to apply for approval
under this chapter. On the same day, the applicant shall provide copies of the
completed application form to the department and to each appropriate local
government. Local governments shall accept the application as notice of the
proposed project. The department shall provide a fifteen-day comment period
during which it will receive comments regarding environmental impacts. In no
more than forty-five days, the department shall either issue hydraulic project
approval, with or without conditions, deny approval, or make a determination
that the review and approval process created by this section is not appropriate
for the proposed project. The department shall base this determination on
identification during the comment period of adverse impacts that cannot be
mitigated by hydraulic project approval. If the department determines that the
review and approval process created by this section is not appropriate for the
proposed project, the department shall notify the applicant and the appropriate
local governments of its determination. The applicant may reapply for approval
of the project under other review and approval processes.

Any person aggrieved by
the approval, denial, conditioning, or modification of hydraulic project
approval under this section may formally appeal the decision to the hydraulic
appeals board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(4) No local government
may require permits or charge fees for fish habitat enhancement projects that
meet the criteria of subsection (1) of this section and that are reviewed and
approved according to the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
57. A new section is added
to chapter 77.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A license issued by
the director is required to:

(a) Practice taxidermy
for commercial purposes;

(b) Deal in raw furs
for commercial purposes;

(c) Act as a fishing
guide;

(d) Operate a game
farm; or

(e) Purchase or sell
anadromous game fish.

(2) A permit issued by
the director is required to:

(a) Conduct, hold, or
sponsor hunting or fishing contests or competitive field trials using live
wildlife;

(b) Collect wild
animals, wild birds, game fish, food fish, shellfish, or protected wildlife for
research or display;

(c) Stock game fish; or

(d) Conduct commercial
activities on department-owned or controlled lands.

(3) Aquaculture as
defined in RCW 15.85.020 is exempt from the requirements of this section,
except when being stocked in public waters under contract with the department.

Sec. 58. RCW 77.70.010 and 1997 c
58 s 884 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A license renewed
under the provisions of this chapter that has been suspended under RCW ((75.28.042))
77.65.080 shall be subject to the following provisions:

(a) A license renewal
fee shall be paid as a condition of maintaining a current license; and

(b) The department
shall waive any other license requirements, unless the department determines
that the license holder has had sufficient opportunity to meet these
requirements.

(2) The provisions of
subsection (1) of this section shall apply only to a license that has been
suspended under RCW ((75.28.042)) 77.65.080 for a period of
twelve months or less. A license holder shall forfeit a license subject to
this chapter and may not recover any license renewal fees previously paid if
the license holder does not meet the requirements of RCW 74.20A.320(9) within
twelve months of license suspension.

Sec. 59. RCW 77.70.150 and 1999 c
126 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sea urchin dive
fishery license is required to take sea urchins for commercial purposes. A sea
urchin dive fishery license authorizes the use of only one diver in the water
at any time during sea urchin harvest operations. If the same vessel has been
designated on two sea urchin dive fishery licenses, two divers may be in the
water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea urchin dive fishery
licenses.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, the director shall issue no new sea urchin
dive fishery licenses. For licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter,
the director shall renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held
the license at the end of the previous year. If a sea urchin dive fishery
license is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is not
renewable. However, if the license is not held because of revocation or
suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall renew the license in the
name of a natural person at the end of the revocation or suspension if the
license holder applies for renewal of the license before the end of the year in
which the revocation or suspension ends.

(3) Where a licensee
failed to obtain the license during the previous year because of a license
suspension or revocation by the ((department)) director or the
court, the licensee may qualify for a license by establishing that the person
held such a license during the last year in which the person was eligible.

(4) Surcharges as
provided for in this section shall be collected and deposited into the sea
urchin dive fishery account hereby created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The sea urchin dive fishery account is subject
to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account shall only be used to
retire sea urchin licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty-five, and thereafter shall only be used for sea urchin management and
enforcement.

(a) A surcharge of one
hundred dollars shall be charged with each sea urchin dive fishery license
renewal for licenses issued in 2000 through 2005.

(b) For licenses issued
for the year 2000 and thereafter, a surcharge shall be charged on the sea
urchin dive fishery license for designating an alternate operator. The
surcharge shall be as follows: Five hundred dollars for the first year or each
of the first two consecutive years after 1999 that any alternate operator is
designated and two thousand five hundred dollars each year thereafter that any
alternate operator is designated.

(5) Sea urchin dive
fishery licenses are transferable. After December 31, 1999, there is a
surcharge to transfer a sea urchin dive fishery license. The surcharge is five
hundred dollars for the first transfer of a license valid for calendar year
2000, and two thousand five hundred dollars for any subsequent transfer,
whether occurring in the year 2000 or thereafter. Notwithstanding this
subsection, a one-time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a transfer
from the natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that person's spouse or
child.

(6) If fewer than
twenty-five natural persons are eligible for sea urchin dive fishery licenses,
the director may accept applications for new licenses. The additional licenses
may not cause more than twenty-five natural persons to be eligible for a sea
urchin dive fishery license. New licenses issued under this section shall be
distributed according to rules of the department that recover the value of such
licensed privilege.

Sec. 60. RCW 77.70.190 and 1999 c
126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sea cucumber dive
fishery license is required to take sea cucumbers for commercial purposes. A
sea cucumber dive fishery license authorizes the use of only one diver in the
water at any time during sea cucumber harvest operations. If the same vessel
has been designated on two sea cucumber dive fishery licenses, two divers may
be in the water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea cucumber dive
fishery licenses.

(2) Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, the director shall issue no new sea cucumber
dive fishery licenses. For licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter,
the director shall renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the
license at the end of the previous year. If a sea cucumber dive fishery
license is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is not
renewable. However, if the license is not held because of revocation or
suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall renew the license in the
name of a natural person at the end of the revocation or suspension if the
license holder applies for renewal of the license before the end of the year in
which the revocation or suspension ends.

(3) Where a licensee
failed to obtain the license during either of the previous two years because of
a license suspension by the ((department)) director or the court,
the licensee may qualify for a license by establishing that the person held
such a license during the last year in which the person was eligible.

(4) Surcharges as
provided for in this section shall be collected and deposited into the sea
cucumber dive fishery account hereby created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The sea cucumber dive fishery account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account shall only be used
to retire sea cucumber licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty-five, and thereafter shall only be used for sea cucumber management and
enforcement.

(a) A surcharge of one
hundred dollars shall be charged with each sea cucumber dive fishery license
renewal for licenses issued in 2000 through 2005.

(b) For licenses issued
for the year 2000 and thereafter, a surcharge shall be charged on the sea
cucumber dive fishery (([license])) license for designating an
alternate operator. The surcharge shall be as follows: Five hundred dollars
for the first year or each of the first two consecutive years after 1999 that
any alternate operator is designated and two thousand five hundred dollars each
year thereafter that any alternate operator is designated.

(5) Sea cucumber dive
fishery licenses are transferable. After December 31, 1999, there is a
surcharge to transfer a sea cucumber dive fishery license. The surcharge is
five hundred dollars for the first transfer of a license valid for calendar
year 2000 and two thousand five hundred dollars for any subsequent transfer
whether occurring in the year 2000 or thereafter. Notwithstanding this
subsection, a one-time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a transfer
from the natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that person's spouse or
child.

(6) If fewer than
twenty-five persons are eligible for sea cucumber dive fishery licenses, the
director may accept applications for new licenses. The additional licenses may
not cause more than twenty-five natural persons to be eligible for a sea
cucumber dive fishery license. New licenses issued under this section shall be
distributed according to rules of the department that recover the value of such
licensed privilege.

Sec. 61. RCW 79A.60.100 and 1994
c 264 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every law
enforcement officer of this state and its political subdivisions has the
authority to enforce this chapter. Law enforcement officers may enforce
recreational boating rules adopted by the commission. Such law enforcement
officers include, but are not limited to, county sheriffs, officers of other
local law enforcement entities, ((wildlife agents and fisheries patrol))
fish and wildlife officers ((of the department of fish and wildlife)),
through the director, the state patrol, ((through its chief,)) and state
park rangers. In the exercise of this responsibility, all such officers may
stop and board any vessel and direct it to a suitable pier or anchorage to
enforce this chapter.

(2) This chapter shall be
construed to supplement federal laws and regulations. To the extent this
chapter is inconsistent with federal laws and regulations, the federal laws and
regulations shall control.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
62. (1) RCW 77.12.055 and
77.65.470 are each recodified as sections in chapter 77.15 RCW.

(2) RCW 77.12.425 and
77.16.220 are each recodified as sections in chapter 77.55 RCW.

(3) RCW 77.32.220 is
recodified as a section in chapter 77.65 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
63. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 77.12.030 (Authority to regulate
wildlife) and 1987 c 506 s 14, 1984 c 240 s 2, 1980 c 78 s 14, 1969 ex.s. c 18
s 2, & 1955 c 36 s 77.12.030;

(2) RCW 77.12.040 (Regulating the taking or
possessing of game--Emergency rules--Game reserves, closed areas and waters)
and 1987 c 506 s 15, 1984 c 240 s 3, 1980 c 78 s 15, 1969 ex.s. c 18 s 3, &
1955 c 36 s 77.12.040;

(3) RCW 77.12.105 (Authority to retain or
transfer wildlife) and 1987 c 506 s 22, 1980 c 78 s 71, 1977 c 44 s 2, &
1955 c 36 s 77.16.030;

(4) RCW 77.12.250 (Entry upon property in
course of duty) and 2000 c 107 s 220, 1980 c 78 s 42, & 1955 c 36 s
77.12.250;

(5) RCW 77.12.295 (Fish and wildlife harvest
in federal exclusive economic zone--Rules) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 9 &
1993 sp.s. c 2 s 99;

(6) RCW 77.12.457 (Planting food fish or
shellfish--Permit authorized by rule) and 1998 c 190 s 73, 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s
17, 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 30, & 1955 c 12 s 75.16.020;

(7) RCW 77.12.724 (Possession of fish and
wildlife--Rules) and 1998 c 190 s 120, 1987 c 506 s 63, & 1980 c 78 s 78;
and

(8) RCW 77.32.420 (Recreational
licenses--Nontransferable--Enforcement provisions) and 2000 c 107 s 272, 1998 c
191 s 4, 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 8, 1989 c 305 s 12, 1987 c 87 s 7, 1984 c 80 s 8,
1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 98, 1980 c 78 s 135, & 1977 ex.s. c 327 s 15.

---
END ---