BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 44.68.070 and 1986 c
61 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislative systems
revolving fund is established in the custody of the state treasurer. All
moneys received by the systems committee, the administrative committee, and the
center shall be deposited in the fund. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for
expenses approved by the systems committee for the purposes of this chapter.
Disbursements from the fund shall be on vouchers signed by both the presiding
officer of the systems committee and the coordinator. No appropriation is
required for disbursements from the fund. The senate and house of
representatives may transfer moneys appropriated for legislative expenses to
the fund, in addition to charges made under RCW 44.68.050(2).

Unexpended
and unencumbered moneys that remain in the account at the end of the fiscal
year do not revert to the state general fund but remain in the account and are
available for any purpose authorized by this section.

--- END ---