BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there is a small but significant percentage of girls sentenced to
confinement at juvenile rehabilitation administration facilities who enter the
facility pregnant and give birth while they are confined. Juvenile offender
and parenting issues may be significantly more complex for these girls than for
their adult counterparts. The legislature finds that these mothers face
substantially greater challenges to becoming successful adults and parents than
other mothers and than nonoffender mothers in their age group.

The legislature also
finds that a child's early attachment to his or her parent influences physical
and intellectual development, forms the foundation for psychological
development including an infant's development of conscience and his or her
ability to trust and relate to others. This early foundation becomes the
prototype for subsequent interpersonal relationships and establishes the
groundwork for key protective factors such as intelligence, trust, and
empathy. Where this foundation is not laid, or where it is destroyed, it may
lead to early aggression, impulsive temperament, and violent behavior, which
are the strongest developmental predictors of future involvement in violent
behavior. The legislature finds persuasive research that strongly indicates
that the best way to improve later developmental outcomes is to improve
mother-child interaction and prevent early loss of primary relationships. The
legislature also finds persuasive national statistics that demonstrate that
incarcerated mothers who develop strong parenting skills and bond with their
children are less likely to reoffend. Consequently, the legislature intends to
establish a program of birth coaching for juvenile mothers confined to the Echo
Glen correctional facility. The legislature also intends the department of
social and health services to investigate the feasibility of developing and
implementing parenting education and visitation programs for juvenile offenders
who are parents.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.40.460 and 1999 c
372 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary,
assistant secretary, or the secretary's designee shall manage and administer
the department's juvenile rehabilitation responsibilities, including but not
limited to the operation of all state institutions or facilities used for
juvenile rehabilitation.

The secretary or
assistant secretary shall:

(1) Prepare a biennial
budget request sufficient to meet the confinement and rehabilitative needs of
the juvenile rehabilitation program, as forecast by the office of financial
management;

(2) Create by rule a
formal system for inmate classification. This classification system shall
consider:

(a) Public safety;

(b) Internal security
and staff safety;

(c) Rehabilitative
resources both within and outside the department;

(d) An assessment of
each offender's risk of sexually aggressive behavior as provided in RCW
13.40.470; and

(e) An assessment of
each offender's vulnerability to sexually aggressive behavior as provided in
RCW 13.40.470;

(3) Develop agreements
with local jurisdictions to develop regional facilities with a variety of
custody levels;

(4) Adopt rules
establishing effective disciplinary policies to maintain order within
institutions;

(5) Develop a
comprehensive diagnostic evaluation process to be used at intake, including but
not limited to evaluation for substance addiction or abuse, literacy, learning
disabilities, fetal alcohol syndrome or effect, attention deficit disorder, ((and))
mental health, and status as a parent or mother-to-be;

(6) Develop placement
criteria:

(a) To avoid assigning
youth who present a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive behavior to
the same sleeping quarters as youth assessed as vulnerable to sexual
victimization under RCW 13.40.470(1)(c); and

(b) To avoid placing a
juvenile offender on parole status who has been assessed as a moderate to high
risk for sexually aggressive behavior in a department community residential
program with another child who is: (i) Dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW, or
an at-risk youth or child in need of services under chapter 13.32A RCW; and
(ii) not also a juvenile offender on parole status; and

(7) Develop a plan to
implement((, by July 1, 1995)):

(a) Substance abuse
treatment programs for all state juvenile rehabilitation facilities and
institutions;

(b) Vocational
education and instruction programs at all state juvenile rehabilitation
facilities and institutions; and

(c) An educational
program to establish self-worth and responsibility in juvenile offenders. This
educational program shall emphasize instruction in character-building
principles such as: Respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness;
accountability; work ethics; good citizenship; and life skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary,
assistant secretary, or his or her designee, shall strengthen programming for
pregnant offenders by providing birth coaching that educates pregnant offenders
about pregnancy, the medical monitoring they will receive, and the birth
process, and prepares the mother for relinquishing her infant to his or her
guardian. Birth coaching may be provided by a member of the juvenile
rehabilitation administration, a child care professional, or a volunteer, as
appropriate. The person providing the birth coaching shall act as the
offender's birth coach during labor and delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department of social
and health services shall report to the legislature no later than December 1,
2002, on the following:

(1) The number of
offenders in juvenile rehabilitation administration facilities who are parents
and who have not had their parental rights terminated;

(2) The feasibility and
fiscal impact of developing and implementing, in conjunction with local school
districts, a basic parenting education curriculum to juvenile offenders who are
parents or who are expected to be involved in the parenting of children upon
release; and

(3) The
feasibility and fiscal impact of instituting a program of regular visitation
between offender parents and their children.

---
END ---