BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.06A.030 and 1996
c 131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The ombudsman shall
perform the following duties:

(1) Provide information
as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of individuals receiving
family and children's services, and on the procedures for providing these
services;

(2) Investigate, upon
his or her own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an administrative act
alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed without an adequate
statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds;
however, the ombudsman may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by
rules adopted under this chapter;

(3) Monitor the
procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the department to
carry out its responsibilities in delivering family and children's services
with a view toward appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's
health and safety;

(4) ((Review
periodically the facilities and procedures of state institutions serving
children, and state-licensed facilities or residences)) Monitor the
procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by state agencies to
protect children's health and safety in state-operated institutions and
facilities, and in facilities and residences certified and licensed by the
state, including licensed child-care facilities and residences;

(5) Recommend changes
in the procedures for addressing the needs of families and children;

(6) Submit annually to
the committee and to the governor by November 1 a report analyzing the work of
the office including recommendations;

(7) Grant the committee
access to all relevant records in the possession of the ombudsman unless
prohibited by law; and

(8) Adopt rules
necessary to implement this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.06A.100 and 1999
c 390 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
social and health services shall:

(1) Allow the ombudsman
or the ombudsman's designee to communicate privately with any child in the
custody of the department for the purposes of carrying out its duties under
this chapter;

(2) Permit the
ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee physical access to state institutions
serving children, and state licensed facilities or residences for the purpose
of carrying out its duties under this chapter;

(3) Upon the
ombudsman's request, grant the ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee the right
to access, inspect, and copy all relevant information, records, or documents in
the possession or control of the department that the ombudsman considers
necessary in an investigation; ((and))

(4) Grant the office of
the family and children's ombudsman unrestricted on-line access to the case and
management information system (CAMIS) for the purpose of carrying out its
duties under this chapter; and

(5) Post in every
children's administration office and in each institution and facility that
serves children and is operated, certified, or licensed by the department a
notice providing the ombudsman's toll-free number and a brief description of
the services provided by the ombudsman. The notice shall be posted in a
conspicuous location. The form of notice must be approved by the ombudsman.
This information must also be distributed to foster parents and to children age
twelve or older in the custody of the department upon entering an institution
operated by the department, or a facility or residence licensed by the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of one hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the office of the family and children's
ombudsman for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, to carry out section 1 of
this act. The ombudsman shall also develop and provide the legislature with an
implementation plan by December 15, 2001.

---
END ---