BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21F RCW to read as follows:

The Washington state
energy office is hereby created as an agency of state government, responsible
to the governor and the legislature for carrying out the purposes of this
chapter. The director shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
The salary of the director shall be determined pursuant to RCW 43.03.040. The
director shall employ such personnel as are necessary to implement this
chapter. The employment of personnel shall be in accordance with chapter 41.06
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the
exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply
in the state energy office to the director and the director's personal secretary.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.21F.025 and 1996
c 186 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Energy"
means petroleum or other liquid fuels; natural or synthetic fuel gas; solid
carbonaceous fuels; fissionable nuclear material; electricity; solar radiation;
geothermal resources; hydropower; organic waste products; wind; tidal activity;
any other substance or process used to produce heat, light, or motion; or the
savings from nongeneration technologies, including conservation or improved
efficiency in the usage of any of the sources described in this subsection((;)).

(2) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation,
association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal
corporation, government agency, public utility district, joint operating
agency, or any other entity, public or private, however organized((;)).

(3)
"Director" means the director of the ((department of community,
trade, and economic development;)) state energy office.

(4) (("Assistant
director" means the assistant director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development responsible for energy policy activities;))
"Office" means the state energy office.

(5)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development((;)).

(6)
"Distributor" means any person, private corporation, partnership,
individual proprietorship, utility, including investor-owned utilities,
municipal utility, public utility district, joint operating agency, or
cooperative, which engages in or is authorized to engage in the activity of
generating, transmitting, or distributing energy in this state((; and)).

(7) "State energy
strategy" means the document and energy policy direction developed under
((section 1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991 including any related appendices))
RCW 43.21F.090.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.21F.045 and 1996
c 186 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department))
office shall supervise and administer energy-related activities as
specified in RCW 43.330.904 (as recodified by this act) and shall advise
the governor and the legislature with respect to energy matters affecting the
state.

(2) In addition to
other powers and duties granted to the ((department)) office, the
((department)) office shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Prepare and update
contingency plans for implementation in the event of energy shortages or
emergencies. The plans shall conform to chapter 43.21G RCW and shall include
procedures for determining when these shortages or emergencies exist, the state
officers and agencies to participate in the determination, and actions to be
taken by various agencies and officers of state government in order to reduce
hardship and maintain the general welfare during these emergencies. The ((department))
office shall coordinate the activities undertaken pursuant to this
subsection with other persons. The components of plans that require
legislation for their implementation shall be presented to the legislature in
the form of proposed legislation at the earliest practicable date. The ((department))
office shall report to the governor and the legislature on probable,
imminent, and existing energy shortages, and shall administer energy allocation
and curtailment programs in accordance with chapter 43.21G RCW.

(b) Establish and
maintain a central repository in state government for collection of existing
data on energy resources, including:

(i) Supply, demand,
costs, utilization technology, projections, and forecasts;

(ii) Comparative costs
of alternative energy sources, uses, and applications; and

(iii) Inventory data on
energy research projects in the state conducted under public and/or private
auspices, and the results thereof.

(c) Coordinate federal
energy programs appropriate for state-level implementation, carry out such
energy programs as are assigned to it by the governor or the legislature, and
monitor federally funded local energy programs as required by federal or state
regulations.

(d) Develop energy
policy recommendations for consideration by the governor and the legislature.

(e) Provide assistance,
space, and other support as may be necessary for the activities of the state's
two representatives to the Pacific northwest electric power and conservation
planning council. To the extent consistent with federal law, the director
shall request that Washington's council members request the administrator of
the Bonneville power administration to reimburse the state for the expenses
associated with the support as provided in the Pacific Northwest Electric Power
Planning and Conservation Act (P.L. 96-501).

(f) Cooperate with
state agencies, other governmental units, and private interests in the
prioritization ((and)), implementation, and review of the
state energy strategy elements and on other energy matters.

(g) Serve as the
official state agency responsible for coordinating implementation of the state
energy strategy.

(h) ((No later than
December 1, 1982, and)) By December 1st of each even-numbered year
((thereafter)), prepare and transmit to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature a report on the implementation of the state
energy strategy and other important energy issues((, as appropriate)).

(i) Provide support for
increasing cost-effective energy efficiency and conservation, including
assisting in the removal of impediments to timely implementation.

(j) Provide support for
the development of cost-effective energy resources including assisting in the
removal of impediments to timely construction.

(k) Promote the use
and development of: (i) Affordable, reliable, clean energy; (ii) energy
efficiency and conservation; (iii) voluntary actions to promote energy
efficiency and environmental health; (iv) scientific and technical information
that promotes energy efficiency and reduced energy use; (v) sustainable and
renewable energy sources; (vi) energy technologies for industry that result in
energy saving investments that lower energy production costs; and (vii)
technologies that will lower consumption.

(l) Adopt rules,
under chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to carry out the powers and duties
enumerated in this chapter.

(((l))) (m)
Provide administrative assistance, space, and other support as may be necessary
for the activities of the energy facility site evaluation council, as provided
for in RCW 80.50.030.

(((m))) (n)
Appoint staff as may be needed to administer energy policy functions and manage
energy facility site evaluation council activities. These employees are exempt
from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3) ((To the extent
the powers and duties set out under this section relate to)) The office
shall coordinate the following programs with Washington State University: Energy
education, applied research, and the technology transfer programs ((they
are transferred to Washington State University)).

(4) ((To the extent the))
The office shall exercise all powers and duties set out under this
section ((relate)) related to energy efficiency in public
buildings ((they are transferred to the department of general administration)).

Sec. 5. RCW 43.21F.055 and 1996
c 186 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department))
office shall not intervene in any regulatory proceeding before the
Washington utilities and transportation commission or proceedings of utilities
not regulated by the commission. Nothing in this chapter abrogates or
diminishes the functions, powers, or duties of the energy facility site
evaluation council pursuant to chapter 80.50 RCW, the utilities and
transportation commission pursuant to Title 80 RCW, or other state or local
agencies established by law.

The ((department))
office shall avoid duplication of activity with other state agencies and
officers and other persons.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.21F.060 and 1996
c 186 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the
duties prescribed in RCW 43.21F.045, the ((department)) office
shall have the authority to:

(1) Obtain all
necessary and existing information from energy producers, suppliers, and
consumers, doing business within the state of Washington, from political
subdivisions in this state, or any person as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of chapter 43.21G RCW: PROVIDED, That if the information is
available in reports made to another state agency, the ((department)) office
shall obtain it from that agency: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, to the maximum
extent practicable, informational requests to energy companies regulated by the
utilities and transportation commission shall be channeled through the
commission and shall be accepted in the format normally used by the companies.
Such information may include but not be limited to:

(a) Sales volume;

(b) Forecasts of energy
requirements; and

(c) Energy costs.

Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, information furnished under this
subsection shall be confidential and maintained as such, if so requested by the
person providing the information, if the information is proprietary.

It shall be unlawful to
disclose such information except as hereinafter provided. A violation shall be
punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars
for each offense. In addition, any person who wilfully or with criminal
negligence, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010, discloses confidential information in
violation of this subsection may be subject to removal from office or immediate
dismissal from public employment notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary.

Nothing in this
subsection prohibits the use of confidential information to prepare statistics
or other general data for publication when it is so presented as to prevent
identification of particular persons or sources of confidential information.

(2) Receive and expend
funds obtained from the federal government or other sources by means of
contracts, grants, awards, payments for services, and other devices in support
of the duties enumerated in this chapter.

Sec. 7. RCW 43.21F.090 and 1996
c 186 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department))
office shall review the state energy strategy as developed under section
1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991, periodically with the guidance of an advisory
committee. For each review, an advisory committee shall be established with a
membership resembling as closely as possible the original energy strategy
advisory committee specified under section 1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991. Upon
completion of a public hearing regarding the advisory committee's advice and
recommendations for revisions to the energy strategy, a written report shall be
conveyed by the ((department)) office to the governor and the
appropriate legislative committees. Any advisory committee established under
this section shall be dissolved within three months after their written report
is conveyed.

Sec. 8. RCW 28B.30.900 and 1996
c 186 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((All powers,
duties, and functions of)) The state energy office ((under RCW
43.21F.045)) shall coordinate all powers, duties, and functions
relating to implementing energy education, applied research, and technology
transfer programs ((shall be transferred to)) with Washington
State University.

(2) The specific
programs ((transferred to Washington State University)) coordinated
under subsection (1) of this section shall include but not be limited to
the following: Renewable energy, energy software, industrial energy
efficiency, education and information, energy ideas clearinghouse, and
telecommunications.

(3)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material ((in
the possession of the state energy office)) pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties ((transferred shall be delivered to the custody of))
assigned to Washington State University shall be made available to
the state energy office. ((All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
software, data base, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by
the state energy office in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to Washington State University.

(b) Any
appropriations made to, any other funds provided to, or any grants made to or
contracts with the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 1996, be transferred and credited to
Washington State University.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, an arbitrator mutually agreed upon by the parties in
dispute shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the
same to the state agencies concerned.

(d))) (b) All rules and all pending business
before ((the state energy office)) Washington State University
pertaining to ((the)) its powers, functions, and duties ((transferred))
shall be continued and acted upon by Washington State University. All existing
contracts, grants, and obligations, excluding personnel contracts and
obligations, shall remain in full force and shall be ((assigned to and))
performed by Washington State University.

(((e))) (c)
The ((transfer)) coordination of the powers, duties, and
functions ((of)) by the state energy office does not affect the
validity of any act performed before July 1, ((1996)) 2001.

(((f))) (d)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the ((transfers))
coordination directed by this section, the director of the office of
financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the
appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(4) Washington State
University shall enter into an interagency agreement with the ((department
of community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office
regarding the relationship between policy development and public outreach. ((The
department of community, trade, and economic development shall provide
Washington State University available existing and future oil overcharge
restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of five years
to carry out energy programs.)) Nothing in ((chapter 186, Laws of 1996))
chapter . . ., Laws of 2001 (this act) prohibits Washington
State University or the state energy office from seeking grant funding
for energy-related programs directly from other entities.

(((5) Washington
State University shall select and appoint existing state energy office
employees to positions to perform the duties and functions transferred.
Employees appointed by Washington State University are exempt from the
provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW unless otherwise designated by the
institution. Any future vacant or new positions will be filled using
Washington State University's standard hiring procedures.))

Sec. 9. RCW 39.35.030 and 1996 c
186 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Public
agency" means every state office, officer, board, commission, committee,
bureau, department, and all political subdivisions of the state.

(2) (("Department"
means the state department of general administration)) "Office"
means the state energy office.

(3) "Major
facility" means any publicly owned or leased building having twenty-five
thousand square feet or more of usable floor space.

(4) "Initial
cost" means the moneys required for the capital construction or renovation
of a major facility.

(5)
"Renovation" means additions, alterations, or repairs within any
twelve-month period which exceed fifty percent of the value of a major facility
and which will affect any energy system.

(6) "Economic
life" means the projected or anticipated useful life of a major facility
as expressed by a term of years.

(7) "Life-cycle
cost" means the initial cost and cost of operation of a major facility
over its economic life. This shall be calculated as the initial cost plus the
operation, maintenance, and energy costs over its economic life, reflecting
anticipated increases in these costs discounted to present value at the current
rate for borrowing public funds, as determined by the office of financial
management. The energy cost projections used shall be those provided by the ((department))
office. The ((department)) office shall update these
projections at least every two years.

(8) "Life-cycle
cost analysis" includes, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(a) The coordination
and positioning of a major facility on its physical site;

(b) The amount and type
of fenestration employed in a major facility;

(c) The amount of
insulation incorporated into the design of a major facility;

(d) The variable
occupancy and operating conditions of a major facility; and

(e) An energy-consumption
analysis of a major facility.

(9) "Energy
systems" means all utilities, including, but not limited to, heating,
air-conditioning, ventilating, lighting, and the supplying of domestic hot
water.

(10)
"Energy-consumption analysis" means the evaluation of all energy
systems and components by demand and type of energy including the internal
energy load imposed on a major facility by its occupants, equipment, and
components, and the external energy load imposed on a major facility by the
climatic conditions of its location. An energy-consumption analysis of the
operation of energy systems of a major facility shall include, but not be
limited to, the following elements:

(a) The comparison of
three or more system alternatives, at least one of which shall include
renewable energy systems;

(b) The simulation of
each system over the entire range of operation of such facility for a year's
operating period; and

(c) The evaluation of
the energy consumption of component equipment in each system considering the operation
of such components at other than full or rated outputs.

The energy-consumption
analysis shall be prepared by a professional engineer or licensed architect who
may use computers or such other methods as are capable of producing predictable
results.

(11) "Renewable
energy systems" means methods of facility design and construction and
types of equipment for the utilization of renewable energy sources including,
but not limited to, hydroelectric power, active or passive solar space heating
or cooling, domestic solar water heating, windmills, waste heat, biomass and/or
refuse-derived fuels, photovoltaic devices, and geothermal energy.

(12)
"Cogeneration" means the sequential generation of two or more forms
of energy from a common fuel or energy source. Where these forms are
electricity and thermal energy, then the operating and efficiency standards
established by 18 C.F.R. Sec. 292.205 and the definitions established by 18
C.F.R. 292.202 (c) through (m) as of July 28, 1991, shall apply.

(13) "Selected
buildings" means educational, office, residential care, and correctional
facilities that are designed to comply with the design standards analyzed and
recommended by the ((department)) office.

(14) "Design
standards" means the heating, air-conditioning, ventilating, and renewable
resource systems identified, analyzed, and recommended by the ((department))
office as providing an efficient energy system or systems based on the
economic life of the selected buildings.

Sec. 10. RCW 39.35.050 and 1996 c
186 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department))
office, in consultation with affected public agencies, shall develop and
issue guidelines for administering this chapter. The purpose of the guidelines
is to define a procedure and method for performance of life-cycle cost analysis
to promote the selection of low-life-cycle cost alternatives. At a minimum,
the guidelines must contain provisions that:

(1) Address energy
considerations during the planning phase of the project;

(2) Identify energy
components and system alternatives including renewable energy systems and
cogeneration applications prior to commencing the energy consumption analysis;

(3) Identify simplified
methods to assure the lowest life-cycle cost alternatives for selected
buildings with between twenty-five thousand and one hundred thousand square
feet of usable floor area;

(4) Establish times
during the design process for preparation, review, and approval or disapproval
of the life-cycle cost analysis;

(5) Specify the
assumptions to be used for escalation and inflation rates, equipment service
lives, economic building lives, and maintenance costs;

(6) Determine
life-cycle cost analysis format and submittal requirements to meet the
provisions of chapter 201, Laws of 1991;

(7) Provide for review
and approval of life-cycle cost analysis.

Sec. 11. RCW 39.35C.010 and 1996
c 186 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Cogeneration" means the sequential generation of two or more forms
of energy from a common fuel or energy source. If these forms are electricity
and thermal energy, then the operating and efficiency standards established by
18 C.F.R. Sec. 292.205 and the definitions established by 18 C.F.R. Sec.
292.202 (c) through (m) apply.

(2)
"Conservation" means reduced energy consumption or energy cost, or
increased efficiency in the use of energy, and activities, measures, or
equipment designed to achieve such results, but does not include thermal or
electric energy production from cogeneration.

(3)
"Cost-effective" means that the present value to a state agency or
school district of the energy reasonably expected to be saved or produced by a
facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life,
including any compensation received from a utility or the Bonneville power
administration, is greater than the net present value of the costs of
implementing, maintaining, and operating such facility, activity, measure, or
piece of equipment over its useful life, when discounted at the cost of public
borrowing.

(4) "Energy"
means energy as defined in RCW 43.21F.025(1).

(5) "Energy
efficiency project" means a conservation or cogeneration project.

(6) "Energy
efficiency services" means assistance furnished by the ((department))
office to state agencies and school districts in identifying,
evaluating, and implementing energy efficiency projects.

(7) (("Department"
means the state department of general administration)) "Office"
means the state energy office.

(8)
"Performance-based contracting" means contracts for which payment is
conditional on achieving contractually specified energy savings.

(9) "Public
agency" means every state office, officer, board, commission, committee,
bureau, department, and all political subdivisions of the state.

(10) "Public
facility" means a building or structure, or a group of buildings or
structures at a single site, owned by a state agency or school district.

(11) "State
agency" means every state office or department, whether elective or
appointive, state institutions of higher education, and all boards,
commissions, or divisions of state government, however designated.

(12) "State
facility" means a building or structure, or a group of buildings or
structures at a single site, owned by a state agency.

(13)
"Utility" means privately or publicly owned electric and gas
utilities, electric cooperatives and mutuals, whether located within or without
Washington state.

(14) "Local
utility" means the utility or utilities in whose service territory a
public facility is located.

Sec. 12. RCW 39.35C.020 and 1996
c 186 s 406 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each state agency
and school district shall implement cost-effective conservation improvements
and maintain efficient operation of its facilities in order to minimize energy
consumption and related environmental impacts and reduce operating costs.

(2) The ((department))
office shall assist state agencies and school districts in identifying,
evaluating, and implementing cost-effective conservation projects at their
facilities. The assistance shall include the following:

(a) Notifying state
agencies and school districts of their responsibilities under this chapter;

(b) Apprising state
agencies and school districts of opportunities to develop and finance such
projects;

(c) Providing technical
and analytical support, including procurement of performance-based contracting
services;

(d) Reviewing
verification procedures for energy savings; and

(e) Assisting in the
structuring and arranging of financing for cost-effective conservation
projects.

(3) Conservation
projects implemented under this chapter shall have appropriate levels of
monitoring to verify the performance and measure the energy savings over the
life of the project. The ((department)) office shall solicit
involvement in program planning and implementation from utilities and other
energy conservation suppliers, especially those that have demonstrated
experience in performance-based energy programs.

(4) The ((department))
office shall comply with the requirements of chapter 39.80 RCW when
contracting for architectural or engineering services.

(5) The ((department))
office shall recover any costs and expenses it incurs in providing
assistance pursuant to this section, including reimbursement from third parties
participating in conservation projects. The ((department)) office
shall enter into a written agreement with the public agency for the recovery of
costs.

Sec. 13. RCW 39.35C.030 and 1996
c 186 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((department))
office shall consult with the local utilities to develop priorities for
energy conservation projects pursuant to this chapter, cooperate where possible
with existing utility programs, and consult with the local utilities prior to
implementing projects in their service territory.

(2) A local utility
shall be offered the initial opportunity to participate in the development of
conservation projects in the following manner:

(a) Before initiating
projects in a local utility service territory, the ((department)) office
shall notify the local utility in writing, on an annual basis, of public
facilities in the local utility's service territory at which the ((department))
office anticipates cost-effective conservation projects will be
developed.

(b) Within sixty days
of receipt of this notification, the local utility may express interest in
these projects by submitting to the ((department)) office a
written description of the role the local utility is willing to perform in
developing and acquiring the conservation at these facilities. This role may
include any local utility conservation programs which would be available to the
public facility, any competitive bidding or solicitation process which the
local utility will be undertaking in accordance with the rules of the utilities
and transportation commission or the public utility district, municipal
utility, cooperative, or mutual governing body for which the public facility
would be eligible, or any other role the local utility may be willing to
perform.

(c) Upon receipt of the
written description from the local utility, the ((department)) office
shall, through discussions with the local utility, and with involvement from
state agencies and school districts responsible for the public facilities,
develop a plan for coordinated delivery of conservation services and financing
or make a determination of whether to participate in the local utility's
competitive bidding or solicitation process. The plan shall identify the local
utility in roles that the local utility is willing to perform and that are
consistent with the provisions of RCW 39.35C.040(2) (d) and (e).

Sec. 14. RCW 39.35C.040 and 1996
c 186 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of
this chapter that the state, state agencies, and school districts are
compensated fairly for the energy savings provided to utilities and be allowed
to participate on an equal basis in any utility conservation program, bidding,
or solicitation process. State agencies and school districts shall not receive
preferential treatment. For the purposes of this section, any type of
compensation from a utility or the Bonneville power administration intended to
achieve reductions or efficiencies in energy use which are cost-effective to
the utility or the Bonneville power administration shall be regarded as a sale
of energy savings. Such compensation may include credits to the energy bill,
low or no interest loans, rebates, or payment per unit of energy saved. The ((department))
office shall, in coordination with utilities, the Bonneville power
administration, state agencies, and school districts, facilitate the sale of
energy savings at public facilities including participation in any competitive
bidding or solicitation which has been agreed to by the state agency or school
district. Energy savings may only be sold to local utilities or, under
conditions specified in this section, to the Bonneville power administration.
The ((department)) office shall not attempt to sell energy
savings occurring in one utility service territory to a different utility.
Nothing in this chapter mandates that utilities purchase the energy savings.

(2) To ensure an
equitable allocation of benefits to the state, state agencies, and school
districts, the following conditions shall apply to transactions between
utilities or the Bonneville power administration and state agencies or school
districts for sales of energy savings:

(a) A transaction shall
be approved by both the state agency or school district and the ((department))
office.

(b) The state agency or
school district and the ((department)) office shall work together
throughout the planning and negotiation process for such transactions unless
the ((department)) office determines that its participation will
not further the purposes of this section.

(c) Before making a
decision under (d) of this subsection, the ((department)) office
shall review the proposed transaction for its technical and economic
feasibility, the adequacy and reasonableness of procedures proposed for
verification of project or program performance, the degree of certainty of
benefits to the state, state agency, or school district, the degree of risk
assumed by the state or school district, the benefits offered to the state,
state agency, or school district and such other factors as the ((department))
office determines to be prudent.

(d) The ((department))
office shall approve a transaction unless it finds, pursuant to the
review in (c) of this subsection, that the transaction would not result in an
equitable allocation of costs and benefits to the state, state agency, or
school district, in which case the transaction shall be disapproved.

(e) In addition to the
requirements of (c) and (d) of this subsection, in areas in which the
Bonneville power administration has a program for the purchase of energy
savings at public facilities, the ((department)) office shall
approve the transaction unless the local utility cannot offer a benefit
substantially equivalent to that offered by the Bonneville power
administration, in which case the transaction shall be disapproved. In
determining whether the local utility can offer a substantially equivalent
benefit, the ((department)) office shall consider the net present
value of the payment for energy savings; any goods, services, or financial
assistance provided by the local utility; and any risks borne by the local
utility. Any direct negative financial impact on a nongrowing, local utility
shall be considered.

(3) Any party to a
potential transaction may, within thirty days of any decision to disapprove a
transaction made pursuant to subsection (2)(c), (d), or (e) of this section,
request an independent reviewer who is mutually agreeable to all parties to the
transaction to review the decision. The parties shall within thirty days of
selection submit to the independent reviewer documentation supporting their
positions. The independent reviewer shall render advice regarding the validity
of the disapproval within an additional thirty days.

Sec. 15. RCW 39.35C.050 and 1996
c 186 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other authorities conferred by law:

(1) The ((department))
office, with the consent of the state agency or school district
responsible for a facility, a state or regional university acting
independently, and any other state agency acting through the department of
general administration or as otherwise authorized by law, may:

(a) Develop and finance
conservation at public facilities in accordance with express provisions of this
chapter;

(b) Contract for energy
services, including performance-based contracts;

(c) Contract to sell
energy savings from a conservation project at public facilities to local
utilities or the Bonneville power administration.

(2) A state or regional
university acting independently, and any other state agency acting through the
department of general administration or as otherwise authorized by law, may
undertake procurements for third-party development of conservation at its
facilities.

(3) A school district
may:

(a) Develop and finance
conservation at school district facilities;

(b) Contract for energy
services, including performance-based contracts at school district facilities;
and

(c) Contract to sell
energy savings from energy conservation projects at school district facilities
to local utilities or the Bonneville power administration directly or to local
utilities or the Bonneville power administration through third parties.

(4) In exercising the
authority granted by subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, a school
district or state agency must comply with the provisions of RCW 39.35C.040.

Sec. 16. RCW 39.35C.060 and 1996
c 186 s 410 are each amended to read as follows:

State agencies may use
financing contracts under chapter 39.94 RCW to provide all or part of the
funding for conservation projects. The ((department)) office
shall determine the eligibility of such projects for financing contracts. The
repayments of the financing contracts shall be sufficient to pay, when due, the
principal and interest on the contracts.

Sec. 17. RCW 39.35C.070 and 1996
c 186 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consistent with the
region's need to develop cost-effective, high efficiency electric energy
resources, the state shall investigate and, if appropriate, pursue development
of cost-effective opportunities for cogeneration in existing or new state
facilities.

(2) To assist state
agencies in identifying, evaluating, and developing potential cogeneration
projects at their facilities, the ((department)) office shall
notify state agencies of their responsibilities under this chapter; apprise
them of opportunities to develop and finance such projects; and provide
technical and analytical support. The ((department)) office
shall recover costs for such assistance through written agreements, including
reimbursement from third parties participating in such projects, for any costs
and expenses incurred in providing such assistance.

(3)(a) The ((department))
office shall identify priorities for cogeneration projects at state
facilities, and, where such projects are initially deemed desirable by the ((department))
office and the appropriate state agency, the ((department)) office
shall notify the local utility serving the state facility of its intent to
conduct a feasibility study at such facility. The ((department)) office
shall consult with the local utility and provide the local utility an
opportunity to participate in the development of the feasibility study for the
state facility it serves.

(b) If the local
utility has an interest in participating in the feasibility study, it shall
notify the ((department)) office and the state agency whose
facility or facilities it serves within sixty days of receipt of notification
pursuant to (a) of this subsection as to the nature and scope of its desired
participation. The ((department)) office, state agency, and
local utility shall negotiate the responsibilities, if any, of each in
conducting the feasibility study, and these responsibilities shall be specified
in a written agreement.

(c) If a local utility
identifies a potential cogeneration project at a state facility for which it
intends to conduct a feasibility study, it shall notify the ((department))
office and the appropriate state agency. The ((department)) office,
state agency, and local utility shall negotiate the responsibilities, if any,
of each in conducting the feasibility study, and these responsibilities shall
be specified in a written agreement. Nothing in this section shall preclude a
local utility from conducting an independent assessment of a potential cogeneration
project at a state facility.

(d) Agreements written
pursuant to (a) and (b) of this subsection shall include a provision for the
recovery of costs incurred by a local utility in performing a feasibility study
in the event such utility does not participate in the development of the
cogeneration project. If the local utility does participate in the
cogeneration project through energy purchase, project development or ownership,
recovery of the utility's costs may be deferred or provided for through negotiation
on agreements for energy purchase, project development or ownership.

(e) If the local
utility declines participation in the feasibility study, the ((department))
office and the state agency may receive and solicit proposals to conduct
the feasibility study from other parties. Participation of these other parties
shall also be secured and defined by a written agreement which may include the
provision for reimbursement of costs incurred in the formulation of the
feasibility study.

(4) The feasibility
study shall include consideration of regional and local utility needs for
power, the consistency of the proposed cogeneration project with the state
energy strategy, the cost and certainty of fuel supplies, the value of
electricity produced, the capability of the state agency to own and/or operate
such facilities, the capability of utilities or third parties to own and/or
operate such facilities, requirements for and costs of standby sources of
power, costs associated with interconnection with the local electric utility's
transmission system, the capability of the local electric utility to wheel
electricity generated by the facility, costs associated with obtaining wheeling
services, potential financial risks and losses to the state and/or state
agency, measures to mitigate the financial risk to the state and/or state
agency, and benefits to the state and to the state agency from a range of
design configurations, ownership, and operation options.

(5) Based upon the
findings of the feasibility study, the ((department)) office and
the state agency shall determine whether a cogeneration project will be
cost-effective and whether development of a cogeneration project should be
pursued. This determination shall be made in consultation with the local
utility or, if the local utility had not participated in the development of the
feasibility study, with any third party that may have participated in the
development of the feasibility study.

(a) Recognizing the
local utility's expertise, knowledge, and ownership and operation of the local
utility systems, the ((department)) office and the state agency
shall have the authority to negotiate directly with the local utility for the
purpose of entering into a sole source contract to develop, own, and/or operate
the cogeneration facility. The contract may also include provisions for the
purchase of electricity or thermal energy from the cogeneration facility, the
acquisition of a fuel source, and any financial considerations which may accrue
to the state from ownership and/or operation of the cogeneration facility by
the local utility.

(b) The ((department))
office may enter into contracts through competitive negotiation under
this subsection for the development, ownership, and/or operation of a
cogeneration facility. In determining an acceptable bid, the ((department))
office and the state agency may consider such factors as technical
knowledge, experience, management, staff, or schedule, as may be necessary to
achieve economical construction or operation of the project. The selection of
a developer or operator of a cogeneration facility shall be made in accordance
with procedures for competitive bidding under chapter 43.19 RCW.

(c) The ((department))
office shall comply with the requirements of chapter 39.80 RCW when contracting
for architectural or engineering services.

(6)(a) The state may
own and/or operate a cogeneration project at a state facility. However, unless
the cogeneration project is determined to be cost-effective, based on the
findings of the feasibility study, the ((department)) office and
state agency shall not pursue development of the project as a state-owned
facility. If the project is found to be cost-effective, and the ((department))
office and the state agency agree development of the cogeneration
project should be pursued as a state-owned and/or operated facility, the ((department))
office shall assist the state agency in the preparation of a finance and
development plan for the cogeneration project. Any such plan shall fully
account for and specify all costs to the state for developing and/or operating
the cogeneration facility.

(b) It is the general
intent of this chapter that cogeneration projects developed and owned by the
state will be sized to the projected thermal energy load of the state facility
over the useful life of the project. The principal purpose and use of such
projects is to supply thermal energy to a state facility and not primarily to
develop generating capacity for the sale of electricity. For state-owned
projects with electricity production in excess of projected thermal
requirements, the ((department)) office shall seek and obtain
legislative appropriation and approval for development. Nothing in chapter
201, Laws of 1991 shall be construed to authorize any state agency to sell
electricity or thermal energy on a retail basis.

(7) When a cogeneration
facility will be developed, owned, and/or operated by a state agency or third
party other than the local serving utility, the ((department)) office
and the state agency shall negotiate a written agreement with the local
utility. Elements of such an agreement shall include provisions to ensure
system safety, provisions to ensure reliability of any interconnected
operations equipment necessary for parallel operation and switching equipment
capable of isolating the generation facility, the provision of and
reimbursement for standby services, if required, and the provision of and
reimbursement for wheeling electricity, if the provision of such has been
agreed to by the local utility.

(8) The state may
develop and own a thermal energy distribution system associated with a
cogeneration project for the principal purpose of distributing thermal energy
at the state facility. If thermal energy is to be sold outside the state
facility, the state may only sell the thermal energy to a utility.

Sec. 18. RCW 39.35C.080 and 1996
c 186 s 412 and 1996 c 33 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

It is the intention of
chapter 201, Laws of 1991 that the state and its agencies are compensated
fairly for the energy provided to utilities from cogeneration at state
facilities. Such compensation may include revenues from sales of electricity
or thermal energy to utilities, lease of state properties, and value of thermal
energy provided to the facility. It is also the intent of chapter 201, Laws of
1991 that the state and its agencies be accorded the opportunity to compete on
a fair and reasonable basis to fulfill a utility's new resource acquisition needs
when selling the energy produced from cogeneration projects at state facilities
through energy purchase agreements.

(1)(a) The ((department))
office and state agencies may participate in any utility request for
resource proposal process, as either established under the rules ((and
regulations)) of the utilities and transportation commission, or by the
governing board of a public utility district, municipal utility, cooperative,
or mutual.

(b) If a local utility
does not have a request for resource proposal pending, the ((energy))
office (([department])) or a state agency may negotiate an equitable and
mutually beneficial energy purchase agreement with that utility.

(2) To ensure an
equitable allocation of benefits to the state and its agencies, the following
conditions shall apply to energy purchase agreements negotiated between
utilities and state agencies:

(a) An energy purchase
agreement shall be approved by both the ((department)) office and
the affected state agency.

(b) The ((department))
office and the state agency shall work together throughout the planning
and negotiation process for energy purchase agreements, unless the ((department))
office determines that its participation will not further the purposes
of this section.

(c) Before approving an
energy purchase agreement, the ((department)) office shall review
the proposed agreement for its technical and economic feasibility, the degree
of certainty of benefits, the degree of financial risk assumed by the state
and/or the state agency, the benefits offered to the state and/or state agency,
and other such factors as the ((department)) office deems
prudent. The ((department)) office shall approve an energy purchase
agreement unless it finds that such an agreement would not result in an
equitable allocation of costs and benefits, in which case the transaction shall
be disapproved.

(3)(a) The state or
state agency shall comply with and shall be bound by applicable avoided cost
schedules, electric power wheeling charges, interconnection requirements,
utility tariffs, and regulatory provisions to the same extent it would be
required to comply and would be bound if it were a private citizen. The state
shall neither seek regulatory advantage, nor change regulations, regulatory
policy, process, or decisions to its advantage as a seller of cogenerated
energy. Nothing contained in chapter 201, Laws of 1991 shall be construed to
mandate or require public or private utilities to wheel electric energy
resources within or beyond their service territories. Nothing in chapter 201,
Laws of 1991 authorizes any state agency or school district to make any sale of
energy or waste heat beyond the explicit provisions of chapter 201, Laws of
1991. Nothing contained in chapter 201, Laws of 1991 requires a utility to
purchase energy from the state or a state agency or enter into any agreement in
connection with a cogeneration facility.

(b) The state shall
neither construct, nor be party to an agreement for developing a cogeneration
project at a state facility for the purpose of supplying its own electrical
needs, unless it can show that such an arrangement would be in the economic
interest of the state taking into account the cost of (i) interconnection
requirements, as specified by the local electric utility, (ii) standby charges,
as may be required by the local electric utility, and (iii) the current price
of electricity offered by the local electric utility. If the local electric
utility can demonstrate that the cogeneration project may place an undue burden
on the electric utility, the ((department)) office or the state
agency shall attempt to negotiate a mutually beneficial agreement that would
minimize the burden upon the ratepayers of the local electric utility.

(4) Any party to an
energy purchase agreement may, within thirty days of any decision made pursuant
to subsection (2)(c) of this section to disapprove the agreement made pursuant
to this section, request an independent reviewer who is mutually agreeable to
all parties to review the decision. The parties shall within thirty days of
selection submit to the independent reviewer documentation supporting their
positions. The independent reviewer shall render advice regarding the validity
of the disapproval within an additional thirty days.

(5) For the purposes of
this section, "waste heat" means the thermal energy that otherwise
would be released to the environment from an industrial process, electric
generation, or other process.

Sec. 19. RCW 39.35C.090 and 1996
c 186 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any
other authorities conferred by law:

(1) The ((department))
office, with the consent of the state agency responsible for a facility,
a state or regional university acting independently, and any other state agency
acting through the department of general administration or as otherwise
authorized by law, may:

(a) Contract to sell
electric energy generated at state facilities to a utility; and

(b) Contract to sell
thermal energy produced at state facilities to a utility.

(2) A state or regional
university acting independently, and any other state agency acting through the
department of general administration or as otherwise authorized by law, may:

(a) Acquire, install,
permit, construct, own, operate, and maintain cogeneration and facility heating
and cooling measures or equipment, or both, at its facilities;

(b) Lease state
property for the installation and operation of cogeneration and facility
heating and cooling equipment at its facilities;

(c) Contract to
purchase all or part of the electric or thermal output of cogeneration plants
at its facilities;

(d) Contract to
purchase or otherwise acquire fuel or other energy sources needed to operate
cogeneration plants at its facilities; and

(e) Undertake
procurements for third-party development of cogeneration projects at its
facilities, with successful bidders to be selected based on the responsible
bid, including nonprice elements listed in RCW 43.19.1911, that offers the
greatest net achievable benefits to the state and its agencies.

(3) ((After July 28,
1991,)) A state agency shall consult with the ((department)) office
prior to exercising any authority granted by this section.

(4) In exercising the
authority granted by subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a state agency
must comply with the provisions of RCW 39.35C.080.

Sec. 20. RCW 39.35C.100 and 1996
c 186 s 414 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The energy
efficiency construction account is hereby created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation and only for the
following purposes:

(a) Construction of
energy efficiency projects, including project evaluation and verification of
benefits, project design, project development, project construction, and
project administration.

(b) Payment of
principal and interest and other costs required under bond covenant on bonds
issued for the purpose of (a) of this subsection.

(2) Sources for this
account may include:

(a) General obligation
and revenue bond proceeds appropriated by the legislature;

(b) Loan repayments
under RCW 39.35C.060 sufficient to pay principal and interest obligations; and

(c) Funding from
federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) The office shall
establish criteria for approving energy efficiency projects to be financed from
moneys disbursed from this account. The criteria shall include
cost-effectiveness, reliability of energy systems, and environmental costs or
benefits. The office shall ensure that the criteria are applied with
professional standards for engineering and review.

Sec. 21. RCW 39.35C.110 and 1996
c 186 s 415 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The energy
efficiency services account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the ((department)) office to provide energy
efficiency services to public agencies including review of life-cycle cost
analyses.

(2) All receipts from
the following source shall be deposited into the account: Project fees charged
under this section and RCW 39.35C.020, 39.35C.070, and 39.35.060.

(3) The ((department))
office may accept moneys and make deposits to the account from federal,
state, or local government agencies.

Sec. 22. RCW 39.35C.130 and 1996
c 186 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department))
office may adopt rules to implement RCW 39.35C.020 through 39.35C.040,
39.35C.070, 39.35C.080, and 39.35.050.

Sec. 23. RCW 19.27A.020 and 1998
c 245 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No later than
January 1, 1991, the state building code council shall adopt rules to be known
as the Washington state energy code as part of the state building code.

(2) The council shall
follow the legislature's standards set forth in this section to adopt rules to
be known as the Washington state energy code. The Washington state energy code
shall be designed to require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy
efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and heating
equipment efficiencies within that framework. The Washington state energy code
shall be designed to allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or
substitute for building envelope thermal performance.

(3) The Washington
state energy code shall take into account regional climatic conditions.
Climate zone 1 shall include all counties not included in climate zone 2.
Climate zone 2 includes: Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas,
Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties.

(4) The Washington
state energy code for residential buildings shall require:

(a) New residential
buildings that are space heated with electric resistance heating systems to
achieve energy use equivalent to that used in typical buildings constructed
with:

(i) Ceilings insulated
to a level of R‑38. The code shall contain an exception which permits
single rafter or joist vaulted ceilings insulated to a level of R‑30 (R
value includes insulation only);

(ii) In zone 1, walls
insulated to a level of R‑19 (R value includes insulation only), or
constructed with two by four members, R‑13 insulation batts, R‑3.2
insulated sheathing, and other normal assembly components; in zone 2 walls
insulated to a level of R‑24 (R value includes insulation only), or
constructed with two by six members, R‑22 insulation batts, R‑3.2
insulated sheathing, and other normal construction assembly components; for the
purpose of determining equivalent thermal performance, the wall U-value shall
be 0.058 in zone 1 and 0.044 in zone 2;

(iii) Below grade
walls, insulated on the interior side, to a level of R‑19 or, if
insulated on the exterior side, to a level of R‑10 in zone 1 and R‑12
in zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);

(iv) Floors over
unheated spaces insulated to a level of R‑30 (R value includes insulation
only);

(v) Slab on grade
floors insulated to a level of R‑10 at the perimeter;

(vi) Double glazed
windows with values not more than U‑0.4;

(vii) In zone 1 the
glazing area may be up to twenty-one percent of floor area and in zone 2 the
glazing area may be up to seventeen percent of floor area where consideration
of the thermal resistance values for other building components and solar heat
gains through the glazing result in thermal performance equivalent to that
achieved with thermal resistance values for other components determined in
accordance with the equivalent thermal performance criteria of (a) of this
subsection and glazing area equal to fifteen percent of the floor area.
Throughout the state for the purposes of determining equivalent thermal
performance, the maximum glazing area shall be fifteen percent of the floor
area; and

(viii) Exterior doors
insulated to a level of R‑5; or an exterior wood door with a thermal
resistance value of less than R‑5 and values for other components
determined in accordance with the equivalent thermal performance criteria of
(a) of this subsection.

(b) New residential
buildings which are space-heated with all other forms of space heating to
achieve energy use equivalent to that used in typical buildings constructed
with:

(i) Ceilings insulated
to a level of R‑30 in zone 1 and R‑38 in zone 2 the code shall
contain an exception which permits single rafter or joist vaulted ceilings
insulated to a level of R‑30 (R value includes insulation only);

(ii) Walls insulated to
a level of R‑19 (R value includes insulation only), or constructed with
two by four members, R‑13 insulation batts, R‑3.2 insulated sheathing,
and other normal assembly components;

(iii) Below grade
walls, insulated on the interior side, to a level of R‑19 or, if
insulated on the exterior side, to a level of R‑10 in zone 1 and R‑12
in zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);

(iv) Floors over
unheated spaces insulated to a level of R‑19 in zone 1 and R‑30 in
zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);

(v) Slab on grade
floors insulated to a level of R‑10 at the perimeter;

(vi) Heat pumps with a
minimum heating season performance factor (HSPF) of 6.8 or with all other
energy sources with a minimum annual fuel utilization efficiency (AFUE) of
seventy-eight percent;

(vii) Double glazed
windows with values not more than U‑0.65 in zone 1 and U‑0.60 in
zone 2. The state building code council, in consultation with the ((department
of community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office,
shall review these U-values, and, if economically justified for consumers,
shall amend the Washington state energy code to improve the U-values by
December 1, 1993. The amendment shall not take effect until July 1, 1994; and

(viii) In zone 1, the
maximum glazing area shall be twenty-one percent of the floor area. In zone 2
the maximum glazing area shall be seventeen percent of the floor area. Throughout
the state for the purposes of determining equivalent thermal performance, the
maximum glazing area shall be fifteen percent of the floor area.

(c) The requirements of
(b)(ii) of this subsection do not apply to residences with log or solid timber
walls with a minimum average thickness of three and one-half inches and with
space heat other than electric resistance.

(d) The state building
code council may approve an energy code for pilot projects of residential
construction that use innovative energy efficiency technologies intended to
result in savings that are greater than those realized in the levels specified
in this section.

(5) U-values for
glazing shall be determined using the area weighted average of all glazing in
the building. U-values for vertical glazing shall be determined, certified,
and labeled in accordance with the appropriate national fenestration rating
council (NFRC) standard, as determined and adopted by the state building code
council. Certification of U-values shall be conducted by a certified,
independent agency licensed by the NFRC. The state building code council may
develop and adopt alternative methods of determining, certifying, and labeling
U-values for vertical glazing that may be used by fenestration manufacturers if
determined to be appropriate by the council. The state building code council
shall review and consider the adoption of the NFRC standards for determining,
certifying, and labeling U-values for doors and skylights when developed and
published by the NFRC. The state building code council may develop and adopt
appropriate alternative methods for determining, certifying, and labeling
U-values for doors and skylights. U-values for doors and skylights determined,
certified, and labeled in accordance with the appropriate NFRC standard shall
be acceptable for compliance with the state energy code. Sealed insulation
glass, where used, shall conform to, or be in the process of being tested for,
ASTM E‑774‑81 class A or better.

(6) The minimum state
energy code for new nonresidential buildings shall be the Washington state
energy code, 1986 edition, as amended.

(7)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington state energy code for
residential structures shall preempt the residential energy code of each city,
town, and county in the state of Washington.

(b) The state energy
code for residential structures does not preempt a city, town, or county's
energy code for residential structures which exceeds the requirements of the
state energy code and which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to
March 1, 1990. Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend
their energy code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.

(8) The state building
code council shall consult with the ((department of community, trade, and
economic development)) state energy office as provided in RCW
34.05.310 prior to publication of proposed rules. The ((department of
community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office
shall review the proposed rules for consistency with the guidelines adopted in
subsection (4) of this section. The director of the ((department of
community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office
shall recommend to the state building code council any changes necessary to
conform the proposed rules to the requirements of this section.

Sec. 24. RCW 42.17.2401 and 1996
c 186 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW
42.17.240, the term "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief
administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, ((the administrator
of the office of marine safety,)) the administrator of the Washington basic
health plan, the director of the department of services for the blind, the
director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the director
of community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of corrections,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the chairman
of the energy facility site evaluation council, the director of the state
energy office, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director
of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive
secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of health,
the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive
secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of
the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the
executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the director of the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, the executive director of the state
investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of
licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office
of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the public
disclosure commission, the director of retirement systems, the director of
revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the
Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals,
the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation
commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the
regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen State
College, each district and each campus president of each state community
college;

(2) Each professional
staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional
staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Central Washington
University board of trustees, board of trustees of each community college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees, Washington
economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board, forest
practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, each member of the Washington health services commission, higher
education coordinating board, higher education facilities authority, horse
racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission,
indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals,
information services board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board,
liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation
commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution
control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public pension
commission, shorelines hearing board, public employees' benefits board, board
of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington state maritime
commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington public power
supply system executive board, Washington State University board of regents,
Western Washington University board of trustees, and fish and wildlife
commission.

Sec. 25. RCW 43.06.115 and 1998 c
245 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor may,
by executive order, ((after consultation with or notification of the
executive-legislative committee on economic development created by chapter
. . . (Senate Bill No. 5300), Laws of 1993,)) declare a community
to be a "military impacted area." A "military impacted
area" means a community or communities, as identified in the executive
order, that experience serious social and economic hardships because of a
change in defense spending by the federal government in that community or
communities.

(2) If the governor
executes an order under subsection (1) of this section, the governor shall
establish a response team to coordinate state efforts to assist the military
impacted community. The response team may include, but not be limited to, one
member from each of the following agencies: (a) The department of community,
trade, and economic development; (b) the department of social and health
services; (c) the employment security department; (d) the state board for
community and technical colleges; (e) the higher education coordinating board;
((and)) (f) the department of transportation; and (g) the state
energy office. The governor may appoint a response team coordinator. The
governor shall seek to actively involve the impacted community or communities
in planning and implementing a response to the crisis. The governor may seek
input or assistance from the community diversification advisory committee, and
the governor may establish task forces in the community or communities to
assist in the coordination and delivery of services to the local community.
The state and community response shall consider economic development, human
service, and training needs of the community or communities impacted.

Sec. 26. RCW 43.21G.010 and 1996
c 186 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that energy in various forms is increasingly subject to possible shortages and
supply disruptions, to the point that there may be foreseen an emergency
situation, and that without the ability to institute appropriate emergency
measures to regulate the production, distribution, and use of energy, a severe
impact on the public health, safety, and general welfare of our state's
citizens may occur. The prevention or mitigation of such energy shortages or
disruptions and their effects is necessary for preservation of the public
health, safety, and general welfare of the citizens of this state.

It is the intent of
this chapter to:

(1) Establish necessary
emergency powers for the governor and define the situations under which such
powers are to be exercised;

(2) Provide penalties
for violations of this chapter.

It is further the
intent of the legislature that in developing proposed orders under the powers
granted in RCW 43.21G.040 as now or hereafter amended the governor may utilize,
on a temporary or ad hoc basis, the knowledge and expertise of persons
experienced in the technical aspects of energy supply, distribution, or use.
Such utilization shall be in addition to support received by the governor from
the ((department of community, trade, and economic development)) state
energy office under RCW 43.21F.045 and ((43.21F.065)) 43.21F.060
and from other state agencies.

Sec. 27. RCW 47.06.110 and 1996 c
186 s 512 are each amended to read as follows:

The state-interest
component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan shall include a state
public transportation plan that:

(1) Articulates the
state vision of an interest in public transportation and provides quantifiable
objectives, including benefits indicators;

(2) Identifies the
goals for public transit and the roles of federal, state, regional, and local
entities in achieving those goals;

(3) Recommends
mechanisms for coordinating state, regional, and local planning for public
transportation;

(4) Recommends
mechanisms for coordinating public transportation with other transportation
services and modes;

(5) Recommends
criteria, consistent with the goals identified in subsection (2) of this
section and with RCW 82.44.180 (2) and (3), for existing federal authorizations
administered by the department to transit agencies; and

(6) Recommends a
statewide public transportation facilities and equipment management system as
required by federal law.

In developing the state
public transportation plan, the department shall involve local jurisdictions,
public and private providers of transportation services, nonmotorized
interests, and state agencies with an interest in public transportation,
including but not limited to the departments of community, trade, and economic
development, social and health services, and ecology, the state energy
office, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office
of the governor, and the office of financial management.

The department shall
submit an initial report to the legislative transportation committee by
December 1, 1993, and shall provide annual reports summarizing the plan's
progress each year thereafter.

Sec. 28. RCW 70.94.527 and 1997 c
250 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county with a
population over one hundred fifty thousand, and each city or town within those
counties containing a major employer shall, by October 1, 1992, adopt by
ordinance and implement a commute trip reduction plan for all major employers.
The plan shall be developed in cooperation with local transit agencies,
regional transportation planning organizations as established in RCW 47.80.020,
major employers, and the owners of and employers at major worksites. The plan
shall be designed to achieve reductions in the proportion of single-occupant
vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee
by employees of major public and private sector employers in the jurisdiction.

(2) All other counties,
and cities and towns in those counties, may adopt and implement a commute trip
reduction plan.

(3) The department of
ecology may, after consultation with the department of transportation and
the state energy office, as part of the state implementation plan for areas
that do not attain the national ambient air quality standards for carbon
monoxide or ozone, require municipalities other than those identified in
subsection (1) of this section to adopt and implement commute trip reduction
plans if the department determines that such plans are necessary for attainment
of said standards.

(4) A commute trip
reduction plan shall be consistent with the guidelines established under RCW
70.94.537 and shall include but is not limited to (a) goals for reductions in
the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip
vehicle miles traveled per employee; (b) designation of commute trip reduction
zones; (c) requirements for major public and private sector employers to
implement commute trip reduction programs; (d) a commute trip reduction program
for employees of the county, city, or town; (e) a review of local parking
policies and ordinances as they relate to employers and major worksites and any
revisions necessary to comply with commute trip reduction goals and guidelines;
(f) an appeals process by which major employers, who as a result of special
characteristics of their business or its locations would be unable to meet the
requirements of a commute trip reduction plan, may obtain waiver or
modification of those requirements; and (g) means for determining base year
values of the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the
commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee and progress toward meeting
commute trip reduction plan goals on an annual basis. Goals which are
established shall take into account existing transportation demand management
efforts which are made by major employers. Each jurisdiction shall ensure that
employers shall receive full credit for the results of transportation demand
management efforts and commute trip reduction programs which have been
implemented by major employers prior to the base year. The goals for miles
traveled per employee for all major employers shall not be less than a fifteen
percent reduction from the worksite base year value or the base year value for
the commute trip reduction zone in which their worksite is located by January
1, 1995, twenty percent reduction from the base year values by January 1, 1997,
twenty-five percent reduction from the base year values by January 1, 1999, and
a thirty-five percent reduction from the base year values by January 1, 2005.

(5) A county, city, or
town may, as part of its commute trip reduction plan, require commute trip
reduction programs for employers with ten or more full time employees at major
worksites in federally designated nonattainment areas for carbon monoxide and
ozone. The county, city or town shall develop the programs in cooperation with
affected employers and provide technical assistance to the employers in
implementing such programs.

(6) The commute trip
reduction plans adopted by counties, cities, and towns under this chapter shall
be consistent with and may be incorporated in applicable state or regional
transportation plans and local comprehensive plans and shall be coordinated,
and consistent with, the commute trip reduction plans of counties, cities, or
towns with which the county, city, or town has, in part, common borders or related
regional issues. Such regional issues shall include assuring consistency in
the treatment of employers who have worksites subject to the requirements of
this chapter in more than one jurisdiction. Counties, cities, or towns
adopting commute trip reduction plans may enter into agreements through the
interlocal cooperation act or by resolution or ordinance as appropriate with
other jurisdictions, local transit agencies, or regional transportation
planning organizations to coordinate the development and implementation of such
plans. Transit agencies shall work with counties, cities, and towns to take
into account the location of major employer worksites when planning transit
service changes or the expansion of public transportation services. Counties, cities,
or towns adopting a commute trip reduction plan shall review it annually and
revise it as necessary to be consistent with applicable plans developed under
RCW 36.70A.070.

(7) Each county, city,
or town implementing a commute trip reduction program shall, within thirty days
submit a summary of its plan along with certification of adoption to the
commute trip reduction task force established under RCW 70.94.537.

(8) Each county, city,
or town implementing a commute trip reduction program shall submit an annual
progress report to the commute trip reduction task force established under RCW
70.94.537. The report shall be due July 1, 1994, and each July 1st thereafter
through July 1, 2006. The report shall describe progress in attaining the
applicable commute trip reduction goals for each commute trip reduction zone
and shall highlight any problems being encountered in achieving the goals. The
information shall be reported in a form established by the commute trip
reduction task force.

(9) Any waivers or
modifications of the requirements of a commute trip reduction plan granted by a
jurisdiction shall be submitted for review to the commute trip reduction task
force established under RCW 70.94.537. The commute trip reduction task force
may not deny the granting of a waiver or modification of the requirements of a
commute trip reduction plan by a jurisdiction but they may notify the
jurisdiction of any comments or objections.

(10) Each county, city,
or town implementing a commute trip reduction program shall count commute trips
eliminated through work-at-home options or alternate work schedules as one and
two-tenths vehicle trips eliminated for the purpose of meeting trip reduction
goals.

(11) Each county, city,
or town implementing a commute trip reduction program shall ensure that
employers that have modified their employees' work schedules so that some or
all employees are not scheduled to arrive at work between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00
a.m. are provided credit when calculating single-occupancy vehicle use and
vehicle miles traveled at that worksite. This credit shall be awarded if
implementation of the schedule change was an identified element in that
worksite's approved commute trip reduction program or if the schedule change
occurred because of impacts associated with chapter 36.70A RCW, the growth
management act.

(12) Plans implemented
under this section shall not apply to commute trips for seasonal agricultural
employees.

(13) Plans implemented
under this section shall not apply to construction worksites when the expected
duration of the construction project is less than two years.

Sec. 29. RCW 70.94.537 and 1997 c
250 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A ((twenty-eight))
twenty-nine member state commute trip reduction task force is
established as follows:

(a) The secretary of
the department of transportation or the secretary's designee who shall serve as
chair;

(b) The director of the
department of ecology or the director's designee;

(c) The director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development or the director's
designee;

(d) The director of the
department of general administration or the director's designee;

(e) The director of
the state energy office or the director's designee;

(f) Three
representatives from counties appointed by the governor from a list of at least
six recommended by the Washington state association of counties;

(((f))) (g)
Three representatives from cities and towns appointed by the governor from a
list of at least six recommended by the association of Washington cities;

(((g))) (h)
Three representatives from transit agencies appointed by the governor from a
list of at least six recommended by the Washington state transit association;

(((h))) (i)
Twelve representatives of employers at or owners of major worksites in
Washington appointed by the governor from a list recommended by the association
of Washington business or other statewide business associations representing
major employers, provided that every affected county shall have at least one
representative; and

(((i))) (j)
Three citizens appointed by the governor.

Members of the commute
trip reduction task force shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Members appointed by the governor shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.220. The task force has all powers necessary to carry out its duties as
prescribed by this chapter. The task force shall be dissolved on July 1, 2006.

(2) By March 1, 1992,
the commute trip reduction task force shall establish guidelines for commute
trip reduction plans. The guidelines are intended to ensure consistency in
commute trip reduction plans and goals among jurisdictions while fairly taking
into account differences in employment and housing density, employer size,
existing and anticipated levels of transit service, special employer
circumstances, and other factors the task force determines to be relevant. The
guidelines shall include:

(a) Criteria for
establishing commute trip reduction zones;

(b) Methods and
information requirements for determining base year values of the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle miles
traveled per employee and progress toward meeting commute trip reduction plan
goals;

(c) Model commute trip
reduction ordinances;

(d) Methods for
assuring consistency in the treatment of employers who have worksites subject
to the requirements of this chapter in more than one jurisdiction;

(e) An appeals process
by which major employers, who as a result of special characteristics of their
business or its locations would be unable to meet the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan, may obtain a waiver or modification of those requirements
and criteria for determining eligibility for waiver or modification;

(f) Methods to ensure
that employers shall receive full credit for the results of transportation
demand management efforts and commute trip reduction programs which have been
implemented by major employers prior to the base year;

(g) Alternative commute
trip reduction goals for major employers which cannot meet the goals of this
chapter because of the unique nature of their business;

(h) Alternative commute
trip reduction goals for major employers whose worksites change and who
contribute substantially to traffic congestion in a trip reduction zone; and

(i) Methods to insure
that employers receive credit for scheduling changes enacted pursuant to the
criteria identified in RCW 70.94.527(11).

(3) The task force
shall work with jurisdictions, major employers, and other parties to develop
and implement a public awareness campaign designed to increase the
effectiveness of local commute trip reduction programs and support achievement
of the objectives identified in this chapter.

(4) The task force
shall assess the commute trip reduction options available to employers other
than major employers and make recommendations to the legislature by October 1,
1992. The recommendations shall include the minimum size of employer who shall
be required to implement trip reduction programs and the appropriate methods
those employers can use to accomplish trip reduction goals.

(5) The task force
shall review progress toward implementing commute trip reduction plans and
programs and the costs and benefits of commute trip reduction plans and
programs and shall make recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 1995,
December 1, 1999, December 1, 2001, December 1, 2003, and December 1, 2005. In
assessing the costs and benefits, the task force shall consider the costs of
not having implemented commute trip reduction plans and programs. The task
force shall examine other transportation demand management programs nationally and
incorporate its findings into its recommendations to the legislature. The
recommendations shall address the need for continuation, modification, or
termination or any or all requirements of this chapter. The recommendations
made December 1, 1995, shall include recommendations regarding extension of the
requirements of this chapter to employers with fifty or more full-time
employees at a single worksite who begin their regular work day between 6:00
a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays for more than twelve continuous months.

Sec. 30. RCW 70.94.541 and 1996 c
186 s 515 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A technical
assistance team shall be established under the direction of the department of
transportation and include representatives of the department of ecology and
the state energy office. The team shall provide staff support to the
commute trip reduction task force in carrying out the requirements of RCW
70.94.537 and to the department of general administration in carrying out the
requirements of RCW 70.94.551.

(2) The team shall
provide technical assistance to counties, cities, and towns, the department of
general administration, other state agencies, and other employers in developing
and implementing commute trip reduction plans and programs. The technical
assistance shall include: (a) Guidance in determining base and subsequent year
values of single-occupant vehicle commuting proportion and commute trip
reduction vehicle miles traveled to be used in determining progress in
attaining plan goals; (b) developing model plans and programs appropriate to
different situations; and (c) providing consistent training and informational
materials for the implementation of commute trip reduction programs. Model
plans and programs, training and informational materials shall be developed in
cooperation with representatives of local governments, transit agencies, and
employers.

(3) In carrying out
this section the department of transportation may contract with statewide
associations representing cities, towns, and counties to assist cities, towns,
and counties in implementing commute trip reduction plans and programs.

Sec. 31. RCW 70.94.960 and 1996 c
186 s 517 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may
disburse matching grants from funds provided by the legislature from the air
pollution control account, created in RCW 70.94.015, to units of local
government to partially offset the additional cost of purchasing "clean
fuel" and/or operating "clean-fuel vehicles" provided that such
vehicles are used for public transit. Publicly owned school buses are
considered public transit for the purposes of this section. The department may
also disburse grants to vocational-technical institutes for the purpose of
establishing programs to certify clean-fuel vehicle mechanics. The department
may also distribute grants to the state energy office and Washington
State University for the purpose of furthering the establishment of clean fuel
refueling infrastructure.

Sec. 32. RCW 82.35.080 and 1999 c
358 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall revoke any certificate
issued under this chapter if it finds that any of the following have occurred
with respect to the certificate:

(a) The certificate was
obtained by fraud or deliberate misrepresentation;

(b) The certificate was
obtained through the use of inaccurate data but without any intention to commit
fraud or misrepresentation;

(c) The facility was
constructed or operated in violation of any provision of this chapter or
provision imposed by the department as a condition of certification; or

(d) The cogeneration
facility is no longer capable of being operated for the primary purpose of
cogeneration.

(2) If the department
finds that there are few inaccuracies under subsection (1)(b) of this section
and that cumulatively they are insignificant in terms of the cost or operation
of the facility or that the inaccurate data is not attributable to carelessness
or negligence and its inclusion was reasonable under the circumstances, then
the department may provide for the continuance of the certificate and whatever
modification it considers in the public interest.

(3) Any person, firm,
corporation, or organization that obtains a certificate revoked under this
section shall be liable for the total amount of money saved by claiming the
credits and exemptions provided under this chapter. The total amount of the
credits shall be collected as delinquent business and occupation taxes, and the
total of the exemptions shall be collected and distributed as delinquent
property taxes. Interest shall accrue on the amounts of the credits and
exemptions from the date the taxes were otherwise due.

(4) The ((department
of community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office
shall provide technical assistance to the department in carrying out its
responsibilities under this section.

Sec. 33. RCW 90.03.247 and 1996 c
186 s 523 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever an application
for a permit to make beneficial use of public waters is approved relating to a
stream or other water body for which minimum flows or levels have been adopted
and are in effect at the time of approval, the permit shall be conditioned to
protect the levels or flows. No agency may establish minimum flows and levels
or similar water flow or level restrictions for any stream or lake of the state
other than the department of ecology whose authority to establish is exclusive,
as provided in chapter 90.03 RCW and RCW 90.22.010 and 90.54.040. The
provisions of other statutes, including but not limited to RCW ((75.20.100))
77.55.100 and chapter 43.21C RCW, may not be interpreted in a manner
that is inconsistent with this section. In establishing such minimum flows,
levels, or similar restrictions, the department shall, during all stages of
development by the department of ecology of minimum flow proposals, consult
with, and carefully consider the recommendations of, the department of fish and
wildlife, the ((department of community, trade, and economic development))
state energy office, the department of agriculture, and representatives
of the affected Indian tribes. Nothing herein shall preclude the department of
fish and wildlife, the ((department of community, trade, and economic
development)) state energy office, or the department of agriculture
from presenting its views on minimum flow needs at any public hearing or to any
person or agency, and the department of fish and wildlife, the ((department
of community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office,
and the department of agriculture are each empowered to participate in
proceedings of the federal energy regulatory commission and other agencies to
present its views on minimum flow needs.

Sec. 34. RCW 80.50.030 and 1996 c
186 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created
and established the energy facility site evaluation council.

(2)(a) The chairman of
the council shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of
the senate, shall have a vote on matters before the council, shall serve for a
term coextensive with the term of the governor, and is removable for cause.
The chairman may designate a member of the council to serve as acting chairman
in the event of the chairman's absence. The chairman is a "state
employee" for the purposes of chapter 42.52 RCW. As applicable, when
attending meetings of the council, members may receive reimbursement for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and are eligible for
compensation under RCW 43.03.250.

(b) The chairman or a
designee shall execute all official documents, contracts, and other materials
on behalf of the council. The ((Washington state department of community,
trade, and economic development)) state energy office shall provide
all administrative and staff support for the council. The director of the ((department
of community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office
has supervisory authority over the staff of the council and shall employ such
personnel as are necessary to implement this chapter. Not more than three such
employees may be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3) The council shall
consist of the directors, administrators, or their designees, of the following
departments, agencies, commissions, and committees or their statutory
successors:

(a) Department of
ecology;

(b) Department of fish
and wildlife;

(c) Department of
health;

(d) Military
department;

(e) Department of
community, trade, and economic development;

(f) Utilities and
transportation commission;

(g) Department of
natural resources;

(h) Department of
agriculture;

(i) Department of
transportation; and

(j) The state energy
office.

(4) The appropriate
county legislative authority of every county wherein an application for a
proposed site is filed shall appoint a member or designee as a voting member to
the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council
only at such times as the council considers the proposed site for the county
which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve until there
has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.

(5) The city
legislative authority of every city within whose corporate limits an energy
plant is proposed to be located shall appoint a member or designee as a voting
member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit with the
council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site for the
city which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve until
there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.

(6) For any port
district wherein an application for a proposed port facility is filed subject
to this chapter, the port district shall appoint a member or designee as a
nonvoting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit
with the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site
for the port district which he or she represents, and such member or designee
shall serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the
proposed site. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the port
district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or association with
any other person.

Sec. 35. RCW 41.06.070 and 1998 c
245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply to:

(a) The members of the
legislature or to any employee of, or position in, the legislative branch of
the state government including members, officers, and employees of the
legislative council, joint legislative audit and review committee, statute law
committee, and any interim committee of the legislature;

(b) The justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior courts or
of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or position in the judicial
branch of state government;

(c) Officers, academic
personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d) The officers of the
Washington state patrol;

(e) Elective officers
of the state;

(f) The chief executive
officer of each agency;

(g) In the departments
of employment security and social and health services, the director and the
director's confidential secretary; in all other departments, the executive head
of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the director, his or her
confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;

(h) In the case of a
multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the members thereof are
elected, appointed by the governor or other authority, serve ex officio, or are
otherwise chosen:

(i) All members of such
boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii) If the members of
the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time basis and there is a
statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board, commission, or
committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or committee;
and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of the board,
commission, or committee;

(iii) If the members of
the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time basis: The chief
executive officer or administrative officer as designated by the board,
commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair of the
board, commission, or committee;

(iv) If all members of
the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The chief executive
officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive officer;

(i) The confidential
secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate offices of the
elective officers of the state;

(j) Assistant attorneys
general;

(k) Commissioned and
enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l) Inmate, student,
part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as
defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m) The public printer
or to any employees of or positions in the state printing plant;

(n) Officers and
employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o) Officers and
employees of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p) Officers and
employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q) Officers and
employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r) Officers and
employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s) Officers and
employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t) ((Officers and
employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter 15.63 RCW;

(u))) Officers and employees of agricultural
commissions formed under chapter 15.65 RCW;

(((v))) (u)
Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 67.40
RCW;

(((w))) (v)
Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor relations in all
state agencies employing such executive assistants including but not limited to
all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards, or other bodies
subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection shall prevail
over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is
made in such law;

(((x))) (w)
In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads, assistant
directors or division directors, and not more than three principal policy
assistants who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency heads;

(((y))) (x)
All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z) Up to a total
of five senior staff positions of the western library network under chapter
27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing program
management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z) shall expire
on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y) Staff employed by the ((department
of community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office
to administer energy policy functions and manage energy site evaluation council
activities under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb))) (z)
Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy education,
applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as
provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2) The following
classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of higher education
and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this chapter:

(a) Members of the
governing board of each institution of higher education and related boards, all
presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential secretaries, administrative,
and personal assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed by
institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive heads of
major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial or professional
employees in an institution or related board having substantial responsibility
for directing or controlling program operations and accountable for allocation
of resources and program results, or for the formulation of institutional
policy, or for carrying out personnel administration or labor relations
functions, legislative relations, public information, development, senior
computer systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is one
which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who is employed
pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational program operating
outside of the state of Washington;

(b) Student, part-time,
or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by
the Washington personnel resources board, employed by institutions of higher
education and related boards;

(c) The governing board
of each institution, and related boards, may also exempt from this chapter
classifications involving research activities, counseling of students,
extension or continuing education activities, graphic arts or publications
activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or special training as
determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in
office, clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;

(d) Printing craft
employees in the department of printing at the University of Washington.

(3) In addition to the
exemptions specifically provided by this chapter, the Washington personnel
resources board may provide for further exemptions pursuant to the following
procedures. The governor or other appropriate elected official may submit
requests for exemption to the Washington personnel resources board stating the
reasons for requesting such exemptions. The Washington personnel resources
board shall hold a public hearing, after proper notice, on requests submitted
pursuant to this subsection. If the board determines that the position for
which exemption is requested is one involving substantial responsibility for
the formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving directing
and controlling program operations of an agency or a major administrative
division thereof, the Washington personnel resources board shall grant the
request and such determination shall be final as to any decision made before
July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions permitted under this
subsection shall not exceed one percent of the number of employees in the
classified service not including employees of institutions of higher education
and related boards for those agencies not directly under the authority of any
elected public official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total
of twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public officials
other than the governor.

The salary and fringe
benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted except for the chief
executive officer of each agency, full-time members of boards and commissions,
administrative assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office
of an elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (((v), (y), (z))) (u) and (x), and (2) of this section,
shall be determined by the Washington personnel resources board. However,
beginning with changes proposed for the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, changes to the
classification plan affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for
classified salary increases resulting from adjustments to the classification
plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.

Any person holding a
classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, when and
if such position is subsequently exempted from the application of this chapter,
be afforded the following rights: If such person previously held permanent
status in another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of
similar nature and salary.

Any classified employee
having civil service status in a classified position who accepts an appointment
in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion to the highest class of
position previously held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.

A person occupying an
exempt position who is terminated from the position for gross misconduct or
malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a classified position as
provided for in this section.

Sec. 36. RCW 43.19.123 and 1996 c
186 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the ((state energy office)) department of general
administration pertaining to energy efficiency in public buildings are
transferred to the ((department of general administration)) state
energy office. All references to the director or the ((state energy
office)) department of general administration in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the ((department of
general administration)) state energy office when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the ((state energy office)) department of general
administration pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the ((department of general
administration)) state energy office. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, software, data base, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the ((state energy office)) department of
general administration in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the ((department of general
administration)) state energy office. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be assigned to the ((department of general administration)) state
energy office.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the ((state energy office)) department of general
administration for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall, on July 1, ((1996)) 2001, be transferred and
credited to the ((department of general administration)) state energy
office.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in
the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) ((Within funds
available,)) Employees ((of the state energy office)) whose
primary responsibility is performing the powers, functions, and duties
pertaining to energy efficiency in public buildings are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the ((department of general administration)) state
energy office. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state
civil service law, are assigned to the ((department of general
administration)) state energy office to perform their usual duties
upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any
action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules
governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all
pending business before the ((state energy office)) department of
general administration pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the ((department of general
administration)) state energy office. All existing contracts and
obligations, excluding personnel contracts and obligations, shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the ((department of general administration))
state energy office.

(5) The transfer of the
powers, duties, functions, and personnel ((of the state energy office)) under
this section shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July
1, ((1996)) 2001.

(6) If apportionments of
budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section,
the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the
agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these
shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

Sec. 37. RCW 43.330.904 and 1996
c 186 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties,
and functions of the ((state energy office)) department of community,
trade, and economic development relating to energy resource policy and
planning and energy facility siting are transferred to the ((department of
community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office.
All references to the director or the ((state energy office)) department
of community, trade, and economic development in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the ((department of
community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office
when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

((The director shall
appoint an assistant director for energy policy, and energy policy staff shall
have no additional responsibilities beyond activities concerning energy policy.))

(2)(a) All reports,
documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the
possession of the ((state energy office)) department of community,
trade, and economic development pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the ((department of
community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office.
All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, data base, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the ((state energy office)) department
of community, trade, and economic development in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the ((department
of community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office.

(b) Any appropriations
made to the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall, on July 1, ((1996)) 2001, be
transferred and credited to the ((department of community, trade, and
economic development)) state energy office.

(c) Whenever any
question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records,
papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of
the ((state energy office)) department of community, trade, and
economic development engaged in performing the powers, functions, and
duties pertaining to the energy facility site evaluation council are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the ((department of community, trade, and
economic development)) state energy office. All employees engaged
in energy facility site evaluation council duties classified under chapter
41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the ((department of
community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all
pending business before the state energy office pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the ((department
of community, trade, and economic development)) state energy office.
All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the ((department of community, trade, and economic development))
state energy office.

(5) The transfer of the
powers, duties, and functions ((of the state energy office)) under
this section does not affect the validity of any act performed before July
1, ((1996)) 2001.

(6) If apportionments
of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this
section, the director of the office of financial management shall certify the
apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation.

(7) ((The department
of community, trade, and economic development shall direct the closure of the
financial records of the state energy office.

(8))) Responsibility for implementing energy
education, applied research, and technology transfer programs ((rests with))
shall be coordinated between the state energy office and Washington
State University. ((The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall provide Washington State University available existing and
future oil overcharge restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum
period of five years to carry out energy programs under an interagency
agreement with the department of community, trade, and economic development.
The interagency agreement shall also outline the working relationship between
the department of community, trade, and economic development and Washington
State University as it pertains to the relationship between energy policy
development and public outreach. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996
prohibits Washington State University from seeking grant, contract, or
fee-for-service funding for energy or related programs directly from other
entities.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
38. RCW 43.19.123 and
43.330.904 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.21F RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
39. The code reviser shall
alphabetize the definitions in RCW 43.21F.025 and correct any references.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
40. The code reviser shall
alphabetize the definitions in RCW 39.35.030 and correct any references.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 41. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of
the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---