BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) The United States
department of health and human services, which administers medicaid funding,
has announced that one of its goals is to integrate people with developmental
disabilities into the social mainstream, with equal opportunities and the chance
to make choices.

(b) The health care
financing administration is urging states to develop plans that strengthen
support systems and to actively involve people with disabilities and their
families in the design, development, and implementation of these plans.

(c) The Washington
state division of developmental disabilities strategies for the future
stakeholder work group, as directed by the legislature under RCW 71A.12.180,
developed recommendations for restructuring the delivery system to create one
that is based on an individual choice and self-determination service delivery
philosophy.

(d) There are presently
over five thousand persons in the state of Washington with developmental
disabilities who are in need of housing, including residential placement
services.

(e) Many families of
developmentally disabled persons are in need of additional services in the
areas of residential support, community relationships, peer development, job
training, and other ancillary activities to improve the quality of life and
service, and these needs cannot be met under current budgetary allocations.
These families are not only asking for assistance, they are also asking to be
an integral part of the planning process that affects their loved ones.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to authorize the secretary of social and health services to
develop and coordinate a pilot project to expand service options and support
services to persons with developmental disabilities and to serve as a model of
private and public funding coming together to offer unique options to families
who desire to be equal partners in developing support for their family members.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The secretary of
social and health services shall develop and coordinate a pilot project under
which the department contracts with an agency provider to administer necessary
support and services, including residential placement, for twenty eligible persons
with developmental disabilities. In addition, the department shall cooperate
with a private nonprofit community organization which provides additional
support services to augment contracted services to make sure each individual's
needs are met. The purpose of the pilot project is to:

(a) Provide services
for persons with developmental disabilities through a special public-private
partnership that is based on the principles of self-directed/person-centered
supports and that uses public and private dollars as the funding source;

(b) In cooperation with
licensed providers, establish and develop services for persons with
developmental disabilities through regionally administered and regionally
controlled programs;

(c) Augment the limited
resources of the state to provide a stable, secure, and more encompassing
provision of services and supports;

(d) Expand service
options to people with developmental disabilities; and

(e) Demonstrate a
person-centered, community-based, individually budgeted model of developing and
delivering service and support.

(2)(a) The pilot
project must be based on a service delivery model that is designed and
administered according to the needs of the individuals. All individuals to be
served must meet the criteria for services established by the division of
developmental disabilities and must be assessed using a person-centered
planning process. The pilot project shall provide services to eligible persons
with developmental disabilities representing a spectrum of needs. All persons
who meet the division of developmental disabilities criteria for service must
be considered regardless of disability, age, race, religious affiliation,
gender, socioeconomic status, or marital status.

(b) Based on the
assessment process, each participant is to be afforded the residential option
necessary to meet his or her individual needs.

(c) In accordance with
each individual plan, participants shall choose qualified providers to meet
their individual needs in such areas as:

(i) Health and medical
care;

(ii) Transportation;

(iii) Personal hygiene;

(iv) Meal planning and
preparation;

(v) Housekeeping;

(vi) Budgeting and
personal finance;

(vii) Home maintenance;

(viii) Supported
employment supports;

(ix) Recreation and
leisure planning;

(x) Community access
and involvement;

(xi) Self-advocacy; and

(xii) Family support.

(3) The department of
social and health services shall measure and monitor the quality of service
provided under the pilot project. Quality of service must be in compliance
with state and federal law.

(4) The department
shall evaluate the pilot project and make an initial report of its findings and
conclusions to the legislature by December 1, 2002, and a final report by
December 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The sum of seven
hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to
the department of social and health services to establish a pilot project as
provided in section 2 of this act in Region V.

(2) The
sum of nine hundred eighty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the
general fund to the department of social and health services to establish a
pilot project as provided in section 2 of this act in Region V.

---
END ---