BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is
added to chapter 70.119A

_5 RCW to read as follows:

_6 Public water systems must comply with all of the
following

_7 requirements in conducting fluoridation of a public
water supply:

_8 (1) Fluoridation is limited to the use of fluorine‑bearing

_9 chemicals that, at the optimum concentration for
addition to the

10 public water supply, release the total fluorine
component as free

11 fluoride anion.

12 (2) For the purposes of this section, the total
release of the

13 fluorine component must be determined by testing actual
potable

14 water, including the configuration of chemicals,
additives,

15 contaminants, and pH balance with first stage and second
stage

16 disinfectants, rather than with distilled water,
produced

17 following injection of the fluorine‑bearing
chemical. The

18 determination of total release must be by analysis
without the use

p. 1 SB
5968

_1 of supplemental agents or methods employed to influence
the

_2 release of fluoride from any fluorine‑bearing
chemical in which it

_3 still may be chemically bound, following procedures for
the normal

_4 administration of the chemical in a fluoridation
program.

_5 (3) The testing of actual potable water for the purposes
of

_6 this section must identify all compounds that are formed
in the

_7 resulting water. The injected fluorine‑bearing
chemical must be

_8 determined not to qualify as totally released as
required if the

_9 analysis finds: (a) A residual fraction of the injected

10 fluorine‑bearing chemical; (b) a partially
dissociated residue of

11 the injected fluorine‑bearing chemical; or (c) a
product of a

12 reaction of the injected fluorine‑bearing chemical
or its

13 dissociation products with some other substance in the
water,

14 whether naturally occurring or added, that does not meet
all

15 acceptable standards for human exposure according to
state and

16 federal standards.

17 (4) The analysis of the fluorine‑bearing
chemical must be

18 performed by an independent certified laboratory capable
of

19 providing detection for the fluorine‑bearing
species and any

20 product of a reaction of the fluorine‑bearing
chemical or its

21 dissociation products at parts per billion.

22 (5) The costs of the analysis may not be borne by
the public

23 water system. An entity or person that distributes the

24 fluorine‑bearing chemical to a public water system
is responsible

25 for ensuring that an analysis of the fluorine‑bearing
chemical has

26 been performed in accordance with this section.

27 (6) No fluorine‑containing substance that
meets any one of the

28 following criteria may be added to the public water
supply:

29 (a) The substance is classified as a pesticide by a
state or

30 federal agency;

31 (b) The substance is classified as a hazardous or
toxic waste

32 by a state or federal authority; or

33 (c) The substance could be classified as a hazardous
or toxic

34 waste under criteria specified in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 261.20
through

35 261.24 (1980).

36 (7) No substance that is derived from a substance
specified in

37 subsection (6) of this section may be added to the
public water

38 supply.

SB 5968 p. 2

_1 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 70.119A

_2 RCW to read as follows:

_3 A product, substance, device, element, medicine, or
preventive

_4 agent may not be added to any public water supply for
the specific

_5 intent of human consumption or for the purpose of
affecting the

_6 physical or mental functions of the body of any person
consuming

_7 the water, rather than for the purpose of making water
more

_8 potable, unless it has been tested and approved as safe
and

_9 effective for the purpose for which it is to be added by
the

10 United States food and drug administration.

11 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of
this act or its

12 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

13 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

14 persons or circumstances is not affected.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
5968