BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that employers are becoming increasingly discouraged from disclosing job
reference information. The legislature further finds that full disclosure of
such information will increase productivity, enhance the safety of the workplace,
and provide greater opportunities to disadvantaged groups who may not have the
educational background or resumes of other workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

An employer who
discloses information about a former or current employee's job performance,
conduct, or other work-related information to a prospective employer, or
employment agency as defined by RCW 49.60.040, at the specific request of that
individual employer or employment agency, is presumed to be acting in good
faith and is immune from civil liability for such disclosure or its
consequences. For purposes of this section, the presumption of good faith may
only be rebutted upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the
information disclosed by the employer was knowingly false or deliberately
misleading.

The
information disclosed by the employer shall be forwarded within five business
days from the date of disclosure to the employee.

---
END ---