BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 3.66.067 and 1984 c
258 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

After a conviction, the
court may ((defer sentencing)) impose sentence by suspending all or a
portion of the defendant's sentence or by deferring the sentence of the
defendant and may place the defendant on probation for a period of no
longer than two years and prescribe the conditions thereof((, but in no
case shall it extend for more than two years from the date of conviction)).
A defendant who has been sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and
who then fails to appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance
with the terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall have the
term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or her presence
known to the court on the record. During the time of the deferral, the
court may, for good cause shown, permit a defendant to withdraw the plea of
guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, and the court may dismiss the
charges.

Sec. 2. RCW 3.66.068 and 1999 c
56 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For a period not to
exceed five years after imposition of sentence for a defendant sentenced under
RCW 46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of sentence for all other
offenses, the court has continuing jurisdiction and authority to suspend or
defer the execution of all or any part of its sentence upon stated terms,
including installment payment of fines. A defendant who has been sentenced,
or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then fails to appear for any
hearing to address the defendant's compliance with the terms of probation when
ordered to do so by the court, shall have the term of probation tolled until
such time as the defendant makes his or her presence known to the court on the
record. However, the jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to
the enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720.

Sec. 3. RCW 35.20.255 and 1999 c
56 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Judges of the municipal
court, in their discretion, shall have the power in all criminal proceedings
within their jurisdiction including violations of city ordinances, to defer
imposition of any sentence, suspend all or part of any sentence including
installment payment of fines, fix the terms of any such deferral or
suspension, and provide for such probation ((and parole)) as in their
opinion is reasonable and necessary under the circumstances of the case, but in
no case shall it extend for more than five years from the date of conviction
for a defendant to be sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years from the
date of conviction for all other offenses. A defendant who has been
sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then fails to appear
for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance with the terms of
probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall have the term of probation
tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or her presence known to the
court on the record. However, the jurisdiction period in this section does
not apply to the enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. Any time
before entering an order terminating probation, the court may modify or revoke
its order suspending or deferring the imposition or execution of the sentence.

Sec. 4. RCW 3.50.320 and 1984 c
258 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

After a conviction, the
court may ((defer sentencing)) impose sentence by suspending all or a
portion of the defendant's sentence or by deferring the sentence of the
defendant and may place the defendant on probation for a period
of no longer than two years and prescribe the conditions thereof((, but
in no case shall it extend for more than two years from the date of conviction)).
A defendant who has been sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and
who then fails to appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance
with the terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall have the
term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or her
presence known to the court on the record. During the time of the
deferral, the court may, for good cause shown, permit a defendant to withdraw
the plea of guilty, permit the defendant to enter a plea of not guilty, and
dismiss the charges.

Sec. 5. RCW 3.50.330 and 1999 c
56 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For a
period not to exceed five years after imposition of sentence for a defendant
sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of sentence for
all other offenses, the court shall have continuing jurisdiction and authority
to suspend or defer the execution of all or any part of the sentence
upon stated terms, including installment payment of fines. A defendant who
has been sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then fails to
appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance with the terms of
probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall have the term of probation
tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or her presence known to the
court on the record. However, the jurisdiction period in this section does
not apply to the enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. Any time
before entering an order terminating probation, the court may modify or revoke
its order suspending or deferring the imposition or execution of the sentence.

---
END ---