BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 47.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall issue a request for proposal by July 1, 2002, for the purpose of
constructing a ten-mile toll facility on Interstate 405, bordered by Interstate
5 in Tukwila and Interstate 90.

(2) Tolls on the
facility may be no more than two dollars, unless the department determines that
an increase in tolls is necessary to retire the bonds for the facility by 2040.

(3) Toll revenues may
only be used for the costs associated with design and construction, operation
and maintenance, and toll collection on the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall establish a process for selling trips on the toll facility to all
licensed drivers in the state.

(2) The department
shall not sell more than fifteen trips per year to each licensed driver in the
state.

(3) Licensed drivers
may sell their toll facility trips. The trips may be sold at a price greater
or less than the price fixed by the department. The department must establish
a reporting process for persons who sell their trips.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 47.56 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may issue bonds for the construction of the toll road authorized
under section 1 of this act. Bonds issued for the construction of the toll
road under the authority of the department must be issued in the name of the
department, are obligations only of the department, must be identified as
". . . . . . Toll Road Bonds," and contain a
recital on their face that the payment or redemption of the bonds and the
payment of the interest on them is secured by a direct and exclusive charge and
lien upon any tolls and other revenues received from the operation of the
particular toll road for the construction of which the bonds are issued and
that neither the payment of the principal or any part of it nor of the interest
or any part of it is a debt, liability, or obligation of the state of
Washington. The department may receive and accept funds from the state of
Washington or the federal government upon a cooperative or other basis for the
construction of the toll road authorized under section 1 of this act and may
enter into such agreements with the state of Washington or the federal government
as may be required for securing the funds.

---
END ---