BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_7 Sec. 1. RCW
13.40.210 and 1997 c 338 s 32 are each amended to read

_8 as follows:

_9 (1) The secretary shall((, except in the case of
a juvenile

10 committed by a court to a term of confinement in a
state

11 institution outside the appropriate standard range
for the

12 offense(s) for which the juvenile was found to be
guilty

13 established pursuant to RCW 13.40.030,)) set a
release ((or

14 discharge)) date for each juvenile committed to
its custody. The

15 release ((or discharge)) date shall be within the
prescribed range

16 to which a juvenile has been committed under RCW
13.40.0357 or

17 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320
concerning offenders

18 the department determines are eligible for the juvenile
offender

p. 1 SB
5972

_1 basic training camp program. Such dates shall be
determined prior

_2 to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's
minimum term of

_3 confinement included within the prescribed range to
which the

_4 juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall
release any

_5 juvenile committed to the custody of the department
within four

_6 calendar days prior to the juvenile's release date or on
the

_7 release date set under this chapter. Days spent in the
custody of

_8 the department shall be tolled by any period of time
during which

_9 a juvenile has absented himself or herself from the
department's

10 supervision without the prior approval of the secretary
or the

11 secretary's designee.

12 (2) The secretary shall monitor the average daily
population of

13 the state's juvenile residential facilities. When the
secretary

14 concludes that in-residence population of residential
facilities

15 exceeds one hundred five percent of the rated bed
capacity

16 specified in statute, or in absence of such
specification, as

17 specified by the department in rule, the secretary may
recommend

18 reductions to the governor. On certification by the
governor that

19 the recommended reductions are necessary, the secretary
has

20 authority to administratively release a sufficient
number of

21 offenders to reduce in-residence population to one
hundred percent

22 of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release
those offenders

23 who have served the greatest proportion of their
sentence. However,

24 the secretary may deny release in a particular case at
the request

25 of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is
no

26 responsible custodian, as determined by the department,
to whom to

27 release the offender, or if the release of the offender
would pose

28 a clear danger to society. The department shall notify
the

29 committing court of the release at the time of release
if any such

30 early releases have occurred as a result of excessive
in-residence

31 population. In no event shall an offender adjudicated
of a violent

32 offense be granted release under the provisions of this

33 subsection.

34 (3)(a) Following the ((juvenile's)) release of
any juvenile

35 under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary may
require

36 the juvenile to comply with a program of parole to be
administered

37 by the department in his or her community which shall
last no

38 longer than eighteen months, except that in the case of
a juvenile

SB 5972 p. 2

_1 sentenced for rape in the first or second degree, rape
of a child

_2 in the first or second degree, child molestation in the
first

_3 degree, or indecent liberties with forcible compulsion,
the period

_4 of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in the
discretion of

_5 the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when the
secretary

_6 finds that an additional period of parole is necessary
and

_7 appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet
the

_8 ongoing needs of the juvenile. A parole program is
mandatory for

_9 offenders released under subsection (2) of this
section. The

10 decision to place an offender on parole shall be based
on an

11 assessment by the department of the offender's risk for

12 reoffending upon release. The department shall
prioritize available

13 parole resources to provide supervision and services to
offenders

14 at moderate to high risk for reoffending.

15 (b) The secretary shall, for the period of parole,
facilitate

16 the juvenile's reintegration into his or her community
and to

17 further this goal shall require the juvenile to refrain
from

18 possessing a firearm or using a deadly weapon and
refrain from

19 committing new offenses and may require the juvenile
to: (i)

20 Undergo available medical, psychiatric, drug and
alcohol, sex

21 offender, mental health, and other offense-related
treatment

22 services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer
and/or

23 designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational
training, or

24 employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the
current address

25 where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular
address

26 during specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed
geographical

27 boundaries; (vii) submit to electronic monitoring;
(viii) refrain

28 from using illegal drugs and alcohol, and submit to
random

29 urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole
officer; (ix)

30 refrain from contact with specific individuals or a
specified

31 class of individuals; (x) meet other conditions
determined by the

32 parole officer to further enhance the juvenile's
reintegration

33 into the community; (xi) pay any court-ordered fines or

34 restitution; and (xii) perform community service.
Community service

35 for the purpose of this section means compulsory
service, without

36 compensation, performed for the benefit of the community
by the

37 offender. Community service may be performed through
public or

38 private organizations or through work crews.

p. 3 SB
5972

_1 (c) The secretary may further require up to
twenty-five percent

_2 of the highest risk juvenile offenders who are placed on
parole to

_3 participate in an intensive supervision program. Offenders

_4 participating in an intensive supervision program shall
be

_5 required to comply with all terms and conditions listed
in (b) of

_6 this subsection and shall also be required to comply
with the

_7 following additional terms and conditions: (i) Obey all
laws and

_8 refrain from any conduct that threatens public safety;
(ii) report

_9 at least once a week to an assigned community case
manager; and

10 (iii) meet all other requirements imposed by the community
case

11 manager related to participating in the intensive
supervision

12 program. As a part of the intensive supervision
program, the

13 secretary may require day reporting.

14 (d) After termination of the parole period, the
juvenile shall

15 be discharged from the department's supervision.

16 (4)(a) The department may also modify parole for
violation

17 thereof. If, after affording a juvenile all of the due
process

18 rights to which he or she would be entitled if the
juvenile were

19 an adult, the secretary finds that a juvenile has
violated a

20 condition of his or her parole, the secretary shall
order one of

21 the following which is reasonably likely to effectuate
the purpose

22 of the parole and to protect the public: (i) Continued

23 supervision under the same conditions previously
imposed; (ii)

24 intensified supervision with increased reporting
requirements;

25 (iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by
this

26 chapter; (iv) except as provided in (a)(v) of this
subsection,

27 imposition of a period of confinement not to exceed
thirty days in

28 a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with
the state of

29 Washington or any city or county for a portion of each
day or for

30 a certain number of days each week with the balance of
the days or

31 weeks spent under supervision; and (v) the secretary may
order any

32 of the conditions or may return the offender to
confinement for

33 the remainder of the sentence range if the offense for
which the

34 offender was sentenced is rape in the first or second
degree, rape

35 of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the

36 first degree, indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, or a

37 sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as
defined by

38 RCW 9.94A.030.

SB 5972 p. 4

_1 (b) If the department finds that any juvenile in a
program of

_2 parole has possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon
during the

_3 program of parole, the department shall modify the
parole under

_4 (a) of this subsection and confine the juvenile for at
least

_5 thirty days. Confinement shall be in a facility
operated by or

_6 pursuant to a contract with the state or any county.

_7 (5) A parole officer of the department of social and
health

_8 services shall have the power to arrest a juvenile under
his or

_9 her supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement
officer

10 would be authorized to arrest the person.

11 (6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06
RCW, the

12 secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to
perform

13 functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section.

14 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

15 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

16 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

17 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 5 SB
5972