BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that:

(1) Small farms are an
important part of our public economy, quality of life, health, history, and
appropriate land stewardship;

(2) The state would
greatly benefit from a focused effort to increase the economic viability and
profitability of small farms through increasing their ability to market their
products;

(3) Marketing
strategies are often difficult for small farmers to undertake because of market
barriers and the difficulty of obtaining information related to marketing; and

(4) A marketing assistance
conference for small farms could provide the needed information, technical
assistance, and barrier clearing work that is key to increasing marketing of
farm products.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The department of
agriculture shall convene a conference to improve domestic and international
marketing opportunities for small farms. To assist in planning the conference,
the department of agriculture must consult with interested associations,
companies, individuals, farmers' markets, local produce buyers, various
advisory groups including the organic advisory board, and the Washington state
cooperative extension. In addition, the department of agriculture must consult
with the department of community, trade, and economic development to assess
what international business services would be useful to further marketing
efforts by small farmers abroad.

(2) The conference must
be organized to provide marketing ideas and concepts that could be utilized by
small farmers, alone or in concert with other small farmers, that would enhance
the economic viability of small farmers whether through direct sales to
consumers or other marketing techniques.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of forty‑nine
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department
of agriculture for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---