BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1)(a) As the legislature
has previously declared in RCW 13.34.130 and elsewhere, children needing
out-of-home placement should be placed with a suitable relative when one is
available. The process of locating relatives can be complicated by lack of
information, including full legal names, dates, and places of birth, and former
addresses.

(b) The legislature
recognizes that adult adoptees adopted after October 1993 have a right to their
original birth certificate upon turning eighteen years of age, if no affidavit
of nondisclosure has been filed, according to RCW 26.33.345. An adult adoptee
who is interested in locating birth parents and other relatives may be able to
use the information on his or her birth certificate to aid in the search.

(c) The legislature
finds that foster children who have turned eighteen lose most of their state
support. These foster children are in need of adult support, and may be
interested in contacting family members, but may not know how to locate them.
The legislature finds that former foster children often have family willing to
provide support, but the former foster child may have difficulty locating them
if legal names are not known.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature:

(a) To make it easier
for child welfare services to locate relatives for out-of-home placement by
expanding the information available from birth records to include grandparents'
information;

(b) To make it easier
for adult adoptees and children who have aged out of foster care to locate
relatives by providing access to known grandparents' information as well as
parents' information;

(c) That grandparents'
information be solicited and provided on a voluntary basis during the data
collection for birth certificates.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 70.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall, by rule, develop a procedure for storing voluntary grandparents'
information with the birth certificate, whether on the certificate itself in a
new section, or only in data base form. The requested information shall
include:

(a) The full legal
names of the grandparents;

(b) The date and place
of birth of the grandparents; and

(c) The current address
of the grandparents.

(2) The department's
procedure shall require the attending physician, midwife, or his or her agent
to request grandparents' information from the parent or parents of a newborn.
When requesting information for birth certificates, the attending physician,
midwife, or his or her agent shall inform the parent or parents that providing
grandparents' information is voluntary and that if it is provided it will be
stored with the birth certificate and could be used as contact information in out-of-home
placement proceedings or by adult adoptees or former foster children.

(3) The department
shall develop informational and educational materials for hospitals, midwives,
and the department of social and health services and local registrars to inform
health care and social workers of requirements and information resources provided
under this section.

(4) Nothing in this
section may be construed to affect existing legal rights of any person, whether
a child, parent, or grandparent.

(5) For the purposes of
this section, "grandparent" means the person or persons listed on the
birth certificate of the parent or parents of the child whose grandparents'
information is being requested.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.58.080 and 1997 c
58 s 937 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within ten days
after the birth of any child, the attending physician, midwife, or his or her
agent shall:

(a) Fill out a
certificate of birth, giving all of the particulars required, including: (i)
The mother's name and date of birth, and (ii) if the mother and father are
married at the time of birth or the father has signed an acknowledgment of
paternity, the father's name and date of birth; and

(b) File the
certificate of birth together with the mother's and father's social security
numbers, and any voluntarily provided grandparents' information, with
the state registrar of vital statistics.

(2) The local registrar
shall forward the birth certificate, any signed affidavit acknowledging
paternity, ((and)) the mother's and father's social security numbers,
and any voluntarily provided grandparents' information, to the state office
of vital statistics pursuant to RCW 70.58.030.

(3) The state registrar
of vital statistics shall make available to the division of child support the
birth certificates, the mother's and father's social security numbers and
paternity affidavits.

(4) Upon the birth of a
child to an unmarried woman, the attending physician, midwife, or his or her
agent shall:

(a) Provide an
opportunity for the child's mother and natural father to complete an affidavit
acknowledging paternity. The completed affidavit shall be filed with the state
registrar of vital statistics. The affidavit shall contain or have attached:

(i) A sworn statement
by the mother consenting to the assertion of paternity and stating that this is
the only possible father;

(ii) A statement by the
father that he is the natural father of the child;

(iii) A sworn statement
signed by the mother and the putative father that each has been given notice,
both orally and in writing, of the alternatives to, the legal consequences of,
and the rights, including, if one parent is a minor, any rights afforded due to
minority status, and responsibilities that arise from, signing the affidavit
acknowledging paternity;

(iv) Written
information, furnished by the department of social and health services,
explaining the implications of signing, including parental rights and
responsibilities; and

(v) The social security
numbers of both parents.

(b) Provide written
information and oral information, furnished by the department of social and
health services, to the mother and the father regarding the benefits of having
the child's paternity established and of the availability of paternity
establishment services, including a request for support enforcement services.
The oral and written information shall also include information regarding the
alternatives to, the legal consequences of, and the rights, including, if one
parent is a minor any rights afforded due to minority status, and
responsibilities that arise from, signing the affidavit acknowledging
paternity.

(5) The physician or
midwife or his or her agent is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable costs,
which the department shall establish by rule, when an affidavit acknowledging
paternity is filed with the state registrar of vital statistics.

(6) If there is no
attending physician or midwife, the father or mother of the child, householder
or owner of the premises, manager or superintendent of the public or private
institution in which the birth occurred, shall notify the local registrar,
within ten days after the birth, of the fact of the birth, and the local
registrar shall secure the necessary information and signature to make a proper
certificate of birth.

(7) When an infant is
found for whom no certificate of birth is known to be on file, a birth
certificate shall be filed within the time and in the form prescribed by the
state board of health.

(8) When
no putative father is named on a birth certificate of a child born to an unwed
mother the mother may give any surname she so desires to her child but shall
designate in space provided for father's name on the birth certificate
"None Named".

---
END ---