BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 54.04.020 and 1931 c
1 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Municipal corporations,
to be known as public utility districts, are hereby authorized for the purposes
of chapter 1, Laws of 1931 and may be established within the limits of the
state of Washington, as provided herein.

Nothing
in this chapter may be construed to authorize public utility districts to
provide services including but not limited to internet access, home security
services, electrical appliance repair generally, telephone services, cell phone
and paging services, and other ancillary services not directly related to the
provisioning of public utility service, including water and electricity for all
uses, unless otherwise specifically authorized.

--- END ---