BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that establishing a school safety center will provide school districts with:
The assistance necessary to create a consistent, comprehensive approach to
school safety for every school and every school district; the means to share
safety information among school districts; and a process for schools to
effectively integrate safe school planning with emergency preparedness
personnel, the criminal justice training commission, and local, county, and
state law enforcement officers.

The safety center shall
disseminate successful models of school safety plans and cooperative efforts;
provide assistance to schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan;
select models of cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as
an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a
school district either in Washington or in another state; coordinate activities
relating to school safety; review and approve manuals and curricula used for
school safety models and training; and develop and maintain a school safety
information web site.

The school safety
center shall be established in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall participate in a
school safety center advisory committee that includes representatives of
educators, classified staff, principals, superintendents, administrators, the
American society for industrial security, the state criminal justice training
commission, and others deemed appropriate and approved by the school safety
center advisory committee. Members of the committee shall be chosen by the
groups they represent. In addition, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall appoint representatives of law enforcement to participate
on the school safety center advisory committee. The advisory committee shall
select a chair.

The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop a training program, using the best
practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel. The criminal
justice training commission with assistance of the advisory committee shall
develop manuals and curricula for a training program for all school safety
personnel. The Washington state criminal justice training commission, in
collaboration with the advisory committee, shall provide the school safety
training for all school administrators and school safety personnel, including
school safety personnel hired after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

A consistent
comprehensive approach to school safety includes a comprehensive safe school
plan and implementation of the plan. Each school district shall direct schools
in its district to develop, by September 1, 2003, a comprehensive safe school
plan. The plan shall cover prevention, intervention, all hazards and crisis
response, and postcrisis recovery. Staff, students, parents, the community,
law enforcement, and emergency preparedness shall be involved in the
development and implementation of the plan. Each school shall annually review
its comprehensive safe school plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent vendor
to establish the school safety hotline. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, with the recommendations of the school safety center
advisory committee, shall develop the request for proposal to obtain hotline
services. The hotline shall include the maintenance and operation of a
toll-free, confidential hotline available for students, parents, school
personnel, and community members to report information, including anonymous
tips, on any activity threatening a school, students, visitors, or personnel,
including suicide.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---