BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The senate committee on
labor, commerce, and financial institutions and the house committee on commerce
and labor shall cause an interim joint study to be performed regarding the
possibility that below-cost sales of petroleum may have an anticompetitive effect.
The interim study shall examine petroleum marketing practices and evaluate
whether and to what extent below-cost sales may constitute deceptive
advertising, unfair competition, or other anticompetitive effects. The study
shall also research whether such below-cost sales promote bankruptcies,
unemployment, and other economic dislocation in the areas in which they occur.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The joint interim study
shall report its findings to the committees set forth in section 1 of this act
on or before December 1, 2001.

---
END ---