BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.160.080 and 1985
c 236 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Local fire
departments or fire districts and local health departments may adopt
regulations as required to implement this chapter.

(2)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prevent a city, town, or county
from adopting ordinances more restrictive than regulations adopted under this
chapter that restrict or prohibit smoking in public places situated within its
jurisdiction.

--- END ---