BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 8.26.035 and 1988 c
90 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a program
or project to be undertaken by a displacing agency will result in the
displacement of any person, the displacing agency shall provide for the payment
to the displaced person of:

(a) Actual reasonable
expenses in moving himself, his family, business, farm operation, or other personal
property;

(b) Actual direct
losses of tangible personal property as a result of moving or discontinuing a
business or farm operation, but not to exceed an amount equal to the reasonable
expenses that would have been required to relocate the property, in accordance
with criteria established by the lead agency;

(c) Actual reasonable
expenses in searching for a replacement business or farm; and

(d)(i) Actual
reasonable expenses necessary to reestablish a displaced farm, nonprofit
organization, or small business at its new site, by rule, in accordance
with criteria established by the lead agency((, but not to exceed ten
thousand dollars)).

(ii) All rules
adopted to establish reasonable expenses under this subsection (1)(d) shall be
made prior to December 1st of any year and do not take effect before the end of
the regular legislative session the following year.

(2) A displaced person
eligible for payments under subsection (1) of this section who is displaced
from a dwelling and who elects to accept the payments authorized by this
subsection in lieu of the payments authorized by subsection (1) of this section
may receive an expense and dislocation allowance determined according to a
schedule established by the lead agency.

(3) A
displaced person eligible for payments under subsection (1) of this section who
is displaced from the person's place of business or farm operation and who is
eligible under criteria established by the lead agency may elect to accept the
payment authorized by this subsection in lieu of the payment authorized by
subsection (1) of this section. The payment shall consist of a fixed payment
in an amount to be determined according to criteria established by the lead
agency, except that the payment shall be not less than one thousand dollars nor
more than twenty thousand dollars. A person whose sole business at the
displacement dwelling is the rental of that property to others does not qualify
for a payment under this subsection.

--- END ---