BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.12.455 and 2000 c
93 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, "establishment" and "institution" mean and include
every private or county or municipal hospital, sanitarium, home, or
other place receiving or caring for any mentally ill, mentally incompetent
person, or chemically dependent person.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.12.460 and 2000 c
93 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

No person,
association, county, municipality, or corporation, shall establish or
keep, for compensation or hire, an establishment as defined in this chapter
without first having obtained a license therefor from the department of health,
complied with rules adopted under this chapter, and paid the license fee
provided in this chapter. Any person who carries on, conducts, or attempts to
carry on or conduct an establishment as defined in this chapter without first
having obtained a license from the department of health, as in this chapter
provided, is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be
punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a
fine not exceeding one thousand dollars, or by both such fine and
imprisonment. The managing and executive officers of any corporation violating
the provisions of this chapter shall be liable under the provisions of this
chapter in the same manner and to the same effect as a private individual
violating the same.

---
END ---