BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.160.020 and 1985
c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Lounge or
lounge area" means an area: (a) Used for the preparation, sale, and
service of beer, wine, or spirits that is licensed for such use by the
Washington state liquor control board; and (b) that is conspicuously posted at
all entrances that persons under twenty-one years of age are not permitted to
enter or remain.

(2)
"Smoke" or "smoking" means the carrying or smoking of any
kind of lighted pipe, cigar, cigarette, or any other lighted smoking equipment.

(((2))) (3)
"Public place" means that portion of any building or vehicle used by
and open to the public, regardless of whether the building or vehicle is owned
in whole or in part by private persons or entities, the state of Washington, or
other public entity, and regardless of whether a fee is charged for admission.

Public places include,
but are not limited to: Elevators, public conveyances or transportation
facilities, museums, concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls,
indoor sports arenas, hospitals, nursing homes, health care facilities or
clinics, enclosed shopping centers, retail stores, retail service
establishments, financial institutions, educational facilities, ticket areas,
public hearing facilities, state legislative chambers and immediately adjacent
hallways, public restrooms, libraries, restaurants, waiting areas, lobbies, and
reception areas. A public place does not include a private residence. This
chapter is not intended to restrict smoking in private facilities which are
occasionally open to the public except upon the occasions when the facility is
open to the public.

(((3))) (4)
"Restaurant" means any building, structure, or area used, maintained,
or advertised as, or held out to the public to be, an enclosure where meals are
made available to be consumed on the premises, for consideration of payment.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.160.030 and 1985
c 236 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No person may smoke in
a public place except as provided in ((designated smoking areas))
RCW 70.160.040.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.160.040 and 1985
c 236 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((A smoking area
may be designated in a public place by the owner or, in the case of a leased or
rented space, by the lessee or other person in charge except in:

(a) Elevators;
buses, except for private hire; streetcars; taxis, except those clearly and
visibly designated by the owner to permit smoking; public areas of retail
stores and lobbies of financial institutions; office reception areas and
waiting rooms of any building owned or leased by the state of Washington or by
any city, county, or other municipality in the state of Washington; museums;
public meetings or hearings; classrooms and lecture halls of schools, colleges,
and universities; and the seating areas and aisle ways which are contiguous to
seating areas of concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, and
indoor sports arenas; and

(b) Hallways of
health care facilities, with the exception of nursing homes, and lobbies of
concert halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, and indoor sports
arenas, if the area is not physically separated. Owners or other persons in
charge are not required to incur any expense to make structural or other
physical modifications in providing these areas.

Except as provided
in other provisions of this chapter,)) No public place, other than a bar, tavern, ((bowling alley))
card room or enhanced card room, tobacco shop, lounge or lounge area,
or ((restaurant)) any other area where persons under eighteen years
of age are not permitted to enter or remain and such designation is
conspicuously posted at all entrances, private hire buses, and taxis that are
clearly and visibly designated by the owner to permit smoking, may be
designated as a smoking area ((in its entirety)). If a bar, tavern,
card room or enhanced card room, tobacco shop, lounge or lounge area,
or ((restaurant)) other area where persons under eighteen years of
age are not permitted to enter or remain is designated as a smoking area ((in
its entirety)), this designation shall be posted conspicuously ((on))
at all entrances normally used by the public.

(2) Where smoking areas
are designated, existing physical barriers and ventilation systems shall be
used to minimize the toxic effect of smoke in adjacent nonsmoking areas.

(3) ((Managers of
restaurants who choose to provide smoking areas shall designate an adequate
amount of seating to meet the demands of restaurant patrons who wish to smoke.))
Owners of restaurants are not required to incur any expense to make structural
or other physical modifications in providing these areas, except as
determined in the regulations developed under subsection (4) of this section.
((Restaurant patrons shall be informed that separate smoking and nonsmoking
sections are available.))

(4)(a) By December
31, 2002, the department of health, in consultation with the liquor control
board and the department of labor and industries, shall adopt rules for the
purpose of protecting the health of nonsmokers from the hazards of exposure to
environmental tobacco smoke. These rules shall address at least the following
issues:

(i) Ensuring that
smoking occurs at a reasonable distance away from any area where smoking is
prohibited, to ensure that tobacco smoke does not enter the area; and

(ii) Mechanical
and/or physical barriers between nonsmoking and smoking areas in restaurants,
restaurant lounges, and other applicable locations.

(b) Before making
rules under this subsection, the secretary of health shall consider proposed
rules to be developed and approved by a task force of nine members, four of
which shall be appointed by the secretary of the department of health from a
list submitted by the Washington restaurant association, and four of which
shall be appointed by the secretary of the department of health from a list
submitted by the Washington alliance for tobacco control and children's
health. The ninth member and chair of the task force shall be the attorney
general or his or her designee. The task force shall report its results to the
appropriate legislative committees and the secretary of the department of
health by December 31, 2001. These rules shall take effect July 1, 2003.

(c) The rules
adopted under this subsection shall be enforced by local health departments
under this chapter unless the legislature determines that another enforcement
entity is more suitable.

(d) In the event of
a question or dispute regarding the applicability of the rules adopted under
this subsection, interpretations of the state department of health shall be
controlling.

(5) Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a facility or area may be designated in its
entirety as a nonsmoking area by the owner or other person in charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This act shall not be
interpreted or construed to permit smoking where it is otherwise restricted by
other applicable state laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
December 31, 2001.

---
END ---