BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. To ensure that the state
budget system continues to operate with stability and predictability, the
legislature finds that it is necessary to maintain a general fund expenditure
limit as first enacted by Initiative 601. An expenditure limit can prevent budgeting
crises that can occur because of increased spending levels during periods of
revenue surplus followed by drastic reductions in state services in lean
years. The legislature also finds that the current strictly formulaic
calculation of an expenditure limit based solely on population growth and
inflation no longer adequately addresses for the needs of our citizens. The
people of Washington are best served by an expenditure limit that will keep
pace with the growth in the state's economy yet still ensure budget discipline
and taxpayer protection. For these reasons, the legislature finds that a limit
based on growth in the state personal income will recognize not only the growth
in population and inflation but also the economic productivity of our economy
and therefore better balance the needs of the citizens for essential government
services with the obligation of the legislature for strict spending
accountability and protection of its taxpayers.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.135.010 and 1994
c 2 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The people of the state
of Washington hereby find and declare:

(1) The continuing
increases in our state tax burden and the corresponding growth of state
government is contrary to the interest of the people of the state of
Washington.

(2) It is necessary to
limit the rate of growth of state government while assuring adequate funding of
essential services, including basic education as defined by the legislature.

(3) The current
budgetary system in the state of Washington lacks stability. The system
encourages crisis budgeting and results in cutbacks during lean years and
overspending during surplus years.

(4) It is therefore the
intent of this chapter to:

(a) Establish a limit
on state expenditures that will assure that the growth rate of state
expenditures does not exceed ninety percent of the growth rate ((of
inflation and state population)) in Washington personal income;

(b) Assure that local
governments are provided funds adequate to render those services deemed
essential by their citizens;

(c) Assure that the
state does not impose responsibility on local governments for new programs or
increased levels of service under existing programs unless the costs thereof
are paid by the state;

(d) Provide for
adjustment of the limit when costs of a program are transferred between the
state and another political entity;

(e) Establish a
procedure for exceeding this limit in emergency situations;

(f) Provide for voter
approval of tax increases; and

(g) Avoid overfunding
and underfunding state programs by providing stability, consistency, and
long-range planning.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.135.025 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state shall not
expend from the general fund during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of
the state expenditure limit established under this chapter.

(2) Except pursuant to
a declaration of emergency under RCW 43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation
under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b), the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any
check, warrant, or voucher that will result in a state general fund expenditure
for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure limit established under
this chapter. A violation of this subsection constitutes a violation of RCW
43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties provided in
RCW 43.88.300.

(3) The state
expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the previous fiscal year's state
expenditure limit increased by a percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth
factor.

(4) For purposes of
computing the state expenditure limit for the fiscal year beginning July 1,
1995, the phrase "the previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit"
means the total state expenditures from the state general fund, not including
federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1989, plus the fiscal
growth factor. This calculation is then computed for the state expenditure
limit for fiscal years 1992, 1993, 1994, and 1995, and as required under RCW
43.135.035(4).

(5) A state expenditure
limit committee is established for the purpose of determining and adjusting the
state expenditure limit as provided in this chapter. The members of the state
expenditure limit committee are the director of financial management, the
attorney general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs of the
senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee
on appropriations. All actions of the state expenditure limit committee taken
pursuant to this chapter require an affirmative vote of at least three members.

(6) Each November, the
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the expenditure limit for the
preceding fiscal year based on actual expenditures and known changes in the
fiscal growth factor and then project an expenditure limit for the next two
fiscal years. If, by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has
not adopted the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his or her
designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as necessary.

(7) "Fiscal growth
factor" means ninety percent of the average of the sum of ((inflation
and population change)) the growth in Washington personal income for
each of the prior three fiscal years.

(((8)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the federal
bureau of labor statistics.

(9) "Population
change" means the percentage change in state population for each fiscal
year as reported by the office of financial management.))

Sec. 4. RCW 43.135.035 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After July 1, 1995,
any action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises state
revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken only if approved by
a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state expenditures in any
fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure
limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a) If the
legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted
downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b) The ballot title
for any vote of the people required under this section shall be substantially
as follows:

"Shall taxes be
imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for ((inflation
and population increases)) the fiscal growth factor?"

(3)(a) The state
expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency for a period
not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth
the nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require
immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and provide
humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no
more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b) Additional taxes
required for an emergency under this section may be imposed only until thirty
days following the next general election, unless an extension is approved at
that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of
the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional
taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the
education construction fund have been exhausted.

(c) The state or any
political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on intangible
property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January 1, 1993.

(4) If the cost of any
state program or function is shifted from the state general fund on or after
January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred
from the state general fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state
expenditure limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund to another fund or account
includes any state legislative action taken after July 1, 2000, that has the
effect of reducing revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would
otherwise be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the
revenues from that particular source to another state or local government
account.

(5) If the cost of any
state program or function is shifted to the state general fund on or after
January 1, 2000, from another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred
to the state general fund from another fund or account, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state
expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act applies to
expenditures in fiscal year 2002 and thereafter.

---
END ---