BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Recent analysis of the
child dependency system following the death of Zy'Nyia Nobles indicated poor
communication of relevant information from the courts, to the department,
within programs between caseworkers, between divisions, among specialists, caregivers,
and family. Appropriate service delivery necessitates communication of
relevant information. Barriers to appropriate communication must be
eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

In order to facilitate
communication of information needed to serve the best interest of any child who
is the subject of a dependency case filed under this chapter, the department of
social and health services shall, consistent with state and federal law
governing the release of confidential information, establish guidelines, and
shall use those guidelines for the facilitation of communication of relevant
information among divisions, providers, the courts, the family, caregivers,
caseworkers, and others.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

A law enforcement
agency in the course of investigating: (1) An allegation under RCW
69.50.401(a) relating to manufacture of methamphetamine; or (2) an allegation
under RCW 69.50.440 relating to possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine, that discovers a child present at the
site, shall contact the department immediately.

NEW SECTION.
Sec. 4. Nothing in this act shall
be construed to create a private right of action or claim against the
department of social and health services on the part of any individual or
organization.

---
END ---