BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

In cooperation with the
Washington state patrol and the department, the fairs commission established
under RCW 15.76.170 shall create and design, and the department shall issue, a
special fair license plate displaying a symbol representing the categories of
fairs defined in RCW 15.76.120. The special fair license plate may be used in
lieu of regular or personalized license plates for motor vehicles required to
display two motor vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under
chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c
291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may
establish a fee for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section 5,
chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the cost of
production of the special license plates and the administration of this
program. Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five
dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more than forty
dollars. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to register and
license the vehicle for which the plates have been requested. All such
additional special license plate fees collected by the department shall be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle fund.

(2) Until December 31,
1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application,
registration, and renewal registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department
shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under
this subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate
license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998, in addition to
all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration of a
motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial
fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying
detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(4) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999, in addition to all
fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle
registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of
thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(5) In addition to all
fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration of a motor
vehicle, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds,
minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to a county for the
purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the
county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected
under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the state general fund.

(6) Effective with
annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 1999, in addition to all
fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle
registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license plate shall pay
a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction
costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this
date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

(7) Effective with
vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2003, in addition to
all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and registration of a
motor vehicle, the holder of a special fair license plate shall pay an initial
fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection of expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the fair fund created under RCW
15.76.115.

(8)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2004, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a special fair license plate shall pay a
fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be deposited
in the state treasury and credited to the fair fund created under RCW
15.76.115.

---
END ---