BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.50.020 and 1995 c
69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Applicant"
means any person who makes application for a site certification pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter((;)).

(2)
"Application" means any request for approval of a particular site or
sites filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires((;)).

(3) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation,
association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal
corporation, government agency, public utility district, or any other entity,
public or private, however organized((;)).

(4) "Site"
means any proposed or approved location of an energy facility((;)).

(5)
"Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant and
the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines, in effect as
of the date of certification, which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040
as now or hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or concurrent with
the construction or operation of any energy facility((;)).

(6) "Associated
facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or other related and
supporting facilities connecting an energy plant with the existing energy
supply, processing, or distribution system, including, but not limited to,
communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment, instrumentation,
and other types of ancillary transmission equipment, off-line storage or
venting required for efficient operation or safety of the transmission system
and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the
inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and
new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages in excess of
200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest power grid:
PROVIDED, That common carrier railroads or motor vehicles shall not be
included((;)).

(7) "Transmission
facility" means any of the following together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Crude or refined
petroleum or liquid petroleum product transmission pipeline of the following
dimensions: A pipeline larger than six inches minimum inside diameter between
valves for the transmission of these products with a total length of at least fifteen
miles;

(b) Natural gas,
synthetic fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas transmission pipeline of the
following dimensions: A pipeline larger than fourteen inches minimum inside
diameter between valves, for the transmission of these products, with a total
length of at least fifteen miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a
distribution facility, except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by
the United States federal power commission((;)).

(8) "Independent
consultants" means those persons who have no financial interest in the
applicant's proposals and who are retained by the council to evaluate the
applicant's proposals, supporting studies, or to conduct additional studies((;)).

(9) "Thermal power
plant" means, for the purpose of certification, any electrical generating
facility using any fuel, including nuclear materials, for distribution of
electricity by electric utilities((;)).

(10) "Energy
facility" means an energy plant or transmission facilities: PROVIDED,
That the following are excluded from the provisions of this chapter:

(a) Facilities for the
extraction, conversion, transmission or storage of water, other than water
specifically consumed or discharged by energy production or conversion for
energy purposes; and

(b) Facilities operated
by and for the armed services for military purposes or by other federal
authority for the national defense((;)).

(11)
"Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council created
by RCW 80.50.030((;)).

(12) "Counsel for
the environment" means an assistant attorney general or a special
assistant attorney general who shall represent the public in accordance with
RCW 80.50.080((;)).

(13)
"Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding exploratory
work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars((;)).

(14) "Energy
plant" means the following facilities together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Any stationary ((thermal
power plant with generating capacity of two hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or
more, measured using maximum continuous electric generating capacity, less
minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient temperature and pressure, and)) or
floating thermal power plants ((of fifty thousand kilowatts or more)),
including associated facilities;

(b) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive liquified natural gas in the equivalent of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per day, which
has been transported over marine waters;

(c) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive more than an average of fifty thousand
barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum or liquified petroleum gas which
has been or will be transported over marine waters, except that the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such
new facility construction;

(d) Any underground
reservoir for receipt and storage of natural gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010
capable of delivering an average of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day; and

(e) Facilities capable
of processing more than twenty-five thousand barrels per day of petroleum into
refined products((;)).

(15) "Land use
plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element thereof adopted by a
unit of local government pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW((;)).

(16) "Zoning
ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local government regulating the
use of land and adopted pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW or
Article XI of the state Constitution.

Sec. 2. RCW 80.50.030 and 1996 c
186 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created
and established the energy facility site evaluation council.

(2)(a) The ((chairman))
chair of the council shall be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate, shall have a vote on matters before the council,
shall serve for a term coextensive with the term of the governor, and is
removable for cause. The ((chairman)) chair may designate a
member of the council to serve as acting ((chairman)) chair in
the event of the ((chairman's)) chair's absence. The ((chairman))
chair is a "state employee" for the purposes of chapter 42.52
RCW. As applicable, when attending meetings of the council, members may
receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060, and are eligible for compensation under RCW 43.03.250.

(b) The ((chairman))
chair or a designee shall execute all official documents, contracts, and
other materials on behalf of the council. The Washington state department of
community, trade, and economic development shall provide all administrative and
staff support for the council. The director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development has supervisory authority over the staff of the
council and shall employ such personnel as are necessary to implement this
chapter. Not more than three such employees may be exempt from chapter 41.06
RCW.

(3) The council shall
consist of the directors, administrators, or their designees, of the following
departments, agencies, commissions, and committees or their statutory
successors:

(a) Department of
ecology;

(b) Department of fish
and wildlife;

(c) Department of
health;

(d) ((Military
department;

(e))) Department of community, trade, and economic
development;

(((f))) (e)
Utilities and transportation commission((;

(g) Department of
natural resources;

(h) Department of
agriculture;

(i) Department of
transportation)).

(4) The appropriate
county legislative authority of every county wherein an application for a
proposed site is filed shall appoint a member or designee as a voting member to
the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council
only at such times as the council considers the proposed site for the county
which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve until there
has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.

(5) The city
legislative authority of every city within whose corporate limits an energy
plant is proposed to be located shall appoint a member or designee as a voting
member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit with the
council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site for the
city which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve until
there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed site.

(6) For any port
district wherein an application for a proposed port facility is filed subject
to this chapter, the port district shall appoint a member or designee as a
nonvoting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit
with the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site
for the port district which he or she represents, and such member or designee
shall serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the
proposed site. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the port
district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or association with
any other person.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

The council shall
actively seek to implement the intent of this chapter as set forth in RCW
80.50.010 by diligently and expediently facilitating the siting of energy
facilities to meet present and emergent energy supply needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

The council may only
develop rules, policies, procedures, guidelines, or operating protocols that
are based directly on, and no more stringent than state statutory or
administrative code authority, and the standards and criteria set forth therein.
A site certification agreement may not require compliance with air quality,
water quality, or health protection measures unless such compliance is based on
and no more stringent than standards adopted into state statute or the
Washington Administrative Code.

Sec. 5. RCW 80.50.060 and 1977
ex.s. c 371 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall apply to the construction of energy facilities which
includes the new construction of energy facilities and the reconstruction or
enlargement of existing energy facilities where the net increase in physical
capacity or dimensions resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets
or exceeds those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (((17)))
(14), as now or hereafter amended. No construction of such energy
facilities may be undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
after July 15, 1977, without first obtaining certification in the manner
provided in this chapter.

(2) However, this
chapter does not apply to the new construction of electrical generating
facilities that opt not to be sited under the provisions of this chapter.

(3) The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal maintenance and repairs
which do not increase the capacity or dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW
80.50.020 (7) and (((17))) (14), as now or hereafter amended.

(((3))) (4)
Applications for certification of energy facilities made prior to July 15, 1977,
shall continue to be governed by the applicable provisions of law in effect on
the day immediately preceding July 15, 1977, with the exceptions of RCW
80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which shall apply to such prior applications and to
site certifications prospectively from July 15, 1977.

(((4))) (5)
Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed by the council
and shall be supported by such information and technical studies as the council
may require.

Sec. 6. RCW 80.50.100 and 1989 c
175 s 174 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council shall
report to the governor its recommendations as to the approval or rejection of
an application for certification within ((twelve)) six months of
receipt by the council of such an application, or such later time as is
mutually agreed by the council and the applicant. If the council recommends
approval of an application for certification, it shall also submit a draft
certification agreement with the report. The council shall include conditions
in the draft certification agreement to implement the provisions of this
chapter, including, but not limited to, conditions to protect state or local
governmental or community interests affected by the construction or operation
of the energy facility, and conditions designed to recognize the purpose of
laws or ordinances, or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, that are
preempted or superseded pursuant to RCW 80.50.110 as now or hereafter amended.

(2) Within ((sixty))
thirty days of receipt of the council's report the governor shall take
one of the following actions:

(a) Approve the
application and execute the draft certification agreement; or

(b) Reject the
application; or

(c) Direct the council
to reconsider certain aspects of the draft certification agreement.

The council shall
reconsider such aspects of the draft certification agreement by reviewing the
existing record of the application or, as necessary, by reopening the
adjudicative proceeding for the purposes of receiving additional evidence.
Such reconsideration shall be conducted expeditiously. The council shall
resubmit the draft certification to the governor incorporating any amendments
deemed necessary upon reconsideration within ninety days of receipt of such
direction for reconsideration. Within ((sixty)) fifteen days
of receipt of such draft certification agreement, the governor shall either
approve the application and execute the certification agreement or reject the
application. The certification agreement shall be binding upon execution by
the governor and the applicant.

(3) The rejection of an
application for certification by the governor shall be final as to that
application but shall not preclude submission of a subsequent application for
the same site on the basis of changed conditions or new information.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---