BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.36.005 and 1993 c
249 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this
chapter)) The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 80.36.410
through 80.36.475, unless the context ((indicates)) clearly requires
otherwise((,)).

(1) "Community
agency" means local community agencies that administer community service
voice mail programs.

(2) "Community
service voice mail" means a computerized voice mail system that provides
low-income recipients with: (a) An individually assigned telephone number; (b)
the ability to record a personal greeting; and (c) a private security code to
retrieve messages.

(3) "Department"
means the department of social and health services.

(4) "Service
year" means the period between July 1st and June 30th.

Sec. 2. RCW 80.36.410 and 1987 c
229 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that universal telephone service is an important policy goal of the state. The
legislature further finds that: (1) Recent changes in the
telecommunications industry, such as federal access charges, raise concerns
about the ability of low-income persons to continue to afford access to local
exchange telephone service; and (2) many low-income persons making the
transition to independence from receiving supportive services through community
agencies do not qualify for economic assistance from the department.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest to take
steps to mitigate the effects of these changes on low-income persons.

Sec. 3. RCW 80.36.470 and 1990 c
170 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Adult
recipients of department-administered programs for the financially needy which
provide continuing financial or medical assistance, food stamps, or supportive
services to persons in their own homes are eligible for participation in the
telephone assistance program. The department shall notify the participants of
their eligibility.

(2) Participants in
community service voice mail programs are eligible for participation in the
telephone assistance program after completing use of community service voice
mail services. Eligibility shall be for a period including the remainder of
the current service year and the following service year. Community agencies
shall notify the department of participants eligible under this subsection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 2 and 3 of this
act expire June 30, 2003.

---
END ---