BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.18.150 and 1989 c
342 s 7 and 1989 c 12 s 18 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The tenant shall
not unreasonably withhold consent to the landlord to enter into the dwelling
unit in order to inspect the premises, make necessary or agreed repairs,
alterations, or improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, or exhibit
the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers, mortgagees, tenants,
workers, or contractors.

(2) Upon written
notice of intent to seek a search warrant, when a tenant or landlord denies a
fire official the right to search a dwelling unit, a fire official may
immediately seek and a court of competent jurisdiction, upon a showing of
probable cause specific to the dwelling unit sought to be searched that criminal
fire code violations exist in the dwelling unit, shall issue a warrant allowing
a search of the dwelling unit.

Upon written notice
of intent to seek a search warrant, when a landlord denies a fire official the
right to search the common areas of the rental building other than the dwelling
unit, a fire official may immediately seek and a court of competent
jurisdiction, upon a showing of probable cause specific to the common area
sought to be searched that a criminal fire code violation exists in those
areas, shall issue a warrant allowing a search of the common areas in which the
violation is alleged.

The superior court
and courts of limited jurisdiction organized under Titles 3, 35, and 35A RCW
have jurisdiction to issue such search warrants. Evidence obtained pursuant to
any such search may be used in a civil or administrative enforcement action.

(3) As used in this
section:

(a) "Common
areas" means a common area or those areas that contain electrical,
plumbing, and mechanical equipment and facilities used for the operation of the
rental building.

(b) "Fire
official" means any fire official authorized to enforce the state or local
fire code.

(4) The landlord
may enter the dwelling unit without consent of the tenant in case of emergency
or abandonment.

(((3))) (5)
The landlord shall not abuse the right of access or use it to harass the
tenant. Except in the case of emergency or if it is impracticable to do so,
the landlord shall give the tenant at least two days' notice of his or her intent
to enter and shall enter only at reasonable times. The tenant shall not
unreasonably withhold consent to the landlord to enter the dwelling unit at a
specified time where the landlord has given at least one day's notice of intent
to enter to exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers or
tenants. A landlord shall not unreasonably interfere with a tenant's enjoyment
of the rented dwelling unit by excessively exhibiting the dwelling unit.

(((4))) (6)
The landlord has no other right of access except by court order, arbitrator or
by consent of the tenant.

(((5))) (7)
A landlord or tenant who continues to violate the rights of the tenant or
landlord with respect to the duties imposed on the other as set forth in
this section after being served with one written notification alleging in good
faith violations of this section listing the date and time of the violation
shall be liable for up to one hundred dollars for each violation after receipt
of the notice. The prevailing ((party)) landlord or tenant may
recover costs of the suit or arbitration under this section, and may also
recover reasonable attorneys' fees.

(8)
Nothing in this section is intended to abrogate or modify in any way any common
law right or privilege.

--- END ---