BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
84.40.0305 and 1997 c 3 s 105 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) As used in this section:

_8 (a) "Previous assessed value" means the assessed
value for the

_9 year immediately preceding the year for which a
calculation is

10 being made under this section.

11 (b) "Current appraised value" means the
appraised value for the

12 year for which a calculation is being made under this
section.

13 (c) "Total value increase" means the
current appraised value

14 minus the previous assessed value. Total value increase
can never

15 be less than zero.

16 (d) "Improvement increase" means the
portion of the total value

17 increase attributable to any physical improvements made
to the

18 property since the previous assessment, other than
improvements

p. 1 SB
6002

_1 exempt under RCW 84.36.400 for the year for which a
calculation is

_2 being made under this section. Improvement increase can
never be

_3 less than zero.

_4 (e) "Market increase" means the total
value increase minus the

_5 improvement increase. Market increase can never be less
than zero.

_6 (2) The assessed value of property is equal to the
lesser of

_7 the current appraised value or a limited value
determined under

_8 this section. The limited value is equal to the greater
of the

_9 values determined as follows:

10 (a) In any year in which the market increase is
equal to or

11 less than sixty percent of the previous assessed
value, the

12 limited value is the improvement increase plus
one hundred fifteen

13 percent of the previous assessed value; or

14 (b) In any year in which the market increase is
more than sixty

15 percent of the previous assessed value, the limited
value for the

16 year of the increase and for each of the three
succeeding years is

17 not less than the sum of:

18 (i) The previous assessed value;

19 (ii) The improvement increase; and

20 (iii) Twenty-five percent of the market increase.

21 (3) Upon loss of preferential tax treatment for
property that

22 qualifies for preferential tax treatment under chapter
84.14,

23 84.26, 84.33, 84.34, or 84.36 RCW, the previous assessed
value

24 shall be the assessed value the property would have had
without

25 the preferential tax treatment.

26 (4) The assessed value of real property that has
been

27 subdivided or merged is the current appraised value
of the parcel

28 or lot formed after the subdivision or merger.

29 (5) The assessed value of new construction and
mobile homes

30 under RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090 is determined
without regard to

31 this section.

32 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
for taxes levied in

33 2001 for collection in 2002 and thereafter if the
proposed

34 amendment to Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution

35 providing for valuation increases to be phased-in over a
period of

36 four years is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by

SB 6002 p. 2

_1 the voters at the next general election. If the
proposed amendment

_2 is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its
entirety.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
6002