BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.25.050 and 1995 c
393 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Drivers of
commercial motor vehicles shall obtain a commercial driver's license as
required under this chapter by April 1, 1992. The director shall establish a
program to convert all qualified commercial motor vehicle drivers by that
date. After April 1, 1992, except when driving under a commercial driver's
instruction permit and a valid automobile or classified license and accompanied
by the holder of a commercial driver's license valid for the vehicle being
driven, no person may drive a commercial motor vehicle unless the person holds
and is in immediate possession of a commercial driver's license and applicable
endorsements valid for the vehicle they are driving. However, this requirement
does not apply to any person:

(a) Who is the operator
of a farm vehicle, and the vehicle is:

(i) Controlled and
operated by a farmer;

(ii)(A) Used to
transport either agricultural products, ((which in this section include
Christmas trees and wood products harvested from private tree farms and
transported by vehicles weighing no more than forty thousand pounds licensed
gross vehicle weight,)) farm machinery, farm supplies, or any combination
of those materials to or from a farm; or

(B) Used to
transport Christmas trees and wood products harvested from private tree farms
and transported by vehicles weighing no more than forty thousand pounds licensed
gross vehicle weight;

(iii) Not used in the
operations of a common or contract motor carrier; and

(iv) Used within one
hundred fifty miles of the person's farm; or

(b) Who is a fire
fighter or law enforcement officer operating emergency equipment, and:

(i) The fire fighter or
law enforcement officer has successfully completed a driver training course
approved by the director; and

(ii) The fire fighter
or law enforcement officer carries a certificate attesting to the successful
completion of the approved training course; or

(c) Who is operating a
recreational vehicle for noncommercial purposes. As used in this section,
"recreational vehicle" includes a vehicle towing a horse trailer for
a noncommercial purpose.

(2) No
person may drive a commercial motor vehicle while his or her driving privilege
is suspended, revoked, or canceled, while subject to disqualification, or in
violation of an out-of-service order. Violations of this subsection shall be
punished in the same way as violations of RCW 46.20.342(1).

--- END ---