BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.04.090 and 1983
1st ex.s. c 23 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

"Employing
unit" means any individual or any type of organization, including any
partnership, association, trust, estate, joint stock company, insurance
company, or corporation, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee
in bankruptcy, trustee or successor thereof, or the legal representative of a
deceased person, which has or subsequent to January 1, 1937, had in its employ
or in its "employment" one or more individuals performing services
within this state. The state and its political subdivisions shall be deemed
employing units as to any transactions occurring on or after September 21, 1977
which would render an employing unit liable for contributions, interest, or
penalties under RCW 50.24.130. "Employing unit" includes Indian
tribes as defined in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 50.04 RCW to read as follows:

The term
"employment" includes services performed in the employ of an Indian
tribe as provided in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The term
"employment" includes service performed in the employ of an Indian
tribe, as defined in section 3306(u) of the federal unemployment tax act,
provided such service is excluded from "employment" as defined in the
federal unemployment tax act solely by reason of section 3306(c)(7), the
federal unemployment tax act, and is not otherwise excluded from
"employment" under this title. For purposes of this section, the
exclusions from employment in RCW 50.44.040, except RCW 50.44.040(12)
addressing nongovernmental preschools, are applicable to services performed in
the employ of an Indian tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Benefits based on service
in employment defined in this chapter are payable in the same amount, on the
same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis
of other service under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Indian tribes or
tribal units, including subdivisions, subsidiaries, or business enterprises
wholly owned by such Indian tribes, subject to this title shall pay
contributions under the same terms and conditions as all other subject
employers, unless they elect to pay into the unemployment compensation fund
amounts equal to the amount of benefits attributable to service in the employ
of the Indian tribe.

(2) Indian tribes
electing to make payments in lieu of contributions shall make such election in
the same manner and under the same conditions as provided in RCW 50.44.030
pertaining to other units of government subject to this title. Indian tribes
shall determine if reimbursement for benefits paid are to be elected by the
tribe as a whole, by individual tribal units, or by combinations of tribal
units.

(3) Indian tribes or
tribal units shall be billed for the full amount of benefits attributable to
service in the employ of the Indian tribe or tribal unit on the same schedule
as other employing units that have elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions.

(4) At the discretion
of the commissioner and on the same basis as other employers with the same
election option, any Indian tribe or tribal unit that elects to become liable
for payments in lieu of contributions is required, within thirty days after the
effective date of its election, to: (a) Execute and file with the commissioner
a surety bond approved by the commissioner; or (b) deposit with the
commissioner money or securities in an amount determined by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1)(a) The commissioner
shall revoke the option for an Indian tribe or tribal unit to make payments in
lieu of contributions as described in section 5 of this act if the Indian tribe
or tribal unit: (i) Did not make payments, including assessments of interest
and penalties, required under this chapter within ninety days of receipt of
statement; or (ii) entered into an approved agency deferred payment contract,
and was not in compliance with the contract on the cutoff date, as authorized
in chapter 50.29 RCW. The revocation shall begin on January 1 of the first
calendar year after the Indian tribe or tribal unit meets these conditions, and
shall continue until the option is reinstated as described in (b) of this
subsection.

(b) The commissioner
shall reinstate the option if, as of the cutoff date, an Indian tribe or tribal
unit whose option was revoked as described in (a) of this subsection: (i) Paid
contributions owed in the current calendar year when due; and (ii) made
required payments, including assessments of interest and penalties, for any
preceding calendar years. The reinstatement shall begin on January 1 of the
first calendar year after the Indian tribe or tribal unit satisfies these
conditions.

(2)(a) Services
performed for an Indian tribe or tribal unit are not services in
"employment" for purposes of sections 2 and 3 of this act if:

(i) The Indian tribe or
tribal unit elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, had the option
revoked, and has not met the conditions for reinstatement of the option; and

(ii) The Indian tribe
or tribal unit either: (A) Did not make required payments, including
assessments of interest and penalties, within one hundred eighty days of
receipt of statement; or (B) entered into an approved agency deferred payment
contract, and was not in compliance with the contract on the last day of the
current calendar quarter.

This revocation of
coverage shall begin on the first day of the first calendar quarter after the
Indian tribe or tribal unit meets these conditions, and shall continue until
coverage is reinstated as described in (c) of this subsection.

(b) Services performed
for an Indian tribe or tribal unit are not services in "employment"
for purposes of sections 2 and 3 of this act if:

(i) The Indian tribe or
tribal unit is a contribution-paying employer; and

(ii) The Indian tribe
or tribal unit either: (A) Did not make required payments, including
assessments of interest and penalties, within one hundred eighty days of
receipt of statement; or (B) entered into an approved agency deferred payment
contract, and was not in compliance with the contract on the last day of the
current calendar quarter.

This revocation of
coverage shall begin on the first day of the first calendar quarter after the
Indian tribe or tribal unit meets these conditions, and shall continue until
coverage is reinstated as described in (c) of this subsection.

(c) The commissioner
may reinstate coverage if the Indian tribe or tribal unit has made required
payments, including assessments of interest and penalties. This reinstatement
of coverage may begin on the first day of the first calendar quarter after
these payments are made.

(3)(a) The commissioner
shall immediately notify the United States internal revenue service and the
United States department of labor if an Indian tribe or tribal unit does not
make required payments, including assessments of interest and penalties, within
ninety days of receipt of statement.

(b) The commissioner
shall immediately notify the United States internal revenue service and the
United States department of labor of any revocation or reinstatement of the
option to make payments in lieu of contributions under subsection (1) of this
section or any revocation or reinstatement of coverage under subsection (2) of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Notices of payment and
reporting delinquency to Indian tribes or their tribal units must include
information that failure to make full payment within the prescribed time
frames: (1) Causes the Indian tribe to be liable for taxes under the federal
unemployment tax act; (2) causes the Indian tribe to lose the option to make
payments in lieu of contributions; and (3) causes the Indian tribe to be
excepted from the definition of "employing unit," as provided in RCW
50.04.090, and services in the employ of the Indian tribe, as provided in
sections 2 and 3 of this act, to be excepted from "employment."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Extended benefits paid
that are attributable to service in the employ of an Indian tribe and not
reimbursed by the federal government must be financed in their entirety by such
Indian tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Unless specifically
addressed in this chapter, Indian tribes or their tribal units are subject to
the same terms and conditions as are other employers subject to contributions
under RCW 50.29.020 or other units of government under RCW 50.44.030 that make
payments in lieu of contributions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. If any part of this act
is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting
part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the
finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a
necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the
granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. This act applies
retroactively to services performed on or after December 21, 2000. Indian
tribes or tribal units may elect to make payments in lieu of contributions
effective December 21, 2000, or a subsequent date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 3 through 9 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 50 RCW.

---
END ---