BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter and section 8 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Public
agency" means any county, city, or other local government agency or any
state government agency, board, or commission.

(2) "Public
transportation" means the same as "public transportation
service" as defined in RCW 36.57A.010 and includes passenger services of
the Washington state ferries.

(3) "Nonmotorized
commuting" means commuting to and from the workplace by an employee by
walking or running or by riding a bicycle or other device not powered by a
motor.

(4) "Ride
sharing" means the same as "commuter ride sharing" as defined in
RCW 46.74.010, including ride sharing on Washington state ferries.

(5) "Car sharing"
means a membership program intended to offer an alternative to car ownership
under which persons or entities that become members are permitted to use
vehicles from a fleet on an hourly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) Employers in this
state who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW and provide financial
incentives to their own or other employees for ride sharing, for using public
transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting
before June 30, 2012, are allowed a credit against taxes payable under chapter
82.04 or 82.16 RCW for amounts paid to or on behalf of employees for ride
sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public
transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not
to exceed sixty dollars per employee per year.

(2) Property managers
who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW and provide financial
incentives to persons employed at a worksite in this state managed by the property
manager for ride sharing, for using public transportation, for using car
sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting before June 30, 2012, are allowed
a credit against taxes payable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW for amounts
paid to or on behalf of these persons for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two
or more persons, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for
using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty dollars per person per year.
A person may not take a credit under this section for amounts claimed for
credit by other persons.

(3) The credit under
this section is equal to the amount paid to or on behalf of each employee
multiplied by fifty percent, but may not exceed sixty dollars per employee per
year. The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due
under chapters 82.04 or 82.16 RCW.

(4) A person may not
receive credit under this section for amounts paid to or on behalf of the same
employee under both chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) Application for tax
credit under section 2 of this act may only be made in the form and manner
prescribed in rules adopted by the department.

(2) The credit under
this section must be taken against taxes due for the same calendar year in
which the amounts for which credit is claimed were paid to or on behalf of
employees for ride sharing, for using public transportation, for using car
sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting and must be claimed by the due date
of the last tax return for the calendar year in which the payment is made.

(3) Any person who
knowingly makes a false statement of a material fact in the application for a
credit under section 2 of this act is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The department shall
keep a running total of all credits granted under section 2 of this act and all
grants provided under section 8 of this act during each calendar year. The
department shall disallow any credits that would cause the tabulation for
credits and grants in any legislative biennium, or portion thereof, to exceed
the following levels: 2001-2003 - two million dollars; 2003-2005 - three
million dollars; 2005-2007 - five million dollars; 2007-2009 - eight million
dollars; 2009-2011 - eight million dollars; 2012 - four million dollars.

(2) No person is
eligible for tax credits under section 2 of this act in excess of one hundred
thousand dollars in any calendar year.

(3) No person is
eligible for tax credits under section 2 of this act in excess of the amount of
tax that would otherwise be due under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW.

(4) No portion of an
application for credit disallowed under this section may be carried back or
carried forward.

(5) No person is
eligible for both grants provided under section 8 of this act and tax credits
under section 2 of this act within the same calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The director shall on
the 25th of February, May, August, and November of each year advise the state
treasurer of the amount of credit taken under section 2 of this act during the
preceding calendar quarter ending on the last day of December, March, June, and
September, respectively.

(2) On the 1st of
April, July, October, and January of each year, the state treasurer based upon
information provided by the department shall deposit to the general fund a sum
equal to the dollar amount of the credit provided under section 2 of this act
from the multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The commute trip
reduction task force shall determine the effectiveness of the tax credit under
section 2 of this act as part of its ongoing evaluation of the commute trip
reduction law and report to the legislative transportation committee and to the
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate. The report
must include information on the amount of tax credits claimed to date and
recommendations on future funding for the tax credit program. The report must
be incorporated into the recommendations required in RCW 70.94.537(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. This chapter expires June
30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
transportation shall administer a grant program for public agencies, nonprofit
organizations, developers, and property managers who provide financial
incentives for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using
public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized
commuting, before June 30, 2012, to their own or other employees.

(2) Public agencies,
nonprofit organizations, developers, and property managers are not eligible
within the same calendar year for grants provided under this section and
credits under section 2 of this act.

(3) The amount of the
grant is equal to the amount paid to or on behalf of each employee multiplied
by fifty percent, but may not exceed sixty dollars per employee per year.

(4) No public agency,
nonprofit organization, developer, or property manager is eligible for grants
under this section in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in any calendar
year.

(5) The department of
transportation shall report to the department of revenue by the 15th day of
each month the aggregate monetary amount of grants provided under this section
in the prior month and the identity of the recipients of those grants.

(6) The total of
credits granted under section 2 of this act and grants provided under this
section may not exceed two million dollars between the years 2001 and 2003;
three million dollars between 2003 and 2005; five million dollars between 2005
and 2007; eight million dollars between 2007 and 2009; eight million dollars
between 2009 and 2011; and four million dollars in 2012. The department of
revenue shall notify the department of transportation when this limitation has
been reached.

(7) The source of funds
for this grant program is the multimodal transportation account.

(8) This section
expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.04.4453 (Credit--Ride-sharing,
public transportation, or nonmotorized commuting incentives--Penalty--Report to
legislature) and 1999 c 402 s 1, 1996 c 128 s 1, & 1994 c 270 s 2;

(2) RCW 82.04.4454 (Credit--Ride-sharing,
public transportation, or nonmotorized commuting incentives--Ceiling) and 1999
c 402 s 3, 1996 c 128 s 2, & 1994 c 270 s 3;

(3) RCW 82.16.048 (Credit--Ride-sharing,
public transportation, or nonmotorized commuting incentives--Penalty--Report to
legislature) and 1999 c 402 s 2, 1996 c 128 s 3, & 1994 c 270 s 4; and

(4) RCW 82.16.049 (Credit--Ride-sharing,
public transportation, or nonmotorized commuting incentives--Ceiling) and 1999
c 402 s 4, 1996 c 128 s 4, & 1994 c 270 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Sections 1 through 7 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The code reviser shall
place cross-reference sections to chapter 82.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 of
this act) in chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. This act takes effect January
1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by legislative appropriation to the multimodal transportation
account by December 31, 2002, this act is null and void.

---
END ---