BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that a child's early attachment to his or her parent influences physical and
intellectual development, forms the foundation for psychological development,
and becomes the prototype for subsequent interpersonal relationships. The legislature
also finds that the late stages of gestation, birth, and first two years of
life are critical in an infant's development of conscience, his or her ability
to trust and relate to others, and establishes the foundation for key
protective factors such as intelligence, trust, and empathy. The legislature
finds that when these are depressed or when an infant is mistreated, it may
lead to early aggression, impulsive temperament, and violent behavior which are
the strongest developmental predictors of future involvement in violent
behavior. The legislature finds persuasive research that strongly indicates
that the best way to improve later developmental outcomes is to improve
mother-child interaction and prevent early loss of primary relationships or breaks
in caregiving.

The legislature also
finds persuasive national statistics that demonstrate that incarcerated mothers
who develop strong parenting skills and bond with their children are less
likely to reoffend. Consequently, the legislature finds that the residential
parenting program at the women's correctional center protects public safety and
promotes outcomes that are socially and fiscally responsible by reducing
recidivism and reducing the likelihood that a child of an incarcerated mother
will become at-risk for committing criminal offenses as a juvenile or adult.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
maintain a residential parenting program at its major correctional institution
for women to allow those inmates who meet eligibility requirements to keep
their infants with them during their incarceration. The program shall provide
an appropriate living situation for the infants, promote positive parenting
skills, and facilitate transition services back into the community.

Sec. 3. RCW 72.09.010 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to establish a comprehensive system of corrections for convicted
law violators within the state of Washington to accomplish the following
objectives.

(1) The system should
ensure the public safety. The system should be designed and managed to provide
the maximum feasible safety for the persons and property of the general public,
the staff, and the inmates.

(2) The system should
punish the offender for violating the laws of the state of Washington. This
punishment should generally be limited to the denial of liberty of the
offender.

(3) The system should
positively impact offenders by stressing personal responsibility and
accountability and by discouraging recidivism.

(4) The system should
treat all offenders fairly and equitably without regard to race, religion, sex,
national origin, residence, or social condition.

(5) The system, as much
as possible, should reflect the values of the community including:

(a) Avoiding idleness.
Idleness is not only wasteful but destructive to the individual and to the
community.

(b) Adoption of the
work ethic. It is the community expectation that all individuals should work
and through their efforts benefit both themselves and the community.

(c) Maintaining, to
the extent appropriate, any existing parent-child relationship with their
children. The community expects parents to be responsible for their children
and for their parenting decisions. Where the court and/or the department has
not prohibited contact or terminated parental rights, and where the inmate's
parental role will continue on release, incarceration should not provide an
excuse to avoid this responsibility.

(d) Providing
opportunities for self improvement. All individuals should have opportunities
to grow and expand their skills and abilities so as to fulfill their role in
the community.

(((d))) (e)
Linking the receipt or denial of privileges to responsible behavior and
accomplishments. The individual who works to improve himself or herself and
the community should be rewarded for these efforts. As a corollary, there
should be no rewards for no effort.

(((e))) (f)
Sharing in the obligations of the community. All citizens, the public and
inmates alike, have a personal and fiscal obligation in the corrections
system. All communities must share in the responsibility of the corrections
system.

(6) The system should
provide for prudent management of resources. The avoidance of unnecessary or
inefficient public expenditures on the part of offenders and the department is
essential. Offenders must be accountable to the department, and the department
to the public and the legislature. The human and fiscal resources of the
community are limited. The management and use of these resources can be
enhanced by wise investment, productive programs, the reduction of duplication
and waste, and the joining together of all involved parties in a common
endeavor. Since most offenders return to the community, it is wise for the
state and the communities to make an investment in effective rehabilitation
programs for offenders and the wise use of resources.

(7) The system should
provide for restitution. Those who have damaged others, persons or property,
have a responsibility to make restitution for these damages.

(8) The system should
be accountable to the citizens of the state. In return, the individual
citizens and local units of government must meet their responsibilities to make
the corrections system effective.

(9) The system should
meet those national standards which the state determines to be appropriate.

Sec. 4. RCW 72.09.015 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Base level of
correctional services" means the minimum level of field services the department
of corrections is required by statute to provide for the supervision and
monitoring of offenders.

(2)
"Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary
determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed while
on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the control of the
secretary.

(3) "County"
means a county or combination of counties.

(4)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(5) "Earned early
release" means earned ((early)) release as authorized by RCW
9.94A.728.

(6) "Extended
family visit" means an authorized visit between an inmate and a member of
his or her immediate family that occurs in a private visiting unit located at
the correctional facility where the inmate is confined.

(7) "Good
conduct" means compliance with department rules and policies.

(8) "Good
performance" means successful completion of a program required by the
department, including an education, work, or other program.

(9) "Immediate
family" means the inmate's children, stepchildren, grandchildren, great
grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents, great grandparents,
siblings, and a person legally married to an inmate. "Immediate
family" does not include an inmate adopted by another inmate or the
immediate family of the adopted or adopting inmate.

(10) "Indigent
inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean an inmate
who has less than a ten-dollar balance of disposable income in his or her
institutional account on the day a request is made to utilize funds and during
the thirty days previous to the request.

(11) "Inmate"
means a person committed to the custody of the department, including but not
limited to persons residing in a correctional institution or facility and
persons released on furlough, work release, or community custody, and persons
received from another state, state agency, county, or federal jurisdiction.

(12)
"Privilege" means any goods or services, education or work programs,
or earned early release days, the receipt of which are directly linked to an
inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good performance. Privileges do not include
any goods or services the department is required to provide under the state or
federal Constitution or under state or federal law.

(13) "Residential
parenting program" means a program for infants born of eligible inmates to
develop a parent-child relationship with their inmate mothers through the
mother's participation in a residential program that permits her to actively
parent her child.

(14)
"Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his or her
designee.

(((14))) (15)
"Superintendent" means the superintendent of a correctional facility
under the jurisdiction of the Washington state department of corrections, or
his or her designee.

(((15)))
(16) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional
industries jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.

Sec. 5. RCW 72.09.450 and 1996 c
277 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An inmate shall not
be denied access to services or supplies required by state or federal law
solely on the basis of his or her inability to pay for them.

(2) An eligible
inmate mother shall not be denied entrance into the residential parenting
program on the basis of indigence.

(3) The
department shall record all lawfully authorized assessments for services or
supplies as a debt to the department. The department shall recoup the
assessments when the inmate's institutional account exceeds the indigency
standard, and may pursue other remedies to recoup the assessments after the
period of incarceration.

(((3))) (4)
The department shall record as a debt any costs assessed by a court against an
inmate plaintiff where the state is providing defense pursuant to chapter 4.92
RCW. The department shall recoup the debt when the inmate's institutional
account exceeds the indigency standard and may pursue other remedies to recoup
the debt after the period of incarceration.

(((4))) (5)
In order to maximize the cost-efficient collection of unpaid offender debt
existing after the period of an offender's incarceration, the department is
authorized to use the following nonexclusive options: (a) Use the collection
services available through the department of general administration, or (b)
notwithstanding any provision of chapter 41.06 RCW, contract with collection
agencies for collection of the debts. The costs for general administration or
collection agency services shall be paid by the debtor. Any contract with a
collection agency shall only be awarded after competitive bidding. Factors the
department shall consider in awarding a collection contract include but are not
limited to a collection agency's history and reputation in the community; and
the agency's access to a local data base that may increase the efficiency of
its collections. The servicing of an unpaid obligation to the department does
not constitute assignment of a debt, and no contract with a collection agency
may remove the department's control over unpaid obligations owed to the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

Participation in the
residential parenting program is not a right and decisions about admission to
the program shall be made on a case-by-case basis.

(1) No inmate who is
the subject of a no contact order which prohibits contact with minor children
or has a documented history of sex offenses against children is eligible to
participate.

(2) The department
shall maintain published procedures including notice provisions for application
and approval of the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall maintain a separate financial account for infant participants in the
residential parenting program. Funds deposited to the infant's account are not
subject to the mandatory inmate deductions required by RCW 72.09.111.

(2) Infant participants
are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families grants and women
infants children funds for child-related expenses. The department shall hold
these funds in the infant's account.

(3) Child support
payments made for the support of the infant and not subject to an assignment
pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal social security act shall be held in the
infant's account.

(4) Funds in the
infant's account may be used only for the infant's needs and expenses and
equipment needed for proper infant care. Such funds may not be used to pay for
maternal expenses and may not be applied to the mother's legal financial
obligations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---