BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that the building blocks of the state's salmon recovery strategy are the
locally developed and implemented salmon recovery plans and activities. Such
watershed and regional efforts as the lower Columbia fish recovery board, upper
Columbia salmon recovery region, Puget Sound tri-county assembly, Puget Sound
shared strategy, Skagit watershed council, Chehalis basin partnership, Hood
Canal coordinating council, Snake river conservation district, and numerous
other salmon recovery and water resources planning entities bring a depth of
local experience, expertise, and resources into salmon recovery. Each of these
watershed and regional entities is different and unique, but they have in
common a shared objective of recovering salmon populations that occur
throughout large regions of the state. For the most effective state recovery
strategy, incentives for coordination throughout salmon recovery regions are
needed.

(2)
Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to encourage the coordination of
watershed and regional level efforts addressing salmon recovery-related
activities through the creation of regional entities that encompass state
salmon recovery regions. Incentives for watershed and regional coordination
will be provided through state funding and technical assistance that is in
addition to existing state assistance for watershed level planning and
projects. The funding and technical assistance will be targeted to those
regional efforts organized to coordinate salmon conservation strategies, plans,
and projects across individual watersheds; promote prioritization of proposed
funding for projects and other recovery activities among these watersheds; and
develop region-wide salmon conservation and recovery plans for acceptance by federal
agencies administering the endangered species act.

---
END ---