BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.94.743 and 1998 c
68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consistent with the
policy of the state to reduce outdoor burning to the greatest extent practical:

(a) Outdoor burning
shall not be allowed in any area of the state where federal or state ambient
air quality standards are exceeded for pollutants emitted by outdoor burning.

(b) Outdoor burning
shall not be allowed in any urban growth area as defined by RCW 36.70A.030, or
any city of the state having a population greater than ten thousand people if
such cities are threatened to exceed state or federal air quality standards,
and alternative disposal practices consistent with good solid waste management
are reasonably available or practices eliminating production of organic refuse
are reasonably available. In no event shall such burning be allowed after
December 31, 2000, except that within the urban growth areas for cities having
a population of less than five thousand people, that are neither within nor
contiguous with any nonattainment or maintenance area designated under the
federal clean air act, in no event shall such burning be allowed after December
31, 2006.

(c) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, outdoor burning may be allowed for the
exclusive purpose of managing storm or flood-related debris. The decision to
allow burning shall be made by the entity with permitting jurisdiction as
determined under RCW 70.94.660 or 70.94.755. If outdoor burning is allowed in
areas subject to (a) or (b) of this subsection, a permit shall be required, and
a fee may be collected to cover the expenses of administering and enforcing the
permit. All conditions and restrictions pursuant to RCW 70.94.750(1) and
70.94.775 apply to outdoor burning allowed under this section.

(d) Outdoor burning
that is normal, necessary, and customary to ongoing agricultural activities,
that is consistent with agricultural burning authorized under RCW 70.94.650 and
70.94.656, is allowed within the urban growth area as defined in (b) of this
subsection if the burning is not conducted during air quality episodes, or
where a determination of impaired air quality has been made as provided in RCW
70.94.473, and the agricultural activities preceded the designation as an urban
growth area.

(2) "Outdoor
burning" means the combustion of material of any type in an open fire or
in an outdoor container without providing for the control of combustion or the
control of emissions from the combustion.

(3) This
section shall not apply to silvicultural burning used to improve or maintain
fire dependent ecosystems for rare plants or animals within state, federal, and
private natural area preserves, natural resource conservation areas, parks, and
other wildlife areas.

--- END ---