BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

Churches and religious
institutions are exempt from the provisions of this chapter. Private schools
must be regulated the same as public schools under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

Churches and religious
institutions are exempt from the provisions of this chapter. Private schools
must be regulated the same as public schools under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

Churches and religious
institutions are exempt from the provisions of this chapter. Private schools
must be regulated the same as public schools under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Churches
and religious institutions are exempt from the provisions of this chapter.
Private schools must be regulated the same as public schools under this
chapter.

---
END ---