BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.261 and 1998 c
98 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in order
to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or
on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical work is on the
construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease. However, if
the construction is of a new residential building with up to four units
intended for rent, sale, or lease, the owner may receive an exemption from the
requirement to obtain a license or use a certified electrician if he or she
provides a signed affidavit to the department stating that he or she will be
performing the work and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal
residence. The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may
only receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended that
the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or her
principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the units.
Nothing in RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 shall be intended to derogate from or dispense with the
requirements of any valid electrical code enacted by a city or town pursuant to
RCW 19.28.010(3), except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate
of competency to demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any
other license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical construction
trade. RCW ((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part I of the
Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees. Nothing in RCW
((19.28.510 through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall
be deemed to apply to the installation or maintenance of telephone, telegraph,
radio, or television wires and equipment; nor to any electrical utility or its
employees in the installation, repair, and maintenance of electrical wiring,
circuits, and equipment by or for the utility, or comprising a part of its
plants, lines or systems. The licensing provisions of RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to:

(1) Persons making
electrical installations on their own property or to regularly employed
employees working on the premises of their employer, unless the electrical work
is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease;

(2) Employees of an
employer while the employer is performing utility type work of the nature
described in RCW ((19.28.200)) 19.28.091 so long as such
employees have registered in the state of Washington with or graduated from a
state-approved outside lineman apprenticeship course that is recognized by the
department and that qualifies a person to perform such work; ((or))

(3) Any work exempted
under RCW ((19.28.200(6))) 19.28.091(6); or

(4)(a) Employees and
the owners of a residential property management entity operated by a licensed
real estate broker under chapter 18.85 RCW, when the entity acts as an agent on
behalf of an owner to manage the residential property of an owner, and the
entity and its employees perform exclusively the following work on the owner's
residential property: The installation, alteration, or maintenance of electrical
systems for plug-in appliances, travel trailers, or like-in-kind replacement of
a circuit breaker, fuse, lamp, snap switch, receptacle outlet, heating element,
lighting fixture ballast with an exact same ballast, contactor, relay, timer,
starter, similar control component, or motor; and the maintenance, repair, or
like-in-kind replacement of existing lighting fixtures, hot water heaters,
ranges, electric heaters, or similar domestic appliances. The residential
property management agent or his or her employee is limited to equipment and
circuits of two hundred forty volts, sixty amperes, single-phase maximum and
may disconnect and reconnect line supply whips not over six feet in length
provided there are no modifications to the characteristics of the branch
circuit.

(b) For the purpose
of this subsection, "electrical equipment" does not include
electrical conductors. However, this exemption does not apply if the
electrical work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent,
sale, or lease. If an owner building contains both residential and commercial
uses, the exemption only applies to the residential uses.

Nothing in RCW ((19.28.510
through 19.28.620)) 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a
friend, neighbor, relative or other person when none of the individuals doing
the electrical installation hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or
business of electrical installations. Nothing precludes any person who is
exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter under this section from
obtaining a journeyman or specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise
meet the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.27.090 and 1997 c
314 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply to:

(1) An authorized
representative of the United States government, the state of Washington, or any
incorporated city, town, county, township, irrigation district, reclamation
district, or other municipal or political corporation or subdivision of this
state;

(2) Officers of a court
when they are acting within the scope of their office;

(3) Public utilities
operating under the regulations of the utilities and transportation commission
in construction, maintenance, or development work incidental to their own
business;

(4) Any construction,
repair, or operation incidental to the discovering or producing of petroleum or
gas, or the drilling, testing, abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum
or gas well or any surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when
performed by an owner or lessee;

(5) The sale or
installation of any finished products, materials, or articles of merchandise
which are not actually fabricated into and do not become a permanent fixed part
of a structure;

(6) Any construction,
alteration, improvement, or repair of personal property, except this chapter
shall apply to all mobile/manufactured housing. A mobile/manufactured home may
be installed, set up, or repaired by the registered or legal owner, by a
contractor registered under this chapter, or by a mobile/manufactured home
retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW who shall
warranty service and repairs under chapter 46.70 RCW;

(7) Any construction,
alteration, improvement, or repair carried on within the limits and boundaries
of any site or reservation under the legal jurisdiction of the federal
government;

(8) Any person who only
furnished materials, supplies, or equipment without fabricating them into, or
consuming them in the performance of, the work of the contractor;

(9) Any work or
operation on one undertaking or project by one or more contracts, the aggregate
contract price of which for labor and materials and all other items is less
than five hundred dollars, such work or operations being considered as of a
casual, minor, or inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this
subsection does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is
only a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same or a
different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is made into
contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for the purpose of evasion
of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does
not apply to a person who advertises or puts out any sign or card or other
device which might indicate to the public that he or she is a contractor, or
that he or she is qualified to engage in the business of contractor;

(10) Any construction
or operation incidental to the construction and repair of irrigation and
drainage ditches of regularly constituted irrigation districts or reclamation
districts; or to farming, dairying, agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or
stock or poultry raising; or to clearing or other work upon land in rural
districts for fire prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is
performed by a registered contractor;

(11) An owner who contracts
for a project with a registered contractor;

(12) Any person working
on his or her own property, whether occupied by him or her or not, and any
person working on his or her personal residence, whether owned by him or her or
not but this exemption shall not apply to any person otherwise covered by this
chapter who constructs an improvement on his or her own property with the
intention and for the purpose of selling the improved property;

(13) Owners of
commercial properties who use their own employees to do maintenance, repair,
and alteration work in or upon their own properties;

(14) A licensed
architect or civil or professional engineer acting solely in his or her
professional capacity, an electrician licensed under the laws of the state of
Washington, or a plumber licensed under the laws of the state of Washington or
licensed by a political subdivision of the state of Washington while operating
within the boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in
this subsection is applicable only when the licensee is operating within the
scope of his or her license;

(15) Any person who
engages in the activities herein regulated as an employee of a registered
contractor with wages as his or her sole compensation or as an employee with
wages as his or her sole compensation;

(16) Contractors on
highway projects who have been prequalified as required by RCW 47.28.070, with
the department of transportation to perform highway construction,
reconstruction, or maintenance work;

(17)(a) Employees
and the owners of a residential property management entity operated by a
licensed real estate broker under chapter 18.85 RCW, when the entity acts as an
agent on behalf of an owner to manage the residential property of an owner, and
the entity and its employees perform exclusively the following work on the
owner's residential property: The installation, alteration, or maintenance of
electrical systems for plug-in appliances, travel trailers, or like-in-kind
replacement of a circuit breaker, fuse, lamp, snap switch, receptacle outlet,
heating element, lighting fixture ballast with an exact same ballast,
contactor, relay, timer, starter, similar control component, or motor; and the
maintenance, repair, or like-in-kind replacement of existing lighting fixtures,
hot water heaters, ranges, electric heaters, or similar domestic appliances.
The residential property management agent or his or her employee is limited to
equipment and circuits of two hundred forty volts, sixty amperes, single-phase
maximum and may disconnect and reconnect line supply whips not over six feet in
length provided there are no modifications to the characteristics of the branch
circuit.

(b) For
the purpose of this subsection, "electrical equipment" does not
include electrical conductors. However, this exemption does not apply if the
electrical work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent,
sale, or lease. If an owner building contains both residential and commercial
uses, the exemption only applies to the residential uses.

---
END ---