BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.155.010 and 1996
c 168 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that there ((exists in the state of Washington over four billion dollars
worth of critical projects for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads, bridges,
water systems, and storm and sanitary sewage systems. The December, 1983
Washington state public works report prepared by the planning and community
affairs agency documented that local governments expect to be capable of
financing over two billion dollars worth of the costs of those critical
projects but will not be able to fund nearly half of the documented needs.

The legislature
further finds that Washington's local governments have unmet financial needs
for solid waste disposal, including recycling, and encourages the board to make
an equitable geographic distribution of the funds)) are several billion dollars worth of
critical local government projects for the planning, acquisition, construction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, streets and
roads, domestic water systems, sanitary sewer systems, storm water systems,
solid waste/recycling systems, and adult or juvenile correction and detention
facilities that are not funded. This finding is supported by infrastructure
needs assessments of 1983, 1988, and other documents.

It is the policy of the
state of Washington to encourage self-reliance by local governments in meeting
their public works needs and to assist in the financing of critical public
works projects by making loans, financing guarantees, and technical assistance
available to local governments for these projects.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.155.020 and 1996
c 168 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1) "Adult or
juvenile correction or detention facilities" means jails as defined by RCW
70.48.020(5).

(2)
"Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.

(((2))) (3)
"Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required by the
growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local governments not
fully planning under the growth management act, a plan required by the public
works board.

(4)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(((3))) (5)
"Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public works
assistance account, or money to be received by the public works assistance
account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest
on obligations issued by local governments to finance public works projects.

(((4))) (6)
"Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special purpose
districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations
in the state excluding school districts and port districts.

(((5))) (7)
"Public works project" means a project of a local government for the
planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of ((streets and roads, bridges, water
systems, or storm and sanitary sewage systems and solid waste facilities,
including recycling facilities)) bridges, streets and roads, domestic
water systems, sanitary sewer systems, storm water systems, solid
waste/recycling systems, and adult or juvenile correction and detention
facilities. A planning project may include the compilation of biological,
hydrological, or other data on a county, drainage basin, or region necessary to
develop a base of information for a capital facility plan.

(((6))) (8)
"Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions necessary
to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with regulatory
requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of existing solid
waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill projects limited to the
opening of landfill cells that are in existing and permitted landfills.

(((7))) (9)
"Technical assistance" means training and other services provided to
local governments to: (a) Help such local governments plan, apply, and qualify
for loans and financing guarantees from the board, and (b) help local
governments improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire, construct,
repair, replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public facilities.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.155.050 and 1995
2nd sp.s. c 18 s 918 and 1995 c 376 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

The public works
assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be
placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when
authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the
public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and to give
financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in
the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements
under federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. ((During the 1995-97
fiscal biennium, moneys in the public works assistance account may be
appropriated for transfer to the flood control assistance account to be used
for flood control assistance, including grants under chapter 86.26 RCW. To the
extent that moneys in the public works assistance account are not appropriated
during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium for public works or flood control
assistance, the legislature may direct their transfer to the state general
fund. In awarding grants under chapter 86.26 RCW, the department of ecology
shall give strong preference to local governments that have: (1) Implemented,
or are in the process of implementing, an ordinance that establishes a flood
plain policy that is substantially more stringent than minimum federal
requirements; (2) completed a comprehensive flood control plan meeting the
requirements of RCW 86.12.200; or (3) constructed, or are in the process of constructing,
a system of overtopping dikes or levees that allow public access.)) Not
more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility planning
under this chapter. Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation may be expended for emergency loans under this chapter. Not more
than one percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended
for capital facility planning loans under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.155.065 and 1990
c 133 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may make
low-interest or interest-free loans to local governments for emergency public
works projects. Emergency public works projects shall include the
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of a public water system that is in violation of health and safety
standards and is being operated by a local government on a temporary basis.
The loans may be used to help fund all or part of an emergency public works
project less any reimbursement from any of the following sources: (1) Federal
disaster or emergency funds, including funds from the federal emergency
management agency; (2) state disaster or emergency funds; (3) insurance
settlements; or (4) litigation. ((Emergency loans may be made only from
those funds specifically appropriated from the public works assistance account
for such purpose by the legislature. The amount appropriated from the public
works assistance account for emergency loan purposes shall not exceed five
percent of the total amount appropriated from this account in any biennium.))

Sec. 5. RCW 43.155.068 and 1995
c 363 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board may make
low-interest or interest-free loans to local governments for preconstruction
activities on public works projects ((before the legislature approves the
construction phase of the project)). Preconstruction activities include
design, engineering, bid-document preparation, environmental studies, right of
way acquisition, and other preliminary phases of public works projects as
determined by the board. ((The purpose of the loans authorized in this
section is to accelerate the completion of public works projects by allowing
preconstruction activities to be performed before the approval of the
construction phase of the project by the legislature.))

(2) Projects receiving
loans for preconstruction activities under this section must be evaluated using
the priority process and factors in RCW 43.155.070(((2))) (4).
The receipt of a loan for preconstruction activities does not ensure the receipt
of a construction loan for the project under this chapter. ((Construction
loans for projects receiving a loan for preconstruction activities under this
section are subject to legislative approval under RCW 43.155.070 (4) and (5).))
The board shall adopt a single application process for local governments
seeking both a loan for preconstruction activities under this section and a
construction loan for the project.

(((3)
Preconstruction activity loans under this section may be made only from those
funds specifically appropriated from the public works assistance account for
such a purpose by the legislature.))

Sec. 6. RCW 43.155.070 and 1999
c 164 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To qualify for
loans or pledges under this chapter the board must determine that a local
government meets all of the following conditions:

(a) The city or county
must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW at a rate of at least
one-quarter of one percent;

(b) The local
government must have developed a ((long-term)) capital facility
plan ((for financing public works needs)); and

(c) The local
government must be using all local revenue sources which are reasonably
available for funding public works, taking into consideration local employment
and economic factors.

(2) Except where
necessary to address a public health need or substantial environmental
degradation, a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must have
adopted a comprehensive plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and
development regulations ((as required by RCW 36.70A.040)) in
conformance with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW. This subsection
does not require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to
adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request is made
before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 which has not adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods
specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from receiving a loan or loan
guarantee under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and development
regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a
request for a loan or loan guarantee.

(3) In considering
awarding loans for public facilities to special districts requesting funding
for a proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, the board shall consider whether the county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations ((as
required by RCW 36.70A.040)) in conformance with the requirements of
chapter 36.70A RCW.

(4) The board shall
develop a priority process for public works projects as provided in this
section. The intent of the priority process is to maximize the value of public
works projects accomplished with assistance under this chapter. The board
shall attempt to assure a geographical balance in assigning priorities to
projects. The board ((shall consider at least the following factors in assigning
a priority to a project)) is empowered to select projects based on the
greatest need and proof of local management efforts as based on criteria
established by the board, which may include:

(a) Whether the local
government receiving assistance has experienced severe fiscal distress
resulting from natural disaster or emergency public works needs;

(b) Whether the project
is critical in nature and would affect the health and safety of a great number
of citizens;

(c) The cost of the
project compared to the size of the local government and amount of loan money
available;

(d) The number of
communities served by or funding the project;

(e) Whether the project
is located in an area of high unemployment, compared to the average state
unemployment;

(f) Whether the project
is the acquisition, expansion, improvement, or renovation by a local government
of a public water system that is in violation of health and safety standards,
including the cost of extending existing service to such a system;

(g) The relative
benefit of the project to the community, considering the present level of
economic activity in the community and the existing local capacity to increase
local economic activity in communities that have low economic growth; ((and))

(h) Whether the
project is included in the local comprehensive plan or capital facilities plan;
and

(i) Other
criteria that the board considers advisable.

(5) Existing debt or
financial obligations of local governments shall not be refinanced under this
chapter. Each local government applicant shall provide documentation of
attempts to secure additional local or other sources of funding for each public
works project for which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.

(6) Before ((November))
February 1 of each year, the board shall develop and submit to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a ((description))
report of the loans made under ((RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and
subsection (9) of this section during the preceding fiscal year and a
prioritized list of projects which are recommended for funding by the
legislature, including one copy to the staff of each of the committees. The
list)) this chapter and RCW 70.119A.170 during the previous year. The
report shall include, but not be limited to, a description of each project
and recommended financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or financial
guarantee, the local government jurisdiction, and the
unemployment rate((, demonstration of the jurisdiction's critical need for
the project and documentation of local funds being used to finance the public
works project. The list shall also include measures of fiscal capacity for
each jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance, compared to authorized
limits and state averages, including local government sales taxes; real estate
excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage, water,
garbage, and other utilities)).

(7) The board shall not
sign ((contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds from the public
works assistance account before the legislature has appropriated funds for a
specific list of public works projects. The legislature may remove projects
from the list recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the
order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.

(8) Subsection (7)
of this section does not apply to loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068,
and subsection (9) of this section.

(9)(a) Loans made
for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be exempted from subsection
(7) of this section. In no case shall the total amount of funds utilized for
capital facilities plans and emergency loans exceed the limitation in RCW
43.155.065.

(b) For the purposes
of this section "capital facilities plans" means those plans required
by the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, and plans required by the
public works board for local governments not subject to the growth management
act)) loan agreements until
all standards of this chapter have been met.

(((10)))
(8) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that the solid
waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary to implement the
comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by the city or county under
chapter 70.95 RCW.

---
END ---