BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.94.654 and 1993 c
353 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever an
air pollution control authority, or the department of ecology for areas outside
the jurisdictional boundaries of an activated air pollution control authority,
shall find that any fire protection agency, county, or conservation district is
capable of effectively administering the issuance and enforcement of permits
for any or all of the kinds of burning identified in RCW 70.94.650 and desirous
of doing so, the authority or the department of ecology, as appropriate, may
delegate powers necessary for the issuance or enforcement, or both, of permits
for any or all of the kinds of burning to the fire protection agency, county,
or conservation district. Such delegation may be withdrawn by the authority or
the department of ecology upon finding that the fire protection agency, county,
or conservation district is not effectively administering the permit program.

(2) The
board of directors, individual board members, and duly authorized employees of
a conservation district who make decisions regarding the issuance and
enforcement of permits for burning under RCW 70.94.650 are not liable for
decisions and actions made in good faith and in compliance with this chapter.

--- END ---