BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This act may be known and
cited as the education and transportation funding act of 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

Any department, agency,
or institution of higher education may purchase services, including services
that have been customarily and historically provided by employees in the
classified service under this chapter, by contracting with individuals,
nonprofit organizations, businesses, employee business units, or other
entities.

No department, agency,
or institution may enter into, renew, extend, or allow the automatic extension
of any collective bargaining agreement that restricts or modifies the authority
granted by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

The office of financial
management shall establish a process for identifying the savings achieved by
state agencies and institutions of higher education as a result of contracting
for services under the authority granted in section 2 of this act.
Expenditures during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium shall constitute the baseline
for purposes of calculating the savings.

It is the intent of the
legislature that, from the up to seven hundred million dollars in identified
savings, fifty percent be directed to providing increased state funding for
common school education programs and common school construction and fifty
percent be directed to providing increased state funding for transportation
projects and programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.06.380 (Purchasing services by
contract not prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2; and

(2) RCW 41.06.382 (Purchasing services by
contract not prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 1.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

---
END ---