BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 90.42 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that significant water savings could be realized through the installation of
more efficient irrigation systems such as trickle irrigation systems where
climatically and economically suitable. The legislature also finds that
positive economic incentives, establishment of necessary legal procedures, and
removal of legal barriers are needed to stimulate the development of workable
technologies and farming systems that rely on lesser quantities of water.

The purpose of this act
is to stimulate the use of water-efficient irrigation systems by allowing the
saved water to be voluntarily transferred by the water right holder.
Additionally, the purpose is to allow private, as well as public, investment to
provide improved market-based incentives for adopting water saving technologies
and to allow the benefits of the conserved water to be fully realized. It is
the intent of this act that sufficient protections be provided to assure that
existing water users are not adversely affected by transfers approved under
this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.42.020 and 1991 c
347 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(2) "Evaporative
loss" is the amount of water consumed through evaporation or
transpiration.

(3) "Net
water savings" means the amount of water that is determined to be
conserved and usable within a specified stream reach or reaches for other
purposes without impairment or detriment to water rights existing at the time
that a water conservation project is undertaken, reducing the ability to
deliver water, or reducing the supply of water that otherwise would have been
available to other existing water uses.

(((3))) (4)
"Trust water right" means any water right acquired by the state under
this chapter for management in the state's trust water rights program.

(((4))) (5)
"Pilot planning areas" means the geographic areas designated under
RCW 90.54.045(2).

(((5))) (6)
"Water conservation project" means any project or program that
achieves physical or operational improvements that provide for increased water
use efficiency in existing systems of diversion, conveyance, application, or
use of water under water rights existing on July 28, 1991.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 90.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of
this chapter, any person holding a valid water right may enter into a contract
with any other person for the transfer of net water savings from installation
of a water-efficient irrigation system financed by any party to the contract.
A contract may be for a permanent or temporary transfer.

The transferred portion
has the same date of priority as the water right from which it originated, but
between them the transferred portion of the right is inferior in priority
unless otherwise provided by the parties to the contract.

The department shall
maintain with the certificate of water right a record of contracts for
transferred water.

(2) In processing
applications for transfers of portions of water rights under this section, if the
department is unable to conclusively determine the validity of the original
water right, the department may make a presumption of validity in respect to
both the original water right and the portion that is transferred.

The presumption of
validity may not be used as evidence as to the existence of the water right in
an adjudication conducted under chapter 90.03 RCW.

(3) The department
shall approve the transfer of the portion of net water savings that is a
reduction in evaporative loss. The department shall also determine whether
there are any additional net water savings that result directly from
installation of the water-efficient irrigation system that can also be
transferred.

(4) The department may
adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, for procedures similar to
those adopted under RCW 90.42.050 to be used to facilitate the processing of
requests for water right transfers made under this section.

The rules may establish
procedures for the department to make preliminary findings that can be used as
an initial basis for developing contracts by applicants.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.03.380 and 1997 c
442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the)). However, all or a portion of a right
may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant to any other
land or place of use without loss of priority of right theretofore established
if such change can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. The
point of diversion of water for beneficial use or the purpose of use may be
changed, if such change can be made without detriment or injury to existing
rights. A change in the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of
use of a water right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition
of new uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For purposes
of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the estimated or
actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right, reduced by
the estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged over the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right. Before any
transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of diversion of
water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person having an interest in
the transfer or change, shall file a written application therefor with the
department, and the application shall not be granted until notice of the
application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that
such transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in
duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a
record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to the
applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same
effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.

(2) If an application
for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to
another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive
concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or
impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place
of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation
district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors
of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district,
and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This
section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the
funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010
through 90.42.070.

---
END ---