BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.290 and 1994 c
264 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

When an
application complying with the provisions of this chapter and with the rules
and regulations of the department has been filed, the same shall be placed on
record with the department, and it shall be its duty to investigate the
application, and determine what water, if any, is available for appropriation,
and find and determine to what beneficial use or uses it can be applied. If it
is proposed to appropriate water for irrigation purposes, the department shall
investigate, determine and find what lands are capable of irrigation by means
of water found available for appropriation. If it is proposed to appropriate
water for the purpose of power development, the department shall investigate,
determine and find whether the proposed development is likely to prove
detrimental to the public interest, having in mind the highest feasible use of
the waters belonging to the public. If the application does not contain, and
the applicant does not promptly furnish sufficient information on which to base
such findings, the department may issue a preliminary permit, for a period of
not to exceed three years, requiring the applicant to make such surveys,
investigations, studies, and progress reports, as in the opinion of the
department may be necessary. If the applicant fails to comply with the
conditions of the preliminary permit, it and the application or applications on
which it is based shall be automatically canceled and the applicant so notified.
If the holder of a preliminary permit shall, before its expiration, file with
the department a verified report of expenditures made and work done under the
preliminary permit, which, in the opinion of the department, establishes the
good faith, intent and ability of the applicant to carry on the proposed
development, the preliminary permit may, with the approval of the governor, be
extended, but not to exceed a maximum period of five years from the date of the
issuance of the preliminary permit. The department shall make and file as part
of the record in the matter, written findings of fact concerning all things
investigated, and if it shall find that there is water available for
appropriation for a beneficial use, and the appropriation thereof as proposed
in the application will not impair existing rights or be detrimental to the
public welfare, it shall issue a permit stating the amount of water to which
the applicant shall be entitled and the beneficial use or uses to which it may
be applied: PROVIDED, That where the water applied for is to be used for
irrigation purposes, it shall become appurtenant only to such land as may be
reclaimed thereby to the full extent of the soil for agricultural purposes.
But where there is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of supply, or
where the proposed use conflicts with existing rights, or threatens to prove
detrimental to the public interest, having due regard to the highest feasible
development of the use of the waters belonging to the public, it shall be duty
of the department to reject such application and to refuse to issue the permit
asked for. If the permit is refused because of conflict with existing rights
and such applicant shall acquire same by purchase or condemnation under RCW
90.03.040, the department may thereupon grant such permit. Any application may
be approved for a less amount of water than that applied for, if there exists
substantial reason therefor, and in any event shall not be approved for more
water than can be applied to beneficial use for the purposes named in the
application. In determining whether or not a permit shall issue upon any
application, it shall be the duty of the department to investigate all facts
relevant and material to the application. If the application proposes to
divert water for municipal purposes and satisfies the following conditions, the
department shall presumptively find that water is available for appropriation
and that the application will not impair existing rights or be detrimental to
the public welfare and shall issue a permit: (1) The application demonstrates
that the diversion is made within one mile upstream from the point at which
fresh water begins to mix with salt water, or the diversion is from a water
body impounded behind an outlet control facility which is within one mile
upstream of the point at which fresh water begins to mix with salt water; (2)
the application demonstrates that the diversion is downstream of the point of
diversion of any existing water rights; and (3) the application demonstrates
that the diversion will at no time decrease flows below minimum instream flows
established by rule. After the department approves said application in
whole or in part and before any permit shall be issued thereon to the
applicant, such applicant shall pay the fee provided in RCW 90.03.470:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event a permit is issued by the department upon
any application, it shall be its duty to notify the director of fish and
wildlife of such issuance.

--- END ---