BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that access to preventive and restorative oral health services by low-income
children is currently restricted by complex regulatory, financial, cultural,
and geographic barriers that have resulted in a large number of children suffering
unnecessarily from dental disease. The legislature also finds that very early
exposure to oral health care can reverse this disease in many cases, thereby
significantly reducing costs of providing dental services to low-income
populations.

It is the intent of the
legislature to address the problem of poor access to oral health care by
providing for school-based sealant programs through the endorsement of dental
hygienists.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary is
authorized to create a school sealant endorsement program for dental hygienists
and dental assistants. The secretary of health, in consultation with the
dental quality assurance commission and the dental hygiene examining committee,
shall adopt rules to implement this section.

(1) A dental hygienist
licensed in this state after the effective date of this act is eligible to
apply for endorsement by the department of health as a school sealant dental hygienist
upon completion of the Washington state school sealant endorsement program.
While otherwise authorized to act, currently licensed hygienists may still
elect to apply for the endorsement.

(2) A dental assistant
employed after the effective date of this act by a dentist licensed in this
state, who has worked under dental supervision for at least two hundred hours,
is eligible to apply for endorsement by the department of health as a school
sealant dental assistant upon completion of the Washington state school sealant
endorsement program. While otherwise authorized to act, currently employed
dental assistants may still elect to apply for the endorsement.

(3) The department may
impose a fee for implementation of this section.

(4) The secretary shall
provide a report to the legislature by December 1, 2005, evaluating the outcome
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 18.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For low-income,
rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public
health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, a dental hygienist
licensed in this state as of the effective date of this act may assess for and
apply sealants and apply fluoride varnishes in community-based sealant programs
carried out in schools without attending the department's school sealant
endorsement program.

(2) For low-income,
rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public
health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, dental hygienists who
are school sealant endorsed under section 2 of this act may assess for and
apply sealants and fluoride varnishes in community-based sealant programs
carried out in schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 18.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For low-income,
rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public
health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, a dental assistant
working as of the effective date of this act under the supervision of a
licensed dentist may apply sealants and fluoride varnishes under the general
supervision of a dentist in community-based sealant programs carried out in
schools without attending the department's school sealant endorsement program.

(2) For low-income,
rural, and other at-risk populations and in coordination with local public
health jurisdictions and local oral health coalitions, dental assistants who
are school sealant endorsed under section 2 of this act may apply sealants and
fluoride varnishes under the general supervision of a dentist in
community-based sealant programs carried out in schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---