BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington state legislature authorizes the Washington state lottery commission
to take actions necessary to participate with other state lotteries in shared
games.

--- END ---