BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.270 and 1997
c 429 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Each growth management
hearings board shall be governed by the following rules on conduct and
procedure:

(1) Any board member
may be removed for inefficiency, malfeasance, and misfeasance in office, under
specific written charges filed by the governor. The governor shall transmit
such written charges to the member accused and the chief justice of the supreme
court. The chief justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of
three judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Removal
of any member of a board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member for
reappointment.

(2) Each board member
shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of
his or her duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. If it is
determined that the review boards shall operate on a full-time basis, each
member shall receive an annual salary to be determined by the governor pursuant
to RCW 43.03.040. If it is determined that a review board shall operate on a
part-time basis, each member shall receive compensation pursuant to RCW
43.03.250, provided such amount shall not exceed the amount that would be set
if they were a full-time board member. The principal office of each board
shall be located by the governor within the jurisdictional boundaries of each
board. The boards shall operate on either a part-time or full-time basis, as
determined by the governor.

(3) Each board member
shall not: (a) Be a candidate for or hold any other public office or trust;
(b) engage in any occupation or business interfering with or inconsistent with
his or her duty as a board member; and (c) for a period of one year after the
termination of his or her board membership, act in a representative capacity
before the board on any matter.

(4) A majority of each
board shall constitute a quorum for making orders or decisions, adopting rules
necessary for the conduct of its powers and duties, or transacting other
official business, and may act even though one position of the board is vacant.
One or more members may hold hearings and take testimony to be reported for
action by the board when authorized by rule or order of the board. The board
shall perform all the powers and duties specified in this chapter or as
otherwise provided by law.

(5) ((The)) Each
board may appoint one or more hearing examiners to assist the board in its
hearing function, to make ((conclusions of law and)) findings of fact
and, if requested by the board, to make recommendations to the board for
decisions in cases before the board. Such hearing examiners must have
demonstrated knowledge of land use planning and law. The boards shall specify
in their joint rules of practice and procedure, as required by subsection (7)
of this section, the procedure and criteria to be employed for designating
hearing examiners as a presiding officer. Hearing examiners selected by a
board shall meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. The
findings and conclusions of the hearing examiner shall not become final until
they have been formally approved by the board. This authorization to use
hearing examiners does not waive the requirement of RCW 36.70A.300 that ((final
orders be issued)) decisions be made within one hundred eighty days
of board receipt of a petition. Each board may mediate disputes between
counties or cities, over whether their comprehensive plans are coordinated or
consistent, by using one or more of its own members, hiring staff to provide
mediation, or contracting for the provision of mediation.

(6) Each board shall
make findings of fact and prepare a written decision in each case decided by
it, and such findings and decision shall be effective upon being signed by two
or more members of the board and upon being filed at the board's principal
office, and shall be open for public inspection at all reasonable times.

(7) All proceedings
before the board, any of its members, or a hearing examiner appointed by the
board shall be conducted in accordance with such administrative rules of
practice and procedure as the boards jointly prescribe. All three boards shall
jointly meet to develop and adopt joint rules of practice and procedure,
including rules regarding expeditious and summary disposition of appeals. The
boards shall publish such rules and decisions they render and arrange for the
reasonable distribution of the rules and decisions. Except as it conflicts
with specific provisions of this chapter, the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, and specifically including the provisions of RCW 34.05.455
governing ex parte communications, shall govern the practice and procedure of
the boards.

(8) A board member or
hearing examiner is subject to disqualification under chapter 34.05 RCW. The
joint rules of practice of the boards shall establish procedures by which a
party to a hearing conducted before the board may file with the board a motion
to disqualify, with supporting affidavit, against a board member or hearing
examiner assigned to preside at the hearing.

(9) The members of the
boards shall meet jointly on at least an annual basis with the objective of
sharing information that promotes the goals and purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.280 and 1996
c 325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A growth management
hearings board shall hear and determine only those petitions alleging either:

(a) That a ((state
agency,)) county((,)) or city planning under this chapter is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates
to the adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments thereto, or chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to ((plans, development regulations, or amendments,
adopted under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW)) the shoreline master
programs or amendments thereto;

(b) That a county or
city planning under this chapter has not taken an action required under this
chapter by the time the action is required to have been taken; ((or

(b))) (c) That ((the twenty-year growth
management planning population projections adopted by the office of financial
management pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted)) a county or
city has not addressed relevant issues associated with an action required to be
taken under this chapter;

(d) That the
comprehensive plan of a county or city adopted under this chapter is not
coordinated with, or consistent with, the comprehensive plan of another county
or city, as required under RCW 36.70A.100; or

(e) That the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it
relates thereto, are not in compliance with the requirements of chapter 90.58
RCW.

(2) A petition alleging
that a county or city has not addressed issues associated with an action
required under this chapter, or that the comprehensive plan of a county or city
is not coordinated with or consistent with another comprehensive plan as
required under RCW 36.70A.100, may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a
county or city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated
orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on which a
review is being requested; (c) a person who is certified by the governor within
sixty days of filing the request with the board; or (d) a person qualified
pursuant to RCW 34.05.530. A petition alleging that a county or city has
not taken an action required under this chapter, by the time such action is
required to have been taken, may be filed by any person. A petition alleging
that the shoreline master program or amendments thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW
as it relates thereto, may be filed by a person with standing under chapter
43.21C RCW.

(3) For purposes of
this section "person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
association, state agency, governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public
or private organization or entity of any character.

(((4) When
considering a possible adjustment to a growth management planning population
projection prepared by the office of financial management, a board shall
consider the implications of any such adjustment to the population forecast for
the entire state.

The rationale for
any adjustment that is adopted by a board must be documented and filed with the
office of financial management within ten working days after adoption.

If adjusted by a
board, a county growth management planning population projection shall only be
used for the planning purposes set forth in this chapter and shall be known as
a "board adjusted population projection". None of these changes shall
affect the official state and county population forecasts prepared by the
office of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.))

Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997
c 429 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All requests for
review to a growth management hearings board shall be initiated by filing a
petition that includes a detailed statement of issues presented for resolution
by the board. The board shall render written decisions articulating the basis
for its holdings. The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not
presented to the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any
prehearing order.

(2) All petitions
relating to whether or not an adopted comprehensive plan, development
regulation, or permanent amendment thereto, is in compliance with the goals and
requirements of ((this chapter or)) chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be
filed within sixty days after publication by the legislative ((bodies)) authority
of the county or city. All petitions relating to whether or not a county or
city has addressed relevant issues associated with an action required under
this chapter must be filed within sixty days after publication by the
legislative authority of the county or city. All petitions relating to whether
or not comprehensive plans are coordinated or consistent, as required under RCW
36.70A.100, must be filed within sixty days after publication by the
legislative authority of the county or city adopting or amending its
comprehensive plan that is alleged not to be coordinated or consistent with
another comprehensive plan. Petitions relating to whether a county or city has
not taken an action required under this chapter by the time such action is
required to have been taken may be filed at any time.

(((a) Except as
provided in (c) of this subsection,)) The date of publication for a
city shall be the date the city publishes the ordinance, or summary of the
ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto, as is required to be published.

(((b))) Promptly
after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that it has adopted the
comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto.

((Except as provided
in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this section)) The date
of publication for a county shall be the date the county publishes the notice
that it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.

(((c) For local
governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly after approval or
disapproval of a local government’s shoreline master program or amendment
thereto by the department of ecology as provided in RCW 90.58.090, the local
government shall publish a notice that the shoreline master program or
amendment thereto has been approved or disapproved by the department of
ecology. For purposes of this section, the date of publication for the
adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program is the date the local
government publishes notice that the shoreline master program or amendment
thereto has been approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.))

(3) Unless the board
dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds that the person filing the
petition lacks standing, or the parties have filed an agreement to have the
case heard in superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall,
within ten days of receipt of the petition, set a time for hearing the matter.

(4) The board shall
base its decision on the record developed by the city((,)) or
county((, or the state)) and supplemented with additional evidence if
the board determines that such additional evidence would be necessary or of
substantial assistance to the board in reaching its decision.

(5) The board, shall
consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions involving the review of the same
comprehensive plan or the same development regulation or regulations.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.70A.295 and 1997
c 429 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superior court
may directly review a petition for review filed under RCW 36.70A.290 if all
parties to the proceeding before the board have agreed to direct review in the
superior court. The agreement of the parties shall be in writing and signed by
all of the parties to the proceeding or their designated representatives. ((The
agreement shall include the parties' agreement to proper venue as provided in
RCW 36.70A.300(5).)) The parties shall file their agreement with the board
within ten days after the date the petition is filed, or if multiple petitions
have been filed and the board has consolidated the petitions pursuant to RCW
36.70A.300, within ten days after the board serves its order of consolidation.

(2) Within ten days of
receiving the timely and complete agreement of the parties, the board shall
file a certificate of agreement with the designated superior court and shall
serve the parties with copies of the certificate. The superior court shall
obtain exclusive jurisdiction over a petition when it receives the certificate
of agreement. With the certificate of agreement the board shall also file the
petition for review, any orders entered by the board, all other documents in
the board's files regarding the action, and the written agreement of the
parties.

(3) For purposes of a
petition that is subject to direct review, the superior court's subject matter
jurisdiction shall be equivalent to that of the board. Consistent with the
requirements of the superior court civil rules, the superior court may
consolidate a petition subject to direct review under this section with a
separate action filed in the superior court.

(4)(a) Except as
otherwise provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, the provisions of RCW
36.70A.280 through ((36.70A.330)) 36.70A.3201, which specify the
nature and extent of board review, shall apply to the superior court's review.

(b) The superior court:

(i) Shall not have
jurisdiction to directly review or modify an office of financial management
population projection;

(ii) Except as
otherwise provided in RCW 36.70A.300(((2)(b))), shall render its
decision on the petition within one hundred eighty days of receiving the
certification of agreement; and

(iii) Shall give a
compliance hearing ((under RCW 36.70A.330(2))) the highest priority of
all civil matters before the court.

(c) An aggrieved party
may secure appellate review of a final judgment of the superior court under
this section by the supreme court or the court of appeals. The review shall be
secured in the manner provided by law for review of superior court decisions in
other civil cases.

(5) If, following a
compliance hearing, the court finds that the state agency, county, or city is
not in compliance with the court's prior order, the court may use its remedial
and contempt powers to enforce compliance.

(6) The superior court
shall transmit a copy of its decision and order on direct review to the board,
the department, and the governor. If the court has determined that a county or
city is not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, the governor may
impose sanctions against the county or city ((in the same manner as if a
board had recommended the imposition of sanctions)) as provided in RCW ((36.70A.330))
36.70A.340.

(7) After the court has
assumed jurisdiction over a petition for review under this section, the
superior court civil rules shall govern a request for intervention and all
other procedural matters not specifically provided for in this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 36.70A.300 and 1997
c 429 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The board
shall issue a final order that shall be based exclusively on whether or not a
state agency, county, or city is in compliance with the requirements of this
chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to adoption or amendment of shoreline
master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans,
development regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or
chapter 90.58 RCW.

(2)))(a) Except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, the ((final order)) board shall ((be issued)) issue
a decision within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the petition for
review, or, if multiple petitions are filed, within one hundred eighty days of
receipt of the last petition that is consolidated.

(b) The board may
extend the period of time for issuing a decision to enable the parties to
settle the dispute if additional time is necessary to achieve a settlement, and
(i) an extension is requested by all parties, or (ii) an extension is requested
by the petitioner and respondent and the board determines that a negotiated
settlement between the remaining parties could resolve significant issues in
dispute. The request must be filed with the board not later than seven days
before the date scheduled for the hearing on the merits of the petition. The
board may authorize one or more extensions for up to ninety days each, subject
to the requirements of this section.

(((3))) (2)
In ((the final order)) rendering its decision, the board shall ((either)):

(a) Find that the ((state
agency,)) county((,)) or city is in compliance with the requirements
of ((this chapter,)) chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption or
amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW
36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or

(b) Find that the
county or city either has, or has not, taken the action by the time such action
is required to have been taken; or

(c) Find that
the ((state agency,)) county((,)) or city ((is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it
relates to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development regulations, and
amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW, in which case))
either has, or has not, addressed relevant issues associated with an action
required under this chapter, but may not consider the adequacy of the actions
taken by the county or city. If the board finds that the county or city has
not addressed the relevant issues, the board shall ((remand the matter
to the affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall)) specify a
reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such longer period
as determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or complexity, within
which the ((state agency,)) county((,)) or city and the person
or persons appealing the action shall ((comply with the requirements of
this chapter. The board may require periodic reports to the board on the
progress the jurisdiction is making towards compliance.

(4) Unless the board
makes a determination of invalidity as provided in RCW 36.70A.302, a finding of
noncompliance and an order of remand shall not affect the validity of
comprehensive plans and development regulations during the period of remand.

(5) Any party
aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board may appeal the decision to
superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514 or 36.01.050 within thirty days of
the final order of the board)) attempt
to resolve the dispute; or

(d) Find that the
comprehensive plans either are, or are not, coordinated or consistent, as
required under RCW 36.70A.100. If the board finds that the comprehensive plans
are not coordinated or consistent, the board shall mediate between the affected
counties or cities to resolve the lack of coordination or lack of consistency.

(3) Nothing in RCW
36.70A.250 through 36.70A.345 precludes an aggrieved party from filing a law
suit seeking equitable relief against a county or city for failing to comply
with the requirements of this chapter or seeking other remedies that may exist
challenging the actions of a county or city taken under this chapter.

(4) Any party
aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board may appeal the decision
directly to the court of appeals for assignment by the chief presiding judge.

Sec. 6. RCW 36.70A.310 and 1994
c 249 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

A request for review by
the state to a growth management hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280(1)
may be made only by the governor, or with the governor's consent the head of an
agency, or by the commissioner of public lands as relating to state trust
lands((, for the review of whether: (1) A county or city that is required
or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 has failed to adopt a comprehensive
plan or development regulations, or countywide planning policies within the
time limits established by this chapter; or (2) a county or city that is
required or chooses to plan under this chapter has adopted a comprehensive plan,
development regulations, or countywide planning policies, that are not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter)).

Sec. 7. RCW 36.70A.320 and 1997
c 429 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section,)) Comprehensive plans
and development regulations, and amendments thereto, adopted under this chapter
are presumed valid upon adoption.

(2) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (4) of this section, the burden is on the petitioner to
demonstrate that any action taken by a state agency, county, or city under this
chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(3) In any petition
under this chapter, the board, after full consideration of the petition, shall
((determine whether there is compliance with the requirements of this
chapter. In making its determination, the board shall consider the criteria
adopted by the department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The board shall find
compliance unless it determines that the action by the state agency, county, or
city is clearly erroneous in view of the entire record before the board and in
light of the goals and requirements of this chapter)) render its
decision.

(4) A county or city ((subject
to a determination of invalidity)) aggrieved by a final decision
made under RCW 36.70A.300 ((or 36.70A.302)) has the burden of
demonstrating that the ordinance or resolution it has enacted in response to
the ((determination of invalidity)) final decision will no longer
substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter ((under
the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1))).

(((5) The shoreline
element of a comprehensive plan and the applicable development regulations
adopted by a county or city shall take effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.))

Sec. 8. RCW 36.70A.340 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

((Upon receipt from
the board of a finding that a state agency, county, or city is in noncompliance
under RCW 36.70A.330, or as a result of failure to meet the requirements of))
If sanctions are imposed under RCW 36.70A.210, 36.70A.295, or
36.70A.345, the governor may either:

(1) Notify and direct
the director of the office of financial management to revise allotments in
appropriation levels;

(2) Notify and direct
the state treasurer to withhold the portion of revenues to which the county or
city is entitled under one or more of the following: The motor vehicle fuel
tax, as provided in chapter 82.36 RCW; the transportation improvement account,
as provided in RCW 47.26.084; the urban arterial trust account, as provided in
RCW 47.26.080; the rural arterial trust account, as provided in RCW 36.79.150;
the sales and use tax, as provided in chapter 82.14 RCW; the liquor profit tax,
as provided in RCW 66.08.190; and the liquor excise tax, as provided in RCW
82.08.170; or

(3) File a notice of
noncompliance with the secretary of state and the county or city, which shall
temporarily rescind the county or city's authority to collect the real estate
excise tax under RCW 82.46.030 until the governor files a notice rescinding the
notice of noncompliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 36.70A.302 (Determination of
invalidity--Vesting of development permits--Interim controls) and 1997 c 429 s
16; and

(2) RCW 36.70A.330 (Noncompliance) and 1997 c
429 s 21, 1995 c 347 s 112, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 14.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. RCW 36.70A.340 is
recodified to appear immediately after RCW 36.70A.345.

---
END ---