BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.112 RCW to read as follows:

Methyl
tertiary-butyl ether may not be intentionally added to any gasoline, motor
fuel, or clean fuel produced for sale or use in the state of Washington after
December 31, 2003, and in no event may methyl tertiary-butyl ether be present
in gasoline above six-tenths of one percent by volume.

--- END ---