BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.215 and 1997
c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limitations in subsection (((7))) (8) of this section, a county
shall adopt, in consultation with its cities, countywide planning policies to
establish a review and evaluation program. This program shall be in addition
to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In
developing and implementing the review and evaluation program required by this
section, the county and its cities shall consider information from other
appropriate jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review and
evaluation program shall be to:

(a) Determine whether a
county and its cities are achieving urban densities within urban growth areas
by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets, and objectives
contained in the countywide planning policies and the county and city
comprehensive plans with actual growth and development that has occurred in the
county and its cities; and

(b) Identify and
adopt reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth areas, that
will be taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter, which are
sufficient to accommodate residential and nonresidential growth.

(2) The review and
evaluation program shall:

(a) Encompass land uses
and activities both within and outside of urban growth areas and provide for
annual collection and reporting of data to the county on urban
and rural land uses, development, critical areas, and capital facilities to the
extent necessary to determine the quantity and type of land suitable for
development, both for residential and employment-based activities;

(b) Provide for
evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every five years
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The first evaluation shall be
completed not later than September 1, 2002. The county and its cities may
establish in the countywide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and other
similar criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;

(c) Provide for methods
to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the countywide planning
policies required by this section and procedures to resolve inconsistencies in
collection and analysis of data; and

(d) Provide for the
amendment of the countywide policies and county and city comprehensive plans and
development regulations as needed to remedy an inconsistency identified
through the evaluation required by this section, or to bring these policies
into compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(3) At a minimum, the
evaluation component of the program required by subsection (1) of this section
shall:

(a) Require a joint
report from each county and its cities regarding regional growth patterns,
trends, comparing employment, housing growth, and market conditions; and
compiling data on new development. The report shall:

(i) Evaluate whether
or not the zoning and development regulations allow development at the
densities sufficient to accommodate the adopted population and employment
projections;

(ii) Highlight the
reasons for the difference between the planned outcomes and actual performance,
such as market and other factors affecting the achievement of planned outcomes;
and

(iii) Indicate
reasonable and appropriate actions adopted to encourage growth to occur
sufficient to accommodate residential and nonresidential needs;

(b) Determine
whether there is sufficient land suitable ((land)) for
development to accommodate the countywide population projection established
for the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent population
allocations within the county and between the county and its cities and the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(((b))) (c)
Determine the net number and types of new residential dwelling units;
the actual density of housing that has been constructed ((and)); the
square footage of new nonresidential development permitted; the actual
amount of land developed for commercial and industrial uses; the estimated
net number of new jobs created countywide; and the amount of known
environmentally sensitive land and lands that cannot be built upon within
the urban growth area since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this
chapter or since the last periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this
section; and

(((c))) (d)
Based on the actual density of development as determined under (((b))) (c)
of this subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type
and density range to determine the amount of land needed for commercial, industrial,
and housing for the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning period used
in the most recently adopted comprehensive plan.

(4) If the evaluation
required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates an inconsistency
between what has occurred since the adoption of the countywide planning
policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section((,
the county and its cities)); or demonstrates that the county or any city
is not achieving the land use designations and densities planned for the
jurisdiction in its comprehensive plan based on the evaluation factors
specified in subsection (3) of this section, the county or city shall identify
and adopt reasonable measures in order to accommodate the demand for
residential units and nonresidential growth during the subsequent five-year
period.

(a) If actions to
achieve consistency are necessary, the county or city shall revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development or other regulations, or take other
actions necessary to increase consistency, and ensure sufficient land suitable
for development with applicable development regulations to accommodate
projected residential units necessary for population growth, and achieved
densities projected for the jurisdiction in the countywide planning policy and
its comprehensive plan. The county or city shall adopt and implement appropriate
measures within one year of conducting the evaluation under this section
that are reasonably likely to increase consistency during the subsequent
five-year period. If necessary, a county, in consultation with its cities as
required by RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to countywide planning
policies to increase consistency. The county and its cities shall annually
monitor the measures adopted under this subsection to determine their effect
and may revise or rescind them as appropriate.

(b) A county or city
adopting actions shall, at a minimum, demonstrate that it has considered
whether the urban land designated for residential and nonresidential uses is
zoned at density ranges with applicable development regulations that are
reasonably likely to be achieved by the market.

(c) Actions to
increase consistency in planned and achieved growth may include, but are not
limited to, the following:

(i) Incentives to
encourage new development consistent with the local plan;

(ii) Funding of
infrastructure and amenities to attract development;

(iii) Changes in
land use regulations and zoning designations for land within the boundaries of
the jurisdiction in a manner that encourages development to occur at densities
sufficient to accommodate projected residential and nonresidential growth;

(iv) Outreach
programs to encourage developers to build the type of development sought in the
jurisdiction's plan or development regulations; and

(v) Improved
procedures to reduce the time it takes the jurisdiction to issue permits.

(5) Countywide
planning policies may include additional incentive provisions and enforcement
measures to accommodate growth and achieve goals.

(6)(a) Not later
than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list of methods used by
counties and cities in carrying out the types of activities required by this
section. The department shall provide this information and appropriate
technical assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing to comply
with the provisions of this section.

(b) By December 31, ((2007))
2003 and 2008, the department shall submit to the appropriate committees
of the legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness of the activities
described and measures taken by the counties and cities in this section
in achieving the goals envisioned by the countywide planning policies and the
comprehensive plans and development regulations of the counties and cities.

(((6))) (7)
From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the department
shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional planning organizations
required under subsection (((7))) (8) of this section to conduct
the review and perform the evaluation required by this section.

(((7))) (8)
The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the cities within
those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand in population
in 1995 as determined by office of financial management population estimates
and that are located west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range. Any
other county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out the review,
evaluation, and amendment programs and procedures as provided in this section.

(9) Unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this section.

(a) "Land
suitable for development" means all vacant, partially used, and
underutilized parcels that are: (i) Designated for commercial, industrial, or
residential use; (ii) not intended for public use; and (iii) not constrained by
critical areas in a way that limits development potential and makes new
construction on a parcel unfeasible.

(b)
"Performance measures" required under RCW 36.70A.210(3) means an
indicator providing consistent and reliable information over time to help gauge
how a jurisdiction is achieving specified performance results.
"Indicator" means a quantifiable measurement or index.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. Section 1 of this act
takes effect September 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2002, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---