BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. This chapter may be known
and cited as the diversification of electricity supply and demand management
act.

Sec. 2. RCW 80.60.005 and 1998 c
318 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that it is in the public interest to:

(1) Encourage private
investment in renewable energy resources;

(2) Stimulate the
economic growth of this state; ((and))

(3) Enhance the
continued diversification of the energy resources used in this state; and

(4) Promote
conservation and efficiency in electricity usage.

Sec. 3. RCW 80.60.010 and 2000 c
158 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise.

(1) "Alternative
energy resources" means the electricity produced from generation
facilities fueled by: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d)
landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; (f) gas produced during the treatment
of wastewater; (g) qualified hydropower; or (h) biomass energy based on solid
organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops
that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper‑chrome‑arsenic.

(2)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(((2))) (3)
"Conservation and efficiency resources" means measures that yield a
decrease of energy consumption while providing the same level of energy
service.

(4)
"Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering system.

(((3))) (5)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(6)
"Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that meets
the definition of RCW 80.04.010.

(((4))) (7)
"Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or association organized
under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.

(((5))) (8)
"Electric utility" means any electrical company, public utility
district, irrigation district, port district, electric cooperative, or
municipal electric utility that is engaged in the business of distributing
electricity to retail electric customers in the state.

(((6))) (9)
"Irrigation district" means an irrigation district under chapter
87.03 RCW.

(((7))) (10)
"Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that owns or
operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.

(((8))) (11)
"Net metering" means measuring the difference between the electricity
supplied by an electric utility and the electricity generated by a
customer-generator that is fed back to the electric utility over the applicable
billing period.

(((9))) (12)
"Net metering system" means a fuel cell or a facility for the
production of electrical energy that:

(a) Uses as its fuel
either solar, wind, or hydropower;

(b) Has a generating
capacity of not more than twenty-five kilowatts;

(c) Is located on the
customer-generator's premises;

(d) Operates in
parallel with the electric utility's transmission and distribution facilities;
and

(e) Is intended
primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for
electricity.

(((10))) (13)
"Port district" means a port district within which an industrial
development district has been established as authorized by Title 53 RCW.

(((11))) (14)
"Public utility district" means a district authorized by chapter
54.04 RCW.

(15) "Qualified
diversity resources" means (a) conservation and efficiency resources
contracted for after March 1, 2001; or (b) alternative energy resources that
are either:

(i) Alternative
energy resources initiating operations after March 1, 2001, that are physically
metered and that are verified in Washington; or

(ii) Existing
alternative energy resources located in Washington and fully owned or
contracted by a Washington utility.

(16) "Qualified
hydropower" means the additional energy produced by (a) existing
hydropower facilities that have been modernized or upgraded after June 1, 1998,
to increase capacity or efficiency; or (b) new hydropower facilities that
operate with a head of twenty meters or less.

(17) "Small
electric utility" means any consumer‑owned utility with twenty-five
thousand or fewer electric meters in service, or that has an average of seven
or fewer customers per mile of distribution line. "Electric meters in
service" means those meters that record in at least nine months in any
calendar year not less than two hundred fifty kilowatt hours per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) By January 1, 2007,
and each year thereafter through December 31, 2011, each electric utility shall
ensure that at least five percent of its resources used to serve its Washington
retail customers are qualified diversity resources. Of the five percent, not
less than one and one‑quarter percent must be alternative energy
resources and not less than one and one‑quarter percent must be
conservation and efficiency resources.

(2) By January 1, 2012,
and each year thereafter, each electric utility shall ensure that at least ten
percent of its resources used to serve its Washington retail customers are
qualified diversity resources. Of the ten percent, not less than two and one‑half
percent must be alternative energy resources and not less than two and one‑half
percent must be conservation and efficiency resources.

(3) An electric utility
that as of March 1, 2001, owns or has under contract sufficient resources to
meet one hundred percent of its annual energy needs to serve its customers is
exempt from the alternative energy resources obligations of this section until
such time as those resources are no longer sufficient to serve at least
ninety-five percent of its annual energy needs, or January 1, 2009, whichever
is earlier.

(4) If in any year the
lowest cost alternative energy resource available to a utility exceeds one
hundred ten percent of the capital and energy cost from a new generation
facility that is not an alternative energy resource, the utility is relieved of
its alternative resource obligations under this section.

(5) A small utility may
meet its obligation under this section by investing at least two times the
amount of its conservation and renewables discount pursuant to the Bonneville
power administration's conservation and renewables discount program for the
contract period beginning October 1, 2001.

(6) A utility is
relieved of its obligation under this section with regard to alternative energy
resources for that portion of its customer load that is met with power
purchased from the Bonneville power administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) By January 1, 2007,
and each year thereafter through December 31, 2011, each natural gas
distribution utility that provides gas services within two or more counties
shall ensure that at least two and one-half percent of its resources used to
serve its Washington retail customers are conservation and efficiency
resources.

(2) By January 1, 2012,
and each year thereafter, each natural gas distribution utility that provides gas
services within two or more counties shall ensure that at least five percent of
its resources used to serve its Washington retail customers are conservation
and efficiency resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) By March 1, 2003, and
by each March 1st thereafter, each electric utility, except electrical
companies, shall report at an open public meeting its activities undertaken to
achieve the requirements of section 4 of this act. A written copy or
transcript of the report must also be submitted to the department within twenty
days of the public meeting.

(2) Beginning March 1,
2003, and by each March 1st thereafter, each electrical company and gas company
shall report to the commission its activities undertaken to achieve the
requirements of sections 4 and 5 of this act.

(3) By July 1, 2003,
and each July 1st thereafter, the department and the commission must jointly
report to the legislature and the governor whether and how the standards in
sections 4 and 5 of this act have been met for the previous calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 43.21F RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall adopt rules governing the reporting requirements in section 6(1) of this
act.

(2) The department
shall adopt rules establishing criteria for determining whether resources
qualify as alternative energy resources or conservation and efficiency
resources as defined in RCW 80.60.010. To the extent practicable, these
criteria shall be consistent with any pertinent recommendations of the regional
technical forum of the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation
planning council created under P.L. 96‑501, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 839. The
department may establish procedures by which an electric utility, except an
electric company, that makes expenditures for eligible conservation and
efficiency resources in an amount equivalent to two percent of its previous
calendar year's gross revenues from the bundled sale of electricity to
Washington retail customers is deemed to have dedicated one-half of one percent
of its resources toward the conservation and efficiency requirements of section
4 of this act. The rules shall include criteria for qualifying expenditures
for weatherization of low‑income households as conservation and
efficiency resources. The department shall also consider energy savings
realized from smart meters and other energy management systems in establishing
criteria under this section.

(3) By July 1, 2003,
the department shall establish criteria by which utilities may meet the
provisions of sections 4 and 5 of this act through a qualified diversity
resource credit trading program. For purposes of this section, "qualified
diversity resource credit trading program" means a clearinghouse or other
system through which a utility may secure, for trade or other consideration,
verifiable evidence that a second party has developed a qualified diversity
resource equivalent in part or in full to the utility's obligation under this
section and that the second party agrees to transfer such evidence exclusively
to the credit of the utility. The department shall report to the legislature
regarding the establishment of any credit trading program under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall
adopt rules to implement sections 4 through 6 of this act with respect to
electrical companies and gas companies. The rules may include criteria to
establish equivalence between an electric company's expenditure levels for
conservation and efficiency resources and the performance standard percentages
set out in sections 4 and 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Each electric utility, as
defined in RCW 80.60.010, shall undertake and complete by January 1, 2003, a
feasibility study to determine effective methods for reducing by at least three
percent use of electricity during daily peak periods of electricity demand.
Each utility shall report the results of its study under section 6 of this act.
The study shall consider the feasibility and effectiveness of such factors as:
Providing consumers information on the cost of electricity at different times
of day or season; "smart meters" technology or other energy
management systems that enable consumers and utilities to improve management of
electricity supply and cost; and rate structures that create an incentive for
demand reduction dispatched by utilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Any direct service
industrial customer that obtains a sales and use tax exemption or deferral or
business and occupation tax or public utility tax credit under chapter
. . . (House Bill No. 1404, Senate Bill No. 5539, or other similar
legislation), Laws of 2001 must meet the obligations under sections 4 and 6 of
this act as if it were an electric utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Sections 1, 4 through 6,
and 10 of this act are each added to chapter 80.60 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. If chapter
. . . (House Bill No. 1404, Senate Bill No. 5539, or other similar
legislation), Laws of 2001 does not become law by June 30, 2001, section 10 of
this act is null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder
of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---