BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that part-time faculty at the state's community and technical colleges are an
invaluable and integral part of the higher education system. The legislature
also finds that part-time faculty teach courses with a high degree of quality.
The legislature further finds that long-term part-time faculty have amassed a
significant degree of experience that contributes to student learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The college board
shall submit to each of the community and technical colleges principles and
guidelines in considering the equitable employment treatment of part-time
faculty. The principles and guidelines shall, at a minimum, include the
following:

(a) A no-harm provision
that will ensure that new policies do not hurt or disadvantage part-time
faculty;

(b) Consideration of
teaching work experience as a factor in hiring full-time faculty;

(c) Consideration of
part-time faculty years of service as a factor in hiring full-time faculty;

(d) Hold irrespective
the age of an applicant as a factor in considering applicants for full-time
faculty positions; and

(e) Direct each
community and technical college to develop a seniority system among part-time
faculty for use in the assignment of courses.

(2) The college board
shall direct each community and technical college to adapt and use the
provisions in this section in all future collective bargaining agreement
negotiations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Nothing contained in this
act may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the
provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement.

---
END ---