BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.36 RCW to read as follows:

If a master planned
resort, as defined in RCW 36.70A.360, is developed in an area that is defined
by the department by rule as critical elk habitat or elk migratory corridor
habitat, then the master planned resort may not recover any damages or make any
claim for elk-caused damage under this chapter or RCW 77.12.240.

By January
1, 2002, the department must adopt rules that identify elk migratory corridors
and critical elk habitat, including calving grounds and winter feeding
grounds. The rules must give consideration to the overall health and
population of designated elk herds.

--- END ---