BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Currently, the department
of fish and wildlife, the parks and recreation commission, and the department
of natural resources own lands that have capital facilities located on them.
Many of these facilities are in poor physical condition. Some of these
facilities are abandoned. Many of these facilities are located near populated
areas, near tourist destinations, or are near state highways that travelers use
to access tourist destinations. Many of these properties are owned by the
state for the purpose of protecting certain habitats, ecosystems, or wildlife,
or have played a role in the environmental history of the state. The state
does not have sufficient resources to refurbish, maintain, and use many of
these facilities.

There are many
nonprofit organizations in the state dedicated to the protection of various
species and working to protect various habitats and ecosystems. These groups
provide a valuable educational opportunity for the public concerning these
species and habitats.

There is an opportunity
for state recreation and natural resources agencies that have poorly maintained
facilities to develop partnerships with nonprofit organizations. These
partnerships would include the state providing the capital financing for the
renovation and repair of facilities, while nonprofit organizations would
provide maintenance and staffing at the facilities, as well as providing
educational opportunities for citizens of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The department of fish
and wildlife, the parks and recreation commission, and the department of
natural resources must jointly establish a committee to review the use of
state-owned facilities located on lands dedicated to recreation and natural
resource uses. The committee must include two members from the senate, one
from each major political party, appointed by the president of the senate, and
two members from the house of representatives, one from each major political
party, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives. The
committee must also include members from interested stakeholder groups located
throughout the state.

The committee must:

(1) Identify potential
state-owned, natural resource or recreation-based facilities that would:

(a) Promote a more
effective use of the state-owned facility;

(b) Increase the
involvement of nonprofit organizations in the educational use of state-owned
lands; and

(c) Maximize the
investment of state funds in state-owned lands by identifying potential
partnerships with nonprofit organizations;

(2) Identify potential
nonprofit partners for various sites; and

(3) Develop a standard
memorandum of understanding between the state agencies and nonprofit
organizations that would address various issues such as division of
responsibilities, liabilities, obligations of each party, and other issues of
concern.

The
committee must submit a report to the legislature by January 7, 2002. The
report must include a list of potential sites, possible sources of funding for
improvements to these sites, and a list of possible stakeholder partners. The
list of stakeholder partners must include details of the stakeholders'
contributions to the sites or program. The report may include recommended
legislation or supplemental budget requests.

---
END ---