BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that the state's fish and wildlife resources and the state's parks
and recreation lands and facilities are some of the most popular and valuable
resources in the state.

Making these resources
easily accessible to all of the citizens of the state is a priority goal. The
purpose of this act is to study and review the feasibility of combining the
department of fish and wildlife's access pass with the proposed state parks'
day use pass into a single, convenient, conservation pass.

The legislature intends
to provide an opportunity for nonprofit, conservation-oriented organizations to
participate in the selling of the conservation pass.

Further, the
legislature intends to explore the possibility of providing new revenue for new
watchable wildlife programs on state park lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature directs
the department of fish and wildlife, the parks and recreation commission, and
the department of revenue to convene a work group to explore the feasibility of
creating a conservation pass that would accomplish the goals set out in section
1 of this act. The work group must include members from interested stakeholder
groups that represent a broad diversity of views and interests related to
outdoor recreation.

The work
group must report its recommendation to the legislature by January 7, 2002.

---
END ---