BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The department of
transportation shall convene a panel of stakeholders to evaluate the advantages
and disadvantages of removing the aviation division from the department of
transportation and creating a Washington state department of aviation. The
stakeholders must be familiar with aviation programs and aviation needs in
Washington. At a minimum the evaluation must include: (1) A survey of
aviation division customers to determine whether the current aviation division
meets the needs of those customers; (2) a comparison of procedures,
regulations, and requirements of the Federal Aviation Administration and the
Federal Highway Administration to determine if federal laws governing the
aviation division conflict with those governing the department of
transportation; (3) an analysis of the department of transportation's processes
to determine whether the creation of a separate aviation division would result
in a cost savings to the division; (4) a financial analysis to determine if the
aviation fuel tax, aircraft registration fees, and other revenue from aviation
services would enable a separate aviation division to operate without
additional state resources; and (5) an analysis to determine if the current
location of the aviation services division meets the needs of its customers.
By December 1, 2001, the stakeholder panel shall make recommendations to the
house of representatives and senate transportation committees and the office of
financial management on the feasibility of creating a Washington state
department of aviation.

---
END ---