BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that statewide enhanced 911 has proven to be a lifesaving service and that
routing a 911 call to the appropriate public safety answering point with a
display of the caller's identification and location should be available for all
users of telecommunications services, regardless of the technology used to make
and transmit the 911 call. The legislature also finds that it is in the best
public interest to ensure that there is adequate ongoing funding to support
enhanced 911 service.

Sec. 2. RCW 38.52.010 and 1997 c
49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Emergency
management" or "comprehensive emergency management" means the
preparation for and the carrying out of all emergency functions, other than
functions for which the military forces are primarily responsible, to mitigate,
prepare for, respond to, and recover from emergencies and disasters, and to aid
victims suffering from injury or damage, resulting from disasters caused by all
hazards, whether natural, technological, or human caused, and to provide
support for search and rescue operations for persons and property in distress.
However, "emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency
management" does not mean preparation for emergency evacuation or
relocation of residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.

(2) "Local
organization for emergency services or management" means an organization
created in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by state or local
authority to perform local emergency management functions.

(3) "Political
subdivision" means any county, city or town.

(4) "Emergency
worker" means any person, including but not limited to an architect
registered under chapter 18.08 RCW or a professional engineer registered under
chapter 18.43 RCW, who is registered with a local emergency management
organization or the department and holds an identification card issued by the
local emergency management director or the department for the purpose of
engaging in authorized emergency management activities or is an employee of the
state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof who is called upon to
perform emergency management activities.

(5) "Injury"
as used in this chapter shall mean and include accidental injuries and/or
occupational diseases arising out of emergency management activities.

(6)(a) "Emergency
or disaster" as used in all sections of this chapter except RCW 38.52.430
shall mean an event or set of circumstances which: (I) Demands immediate
action to preserve public health, protect life, protect public property, or to
provide relief to any stricken community overtaken by such occurrences, or (ii)
reaches such a dimension or degree of destructiveness as to warrant the
governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.

(b)
"Emergency" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means an incident that requires
a normal police, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical services, or utility
response as a result of a violation of one of the statutes enumerated in RCW
38.52.430.

(7) "Search and
rescue" means the acts of searching for, rescuing, or recovering by means
of ground, marine, or air activity any person who becomes lost, injured, or is
killed while outdoors or as a result of a natural, technological, or human
caused disaster, including instances involving searches for downed aircraft
when ground personnel are used. Nothing in this section shall affect
appropriate activity by the department of transportation under chapter 47.68
RCW.

(8) "Executive
head" and "executive heads" means the county executive in those
charter counties with an elective office of county executive, however
designated, and, in the case of other counties, the county legislative
authority. In the case of cities and towns, it means the mayor in those cities
and towns with mayor-council or commission forms of government, where the mayor
is directly elected, and it means the city manager in those cities and towns
with council manager forms of government. Cities and towns may also designate
an executive head for the purposes of this chapter by ordinance.

(9)
"Director" means the adjutant general.

(10) "Local
director" means the director of a local organization of emergency
management or emergency services.

(11)
"Department" means the state military department.

(12) "Emergency
response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means a public agency's use of emergency
services during an emergency or disaster as defined in subsection (6)(b) of
this section.

(13) "Expense of
an emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means reasonable costs
incurred by a public agency in reasonably making an appropriate emergency response
to the incident, but shall only include those costs directly arising from the
response to the particular incident. Reasonable costs shall include the costs
of providing police, coroner, fire fighting, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response at the scene of the incident, as well as the
salaries of the personnel responding to the incident.

(14) "Public
agency" means the state, and a city, county, municipal corporation,
district, town, or public authority located, in whole or in part, within this
state which provides or may provide fire fighting, police, ambulance, medical,
or other emergency services.

(15) "Incident
command system" means: (a) An all-hazards, on-scene functional management
system that establishes common standards in organization, terminology, and
procedures; provides a means (unified command) for the establishment of a
common set of incident objectives and strategies during
multiagency/multijurisdiction operations while maintaining individual
agency/jurisdiction authority, responsibility, and accountability; and is a
component of the national interagency incident management system; or (b) an
equivalent and compatible all-hazards, on-scene functional management system.

(16)
"Radio communications service company" has the meaning ascribed to it
in RCW 82.14B.020.

Sec. 3. RCW 38.52.530 and 2000 c
34 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The enhanced 911
advisory committee is created to advise and assist the state enhanced 911
coordinator in coordinating and facilitating the implementation and operation
of enhanced 911 throughout the state. The director shall appoint members of
the committee who represent diverse geographical areas of the state and include
state residents who are members of the national emergency number association,
the associated public communications officers Washington chapter, the
Washington state fire chiefs association, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington state council of fire fighters, the
Washington state council of police officers, the Washington ambulance
association, the state fire protection policy board, the Washington fire commissioners
association, the Washington state patrol, the association of Washington cities,
the Washington state association of counties, the utilities and transportation
commission or commission staff, and an equal number of representatives
of large and small local exchange telephone companies and large and small
radio communications service companies offering commercial mobile radio service
in the state. This section expires December 31, 2006.

Sec. 4. RCW 38.52.540 and 2001 c
128 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The enhanced
911 account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the state
enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes imposed by RCW 82.14B.030 shall
be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account shall be used only to
support the statewide coordination and management of the enhanced 911 system,
for the implementation of wireless enhanced 911 statewide, and to help
supplement, within available funds, the operational costs of the system,
including adequate funding of counties to enable implementation of wireless
enhanced 911 service and reimbursement of radio communications service
companies for costs incurred in providing wireless enhanced 911 service
pursuant to negotiated contracts between the counties or their agents and the
radio communications service companies.

(2) Funds generated
by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030(3) shall not be
distributed to any county that has not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911
((taxes)) tax allowed under RCW 82.14B.030(1) ((and (2))).
Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030(4)
shall not be distributed to any county that has not imposed the maximum county
enhanced 911 tax allowed under RCW 82.14B.030(2) or to any unit of local
government where a moratorium on the siting of cellular towers that provide
emergency communications services is being imposed by that government.

(3) The state
enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the enhanced 911
advisory committee, is authorized to enter into statewide agreements to improve
the efficiency of enhanced 911 services for all counties and shall specify by
rule the additional purposes for which moneys, if available, may be expended
from this account.

Sec. 5. RCW 38.52.550 and 1991 c
329 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

A telecommunications
company, or radio communications service company, providing emergency
communications systems or services or a business or individual providing data
base information to emergency communication system personnel shall not be
liable for civil damages caused by an act or omission of the company, business,
or individual in the:

(1) Good faith release
of information not in the public record, including unpublished or unlisted
subscriber information to emergency service providers responding to calls
placed to a 911 or enhanced 911 emergency service; or

(2) Design,
development, installation, maintenance, or provision of consolidated 911 or
enhanced 911 emergency communication systems or services other than an act or
omission constituting gross negligence or wanton or willful misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

The state enhanced 911
coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory
committee, shall set nondiscriminatory, uniform technical and operational
standards consistent with the rules of the federal communications commission
for the transmission of 911 calls from radio communications service companies
to enhanced 911 emergency communications systems. These standards must not
exceed the requirements set by the federal communications commission. The
authority given to the state enhanced 911 coordinator in this section is
limited to setting standards as set forth in this section and does not
constitute authority to regulate radio communications service companies.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.14B.020 and 1998
c 304 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Emergency
services communication system" means a multicounty, countywide, or
districtwide radio or landline communications network, including an enhanced
911 telephone system, which provides rapid public access for coordinated
dispatching of services, personnel, equipment, and facilities for police, fire,
medical, or other emergency services.

(2) "Enhanced 911
telephone system" means a public telephone system consisting of a network,
data base, and on-premises equipment that is accessed by dialing 911 and that
enables reporting police, fire, medical, or other emergency situations to a
public safety answering point. The system includes the capability to
selectively route incoming 911 calls to the appropriate public safety answering
point that operates in a defined 911 service area and the capability to
automatically display the name, address, and telephone number of incoming 911
calls at the appropriate public safety answering point.

(3) "Switched
access line" means the telephone service line which connects a
subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main telephone(s) to the local
exchange company's switching office.

(4) "Local
exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it in RCW 80.04.010.

(5) "Radio access
line" means the telephone number assigned to or used by a subscriber for
two-way local wireless voice service available to the public for hire from a
radio communications service company. Radio access lines include, but are not
limited to, radio-telephone communications lines used in cellular telephone
service, personal communications services, and network radio access lines, or
their functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access lines do not include
lines that provide access to one-way signaling service, such as paging service,
or to communications channels suitable only for data transmission, or to
nonlocal radio access line service, such as wireless roaming service, or to a
private telecommunications system.

(6) "Radio
communications service company" has the meaning ascribed to it in RCW
80.04.010, except that it does not include radio paging providers. It does
include those persons or entities that provide commercial mobile radio
services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec. 332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and
nonfacilities-based resellers.

(7) "Private
telecommunications system" has the meaning ascribed to it in RCW
80.04.010.

(8)
"Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of telephone service as
telephone service is defined in RCW 82.04.065(3).

(9) "Place of
primary use" has the meaning ascribed to it in the federal mobile
telecommunications sourcing act, P.L. 106-252.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.14B.030 and 1998
c 304 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a county may impose a county enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of
switched access lines in an amount not exceeding fifty cents per month for each
switched access line. The amount of tax shall be uniform for each switched access
line. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to all local exchange
companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the date on
which the first payment is due.

(2) The legislative
authority of a county may also impose a county enhanced 911 excise tax
on the use of radio access lines whose place of primary use is located
within the county in an amount not exceeding ((twenty-five)) fifty
cents per month for each radio access line. The amount of tax shall be uniform
for each radio access line. The county shall provide notice of such tax to all
radio communications service companies serving in the county at least sixty
days in advance of the date on which the first payment is due. Any county
imposing this tax shall include in its ordinance a refund mechanism whereby the
amount of any tax ordered to be refunded by the judgment of a court of record,
or as a result of the resolution of any appeal therefrom, shall be refunded to
the radio communications service company or local exchange company that
collected the tax, and those companies shall reimburse the subscribers who paid
the tax. The ordinance shall further provide that to the extent the
subscribers who paid the tax cannot be identified or located, the tax paid by
those subscribers shall be returned to the county.

(3) A state enhanced
911 excise tax is imposed on all switched access lines in the state. The
amount of tax shall not exceed twenty cents per month for each switched access
line. The tax shall be uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed
under this subsection shall be remitted to the department of revenue by local
exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds
shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created in RCW
38.52.540.

(4) A state enhanced
911 excise tax is imposed on all radio access lines whose place of primary use
is located within the state in an amount of twenty cents per month for each
radio access line. The tax shall be uniform for each radio access line. The
tax imposed under this section shall be remitted to the department of revenue
by radio communications service companies, including those companies that
resell radio access lines, on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds
shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created in RCW
38.52.540. The tax imposed under this section is not subject to the state
sales and use tax or any local tax.

(5) By August
31st of each year the state enhanced 911 coordinator shall recommend the level
for the next year of the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by subsection
(3) of this section, based on a systematic cost and revenue analysis, to
the utilities and transportation commission. The commission shall by the
following October 31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911 excise tax
for the following year.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.14B.040 and 1998
c 304 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The state enhanced 911
tax and the county enhanced 911 tax on switched access lines shall be collected
from the subscriber by the local exchange company providing the switched access
line. The state enhanced 911 tax and the county 911 tax on radio access
lines shall be collected from the subscriber by the radio communications
service company providing the radio access line to the subscriber. The amount
of the tax shall be stated separately on the billing statement which is sent to
the subscriber.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.14B.042 and 2000
c 106 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state enhanced
911 excise ((tax)) taxes imposed by this chapter must be paid by
the subscriber to the local exchange company providing the switched access line
or the radio communications service company providing the radio access line,
and each local exchange company and each radio communications service
company shall collect from the subscriber the full amount of the ((tax))
taxes payable. The state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes
required by this chapter to be collected by the local exchange company ((is))
or the radio communications service company are deemed to be held in
trust by the local exchange company or the radio communications service
company until paid to the department. Any local exchange company or
radio communications service company that appropriates or converts the tax
collected to its own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax to the
extent that the money collected is not available for payment on the due date as
prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) If any local
exchange company or radio communications service company fails to
collect the state enhanced 911 excise tax or, after collecting the tax, fails
to pay it to the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, whether
such failure is the result of its own act or the result of acts or conditions
beyond its control, the local exchange company or the radio communications
service company is personally liable to the state for the amount of the
tax, unless the local exchange company or the radio communications service
company has taken from the buyer in good faith a properly executed resale
certificate under RCW 82.14B.200.

(3) The amount of tax,
until paid by the subscriber to the local exchange company, the radio
communications service company, or to the department, constitutes a debt
from the subscriber to the local exchange company or the radio
communications service company. Any local exchange company or radio
communications service company that fails or refuses to collect the tax as
required with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any subscriber who refuses
to pay any tax due under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. The state
enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes required by this chapter to be
collected by the local exchange company or the radio communications service
company must be stated separately on the billing statement that is sent to
the subscriber.

(4) If a subscriber has
failed to pay to the local exchange company or the radio communications
service company the state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes
imposed by this chapter and the local exchange company or the radio
communications service company has not paid the amount of the tax to the
department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
subscriber for collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of ten percent
may be added to the amount of the tax for failure of the subscriber to pay the
tax to the local exchange company or the radio communications service
company, regardless of when the tax is collected by the department. Tax
under this chapter is due as provided under RCW 82.14B.061.

Sec. 11. RCW 82.14B.061 and 2000
c 106 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of
revenue shall administer and shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to
enforce and administer the state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes
imposed by this chapter. Chapter 82.32 RCW, with the exception of RCW
82.32.045, 82.32.145, and 82.32.380, applies to the administration, collection,
and enforcement of the state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes.

(2) The state enhanced
911 excise ((tax)) taxes imposed by this chapter, along with
reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department, are due at the same
time the taxpayer reports other taxes under RCW 82.32.045. If no other taxes
are reported under RCW 82.32.045, the taxpayer shall remit tax on an annual
basis in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.

(3) The department of
revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of taxpayers from the obligation of
remitting monthly and may require the return to cover other longer reporting
periods, but in no event may returns be filed for a period greater than one year.

(4) The state enhanced
911 excise ((tax)) taxes imposed by this chapter ((is)) are
in addition to any taxes imposed upon the same persons under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.14B.200 and 1998
c 304 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless a local
exchange company or a radio communications service company has taken
from the buyer a resale certificate or equivalent document under RCW 82.04.470,
the burden of proving that a sale of the use of a switched access ((lines
[line])) line or radio access line was not a sale to a subscriber is
upon the person who made the sale.

(2) If a local exchange
company or a radio communications service company does not receive a
resale certificate at the time of the sale, have a resale certificate on file
at the time of the sale, or obtain a resale certificate from the buyer within a
reasonable time after the sale, the local exchange company or the radio
communications service company remains liable for the tax as provided in
RCW 82.14B.042, unless the local exchange company or the radio
communications service company can demonstrate facts and circumstances
according to rules adopted by the department of revenue that show the sale was
properly made without payment of the state enhanced 911 excise tax.

(3) The penalty imposed
by RCW 82.32.291 may not be assessed on state enhanced 911 excise taxes due but
not paid as a result of the improper use of a resale certificate. This
subsection does not prohibit or restrict the application of other penalties
authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. RCW 38.52.560 (Automatic number
identification--Wireless two-way telecommunications service) and 1994 c 96 s 5
are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. This act takes effect
January 1, 2003.

---
END ---