BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The college board
shall create an electronic job bank on its web site to act as a clearinghouse
for people seeking academic teaching positions at the state's community and
technical colleges. The job bank must be accessible on the internet. Use of
the electronic job bank is not mandatory.

(2) The college board
shall include a separate section on its electronic job bank reserved for the
exclusive listing of part-time academic employment opportunities at state
community and technical colleges.

(3) The separate
section of the electronic job bank under subsection (2) of this section must,
at a minimum, include an internet link to each of the following components, if
available from the community or technical college offering the employment
opportunity:

(a) A description of
the open position;

(b) A listing of
required skills and experience necessary for the position; and

(c) The district where
the employment opening exists.

(4) The
college board shall develop a strategy to promote its electronic job bank to
prospective candidates.

--- END ---