BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 18.92 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature
recognizes that low-income households may not receive needed veterinary
services for household pets. It is the intent of the legislature to allow
qualified animal control agencies and humane societies to provide limited
veterinary services to low‑income members of our communities. It is not
the intent of the legislature to allow these agencies to provide veterinary
services to the public at large.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 18.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Subject to the
limitations in this section, animal care and control agencies as defined in RCW
16.52.011 and nonprofit humane societies, that have qualified under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code may provide limited veterinary services
to animals owned by qualified low-income households. The veterinary services
provided shall be limited to electronic identification, surgical sterilization,
and vaccinations. For purposes of this section, "low-income household"
means the same as in RCW 43.185A.010.

(b) Animal control
agencies and nonprofit humane societies, receiving animals on an emergency
basis, may provide emergency care, subject to a local ordinance that defines an
emergency situation and establishes temporary time limits. Any local ordinance
addressing the needs under this subsection that was approved by the voters and
is in effect on the effective date of this act remains in effect.

(2) Veterinarians
employed at these facilities must be licensed under this chapter. No officer,
director, supervisor, or any other individual associated with an animal care or
control agency or nonprofit humane society owning and operating a veterinary
medical facility may impose any terms or conditions of employment or direct or
attempt to direct an employed veterinarian in any way that interferes with the
free exercise of the veterinarian's professional judgment or infringes upon the
utilization of his or her professional skills.

(3) A veterinarian and
animal control agencies and humane societies acting under this section shall,
for purposes of providing the limited veterinary services, meet the
requirements established under this chapter and are subject to the rules
adopted by the veterinary board of governors in the same fashion as any
licensed veterinarian or veterinary medical facility in the state.

(4) The
Washington state veterinary board of governors shall adopt rules to ensure that
agencies and societies are in compliance with this section. The limited
veterinary medical service authority granted by this section may be suspended,
revoked, or conditioned by a determination of the board of governors for any
act of noncompliance with this section.

---
END ---