BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.812 and 1994 c
197 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
department of retirement systems shall credit at least one-half service credit
month for each month of each school year, as defined by RCW 28A.150.040, from
October 1, 1977, through December 31, 1986, to a member of the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 who was employed by an employer, as defined by RCW
41.32.010, under a contract for half-time employment as determined by the
department for such school year and from whose compensation contributions were
paid by the employee or picked up by the employer. Any withdrawn contributions
shall be restored under RCW 41.32.500(1) or 41.50.165 prior to crediting any
service.

(2) Any
teacher who at any time between October 1, 1977, and December 31, 1986, was
employed by an employer, as defined by RCW 41.32.010, under a contract for at
least half-time employment as determined by the department, but was not yet a
member of the teachers' retirement system plan 2, has the option to receive
service credit for each month of each school year worked between October 1,
1977, and December 31, 1986. In order to establish service credit, the member
must pay the required contribution, plus interest as determined by the
department, to the retirement system. The employer must pay the required
employer contribution, plus interest as determined by the department, upon
notice from the department that the member has made contributions under this
section.

--- END ---