BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.85.050 and 1999
sp.s. c 13 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Counties,
cities, and tribal governments must jointly designate, by resolution or by
letters of support, the area for which a habitat project list is to be
developed and the lead entity that is to be responsible for submitting the
habitat project list. No project included on a habitat project list shall be
considered mandatory in nature and no private landowner may be forced or
coerced into participation in any respect. The lead entity may be a county,
city, conservation district, special district, tribal government, or other
entity.

(b) In lieu of the
requirements of (a) of this subsection, a lead agency under chapter 90.82 RCW
may serve as the lead entity under the provisions of this chapter and be
responsible for submitting the habitat project list for the geographical
planning area within the jurisdiction of the planning unit if (i) a habitat
component is selected under RCW 90.82.100; (ii) a watershed assessment has been
completed under RCW 90.82.040(2)(a)(ii); and (iii) a ranked list of projects
and activities has been prepared that warrant immediate financial assistance
consistent with RCW 90.82.110.

(c) The lead
entity shall establish a committee that consists of representative interests of
counties, cities, conservation districts, tribes, environmental groups,
business interests, landowners, citizens, volunteer groups, regional fish
enhancement groups, and other habitat interests. The purpose of the committee
is to provide a citizen-based evaluation of the projects proposed to promote
salmon habitat. The technical review team may provide the lead entity with
organizational models that may be used in establishing the committees.

(((c))) (d)
The committee shall compile a list of habitat projects, establish priorities
for individual projects, define the sequence for project implementation, and
submit these activities as the habitat project list. The committee shall also
identify potential federal, state, local, and private funding sources.

(2) The area covered by
the habitat project list must be based, at a minimum, on a WRIA, combination of
WRIAs, or any other area as agreed to by the counties, cities, and tribes in
resolutions or in letters of support meeting the requirements of this
subsection. Preference will be given to projects in an area that contain a
salmon species that is listed or proposed for listing under the federal
endangered species act.

(3) The lead entity
shall submit the habitat project list to the technical review team in
accordance with procedures adopted by the board.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.82.040 and 1998 c
247 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Once a WRIA
planning unit has been initiated under RCW 90.82.060 and a lead agency has been
designated, it shall notify the department and may apply to the department for
funding assistance for conducting the planning. Funds shall be provided from
and to the extent of appropriations made by the legislature to the department
expressly for this purpose.

(2)(a) Each
planning unit that has complied with subsection (1) of this section is eligible
to receive watershed planning grants in the following amounts for three phases
of watershed planning:

(((a))) (i)
Initiating governments may apply for an initial organizing grant of up to fifty
thousand dollars for a single WRIA or up to seventy-five thousand dollars for a
multi-WRIA management area in accordance with RCW 90.82.060(4);

(((b))) (ii)
A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred thousand dollars for each WRIA
in the management area for conducting watershed assessments in accordance with
RCW 90.82.070, except that a planning unit whose initiating governments
choose to include an instream flow, water quality, or habitat component in
accordance with RCW 90.82.080 through 90.82.100 may apply for additional funds
to conduct assessments of up to one hundred thousand dollars for each component
included; and

(((c))) (iii)
A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars for each
WRIA in the management area for developing a watershed plan and making
recommendations for actions by local, state, and federal agencies, tribes,
private property owners, private organizations, and individual citizens,
including a recommended list of strategies and projects that would further the
purpose of the plan in accordance with RCW 90.82.060 through 90.82.100.

(b) A planning unit
may request a different amount for phase two or phase three of watershed
planning than is specified in (a) of this subsection, provided that the total
amount of funds awarded do not exceed the maximum amount the planning unit is
eligible for under (a) of this subsection. The department shall not approve an
alternate allocation of funds unless the planning unit demonstrates that an
alternate allocation will not impair the unit's ability to complete a plan in
accordance with this chapter.

(3)(a) The department
shall use the eligibility criteria in this subsection (3) instead of rules,
policies, or guidelines when evaluating grant applications at each stage of the
grants program.

(b) In reviewing grant
applications under this subsection (3), the department shall evaluate whether:

(i) The planning unit
meets all of the requirements of this chapter;

(ii) The application
demonstrates a need for state planning funds to accomplish the objectives of
the planning process; and

(iii) The application
and supporting information evidences a readiness to proceed.

(c) In ranking grant
applications submitted at each stage of the grants program, the department
shall give preference to applications in the following order of priority:

(i) Applications from
existing planning groups that have been in existence for at least one year;

(ii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds that have
aquatic fish species listed or proposed to be listed as endangered or
threatened under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et
seq. and for which there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water
for population and economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning;

(iii) Applications that
address protection and enhancement of fish habitat in watersheds or for which
there is evidence of an inability to supply adequate water for population and
economic growth from:

(A) First, multi-WRIA
planning; and

(B) Second, single WRIA
planning.

(d) The department may
not impose any local matching fund requirement as a condition for grant
eligibility or as a preference for receiving a grant.

(4) The department may
retain up to one percent of funds allocated under this section to defray
administrative costs.

(5) Planning under this
chapter should be completed as expeditiously as possible, with the focus being
on local stakeholders cooperating to meet local needs.

(6) Funding provided
under this section shall be considered a contractual obligation against the moneys
appropriated for this purpose.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.82.130 and 1998 c
247 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon completing
its proposed watershed plan, the planning unit may approve the proposal by
consensus of all of the members of the planning unit or by consensus among the
members of the planning unit appointed to represent units of government and a
majority vote of the nongovernmental members of the planning unit.

(b) If the proposal is
approved by the planning unit, the unit shall submit the proposal to the
counties with territory within the management area. If the planning unit has
received funding beyond the initial fifty thousand dollars under RCW 90.82.040,
such a proposal approved by the planning unit shall be submitted to the
counties within four years of the date ((the)) that funds beyond the
initial funding ((was)) were first ((received)) expended
by the planning unit.

(c) If the watershed
plan is not approved by the planning unit, the planning unit may submit the
components of the plan for which agreement is achieved using the procedure
under (a) of this subsection, or the planning unit may terminate the planning
process.

(2)(a) The legislative
authority of each of the counties with territory in the management area shall
provide public notice of and conduct at least one public hearing on the
proposed watershed plan submitted under this section. After the public
hearings, the legislative authorities of these counties shall convene in joint
session to consider the proposal. The counties may approve or reject the
proposed watershed plan for the management area, but may not amend it.
Approval of such a proposal shall be made by a majority vote of the members of
each of the counties with territory in the management area.

(b) If a proposed
watershed plan is not approved, it shall be returned to the planning unit with
recommendations for revisions. Approval of such a revised proposal by the
planning unit and the counties shall be made in the same manner provided for
the original watershed plan. If approval of the revised plan is not achieved,
the process shall terminate.

(3) The planning unit
shall not add an element to its watershed plan that creates an obligation
unless each of the governments to be obligated has at least one representative
on the planning unit and the respective members appointed to represent those
governments agree to adding the element that creates the obligation. A
member's agreeing to add an element shall be evidenced by a recorded vote of
all members of the planning unit in which the members record support for adding
the element. If the watershed plan is approved under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section and the plan creates obligations: (a) For agencies of state
government, the agencies shall adopt by rule the obligations of both state and
county governments and rules implementing the state obligations, the
obligations on state agencies are binding upon adoption of the obligations into
rule, and the agencies shall take other actions to fulfill their obligations as
soon as possible; or (b) for counties, the obligations are binding on the
counties and the counties shall adopt any necessary implementing ordinances and
take other actions to fulfill their obligations as soon as possible.

(4) As used in this
section, "obligation" means any action required as a result of this
chapter that imposes upon a tribal government, county government, or state
government, either: A fiscal impact; a redeployment of resources; or a change
of existing policy.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.80.100 and 1997 c
441 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Neither the county ((nor)),
the department, a conservancy board, or its employees, nor individual
conservancy board commissioners shall be subject to any cause of action or
claim for damages arising out of proposed decisions on transfers ((approved))
made by a board under this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.80.130 and 1997 c
441 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Water conservancy board
activities are subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW and
to chapter 42.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 90.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A board is subject
to the requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW. Each board must establish and
maintain records of its proceedings and determinations. While in the
possession of the board, all such records must be made available for inspection
and copies must be provided to the public on request under the provisions of
chapter 42.17 RCW.

(2) Upon the conclusion
of its business involving a water right transfer application, a board must
promptly send the original copies of all records relating to that application
to the department for recordkeeping. A board may keep a copy of the original
documents. After the records are transferred to the department, the
responsibility for making the records available under chapter 42.17 RCW is
transferred to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. It is the intent of the
legislature, through the provisions of this act, to clarify existing law.
Namely, the legislature intends to clarify the existing law and the authority
of the department of ecology and water conservancy boards.

Sec. 8. RCW 90.80.010 and 1997 c
441 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following
definitions apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means a water conservancy board created under this chapter.

(2)
"Commissioner" means a member of a water conservancy board.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(5)
"Transfer" means a transfer, change, or amendment to a water right
referred to in RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100.

Sec. 9. RCW 90.80.070 and 1997 c
441 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applications to the
board for transfers shall be made on a form provided by the department, and
shall contain such additional information as may be required by the board in
order to review and act upon the application. At a minimum, the application
shall include information sufficient to establish to the board's satisfaction
of the transferor's right to the quantity of water being transferred, and a
description of any applicable limitations on the right to use water, including
the point of diversion or withdrawal, place of use, source of supply, purpose
of use, quantity of use permitted, time of use, period of use, and the place of
storage.

(2) The transferor and
the transferee of any proposed water transfer may apply to a board for approval
of the transfer if the water proposed to be transferred is currently diverted,
withdrawn, or used within the geographic boundaries of the county, or would
be diverted, withdrawn, or used within the geographic boundaries of the
county if the transfer is approved. In the case of a proposed water transfer
in which the water is currently diverted or withdrawn or would be
diverted or withdrawn outside the geographic boundaries of the county,
the board shall hold a public hearing in the county of the diversion or
withdrawal or proposed diversion or withdrawal. The board shall
provide for prominent publication of notice of such hearing in a newspaper of
general circulation published in the county in which the hearing is to be held
for the purpose of affording an opportunity for interested persons to comment
upon the application.

(3) After an
application for a transfer is filed with the board, the board shall publish
notice of the application in accordance with the publication requirements and
send notice to state agencies as provided in RCW 90.03.280. Any person may
submit comments to the board regarding the application. Any water right holder
claiming detriment or injury to an existing water right may intervene in the
application before the board pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. If a
majority of the board determines that the application is complete, in
accordance with the law and the transfer can be made without injury or
detriment to existing water rights in accordance with RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390,
or 90.44.100, the board shall issue the applicant a certificate
conditionally approving the transfer, subject to review by the director.

(4) If a water right
holder claims a proposed transfer will cause an impairment to that right, the
water right holder is entitled to a hearing before the board. The board shall
receive such evidence as it deems material and necessary to determine the
validity of the claim of impairment. If the party claiming the impairment
establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that his or her water right will
be impaired by the proposed transfer, the board may not approve the transfer
unless the applicant and the impaired party agree upon compensation for the
impairment.

Sec. 10. RCW 90.80.120 and 1997 c
441 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A commissioner of a
water conservancy board who has an ownership interest in a water right subject
to an application for approval of a transfer ((or change)) by the board,
shall not participate in the board's review or decision upon the application.

(2) A commissioner of a
water conservancy board who also serves as an employee or upon the governing
body of a municipally owned water system, shall not participate in the board's
review or decision upon an application for the transfer ((or change)) of
a water right in which that water system has or is proposed to have an
ownership interest.

Sec. 11. RCW 90.80.140 and 1997 c
441 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
affects transfers that may be otherwise approved under chapter 90.03 or 90.44
RCW.

Sec. 12. RCW 90.80.050 and 1997 c
441 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A water conservancy
board constitutes a public body corporate and politic and a separate unit of
local government in the state. Each board shall consist of three commissioners
appointed by the county legislative authority for six-year terms. The county
legislative authority shall stagger the initial appointment of commissioners so
that the first commissioners who are appointed shall serve terms of two, four,
and six years, respectively, from the date of their appointment. In any
county with a population over five hundred thousand as of December 31, 2000,
the county legislative authority may appoint two additional commissioners, for
a total of five. If the county elects to appoint five commissioners, the
initial terms of the additional commissioners shall be for three and five-year
terms respectively. All vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.
The county legislative authority shall consider, but is not limited in
appointing, nominations to the board by people or entities petitioning or
requesting the creation of the board. However, the county legislative
authority shall ensure that individual water right holders who divert water for
use within the county are represented on the board. In making appointments to
the board, the county legislative authority shall choose from among persons who
are residents of the county or a county that is contiguous to the county that
the water conservancy board is to serve. No commissioner may participate in
board decisions until he or she has successfully completed the necessary
training required under RCW 90.80.040. Commissioners shall serve without
compensation, but are entitled to reimbursement for necessary travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and costs incident to training.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The legislature finds
that the current backlog of pending water rights applications is unacceptable
and that it is essential to facilitate more expeditious processing and
eliminate the backlog as soon as possible. Agriculture, business, and
individuals are unable to carry out plans and are suffering economic harm
because of the delay in processing water rights applications. By this act, the
legislature intends to remove some of the complexity in the processing of water
rights applications that is the result of judicial interpretations of existing
law and, thereby, to make processing itself more expeditious and, also, to make
the law more clear and, thereby, to help avoid additional delay caused by
litigation. The legislature intends to allow pending applications for changes,
transfers, or amendments of existing water rights to be processed independently
of pending applications for new water rights and without regard to possible
impairment of pending applications for new water rights for the same source of
supply. The legislature intends to address both surface water and ground water
and does not intend to divert resources away from or in any other way to deter
the processing of applications for new water rights.

Sec. 14. RCW 90.03.380 and 1997 c
442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to the
use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the state shall be
and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same is used:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to others
and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of
priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.

(a) A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to
enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be
permitted if such change results in no increase in the ((annual consumptive))
quantity of water used or previously used before implementation of water
distribution and use efficiency measures under the water right. ((For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the water
right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged over
the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water
right.))

(b) Before any
transfer of such right to use water or change of the point of diversion of
water or change of purpose of use can be made, any person having an interest in
the transfer or change, shall file a written application therefor with the
department, and the application shall not be granted until notice of the
application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that
such transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in
duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a
record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to the
applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same
effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.

(2) If an application
for change proposes to transfer water rights from one irrigation district to
another, the department shall, before publication of notice, receive
concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such transfer or change
will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to other landowners or
impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3) A change in place
of use by an individual water user or users of water provided by an irrigation
district need only receive approval for the change from the board of directors
of the district if the use of water continues within the irrigation district,
and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4) This section shall
not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state through the funding of
water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through
90.42.070. Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to and shall
not be construed as providing any limitation to the transfers, changes, or
amendments of water rights established under the authority of a family farm
permit that are authorized under section 17 of this act.

(5) Until June 30,
2008, pending applications for new water rights are not entitled to protection
from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application for a change,
transfer, or amendment of an existing surface or ground water right is
considered.

(6) Until June 30,
2008, applications relating to existing surface or ground water rights may be
processed and decisions on them rendered independently of processing and
rendering decisions on pending applications for new water rights within the
same source of supply without regard to the date of filing of the pending
applications for new water rights.

(7) Beginning
January 1, 2002, and ending January 1, 2004, the department shall report to the
legislature by January 1st of each year on the results of processing
applications under subsections (5) and (6) of this section and, in the report
due on January 1, 2004, provide an evaluation and make recommendations
regarding modification of any of the provisions of these subsections.

(8) No applicant for
a change, transfer, or amendment of a surface or ground water right may be
required to give up any part of the applicant's valid water right or claim to a
state agency, the trust water rights program, or to other persons as a
condition of processing or approving the application.

(9) The department
must process all applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights for the same source of supply according to priority date. Additionally,
the department must process all applications for new water rights for the same
source of supply according to priority date.

(10) The right to
use water for any beneficial use within the general category of an agricultural
use includes the right to use the water, without applying to the department or
any other governmental entity for approval, for any other beneficial use within
the general category of an agricultural use. The general category of an
agricultural use of water includes, but is not limited to, the beneficial use
of water for stock watering, agricultural irrigation, agricultural frost
control, processing agricultural commodities into agricultural products, and
other agricultural uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

After June 30, 2008,
any right acquired or obligation or liability incurred or any rule adopted or
other order under RCW 90.03.380 (5) and (6) remains valid and does not affect
any proceeding instituted under RCW 90.03.380 (5) or (6).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter
authorizes the processing of applications relating to existing water rights to
stop the processing of applications for new water rights. The processing of
applications assigned priority by rule may not stop the processing of other
applications, and at least half of the resources available to the department
must be devoted to the processing of nonpriority applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 90.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Transfers of water
rights established under the authority of family farm permits may be approved
as authorized under this section and under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or
90.44.100 as appropriate.

(2) A water right
established under the authority of a family farm permit may be transferred:

(a) For use for
agricultural irrigation purposes as limited by RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2) except
as provided in RCW 90.66.060(3);

(b) To any purpose of
use that is a beneficial use of water if the transfer is made exclusively under
a lease agreement, except that transfers for the use of water for agricultural
irrigation purposes shall be limited as provided by RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2);

(c) To any purpose of
use that is a beneficial use of water if the water right is for the use of
water at a location that is, immediately before the transfer is approved,
within the boundaries of a city or town or within the boundaries of an urban
growth area designated under chapter 36.70A RCW, except that transfers for the
use of water for agricultural irrigation purposes shall be limited as provided
by RCW 90.66.060 (1) and (2).

(3) If a portion of the
water governed by a water right established under the authority of a family
farm permit is made surplus to the beneficial uses exercised under the right
through the implementation of practices or technologies, including but not
limited to conveyance practices or technologies, which are more efficient or
more water-use efficient than those under which the right was perfected, the
right to use the surplus water may be transferred to any purpose of use that is
a beneficial use of water. Nothing in this subsection authorizes: A transfer
of the portion of a water right that is necessary for the production of crops
historically grown under the right; or a transfer of a water right or a portion
of a water right that has not been perfected through beneficial use before the
transfer.

(4) The authority
granted by this section to transfer or alter the purpose of use of a water
right established under the authority of a family farm permit shall not be
construed as limiting in any manner the authority granted by RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.390, or 90.44.100 to alter other elements of such a water right.

Sec. 18. RCW 90.66.040 and 1979 c
3 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of
this chapter, the following definitions shall be applicable:

(1) "Family
farm" means a geographic area including not more than two thousand acres
of irrigated agricultural lands, whether contiguous or noncontiguous, the
controlling interest in which is held by a person having a controlling interest
in no more than two thousand acres of irrigated agricultural lands in the state
of Washington which are irrigated under rights acquired after December 8, 1977.

(2) "Person"
means any individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership,
organization, or other entity whatsoever, whether public or private. The term
"person" shall include as one person all corporate or partnership
entities with a common ownership of more than one-half of the assets of each of
any number of such entities.

(3) "Controlling
interest" means a property interest that can be transferred to another
person, the percentage interest so transferred being sufficient to effect a
change in control of the landlord's rights and benefits. Ownership of property
held in trust shall not be deemed a controlling interest where no part of the
trust has been established through expenditure or assignment of assets of the
beneficiary of the trust and where the rights of the family farm permit which
is a part of the trust cannot be transferred to another by the beneficiary of
the trust under terms of the trust. Each trust of a separate donor origin
shall be treated as a separate entity and the administration of property under
trust shall not represent a controlling interest on the part of the trust
officer.

(4)
"Department" means the department of ecology of the state of
Washington.

(5)
"Application", "permit" and "public waters" shall
have the meanings attributed to these terms in chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW.

(6) "Public water
entity" means any public or governmental entity with authority to
administer and operate a system to supply water for irrigation of agricultural
lands.

(7)
"Transfer" means a transfer, change, or amendment to a water right
referred to in RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100.

(8)
"Withdraw" means to withdraw ground water or to divert surface water.

Sec. 19. RCW 90.66.060 and 1979 c
3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right to withdraw
water for use for the irrigation of agricultural lands under authority of a
family farm permit shall have no time limit ((but)) and shall be
conditioned upon the land being irrigated complying with the definition of a
family farm as defined at the time the permit is issued((: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That)).

(2) If the
acquisition by any person of land and water rights by gift, devise, bequest, or
by way of bona fide satisfaction of a debt, would otherwise cause land being
irrigated pursuant to a family farm permit to lose its status as a family farm,
such acquisition shall be deemed to have no effect upon the status of family
farm water permits pertaining to land held or acquired by the person acquiring
such land and water rights if all lands held or acquired are again in compliance
with the definition of a family farm within five years from the date of such
acquisition.

(((2))) If the
department determines that water is being withdrawn under a family farm permit
for use on land not in conformity with the definition of a family farm, the
department shall notify the holder of such family farm permit by personal
service of such fact and the permit shall be suspended two years from the date
of receipt of notice unless the person having a controlling interest in said
land satisfies the department that such land is again in conformity with the
definition of a family farm. The department may, upon a showing of good cause
and reasonable effort to attain compliance on the part of the person having the
controlling interest in such land, extend the two year period prior to
suspension. If conformity is not achieved prior to five years from the date of
notice the rights of withdrawal shall be canceled.

(3) This section
does not apply in any manner whatsoever to a transfer of surplus water authorized
by section 17(3) of this act; however, this section does apply to other
transfers of a water right established under the authority of a family farm
permit to the extent that the transfer is to a use of water for agricultural
irrigation purposes.

Sec. 20. RCW 90.14.140 and 1998 c
258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient cause" shall be defined
as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of ((five)) ten or more consecutive years where such
nonuse occurs as a result of:

(a) Drought, or other
unavailability of water;

(b) Active service in
the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(c) Nonvoluntary
service in the armed forces of the United States;

(d) The operation of
legal proceedings;

(e) Federal or state
agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights which preclude or
reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(f) Federal laws
imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through the
voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas.

(2) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there shall be no
relinquishment of any water right:

(a) If such right is
claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW and annual
license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b) If such right is
used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time of drought or
other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion facilities are
maintained in good operating condition for the use of such reserve or standby water
supply;

(c) If such right is
claimed for a determined future development to take place either within fifteen
years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use of the water right,
whichever date is later;

(d) If such right is
claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter 90.03 RCW;

(e) If such waters are
not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
((or))

(f) If such right or
portion of the right is leased to another person for use on land other than the
land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial
use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of
the right has been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;

(g) If such right is
a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW; or

(h) If such a right
or portion of the right is authorized for a purpose that is satisfied by the
use of agricultural industrial reclaimed water as authorized in section 34 of
this act.

Sec. 21. RCW 90.38.020 and 1989 c
429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The
department may acquire water rights, including but not limited to storage
rights, by purchase, gift, or other appropriate means other than by
condemnation, from any person or entity or combination of persons or entities.
Once acquired, such rights are trust water rights. A water right acquired
by the state that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes shall be administered as a trust water right in compliance with that
condition.

(b) If an aquatic
species is listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered
species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) for a body of water, certain instream
flows are needed for the species, and the holder of a right to water from the
body of water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to
the trust water system to assist in providing those instream flows on a temporary
or permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms as
the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section. Once accepted, such rights are trust water
rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.

(2) The department may
make such other arrangements, including entry into contracts with other persons
or entities as appropriate to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter can be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) The trust water
rights may be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed the extent to
which the water right was exercised during any of the five years before the
donation nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the
donor plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which
the water right was exercised during any of the five years before the donation.
If, upon appeal from a determination by the department, it is found that
exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising a
portion of that trust water right impairs existing water rights in violation of
RCW 90.38.902, the donation shall be altered to eliminate the impairment.

(5) Any water right
conveyed to the trust water right system that is expressly conditioned to limit
its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the department for public
purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is deductible for federal
income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the water right.

Sec. 22. RCW 90.38.040 and 1994 c
264 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All trust water
rights acquired by the department shall be placed in the Yakima river basin
trust water rights program to be managed by the department. The department
shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington
for each trust water right it acquires.

(2) Trust water rights
shall retain the same priority date as the water right from which they
originated. Trust water rights may be modified as to purpose or place of use
or point of diversion, including modification from a diversionary use to a
nondiversionary instream use.

(3) Trust water rights
may be held by the department for instream flows and/or irrigation use.

(4) A schedule of the
amount of net water saved as a result of water conservation projects carried
out in accordance with this chapter, shall be developed annually to reflect the
predicted hydrologic and water supply conditions, as well as anticipated water
demands, for the upcoming irrigation season. This schedule shall serve as the
basis for the distribution and management of trust water rights each year.

(5)(a) No
exercise of a trust water right may be authorized unless the department first
determines that no existing water rights, junior or senior in priority, will be
impaired as to their exercise or injured in any manner whatever by such
authorization. Before any trust water right is exercised, the department shall
publish notice thereof in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made, and
in such other newspapers as the department determines are necessary, once a
week for two consecutive weeks. At the same time the department may also send
notice thereof containing pertinent information to the director of fish and
wildlife.

(b) Subsection
(5)(a) of this section does not apply to a trust water right resulting from a
donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.38.020(1). However, the
department shall provide the notice described in (a) of this subsection the
first time the trust water right resulting from the donation is exercised.

(6) RCW 90.03.380 and
90.14.140 through 90.14.910 shall have no applicability to trust water rights
held by the department under this chapter or exercised under this section.

Sec. 23. RCW 90.42.040 and 1993 c
98 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All trust water
rights acquired by the state shall be placed in the state trust water rights
program to be managed by the department. Trust water rights acquired by the
state shall be held or authorized for use by the department for instream flows,
irrigation, municipal, or other beneficial uses consistent with applicable
regional plans for pilot planning areas, or to resolve critical water supply
problems.

(2) The department
shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington
for each permanent trust water right conveyed to the state indicating the reach
or reaches of the stream, the quantity, and the use or uses to which it may be
applied. A superseding certificate shall be issued that specifies the amount
of water the water right holder would continue to be entitled to as a result of
the water conservation project. The superseding certificate shall retain the
same priority date as the original right. For nonpermanent conveyances, the
department shall issue certificates or such other instruments as are necessary
to reflect the changes in purpose or place of use or point of diversion or
withdrawal. Water rights for which such nonpermanent conveyances are arranged
shall not be subject to relinquishment for nonuse.

(3) A trust water right
retains the same priority date as the water right from which it originated, but
as between them the trust right shall be deemed to be inferior in priority
unless otherwise specified by an agreement between the state and the party
holding the original right.

(4) Exercise of a trust
water right may be authorized only if the department first determines that
neither water rights existing at the time the trust water right is established,
nor the public interest will be impaired. If impairment becomes apparent
during the time a trust water right is being exercised, the department shall
cease or modify the use of the trust water right to eliminate the impairment.

(5) Before any trust
water right is created or modified, the department shall, at a minimum, require
that a notice be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in
the county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made,
and in other newspapers as the department determines is necessary, once a week
for two consecutive weeks. At the same time the department shall send a notice
containing pertinent information to all appropriate state agencies, potentially
affected local governments and federally recognized tribal governments, and
other interested parties.

(6) RCW 90.14.140
through 90.14.230 have no applicability to trust water rights held by the
department under this chapter or exercised under this section.

(7) RCW 90.03.380 has
no applicability to trust water rights acquired by the state through the
funding of water conservation projects.

(8) Subsections (4)
and (5) of this section do not apply to a trust water right resulting from a
donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b). However, the
department shall provide the notice described in subsection (5) of this section
the first time the trust water right resulting from the donation is exercised.

Sec. 24. RCW 90.42.080 and 1993 c
98 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The state
may acquire all or portions of existing water rights, by purchase, gift, or
other appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any person or entity
or combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust
water rights. A water right acquired by the state that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be administered as a
trust water right in compliance with that condition.

(b) If an aquatic
species is listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered
species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) for a body of water, certain instream
flows are needed for the species, and the holder of a right to water from the
body of water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to
the trust water system to assist in providing those instream flows on a
temporary or permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such
terms as the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section. Once accepted, such rights are
trust water rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.

(2) The department may
enter into leases, contracts, or such other arrangements with other persons or
entities as appropriate, to ensure that trust water rights acquired in
accordance with this chapter may be exercised to the fullest possible extent.

(3) Trust water rights
may be acquired by the state on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4) A water right
donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed the extent to
which the water right was exercised during any of the five years before the
donation nor may the total of any portion of the water right remaining with the
donor plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the extent to which
the water right was exercised during any of the five years before the
donation. If, upon appeal from a determination by the department, it is found
that exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation or exercising
a portion of that trust water right impairs existing water rights in violation
of RCW 90.42.070, the donation shall be altered to eliminate the impairment.

(5) The
provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to donations for
instream flows described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, but do apply
to other transfers of water rights under this section.

(((5))) (6)
No funds may be expended for the purchase of water rights by the state pursuant
to this section unless specifically appropriated for this purpose by the
legislature.

(7) Any water right
conveyed to the trust water right system that is expressly conditioned to limit
its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the department for public
purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is deductible for federal
income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the water right.

Sec. 25. RCW 90.03.330 and 1987 c
109 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon a
showing satisfactory to the department that any appropriation has been
perfected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the
duty of the department to issue to the applicant a certificate stating such
facts in a form to be prescribed by him or her, and such certificate
shall thereupon be recorded with the department. Any original water right
certificate issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded with the
department and thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the same, be
by the department transmitted to the county auditor of the county or counties
where the distributing system or any part thereof is located, and be recorded
in the office of such county auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to the
owner thereof.

(2) A certificate
issued by the department under the provisions of this chapter may not be
revoked or diminished without specific legislative or judicial direction,
provided that the water right represented by the certificate has not been
relinquished under the provisions of chapter 90.14 RCW, issued with ministerial
errors, or obtained through the misrepresentation of the completion of the
project or the quantity appropriated. The department may revoke or adjust a
certificate if ministerial errors are discovered or if a certificate has been
obtained through misrepresentation.

Sec. 26. RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c
316 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After an
application to, and upon the issuance by the department of an amendment to the
appropriate permit or certificate of ground water right, the holder of a valid
right to withdraw public ground waters may, without losing the holder's
priority of right, construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new
location in substitution for or in addition to those at the original location,
or the holder may change the ((manner)) purpose or the place of
use of the water.

(2) An amendment to
construct replacement or a new additional well or wells at a location outside
of the location of the original well or wells or to change the ((manner))
purpose or place of use of the water shall be issued only after
publication of notice of the application and findings as prescribed in the case
of an original application. Such amendment shall be issued by the department
only on the conditions that: (a) The additional or replacement well or wells
shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original well or wells;
(b) where a replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well
or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be properly
decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where an additional
well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells may continue to be
used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and additional well
or wells shall not enlarge the right conveyed by the original permit or
certificate; and (d) other existing rights shall not be impaired. The
department may specify an approved ((manner)) purpose of
construction and shall require a showing of compliance with the terms of the
amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an original permit.

(3) The construction of
a replacement or new additional well or wells at the location of the original
well or wells shall be allowed without application to the department for an
amendment. However, the following apply to such a replacement or new
additional well: (a) The well shall tap the same body of public ground water
as the original well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the
use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well
or wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW;
(c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or wells may
continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and
additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right conveyed by the original
water use permit or certificate; (d) the construction and use of the well shall
not interfere with or impair water rights with an earlier date of priority than
the water right or rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement
or additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a well
it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an approved ((manner))
purpose of construction of the well; and (g) the department shall
require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this subsection (3).

(4) A certificate
issued by the department under the provisions of this chapter may not be
revoked or diminished without specific legislative or judicial direction,
provided that the water right represented by the certificate has not been
relinquished under the provisions of chapter 90.14 RCW, issued with ministerial
errors, or obtained through the misrepresentation of the completion of the
project or the quantity appropriated. The department may revoke or adjust a
certificate if ministerial errors are discovered or if a certificate has been
obtained through misrepresentation.

(5) As used in
this section, the "location of the original well or wells" is the
area described as the point of withdrawal in the original public notice
published for the application for the water right for the well.

(6) The right to use
water for any beneficial use within the general category of an agricultural use
includes the right to use the water, without applying to the department or any
other governmental entity for approval, for any other beneficial use within the
general category of an agricultural use. The general category of an
agricultural use of water includes, but is not limited to, the beneficial use
of water for stock watering, agricultural irrigation, agricultural frost
control, processing agricultural commodities into agricultural products, and
other agricultural uses.

Sec. 27. RCW 90.03.390 and 1991 c
350 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) RCW
90.03.380 shall not be construed to prevent water users from making a seasonal
or temporary change of point of diversion or place of use of water when such
change can be made without detriment to existing rights((, but in no case
shall such change be made without the permission of the water master of the
district in which such proposed change is located, or of the department. Nor
shall RCW 90.03.380 be construed to prevent construction of emergency interties
between public water systems to permit exchange of water during short-term
emergency situations, or rotation in the use of water for bringing about a more
economical use of the available supply, provided however, that the department
of health in consultation with the department of ecology shall adopt rules or
develop written guidelines setting forth standards for determining when a
short-term emergency exists and the circumstances in which emergency interties
are permitted. The rules or guidelines shall be consistent with the procedures
established in RCW 43.83B.400 through 43.83B.420)). Water users owning
lands to which water rights are attached may rotate in the use of water to
which they are collectively entitled, or an individual water user having lands
to which are attached water rights of a different priority, may in like manner
rotate in use when such rotation can be made without detriment to other
existing water rights((, and has the approval of the water master or
department)). Before rotating the use of water, the water right holder
shall notify the department of the change and describe the land subject to the
rotation in use.

(2) A person may
change the place of use of a water right without the requirement of approval
under this section where the water is used on land contiguous to the place of
use of the water right, the land is owned or leased by the holder of the water
right, and the total amount of land to which the water is applied is not
increased. Before making the change, the water right holder shall notify the
department of the change and describe the land subject to the change in place
of use. This subsection does not apply to the use of water within an irrigation
district or to changes in use that increase the total amount of acreage
irrigated under a water right.

(3) RCW 90.03.380
shall not be construed to prevent construction of emergency interties between
public water systems to permit exchange of water during short-term emergency
situations, or rotation in the use of water for bringing about a more
economical use of the available supply, however, the department of health in
consultation with the department of ecology shall adopt rules or develop
written guidelines setting forth standards for determining when a short-term
emergency exists and the circumstances in which emergency interties are
permitted. The rules or guidelines shall be consistent with the procedures
established in RCW 43.83B.400 through 43.83B.420.

Sec. 28. RCW 90.14.043 and 1985 c
435 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
time restrictions imposed by the provisions of chapter 90.14 RCW, a person may
file a claim pursuant to RCW 90.14.041 if such person obtains a certification
from the pollution control hearings board as provided in this section.

(2) A certification
shall be issued by the pollution control hearings board if, upon petition to
the board, it is shown to the satisfaction of the board that:

(a) Waters of the state
have been applied to beneficial use continuously (with no period of nonuse
exceeding ((five)) ten consecutive years) in the case of surface
water beginning not later than June 7, 1917, and in the case of ground water beginning
not later than June 7, 1945, or

(b) Waters of the state
have been applied to beneficial use continuously (with no period of nonuse
exceeding five consecutive years) from the date of entry of a court decree
confirming a water right and any failure to register a claim resulted from a
reasonable misinterpretation of the requirements as they related to such court
decreed rights.

(3) The board shall
have jurisdiction to accept petitions for certification from any person through
September 1, 1985, and not thereafter.

(4) A petition for
certification shall include complete information on the claim pursuant to RCW
90.14.051 (1) through (8), and any such information as the board may require.

(5) The department of
ecology is directed to accept for filing any claim certified by the board as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The department of ecology, upon
request of the board, may provide assistance to the board pertinent to any certification
petition.

(6) A certification by
the pollution control hearings board or a filing with the department of ecology
of a claim under this section shall not constitute a determination or
confirmation that a water right exists.

(7) The provisions of RCW
90.14.071 shall have no applicability to certified claims filed pursuant to
this section.

(8) This
section shall have no applicability to ground waters resulting from the
operations of reclamation projects.

Sec. 29. RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c
291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person entitled to
divert or withdraw waters of the state through any appropriation authorized by
enactments of the legislature prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917,
or by custom, or by general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who
voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any
part of said right to divert or withdraw for any period of ((five)) ten
successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion
thereof, and said right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the
waters affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in
accordance with RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 30. RCW 90.14.170 and 1967 c
233 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person entitled to
divert or withdraw waters of the state by virtue of his ownership of land
abutting a stream, lake, or watercourse, who abandons the same, or who
voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any
part of said right to withdraw or divert said water for any period of ((five))
ten successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or
portion thereof, and such right or portion thereof shall revert to the state,
and the waters affected by said right shall become available for appropriation
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 31. RCW 90.14.180 and 1987 c
109 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person hereafter
entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state through an appropriation
authorized under RCW 90.03.330, 90.44.080, or 90.44.090 who abandons the same,
or who voluntarily fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or
any part of said right to withdraw for any period of ((five)) ten
successive years shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and such right
or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters affected by said
right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with RCW
90.03.250. All certificates hereafter issued by the department of ecology
pursuant to RCW 90.03.330 shall expressly incorporate this section by
reference.

Sec. 32. RCW 90.46.005 and 1997 c
355 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that by encouraging the use of reclaimed water while assuring the health and
safety of all Washington citizens and the protection of its environment, the
state of Washington will continue to use water in the best interests of present
and future generations.

To facilitate the use
of reclaimed water as soon as is practicable, the legislature encourages the
cooperative efforts of the public and private sectors and the use of pilot
projects to effectuate the goals of this chapter. The legislature further
directs the department of health and the department of ecology to coordinate
efforts towards developing an efficient and streamlined process for creating
and implementing processes for the use of reclaimed water.

It is hereby declared
that the people of the state of Washington have a primary interest in the
development of facilities to provide reclaimed water to replace potable water
in nonpotable applications, to supplement existing surface and ground water
supplies, and to assist in meeting the future water requirements of the state.

The legislature further
finds and declares that the utilization of reclaimed water by local communities
for domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational, and fish and wildlife
habitat creation and enhancement purposes, including wetland enhancement, will
contribute to the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state
of Washington. To the extent reclaimed water is appropriate for beneficial
uses, it should be so used to preserve potable water for drinking purposes.
Use of reclaimed water constitutes the development of new basic water supplies
needed for future generations.

The legislature further
finds and declares that the use of reclaimed water is not inconsistent with the
policy of antidegradation of state waters announced in other state statutes,
including the water pollution control act, chapter 90.48 RCW and the water
resources act, chapter 90.54 RCW.

The legislature finds
that other states, including California, Florida, and Arizona, have
successfully used reclaimed water to supplement existing water supplies without
threatening existing resources or public health.

It is the intent of the
legislature that the department of ecology and the department of health
undertake the necessary steps to encourage the development of water reclamation
facilities so that reclaimed water may be made available to help meet the
growing water requirements of the state.

The legislature further
finds and declares that reclaimed water facilities are water pollution control
facilities as defined in chapter 70.146 RCW and are eligible for financial
assistance as provided in chapter 70.146 RCW. The legislature finds that
funding demonstration projects will ensure the future use of reclaimed water.
The demonstration projects in RCW 90.46.110 are varied in nature and will
provide the experience necessary to test different facets of the standards and
refine a variety of technologies so that water purveyors can begin to use
reclaimed water technology in a more cost-effective manner. This is especially
critical in smaller cities and communities where the feasibility for such
projects is great, but there are scarce resources to develop the necessary
facilities.

The legislature
further finds that the agricultural processing industry can play a critical and
beneficial role in promoting the efficient use of water by having the
opportunity to develop and reuse agricultural industrial reclaimed water from
food processing.

Sec. 33. RCW 90.46.010 and 1997 c
444 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Greywater" means wastewater having the consistency and strength of
residential domestic type wastewater. Greywater includes wastewater from
sinks, showers, and laundry fixtures, but does not include toilet or urinal
waters.

(2) "Land
application" means application of treated effluent for purposes of
irrigation or landscape enhancement for residential, business, and governmental
purposes.

(3) "Person"
means any state, individual, public or private corporation, political
subdivision, governmental subdivision, governmental agency, municipality,
copartnership, association, firm, trust estate, or any other legal entity
whatever.

(4) "Reclaimed
water" means effluent derived in any part from sewage from a wastewater
treatment system that has been adequately and reliably treated, so that as a
result of that treatment, it is suitable for a beneficial use or a controlled
use that would not otherwise occur and is no longer considered wastewater.

(5) "Sewage"
means water-carried human wastes from residences, buildings, industrial and
commercial establishments, or other places, together with such ground water
infiltration, surface waters, or industrial wastewater as may be present.

(6) "User"
means any person who uses reclaimed water.

(7)
"Wastewater" means water and wastes discharged from homes,
businesses, and industry to the sewer system.

(8) "Beneficial
use" means the use of reclaimed water, that has been transported from the
point of production to the point of use without an intervening discharge to the
waters of the state, for a beneficial purpose.

(9) "Direct
recharge" means the controlled subsurface addition of water directly to
the ground water basin that results in the replenishment of ground water.

(10) "Ground water
recharge criteria" means the contaminant criteria found in the drinking
water quality standards adopted by the state board of health pursuant to
chapter 43.20 RCW and the department of health pursuant to chapter 70.119A RCW.

(11) "Planned
ground water recharge project" means any reclaimed water project designed
for the purpose of recharging ground water, via direct recharge or surface
percolation.

(12) "Reclamation
criteria" means the criteria set forth in the water reclamation and reuse
interim standards and subsequent revisions adopted by the department of ecology
and the department of health.

(13) "Streamflow
augmentation" means the discharge of reclaimed water to rivers and streams
of the state or other surface water bodies, but not wetlands.

(14) "Surface
percolation" means the controlled application of water to the ground
surface for the purpose of replenishing ground water.

(15) "Wetland or
wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface water or
ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under
normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted
to life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps,
marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands regulated under this chapter shall
be delineated in accordance with the manual adopted by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.58.380.

(16) "Constructed
beneficial use wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally constructed on
nonwetland sites to produce or replace natural wetland functions and values.
Constructed beneficial use wetlands are considered "waters of the
state."

(17) "Constructed
treatment wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally constructed on
nonwetland sites and managed for the primary purpose of wastewater or storm
water treatment. Constructed treatment wetlands are considered part of the
collection and treatment system and are not considered "waters of the
state."

(18)
"Agricultural industrial reclaimed water" means water that has been
used for the purpose of agriculture processing and has been adequately and
reliably treated, so that as a result of that treatment, it is suitable for
other agricultural water use.

(19)
"Agricultural processing" means the processing of crops or milk to
produce a product primarily for wholesale or retail sale for human or animal
consumption, including but not limited to potato, fruit, vegetable, and grain
processing.

(20)
"Agricultural water use" means the use of water for irrigation and
other uses related to the production of agricultural products. These uses
include, but are not limited to, construction, operation, and maintenance of
agricultural facilities and livestock operations at farms, ranches, dairies,
and nurseries. Examples of these uses include, but are not limited to, dust
control, temperature control, and fire control.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
34. A new section is added
to chapter 90.46 RCW to read as follows:

The owner of an
agricultural processing plant that generates agricultural industrial reclaimed
water may obtain a permit from the department of ecology for application of
that water to agricultural water use. The department of ecology may issue an
agricultural reclaimed water permit under chapter 90.48 RCW to the owner of
the agricultural processing plant who may then distribute the water through
methods including, but not limited to, irrigation systems, subject to
provisions in the permit governing the location, rate, water quality, and
purpose. In cases where the department of ecology determines that a
significant risk to public health exists, in land application of the water, the
department must refer the application to the department of health for review
and consultation.

The owner
of the agricultural processing plant who obtains a permit under this section
has the exclusive right to the use of any agricultural industrial reclaimed
water generated from the plant and to the distribution of such water through
facilities including irrigation systems. Use and distribution of the water by
the owner is exempt from the permit requirements of RCW 90.03.250, 90.03.380,
90.44.060, and 90.44.100.

Sec. 35. RCW 90.03.252 and 1997 c
444 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The permit
requirements of RCW 90.03.250 do not apply to the use of reclaimed water by the
owner of a wastewater treatment facility under the provisions of RCW 90.46.120 and
do not apply to the use of agricultural industrial reclaimed water as provided
under section 34 of this act.

Sec. 36. RCW 90.44.062 and 1997 c
444 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The permit requirements
of RCW 90.44.060 do not apply to the use of reclaimed water by the owner of a
wastewater treatment facility under the provisions of RCW 90.46.120 and do
not apply to the use of agricultural industrial reclaimed water as provided under
section 34 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 37. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---