BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.95.180 and 1997 c
213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applications for
permits to operate a new or modified solid waste handling facility shall be on
forms prescribed by the department and shall contain a description of the
proposed facilities and operations at the site, plans and specifications for
any new or additional facilities to be constructed, and such other information
as the jurisdictional health department may deem necessary in order to
determine whether the site and solid waste disposal facilities located thereon
will comply with local and state regulations.

(2) Upon receipt of an
application for a permit to establish or modify a solid waste handling
facility, the jurisdictional health department shall refer one copy of the
application to the department which shall report its findings to the
jurisdictional health department, and, for applications to modify facility
operations under subsection (3) of this section, shall issue its concurrence or
nonconcurrence under RCW 70.95.185 following receipt by the department of the
jurisdictional health department's recommendations.

(3) An owner or
operator of a solid waste landfill facility located west of the crest of the
Cascade mountains who proposes to modify facility operations as defined in this
subsection shall obtain a permit for the modifications and a concurrence by the
department as provided under RCW 70.95.185. When the owner or operator of such
a facility proposes to increase on an annual basis the disposal of municipal solid
waste generated within the state but outside the county in which the facility
is located, in an amount greater than ten thousand tons more than the preceding
calendar year, such increase shall be considered a modification of facility
operations. In addition to the determinations under this subsection, the
jurisdictional health department shall require the applicant to provide
information on the types and quantities of waste to be disposed in the
facility, and shall obtain information from the jurisdictional health
departments in the areas generating the waste regarding compliance of waste
generators and transporters with the applicable local comprehensive solid waste
management program.

(4) The
jurisdictional health department shall investigate every application as may be
necessary to determine whether a proposed or modified site and facilities meet
all solid waste, air, and other applicable laws and regulations, and conforms
with the approved comprehensive solid waste handling plan, and complies with all
zoning requirements.

(((4))) (5)
When the jurisdictional health department finds that the permit should be
issued, it shall issue such permit. For applications to modify facility
operations under subsection (3) of this section, the jurisdictional health
department shall obtain the concurrence of the department before issuing the
permit. Every application shall be approved or disapproved within ninety
days after its receipt by the jurisdictional health department.

(((5))) (6)
The jurisdictional board of health may establish reasonable fees for permits
and renewal of permits. All permit fees collected by the health department
shall be deposited in the treasury and to the account from which the health
department's operating expenses are paid.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.95.185 and 1984 c
123 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except for
permits requiring concurrence by the department before issuance under
subsection (2) of this section, every permit issued by a jurisdictional health
department under RCW 70.95.180 shall be reviewed by the department to ensure
that the proposed site or facility conforms with:

(((1))) (a)
All applicable laws and regulations including the minimal functional standards
for solid waste handling; and

(((2))) (b)
The approved comprehensive solid waste management plan.

The department shall
review the permit within thirty days after the issuance of the permit by the
jurisdictional health department. The department may appeal the issuance of
the permit by the jurisdictional health department to the pollution control
hearings board, as described in chapter 43.21B RCW, for noncompliance with
subsection (1) ((or (2))) (a) or (b) of this section.

No permit issued
pursuant to RCW 70.95.180 after June 7, 1984, shall be considered valid unless
it has been reviewed by the department.

(2) The
jurisdictional health department shall forward applications to modify facility
operations under RCW 70.95.180(3) to the department within five days of
receiving a complete application. The department shall review the application
to ensure that:

(a) The proposed
facility operations will conform to all applicable laws and regulation,
including the minimum functional standards for solid waste handling;

(b) The handling of
waste generated and transported to the facility will conform to the applicable
local comprehensive solid waste management plans for the areas in which the
waste is generated; and

(c) The standards
for source separation and recycling services, diversion of dangerous waste, and
waste reduction programs to which the waste is subject in the areas in which it
is generated are substantially equivalent to those of solid waste generated in
the county or city in which the landfill disposal facility is located.

The department
shall inform the jurisdictional health department of its concurrence or
nonconcurrence within forty-five days of receipt of the complete application.
A concurrence may include such conditions as may be necessary to ensure the
waste to be disposed in the facility is subject to standards for source
separation and recycling, diversion of dangerous waste, and waste reduction
substantially equivalent to those of solid waste generated in the county or
city in which the landfill disposal facility is located. The jurisdictional
health department shall not issue the permit without a concurrence from the
department.

---
END ---