BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that each person has a fundamental and inalienable right to a healthful
environment and each person has a responsibility to preserve and enhance that
right. The state has a solemn obligation to the present generation for the
benefit of future generations. The legislature finds a healthful environment
is threatened by irresponsible disposal of hazardous substances from sites that
have been cleaned up as required by law.

(2) The legislature
finds that a deposit of hazardous substances on real property that results in
increasing the contamination level of that property has potential significant
adverse environmental impacts. The legislature therefore intends to prohibit
such deposits except in limited circumstances, such as deposits on
state-designated disposal sites or on properties that are part of an approved
county solid waste plan. The legislature further intends to declare that, with
these limited exceptions, no hazardous substance may be deposited on real
property containing the hazardous substances to a lesser quantity and degree
than the hazardous substance being deposited.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.105D.020 and 1998
c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Agreed
order" means an order issued by the department under this chapter with
which the potentially liable person receiving the order agrees to comply. An
agreed order may be used to require or approve any cleanup or other remedial
actions but it is not a settlement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and shall not
contain a covenant not to sue, or provide protection from claims for
contribution, or provide eligibility for public funding of remedial actions
under RCW 70.105D.070(2)(d)(xi).

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3)
"Director" means the director of ecology or the director's designee.

(4)
"Facility" means (a) any building, structure, installation,
equipment, pipe or pipeline (including any pipe into a sewer or publicly owned
treatment works), well, pit, pond, lagoon, impoundment, ditch, landfill,
storage container, motor vehicle, rolling stock, vessel, or aircraft, or (b)
any site or area where a hazardous substance, other than a consumer product in
consumer use, has been deposited, stored, disposed of, or placed, or otherwise
come to be located.

(5) "Federal
cleanup law" means the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., as
amended by Public Law 99-499.

(6) "Foreclosure
and its equivalents" means purchase at a foreclosure sale, acquisition, or
assignment of title in lieu of foreclosure, termination of a lease, or other
repossession, acquisition of a right to title or possession, an agreement in
satisfaction of the obligation, or any other comparable formal or informal
manner, whether pursuant to law or under warranties, covenants, conditions,
representations, or promises from the borrower, by which the holder acquires
title to or possession of a facility securing a loan or other obligation.

(7) "Hazardous
substance" means:

(a) Any dangerous or
extremely hazardous waste as defined in RCW 70.105.010 (5) and (6), or any
dangerous or extremely dangerous waste designated by rule pursuant to chapter
70.105 RCW;

(b) Any hazardous
substance as defined in RCW 70.105.010(14) or any hazardous substance as
defined by rule pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW;

(c) Any substance that,
on March 1, 1989, is a hazardous substance under section 101(14) of the federal
cleanup law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601(14);

(d) Petroleum or
petroleum products; and

(e) Any substance or
category of substances, including solid waste decomposition products,
determined by the director by rule to present a threat to human health or the
environment if released into the environment.

The term hazardous
substance does not include any of the following when contained in an
underground storage tank from which there is not a release: Crude oil or any
fraction thereof or petroleum, if the tank is in compliance with all applicable
federal, state, and local law.

(8) "Independent remedial
actions" means remedial actions conducted without department oversight or
approval, and not under an order, agreed order, or consent decree.

(9) "Holder"
means a person who holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect a security
interest. A holder includes the initial holder such as the loan originator,
any subsequent holder such as a successor-in-interest or subsequent purchaser
of the security interest on the secondary market, a guarantor of an obligation,
surety, or any other person who holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect
a security interest, or a receiver, court-appointed trustee, or other person
who acts on behalf or for the benefit of a holder. A holder can be a public or
privately owned financial institution, receiver, conservator, loan guarantor,
or other similar persons that loan money or guarantee repayment of a loan.
Holders typically are banks or savings and loan institutions but may also
include others such as insurance companies, pension funds, or private
individuals that engage in loaning of money or credit.

(10) "Indicia of
ownership" means evidence of a security interest, evidence of an interest
in a security interest, or evidence of an interest in a facility securing a
loan or other obligation, including any legal or equitable title to a facility
acquired incident to foreclosure and its equivalents. Evidence of such
interests includes, mortgages, deeds of trust, sellers interest in a real
estate contract, liens, surety bonds, and guarantees of obligations, title held
pursuant to a lease financing transaction in which the lessor does not select
initially the leased facility, or legal or equitable title obtained pursuant to
foreclosure and their equivalents. Evidence of such interests also includes
assignments, pledges, or other rights to or other forms of encumbrance against
the facility that are held primarily to protect a security interest.

(11) "Operating a
facility primarily to protect a security interest" occurs when all of the
following are met: (a) Operating the facility where the borrower has defaulted
on the loan or otherwise breached the security agreement; (b) operating the
facility to preserve the value of the facility as an ongoing business; (c) the
operation is being done in anticipation of a sale, transfer, or assignment of
the facility; and (d) the operation is being done primarily to protect a
security interest. Operating a facility for longer than one year prior to
foreclosure or its equivalents shall be presumed to be operating the facility
for other than to protect a security interest.

(12) "Owner or
operator" means:

(a) Any person with any
ownership interest in the facility or who exercises any control over the
facility; or

(b) In the case of an
abandoned facility, any person who had owned, or operated, or exercised control
over the facility any time before its abandonment;

The term does not
include:

(i) An agency of the
state or unit of local government which acquired ownership or control
involuntarily through bankruptcy, tax delinquency, abandonment, or
circumstances in which the government involuntarily acquires title. This
exclusion does not apply to an agency of the state or unit of local government
which has caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of a
hazardous substance from the facility;

(ii) A person who,
without participating in the management of a facility, holds indicia of
ownership primarily to protect the person's security interest in the facility.
Holders after foreclosure and its equivalent and holders who engage in any of
the activities identified in subsection (13)(e) through (g) of this section
shall not lose this exemption provided the holder complies with all of the
following:

(A) The holder properly
maintains the environmental compliance measures already in place at the
facility;

(B) The holder complies
with the reporting requirements in the rules adopted under this chapter;

(C) The holder complies
with any order issued to the holder by the department to abate an imminent or
substantial endangerment;

(D) The holder allows
the department or potentially liable persons under an order, agreed order, or
settlement agreement under this chapter access to the facility to conduct
remedial actions and does not impede the conduct of such remedial actions;

(E) Any remedial
actions conducted by the holder are in compliance with any preexisting
requirements identified by the department, or, if the department has not
identified such requirements for the facility, the remedial actions are
conducted consistent with the rules adopted under this chapter; and

(F) The holder does not
exacerbate an existing release. The exemption in this subsection (12)(b)(ii)
does not apply to holders who cause or contribute to a new release or
threatened release or who are otherwise liable under RCW 70.105D.040(1) (b),
(c), (d), and (e); provided, however, that a holder shall not lose this
exemption if it establishes that any such new release has been remediated
according to the requirements of this chapter and that any hazardous substances
remaining at the facility after remediation of the new release are divisible
from such new release;

(iii) A fiduciary in
his, her, or its personal or individual capacity. This exemption does not
preclude a claim against the assets of the estate or trust administered by the
fiduciary or against a nonemployee agent or independent contractor retained by
a fiduciary. This exemption also does not apply to the extent that a person is
liable under this chapter independently of the person's ownership as a fiduciary
or for actions taken in a fiduciary capacity which cause or contribute to a new
release or exacerbate an existing release of hazardous substances. This
exemption applies provided that, to the extent of the fiduciary's powers
granted by law or by the applicable governing instrument granting fiduciary
powers, the fiduciary complies with all of the following:

(A) The fiduciary
properly maintains the environmental compliance measures already in place at
the facility;

(B) The fiduciary
complies with the reporting requirements in the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(C) The fiduciary
complies with any order issued to the fiduciary by the department to abate an
imminent or substantial endangerment;

(D) The fiduciary
allows the department or potentially liable persons under an order, agreed
order, or settlement agreement under this chapter access to the facility to
conduct remedial actions and does not impede the conduct of such remedial
actions;

(E) Any remedial
actions conducted by the fiduciary are in compliance with any preexisting
requirements identified by the department, or, if the department has not
identified such requirements for the facility, the remedial actions are
conducted consistent with the rules adopted under this chapter; and

(F) The fiduciary does
not exacerbate an existing release.

The exemption in this
subsection (12)(b)(iii) does not apply to fiduciaries who cause or contribute
to a new release or threatened release or who are otherwise liable under RCW
70.105D.040(1) (b), (c), (d), and (e); provided however, that a fiduciary shall
not lose this exemption if it establishes that any such new release has been
remediated according to the requirements of this chapter and that any hazardous
substances remaining at the facility after remediation of the new release are
divisible from such new release. The exemption in this subsection (12)(b)(iii)
also does not apply where the fiduciary's powers to comply with this subsection
(12)(b)(iii) are limited by a governing instrument created with the objective
purpose of avoiding liability under this chapter or of avoiding compliance with
this chapter; or

(iv) Any person who has
any ownership interest in, operates, or exercises control over real property
where a hazardous substance has come to be located solely as a result of
migration of the hazardous substance to the real property through the ground
water from a source off the property, if:

(A) The person can
demonstrate that the hazardous substance has not been used, placed, managed, or
otherwise handled on the property in a manner likely to cause or contribute to
a release of the hazardous substance that has migrated onto the property;

(B) The person has not
caused or contributed to the release of the hazardous substance;

(C) The person does not
engage in activities that damage or interfere with the operation of remedial
actions installed on the person's property or engage in activities that result
in exposure of humans or the environment to the contaminated ground water that
has migrated onto the property;

(D) If requested, the
person allows the department, potentially liable persons who are subject to an
order, agreed order, or consent decree, and the authorized employees, agents,
or contractors of each, access to the property to conduct remedial actions
required by the department. The person may attempt to negotiate an access
agreement before allowing access; and

(E) Legal withdrawal of
ground water does not disqualify a person from the exemption in this subsection
(12)(b)(iv).

(13)
"Participation in management" means exercising decision-making
control over the borrower's operation of the facility, environmental
compliance, or assuming or manifesting responsibility for the overall
management of the enterprise encompassing the day-to-day decision making of the
enterprise.

The term does not
include any of the following: (a) A holder with the mere capacity or ability
to influence, or the unexercised right to control facility operations; (b) a
holder who conducts or requires a borrower to conduct an environmental audit or
an environmental site assessment at the facility for which indicia of ownership
is held; (c) a holder who requires a borrower to come into compliance with any
applicable laws or regulations at the facility for which indicia of ownership
is held; (d) a holder who requires a borrower to conduct remedial actions
including setting minimum requirements, but does not otherwise control or
manage the borrower's remedial actions or the scope of the borrower's remedial
actions except to prepare a facility for sale, transfer, or assignment; (e) a
holder who engages in workout or policing activities primarily to protect the
holder's security interest in the facility; (f) a holder who prepares a
facility for sale, transfer, or assignment or requires a borrower to prepare a
facility for sale, transfer, or assignment; (g) a holder who operates a
facility primarily to protect a security interest, or requires a borrower to
continue to operate, a facility primarily to protect a security interest; and
(h) a prospective holder who, as a condition of becoming a holder, requires an
owner or operator to conduct an environmental audit, conduct an environmental
site assessment, come into compliance with any applicable laws or regulations,
or conduct remedial actions prior to holding a security interest is not
participating in the management of the facility.

(14) "Person"
means an individual, firm, corporation, association, partnership, consortium,
joint venture, commercial entity, state government agency, unit of local
government, federal government agency, ((or)) Indian tribe, special
district, port district, or any other entity established under law.

(15) "Policing
activities" means actions the holder takes to insure that the borrower
complies with the terms of the loan or security interest or actions the holder
takes or requires the borrower to take to maintain the value of the security.
Policing activities include: Requiring the borrower to conduct remedial
actions at the facility during the term of the security interest; requiring the
borrower to comply or come into compliance with applicable federal, state, and
local environmental and other laws, regulations, and permits during the term of
the security interest; securing or exercising authority to monitor or inspect
the facility including on-site inspections, or to monitor or inspect the
borrower's business or financial condition during the term of the security
interest; or taking other actions necessary to adequately police the loan or security
interest such as requiring a borrower to comply with any warranties, covenants,
conditions, representations, or promises from the borrower.

(16) "Potentially
liable person" means any person whom the department finds, based on
credible evidence, to be liable under RCW 70.105D.040. The department shall
give notice to any such person and allow an opportunity for comment before
making the finding, unless an emergency requires otherwise.

(17) "Prepare a
facility for sale, transfer, or assignment" means to secure access to the
facility; perform routine maintenance on the facility; remove inventory,
equipment, or structures; properly maintain environmental compliance measures
already in place at the facility; conduct remedial actions to clean up releases
at the facility; or to perform other similar activities intended to preserve
the value of the facility where the borrower has defaulted on the loan or
otherwise breached the security agreement or after foreclosure and its
equivalents and in anticipation of a pending sale, transfer, or assignment,
primarily to protect the holder's security interest in the facility. A holder
can prepare a facility for sale, transfer, or assignment for up to one year
prior to foreclosure and its equivalents and still stay within the security
interest exemption in subsection (12)(b)(ii) of this section.

(18) "Primarily to
protect a security interest" means the indicia of ownership is held
primarily for the purpose of securing payment or performance of an obligation.
The term does not include indicia of ownership held primarily for investment
purposes nor indicia of ownership held primarily for purposes other than as
protection for a security interest. A holder may have other, secondary
reasons, for maintaining indicia of ownership, but the primary reason must be
for protection of a security interest. Holding indicia of ownership after
foreclosure or its equivalents for longer than five years shall be considered
to be holding the indicia of ownership for purposes other than primarily to
protect a security interest. For facilities that have been acquired through
foreclosure or its equivalents prior to July 23, 1995, this five-year period
shall begin as of July 23, 1995.

(19) "Public
notice" means, at a minimum, adequate notice mailed to all persons who
have made timely request of the department and to persons residing in the
potentially affected vicinity of the proposed action; mailed to appropriate
news media; published in the newspaper of largest circulation in the city or county
of the proposed action; and opportunity for interested persons to comment.

(20)
"Release" means any intentional or unintentional entry of any
hazardous substance into the environment, including but not limited to the
abandonment or disposal of containers of hazardous substances.

(21) "Remedy"
or "remedial action" means any action or expenditure consistent with
the purposes of this chapter to identify, eliminate, or minimize any threat or
potential threat posed by hazardous substances to human health or the
environment including any investigative and monitoring activities with respect
to any release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and any health
assessments or health effects studies conducted in order to determine the risk
or potential risk to human health.

(22) "Security
interest" means an interest in a facility created or established for the
purpose of securing a loan or other obligation. Security interests include
deeds of trusts, sellers interest in a real estate contract, liens, legal, or
equitable title to a facility acquired incident to foreclosure and its
equivalents, and title pursuant to lease financing transactions. Security
interests may also arise from transactions such as sale and leasebacks,
conditional sales, installment sales, trust receipt transactions, certain
assignments, factoring agreements, accounts receivable financing arrangements,
easements, and consignments, if the transaction creates or establishes an
interest in a facility for the purpose of securing a loan or other obligation.

(23) "Industrial
properties" means properties that are or have been characterized by, or
are to be committed to, traditional industrial uses such as processing or
manufacturing of materials, marine terminal and transportation areas and facilities,
fabrication, assembly, treatment, or distribution of manufactured products, or
storage of bulk materials, that are either:

(a) Zoned for
industrial use by a city or county conducting land use planning under chapter
36.70A RCW; or

(b) For counties not
planning under chapter 36.70A RCW and the cities within them, zoned for
industrial use and adjacent to properties currently used or designated for
industrial purposes.

(24) "Workout
activities" means those actions by which a holder, at any time prior to
foreclosure and its equivalents, seeks to prevent, cure, or mitigate a default
by the borrower or obligor; or to preserve, or prevent the diminution of, the
value of the security. Workout activities include: Restructuring or
renegotiating the terms of the security interest; requiring payment of
additional rent or interest; exercising forbearance; requiring or exercising
rights pursuant to an assignment of accounts or other amounts owed to an
obligor; requiring or exercising rights pursuant to an escrow agreement
pertaining to amounts owed to an obligor; providing specific or general
financial or other advice, suggestions, counseling, or guidance; and exercising
any right or remedy the holder is entitled to by law or under any warranties,
covenants, conditions, representations, or promises from the borrower.

(25)(a)
"Fiduciary" means a person acting for the benefit of another party as
a bona fide trustee; executor; administrator; custodian; guardian of estates or
guardian ad litem; receiver; conservator; committee of estates of incapacitated
persons; trustee in bankruptcy; trustee, under an indenture agreement, trust
agreement, lease, or similar financing agreement, for debt securities,
certificates of interest or certificates of participation in debt securities,
or other forms of indebtedness as to which the trustee is not, in the capacity
of trustee, the lender. Except as provided in subsection (12)(b)(iii) of this
section, the liability of a fiduciary under this chapter shall not exceed the
assets held in the fiduciary capacity.

(b)
"Fiduciary" does not mean:

(i) A person acting as
a fiduciary with respect to a trust or other fiduciary estate that was
organized for the primary purpose of, or is engaged in, actively carrying on a
trade or business for profit, unless the trust or other fiduciary estate was
created as part of, or to facilitate, one or more estate plans or because of
the incapacity of a natural person;

(ii) A person who
acquires ownership or control of a facility with the objective purpose of
avoiding liability of the person or any other person. It is prima facie
evidence that the fiduciary acquired ownership or control of the facility to
avoid liability if the facility is the only substantial asset in the fiduciary
estate at the time the facility became subject to the fiduciary estate;

(iii) A person who acts
in a capacity other than that of a fiduciary or in a beneficiary capacity and
in that capacity directly or indirectly benefits from a trust or fiduciary
relationship;

(iv) A person who is a
beneficiary and fiduciary with respect to the same fiduciary estate, and who
while acting as a fiduciary receives benefits that exceed customary or
reasonable compensation, and incidental benefits permitted under applicable
law;

(v) A person who is a
fiduciary and receives benefits that substantially exceed customary or
reasonable compensation, and incidental benefits permitted under applicable
law; or

(vi) A person who acts
in the capacity of trustee of state or federal lands or resources.

(26) "Fiduciary
capacity" means the capacity of a person holding title to a facility, or
otherwise having control of an interest in the facility pursuant to the
exercise of the responsibilities of the person as a fiduciary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.105D RCW to read as follows:

No hazardous substance
that has been removed from a facility may be deposited on real property that
contains hazardous substances to a lesser quantity and degree than the
hazardous substance being deposited on the property. This section does not
apply to:

(1) Actions taken in
accordance with a settlement authorized in RCW 70.105D.040(5); or

(2) Deposits on a
disposal site or landfill as defined in RCW 70.95.030 and deposits at
facilities for the recyclying, storage, treatment, incineration, or disposal of
hazardous wastes as defined in RCW 70.105.010(11) and 70.95.010(15).

Sec. 4. RCW 70.105D.050 and 1994
c 257 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) With respect to any
release, or threatened release, for which the department does not conduct or
contract for conducting remedial action and for which the department believes
remedial action is in the public interest, the director shall issue orders or
agreed orders requiring potentially liable persons to provide the remedial
action.

(2) Any liable
person who refuses, without sufficient cause, to comply with an order or agreed
order of the director or who violates section 3 of this act is liable in
an action brought by the attorney general for:

(a) Up to three times
the amount of any costs incurred by the state as a result of the party's
refusal to comply or as a result of the violation of section 3 of this act;
and

(b) A civil penalty of
up to twenty-five thousand dollars for each day the party refuses to comply or
up to twenty-five thousand dollars for each violation of section 3 of this act.

(3) The treble
damages and civil penalty under ((this)) subsection (2) of this
section apply to all recovery actions filed on or after March 1, 1989,
and to all violations of section 3 of this act occurring on or after the
effective date of this section.

(((2))) (4)
Any person who incurs costs complying with an order issued under subsection (((1)))
(2) of this section may petition the department for reimbursement of
those costs. If the department refuses to grant reimbursement, the person may
within thirty days thereafter file suit and recover costs by proving that he or
she was not a liable person under RCW 70.105D.040 and that the costs incurred
were reasonable.

(((3))) (5)
The attorney general shall seek, by filing an action if necessary, to recover
the amounts spent by the department for investigative and remedial actions and
orders, and agreed orders, including amounts spent prior to March 1, 1989, and
for investigations and other actions taken regarding violations of section 3 of
this act.

(((4))) (6)
The attorney general may bring an action to secure such relief as is necessary
to protect human health and the environment under this chapter.

(((5))) (7)(a)
Any person may commence a civil action to compel the department to perform any
nondiscretionary duty under this chapter. At least thirty days before
commencing the action, the person must give notice of intent to sue, unless a
substantial endangerment exists. The court may award attorneys' fees and other
costs to the prevailing party in the action.

(b) Civil
actions under this section and RCW 70.105D.060 may be brought in the superior
court of Thurston county or of the county in which the release or threatened
release exists.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.105D.080 and 1997
c 406 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in RCW 70.105D.040(4) (d) and (f), a person may bring a private right
of action, including a claim for contribution or for injunctive or
declaratory relief, against any other person liable under RCW 70.105D.040 for
the recovery of remedial action costs or for violations of section 3 of this
act. In the action, natural resource damages paid to the state under this
chapter may also be recovered. Recovery shall be based on such equitable
factors as the court determines are appropriate. Remedial action costs and
damages or other remedies for violations of section 3 of this act shall
include reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses.

(2) Recovery of
remedial action costs shall be limited to those remedial actions that, when
evaluated as a whole, are the substantial equivalent of a department-conducted
or department-supervised remedial action. Substantial equivalence shall be
determined by the court with reference to the rules adopted by the department
under this chapter. An action under this section may be brought after remedial
action costs are incurred but must be brought within three years from the date
remedial action confirms cleanup standards are met or within one year of May
12, 1993, whichever is later.

(3) The
prevailing party in ((such)) an action brought under this section
shall recover its reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. This section applies
to all causes of action regardless of when the cause of action may have
arisen. To the extent a cause of action has arisen prior to May 12, 1993, this
section applies retroactively, but in all other respects it applies
prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---