BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.95.020 and 1998 c
156 s 1 and 1998 c 90 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The purpose of this
chapter is to establish a comprehensive state-wide program for solid waste
handling, ((and solid waste)) recovery ((and/or)), and recycling
which will prevent land, air, and water pollution and conserve the natural,
economic, and energy resources of this state. To this end it is the purpose of
this chapter:

(1) To assign primary
responsibility for adequate solid waste handling to local government, reserving
to the state, however, those functions necessary to assure effective programs
throughout the state;

(2) To provide for
adequate planning for solid waste handling by local government;

(3) To provide for the
adoption and enforcement of basic minimum performance standards for solid waste
handling;

(4) To encourage the
development and operation of waste recycling facilities needed to accomplish
the management priority of waste recycling, and to promote consistency in the
requirements for such facilities throughout the state;

(5) To provide
technical and financial assistance to local governments in the planning,
development, and conduct of solid waste handling programs;

(6) To encourage ((storage,))
proper disposal((,)) and recycling of discarded vehicle tires and the
use of new technologies to convert discarded vehicle tires into energy;

(7) To stimulate
private recycling programs throughout the state; and

(((7))) (8)
To encourage the development and operation of waste recycling facilities and
activities needed to accomplish the management priority of waste recycling and
to promote consistency in the permitting requirements for such facilities and
activities throughout the state.

It is the intent of the
legislature that local governments be encouraged to use the expertise of
private industry and to contract with private industry to the fullest extent
possible to carry out solid waste recovery ((and/or)) and
recycling programs.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.95.260 and 1995 c
399 s 189 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall in
addition to its other powers and duties:

(1) Cooperate with the
appropriate federal, state, interstate and local units of government and with
appropriate private organizations in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter.

(2) Coordinate the
development of a solid waste management plan for all areas of the state in
cooperation with local government, the department of community, trade, and
economic development, and other appropriate state and regional agencies. The
plan shall relate to solid waste management for twenty years in the future and
shall be reviewed biennially, revised as necessary, and extended so that
perpetually the plan shall look to the future for twenty years as a guide in
carrying out a state coordinated solid waste management program. The plan
shall be developed into a single integrated document and shall be ((adopted
no later than October 1990. The plan shall be)) revised regularly after
its initial completion so that local governments revising local comprehensive
solid waste management plans can take advantage of the data and analysis in the
state plan.

(3) Provide technical
assistance to any person as well as to cities, counties, and industries.

(4) Initiate, conduct,
and support research, demonstration projects, and investigations, and
coordinate research programs pertaining to solid waste management systems,
including the use of new technologies to convert discarded vehicle tires into
energy.

(5) Develop statewide
programs to increase public awareness of and participation in tire recycling,
and to stimulate and encourage local private tire recycling centers and public
participation in tire recycling.

(6) ((May, under the
provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, from time to time)) Promulgate such rules ((and
regulations)) as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.95.510 and 1989 c
431 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

There is levied a one
dollar per tire fee on the retail sale of new replacement vehicle tires ((for
a period of five years, beginning October 1, 1989)). The fee imposed in
this section shall be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall
collect from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the
buyer by the seller less the ten percent amount retained by the seller as
provided in RCW 70.95.535 shall be paid to the department of revenue in
accordance with RCW 82.32.045. All other applicable provisions of chapter
82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to the fee imposed under
this section. The department of revenue shall administer this section.

For the purposes of
this section, "new replacement vehicle tires" means tires that are
newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and does not include retreaded vehicle
tires.

This section expires
January 1, 2012.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.95.520 and 1996 c
283 s 902 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created an
account within the state treasury to be known as the vehicle tire recycling
account. All assessments and other funds collected or received under this
chapter shall be deposited in the vehicle tire recycling account and used by
the department of ecology for administration and implementation of this
chapter. ((After October 1, 1989,)) The department of revenue
shall deduct two percent from funds collected pursuant to RCW 70.95.510 for the
purpose of administering and collecting the fee from new replacement vehicle
tire retailers.

((During the 1995-97
biennium, funds in the account may be appropriated to support recycling market
development activities by state agencies.))

Sec. 5. RCW 70.95.530 and 1988 c
250 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Moneys in the vehicle
tire recycling account ((may)) shall be appropriated to the
department of ecology:

(1) To provide for
funding to state and local governments for the removal of discarded vehicle
tires from unauthorized tire dump sites;

(2) To ((accomplish
the other purposes of RCW 70.95.020(5))) encourage proper disposal and
recycling of discarded vehicle tires; ((and))

(3) To ((fund the
study authorized in section 2, chapter 250, Laws of 1988)) facilitate
use of new technologies to convert discarded vehicle tires into energy; and

(4) To provide local
governments with grants for enforcement programs designed to address the
illegal disposal of tires.

In spending funds in
the account under this section, the department of ecology shall identify
communities with the most severe problems with waste tires and provide funds
first to projects in those communities that seek to remove
accumulations of waste tires through use of new technologies that convert
discarded vehicle tires into energy.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.95.535 and 1989 c
431 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Every
person engaged in making retail sales of new replacement vehicle tires in this
state shall retain ten percent of the collected one dollar fee. The moneys
retained may be used for costs associated with the proper management of the
waste vehicle tires by the retailer.

(((2) The department
of ecology will administer the funds for the purposes specified in RCW
70.95.020(5) including, but not limited to:

(a) Making grants to
local governments for pilot demonstration projects for on-site shredding and
recycling of tires from unauthorized dump sites;

(b) Grants to local
government for enforcement programs;

(c) Implementation
of a public information and education program to include posters, signs, and
informational materials to be distributed to retail tire sales and tire service
outlets;

(d) Product marketing
studies for recycled tires and alternatives to land disposal.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 70.95 RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW
70.95.020, 70.95.260, and 70.95.530, the phrase "new technologies to
convert discarded vehicle tires into energy" means the use of tires as a
fuel source with an electrothermal technology used in a noncombustive,
oxygen-reduced process, that results in low emissions of air pollution,
produces highly stable, leach-resistant products that are of commercial value,
and is a net producer of energy.

Sec. 8. RCW 70.95.565 and 1988 c
250 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

No ((business)) person
may enter into a contract for:

(1) Transportation of
waste tires with an unlicensed waste tire transporter; or

(2) Waste tire storage
with an unlicensed owner or operator of a waste tire storage site.

Sec. 9. 2000 c 150 s 1
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) On July 1, 2001,
any remaining fund balances in the following accounts are transferred to the
state wildlife account:

(a) The aquaculture
disease control account;

(b) The Cedar river
channel construction and operation account; and

(c) The wildlife
conservation reward fund.

(2) On July 1, 2001,
any remaining fund balances in the following accounts are transferred to the
parks renewal and stewardship account:

(a) The state wildlife
and recreation lands management account;

(b) The state and local
improvements revolving account; and

(c) The underwater park
account.

(3) On July 1, 2001,
any remaining fund balances in the following accounts are transferred to the
state toxics control account:

(a) The clean
Washington account; and

(b) ((The vehicle
tire recycling account; and

(c))) The solid waste management account.

Sec. 10. 2000 c 150 s 2
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 79A.20.020 (State wildlife and
recreation lands management account) and 1992 c 153 s 4;

(2) RCW 75.58.020 (Disease inspection and
control program--User fees--Aquaculture disease control account) and 1993 sp.s.
c 2 s 56 & 1985 c 457 s 9;

(3) RCW 70.95H.800 (Clean Washington account)
and 1991 c 319 s 212;

(4) ((RCW 70.95.520 (Vehicle tire recycling
account--Deposit of funds) and 1996 c 283 s 902, 1989 c 431 s 94, & 1985 c
345 s 6;

(5))) RCW 70.95.800 (Solid waste management
account--Expenditures) and 1993 c 130 s 2, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 73, & 1989 c
431 s 90;

(((6))) (5) RCW 43.21J.020 (Environmental and forest
restoration account) and 1993 c 516 s 3;

(((7))) (6) RCW 43.83C.030 (Proceeds to be deposited
in state and local improvements revolving account) and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 54,
1985 c 57 s 47, & 1972 ex.s. c 129 s 3;

(((8))) (7) RCW 79A.05.365 (Underwater
parks--Fees--Underwater park account) and 1993 c 267 s 3;

(((9))) (8) RCW 75.52.140 (Cedar river spawning
channel--Transfer of funds) and 1989 c 85 s 7; and

(((10))) (9) RCW 77.21.080 (Wildlife conservation
reward fund) and 1989 c 11 s 29 & 1987 c 506 s 75.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Sections 1 through 3, 5,
and 7 of this act take effect January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 4, 9, and 10 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect June 30, 2001.

---
END ---