BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature enacted
chapter 263, Laws of 1999 to help address problems with failing septic
systems. As part of chapter 263, Laws of 1999, a work group was created to
develop recommendations regarding financial assurances of on-site sewage
disposal system practitioners, including bonding, insurance, risk pools, and
similar methods. This work group submitted its recommendations to the
legislature on December 1, 1999. Recommendations developed by the work group
include the development of a data collection system that documents the number
and types of systems, locations within the state by region, the frequency of
repair, and the diagnosed factors leading to repair, as well as the development
of a model program that identifies the authorities, roles, and responsibilities
of the designer, installer, and homeowner.

The legislature
recognizes that a major source of nonpoint pollution is failing on-site sewage
disposal systems. The 1999-2001 Puget Sound water quality work plan, developed
by the Puget Sound water quality action team, indicates that local governments
have reported failure rates for on-site sewage disposal systems of up to
twenty-five percent along the shoreline of Puget Sound. Pollution from these
failing systems poses a risk to public health and water quality, and
significantly impacts the shellfish industry. The general public is also
exposed to significant health risks when sewage is discharged upon the ground
or into surface or ground waters. The legislature finds that the public health
and water quality can be better protected by: The development of better data;
the development of clear lines of responsibility between the designer,
installers, and homeowners; and clarifications to the existing law regarding
on-site sewage disposal systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature
recommends the state board of health consider requiring the installation of
inspection portals in on-site wastewater treatment systems through the adoption
of rules or incorporation in on-site sewage system operations and maintenance
guidelines.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.118.020 and 1994
c 281 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1)
"Nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices" means any device that
stores and treats nonwater-carried human urine and feces.

(2) "Alternative
methods of effluent disposal" means systems approved by the department of
health, including at least, mound systems, alternating drainfields, anaerobic
filters, evapotranspiration systems, and aerobic systems.

(3) "Failure"
means: (a) Effluent has been discharged on the surface of the ground prior to
approved treatment; or (b) effluent has percolated to the surface of the
ground; or (c) effluent has contaminated or threatens to contaminate a ground
water supply; or (d) a drainfield, sand filter, or mound that has become
saturated. For purposes of this subsection, "saturated" means an
inability to fully absorb wastewater, which may be exhibited by a pumped tank
filling from the backflow from the drainfield, sand filter, or mound. A
failing system does not include those systems that are either temporarily frozen
during winter or temporarily saturated due to the occurrence of a flooded
stream or river.

(4)
"Additive" means any commercial product intended to affect the
performance or aesthetics of an on-site sewage disposal system.

(5)
"Department" means the department of health.

(6) "On-site
sewage disposal system" means any system of piping, treatment devices, or
other facilities that convey, store, treat, or dispose of sewage on the
property where it originates or on nearby property under the control of the
user where the system is not connected to a public sewer system. For purposes
of this chapter, an on-site sewage disposal system does not include indoor
plumbing and associated fixtures.

(7) "Chemical
additive" means those additives containing acids, bases, or other
chemicals deemed unsafe by the department for use in an on-site sewage disposal
system.

(8) "Additive
manufacturer" means any person who manufactures, formulates, blends,
packages, or repackages an additive product for sale, use, or distribution
within the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The department of health
shall develop a model program pertaining to on-site sewage disposal systems
that describes the authorities, roles, and responsibilities of designers, installers,
and homeowners. In developing the model program, the department shall involve
local health jurisdictions, owners of on-site sewage disposal systems,
designers and installers of on-site sewage disposal systems, and builders. The
meetings to develop the model program shall be open to the public, and time
shall be allocated at each meeting to receive public comment. The model
program has no binding effect on the liability of any party, but shall be used
in the future development of a cost-effective performance-based recovery system
for consumers of on-site sewage disposal systems. The model shall give
consideration to long-term performance warranties provided to the owners of
these on-site systems. Design criteria in this model should address peak flow
limitations. The department of health shall report its recommendations and
model to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative
committees by July 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The department of health
shall develop recommendations for establishing a statewide system of risk
assessment data for on-site sewage disposal systems. The department shall
consult with local health jurisdictions in developing the recommendations. The
recommendations shall address how local governments will maintain and transmit
information to the department pertaining to on-site sewage disposal systems,
and how this information will be used by local health jurisdictions to
determine appropriate siting, design, and inspection protocols. Information
that shall be considered when developing the recommendations for the system of
risk assessment data include the number and types of on-site sewage disposal
systems, the frequency of repair by geographic regions, factors leading to
repair by general category, and funding for the state and local governments to
develop and maintain the system of data. Nothing in this section requires a
local board of health to collect information concerning why an on-site sewage
disposal system failed prior to the development of the system. The department
of health shall submit its recommendations to the office of financial
management and the appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 70.118 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever a local health
officer determines that a person has intentionally discharged effluent onto the
surface of the ground, or into surface or ground water, or has installed a
bypass to an on-site sewage disposal system that results in such a discharge,
and the person causing the discharge is an installer, pumper, or other on-site
sewage disposal system professional subject to department of health guidelines
for on-site sewage disposal system work, the local board of health must suspend
the license, certification, permit, or other authority of the on-site sewage
disposal system professional for a minimum of thirty days. The suspension
under this section is in addition to any civil or criminal penalty that may be
imposed by the local board of health or the department of health. This section
does not apply when the discharge is authorized by a local health officer as
the only realistic method of final disposal of treated effluent. This section
does not apply to designers of on-site sewage disposal systems, who are subject
to section 7 of this act for intentional discharges of effluent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 18.210 RCW to read as follows:

When a
local health officer determines that a designer has intentionally discharged
effluent onto the surface of the ground, or into surface or ground water, or
has installed a bypass to an on-site sewage disposal system that results in
such a discharge, the local health officer shall report the incident to the
board. The board, acting pursuant to RCW 18.210.030, shall suspend the license
or practice permit of the designer for a minimum of thirty days. The
suspension shall be in addition to any civil or criminal penalty that may be
imposed. An intentional discharge of effluent in violation of this section
constitutes malpractice under RCW 18.210.020. This section does not apply when
the discharge is authorized by a local health officer as the only realistic
method of final disposal of treated effluent.

---
END ---