BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that dioxin is a concern for public health, safety, and the environment because
it builds up in the environment, enters humans and wildlife through the food
chain, and can cause health effects such as cancer, immune suppression, and
reproductive problems.

In order to protect the
health of communities, the environment, and food in Washington state, the
legislature further finds that it is necessary for the department of ecology to
place controls on dioxin.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.105.010 and 1989
c 376 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The words and phrases
defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated when used in this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Department"
means the department of ecology.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology or the
director's designee.

(3) "Disposal
site" means a geographical site in or upon which hazardous wastes are
disposed of in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(4) "Dispose or
disposal" means the discarding or abandoning of hazardous wastes or the
treatment, decontamination, or recycling of such wastes once they have been
discarded or abandoned.

(5))) "Dangerous wastes" means any
discarded, useless, unwanted, or abandoned substances, including but not
limited to certain pesticides, or any residues or containers of such substances
which are disposed of in such quantity or concentration as to pose a
substantial present or potential hazard to human health, wildlife, or the
environment because such wastes or constituents or combinations of such wastes:

(a) Have short-lived,
toxic properties that may cause death, injury, or illness or have mutagenic,
teratogenic, or carcinogenic properties; or

(b) Are corrosive,
explosive, flammable, or may generate pressure through decomposition or other
means.

(((6))) (2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3) "Designated
zone facility" means any facility that requires an interim or final status
permit under rules adopted under this chapter and that is not a preempted
facility as defined in this section.

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology or the
director's designee.

(5) "Disposal
site" means a geographical site in or upon which hazardous wastes are
disposed of in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(6) "Dispose or
disposal" means the discarding or abandoning of hazardous wastes or the
treatment, decontamination, or recycling of such wastes once they have been
discarded or abandoned.

(7)
"Extremely hazardous waste" means any dangerous waste which

(a) will persist in a
hazardous form for several years or more at a disposal site and which in its
persistent form

(i) presents a
significant environmental hazard and may be concentrated by living organisms
through a food chain or may affect the genetic make-up of man or wildlife, and

(ii) is highly toxic to
man or wildlife

(b) if disposed of at a
disposal site in such quantities as would present an extreme hazard to man or
the environment.

(((7)
"Person" means any person, firm, association, county, public or
municipal or private corporation, agency, or other entity whatsoever.

(8)
"Pesticide" shall have the meaning of the term as defined in RCW
15.58.030 as now or hereafter amended.

(9) "Solid
waste advisory committee" means the same advisory committee as per RCW
70.95.040 through 70.95.070.

(10)
"Designated zone facility" means any facility that requires an
interim or final status permit under rules adopted under this chapter and that
is not a preempted facility as defined in this section.

(11))) (8) "Facility" means all
contiguous land and structures, other appurtenances, and improvements on the
land used for recycling, storing, treating, incinerating, or disposing of
hazardous waste.

(((12)
"Preempted facility" means any facility that includes as a
significant part of its activities any of the following operations: (a)
Landfill, (b) incineration, (c) land treatment, (d) surface impoundment to be
closed as a landfill, or (e) waste pile to be closed as a landfill.

(13))) (9) "Hazardous household substances"
means those substances identified by the department as hazardous household
substances in the guidelines developed under RCW 70.105.220.

(((14))) (10)
"Hazardous substances" means any liquid, solid, gas, or sludge,
including any material, substance, product, commodity, or waste, regardless of
quantity, that exhibits any of the characteristics or criteria of hazardous
waste as described in rules adopted under this chapter.

(((15))) (11)
"Hazardous waste" means and includes all dangerous and extremely
hazardous waste, including substances composed of both radioactive and
hazardous components.

(((16))) (12)
"Local government" means a city, town, or county.

(((17))) (13)
"Moderate-risk waste" means (a) any waste that exhibits any of the
properties of hazardous waste but is exempt from regulation under this chapter
solely because the waste is generated in quantities below the threshold for
regulation, and (b) any household wastes which are generated from the disposal
of substances identified by the department as hazardous household substances.

(((18))) (14)
"Person" means any person, firm, association, county, public or
municipal or private corporation, agency, or other entity whatsoever.

(15)
"Pesticide" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 15.58.030.

(16) "Preempted
facility" means any facility that includes as a significant part of its
activities any of the following operations: (a) Landfill, (b) incineration,
(c) land treatment, (d) surface impoundment to be closed as a landfill, or (e) waste
pile to be closed as a landfill.

(17)
"Service charge" means an assessment imposed under RCW 70.105.280
against those facilities that store, treat, incinerate, or dispose of dangerous
or extremely hazardous waste that contains both a nonradioactive hazardous
component and a radioactive component. Service charges shall also apply to
facilities undergoing closure under this chapter in those instances where
closure entails the physical characterization of remaining wastes which contain
both a nonradioactive hazardous component and a radioactive component or the
management of such wastes through treatment or removal, except any commercial
low-level radioactive waste facility.

(18) "Solid
waste" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.95.030.

(19) "Solid waste
advisory committee" means the same advisory committee as per RCW 70.95.040
through 70.95.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 70.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall prohibit the sale or use of commercial fertilizers or soil amendments
that contain any solid waste, hazardous waste, by-products, or co-products,
resulting from an industrial process that creates or releases dioxin.

(2) Any person in
Washington state generating a solid waste, hazardous waste, by-product, or
co-product, resulting from an industrial process that may create or release
dioxin shall report annually to the department if such wastes, by-products, or
co-products can be used for the purposes of commercial fertilizer or soil
amendments.

(3) Any person
importing to Washington state a solid waste, hazardous waste, by-product, or
co-product, resulting from an industrial process that may create or release
dioxin shall report annually to the department if such wastes, by-products, or
co-products can be used for the purposes of commercial fertilizer or soil
amendments.

(4) The department has
the authority to immediately stop the sale or use of any commercial fertilizer
or soil amendment which is made from, contains, or is a solid waste, hazardous
waste, by-product, or co-product, resulting from an industrial process that
creates or releases dioxin.

(5) The department
shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

(6) This section does
not apply to biosolids regulated under chapter 70.95J RCW.

(7) For the purposes of
this section, "industrial processes" means processes that use or burn
chlorine or chlorine compounds such as processes at pulp mills, cement kilns,
waste incinerators, oil refineries, and steel smelting operations.

(8) For the purposes of
this section "dioxin" means polychlorinated dibenzo-p-dioxins and
polychlorinated dibenzofurans with chlorine atoms in the 2, 3, 7, and 8
positions of the molecule.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 70.105 RCW to read as follows:

Forms for reporting
under section 3 of this act shall be provided by the department and at a
minimum require the following information: The amount, type, and origin of
waste, by-product, or co-product and whether it has in the past or has the
potential to be incorporated into commercial fertilizer or soil amendment and
the levels of dioxin.

Sec. 5. RCW 70.95C.020 and 1991
c 319 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter,
the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology or the
director's designee.

(3) "Dangerous
waste" shall have the same definition as set forth in RCW 70.105.010(((5)))
and shall specifically include those wastes designated as dangerous by rules
adopted pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW.

(4) "EPA/state
identification number" means the number assigned by the EPA (environmental
protection agency) or by the department of ecology to each generator and/or
transporter and treatment, storage, and/or disposal facility.

(5) "Extremely
hazardous waste" shall have the same definition as set forth in RCW 70.105.010(((6)))
and shall specifically include those wastes designated as extremely hazardous
by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW.

(6) "Fee"
means the annual hazardous waste fees imposed under RCW 70.95E.020 and
70.95E.030.

(7)
"Generate" means any act or process which produces hazardous waste or
first causes a hazardous waste to become subject to regulation.

(8) "Hazardous
substance" means any hazardous substance listed as a hazardous substance
as of March 21, 1990, pursuant to section 313 of Title III of the Superfund
Amendments and Reauthorization Act, any other substance determined by the
director by rule to present a threat to human health or the environment, and
all ozone depleting compounds as defined by the Montreal Protocol of October 1987.

(9)(a) "Hazardous
substance use reduction" means the reduction, avoidance, or elimination of
the use or production of hazardous substances without creating substantial new
risks to human health or the environment.

(b) "Hazardous
substance use reduction" includes proportionate changes in the usage of
hazardous substances as the usage of a hazardous substance or hazardous
substances changes as a result of production changes or other business changes.

(10) "Hazardous
substance user" means any facility required to report under section 313 of
Title III of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act, except for those
facilities which only distribute or use fertilizers or pesticides intended for
commercial agricultural applications.

(11) "Hazardous waste"
means and includes all dangerous and extremely hazardous wastes, but does not
include radioactive wastes or a substance composed of both radioactive and
hazardous components and does not include any hazardous waste generated as a
result of a remedial action under state or federal law.

(12) "Hazardous
waste generator" means any person generating hazardous waste regulated by
the department.

(13) "Office"
means the office of waste reduction.

(14) "Plan"
means the plan provided for in RCW 70.95C.200.

(15) "Person"
means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, partnership,
association, state, public or private or municipal corporation, commission,
political subdivision of a state, interstate body, the federal government,
including any agency or officer thereof, and any Indian tribe or authorized
tribal organization.

(16)
"Process" means all industrial, commercial, production, and other
processes that result in the generation of waste.

(17) "Recycled for
beneficial use" means the use of hazardous waste, either before or after
reclamation, as a substitute for a commercial product or raw material, but does
not include: (a) Use constituting disposal; (b) incineration; or (c) use as a
fuel.

(18)
"Recycling" means reusing waste materials and extracting valuable
materials from a waste stream. Recycling does not include burning for energy
recovery.

(19)
"Treatment" means the physical, chemical, or biological processing of
waste to render it completely innocuous, produce a recyclable by-product,
reduce toxicity, or substantially reduce the volume of material requiring
disposal as described in the priorities established in RCW 70.105.150.
Treatment does not include incineration.

(20) "Used oil"
means (a) lubricating fluids that have been removed from an engine crankcase,
transmission, gearbox, hydraulic device, or differential of an automobile, bus,
truck, vessel, plane, heavy equipment, or machinery powered by an internal
combustion engine; (b) any oil that has been refined from crude oil, used, and
as a result of use, has been contaminated with physical or chemical impurities;
and (c) any oil that has been refined from crude oil and, as a consequence of
extended storage, spillage, or contamination, is no longer useful to the
original purchaser. "Used oil" does not include used oil to which
hazardous wastes have been added.

(21) "Waste"
means any solid waste as defined under RCW 70.95.030, any hazardous waste, any
air contaminant as defined under RCW 70.94.030, and any organic or inorganic
matter that shall cause or tend to cause water pollution as defined under RCW
90.48.020.

(22) "Waste
generator" means any individual, business, government agency, or any other
organization that generates waste.

(23) "Waste
reduction" means all in-plant practices that reduce, avoid, or eliminate
the generation of wastes or the toxicity of wastes, prior to generation,
without creating substantial new risks to human health or the environment. As
used in RCW 70.95C.200 through 70.95C.240, "waste reduction" refers
to hazardous waste only.

Sec. 6. RCW 70.95E.010 and 1995
c 207 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Dangerous
waste" shall have the same definition as set forth in RCW 70.105.010(((5)))
and shall include those wastes designated as dangerous by rules adopted
pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW.

(2) "Department"
means the department of ecology.

(3) "EPA/state
identification number" means the number assigned by the EPA (environmental
protection agency) or by the department of ecology to each generator and/or
transporter and treatment, storage, and/or disposal facility.

(4) "Extremely
hazardous waste" shall have the same definition as set forth in RCW
70.105.010(((6))) and shall specifically include those wastes designated
as extremely hazardous by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW.

(5) "Fee"
means the annual fees imposed under this chapter.

(6)
"Generate" means any act or process which produces hazardous waste or
first causes a hazardous waste to become subject to regulation.

(7) "Hazardous
waste" means and includes all dangerous and extremely hazardous wastes but
for the purposes of this chapter excludes all radioactive wastes or substances
composed of both radioactive and hazardous components.

(8) "Hazardous
waste generator" means all persons whose primary business activities are
identified by the department to generate any quantity of hazardous waste in the
calendar year for which the fee is imposed.

(9) "Person"
means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, partnership,
association, state, public or private or municipal corporation, commission,
political subdivision of a state, interstate body, the federal government
including any agency or officer thereof, and any Indian tribe or authorized
tribal organization.

(10) "Price
deflator" means the United States department of commerce bureau of
economic analysis, "Implicit Price Deflator for Gross National
Product" for "Government Purchases of Goods and Services," for
"State and Local Government."

(11) "Recycled for
beneficial use" means the use of hazardous waste, either before or after
reclamation, as a substitute for a commercial product or raw material, but does
not include: (a) Use constituting disposal; (b) incineration; or (c) use as a
fuel.

(12) "Waste
generation site" means any geographical area that has been assigned an EPA/state
identification number.

Sec. 7. RCW 70.105.020 and 1994
c 264 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

The department after
notice and public hearing shall:

(1) Adopt regulations
designating as extremely hazardous wastes subject to the provisions of this
chapter those substances which exhibit characteristics consistent with the
definition provided in RCW 70.105.010(((6)));

(2) Adopt
and may revise when appropriate, minimum standards and regulations for disposal
of extremely hazardous wastes to protect against hazards to the public, and to
the environment. Before adoption of such standards and regulations, the
department shall consult with appropriate agencies of interested local
governments and secure technical assistance from the department of agriculture,
the department of social and health services, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, the department of labor and
industries, and the department of community, trade, and economic development,
through the director of fire protection.

Sec. 8. RCW 70.105D.020 and 1998
c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Agreed
order" means an order issued by the department under this chapter with
which the potentially liable person receiving the order agrees to comply. An
agreed order may be used to require or approve any cleanup or other remedial
actions but it is not a settlement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and shall not
contain a covenant not to sue, or provide protection from claims for
contribution, or provide eligibility for public funding of remedial actions
under RCW 70.105D.070(2)(d)(xi).

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3) "Director"
means the director of ecology or the director's designee.

(4)
"Facility" means (a) any building, structure, installation,
equipment, pipe or pipeline (including any pipe into a sewer or publicly owned
treatment works), well, pit, pond, lagoon, impoundment, ditch, landfill,
storage container, motor vehicle, rolling stock, vessel, or aircraft, or (b)
any site or area where a hazardous substance, other than a consumer product in
consumer use, has been deposited, stored, disposed of, or placed, or otherwise
come to be located.

(5) "Federal
cleanup law" means the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., as
amended by Public Law 99-499.

(6) "Foreclosure
and its equivalents" means purchase at a foreclosure sale, acquisition, or
assignment of title in lieu of foreclosure, termination of a lease, or other
repossession, acquisition of a right to title or possession, an agreement in
satisfaction of the obligation, or any other comparable formal or informal
manner, whether pursuant to law or under warranties, covenants, conditions,
representations, or promises from the borrower, by which the holder acquires
title to or possession of a facility securing a loan or other obligation.

(7) "Hazardous
substance" means:

(a) Any dangerous or
extremely hazardous waste as defined in RCW 70.105.010 (((5) and (6))),
or any dangerous or extremely dangerous waste designated by rule pursuant to
chapter 70.105 RCW;

(b) Any hazardous
substance as defined in RCW 70.105.010(((14))) or any hazardous
substance as defined by rule pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW;

(c) Any substance that,
on March 1, 1989, is a hazardous substance under section 101(14) of the federal
cleanup law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601(14);

(d) Petroleum or
petroleum products; and

(e) Any substance or
category of substances, including solid waste decomposition products,
determined by the director by rule to present a threat to human health or the
environment if released into the environment.

The term hazardous
substance does not include any of the following when contained in an
underground storage tank from which there is not a release: Crude oil or any
fraction thereof or petroleum, if the tank is in compliance with all applicable
federal, state, and local law.

(8) "Independent
remedial actions" means remedial actions conducted without department
oversight or approval, and not under an order, agreed order, or consent decree.

(9) "Holder"
means a person who holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect a security
interest. A holder includes the initial holder such as the loan originator,
any subsequent holder such as a successor-in-interest or subsequent purchaser
of the security interest on the secondary market, a guarantor of an obligation,
surety, or any other person who holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect
a security interest, or a receiver, court-appointed trustee, or other person
who acts on behalf or for the benefit of a holder. A holder can be a public or
privately owned financial institution, receiver, conservator, loan guarantor,
or other similar persons that loan money or guarantee repayment of a loan.
Holders typically are banks or savings and loan institutions but may also
include others such as insurance companies, pension funds, or private
individuals that engage in loaning of money or credit.

(10) "Indicia of
ownership" means evidence of a security interest, evidence of an interest
in a security interest, or evidence of an interest in a facility securing a
loan or other obligation, including any legal or equitable title to a facility
acquired incident to foreclosure and its equivalents. Evidence of such
interests includes, mortgages, deeds of trust, sellers interest in a real
estate contract, liens, surety bonds, and guarantees of obligations, title held
pursuant to a lease financing transaction in which the lessor does not select
initially the leased facility, or legal or equitable title obtained pursuant to
foreclosure and their equivalents. Evidence of such interests also includes
assignments, pledges, or other rights to or other forms of encumbrance against
the facility that are held primarily to protect a security interest.

(11) "Operating a
facility primarily to protect a security interest" occurs when all of the
following are met: (a) Operating the facility where the borrower has defaulted
on the loan or otherwise breached the security agreement; (b) operating the
facility to preserve the value of the facility as an ongoing business; (c) the
operation is being done in anticipation of a sale, transfer, or assignment of
the facility; and (d) the operation is being done primarily to protect a
security interest. Operating a facility for longer than one year prior to
foreclosure or its equivalents shall be presumed to be operating the facility
for other than to protect a security interest.

(12) "Owner or
operator" means:

(a) Any person with any
ownership interest in the facility or who exercises any control over the
facility; or

(b) In the case of an
abandoned facility, any person who had owned, or operated, or exercised control
over the facility any time before its abandonment;

The term does not
include:

(i) An agency of the
state or unit of local government which acquired ownership or control
involuntarily through bankruptcy, tax delinquency, abandonment, or
circumstances in which the government involuntarily acquires title. This
exclusion does not apply to an agency of the state or unit of local government
which has caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of a
hazardous substance from the facility;

(ii) A person who,
without participating in the management of a facility, holds indicia of
ownership primarily to protect the person's security interest in the facility.
Holders after foreclosure and its equivalent and holders who engage in any of
the activities identified in subsection (13)(e) through (g) of this section
shall not lose this exemption provided the holder complies with all of the
following:

(A) The holder properly
maintains the environmental compliance measures already in place at the
facility;

(B) The holder complies
with the reporting requirements in the rules adopted under this chapter;

(C) The holder complies
with any order issued to the holder by the department to abate an imminent or
substantial endangerment;

(D) The holder allows
the department or potentially liable persons under an order, agreed order, or
settlement agreement under this chapter access to the facility to conduct
remedial actions and does not impede the conduct of such remedial actions;

(E) Any remedial
actions conducted by the holder are in compliance with any preexisting
requirements identified by the department, or, if the department has not
identified such requirements for the facility, the remedial actions are
conducted consistent with the rules adopted under this chapter; and

(F) The holder does not
exacerbate an existing release. The exemption in this subsection (12)(b)(ii)
does not apply to holders who cause or contribute to a new release or threatened
release or who are otherwise liable under RCW 70.105D.040(1) (b), (c), (d), and
(e); provided, however, that a holder shall not lose this exemption if it
establishes that any such new release has been remediated according to the
requirements of this chapter and that any hazardous substances remaining at the
facility after remediation of the new release are divisible from such new
release;

(iii) A fiduciary in
his, her, or its personal or individual capacity. This exemption does not
preclude a claim against the assets of the estate or trust administered by the
fiduciary or against a nonemployee agent or independent contractor retained by
a fiduciary. This exemption also does not apply to the extent that a person is
liable under this chapter independently of the person's ownership as a
fiduciary or for actions taken in a fiduciary capacity which cause or
contribute to a new release or exacerbate an existing release of hazardous
substances. This exemption applies provided that, to the extent of the
fiduciary's powers granted by law or by the applicable governing instrument
granting fiduciary powers, the fiduciary complies with all of the following:

(A) The fiduciary
properly maintains the environmental compliance measures already in place at
the facility;

(B) The fiduciary
complies with the reporting requirements in the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(C) The fiduciary
complies with any order issued to the fiduciary by the department to abate an
imminent or substantial endangerment;

(D) The fiduciary
allows the department or potentially liable persons under an order, agreed
order, or settlement agreement under this chapter access to the facility to
conduct remedial actions and does not impede the conduct of such remedial
actions;

(E) Any remedial
actions conducted by the fiduciary are in compliance with any preexisting
requirements identified by the department, or, if the department has not
identified such requirements for the facility, the remedial actions are
conducted consistent with the rules adopted under this chapter; and

(F) The fiduciary does
not exacerbate an existing release.

The exemption in this
subsection (12)(b)(iii) does not apply to fiduciaries who cause or contribute
to a new release or threatened release or who are otherwise liable under RCW
70.105D.040(1) (b), (c), (d), and (e); provided however, that a fiduciary shall
not lose this exemption if it establishes that any such new release has been
remediated according to the requirements of this chapter and that any hazardous
substances remaining at the facility after remediation of the new release are
divisible from such new release. The exemption in this subsection (12)(b)(iii)
also does not apply where the fiduciary's powers to comply with this subsection
(12)(b)(iii) are limited by a governing instrument created with the objective
purpose of avoiding liability under this chapter or of avoiding compliance with
this chapter; or

(iv) Any person who has
any ownership interest in, operates, or exercises control over real property
where a hazardous substance has come to be located solely as a result of
migration of the hazardous substance to the real property through the ground
water from a source off the property, if:

(A) The person can
demonstrate that the hazardous substance has not been used, placed, managed, or
otherwise handled on the property in a manner likely to cause or contribute to
a release of the hazardous substance that has migrated onto the property;

(B) The person has not
caused or contributed to the release of the hazardous substance;

(C) The person does not
engage in activities that damage or interfere with the operation of remedial
actions installed on the person's property or engage in activities that result
in exposure of humans or the environment to the contaminated ground water that
has migrated onto the property;

(D) If requested, the
person allows the department, potentially liable persons who are subject to an
order, agreed order, or consent decree, and the authorized employees, agents,
or contractors of each, access to the property to conduct remedial actions
required by the department. The person may attempt to negotiate an access
agreement before allowing access; and

(E) Legal withdrawal of
ground water does not disqualify a person from the exemption in this subsection
(12)(b)(iv).

(13)
"Participation in management" means exercising decision-making
control over the borrower's operation of the facility, environmental
compliance, or assuming or manifesting responsibility for the overall
management of the enterprise encompassing the day-to-day decision making of the
enterprise.

The term does not
include any of the following: (a) A holder with the mere capacity or ability
to influence, or the unexercised right to control facility operations; (b) a
holder who conducts or requires a borrower to conduct an environmental audit or
an environmental site assessment at the facility for which indicia of ownership
is held; (c) a holder who requires a borrower to come into compliance with any
applicable laws or regulations at the facility for which indicia of ownership
is held; (d) a holder who requires a borrower to conduct remedial actions
including setting minimum requirements, but does not otherwise control or
manage the borrower's remedial actions or the scope of the borrower's remedial
actions except to prepare a facility for sale, transfer, or assignment; (e) a
holder who engages in workout or policing activities primarily to protect the
holder's security interest in the facility; (f) a holder who prepares a
facility for sale, transfer, or assignment or requires a borrower to prepare a
facility for sale, transfer, or assignment; (g) a holder who operates a facility
primarily to protect a security interest, or requires a borrower to continue to
operate, a facility primarily to protect a security interest; and (h) a
prospective holder who, as a condition of becoming a holder, requires an owner
or operator to conduct an environmental audit, conduct an environmental site
assessment, come into compliance with any applicable laws or regulations, or
conduct remedial actions prior to holding a security interest is not
participating in the management of the facility.

(14) "Person"
means an individual, firm, corporation, association, partnership, consortium,
joint venture, commercial entity, state government agency, unit of local
government, federal government agency, or Indian tribe.

(15) "Policing
activities" means actions the holder takes to insure that the borrower
complies with the terms of the loan or security interest or actions the holder
takes or requires the borrower to take to maintain the value of the security.
Policing activities include: Requiring the borrower to conduct remedial
actions at the facility during the term of the security interest; requiring the
borrower to comply or come into compliance with applicable federal, state, and
local environmental and other laws, regulations, and permits during the term of
the security interest; securing or exercising authority to monitor or inspect
the facility including on-site inspections, or to monitor or inspect the
borrower's business or financial condition during the term of the security
interest; or taking other actions necessary to adequately police the loan or
security interest such as requiring a borrower to comply with any warranties,
covenants, conditions, representations, or promises from the borrower.

(16) "Potentially
liable person" means any person whom the department finds, based on
credible evidence, to be liable under RCW 70.105D.040. The department shall
give notice to any such person and allow an opportunity for comment before
making the finding, unless an emergency requires otherwise.

(17) "Prepare a
facility for sale, transfer, or assignment" means to secure access to the
facility; perform routine maintenance on the facility; remove inventory,
equipment, or structures; properly maintain environmental compliance measures
already in place at the facility; conduct remedial actions to clean up releases
at the facility; or to perform other similar activities intended to preserve
the value of the facility where the borrower has defaulted on the loan or
otherwise breached the security agreement or after foreclosure and its
equivalents and in anticipation of a pending sale, transfer, or assignment,
primarily to protect the holder's security interest in the facility. A holder
can prepare a facility for sale, transfer, or assignment for up to one year prior
to foreclosure and its equivalents and still stay within the security interest
exemption in subsection (12)(b)(ii) of this section.

(18) "Primarily to
protect a security interest" means the indicia of ownership is held
primarily for the purpose of securing payment or performance of an obligation.
The term does not include indicia of ownership held primarily for investment
purposes nor indicia of ownership held primarily for purposes other than as
protection for a security interest. A holder may have other, secondary
reasons, for maintaining indicia of ownership, but the primary reason must be
for protection of a security interest. Holding indicia of ownership after
foreclosure or its equivalents for longer than five years shall be considered
to be holding the indicia of ownership for purposes other than primarily to
protect a security interest. For facilities that have been acquired through
foreclosure or its equivalents prior to July 23, 1995, this five-year period
shall begin as of July 23, 1995.

(19) "Public
notice" means, at a minimum, adequate notice mailed to all persons who
have made timely request of the department and to persons residing in the
potentially affected vicinity of the proposed action; mailed to appropriate
news media; published in the newspaper of largest circulation in the city or
county of the proposed action; and opportunity for interested persons to
comment.

(20)
"Release" means any intentional or unintentional entry of any
hazardous substance into the environment, including but not limited to the
abandonment or disposal of containers of hazardous substances.

(21) "Remedy"
or "remedial action" means any action or expenditure consistent with
the purposes of this chapter to identify, eliminate, or minimize any threat or
potential threat posed by hazardous substances to human health or the
environment including any investigative and monitoring activities with respect
to any release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and any health
assessments or health effects studies conducted in order to determine the risk
or potential risk to human health.

(22) "Security
interest" means an interest in a facility created or established for the
purpose of securing a loan or other obligation. Security interests include
deeds of trusts, sellers interest in a real estate contract, liens, legal, or
equitable title to a facility acquired incident to foreclosure and its
equivalents, and title pursuant to lease financing transactions. Security
interests may also arise from transactions such as sale and leasebacks,
conditional sales, installment sales, trust receipt transactions, certain
assignments, factoring agreements, accounts receivable financing arrangements,
easements, and consignments, if the transaction creates or establishes an interest
in a facility for the purpose of securing a loan or other obligation.

(23) "Industrial
properties" means properties that are or have been characterized by, or
are to be committed to, traditional industrial uses such as processing or
manufacturing of materials, marine terminal and transportation areas and
facilities, fabrication, assembly, treatment, or distribution of manufactured
products, or storage of bulk materials, that are either:

(a) Zoned for
industrial use by a city or county conducting land use planning under chapter
36.70A RCW; or

(b) For counties not
planning under chapter 36.70A RCW and the cities within them, zoned for
industrial use and adjacent to properties currently used or designated for
industrial purposes.

(24) "Workout
activities" means those actions by which a holder, at any time prior to
foreclosure and its equivalents, seeks to prevent, cure, or mitigate a default
by the borrower or obligor; or to preserve, or prevent the diminution of, the
value of the security. Workout activities include: Restructuring or
renegotiating the terms of the security interest; requiring payment of
additional rent or interest; exercising forbearance; requiring or exercising
rights pursuant to an assignment of accounts or other amounts owed to an obligor;
requiring or exercising rights pursuant to an escrow agreement pertaining to
amounts owed to an obligor; providing specific or general financial or other
advice, suggestions, counseling, or guidance; and exercising any right or
remedy the holder is entitled to by law or under any warranties, covenants,
conditions, representations, or promises from the borrower.

(25)(a)
"Fiduciary" means a person acting for the benefit of another party as
a bona fide trustee; executor; administrator; custodian; guardian of estates or
guardian ad litem; receiver; conservator; committee of estates of incapacitated
persons; trustee in bankruptcy; trustee, under an indenture agreement, trust
agreement, lease, or similar financing agreement, for debt securities, certificates
of interest or certificates of participation in debt securities, or other forms
of indebtedness as to which the trustee is not, in the capacity of trustee, the
lender. Except as provided in subsection (12)(b)(iii) of this section, the
liability of a fiduciary under this chapter shall not exceed the assets held in
the fiduciary capacity.

(b)
"Fiduciary" does not mean:

(i) A person acting as
a fiduciary with respect to a trust or other fiduciary estate that was
organized for the primary purpose of, or is engaged in, actively carrying on a
trade or business for profit, unless the trust or other fiduciary estate was
created as part of, or to facilitate, one or more estate plans or because of
the incapacity of a natural person;

(ii) A person who
acquires ownership or control of a facility with the objective purpose of
avoiding liability of the person or any other person. It is prima facie
evidence that the fiduciary acquired ownership or control of the facility to
avoid liability if the facility is the only substantial asset in the fiduciary
estate at the time the facility became subject to the fiduciary estate;

(iii) A person who acts
in a capacity other than that of a fiduciary or in a beneficiary capacity and
in that capacity directly or indirectly benefits from a trust or fiduciary
relationship;

(iv) A person who is a
beneficiary and fiduciary with respect to the same fiduciary estate, and who
while acting as a fiduciary receives benefits that exceed customary or
reasonable compensation, and incidental benefits permitted under applicable
law;

(v) A person who is a
fiduciary and receives benefits that substantially exceed customary or
reasonable compensation, and incidental benefits permitted under applicable
law; or

(vi) A person who acts
in the capacity of trustee of state or federal lands or resources.

(26) "Fiduciary
capacity" means the capacity of a person holding title to a facility, or
otherwise having control of an interest in the facility pursuant to the
exercise of the responsibilities of the person as a fiduciary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) Section 3 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2003.

(2) Section 4 of this
act takes effect September 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The department of ecology
shall adopt all rules necessary to implement this act by June 30, 2002.

---
END ---