BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature that all waters of the state meet water quality standards, that the
public enjoy the full range of beneficial uses of state waters, and that water
quality standards are enforced. It is the further intent of the legislature
that sacrificing areas of the state for diluting pollution is unacceptable for
long-lasting pollutants that are particularly harmful to wildlife and people,
especially children, because of the pollutants' propensity to build up in the
food chain and in breastmilk. The legislature recognizes that the department
of ecology has initiated a strategy to eliminate discharges of these persistent
bioaccumulative toxics and that prohibiting mixing zones for these toxic
pollutants is an important step toward eliminating discharges.

Sec. 2. RCW 90.48.010 and 1973 c
155 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It is declared to be
the public policy of the state of Washington to maintain the highest possible
standards to insure the purity of all waters of the state consistent with
public health and public enjoyment thereof, the propagation and protection of
wild life, birds, game, fish and other aquatic life, and the industrial
development of the state, and to that end require the use of all known
available and reasonable methods by industries and others to prevent and
control the pollution of the waters of the state of Washington. Consistent
with this policy, the state of Washington will exercise its powers, as fully
and as effectively as possible, to retain and secure high quality for all
waters of the state. At a minimum, the state of Washington shall exercise
its powers to ensure that water quality standards are met in all waters of the
state, including waters at or near outfalls permitted under the national
pollutant discharge elimination system. The state shall prevent exceedances of
water quality standards for persistent bioaccumulative toxics, including
exceedances in mixing zones.

The state of Washington
in recognition of the federal government's interest in the quality of the
navigable waters of the United States, of which certain portions thereof are
within the jurisdictional limits of this state, proclaims a public policy of
working cooperatively with the federal government in a joint effort to
extinguish the sources of water quality degradation, while at the same time
preserving and vigorously exercising state powers to insure that present and
future standards of water quality within the state shall be determined by the
citizenry, through and by the efforts of state government, of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.48.020 and 1995 c
255 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((Whenever the word))
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Aquatic
noxious weed" has the meaning prescribed under RCW 17.26.020.

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3)
"Director" means the director of ecology.

(4) "Mixing
zone" means an area in a waterbody which is around or beyond an outfall
permitted under the national pollutant discharge elimination system in which
concentrations of a particular pollutant mix with receiving waters.

(5) "Persistent
bioaccumulative toxics" means the following chemicals and compounds:

(a) Aldrin;

(b) Anthracene;

(c) Benzo(a)pyrene;

(d)
Benzo(ghi)perylene;

(e)
Benz(a)anthracene;

(f) Cadmium and
compounds;

(g) Chlordane;

(h) DDT (DDD, DDE);

(i)
1,4-dichlorobenzene;

(j)
3,3'-dichlorobenzidine;

(k) Dieldrin;

(l) Endosulfan,
including isomers and sulphate;

(m) Endrin;

(n) Heptachlor;

(o)
Hexachlorobenzene;

(p)
A-1,2,3,4,5,6-hexachlorocychlohexene;

(q)
G-1,2,3,4,5,6-hexachlorocychlohexene or Lindane;

(r) Mercury and
compounds;

(s) Mirex;

(t)
Pentachlorophenol;

(u) Perylene;

(v) Phenanthrene;

(w) Polychlorinated
biphenyls;

(x) Polychlorinated
dibenzo-p-dioxins and furans;

(y) Toxaphene;

(z) Tributyl tin;

(aa) Trifluralin;

(bb) Lead.

It shall also
include other chemicals and compounds as adopted by rule.

(6) "Person"
((is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to include)) means
any political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, public or
private corporation, copartnership, association, firm, individual, or
any other entity whatsoever.

((Wherever the words))
(7) "Pollution" means such contamination, or other alteration of
the physical, chemical, or biological properties, of any waters of the state,
including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or odor of the
waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other
substance into any waters of the state as will or is likely to create a
nuisance or render such waters harmful, detrimental, or injurious to the public
health, safety, or welfare, or to domestic, commercial, industrial,
agricultural, recreational, or other legitimate beneficial uses, or to
livestock, wild animals, birds, fish, or other aquatic life.

(8) "Waters
of the state" ((shall be used in this chapter, they shall be construed
to include)) means lakes, rivers, ponds, streams, inland waters,
underground waters, salt waters, and all other surface waters and
watercourses within the jurisdiction of the state of Washington.

((Whenever the word
"pollution" is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to mean
such contamination, or other alteration of the physical, chemical or biological
properties, of any waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste,
color, turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid,
gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as
will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental or injurious to the public health, safety or welfare, or to
domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other
legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish or other
aquatic life.

Wherever the word
"department" is used in this chapter it shall mean the department of
ecology.

Whenever the word
"director" is used in this chapter it shall mean the director of
ecology.

Whenever the words
"aquatic noxious weed" are used in this chapter, they have the
meaning prescribed under RCW 17.26.020.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
ecology shall adopt by rule criteria for designating chemicals and compounds as
persistent bioaccumulative toxics.

Sec. 5. RCW 90.48.080 and 1987 c
109 s 126 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall
be unlawful for any person to throw, drain, run, or otherwise discharge into
any of the waters of this state, or to cause, permit, or suffer to be
thrown, run, drained, allowed to seep, or otherwise discharged into such
waters any organic or inorganic matter that shall cause or tend to cause
pollution of such waters according to the determination of the department, as
provided for in this chapter. Mixing zones for persistent bioaccumulative
toxic pollutants are prohibited.

---
END ---