BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
that insurers or educational, religious, charitable, or scientific institutions
that conduct charitable gift annuity businesses serve a valuable public
purpose. The legislature intends to inform and protect the public and the institutions
that benefit from the issuance of charitable gift annuity contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.38 RCW to read as follows:

Any insurer or
educational, religious, charitable, or scientific institution in receipt of a
certificate of exemption under this chapter must inform the transferor and the
transferor's nominee, in writing, of the existence or nonexistence of a
charitable gift annuity business guaranty fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The insurance
commissioner shall prepare and submit to the legislature no later than December
1, 2001, proposed legislation creating a charitable gift annuity business
guaranty association.

---
END ---