BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. In 1998, the legislature
authorized development of remote site incubators to reestablish wild salmon and
trout populations to self-sustaining status through natural spawning. Remote
site incubators were placed in tributaries to assist in the reestablishing of
endangered species act listed chinook salmon in the Nooksack river, chum salmon
in Hood Canal and the Columbia river, and coho in the north Puget Sound. The
first return from these remote site incubator-assisted chum and chinook salmon
will be in 2001, and it is the intent of the legislature to provide assistance
in the monitoring of the returns to determine remote site incubators'
cost-effectiveness for supplementation of fish populations, and to continue the
remote site incubator program as a component of wild salmon recovery.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.95.200 and 1998 c
251 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall develop and implement a program utilizing remote site incubators in
Washington state. The program shall identify sites in tributaries that are
suitable for reestablishing self-sustaining, locally adapted populations of
coho, chum, or chinook salmon. ((The initial selection of sites shall be
completed by July 1, 1999, and updated annually thereafter.))

(2) The department may
only approve a remote site incubator project if the department deems it is
consistent with the conservation of wild salmon and trout. The department
shall only utilize appropriate salmonid eggs in remote site incubators, and may
acquire eggs by gift or purchase.

(3) The department
shall depend chiefly upon volunteer efforts to implement the remote site
incubator program through volunteer cooperative projects and the regional
fisheries enhancement groups. The department may prioritize remote site
incubator projects within regional enhancement areas.

(4) The department may
purchase remote site incubators and may use agency employees to construct
remote site incubators. The ((director and the secretary of the))
department ((of corrections)) shall ((jointly investigate the
potential of producing remote site incubators through the prison industries
program of the department of corrections, and shall jointly)) annually
evaluate the results of the program and report ((their finding)) to
the natural resources committees of the house of representatives and the senate
by December ((1, 1999)) 1st of each year. The fish and wildlife
commission must be provided with annual reports on the progress of the program.

(5) The department
shall investigate the use of the remote site incubator technology for the
production of warm water fish.

(((6) The department
shall evaluate the initial results of the program and report to the legislature
by December 1, 2000. Annual reports on the progress of the program shall be
provided to the fish and wildlife commission.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 77.95 RCW to read as follows:

The remote site
incubator account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from appropriations must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for remote site incubator projects. Only the
director of fish and wildlife or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The sum of two
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund
to the department of fish and wildlife for deposit in the remote site incubator
account created in section 3 of this act.

(2) The sum of two
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund
to the department of fish and wildlife for deposit in the remote site incubator
account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---