BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 47.17.735 and 1994 c
209 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

A state highway to be
known as state route number 525 is established as follows:

Beginning at a junction
with state route number 5 in the vicinity south of Everett, thence
northwesterly to the state ferry terminal at Mukilteo; also

From the junction
with state route number 526 at Mukilteo, thence southerly to a junction with
state route number 525; also

From the state ferry
terminal at Mukilteo via the state ferry system northerly to the state ferry
terminal at Clinton; also

From the
state ferry terminal at Clinton, thence northwesterly to a junction with state
route number 20 in the vicinity east of Keystone.

--- END ---