BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.14A.050 and 2000
c 232 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall:

(1)(a) Consult with
relevant qualified professionals to develop a set of minimum guidelines to be
used for identifying all children who are in a state-assisted support system,
whether at-home or out-of-home, who are likely to need long-term care or
assistance, because they face physical, emotional, medical, mental, or other
long-term challenges;

(b) The guidelines
must, at a minimum, consider the following criteria for identifying children in
need of long-term care or assistance:

(i) Placement within
the foster care system for two years or more;

(ii) Multiple foster
care placements;

(iii) Repeated
unsuccessful efforts to be placed with a permanent adoptive family;

(iv) Chronic behavioral
or educational problems;

(v) Repetitive criminal
acts or offenses;

(vi) Failure to comply
with court-ordered disciplinary actions and other imposed guidelines of
behavior, including drug and alcohol rehabilitation; and

(vii) Chronic physical,
emotional, medical, mental, or other similar conditions necessitating long-term
care or assistance;

(2) Develop programs
that are necessary for the long-term care of children and youth that are
identified for the purposes of this section. Programs must: (a) Effectively
address the educational, physical, emotional, mental, and medical needs of
children and youth; and (b) incorporate an array of family support options, to
individual needs and choices of the child and family. The programs must be
ready for implementation by January 1, 1995;

(3) Conduct an
evaluation of all children currently within the foster care agency caseload to
identify those children who meet the criteria set forth in this section. ((The
evaluation shall be completed by January 1, 1994.)) All children entering
the foster care system ((after January 1, 1994,)) must be evaluated for
identification of long-term needs within thirty days of placement;

(4) As a result of
the passage of chapter 232, Laws of 2000, the department is conducting a pilot
project to do a comparative analysis of a variety of assessment instruments to
determine the most effective tools and methods for evaluation of children. The
pilot project may extend through August 31, 2001. The department shall report
to the appropriate committees in the senate and house of representatives by
September 30, 2001, on the results of the pilot project. The department shall
select an assessment instrument that can be implemented within available
resources. The department shall complete statewide implementation by December
31, 2001. The department shall report to the appropriate committees in the
senate and house of representatives on how the use of the selected assessment
instrument has affected department policies, by no later than December 31,
2002, December 31, 2004, and December 31, 2006;

(5) By region,
report to the legislature on the following using aggregate data every six
months beginning December 31, 2000:

(a) The number of
children evaluated during the first thirty days of placement as required in
subsection (3) of this section;

(b) The tool or tools
used to evaluate children, including the content of the tool and the method by
which the tool was validated;

(c) The findings from
the evaluation regarding the children's needs;

(d) How the department
used the results of the evaluation to provide services to the foster child to
meet his or her needs; and

(e) Whether and how the
evaluation results assisted the department in providing appropriate services to
the child, matching the child with an appropriate care provider early on in the
child's placement and achieving the child's permanency plan in a timely
fashion((.));

(((5))) (6)
Each region of the department shall make the appropriate number of referrals to
the foster care assessment program to ensure that the services offered by the
program are used to the extent funded pursuant to the department's contract
with the program. The department shall report to the legislature by November
30, 2000, on the number of referrals, by region, to the foster care assessment
program. If the regions are not referring an adequate number of cases to the
program, the department shall include in its report an explanation of what
action it is or has taken to ensure that the referrals are adequate((.));

(((6))) (7)
The department shall report to the legislature by December 15, 2000, on how it
will use the foster care assessment program model to assess children as they
enter out-of-home care((.));

(((7))) (8)
The department is to accomplish the tasks listed in subsections (4) through (((6)))
(7) of this section within existing resources((.));

(((8))) (9)
Study and develop a comprehensive plan for the evaluation and identification of
all children and youth in need of long-term care or assistance, including, but
not limited to, the mentally ill, developmentally disabled, medically fragile,
seriously emotionally or behaviorally disabled, and physically impaired;

(((9))) (10)
Study and develop a plan for the children and youth in need of long-term care
or assistance to ensure the coordination of services between the department's
divisions and between other state agencies who are involved with the child or
youth;

(((10))) (11)
Study and develop guidelines for transitional services, between long-term care
programs, based on the person's age or mental, physical, emotional, or medical
condition; and

(((11)))
(12) Study and develop a statutory proposal for the emancipation of
minors.

--- END ---