BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The department of social
and health services serves parents and children with multiple needs, which
cannot be resolved in isolation. Further, the complexity of service delivery
systems is a barrier for families in crisis when a child is removed or a parent
is removed from the home. The department must undertake efforts to streamline
the delivery of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

The department of
social and health services shall develop methods for coordination of services
to parents and children in child dependency cases. To the maximum extent
possible under current funding levels, the department must:

(1) Coordinate and
integrate services to children and families, using service plans and activities
that address the children's and families' multiple needs. Assessment criteria
should screen for multiple needs;

(2) Develop treatment
plans for the individual needs of the client in a manner that minimizes the number
of contacts the client is required to make; and

(3) Access training for
department staff to increase skills across disciplines to assess needs for
mental health, substance abuse, developmental disabilities, and other areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The department of social
and health services shall report to the legislature regarding its methods for
coordination of services under the provisions of this act. The department must
provide the report to the legislature with the reports required under kidscreen
in RCW 74.14A.050(4).

---
END ---