BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.70A.020 and 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following goals are
adopted to guide the development and adoption of comprehensive plans and
development regulations of those counties and cities that are required or
choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in
order of priority and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:

(1) Urban growth.
Encourage development in urban areas where adequate public facilities and
services exist or can be provided in an efficient manner.

(2) Reduce sprawl.
Reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low-density development.

(3) Transportation.
Encourage efficient multimodal transportation systems that are based on
regional priorities and coordinated with county and city comprehensive plans.

(4) Housing. Encourage
the availability of affordable housing to all economic segments of the
population of this state, promote a variety of residential densities and
housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing stock.

(5) Economic
development. Encourage economic development throughout the state that is
consistent with adopted comprehensive plans, promote economic opportunity for
all citizens of this state, especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged
persons, promote the retention and/or expansion of existing businesses,
recognize regional differences impacting economic development opportunities,
and encourage growth in areas experiencing insufficient economic growth, all
within the capacities of the state's natural resources, public services, and
public facilities.

(6) Property rights.
Private property shall not be taken for public use without just compensation
having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be protected from
arbitrary and discriminatory actions.

(7) Permits. Applications
for both state and local government permits should be processed in a timely and
fair manner to ensure predictability.

(8) Natural resource
industries. Maintain and enhance natural resource-based industries, including
productive timber, agricultural, and fisheries industries. Encourage the
conservation of productive forest lands and productive agricultural lands, and
discourage incompatible uses.

(9) Open space and
recreation. Encourage the retention of open space and development of
recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat, increase access
to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks.

(10) Environment.
Protect the environment and enhance the state's high quality of life, including
air and water quality, and the availability of water.

(11) Citizen
participation and coordination. Encourage the involvement of citizens in the
planning process and ensure coordination between communities and jurisdictions
to reconcile conflicts.

(12) Public facilities
and services. Ensure that those public facilities and services necessary to
support development shall be adequate to serve the development at the time the
development is available for occupancy and use without decreasing current
service levels below locally established minimum standards.

(13) Historic
preservation. Identify and encourage the preservation of lands, sites, and
structures, that have historical or archaeological significance.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997
c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Adopt a
comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use
plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.

(2) "Agricultural
land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal
products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not
subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish
in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.

(3) "City"
means any city or town, including a code city.

(4) "Comprehensive
land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means
a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a
county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5) "Critical
areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b)
areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c)
fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and
(e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7) "Development
regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on
development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not
limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master
programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision
ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments
thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a
project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the
decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body
of the county or city.

(8) "Forest
land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term
commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically
managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise
tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term
commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is primarily
devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land
that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the
following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9) "Geologically
hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to
erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the
siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with
public health or safety concerns.

(10) "Land
suitable for development" means all vacant, partially used, and
underutilized parcels that are: (a) Designated for commercial, industrial, or
residential use; (b) not intended for public use; and (c) not constrained by
critical areas in a way that limits development potential and makes new
construction on a parcel unfeasible.

(11)
"Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity,
productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial
production, in consideration with the land's proximity to population areas,
and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(((11))) (12)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(((12))) (13)
"Performance measures" required under RCW 36.70A.210(3) means an
indicator providing consistent and reliable information over time to help gauge
how a jurisdiction is achieving specified performance results.
"Indicator" means a quantifiable measurement or index.

(14)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(((13))) (15)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection,
and other governmental services.

(((14))) (16)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a) In which open
space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built
environment;

(b) That foster
traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both
live and work in rural areas;

(c) That provide visual
landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;

(d) That are compatible
with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;

(e) That reduce the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low‑density
development;

(f) That generally do
not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g) That are consistent
with the protection of natural surface water flows and ground water and surface
water recharge and discharge areas.

(((15))) (17)
"Rural counties" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.14.370(5).

(18) "Rural
development" refers to development outside the urban growth area and
outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses and
residential densities, including clustered residential development, at levels
that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(((16))) (19)
"Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services, transportation and
public transit services, and other public utilities associated with rural
development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(((17))) (20)
"Small-scale business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that is owned
and operated independently from all other businesses, and that is of a size and
scale that is: (a) Compatible with adjacent land uses and existing or planned
infrastructure; and (b) if in a rural area, is consistent with the rural
character of the area as defined by the local government according to RCW
36.70A.030(16); or (c) if outside a rural area, is consistent with the
neighborhood character, as may be established by the local government in which
it is located.

(21) "Urban
growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location
of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a degree as to be
incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other
agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural
uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW
36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over wide areas,
urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18))) (22)
"Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19))) (23)
"Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and
typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer
systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police
protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(((20))) (24)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.070 and 1998
c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive plan
of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text covering objectives,
principles, and standards used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan
shall be an internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted and
amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.

Each comprehensive plan
shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the following:

(1) A land use element
designating the proposed general distribution and general location and extent
of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture, timber production,
housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation
airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land
use element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall provide for
protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used for public water
supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage,
flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and
provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges
that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or waters entering
Puget Sound.

(2) A housing element
ensuring the vitality and character of established residential neighborhoods
that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of existing and projected housing
needs that identifies the number of housing units necessary to accommodate
projected growth; (b) includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives,
and mandatory provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient land for
housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted housing, housing
for low-income families, manufactured housing, multifamily housing, and group
homes and foster care facilities; and (d) makes adequate provisions for
existing and projected needs of all economic segments of the community.

(3) A capital
facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing capital
facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and capacities of
the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for such capital
facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new
capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies sources
of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess the land
use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs and to
ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and
financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and
consistent.

(4) A utilities element
consisting of the general location, proposed location, and capacity of all
existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to, electrical
lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5) Rural element.
Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are not designated
for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources. The following
provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a) Growth management
act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances vary from county to
county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and uses, a county may
consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written record explaining how
the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.

(b) Rural development.
The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry, and agriculture in
rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety of rural densities,
uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to
serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve a variety of rural
densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer,
design guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques that
will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural character.

(c) Measures governing
rural development. The rural element shall include measures that apply to
rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as established
by the county, by:

(i) Containing or
otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii) Assuring visual
compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural area;

(iii) Reducing the
inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density
development in the rural area;

(iv) Protecting
critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and ground
water resources; and

(v) Protecting against
conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d) Limited areas of
more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements of this
subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this subsection
(5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more intensive rural
development, including necessary public facilities and public services to serve
the limited area as follows:

(i) Rural development
consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of existing commercial,
industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline
development, villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use area shall be
subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but shall not be
subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection. An
industrial area is not required to be principally designed to serve the
existing and projected rural population;

(ii) The
intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to serve
those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and setting,
but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale recreation
or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve the existing
and projected rural population. Public services and public facilities shall be
limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist use and shall be
provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(iii) The
intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential uses
or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion
of small-scale businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with
the rural character of the area, as defined by the local government according
to RCW 36.70A.030(16). Rural counties may also allow new small-scale
businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an existing business as
long as the new small-scale business conforms to the rural character of the
area as defined by the local government according to RCW 36.70A.030(16).
Public services and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to
serve the isolated nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that
does not permit low-density sprawl;

(iv) A county shall
adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or uses of more
intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this subsection.
Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the
logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new
pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v) For purposes of (d)
of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one that was in
existence:

(A) On July 1, 1990, in
a county that was initially required to plan under all of the provisions of
this chapter;

(B) On the date the
county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a county that is
planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2);
or

(C) On the date the
office of financial management certifies the county's population as provided in
RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions of
this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e) Exception. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural area a major
industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise specifically
permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6) A transportation
element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use element.

(a) The transportation
element shall include the following subelements:

(i) Land use
assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii) Estimated traffic
impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting from land use
assumptions to assist the department of transportation in monitoring the
performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the facilities, and
to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation
facilities;

(iii) Facilities and
services needs, including:

(A) An inventory of air,
water, and ground transportation facilities and services, including transit
alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital
facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory
must include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or county's
jurisdiction boundaries;

(B) Level of service
standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes to serve as a
gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should be regionally
coordinated;

(C) For state-owned
transportation facilities, level of service standards for highways, as
prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the performance of the
system. The purposes of reflecting level of service standards for state
highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the
system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination
between the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the department of transportation's six-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except for
counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state
highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry
route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b)
of this subsection;

(D) Specific actions
and requirements for bringing into compliance locally owned transportation
facilities or services that are below an established level of service standard;

(E) Forecasts of
traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan to provide
information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future growth;

(F) Identification of
state and local system needs to meet current and future demands. Identified
needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be consistent with the
statewide multimodal transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv) Finance,
including:

(A) An analysis of
funding capability to judge needs against probable funding resources;

(B) A multiyear
financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive plan, the
appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year street,
road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems. The
multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year improvement
program developed by the department of transportation as required by RCW
47.05.030;

(C) If probable funding
falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of how additional funding
will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that
level of service standards will be met;

(v) Intergovernmental
coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts of the
transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation systems of
adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi) Demand-management
strategies.

(b) After adoption of
the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or who choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances
which prohibit development approval if the development causes the level of
service on a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the
standards adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan,
unless transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies may
include increased public transportation service, ride sharing programs, demand
management, and other transportation systems management strategies. For the
purposes of this subsection (6) "concurrent with the development"
shall mean that improvements or strategies are in place at the time of
development, or that a financial commitment is in place to complete the
improvements or strategies within six years.

(c) The transportation
element described in this subsection (6), and the six-year plans required by
RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW 35.58.2795 for public
transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state, must be consistent.

(7) An economic
development element establishing local goals, policies, objectives, and
provisions for economic growth, vitality, and quality of life. The element
shall include: (a) An assessment of the economic contributions made by
existing commercial and industrial sectors to the community or region; (b) an
assessment of opportunities for business retention, expansion, recruitment, and
economic benefits of natural amenities; (c) an assessment of future needs,
including capital facilities, land use, and housing, infrastructure, and
workforce training to manage projected growth and foster economic vitality; and
(d) an evaluation of economic impacts from new and existing businesses to
determine effects on job retention, expansion, and enhancement opportunities.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.70A.210 and 1998
c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature
recognizes that counties are regional governments within their boundaries, and
cities are primary providers of urban governmental services within urban growth
areas. For the purposes of this section, a "countywide planning
policy" is a written policy statement or statements used solely for
establishing a countywide framework from which county and city comprehensive
plans are developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as required in
RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the
land-use powers of cities.

(2) The legislative
authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt a countywide
planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in whole or in part
within the county as follows:

(a) No later than sixty
calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority of each county that
as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
convene a meeting with representatives of each city located within the county
for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a countywide planning policy. In other counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this meeting shall be
convened no later than sixty days after the date the county adopts its resolution
of intention or was certified by the office of financial management.

(b) The process and
framework for adoption of a countywide planning policy specified in (a) of this
subsection shall determine the manner in which the county and the cities agree
to all procedures and provisions including but not limited to desired planning
policies, deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration
thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.

(c) If a county fails
for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of cities as required
in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately impose any appropriate
sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d) If there is no
agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or chose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no agreement within one
hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its resolution of intention
or was certified by the office of financial management in any other county that
is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first
inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department of community, trade, and
economic development to mediate any disputes that preclude agreement. If
mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that will lead to
agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or cities for failure to reach an
agreement as provided in this section. The governor shall specify the reason
or reasons for the imposition of any sanction.

(e) No later than July
1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was required or chose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months
after the date the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified
by the office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall
adopt a countywide planning policy according to the process provided under this
section and that is consistent with the agreement pursuant to (b) of this
subsection, and after holding a public hearing or hearings on the proposed
countywide planning policy.

(3) A countywide
planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a) Policies to
implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b) Policies for
promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of urban services
to such development;

(c) Policies for siting
public capital facilities of a countywide or statewide nature, including transportation
facilities of statewide significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140;

(d) Policies for
countywide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e) Policies that
consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all economic
segments of the population and parameters for its distribution;

(f) Policies for joint
county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g) Policies for
countywide economic development and employment; ((and))

(h) Policies for the
allocation of projected population and employment growth, and the number of
residential units necessary to accommodate growth in the urban and rural areas
by jurisdiction;

(i) Policies
establishing appropriate densities for urban and rural areas;

(j) Performance
measures to annually review progress towards accommodating the twenty-year
population and employment growth projections established in the countywide
planning policies;

(k) Policies that
plan for and achieve a balance between jobs and housing; and

(l) An analysis
of the fiscal impact.

(4) Federal agencies
and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the countywide planning
policy adoption process. Adopted countywide planning policies shall be adhered
to by state agencies.

(5) Failure to adopt a
countywide planning policy that meets the requirements of this section may
result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a county or city within
the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or
sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to adopt a
countywide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are
fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a countywide planning
policy.

(6) Cities and the
governor may appeal an adopted countywide planning policy to the growth
management hearings board within sixty days of the adoption of the countywide
planning policy.

(7) Multicounty
planning policies shall be adopted by two or more counties, each with a
population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with contiguous urban areas
and may be adopted by other counties, according to the process established
under this section or other processes agreed to among the counties and cities
within the affected counties throughout the multicounty region.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. It is the intent of the
legislature that the new elements required under section 3 of this act be
adopted concurrent with the scheduled update provided in RCW 36.70A.130.
Section 3 of this act is null and void unless funds are appropriated by the
state at least one year before local governments must update comprehensive
plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

---
END ---