BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

All science textbooks
purchased with state moneys must have the following notice placed prominently
in them.

"A
MESSAGE FROM THE WASHINGTON STATE LEGISLATURE

This
textbook discusses evolution, a controversial theory some scientists present as
a scientific explanation for the origin of living things, such as plants,
animals, and humans.

No
one was present when life first appeared on earth. Therefore, any statement
about life's origins should be considered as theory, not fact.

The
word "evolution" may refer to many types of change. Evolution
describes changes that occur within a species. (White moths, for example, may
"evolve" into gray moths.) This process is microevolution, which can
be observed and described as fact. Evolution may also refer to the change of
one living thing to another, such as reptiles into birds. This process, called
macroevolution, has never been observed and should be considered a theory.
Evolution also refers to the unproven belief that random, undirected forces
produced a world of living things.

There
are many unanswered questions about the origin of life which are not mentioned
in your textbook, including:

-
Why did the major groups of animals suddenly appear in the fossil record (known
as the "Cambrian Explosion")?

-
Why have no new major groups of living things appeared in the fossil record for
a long time?

-
Why do major groups of plants and animals have no transitional forms in the
fossil record?

-
How did you and all living things come to possess such a complete and complex
set of "Instructions" for building a living body?

Study hard and keep an open mind. Someday, you may contribute to the theories of
how living things appeared on earth."

--- END ---