BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that roadside littering and illegal dumping negatively impact our state's
beauty and quality of life, and the health and safety of our residents.

The legislature further
finds that all purchased tangible personal property, its packaging, and related
services contribute to the litter and waste streams. But not all purchased
tangible personal property and related services, including substantial
contributors to the litter and waste streams, are reached under the litter tax
and hazardous substance tax, which together fund waste reduction, waste
management, and site clean-up programs. Both taxes are based on individual
inventory items, rather than gross proceeds, and have proved difficult for
taxpayers to remit correctly. Additionally, both taxes have not been reliable
program funding sources.

Therefore, the
legislature intends that taxes dedicated to the waste reduction, waste
management, and site clean-up programs should provide stable funding, should be
easy for taxpayers to understand and pay, and should come from a base that
truly reflects the scope of the contributing sources.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.250 and 1998 c
343 s 5 and 1998 c 312 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon
every person except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(5), 82.04.272, or
subsection (2) of this section engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.

(b) In addition to
the tax imposed in (a) of this subsection, a litter control tax is imposed
equal to the rate specified in section 5 of this act upon every person taxable
under (a) of this subsection.

(2) Upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail that are
exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW
82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of
the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.270 and 1999 c
358 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon every
person except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(5) or 82.04.272 engaging
within this state in the business of making sales at wholesale; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.

(2) In addition to
the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section, a litter control tax is
imposed equal to the rate specified in section 5 of this act upon every person
taxable under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.272 and 1998 c
343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Upon
every person engaging within this state in the business of warehousing and
reselling prescription drugs; as to such persons, the amount of the tax shall
be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent.

(b) In addition to
the tax imposed in (a) of this subsection, a litter control tax is imposed
equal to the rate specified in section 5 of this act upon every person taxable
under (a) of this subsection.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Prescription
drug" has the same meaning as that term is given in RCW 82.08.0281; and

(b) "Warehousing
and reselling prescription drugs" means the buying of prescription drugs
from a manufacturer or another wholesaler, and reselling of the drugs to
persons selling at retail or to hospitals, clinics, health care providers, or
other providers of health care services, by a wholesaler or retailer who is registered
with the federal drug enforcement administration and licensed by the state
board of pharmacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The rate of the
litter control tax under RCW 82.04.250(1)(b), 82.04.270(2), and 82.04.272(1)(b)
shall be six one-thousandths of one percent.

(2) Sixty-two percent
of the taxes collected under RCW 82.04.250(1)(b), 82.04.270(2), and
82.04.272(1)(b) shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and
litter control account under RCW 70.93.180 and thirty-eight percent shall be
deposited in the toxics control accounts under RCW 70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

A credit is allowed
against the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.250(1)(b), 82.04.270(2), and
82.04.272(1)(b) equal to the rate in section 5 of this act multiplied by the
gross proceeds of the sales specified in RCW 82.04.050(2) (e) and (f); RCW
82.04.050(3) (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), and (g); and RCW 82.04.060(2). For those
persons subject to tax under RCW 82.04.250(2), a credit is allowed against the
tax imposed under RCW 82.04.250(1)(b), 82.04.270(2), and 82.04.272(1)(b) equal
to the rate in section 5 of this act multiplied by the gross proceeds of sales
specified in RCW 82.04.270.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.21.020 and 1989 c
2 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Hazardous
substance" means:

(a) ((Any substance
that, on March 1, 1989, is a hazardous substance under section 101(14) of the
federal comprehensive environmental response, compensation, and liability act
of 1980, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601(14), as amended by Public Law 99-499;

(b))) Petroleum products;

(((c) Any pesticide
product required to be registered under the federal insecticide, fungicide and
rodenticide act; and

(d))) (b) Any other substance, category of
substance, and any product or category of product determined by the director of
ecology by rule to present a threat to human health or the environment if
released into the environment. The director of ecology shall not add or delete
substances from this definition more often than twice during each calendar
year. For tax purposes, changes in this definition shall take effect on the
first day of the next month that is at least thirty days after the effective
date of the rule. The word "product" or "products" as used
in this ((paragraph (d))) subsection (1)(b) means an item or
items containing both: (i) One or more substances that are hazardous
substances under (a)((, (b), or (c))) of this subsection or that are
substances or categories of substances determined under this ((paragraph (d)))
subsection (1)(b) to present a threat to human health or the environment
if released into the environment; and (ii) one or more substances that are not
hazardous substances.

(2) "Petroleum
product" means plant condensate, lubricating oil, gasoline, aviation fuel,
kerosene, diesel motor fuel, benzol, fuel oil, residual oil, liquefied or
liquefiable gases such as butane, ethane, and propane, and every other product
derived from the refining of crude oil, but the term does not include crude
oil. Petroleum product does not include a product that is packaged for sale
to the ultimate consumer and possessed by a wholesaler or retailer.

(3)
"Possession" means the control of a hazardous substance located
within this state and includes both actual and constructive possession.
"Actual possession" occurs when the person with control has physical
possession. "Constructive possession" occurs when the person with
control does not have physical possession. "Control" means the power
to sell or use a hazardous substance or to authorize the sale or use by
another.

(4) "Previously
taxed hazardous substance" means a hazardous substance in respect to which
a tax has been paid under this chapter and which has not been remanufactured or
reprocessed in any manner (other than mere repackaging or recycling for
beneficial reuse) since the tax was paid.

(5) "Wholesale
value" means fair market wholesale value, determined as nearly as possible
according to the wholesale selling price at the place of use of similar
substances of like quality and character, in accordance with rules of the
department.

(6) Except for terms
defined in this section, the definitions in chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12
RCW apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.19.010 (Litter tax
imposed--Report to the legislature--Time of collection) and 1998 c 257 s 7,
1992 c 175 s 3, & 1971 ex.s. c 307 s 12;

(2) RCW 82.19.020 (Application to certain
products) and 1992 c 175 s 4 & 1971 ex.s. c 307 s 13;

(3) RCW 82.19.030 (Rule-making authority
tax--Items subject to--Reporting and accounting) and 1992 c 175 s 5 & 1971
ex.s. c 307 s 14;

(4) RCW 82.19.040 (Application of chapters
82.04 and 82.32 RCW--Disposition of revenue) and 1992 c 175 s 6 & 1971
ex.s. c 307 s 16; and

(5) RCW 82.19.050 (Exemptions) and 1992 c
175 s 7 & 1971 ex.s. c 307 s 17.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. This act does not affect
any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the
sections repealed or under any rule or order adopted under those statutes nor
does it affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

---
END ---