BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.21.020 and 1989 c
2 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Hazardous
substance" means:

(a) Any substance that,
on March 1, ((1989)) 2002, is a hazardous substance under section
101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental response, compensation, and
liability act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601(14), as amended by Public Law 99-499
on October 17, 1986, except that hazardous substance does not include the
following noncompound metals when in solid form in a particle larger than one
hundred micrometers (0.004 inches) in diameter: Antimony, arsenic, beryllium,
cadmium, chromium, copper, lead, nickel, selenium, silver, thallium, or zinc;

(b) Petroleum products;

(c) Any pesticide
product required to be registered under section 136a of the federal
insecticide, fungicide and rodenticide act, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq., as
amended by Public Law 104-170 on August 3, 1996; and

(d) Any other
substance, category of substance, and any product or category of product
determined by the director of ecology by rule to present a threat to human
health or the environment if released into the environment. The director of
ecology shall not add or delete substances from this definition more often than
twice during each calendar year. For tax purposes, changes in this definition
shall take effect on the first day of the next month that is at least thirty
days after the effective date of the rule. The word "product" or
"products" as used in this paragraph (d) means an item or items
containing both: (i) One or more substances that are hazardous substances
under (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection or that are substances or categories of
substances determined under this paragraph (d) to present a threat to human
health or the environment if released into the environment; and (ii) one or
more substances that are not hazardous substances.

(2) "Petroleum
product" means plant condensate, lubricating oil, gasoline, aviation fuel,
kerosene, diesel motor fuel, benzol, fuel oil, residual oil, liquefied or
liquefiable gases such as butane, ethane, and propane, and every other product
derived from the refining of crude oil, but the term does not include crude
oil.

(3)
"Possession" means the control of a hazardous substance located
within this state and includes both actual and constructive possession.
"Actual possession" occurs when the person with control has physical
possession. "Constructive possession" occurs when the person with
control does not have physical possession. "Control" means the power
to sell or use a hazardous substance or to authorize the sale or use by
another.

(4) "Previously
taxed hazardous substance" means a hazardous substance in respect to which
a tax has been paid under this chapter and which has not been remanufactured or
reprocessed in any manner (other than mere repackaging or recycling for
beneficial reuse) since the tax was paid.

(5) "Wholesale
value" means fair market wholesale value, determined as nearly as possible
according to the wholesale selling price at the place of use of similar
substances of like quality and character, in accordance with rules of the
department.

(6) Except for terms
defined in this section, the definitions in chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12
RCW apply to this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---