BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.16.030 and 1947 c
91 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The board
shall meet at least once ((monthly)) quarterly, the date to be
fixed by regulation of the board, at such other regular times as may be fixed
by a regulation of the board; and at any time upon call of the chairman, of
which due advance notice shall be given the other members of the board.

--- END ---