BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.73.081 and 1993 c
254 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to other
duties prescribed by law, the secretary shall:

(1) Prescribe minimum
requirements for:

(a) Ambulance, air
ambulance, and aid vehicles and equipment;

(b) Ambulance and aid
services; and

(c) Minimum emergency
communication equipment;

(2) Adopt procedures
for services that fail to perform in accordance with minimum requirements;

(3) Prescribe minimum
standards for first responder and emergency medical technician training
including:

(a) Adoption of
standards that permit individuals who are at least sixteen years of age at the
beginning of training to apply for training;

(b) Adoption of
curriculum and period of certification;

(((b))) (c)
Procedures for certification, recertification, decertification, or modification
of certificates;

(((c))) (d)
Adoption of requirements for ongoing training and evaluation, as approved by
the county medical program director, to include appropriate evaluation for
individual knowledge and skills. The first responder, emergency medical
technician, or emergency medical services provider agency may elect a program
of continuing education and a written and practical examination instead of
meeting the ongoing training and evaluation requirements;

(((d))) (e)
Procedures for reciprocity with other states or national certifying agencies;

(((e))) (f)
Review and approval or disapproval of training programs; and

(((f))) (g)
Adoption of standards for numbers and qualifications of instructional personnel
required for first responder and emergency medical technician training
programs;

(4) Prescribe minimum
requirements for liability insurance to be carried by licensed services except
that this requirement shall not apply to public bodies; and

(5)
Certify emergency medical program directors.

--- END ---