BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.04.345 and 1999 c
378 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may
assume or use the designation "certified public accountant" or
"CPA" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation,
sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the person is a certified public
accountant or CPA unless the person holds a valid certificate as a certified
public accountant.

(2) No person may hold
himself or herself out to the public and assume or use the designation
"certified public accountant" or "CPA" or any other title,
designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to
indicate that the person is a certified public accountant or CPA unless the
person holds a valid certificate as a certified public accountant and holds a
valid license to practice under RCW 18.04.215.

(3) No firm may hold
itself out to the public, or assume or use the designation "certified
public accountant" or "CPA" or any other title, designation,
words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that
the firm is composed of certified public accountants or CPAs, unless the firm
is licensed under RCW 18.04.195, holds a valid license to practice under RCW
18.04.215, and all offices of the firm in this state for the practice of public
accounting are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205.

(4) No person,
partnership, or corporation may hold himself, herself, or itself out to the
public, or assume or use along, or in connection with his, hers, or its name,
or any other name the title or designation "certified accountant,"
"chartered accountant," "licensed accountant,"
"licensed public accountant," "public accountant," or any
other title or designation likely to be confused with "certified public
accountant" or any of the abbreviations "CA," "LA,"
"LPA," or "PA," or similar abbreviations likely to be
confused with "CPA." However, nothing in this chapter prohibits use
of the title "accountant" by any person regardless of whether the
person has been granted a certificate or holds a license under this chapter.

(5) No person may sign,
affix, or associate his or her name or any trade or assumed name used by the
person in his or her business to any report designated as an "audit,"
"review," or "compilation," unless the person holds a
license to practice under RCW 18.04.215 and all of the person's offices in this
state for the practice of public accounting are maintained and licensed under
RCW 18.04.205.

(6) No person may sign,
affix, or associate a firm name to any report designated as an
"audit," "review," or "compilation," unless the
firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215, and all of its offices in
this state for the practice of public accounting are maintained and registered
under RCW 18.04.205.

(7) No person,
partnership, or corporation not holding a license to practice under RCW 18.04.215
may hold himself, herself, or itself out to the public as an
"auditor" with or without any other description or designation by use
of such word on any sign, card, letterhead, or in any advertisement or
directory.

(8) No person may
assume or use the designation "certified public accountant" or
"CPA" in conjunction with names indicating or implying that there is
a partnership or corporation, if there is in fact no bona fide partnership or
corporation registered under RCW 18.04.195.

(9) No person, partnership,
or corporation holding a license under RCW 18.04.215 may hold himself, herself,
or itself out to the public in conjunction with the designation "and
Associates" or "and Assoc." unless he or she has in fact a
partner or employee who holds a license under RCW 18.04.215.

(10) No
person, partnership, or corporation holding a certificate as a certified public
accountant or a license to practice under this chapter may accept a commission,
referral fee, or contingent fee for the performance of a professional service
or the referral of a client to a product or service.

--- END ---