BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) One law enforcement
service district may be created in the unincorporated area of a county to
finance the provision of additional levels of law enforcement as provided in
this chapter. A law enforcement service district is a quasi-municipal corporation
and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes.
The county legislative authority shall be the governing body of a law
enforcement service district, and the county treasurer shall act as the ex
officio treasurer of the service district. The voters of a law enforcement
service district shall be all registered voters residing in the service
district.

(2) A law enforcement
service district may not provide law enforcement services itself, but may
contract with a county for the provision of additional levels of law
enforcement within the service district. The county sheriff shall be the chief
law enforcement officer and shall be in charge of the law enforcement personnel
in a law enforcement service district.

(3) Whenever territory
located within a law enforcement service district is incorporated or annexed
into a city or town, the area shall be removed from the law enforcement
service district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The creation of a law
enforcement service district shall be initiated by either resolution of the
county legislative authority, or petition of registered voters, proposing the
creation of the service district. A petition shall be filed with the county
legislative authority and must be signed by registered voters residing in the
proposed service district equal in number to at least ten percent of the voters
voting within the boundaries of the proposed service district at the last
general election. The boundaries of the proposed law enforcement service
district shall be countywide, excluding incorporated areas; and those
boundaries shall be described on the petition or resolution, whichever method
is used.

The county legislative
authority shall hold a public hearing on the proposed law enforcement service
district if the petition includes sufficient valid signatures, or such a
resolution is adopted. Notice of the public hearing shall be published, at
least once, not less than ten days prior to the hearing in a newspaper of
general circulation in the proposed service district. The county legislative
authority shall hear objections from any affected person.

A special election
shall be called by the county legislative authority, at one of the dates
specified in RCW 29.13.020, to authorize the establishment of the law
enforcement service district and establish the maximum rate of property tax
that may be imposed by the service district, if after the public hearing the
county legislative authority finds the creation of the service district to be
in the public interest. The county legislative authority shall establish the
maximum rate or rates and describe the particular property tax. A single
ballot proposition shall include language both authorizing the creation of the
law enforcement service district and authorizing the service district to impose
a property tax up to a specified rate or rates equal to or less than those
allowed in section 3 of this act. The law enforcement service district shall
be established by resolution of the county legislative authority if this ballot
proposition is approved by a simple majority of the voters voting on the
proposition. The service district is authorized to impose a property tax not
to exceed the maximum rate or rates described in the ballot proposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The county legislative
authority may submit a ballot proposition to the voters of the service district
to authorize an increased maximum rate of property tax, or a new property tax
not previously authorized. Approval of the ballot proposition shall be by
simple majority of the voters voting on the ballot proposition.

(2) A law enforcement
service district may impose a property tax pursuant to Title 84 RCW, if
authorized by the service district voters.

Tax receipts received
by a law enforcement service district shall: (a) Be placed in a special fund
to be used exclusively for financing the provision of additional levels of law
enforcement in the service district; and (b) not diminish the contribution from
the county general fund provided for the support of the basic level of law
enforcement services that the law enforcement service district supplements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

---
END ---