BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds
that:

_6 (1) Over eight million people in the United States
have been

_7 diagnosed with cancer at some point in their lives;

_8 (2) Approximately one hundred seven billion dollars
are spent

_9 on medical care to treat this disease;

10 (3) A comprehensive approach to cancer is needed and
will be

11 more responsive to the issue than a piecemeal approach;

12 (4) A comprehensive approach to cancer will enable
Washington

13 state to choose where to focus health promotion
resources, set

14 statewide priorities, and build a coordinated team of
educators,

15 institutions, organizations, and the state; and

16 (5) The formation and development of an advisory
committee on

17 cancer coordination and control is an important part of
the

p. 1 SB
6067

_1 legislature's goal to positively impact the overall
health and

_2 well-being of its citizens.

_3 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is
added to chapter 43.70

_4 RCW to read as follows:

_5 The advisory committee on cancer coordination and
control is

_6 established in the department. The committee must have
no more than

_7 twenty members, including the secretary of the
department or his

_8 or her designee who shall serve as chair. The committee
shall meet

_9 at least quarterly in its first year, and annually
thereafter. Four

10 of the members of the committee must be legislators, one
appointed

11 by each caucus of the house of representatives and
senate. The

12 remainder of the members must include, but not be
limited to, the

13 following sectors: Cancer survivors, public and private
health

14 plans, advocacy organizations, research, hospitals,
local public

15 health, physicians, and nurses.

16 Except for the secretary, the members shall serve
four-year

17 terms. Of the initial members, five must be appointed
for a one-

18 year term, five must be appointed for a two-year term,
five must

19 be appointed for a three-year term, and five must be
appointed for

20 a four-year term. Members may succeed themselves for
one term and

21 may be appointed again after being off the committee for
one term.

22 The committee shall recommend to the secretary a
plan for the

23 statewide implementation of an interagency comprehensive

24 coordinated cancer control program that includes but is
not

25 limited to:

26 (1) Identify and examine the limitations and
problems

27 associated with existing laws, regulations, programs,
and services

28 related to cancer control;

29 (2) Examine the awareness of, access to, and
financing of

30 cancer control services for Washington's citizens, with
attention

31 paid to the uninsured and underinsured, and regional and

32 urban/rural differences;

33 (3) Advise the secretary on a coordinated,
effective, and

34 efficient use of resources;

35 (4) Identify and review health promotion and disease
prevention

36 strategies relating to the leading causes of cancer
mortality and

37 morbidity; and

SB 6067 p. 2

_1 (5) Support and encourage state research efforts to
find a cure

_2 for cancer.

_3 The department shall submit a written report not
later than

_4 twelve months after the effective date of this act to
the governor

_5 and legislature. The report must address a written
plan, including

_6 policy recommendations, for statewide implementation of
a

_7 coordinated cancer control program. Annual reports must
be

_8 submitted thereafter to highlight plan implementation.

_9 As used in this section, "comprehensive approach
to cancer"

10 means an integrated and coordinated approach to reduce
the

11 incidence, morbidity, and mortality of cancer through
prevention,

12 early detection, and timely treatment.

13 NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If any provision of
this act or its

14 application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the

15 remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other

16 persons or circumstances is not affected.

17 NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary
for the immediate

18 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

19 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

20 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
6067