BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.86A.030 and 1993
c 512 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Funds held in
public depositaries not as demand deposits as provided in RCW 43.86A.020 and
43.86A.030, shall be available for a time certificate of deposit investment
program according to the following formula: The state treasurer shall
apportion to all participating depositaries an amount equal to five percent of
the three year average mean of general state revenues as certified in
accordance with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or fifty
percent of the total surplus treasury investment availability, whichever is
less. Within thirty days after certification, those funds determined to be
available according to this formula for the time certificate of deposit
investment program shall be deposited in qualified public depositaries. These
deposits shall be allocated among the participating depositaries on a basis to
be determined by the state treasurer.

(2)(a) The state
treasurer may use up to fifty million dollars per year of all funds available
under this section for the purposes of RCW 43.86A.060. The amounts made
available to these public depositaries shall be equal to the amounts of
outstanding loans made under RCW 43.86A.060.

(b) The state
treasurer may use up to twenty-five million dollars per year of all funds
available under this section for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

(3) The formula so
devised shall be a matter of public record giving consideration to, but not
limited to deposits, assets, loans, capital structure, investments or some
combination of these factors. However, if in the judgment of the state
treasurer the amount of allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by
this section will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 43.86A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state treasurer
shall deposit the funds available under RCW 43.86A.030(2)(b) in qualified
public depositaries at market interest rates. The qualified public depositary
shall remit two hundred basis points of interest on each deposit to entities
that have:

(a) Received or
administered funding during the previous two years for business loans from one
of the following federal sources: (i) Department of housing and urban
development under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3535(d) and 5300-5320 et seq.; (ii) small
business administration under 15 U.S.C. Sec. 633 et seq.; (iii) economic
development administration under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3243; (iv) department of
agriculture under 7 U.S.C. Sec. 1932 and 1989; and (v) the treasury department
through the community development financial institution fund under 12 U.S.C.
Sec. 4701 et seq.;

(b) Been in continuous
operation or administers a loan fund which has been in continuous operation for
a minimum of three years;

(c) Losses averaging
less than ten percent of outstanding loans for the previous three years; and

(d) No more than fifty
percent of operational funding from a single source.

The public depositary
shall pay the remainder of the interest on each deposit to the state
treasurer. As a condition of receiving the remittance of two hundred basis
points of interest, the entity receiving the remittance must make qualifying
loans as provided in this section.

(2) Qualifying loans
made under this section are those that:

(a) Have terms that do
not exceed five years;

(b) Are made to
business enterprises that are owned by persons qualified as low-income
households under RCW 43.185A.010;

(c) Incur points or
fees charged at loan closing that do not exceed two percent of the loan amount;
and

(d) Are for a principal
amount not exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(3) In addition to
making loans under subsection (2) of this section, the entity receiving the
remittance may use the remittance for technical assistance.

(4) The remittance of
two hundred basis points of interest on each deposit must be approved by the
department of community, trade, and economic development as being made to
qualifying entities eligible to participate in this program. The qualifying
public depositary providing the remittance has no obligation to the qualifying
entity, legal or otherwise, other than providing the remittance.

(5) Participation of a
qualified public depositary in this program contributes toward meeting the
credit needs of the communities it serves as set forth under chapter 30.60 RCW
for state banks, chapter 32.40 RCW for state savings banks, and the federal
community reinvestment act of 1977 for federal savings banks, federal savings
and loan associations, and national banks.

(6) In setting interest
rates for funds deposited under this program, the state treasurer shall offer
rates that are commensurate with other similar deposits made by the treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.86A RCW to read as follows:

The qualifying
entities, as defined in section 2 of this act, shall compile information on
loans made to business enterprises under section 2 of this act. The
information shall include, but is not limited to:

(1) Name of the
business enterprise;

(2) Geographic location
of the business enterprise;

(3) Type of business;

(4) Total number and
amount of loans requested by business enterprises;

(5) Amount and term of
the loan made to the business enterprise;

(6) Amount of the funds
under section 2 of this act that are used for technical assistance by the
qualifying entity; and

(7) Other
information the state treasurer, in consultation with the department of
community, trade, and economic development deems necessary for the
implementation of this section.

---
END ---