BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that historic schools are often the architectural and social centers of
neighborhoods and communities, serving as structural reminders of our shared
heritage. The state should encourage the preservation, when feasible, of such
buildings, so that they may serve future generations as ably as they did past
generations.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.525.166 and 1997
c 369 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Allocations to school
districts of state funds provided by RCW 28A.525.160 through 28A.525.182 shall
be made by the state board of education and the amount of state assistance to a
school district in financing a school plant project shall be determined in the
following manner:

(1) The boards of
directors of the districts shall determine the total cost of the proposed
project, which cost may include the cost of acquiring and preparing the site,
the cost of constructing the building or of acquiring a building and preparing
the same for school use, the cost of rehabilitating or restoring an existing
school building listed or eligible to be listed as an historic property,
the cost of necessary equipment, taxes chargeable to the project, necessary
architects' fees, and a reasonable amount for contingencies and for other
necessary incidental expenses: PROVIDED, That the total cost of the project
shall be subject to review and approval by the state board of education.

(2) The state matching
percentage for a school district shall be computed by the following formula:

The ratio of the school
district's adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state
adjusted valuation per pupil shall be subtracted from three, and then the
result of the foregoing shall be divided by three plus (the ratio of the school
district's adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state
adjusted valuation per pupil).

District
adjusted Total state ad-

3‑ valuation
per ) justed
valuation

Computed pupil per
pupil State

State = BBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBBB = B% Assist‑

Ratio District
adjusted Total state ad- ance

3+ valuation
per ) justed
valuation

pupil per
pupil

PROVIDED, That in the event
the percentage of state assistance to any school district based on the above
formula is less than twenty percent and such school district is otherwise
eligible for state assistance under RCW 28A.525.160 through 28A.525.182, the
state board of education may establish for such district a percentage of state
assistance not in excess of twenty percent of the approved cost of the project,
if the state board finds that such additional assistance is necessary to
provide minimum facilities for housing the pupils of the district.

(3) In addition to the
computed percent of state assistance developed in (2) above, a school district
shall be entitled to additional percentage points determined by the average
percentage of growth for the past three years. One percent shall be added to
the computed percent of state assistance for each percent of growth, with a
maximum of twenty percent.

(4) The
approved cost of the project determined in the manner herein prescribed times
the percentage of state assistance derived as provided for herein shall be the
amount of state assistance to the district for the financing of the project:
PROVIDED, That need therefor has been established to the satisfaction of the
state board of education: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That additional state assistance
may be allowed if it is found by the state board of education that such
assistance is necessary in order to meet (a) a school housing emergency
resulting from the destruction of a school building by fire, the condemnation
of a school building by properly constituted authorities, a sudden excessive
and clearly foreseeable future increase in school population, or other
conditions similarly emergent in nature; or (b) a special school housing burden
resulting from industrial projects of statewide significance or imposed by
virtue of the admission of nonresident students into educational programs
established, maintained and operated in conformity with the requirements of
law; or (c) a deficiency in the capital funds of the district resulting from
financing, subsequent to April 1, 1969, and without benefit of the state
assistance provided by prior state assistance programs, the construction of a
needed school building project or projects approved in conformity with the
requirements of such programs, after having first applied for and been denied
state assistance because of the inadequacy of state funds available for the
purpose, or (d) a condition created by the fact that an excessive number of
students live in state owned housing, or (e) a need for the construction of a
school building to provide for improved school district organization or racial
balance, or (f) conditions similar to those defined under (a), (b), (c), (d)
and (e) hereinabove, creating a like emergency.

---
END ---