BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

A public utility
district that provides wholesale telecommunications services under this chapter
shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 80.54 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 80.54.010 and 1985 c
450 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Attachment" means any wire or cable for the transmission of
intelligence by telecommunications or television, including cable television,
light waves, or other phenomena, or for the transmission of electricity for
light, heat, or power, and any related device, apparatus, or auxiliary
equipment, installed upon any pole or in any telecommunications, electrical,
cable television, or communications right of way, duct, conduit, manhole or
handhole, or other similar facilities owned or controlled, in whole or in part,
by one or more utilities, including public utility districts that provide
wholesale telecommunications services under RCW 54.16.330 and 54.16.340,
where the installation has been made with the consent of the one or more
utilities.

(2)
"Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, company,
association, joint stock association, or cooperatively organized association,
other than a utility, which is authorized to construct attachments upon, along,
under, or across the public ways.

(3)
"Utility" means any electrical company or telecommunications company
as defined in RCW 80.04.010, and does not include any entity cooperatively
organized, or owned by federal, state, or local government, or a subdivision of
state or local government, except that a public utility district that
provides wholesale telecommunications services under RCW 54.16.330 and
54.16.340 is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

---
END ---