BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section
applies to employees at the University of Washington who are undergraduate
students or graduate students on the campus of the University of Washington and
are:

(a) Graduate teaching
assistants;

(b) Graduate research
assistants;

(c) Graduate teaching
associates; or

(d) Tutors, readers,
and graders in academic and tutoring centers.

(2) A group of
employees described under subsection (1) of this section may not be classified
as a collective bargaining unit, and no such employee is required to become a
member of a bargaining unit.

(3) An employee under
subsection (1) of this section may not participate in any labor action that
will disrupt the learning environment for students at the University of
Washington. This includes labor strikes, walkouts, or any action preventing
student employees from performing their duties.

(4)(a) A violation of
this section is a misdemeanor. Each day upon which the violation occurs
constitutes a separate violation. A person violating this section may be
enjoined from continuing the violation.

(b) An employee
described under subsection (1) of this section who participates in a labor
strike may be terminated from his or her employment with the University of
Washington and may be prohibited from performing like work in any institution
of higher education in the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---