BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature intends
to clarify that the fee-for-service method of paying for and delivering medical
services to clients eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW is, and always has been,
separate and distinct from the managed care method of paying for and delivering
such services.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.522 and 1997 c
59 s 15 and 1997 c 34 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section, "managed health care system" means any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring organizations,
or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care
services covered under RCW 74.09.520 and rendered by licensed providers, on a
prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section
1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal
social security act.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall enter into agreements with managed health care
systems to provide health care services to recipients of temporary assistance
for needy families under the following conditions:

(a) Agreements shall be
made for at least thirty thousand recipients statewide;

(b) Agreements in at
least one county shall include enrollment of all recipients of temporary
assistance for needy families;

(c) To the extent that
this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act, recipients shall have a
choice of systems in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate
their enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the department may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of a
period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department shall not restrict a recipient's right to
terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as established by the
department by rule;

(d) To the extent that
this provision is consistent with section 1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act, participating managed health care systems shall not enroll
a disproportionate number of medical assistance recipients within the total
numbers of persons served by the managed health care systems, except as
authorized by the department under federal demonstration waivers granted under
section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;

(e) In negotiating with
managed health care systems the department shall adopt a uniform procedure to
negotiate and enter into contractual arrangements, including standards
regarding the quality of services to be provided; and financial integrity of
the responding system;

(f) The department
shall seek waivers from federal requirements as necessary to implement this
chapter;

(g) The department
shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid capitation contracts that include
inpatient care. However, if this is not possible or feasible, the department
may enter into prepaid capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;

(h) The department
shall define those circumstances under which a managed health care system is
responsible for out-of-plan services and assure that recipients shall not be
charged for such services; and

(i) Nothing in this
section prevents the department from entering into similar agreements for other
groups of people eligible to receive services under this chapter.

(3)(a) The
department is not liable for any payment to a provider under the following
circumstances:

(i) The department
and a managed health care system entered into an agreement under this section;

(ii) A provider
renders a service included within the schedule of benefits under the agreement
between the department and the managed health care system to a person enrolled
with the managed health care system; and

(iii) The managed
health care system does not, will not, or cannot pay the provider for the
service rendered.

(b) The department
is not liable even if the provider has a core provider agreement with the
department under RCW 74.09.120.

(c) The department
may authorize exceptions by rule.

(4) The
department shall ensure that publicly supported community health centers and
providers in rural areas, who show serious intent and apparent capability to
participate as managed health care systems are seriously considered as
contractors. The department shall coordinate its managed care activities with
activities under chapter 70.47 RCW.

(((4))) (5)
The department shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and other states in
this geographical region in order to develop recommendations to be presented to
the appropriate federal agencies and the United States congress for improving
health care of the poor, while controlling related costs.

(((5))) (6)
The legislature finds that competition in the managed health care marketplace
is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence of a large number of managed
health care system options for medicaid clients. In a managed care delivery
system, whose goal is to focus on prevention, primary care, and improved
enrollee health status, continuity in care relationships is of substantial
importance, and disruption to clients and health care providers should be
minimized. To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall
guide the department in its healthy options managed health care purchasing
efforts:

(a) All managed health
care systems should have an opportunity to contract with the department to the
extent that minimum contracting requirements defined by the department are met,
at payment rates that enable the department to operate as far below
appropriated spending levels as possible, consistent with the principles
established in this section.

(b) Managed health care
systems should compete for the award of contracts and assignment of medicaid
beneficiaries who do not voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:

(i) Demonstrated
commitment to or experience in serving low-income populations;

(ii) Quality of
services provided to enrollees;

(iii) Accessibility,
including appropriate utilization, of services offered to enrollees;

(iv) Demonstrated
capability to perform contracted services, including ability to supply an
adequate provider network;

(v) Payment rates; and

(vi) The ability to
meet other specifically defined contract requirements established by the
department, including consideration of past and current performance and
participation in other state or federal health programs as a contractor.

(c) Consideration
should be given to using multiple year contracting periods.

(d) Quality,
accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving low-income populations
shall be given significant weight in the contracting, evaluation, and
assignment process.

(e) All contractors
that are regulated health carriers must meet state minimum net worth
requirements as defined in applicable state laws. The department shall adopt
rules establishing the minimum net worth requirements for contractors that are
not regulated health carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of
the department to take action under a contract upon finding that a contractor's
financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's ability to meet its
contract obligations.

(f) Procedures for resolution
of disputes between the department and contract bidders or the department and
contracting carriers related to the award of, or failure to award, a managed
care contract must be clearly set out in the procurement document. In
designing such procedures, the department shall give strong consideration to
the negotiation and dispute resolution processes used by the Washington state
health care authority in its managed health care contracting activities.

(((6))) (7)
The department may apply the principles set forth in subsection (((5))) (6)
of this section to its managed health care purchasing efforts on behalf of
clients receiving supplemental security income benefits to the extent
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. This act applies to
requests for payment from the department of social and health services that are
made on or after the effective date of this act, regardless of when the
services were rendered. This act also applies to requests for payment from the
department of social and health services that were made before the effective
date of this act, if such requests for payment are the subject in any way of a
lawsuit that is pending or ongoing in any court of this state as of the effective
date of this act. To this extent, this act applies retroactively, but in all
other respects it applies prospectively.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---