BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that federally assisted housing provides a source of affordable housing for
many seniors in Washington. The legislature further finds that owners of
federally assisted housing have the option of either prepaying their mortgage
or opting out of the program after a specified period of time. The legislature
further finds that many nonprofit organizations have a desire to acquire
federally assisted housing where the owner has decided to opt out of the program.
The legislature further finds that many nonprofit organizations have difficulty
in obtaining financing, on an expedited basis, in order to purchase federally
assisted housing when it becomes available. The legislature further finds that
there is a need to develop financing programs designed to respond to immediate
financing needs of nonprofit organizations that are trying to purchase
federally assisted housing where the owner is opting out of the program.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature to create a task force on federally assisted housing
preservation to explore techniques designed to expedite financing to nonprofit
organizations that want to purchase federally assisted housing developments
where the owner is opting out of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) There is created the
task force on federally assisted housing preservation to consist of twelve
members. The task force consists of the following members:

(a) The chair of the
Washington affordable housing advisory board, created under chapter 43.185B
RCW, who shall serve as an ex officio member and as chair;

(b) The executive
director of the Washington state investment board or the director's designee,
who shall serve as an ex officio member;

(c) The executive
director of the Washington housing finance commission or the director's
designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member;

(d) The secretary of
the department of social and health services or the secretary's designee, who
shall serve as an ex officio member;

(e) Two representatives
from nonprofit organizations that represent owners of federally assisted
housing developments that serve seniors;

(f) Two representatives
from for-profit organizations that represent owners of federally assisted
housing developments that serve seniors;

(g) Three
representatives from financial institutions involved in financing senior
housing development, one representative must be from an investment and banking
firm involved in financing federally insured assisted housing development; and

(h) One representative
from a public housing authority.

(2) The director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall appoint all
nonex officio members to the task force on federally assisted housing
preservation. The vice-chair of the task force is selected by majority vote of
the task force members. The members of the task force shall serve without
compensation.

(3) The department of
community, trade, and economic development, the Washington state investment
board, and the Washington state housing finance commission shall provide
necessary information, assistance, and administrative and clerical assistance
to the task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The task force on
federally assisted housing preservation shall:

(1) Review financing
needs for the preservation, acquisition, or rehabilitation of federally
assisted housing developments for seniors by nonprofit organizations;

(2) Review existing
federal and state programs and incentives designed to assist in the
preservation of federally assisted housing developments for seniors;

(3) Review techniques
designed to expedite the acquisition financing of federally assisted housing
developments for seniors, by nonprofit organizations, where the owner has opted
out of the program. This would include, but not be limited to, streamlined
loan underwriting, preapproved lines of credit for preservation purchases, and
expedited loan approvals by public and private funding sources;

(4) Make
recommendations on possible financing techniques that could be developed at the
state level to assist nonprofit organizations in the preservation of federally
assisted housing developments for seniors; and

(5) By December 1,
2001, prepare and submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a
report detailing its findings and recommendations regarding financing
techniques designed to assist nonprofit organizations in the preservation,
acquisition, or rehabilitation of federally assisted housing developments for
seniors where the owner is planning to opt out of the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act expires February
1, 2002.

---
END ---