BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.93.020 and 1994 c
264 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "General
authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, department,
or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of
local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of state
government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension of
persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in
general, as distinguished from a limited authority Washington law enforcement
agency, and any other unit of government expressly designated by statute as a
general authority Washington law enforcement agency. The Washington state
patrol ((is a)) and the department of fish and wildlife are
general authority Washington law enforcement ((agency)) agencies.

(2) "Limited
authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency, political
subdivision, or unit of local government of this state, and any agency,
department, or division of state government, having as one of its functions the
apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the
traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not
limited to, the state departments of natural resources((, fish and wildlife,))
and social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state
lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state
utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor control board, and
the state department of corrections.

(3) "General
authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated
and elected, appointed, or employed officer of a general authority Washington
law enforcement agency who is commissioned to enforce the criminal laws of the
state of Washington generally.

(4) "Limited
authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated
officer of a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency empowered by
that agency to detect or apprehend violators of the laws in some or all of the
limited subject areas for which that agency is responsible. A limited
authority Washington peace officer may be a specially commissioned Washington
peace officer if otherwise qualified for such status under this chapter.

(5) "Specially
commissioned Washington peace officer", for the purposes of this chapter,
means any officer, whether part-time or full-time, compensated or not,
commissioned by a general authority Washington law enforcement agency to
enforce some or all of the criminal laws of the state of Washington, who does
not qualify under this chapter as a general authority Washington peace officer
for that commissioning agency, specifically including reserve peace officers,
and specially commissioned full-time, fully compensated peace officers duly
commissioned by the states of Oregon or Idaho or any such peace officer
commissioned by a unit of local government of Oregon or Idaho. A reserve peace
officer is an individual who is an officer of a Washington law enforcement
agency who does not serve such agency on a full-time basis but who, when called
by the agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the same basis as
full-time peace officers to enforce the criminal laws of the state.

(6) "Federal peace
officer" means any employee or agent of the United States government who has
the authority to carry firearms and make warrantless arrests and whose duties
involve the enforcement of criminal laws of the United States.

(7) "Agency with
primary territorial jurisdiction" means a city or town police agency which
has responsibility for police activity within its boundaries; or a county
police or sheriff's department which has responsibility with regard to police
activity in the unincorporated areas within the county boundaries; or a
statutorily authorized port district police agency or four-year state college
or university police agency which has responsibility for police activity within
the statutorily authorized enforcement boundaries of the port district, state
college, or university.

(8) "Primary
commissioning agency" means (a) the employing agency in the case of a
general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington
peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer, and
(b) the commissioning agency in the case of a specially commissioned Washington
peace officer (i) who is performing functions within the course and scope of
the special commission and (ii) who is not also a general authority Washington
peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal
peace officer, or a federal peace officer.

(9) "Primary
function of an agency" means that function to which greater than fifty
percent of the agency's resources are allocated.

(10) "Mutual law
enforcement assistance" includes, but is not limited to, one or more law
enforcement agencies aiding or assisting one or more other such agencies
through loans or exchanges of personnel or of material resources, for law
enforcement purposes.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.93.140 and 1985 c
89 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not
limit the scope of jurisdiction and authority of the Washington state patrol and
the department of fish and wildlife as otherwise provided by law, and ((the
Washington state patrol)) these agencies shall not be bound by the
reporting requirements of RCW 10.93.030.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.26.030 and 1996 c
178 s 11 and 1996 c 38 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system" provided herein.

(2)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any
city, town, county, or district or the elected officials of any municipal
corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter, any
authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of
RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents
the fire fighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over
20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which
is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or fire fighters
as defined in this chapter.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to the
extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter:

(i) The legislative
authority of any city, town, county, or district;

(ii) The elected
officials of any municipal corporation;

(iii) The governing
body of any other general authority law enforcement agency; or

(iv) A four-year
institution of higher education having a fully operational fire department as
of January 1, 1996.

(3) "Law
enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is
commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated
basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with
the following qualifications:

(a) No person who is
serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and
who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;

(b) Only those deputy
sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county
charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy
sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those
persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a
private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;

(c) Only such full time
commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices,
positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically
created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter
provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be
considered city police officers;

(d) The term "law
enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor
guild, association or organization (which is an employer under RCW
41.26.030(2)) if that individual has five years previous membership in the
retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this
subsection (3)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members; and

(e) The term "law
enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January
1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as
the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or
both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten
thousand. The provisions of this subsection (3)(e) shall not apply to any
public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a
retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(4) "Fire
fighter" means:

(a) Any person who is
serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire
department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires
passing a civil service examination for fire fighter, and who is actively
employed as such;

(b) Anyone who is
actively employed as a full time fire fighter where the fire department does
not have a civil service examination;

(c) Supervisory fire
fighter personnel;

(d) Any full time
executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized
under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection (4)(d) shall not apply
to plan 2 members;

(e) The executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer
under RCW 41.26.030(2) as now or hereafter amended), if such individual has
five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter
41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (4)(e) shall not apply
to plan 2 members;

(f) Any person who is
serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire
dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was
required to have passed a civil service examination for fire fighter; and

(g) Any person who on
March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an
employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under the
provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW.

(5)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(6) "Surviving
spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. "Surviving
spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as
provided in RCW 41.26.162.

(7)(a)
"Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is
under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically handicapped as determined
by the department, except a handicapped person in the full time care of a state
institution, who is:

(i) A natural born
child;

(ii) A stepchild where
that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under
this chapter;

(iii) A posthumous
child;

(iv) A child legally
adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable
under this chapter; or

(v) An illegitimate
child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this
chapter.

(b) A person shall also
be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven
months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other
educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in
which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal
and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after
which the child returns to school.

(8) "Member"
means any fire fighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply
under subsections (3) or (4) of this section whose membership is transferred to
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and fire fighter
who is employed in that capacity on or after such date.

(9) "Retirement
fund" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system fund" as provided for herein.

(10)
"Employee" means any law enforcement officer or fire fighter as
defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(11)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit
described herein.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.

(12)(a) "Final
average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member holding the
same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of
retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at time of
retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member who has
not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding
the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to
such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such
member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed,
computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests
pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of vesting.

(b) "Final average
salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly average of the member's
basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months of service
prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting
authorized unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of final
average salary.

(13)(a) "Basic
salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of salary or
wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special
salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and
upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.

(b) "Basic
salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member
during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and
shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant
to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code,
but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused
accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance
pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall
have the option of having such member's basic salary be the greater of:

(i) The basic salary
the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature;
or

(ii) Such member's
actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because basic salary under (b)(i) of this subsection is greater
than basic salary under (b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by the member
for both member and employer contributions.

(14)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an
employer as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation
is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in
duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service
in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit
shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member
from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a fire
fighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy
or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only
service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any
retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(i) For members
retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of a prior
pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (A)
such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member
as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (B)
such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member
under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160 or 41.20.170. However, in no
event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970,
where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a
position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time
credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such
prior act.

(ii) A member who is
employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service
to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual
service.

(b) "Service"
for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member for one or more
employers for which basic salary is earned for ninety or more hours per
calendar month which shall constitute a service credit month. Periods of
employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is
earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month
shall constitute one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a
member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than
seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.

Members of the
retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective position may
elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service credit years of
service shall be determined by dividing the total number of service credit
months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit year of service
as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation of such
retirement allowance or benefits.

If a member receives
basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar month, the
individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit during any
calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered;
or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in
which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours is
rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar month in
which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(15) "Accumulated
contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest
credited thereon.

(16) "Actuarial
reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein
reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred
in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of
each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of
retirement.

(17) "Actuarial
valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition
of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary
value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of
future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among
active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement,
withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(18) "Disability
board" for plan 1 members means either the county disability board or the
city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.

(19) "Disability
leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which
a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to
the commencement of disability retirement. The definition contained in this
subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20) "Disability
retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period following termination of
a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a
disability retirement allowance.

(21)
"Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which
may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(22) "Medical
services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as minimum
services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid
in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a) Hospital expenses:
These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for

(i) Board and room not
to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the
attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii) Necessary hospital
services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.

(b) Other medical
expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical
expenses", provided that they have not been considered as "hospital
expenses".

(i) The fees of the
following:

(A) A physician or
surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B) An osteopathic
physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;

(C) A chiropractor
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii) The charges of a
registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the
member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the
member's spouse.

(iii) The charges for
the following medical services and supplies:

(A) Drugs and medicines
upon a physician's prescription;

(B) Diagnostic x-ray
and laboratory examinations;

(C) X-ray, radium, and
radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D) Anesthesia and
oxygen;

(E) Rental of iron lung
and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F) Artificial limbs
and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G) Professional
ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when
injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H) Dental charges
incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and
who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after
the accident;

(I) Nursing home
confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J) Physical therapy by
a registered physical therapist;

(K) Blood transfusions,
including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;

(L) An optometrist
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(23) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24) "Retiree"
for persons who establish membership in the retirement system on or after
October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement allowance or other
benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer
by such member.

(25)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(26) "State
actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW
44.44.010(2).

(27) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to state-wide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(28) "Plan 1"
means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, plan
1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first
became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(29) "Plan 2"
means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, plan
2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first
became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.

(30) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(31) "Service
credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of
partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(32) "General
authority law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or
division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of
local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of
state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension
of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in
general, but not including the Washington state patrol or the department of
fish and wildlife. Such an agency, department, or division is
distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of
its functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions
or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas,
including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources((,
fish and wildlife,)) and social and health services, the state gambling
commission, the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation
commission, the state utilities and transportation commission, the state liquor
control board, and the state department of corrections.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.12.055 and 2000 c
107 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Fish and wildlife
officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers shall enforce this title,
rules of the department, and other statutes as prescribed by the legislature.
((However, when acting within the scope of these duties and when an offense
occurs in the presence of the fish and wildlife officer who is not an ex
officio fish and wildlife officer, the fish and wildlife officer may enforce
all criminal laws of the state. The fish and wildlife officer must have
successfully completed the basic law enforcement academy course sponsored by
the criminal justice training commission, or a course approved by the
department and the criminal justice training commission and provided by the
department or the criminal justice training commission, prior to enforcing the
criminal laws of the state.)) Fish and wildlife officers who are not ex
officio officers shall have and exercise, throughout the state, such police
powers and duties as are vested in sheriffs and peace officers generally. An
applicant for a fish and wildlife officer position must be a citizen of the
United States of America who can read and write the English language. All fish
and wildlife officers employed after the effective date of this section must
successfully complete the basic law enforcement academy course, known as the basic
course, sponsored by the criminal justice training commission, or the basic law
enforcement equivalency certification, known as the equivalency course,
provided by the criminal justice training commission. All officers employed on
the effective date of this section must have successfully completed the basic
course, the equivalency course, or the supplemental course in criminal law
enforcement, known as the supplemental course, offered under chapter 155, Laws
of 1985. Any officer who has not successfully completed the basic course, the
equivalency course, or the supplemental course must complete the basic course
or the equivalency course within fifteen months of the effective date of this
section.

(2) Fish and wildlife
officers are peace officers. However, nothing in this section or RCW
10.93.020 confers membership to such officers in the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 RCW.

(3) Any liability or
claim of liability under chapter 4.92 RCW that arises out of the exercise or
alleged exercise of authority by a fish and wildlife officer rests with the
department unless the fish and wildlife officer acts under the direction and
control of another agency or unless the liability is otherwise assumed under an
agreement between the department and another agency.

(4) Fish and wildlife
officers may serve and execute warrants and processes issued by the courts.

(((5) Fish and
wildlife officers may enforce RCW 79.01.805 and 79.01.810.

(6) Fish and
wildlife officers are authorized to enforce all provisions of chapter 88.02 RCW
and any rules adopted under that chapter, and the provisions of RCW 79A.05.310
and any rules adopted under that section.

(7) To enforce the
laws of this title, fish and wildlife officers may call to their aid any ex
officio fish and wildlife officer or citizen and that person shall render aid.))

Sec. 5. RCW 77.15.096 and 2001 c
253 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Fish and
wildlife officers may inspect without warrant at reasonable times and in a
reasonable manner the premises, containers, fishing equipment, fish, seaweed,
shellfish, and wildlife, and records required by the department of any
commercial fisher or wholesale dealer or fish buyer. Fish and wildlife
officers may similarly inspect without warrant the premises, containers,
fishing equipment, fish, shellfish, and wildlife, and records required by the
department of any shipping agent or other person placing or attempting to place
fish, shellfish, or wildlife into interstate commerce, any cold storage plant
that the department has probable cause to believe contains fish, shellfish, or
wildlife, or of any taxidermist or fur buyer. Fish and wildlife officers may
inspect without warrant the records required by the department of any retail
outlet selling fish, shellfish, or wildlife, and, if the officers have probable
cause to believe a violation of this title or rules of the commission has
occurred, they may inspect without warrant the premises, containers, and fish,
shellfish, and wildlife of any retail outlet selling fish, shellfish, or
wildlife. Authority granted under this section does not extend to quarters
in a boat, building, or other property used exclusively as a private domicile,
does not extend to transitory residences in which a person has a reasonable
expectation of privacy, and does not allow search and seizure without a warrant
if the thing or place is protected from search without warrant within the
meaning of Article I, section 7 of the state Constitution.

---
END ---