BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds that
tribal governments face demands similar to those of the state. For instance,
tribal governments fund education, health care, and law enforcement. Like
state and local governments, tribes need a stable and predictable tax base from
which to produce tax revenues. The legislature also finds that the Indian
lands tax base is already at or near tax capacity due to the presence of the
state tax. Furthermore, the existence of the state tax makes it difficult for
tribes to implement their own taxes without negatively impacting the businesses
located on Indian lands. Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to
authorize the governor to enter into tax compacts on a pilot basis in order to
accurately determine the value and costs to the state of entering into tax
compacts with tribes on a broad basis.

It is the intent of the
legislature that this act permit, but not require, the governor to enter into
tax compacts on a pilot basis with up to three Indian tribes when the governor
determines it is in the mutual interest of the Indian tribes and the state to
do so. The legislature recognizes that the circumstances and elements of each
compact will be unique and separate to that compact. Nothing in this act
should be taken as an attempt by the state to require any action by any Indian
tribe except by that tribe's agreement under compact. Further, no elements of
any one compact shall be taken or interpreted as binding upon or limiting the
scope of negotiations with any other tribe not party to that specific compact
except as the governor may be limited by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.02 RCW to read as follows:

The governor is
authorized to enter into tax compacts with up to three Indian tribes in the
state of Washington.

(1) The tax compacts
are subject to the following limitations:

(a) The compacts are
limited to the taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.16 RCW.

(b) The compacts must
provide that the revenue from the taxes imposed under the compact be used
exclusively for essential government services, such as education, health care,
roads, sewers, water supply, law enforcement, and fire protection.

(c) The compacts may
provide for the retrocession by the state of all or for a portion of the state
tax.

(d) The compacts may
provide for revenue sharing and may provide for sharing of services and
interlocal cooperation agreements.

(2) The governor shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2003, regarding the compacts entered
into under this section. The report shall contain information on the fiscal
impact of the compacts, administrative issues encountered during
implementation, any legal issues that need to be addressed in state law, and
any other matter significant to this issue. The report shall contain a
recommendation on the feasibility of extending this pilot project on a
permanent basis. The report shall also recommend what other taxes should be
considered as eligible for compacts.

(3) The governor may
delegate the power to negotiate cooperative agreements to the department of
revenue.

(4) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Indian
tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian tribe
located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

(b) "Indian
lands" means all land within the exterior boundaries of a reservation and
land held in trust for a tribe or Indian person by the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

Activities subject to
this chapter are not subject to the tax imposed under this chapter during the
effective period of a cooperative agreement under section 1 of this act if
covered by the terms of such agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

Taxable events subject
to this chapter are not subject to the tax imposed under this chapter during
the effective period of a cooperative agreement under section 1 of this act if
covered by the terms of such agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

Use of tangible
personal property or services subject to this chapter are not subject to the
tax imposed by this chapter during the effective period of a cooperative
agreement under section 1 of this act if covered by the terms of such
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

Activities
subject to this chapter are not subject to the tax imposed under this chapter
during the effective period of a cooperative agreement under section 1 of this
act if covered by the terms of such agreement.

---
END ---