BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the quality of direct care for our state's vulnerable adults is directly
related to many factors. Competitive and reasonable wages paid to those who
provide direct care is one of those factors.

It shall be the purpose
of state government to ensure that all nonlicensed direct care providers who
are paid by the state, or private agencies contracting with the state, to
provide direct care to vulnerable adults shall be paid an hourly salary that
equals two times the minimum wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

Before July 1, 2005,
all long-term nonlicensed direct care workers who provide direct care in the
person's own home through medicaid personal care as described in RCW 74.09.520,
community options program entry system waiver services as described in RCW
74.39A.030, or chore services as described in RCW 74.39A.110 as an individual
provider or employee of a home care agency under chapter 70.127 RCW, who are
paid by the state, or through private agencies that contract with the state, to
provide direct care as defined by the department in rule to vulnerable adults
as defined in RCW 74.34.020 shall receive a wage that equals at least two times
the minimum wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

As used in sections 2
and 4 of this act:

(1) "Long-term
nonlicensed direct care worker" means:

(a) A nonlicensed
worker providing direct hands-on care to a medicaid client in a nursing home
under chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding home under chapter 18.20 RCW, adult family
home under chapter 70.128 RCW, or developmental disability residential program
under chapter 71.12 RCW. A nonlicensed worker includes the resident owner,
resident operator, or resident manager of an adult family home, group home, or
boarding home licensed for less than six beds, who provides direct care; or

(b) A nonlicensed
worker providing direct care to a person with functional disabilities in the
person's own home through medicaid personal care as described in RCW 74.09.520,
community options program entry system waiver services as described in RCW
74.39A.030, or chore services as described in RCW 74.39A.110 as an individual
provider or employee of a home care agency under chapter 70.127 RCW.

(2) "Long-term
nonlicensed direct care worker" does not include janitorial staff, food
service staff, or any other staff working in a nursing home, group home, or
boarding home facility, or an owner, operator, or manager of a nursing home.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of
social and health services shall establish a wage enhancement program to
enhance the wages of long-term nonlicensed direct care workers. Facilities,
organizations, and agencies that employ or contract with long-term nonlicensed
direct care workers may voluntarily participate in the program. Under the
program, the department of social and health services shall provide
participating facilities, organizations, and agencies with funds to enhance the
wages of long-term nonlicensed direct care workers based on the proportion of worker
hours that may be reasonably apportioned to the care of medicaid clients
compared to the total number of hours of care for all clients of the facility
or home. Wage enhancement funds shall be available for both current workers
and additional long-term nonlicensed direct care workers. Participating
facilities, organizations, and agencies shall provide worker and medicaid
client data as determined necessary by the department of social and health
services. The department shall develop standards for determining how the wage
enhancement funds are to be distributed to participating facilities,
organizations, and agencies, and reporting requirements needed to determine how
wage enhancement funds provided under this act shall be distributed to each
long-term nonlicensed direct care worker. Facilities, organizations, and
agencies participating in the wage enhancement program shall report to the
department retrospectively on how the funds were distributed. All funds
provided to a participating facility, organization, or agency must be used only
to directly enhance the wages of long-term nonlicensed direct care workers.
Participating facilities, organizations, and agencies are prohibited from
arbitrarily reducing the wages of any long-term nonlicensed direct care worker
on or after July 1, 2001, through July 2, 2002. Any funds received under this
act that are not expended for the purposes of this act must be returned to the
department.

(a) On July 1, 2001,
participating facilities, organizations, and agencies shall increase by fifty
cents per hour, plus an amount equal to mandatory federal and state payroll
taxes, the wages paid to each long-term nonlicensed direct care worker employed
or contracted with by the facility, organization, or agency.

(b) On July 1, 2002,
participating facilities, organizations, and agencies shall increase the wages
paid to all long-term nonlicensed direct care workers by an average amount of
one dollar per hour, plus an amount equal to mandatory federal and state
payroll taxes. Participating facilities, organizations, and agencies shall
determine the amount of the wage enhancement for each eligible long-term
nonlicensed direct care worker in accordance with wage increase criteria
guidelines adopted by each participating facility, organization, or agency.
The wage increase criteria guidelines must include consideration of tenure,
shift, and technical performance of duties, unless otherwise established by
contract or bargaining agreement and consistent with existing state and federal
law.

(c) On July 1, 2005,
participating facilities, organizations, and agencies shall increase the wages
paid to all long-term nonlicensed direct care workers to an amount that equals
at least two times the minimum wage per hour, plus an amount equal to mandatory
federal and state payroll taxes. Participating facilities, organizations, and
agencies shall determine the amount of the wage enhancement for each eligible
long-term nonlicensed direct care worker in accordance with wage increase
criteria guidelines adopted by each participating facility, organization, or
agency. The wage increase criteria guidelines must include consideration of
tenure, shift, and technical performance of duties, unless otherwise
established by contract or bargaining agreement and consistent with existing
state and federal law.

(2) The
department shall determine the wage increase amount for persons working in the
individual provider program. The department shall distribute the funding for
the July 1, 2002, wage increase so that each participating employer receives an
amount equal to the cost of providing a wage increase of one dollar per hour to
each long-term nonlicensed direct care worker, plus an amount equal to
mandatory federal and state payroll taxes.

---
END ---