BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that outpatient prescription drugs are an essential component of
patient care. The legislature directs the department of social and health
services' medical assistance administration to administer its prescription drug
prior authorization and drug utilization programs in a manner that ensures that
beneficiaries have access to medically necessary medicines, giving primary
consideration to clinical efficacy and client care. Cost-effectiveness may
also be considered where such consideration would not jeopardize beneficiary
access to clinically efficacious prescription drugs.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.010 and 1990 c
296 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Children's
health program" means the health care services program provided to
children under eighteen years of age and in households with incomes at or below
the federal poverty level as annually defined by the federal department of
health and human services as adjusted for family size, and who are not
otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for
the medically needy.

(2)
"Committee" means the ((children's health services)) drug
utilization and education committee ((created in section 3 of this act)).

(3) "Compendia"
means the "American Hospital Formulary Services Drug Information,"
"U.S. Pharmacopeia‑-Drug Information," peer-reviewed medical
literature, and clinical information submitted to the state medicaid agency by
the pharmaceutical research company that developed the product and is
registered with the federal food and drug administration as the product
distributor.

(4)
"County" means the board of county commissioners, county council,
county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A combination of
two or more county authorities or tribal jurisdictions may enter into joint
agreements to fulfill the requirements of RCW 74.09.415 through 74.09.435.

(((4))) (5)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(((5))) (6)
"Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.

(((6))) (7)
"Drug utilization review" means both retrospective and prospective
drug utilization review. Such programs are designed to ensure that drug
utilization is: (a) Medically appropriate; (b) medically necessary; and (c)
not likely to have adverse medical results.

(8) "Drug
utilization review criteria" means standards recommended by the committee
for use in determining whether use of a drug is likely to be medically
appropriate, medically necessary, and will not result in adverse medical
outcomes.

(9)
"Internal management" means the administration of medical assistance,
medical care services, the children's health program, and the limited casualty
program.

(((7))) (10)
"Limited casualty program" means the medical care program provided to
medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social
security act, and to medically indigent persons who are without income or
resources sufficient to secure necessary medical services.

(((8))) (11)
"Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care program
provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the
federal social security act.

(((9))) (12)
"Medical care services" means the limited scope of care financed by
state funds and provided to general assistance recipients, and recipients of
alcohol and drug addiction services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.

(((10))) (13)
"Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.

(((11))) (14)
"Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually by the
United States department of health and human services, or successor agency.

(((12))) (15)
"Prior authorization" means a process requiring the prescriber or the
dispenser to verify with the state medicaid agency or its contractor that the
proposed medical use of a particular medicine for a patient meets predetermined
criteria for payment by the program.

(16)
"Prospective drug utilization review" means that part of the drug
utilization review program that occurs before a drug is dispensed and that uses
the drug utilization review criteria to screen for potential drug therapy
problems related to therapeutic duplication, drug-disease contraindications,
drug-drug interactions, incorrect drug dosage or duration of drug treatment,
drug-allergy interactions, and clinical abuse or misuse.

(17)
"Retrospective drug utilization review" means that part of the drug
utilization review program that is an historical review of drug utilization
data using drug utilization review criteria to examine pharmacy claims data and
other information to identify overuse, underuse, appropriate use of branded and
generic products, therapeutic duplication, drug-disease contraindications,
drug-drug interactions, incorrect drug dosage or duration of drug treatment,
and clinical abuse or misuse.

(18)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The drug
utilization and education committee is hereby established within the
department's medical assistance administration for the implementation of: (a)
A retrospective and prospective drug utilization review program; and (b) a
prior authorization program for outpatient prescription drugs under the medical
assistance program.

(2) The committee shall
consist of eleven members as appointed by the secretary as follows:

(a) Three physicians
licensed in this state and actively engaged in the practice of medicine chosen
from a list of nominees provided by the Washington state medical association;

(b) One advanced
registered nurse practitioner licensed in this state and actively engaged in
the practice of nursing chosen from a list of nominees provided by the
Washington state nurses association;

(c) Three pharmacists
licensed in this state and actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy chosen
from a list of nominees provided by the Washington state pharmacists
association;

(d) Three health care
consumer or advocate organization representatives chosen from nominees
submitted by Washington state chartered nonprofit health organizations whose
purpose it is to work with and for health care consumers and their families;
and

(e) One person with
background experience, education, or expertise in pharmacoeconomics.

(3) Committee members
shall serve staggered three-year terms. Of the initial members, one physician,
the advanced registered nurse practitioner, one pharmacist, and one consumer
representative shall each be appointed for two-year terms, and one physician,
two pharmacists, and the pharmacoeconomics representative shall each be
appointed for one-year terms. The remaining committee members shall be
appointed for three-year terms. Members may be reappointed for a period not to
exceed three three-year terms. Vacancies on the committee shall be filled for
the balance of the unexpired term from nominee lists for the appropriate
committee category as under subsection (2) of this section.

(4) Committee members
shall select a chair and a vice-chair on an annual basis from the committee
membership.

(5) The committee shall
meet at least quarterly and may meet at other times at the discretion of the
chair. The department shall provide staff support to the committee. Notice of
any meeting of the committee shall be published in the Washington state
register thirty days before such meeting. Committee meetings shall in all
respects comply with the provisions of the open public meetings act, chapter
42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The committee has the
power and duty to:

(1) In regards to drug
utilization review:

(a) Advise and make
recommendations regarding rules adopted by the department implementing the
provisions of state and federal law related to drug utilization review;

(b) Advise and make
recommendations regarding the implementation of a retrospective and prospective
drug utilization review program for the medical assistance program, including
recommendations for criteria for selection of contractors and reviewing
contracts between the medical assistance program and any other entity that will
process and review drug claims and profiles for the drug utilization review
program in accordance with this section;

(c) Advise and make
recommendations regarding the drug utilization review criteria for the
retrospective and prospective drug utilization review programs. Any
recommended drug utilization review criteria must be consistent with the
indications supported and/or rejected by the compendia and the food and drug
administration's approved labeling for the drug. In developing its
recommendations, the committee also shall consider outside information provided
by interested parties, including prescribers who treat significant numbers of
patients under the medical assistance program;

(d) Establish a process
to review, on a periodic basis, the drug utilization review criteria and, as
necessary, recommend modifications to the prospective and retrospective drug
utilization review programs; and

(e) Provide a period
for public comment during each committee meeting; and

(2) In regards to drug
prior authorization:

(a) Advise and make
recommendations regarding the rules to be adopted by the department regarding
outpatient prescription drug prior authorization;

(b) Advise and make
recommendations regarding the drug prior authorization review process
established in section 6 of this act;

(c) Make formal
recommendations to the department regarding any outpatient prescription drug
covered by the medical assistance program that is to be subject to prior
authorization;

(d) Review on an annual
basis whether drugs placed on prior authorization should remain on prior
authorization; and

(e) Make
recommendations for modification of the prior authorization review process, as
necessary, to achieve the objectives of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The committee shall
advise and make recommendations to the department in administration of its
prospective and retrospective drug utilization review program for outpatient
prescription drugs under the medical assistance program, using drug utilization
review criteria to ensure that drug utilization is medically appropriate,
medically necessary, and not likely to result in adverse medical outcomes.

(2) The department may
contract with an entity to process and review drug claims and profiles for the
drug utilization review program, provided that the department shall use a
competitive bidding process as required by the office of state procurement.

(3) The prospective
drug utilization review program shall be based on drug utilization review
criteria, after giving due consideration to criteria recommended by the
committee. If the department rejects the criteria recommended by the
committee, the department must specify the reasons for its finding that the
committee's recommendation is inappropriate. Those reasons cannot be based
exclusively upon cost considerations.

(4) The program shall
provide that, before a prescription is filled or delivered, a review shall be
conducted by a pharmacist at the point of sale to screen for potential drug
therapy problems. In conducting the prospective drug utilization review, a
pharmacist may not alter the prescribed outpatient drug therapy without a new
prescription order by the prescribing physician and approval by the patient.
The prospective drug utilization review shall screen for:

(a) Therapeutic
duplication;

(b) Drug-disease
contraindications;

(c) Drug-drug
interactions;

(d) Incorrect drug
dosage or duration of drug treatment;

(e) Drug-allergy
interactions; and

(f) Clinical abuse or
misuse.

(5) The retrospective
drug utilization review program shall be based on drug utilization review
criteria developed after giving due consideration to criteria recommended by
the committee. If the department rejects the criteria recommended by the
committee, the department must specify the reasons for its finding that the
committee's recommendation is inappropriate. Those reasons cannot be based
exclusively upon cost considerations.

(6) The retrospective
drug utilization program shall use the department's mechanized drug claims
processing and information retrieval system to analyze medical assistance
claims to:

(a) Identify patterns
of fraud, abuse, gross overuse or underuse, and inappropriate or medically
unnecessary care;

(b) Assess data on drug
use using criteria developed from the compendia for the purpose of evaluating:

(i) Therapeutic
appropriateness;

(ii) Overuse or
underuse;

(iii) Appropriate use
of branded and generic products;

(iv) Therapeutic
duplication;

(v) Drug-disease
contraindications;

(vi) Drug-drug
interactions;

(vii) Incorrect drug
dosage or duration of drug treatment; and

(viii) Clinical abuse
or misuse; and

(c) Propose remedial
strategies to improve the quality of care and to promote effective use of
medical assistance program funds or beneficiary expenditures.

(7) The department
shall provide advance notice of proposed changes to the drug utilization review
criteria and modification of the prospective and retrospective drug utilization
review programs thirty days before the planned implementation of such changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any drug prior
authorization program shall meet the following conditions:

(a) The program shall
provide telephone, fax, or other electronically transmitted approval or denial
within twenty-four hours after receipt of the prior authorization request;

(b) In an emergency
situation, including a situation in which a response to a prior authorization
request is unavailable, a seventy-two hour supply of the prescribed drug shall
be dispensed and paid for by the medical assistance program;

(c) In an emergency
situation, authorization shall be granted if the drug is prescribed for a
medically accepted indication supported by the compendia unless there is a
therapeutically equivalent generic drug that is available without prior
authorization; and

(d) The program shall
consult with prescribers to develop a streamlined process for the prescriber to
furnish any documentation required to support a prior authorization request.
To the extent possible, such process shall flow directly from the patient care
interaction and not a separate set of tasks required of the prescriber by the
state.

(2) The committee may
review any drug to develop recommendations to the department regarding the
appropriateness of placing the drug on prior authorization. Review by the
committee is not a precondition to the department's placing a drug on prior
authorization when public safety is of concern. In no case shall prior
authorization extend beyond sixty days without review by the committee. In
deciding whether to make a drug subject to prior authorization, the department
shall give primary consideration to clinical efficacy and patient care.
Cost-effectiveness may also be considered where such consideration would not
jeopardize beneficiary access to clinically efficacious prescription drugs.

(3) In the review of
any drug, the committee shall adhere to the following conditions:

(a) Any consideration
of the cost of the drug by the committee shall reflect the total cost of
treating the conditions for which the drug is prescribed, including
nonpharmaceutical costs that may be affected by the drug's use in treating
program beneficiaries;

(b) The committee
considers the potential impact on patient care and the potential fiscal impact
that may result from placement of such a drug on prior authorization;

(c) The committee
considers available retrospective drug utilization review data to identify a
drug whose use is likely not to be medically appropriate or medically
necessary, or likely to result in adverse medical outcomes;

(d) The committee
provides thirty days' public notice prior to any meeting developing
recommendations concerning whether such a drug should be placed on prior
authorization. Any interested party may request an opportunity to make an oral
presentation to the committee related to the prior authorization of the drug.
The committee shall also consider any information provided by any interested
party, including but not limited to physicians, pharmacists, beneficiaries or
other health care consumers, and manufacturers or distributors of the drug; and

(e) The committee makes
a formal written recommendation to the department that such a drug be placed on
prior authorization which shall be supported by an analysis demonstrating: (i)
The expected impact of such a decision on the clinical care likely to be
received by beneficiaries for whom the drug is medically necessary; (ii) the
expected impact on physicians whose patients require the drug; and (iii) the
expected fiscal impact on the medical assistance program.

(4) The department must
provide a written decision regarding its acceptance or rejection of a
recommendation of the committee. If the department rejects the recommendation
of the committee, the department must specify the reasons for its finding that
the committee's recommendation is inappropriate. Those reasons cannot be based
exclusively upon cost considerations. The department may consider any
additional and clarifying information provided by any interested party
rendering its decision.

(5) The department's
decision shall be published for public comment for a period of no less than
thirty days. The effective date of the decision shall not be prior to the
close of the comment period and effective notice of the decision's finality is
available to prescribers.

(6) The department
shall develop a grievance mechanism to hear appeals by interested parties of
the department's decision to place a drug on prior authorization. After
participating in the grievance mechanism, any interested party aggrieved by the
placement of a drug on prior authorization is entitled to an administrative
hearing before the department under the provisions of the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(7) The committee shall
review the prior authorization status of a drug when new and substantive data
is provided to the department.

(8) The
committee shall provide thirty days' public notice prior to any meeting to
determine whether changes should be recommended to the drug prior authorization
review process.

---
END ---