BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.010 and 1998 c
18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All county and
municipal peace officers are hereby charged with the duty of investigating and
prosecuting all violations of this title, and the penal laws of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor, and all fines imposed for violations of this
title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor shall
belong to the county, city or town wherein the court imposing the fine is
located, and shall be placed in the general fund for payment of the salaries of
those engaged in the enforcement of the provisions of this title and the penal
laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation,
possession, distribution and sale of liquor: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines,
forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of
the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW
as now exists or is later amended.

(2) In addition to any
and all other powers granted, the board shall have the power to enforce the
penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor.

(3) In addition to the
other duties under this section, the board shall enforce chapters 82.24 and
82.26 RCW.

(4) The board may
appoint and employ, assign to duty and fix the compensation of, officers to be
designated as liquor enforcement officers. Such liquor enforcement officers
shall have the power, under the supervision of the board, to enforce the penal
provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor. They shall have the power and authority to serve and execute all
warrants and process of law issued by the courts in enforcing the penal
provisions of this title or of any penal law of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor, and the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW. They shall have
the power to arrest without a warrant any person or persons found in the act of
violating any of the penal provisions of this title or of any penal law of this
state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor, and the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26
RCW.

(5) The basic law
enforcement training provided by the criminal justice training commission shall
be made available to liquor enforcement officers. Participation in this course
is optional and voluntary on the part of liquor enforcement officers employed
on or after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 66.44 RCW to read as follows:

Liquor
enforcement officers who are required to carry firearms or other weapons in the
course of their duties shall be issued those weapons by the board at no expense
to individual liquor enforcement officers. Weapons issued by the board under
this section may only be used by the liquor enforcement officer to whom they
are issued while on duty.

---
END ---