BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.010 and 1998 c
18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All county and
municipal peace officers are hereby charged with the duty of investigating and
prosecuting all violations of this title, and the penal laws of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor, and all fines imposed for violations of this
title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor shall
belong to the county, city or town wherein the court imposing the fine is
located, and shall be placed in the general fund for payment of the salaries of
those engaged in the enforcement of the provisions of this title and the penal
laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation,
possession, distribution and sale of liquor: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines,
forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of
the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW
as now exists or is later amended.

(2) In addition to any
and all other powers granted, the board shall have the power to enforce the
penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor.

(3) In addition to the
other duties under this section, the board shall enforce chapters 82.24 and
82.26 RCW.

(4) The board may
appoint and employ, assign to duty and fix the compensation of, officers to be
designated as liquor enforcement officers. Such liquor enforcement officers
shall have the power, under the supervision of the board, to enforce the penal
provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor. They shall have the power and authority to serve and execute all
warrants and process of law issued by the courts in enforcing the penal
provisions of this title or of any penal law of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor, and the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW. They shall have
the power to arrest without a warrant any person or persons found in the act of
violating any of the penal provisions of this title or of any penal law of this
state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor, and the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26
RCW.

(5) All liquor
enforcement officers shall engage in basic law enforcement officer training
provided by the criminal justice training commission. An officer employed on
or after the effective date of this act may not engage in any enforcement
duties until the officer has received the basic law enforcement training
certificate. Law enforcement training for liquor enforcement officers employed
prior to the effective date of this act shall be phased in over time. The
liquor control board shall adopt a policy specifying the number of officers who
shall attend basic law enforcement training per year, and the procedure for
selecting the order and timing of officers sent to the training.

(6) During the
course of their liquor enforcement duties, liquor enforcement officers who have
completed the training prescribed under subsection (5) of this section, and
have received the basic law enforcement training certificate, have the
authority to arrest without a warrant any person who is found in the act of
violating any criminal law of this state.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.101.010 and 2001
c 167 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When used in this
chapter:

(1) The term
"commission" means the Washington state criminal justice training
commission.

(2) The term
"boards" means the education and training standards boards, the
establishment of which are authorized by this chapter.

(3) The term
"criminal justice personnel" means any person who serves in a county,
city, state, or port commission agency engaged in crime prevention, crime
reduction, or enforcement of the criminal law.

(4) The term "law
enforcement personnel" means any public employee or volunteer having as a
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general or any employee or
volunteer of, or any individual commissioned by, any municipal, county, state,
or combination thereof, agency having as its primary function the enforcement
of criminal laws in general as distinguished from an agency possessing peace
officer powers, the primary function of which is the implementation of
specialized subject matter areas. For the purposes of this subsection
"primary function" means that function to which the greater
allocation of resources is made.

(5) The term
"correctional personnel" means any employee or volunteer who by
state, county, municipal, or combination thereof, statute has the
responsibility for the confinement, care, management, training, treatment,
education, supervision, or counseling of those individuals whose civil rights
have been limited in some way by legal sanction.

(6) A peace officer is
"convicted" at the time a plea of guilty has been accepted, or a
verdict of guilty or finding of guilt has been filed, notwithstanding the
pendency of any future proceedings, including but not limited to sentencing,
posttrial or postfact-finding motions and appeals. "Conviction"
includes a deferral of sentence and also includes the equivalent disposition by
a court in a jurisdiction other than the state of Washington.

(7) "Discharged
for disqualifying misconduct" means terminated from employment for: (a)
Conviction of (i) any crime committed under color of authority as a peace
officer, (ii) any crime involving dishonesty or false statement within the
meaning of Evidence Rule 609(a), (iii) the unlawful use or possession of a
controlled substance, or (iv) any other crime the conviction of which
disqualifies a Washington citizen from the legal right to possess a firearm
under state or federal law; (b) conduct that would constitute any of the crimes
addressed in (a) of this subsection; or (c) knowingly making materially false
statements during disciplinary investigations, where the false statements are
the sole basis for the termination.

(8) A peace officer is
"discharged for disqualifying misconduct" within the meaning of
subsection (7) of this section under the ordinary meaning of the term and when
the totality of the circumstances support a finding that the officer resigned
in anticipation of discipline, whether or not the misconduct was discovered at
the time of resignation, and when such discipline, if carried forward, would
more likely than not have led to discharge for disqualifying misconduct within
the meaning of subsection (7) of this section.

(9) When used in
context of proceedings referred to in this chapter, "final" means
that the peace officer has exhausted all available civil service appeals,
collective bargaining remedies, and all other such direct administrative
appeals, and the officer has not been reinstated as the result of the action.
Finality is not affected by the pendency or availability of state or federal
administrative or court actions for discrimination, or by the pendency or
availability of any remedies other than direct civil service and collective
bargaining remedies.

(10) "Peace
officer" means any law enforcement personnel subject to the basic law
enforcement training requirement of RCW 43.101.200 and any other requirements
of that section, notwithstanding any waiver or exemption granted by the
commission, and notwithstanding the statutory exemption based on date of
initial hire under RCW 43.101.200. Commissioned officers of the Washington
state patrol, whether they have been or may be exempted by rule of the
commission from the basic training requirement of RCW 43.101.200, are included
as peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Fish and wildlife officers
with enforcement powers for all criminal laws under RCW ((77.12.055)) 77.15.075
are peace officers for purposes of this chapter.

(11) "Liquor
enforcement officer" means an officer employed or appointed by the liquor
control board under RCW 66.44.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall provide basic law enforcement training to all liquor
enforcement officers.

---
END ---