BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.32.520 and 2000 c
107 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A personal use
shellfish and seaweed license is required for all persons other than residents
or nonresidents under fifteen years of age to fish for, take, dig for, or
possess seaweed or shellfish for personal use from state waters or offshore
waters including national park beaches.

(2) The fees for annual
personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses are:

(a) For a resident
fifteen years of age or older, seven dollars;

(b) For a nonresident
fifteen years of age or older, twenty dollars; and

(c) For a senior, five
dollars.

(3) The license fee for
a two-day personal use shellfish and seaweed license is six dollars for
residents or nonresidents fifteen years of age or older.

(((4)
The personal use shellfish and seaweed license shall be visible on the licensee
while harvesting shellfish or seaweed.))

--- END ---