BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.50.020 and 1995 c
69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(2)
"Application" means any request for approval of a particular site or
sites filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires;

(3) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation,
association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal
corporation, government agency, public utility district, or any other entity,
public or private, however organized;

(4) "Site"
means any proposed or approved location of an energy facility;

(5)
"Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant and
the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines, in effect as
of the date of certification, which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040
as now or hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or concurrent with
the construction or operation of any energy facility;

(6) "Associated
facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or other related and
supporting facilities connecting an energy plant with the existing energy
supply, processing, or distribution system, including, but not limited to,
communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment, instrumentation,
and other types of ancillary transmission equipment, off-line storage or
venting required for efficient operation or safety of the transmission system
and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the
inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and
new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages in excess of
200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest power grid:
PROVIDED, That common carrier railroads or motor vehicles shall not be
included;

(7) "Transmission
facility" means any of the following together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Crude or refined
petroleum or liquid petroleum product transmission pipeline of the following
dimensions: A pipeline larger than six inches minimum inside diameter between
valves for the transmission of these products with a total length of at least
fifteen miles;

(b) Natural gas,
synthetic fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas transmission pipeline of the
following dimensions: A pipeline larger than fourteen inches minimum inside
diameter between valves, for the transmission of these products, with a total
length of at least fifteen miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a
distribution facility, except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by
the United States federal power commission;

(8) "Independent
consultants" means those persons who have no financial interest in the
applicant's proposals and who are retained by the council to evaluate the
applicant's proposals, supporting studies, or to conduct additional studies;

(9) "Thermal power
plant" means, for the purpose of certification, any electrical generating
facility using any fuel, including nuclear materials, for distribution of
electricity by electric utilities;

(10) "Energy
facility" means an energy plant or transmission facilities: PROVIDED,
That the following are excluded from the provisions of this chapter:

(a) Facilities for the
extraction, conversion, transmission or storage of water, other than water
specifically consumed or discharged by energy production or conversion for
energy purposes; and

(b) Facilities operated
by and for the armed services for military purposes or by other federal
authority for the national defense;

(11)
"Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council created
by RCW 80.50.030;

(12) "Counsel for
the environment" means an assistant attorney general or a special
assistant attorney general who shall represent the public in accordance with
RCW 80.50.080;

(13)
"Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding exploratory
work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars;

(14) "Energy
plant" means the following facilities together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Any stationary
thermal power plant with generating capacity of ((two)) three
hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum continuous
electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and pressure, and floating thermal power plants of fifty thousand
kilowatts or more, including associated facilities;

(b) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive liquified natural gas in the equivalent of more
than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per day, which has
been transported over marine waters;

(c) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive more than an average of fifty thousand
barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum or liquified petroleum gas which
has been or will be transported over marine waters, except that the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such
new facility construction;

(d) Any underground
reservoir for receipt and storage of natural gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010
capable of delivering an average of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day; and

(e) Facilities capable
of processing more than twenty-five thousand barrels per day of petroleum into
refined products;

(15) "Land use
plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element thereof adopted by a
unit of local government pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW;

(16)
"Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local government
regulating the use of land and adopted pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or
36.70 RCW or Article XI of the state Constitution.

---
END ---