BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that the current method for determining water-dependent rental rates for aquatic
land leases for marinas may not be achieving the management goals in RCW
79.90.455. The current method for setting rental rates for marinas, as well as
alternatives to the current methods, should be evaluated in light of achieving
management goals for aquatic lands leases.

(2) The department of
natural resources shall study and prepare a report to the legislature on
alternatives to the current method for determination of water-dependent rent
for marina lessees, as set forth in RCW 79.90.480.

(3) The report shall be
prepared with the assistance of appropriate outside economic expertise, and
with marina owner and other stakeholder involvement. Affected marina owners
and stakeholders shall participate with the department of natural resources by
providing information necessary to complete this study. This information must
include gross income and expenses from each marina with details on the sources
of income and cause of expense. For each method, the report must:

(a) Describe each
method and the costs and benefits of each;

(b) Compare each with
the current method of calculating rents;

(c) Provide the private
industry perspective;

(d) Describe the public
perspective;

(e) Analyze the impact
on state lease revenue;

(f) Evaluate the
impacts of water-dependent rates on economic development in economically
distressed counties;

(g) Evaluate the
liabilities associated with marinas; and

(h) Evaluate the ease
and cost of administration.

(4) The report shall be
presented to the legislature by September 1, 2001, with the recommendations of
the department of natural resources clearly identified. The department's
recommendations must include draft legislation as necessary for implementation
of its recommendations.

(5) In
order to facilitate the participation of affected stakeholders in the
preparation of the report to the legislature, the department of natural
resources shall form a marina rent committee.

---
END ---