BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.18.200 and 1990 c
59 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided
otherwise in chapter 29.19 RCW, primaries for partisan offices must be
conducted as blanket primaries with private choice under the following
procedures:

(1) A voter may
indicate an affiliation with a party or identification as an independent voter,
but all properly registered voters may still vote for their choice
((at any primary held under this title,)) for any candidate for each
office, regardless of political affiliation ((and without a declaration of
political faith or adherence on the part of the voter));

(2) Each voter
determines in private, without any public disclosure at the polls, the
candidates he or she chooses to vote for; and

(3) Each voter,
without regard to any partisan or independent identification he or she made
when voting for partisan offices, may vote for all nonpartisan offices and
ballot measures on the ballot.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.30.081 and 1990 c
59 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On the top of each
ballot there shall be printed instructions directing the voters how to mark the
ballot, including write-in votes. Next shall appear the following
direction: "First, please indicate the political party of which you
consider yourself to be a member, or choose 'Independent'." After the
instructions and before the offices shall be placed the questions of adopting
constitutional amendments or any other state measure authorized by law to be
submitted to the voters at that election.

(2) The candidate or
candidates of the major political party which received the highest number of
votes from the electors of this state for the office of president of the United
States at the last presidential election shall appear first following the
appropriate office heading, the candidate or candidates of the other major
political parties shall follow according to the votes cast for their nominees
for president at the last presidential election, and independent candidates and
the candidate or candidates of all other parties shall follow in the order of
their qualification with the secretary of state.

(3) The names of
candidates for president and vice-president for each political party shall be
grouped together with a single response position for a voter to indicate his or
her choice.

(4) All paper ballots
and ballot cards shall be sequentially numbered in such a way to permit removal
of such numbers without leaving any identifying marks on the ballot.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.42.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 329 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Each political party
organization shall have the power to:

(1) Make its own rules
and regulations;

(2) Call conventions;

(3) Elect delegates to
conventions, state and national;

(4) Designate
candidates to appear on the primary ballot under rules filed with the secretary
of state at least sixty days before the primary;

(5) Fill
vacancies on the ticket in accordance with RCW 29.18.150;

(((5))) (6)
Provide for the nomination of presidential electors; and

(((6))) (7)
Perform all functions inherent in such an organization((: PROVIDED, That
only major political parties shall have the power to designate candidates to
appear on the state primary election ballot as provided in RCW 29.18.150 as now
or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 4. RCW 29.62.010 and 1990 c
59 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

Every canvassing board
or officer responsible for canvassing and certifying the returns of any primary
or election shall:

(1) Adopt
administrative rules to facilitate and govern the canvassing process in that
jurisdiction;

(2) For each primary
and election, prepare and sign a statement of the returns for each office,
candidate, and issue voted on in that jurisdiction, categorized by the party
or independent affiliation indicated by voters;

(3) If, at a partisan
primary, two or more candidates of the same party receive the greatest, and
identical, number of votes for an office, resolve the tie vote by lot;

(4) If, at a
nonpartisan or judicial primary, two or more candidates receive the second
greatest, and identical, number of votes for that office or position, resolve
the tie vote by lot.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.62.090 and 1999 c
298 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Immediately after the
official results of a state primary or general election in a county are
ascertained, the county auditor or other election officer shall make an
abstract of the number of registered voters in each precinct and of all the
votes cast in the county at such state primary or general election for and
against state measures and for each candidate for federal, state, and
legislative office or for any other office which the secretary of state is
required by law to canvass, categorized by the party or independent affiliation
indicated by voters. The abstract shall be entered on blanks furnished by
the secretary of state or on compatible computer printouts approved by the
secretary of state, and transmitted to the secretary of state no later than the
next business day following the certification by the county canvassing board.

(2) After each general
election, the county auditor or other election officer shall provide to the
secretary of state a report of the number of absentee ballots cast in each
precinct for and against state measures and for each candidate for federal,
state, and legislative office or for any other office which the secretary of
state is required by law to canvass. The report may be included in the
abstract required by this section or may be transmitted to the secretary of
state separately, but in no event later than March 31 of the year following the
election. Absentee ballot results may be incorporated into votes cast at the
polls for each precinct or may be reported separately on a precinct-by-precinct
basis.

(3) If
absentee ballot results are not incorporated into votes cast at the polls, the
county auditor or other election official may aggregate results from more than
one precinct if the auditor, pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary of
state, finds that reporting a single precinct's absentee ballot results would
jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot. To the extent practicable,
precincts for which absentee results are aggregated shall be contiguous.

---
END ---