BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
84.36.560 and 1999 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) The real and personal property owned or used by
a nonprofit

_8 entity in providing rental housing for very
low-income households

_9 or used to provide space for the placement of a
mobile home for a

10 very low-income household within a mobile home park
is exempt from

11 taxation if:

12 (a) The benefit of the exemption inures to the
nonprofit

13 ((organization, association, or corporation)) entity;

14 (b) At least seventy-five percent of the occupied
dwelling

15 units in the rental housing or lots in a mobile home
park are

16 occupied by a very low-income household((s));
and

17 (c) The rental housing ((was)) or lots in
a mobile home park

18 were insured, financed, or assisted in whole or
in part through:

p. 1 SB
6092

_1 (i) A federal or state housing program administered
by the

_2 department of community, trade, and economic
development; or

_3 (ii) An affordable housing levy authorized under RCW
84.52.105.

_4 (2) If less than seventy-five percent of the occupied
dwelling

_5 units within the rental housing or lots in the mobile
home park

_6 are occupied by very low-income households, the rental
housing

_7 ((used to provide housing for very low-income
households)) or

_8 mobile home park is eligible for a partial
exemption on the real

_9 property and a total exemption of the housing's or
park's personal

10 property as follows:

11 (a) ((The)) A partial exemption shall
be allowed for each

12 dwelling unit in the rental housing or for each lot
in a mobile

13 home park occupied by a very low-income
household((s)).

14 (b) The amount of exemption shall be calculated by
multiplying

15 the assessed value of the property reasonably necessary
to provide

16 the rental housing or to operate the mobile home park
by a

17 fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number
of dwelling

18 units or lots occupied by very low-income
households as of

19 December 31st of the first assessment year in which
the rental

20 housing or mobile home park becomes operational or on
January 1st

21 of ((the)) each subsequent assessment year
for which the exemption

22 is claimed. The denominator of the fraction is the
total number of

23 ((occupied)) dwelling units ((as of)) or
lots occupied as of

24 December 31st of the first assessment year the rental
housing or

25 mobile home park becomes operational and January
1st of ((the))

26 each subsequent assessment year for which
exemption is claimed.

27 (3) ((Rental housing for very low-income
households is exempt

28 from property taxation only if the nonprofit
operating the housing

29 is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the
federal

30 internal revenue code)) If a currently exempt
rental housing unit

31 or mobile home lot was occupied by a very low-income
household at

32 the time the exemption was granted, and the income of
the

33 household subsequently rises above fifty percent of
the median

34 income but remains at or below eighty percent of
median income

35 adjusted for family size as most recently determined
by the

36 federal department of housing and urban development
for the county

37 in which the rental housing or mobile home park is
located, the

38 exemption will continue as long as the housing
continues to meet

SB 6092 p. 2

_1 the certification requirements of a very low-income
housing

_2 program administered by the department of community,
trade, and

_3 economic development or the affordable housing levy
under RCW

_4 84.52.105. However, if a dwelling unit or a lot
becomes vacant and

_5 is subsequently re-rented, the income of the new
household must be

_6 at or below fifty percent of the median income
adjusted for family

_7 size as most recently determined by the federal
department of

_8 housing and urban development for the county in which
the rental

_9 housing or mobile home park is located to remain
exempt from

10 property tax.

11 (4) If at the time of initial application the
property is

12 unoccupied, or subsequent to the initial application
the property

13 is unoccupied because of renovations, and the
property is not

14 currently being used for the exempt purpose
authorized by this

15 section but will be used for the exempt purpose
within two

16 assessment years, the property shall be eligible for
a property

17 tax exemption for the assessment year in which the
claim for

18 exemption is submitted under the following
conditions:

19 (a) A commitment for financing to acquire,
construct, renovate,

20 or otherwise convert the property to provide housing
for very low-

21 income households has been obtained, in whole or in
part, by the

22 nonprofit entity claiming the exemption from:

23 (i) A federal or state housing program
administered by the

24 department of community, trade, and economic
development; or

25 (ii) An affordable housing levy authorized under
RCW 84.52.105;

26 (b) The nonprofit entity has manifested its
intent in writing

27 to construct, remodel, or otherwise convert the
property to

28 housing for very low-income households; and

29 (c) Only the portion of property that will be
used to provide

30 housing or lots for very low-income households shall
be exempt

31 under this section.

32 (((4))) (5) To be exempt under this
section, the property must

33 be used exclusively for the purposes for which the
exemption is

34 granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

35 (((5))) (6) The nonprofit entity
qualifying for ((the)) a

36 property tax exemption under this section ((by
providing rental

37 housing for very low-income households)) may
agree to make

38 payments to the city, county, or other political
subdivision for

p. 3 SB
6092

_1 improvements, services, and facilities furnished by the
city,

_2 county, or political subdivision for the benefit of the
rental

_3 housing. However, these payments shall not exceed the
amount last

_4 levied as the annual tax of the city, county, or
political

_5 subdivision upon the property prior to exemption.

_6 (((6))) (7) As used in this section:

_7 (a) "Group home" means a single-family
dwelling financed, in

_8 whole or in part, by the department of community,
trade, and

_9 economic development or by an affordable housing levy
under RCW

10 84.52.105. The residents of a group home shall not
be considered to

11 jointly constitute a household, but each resident
shall be

12 considered to be a separate household occupying a
separate

13 dwelling unit. The individual incomes of the
residents shall not be

14 aggregated for purposes of this exemption;

15 (b) "Mobile home lot" or "mobile
home park" means the same as

16 these terms are defined in RCW 59.20.030;

17 (c) "Occupied dwelling unit" means
a living unit that is

18 occupied by an individual or household as of December
31st of the

19 first assessment year the rental housing becomes
operational or is

20 occupied by an individual or household on January
1st of ((the))

21 each subsequent assessment year in which the
claim for exemption

22 is submitted. If the housing facility is comprised
of three or

23 fewer dwelling units and there are any unoccupied
units on January

24 1st, the department shall base the amount of the
exemption upon

25 the number of occupied dwelling units as of December
31st of the

26 first assessment year the rental housing becomes
operational and

27 on May 1st of each subsequent assessment year in
which the claim

28 for exemption is submitted;

29 (((b))) (d) "Rental housing"
means a residential housing

30 facility or group home that is occupied but not
owned by very low-

31 income households;

32 (((c))) (e) "Very low-income
household((s))" means a single

33 person, family, or unrelated persons living together
whose income

34 is at or below fifty percent of the median income adjusted
for

35 family size as most recently determined by the federal
department

36 of housing and urban development for the county in which
the

37 rental housing is located and in effect as of January
1st of the

38 year the application for exemption is submitted; and

SB 6092 p. 4

_1 (((d))) (f) "Nonprofit entity"
means a:

_2 (i) Nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 ((and
includes a))

_3 that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c)
of the federal

_4 internal revenue code;

_5 (ii) Limited partnership where ((the))
a nonprofit ((or)) as

_6 defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from income
tax under

_7 section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code,
a public

_8 corporation established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670,
((and)) or

_9 35.21.730, a housing authority created under RCW
35.82.030 or

10 35.82.300, or a housing authority meeting the
definition in RCW

11 35.82.210(2)(a) is a general partner((,));
or ((a))

12 (iii) Limited liability company where ((the))
a nonprofit ((or

13 the)) as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is
exempt from income tax

14 under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue
code, a

15 public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660,
35.21.670, or

16 35.21.730, a housing authority established under RCW
35.82.030 or

17 35.82.300, or a housing authority meeting the
definition in RCW

18 35.82.210(2)(a) is a managing member.

19 Sec. 2. RCW
84.36.805 and 1999 c 203 s 2 and 1999 c 139 s 3 are

20 each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

21 (1) In order to qualify for an exemption under this
chapter and

22 RCW 84.36.560, the nonprofit organizations,
associations, or

23 corporations must satisfy the conditions in this
section.

24 (2) The property must be used exclusively for the
actual

25 operation of the activity for which exemption is
granted, unless

26 otherwise provided, and does not exceed an amount
reasonably

27 necessary for that purpose, except:

28 (a) The loan or rental of the property does not
subject the

29 property to tax if:

30 (i) The rents and donations received for the use of
the portion

31 of the property are reasonable and do not exceed the
maintenance

32 and operation expenses attributable to the portion of
the property

33 loaned or rented; and

34 (ii) Except for the exemptions under RCW
84.36.030(4) and

35 84.36.037, the property would be exempt from tax if
owned by the

36 organization to which it is loaned or rented;

p. 5 SB
6092

_1 (b) The use of the property for fund-raising
activities does

_2 not subject the property to tax if the fund-raising
activities are

_3 consistent with the purposes for which the exemption is
granted.

_4 (3) The property must be irrevocably dedicated to
the purpose

_5 for which exemption has been granted, and on the
liquidation,

_6 dissolution, or abandonment by said organization,
association, or

_7 corporation, said property will not inure directly or
indirectly

_8 to the benefit of any shareholder or individual, except
a

_9 nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
which too

10 would be entitled to property tax exemption. This
property need not

11 be irrevocably dedicated if it is leased or rented to
those

12 qualified for exemption under this chapter or RCW
84.36.560 for

13 leased property, but only if under the terms of the
lease or

14 rental agreement the nonprofit organization,
association, or

15 corporation receives the benefit of the exemption.

16 (4) The facilities and services must be available to
all

17 regardless of race, color, national origin or ancestry.

18 (5) The organization, association, or corporation
must be duly

19 licensed or certified where such licensing or
certification is

20 required by law or regulation.

21 (6) Property sold to organizations, associations, or

22 corporations with an option to be repurchased by the
seller shall

23 not qualify for exempt status. This subsection does
not apply to

24 property sold to a nonprofit entity, as defined in
RCW

25 84.36.560(7), by:

26 (a) A nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that
is exempt from

27 income tax under section 501(c) of the federal
internal revenue

28 code;

29 (b) A governmental entity established under RCW
35.21.660,

30 35.21.670, or 35.21.730;

31 (c) A housing authority created under RCW
35.82.030;

32 (d) A housing authority meeting the definition in
RCW

33 35.82.210(2)(a); or

34 (e) A housing authority established under RCW
35.82.300.

35 (7) The department shall have access to its books in
order to

36 determine whether the nonprofit organization,
association, or

37 corporation is exempt from taxes under this chapter and
RCW

38 84.36.560.

SB 6092 p. 6

_1 (8) This section does not apply to exemptions
granted under RCW

_2 84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 7 SB
6092