BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that new approaches are needed to serve youth with either serious emotional
disturbances or serious behavioral disturbances or both.

(2) The legislature finds
that an organization with a long history of serving youth has secured private
foundation funding that can be combined with existing state appropriated
funding to establish a blended funding demonstration project to test a new
partnership approach for serving youth with either serious emotional
disturbances or serious behavioral disturbances or both.

(3) The legislature
declares its support for the creative application of statutory authority by the
department to implement this blended funding demonstration project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The secretary and the
superintendent of public instruction shall enter into a joint agreement with an
organization with a long history of serving youth that has secured private
foundation funding to be combined with existing state appropriated funding to
establish a blended funding demonstration project to test a new partnership
approach for serving youth with either serious emotional disturbances or
serious behavioral disturbances or both. The secretary of the department shall
have primary responsibility for negotiating and executing the joint agreement.

(2) The secretary and
the superintendent of public instruction shall transfer to the organization
described in this section appropriations made in the biennial operating
budget. These funds represent a reallocation of existing resources used to
serve youth with either serious emotional disturbances or serious behavioral
disturbances or both. The secretary shall transfer the funds described in this
section notwithstanding RCW 71.24.035(15)(c).

(3) If any federal
restrictions exist that create barriers to the transfer of funds appropriated
to the department or the superintendent of public instruction, or if other
federal requirements exist that hamper the implementation of the blended
funding demonstration project described in this section, the secretary and the
superintendent of public instruction shall assist the governor in immediately
applying to the federal government for waivers of the federal restrictions or
requirements.

(4) The secretary and
the superintendent of public instruction shall exercise existing statutory
authority to the extent necessary to facilitate the immediate and complete
implementation of this blended funding demonstration project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The blended funding
demonstration project to test a new partnership approach for serving youth with
either serious emotional disturbances or serious behavioral disturbances or
both shall:

(1) Serve at least
twenty-seven youth in the least restrictive setting at a lower cost than
traditional approaches;

(2) Provide a
comprehensive assessment, family advocacy, care monitoring, and evaluation;

(3) Provide individual
and family therapy, therapeutic child care, crisis intervention, residential
care, and access to other services through community-based partner agencies;

(4) Create and maintain
a data tracking system; and

(5) Evaluate the
individual outcomes of the youth served by reviewing academic performance,
placements in psychiatric hospitalization or residential care, involvement with
the juvenile justice system, out-of-home placement, and quality and amount of
community involvement. The evaluation shall compare the results of children
receiving the services described above with the results of a similar cohort of
children receiving traditional services in a residential setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Sections 1 through 3 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---