BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

All school districts
have a duty to advise each parent or guardian who has requested information on
education alternatives of the differences between home-based education provided
for in chapter 28A.200 RCW and all forms of alternative education provided for
by law or rule. The school district must provide each parent or guardian
requesting information about home-based education or alternative education a
document to be signed by the parent or guardian in substantially the following
form:

INFORMED CONSENT REGARDING
INSTRUCTION

Name of student:
. . . . . . Identification:
. . . . . .

Dear Parent or Guardian:

You have inquired about
education alternatives for your child. You have a right to know by law that
there are differences between home-based instruction and alternative education.

Home-based education is
governed by chapter 28A.200 RCW. Chapter 28A.200 RCW recognizes that the
parent has the responsibility for all educational decisions relating to
philosophy or doctrine, selection of books, teaching materials, and curriculum,
and methods, timing, and place for the provision or evaluation of home-based instruction.
Subject to certain annual standardized student testing requirements, excluding
the Washington assessment of student learning, the parent is free to educate
the parent's child as he or she sees fit. The parent and the child receive no
financial support from the state or the school district. The school district
does not receive credit for funding purposes for the child if the child
receives home-based schooling. The applicable statutes are set forth on the
back of this form.

The various alternative
education programs are also governed by state law and rule. There are
different types of alternative education. Although the parent can be part of
his or her child's education, the school district, subject to state and federal
law, is still in control of decisions regarding curriculum. The school
district also receives credit for your child's enrollment for the purpose of
state funding.

I, parent or guardian,
understand the difference between home-based education and alternative
education and want my child to receive:

. . . Home-based
schooling

. . . Alternative
education through (name of school district)

DATED this
. . . day of . . . . . ., year.

. . . . . . . . .
.

Parent or guardian

The school
district shall not receive any level of state funding for any student placed in
alternative education under chapter 28A.150 RCW et seq. unless and until the
district provides the signed consent form provided for in this section to the
superintendent of public instruction.

--- END ---