BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
35.79.010 and 1965 c 7 s 35.79.010 are each amended to

_5 read as follows:

_6 The owners of an interest in any real estate
abutting upon any

_7 street or alley who may desire to vacate the street or
alley, or

_8 any part thereof, may petition the legislative authority
to make

_9 vacation, giving a description of the property to be
vacated, or

10 the legislative authority may itself initiate by
resolution such

11 vacation procedure. The petition or resolution shall be
filed with

12 the city or town clerk, and, if the petition is signed
by the

13 owners of more than two-thirds of the property abutting
upon the

14 part of such street or alley sought to be vacated, the
legislative

15 authority by resolution shall fix a time when the
petition will be

16 heard and determined by such authority or a committee
thereof, or

17 by an assigned hearing examiner, which time shall
not be more than

p. 1 SB
6095

_1 sixty days nor less than twenty days after the date of
the passage

_2 of such resolution.

_3 Sec. 2. RCW
35.79.030 and 1987 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read

_4 as follows:

_5 The hearing on ((such)) the petition
may be held before the

_6 legislative authority((,)) or ((before)) a
committee thereof, or

_7 before an assigned hearing examiner, upon the
date fixed by

_8 resolution or at the time ((said)) the
hearing may be adjourned

_9 to. If the hearing is before ((such)) a
committee or an assigned

10 hearing examiner the same shall, following the
hearing, report its

11 recommendation on the petition to the legislative
authority, which

12 may adopt or reject the recommendation. If ((such))
the hearing

13 ((be)) is held before ((such)) a
committee or an assigned hearing

14 examiner, it ((shall)) is not ((be))
necessary ((to hold)) for a

15 hearing to be held on the petition before ((such))
the legislative

16 authority. If the legislative authority determines to
grant

17 ((said)) the petition or any part thereof,
((such)) the city or

18 town ((shall be authorized and have authority)) may
by ordinance

19 ((to)) vacate such street, or alley, or any part
thereof, and the

20 ordinance may provide that it ((shall)) does
not become effective

21 until the owners of property abutting upon the street or
alley, or

22 part thereof so vacated, ((shall)) compensate ((such))
the city or

23 town in an amount ((which does not exceed one-half
the appraised

24 value of the area so vacated, except in the event the
subject

25 property or portions thereof were acquired at public
expense,

26 compensation may be required in an amount)) equal
to the full

27 appraised value of the vacation: PROVIDED, That such
ordinance

28 may provide that the city retain an easement or the
right to

29 exercise and grant easements in respect to the vacated
land for

30 the construction, repair, and maintenance of public
utilities and

31 services. A certified copy of such ordinance shall be
recorded by

32 the clerk of the legislative authority and in the office
of the

33 auditor of the county in which the vacated land is
located.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 6095 p. 2