BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
35A.47.040 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.47.040 are each

_5 amended to read as follows:

_6 Every code city ((shall have authority to)) may
permit and

_7 regulate under such restrictions and conditions as it
may set by

_8 charter or ordinance and ((to)) may grant
nonexclusive franchises

_9 for the use of public streets, bridges or other public
ways,

10 structures or places above or below the surface of the
ground for

11 all private and publicly owned or operated utilities
including,

12 but not limited to, railroads and other routes
and facilities for

13 public conveyances, for poles, conduits, tunnels, towers
and

14 structures, pipes and wires and appurtenances thereof
for

15 transmission and distribution of electrical energy,
signals and

16 other methods of communication, for gas, steam,
and liquid fuels,

17 for water, sewer, and other private and publicly
owned and

p. 1 SB
6096

_1 operated facilities for public service. The power
hereby granted

_2 shall be in addition to the franchise authority granted
by general

_3 law to cities.

_4 No ordinance or resolution granting any franchise in
a code

_5 city for any purpose ((shall)) may be
adopted or passed by the

_6 city's legislative body on the day of its introduction
nor for

_7 five days thereafter, nor at any other than a regular
meeting nor

_8 without first being submitted to the city attorney, nor
without

_9 having been granted by the approving vote of at least a
majority

10 of the entire legislative body, nor without being
published at

11 least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the
city

12 before becoming effective.

13 The city council may require a bond in a reasonable
amount for

14 any person or corporation obtaining a franchise from the
city

15 conditioned upon the faithful performance of the
conditions and

16 terms of the franchise and providing a recovery on the
bond in

17 case of failure to perform the terms and conditions of
the

18 franchise.

19 A code city may exercise the authority hereby
granted,

20 notwithstanding a contrary limitation of any preexisting
charter

21 provision.

22 Sec. 2. RCW
36.94.180 and 1986 c 234 s 34 are each amended to read

23 as follows:

24 In the event of the annexation to a city or town of
an area, or

25 incorporation of an area, in which a county is operating
a

26 sewerage and/or water system, the property, facilities,
and

27 equipment of such sewerage and/or water system lying
within the

28 annexed or incorporated area ((may)) shall
be transferred to the

29 city or town, on the request of the city or town,
if such transfer

30 will not materially affect the operation of any of the
remaining

31 county system, subject to the assumption by the city or
town of

32 the county's obligations relating to such property,
facilities,

33 and equipment, under the procedures specified in, and pursuant
to

34 the authority contained in, chapter 35.13A RCW.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

SB 6096 p. 2