BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_4 Sec. 1. RCW
39.34.030 and 1992 c 161 s 4 are each amended to read

_5 as follows:

_6 (1) Any power or powers, privileges, or
authority exercised or

_7 capable of exercise by a public agency of this state may
be

_8 exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other public
agency of this

_9 state having the power or powers, privilege, or
authority, and

10 jointly with any public agency of any other state or of
the United

11 States to the extent that laws of such other state or of
the

12 United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment.
Any agency

13 of the state government when acting jointly with any
public agency

14 may exercise and enjoy all of the powers, privileges,
and

15 authority conferred by this chapter upon a public
agency. Any power

16 or powers, privileges, or authority exercised or
capable of

17 exercise by one or more public agencies of this state
may be

18 exercised jointly through a cooperative agreement
with any other

p. 1 SB
6097

_1 public agency of this state so long as at least one
of the

_2 participating public agencies has the power or
powers, privilege,

_3 or authority. Where two or more public agencies of
this state

_4 jointly exercise through a cooperative agreement any
power or

_5 powers, privilege, or authority held by at least one
of the

_6 participating agencies, the participating agencies
acting through

_7 the joint powers agreement shall be empowered to act
as fully as

_8 if the participating agencies were one combined
public agency

_9 vested with the same power or powers, privileges, or
authority.

10 (2) Any two or more public agencies may enter into
agreements

11 with one another for joint or cooperative action
pursuant to the

12 provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, That any such
joint or

13 cooperative action by public agencies which are
educational

14 service districts and/or school districts shall comply
with the

15 provisions of RCW 28A.320.080. Appropriate action by
ordinance,

16 resolution, or otherwise pursuant to law of the
governing bodies

17 of the participating public agencies ((shall be))
is necessary

18 before any such agreement may enter into force.

19 (3) Any such agreement shall specify the following:

20 (a) Its duration;

21 (b) The precise organization, composition,
and nature of any

22 separate legal or administrative entity created thereby
together

23 with the powers delegated thereto, provided such entity
may be

24 legally created. Such entity may include a nonprofit
corporation

25 organized pursuant to chapter 24.03 or 24.06 RCW whose
membership

26 is limited solely to the participating public agencies
or a

27 partnership organized pursuant to chapter 25.04 RCW
whose partners

28 are limited solely to participating public agencies and
the funds

29 of any such corporation or partnership shall be subject
to audit

30 in the manner provided by law for the auditing of public
funds;

31 (c) Its purpose or purposes;

32 (d) The manner of financing the joint or cooperative

33 undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget
therefor;

34 (e) The permissible method or methods to be employed
in

35 accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the
agreement

36 and for disposing of property upon such partial or
complete

37 termination;

38 (f) Any other necessary and proper matters.

SB 6097 p. 2

_1 (4) In the event that the agreement does not
establish a

_2 separate legal entity to conduct the joint or
cooperative

_3 undertaking, the agreement shall, in addition to items enumerated

_4 in subsection (3)(a), (c), (d), (e), and
(f) ((enumerated in

_5 subdivision (3) hereof)) of this section,
contain the following:

_6 (a) Provision for an administrator or a joint board
responsible

_7 for administer­ing the joint or cooperative
undertaking. In the case

_8 of a joint board, public agencies party to the agreement
shall be

_9 represented;

10 (b) The manner of acquiring, holding, and
disposing of real and

11 personal property used in the joint or cooperative
undertaking.

12 Any joint board is authorized to establish a special
fund with a

13 state, county, city, or district treasurer servicing an
involved

14 public agency designated "Operating fund of
. . . . . . joint board".

15 (5) No agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall
relieve

16 any public agency of any obligation or responsibility
imposed upon

17 it by law except that to the extent of actual and timely

18 performance thereof by a joint board or other legal or

19 administrative entity created by an agreement made
hereunder, the

20 performance may be offered in satisfaction of the
obligation or

21 responsibility.

22 (6) Financing of joint projects by agreement shall
be as

23 provided by law.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
6097