BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) Washington's tax
system is one of the most unique systems in the nation. The state relies
primarily on the sales tax, the business and occupation (B&O) tax, and the
property tax. (a) The state relies most heavily on one of the highest sales
taxes in the nation. The sales tax is a large and efficient revenue producer.
It is relatively popular because it is paid in small increments. Since the
sales tax is based on consumption, however, the tax is volatile and unstable
during economic downturns and can cause large budget deficits.

(b) Washington is the
only state in the nation that levies a B&O tax on gross income. Since the
B&O tax is not based on profit, tax collections are very stable. However,
the B&O tax favors established, profitable firms at the expense of start-up
firms and firms with low‑profit margins.

(c) The property tax is
the oldest revenue source in the state, having been established before
statehood. Property taxes are a very stable source of revenue. While
Washington's property taxes are only slightly above average for the states, the
tax is perceived as high by the taxpayers. In addition, the tax is complex and
the administrative costs are high.

Washington's tax system
has remained relatively unchanged since 1935. Since that time, the state has
grown in population and emphasis from a more agrarian society to a more
industrial, technology-based society. It is the intent of the legislature to
study the current tax system in the state of Washington to determine how well
it functions and how it can be changed to better serve the citizens of the
state in the twenty-first century.

(2) The department of
revenue shall create a committee on taxation to study the elasticity, equity,
and adequacy of the state's tax system. The committee on taxation shall
consist of eleven members. The committee shall include six academic scholars
appointed by the department of revenue from the fields of economics, taxation,
business administration, public administration, public policy, and other relevant
disciplines as determined by the department. In making the appointments, the
department shall consult with the majority and minority leaders in the senate,
the co-speakers in the house of representatives, the chair of the ways and
means committee in the senate, and the co-chairs of the finance committee in
the house of representatives. The governor and the chairs of the majority and
minority caucuses in each house of the legislature shall each appoint one
member to the committee. These appointments may be legislative members.

(3) The members of the
committee shall elect a chair. The committee may elect a chair from among
their membership or may elect a nonvoting chair who is not a member of the
committee. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) The purpose of the
study is to determine how well the current tax system functions and how it
might be changed to better serve the citizens of the state in the twenty-first
century. In reviewing options for changes to the tax system to better serve
the citizens of the state, the committee shall develop multiple alternatives to
the existing tax system. To the extent possible, the alternatives shall be
designed to increase the harmony between the tax system of this state and the
surrounding states, encourage commerce and business creation, and encourage
home ownership. In developing alternatives, the committee shall examine and
consider the effects of tax incentives, including exemptions, deferrals, and
credits. The alternatives shall range from incremental improvements in the
current tax structure to complete replacement of the tax structure. In
conducting the study, the committee shall examine the tax structures of other
states and review previous studies regarding tax reform in this state,
including the study conducted by the 1982 Tax Advisory Council and the study
conducted by Governor Gardner's Committee on Washington's Financial Future in
1988. In developing alternatives, the committee shall be guided by the
following criteria:

(a) Administrative
simplicity: A tax system should neither be excessively expensive for the state
to administer nor impose undue recordkeeping and reporting requirements on taxpayers.

(b) Economic
neutrality: A tax system should be designed to minimize distortions in
economic decision making.

(c) Fairness: The
burden of taxation should be equitably spread among the citizens.

(d) Stability: The
revenue of a tax system should not fluctuate dramatically with the condition of
the economy.

(e) Transparency: A
tax system should be designed so that the costs of government are clear to
citizens.

(5) While the committee
may consider all possibilities, most of the alternatives presented by the
committee to the legislature shall be revenue neutral and contain no income
tax.

(6) The department of
revenue shall create an advisory group to include, but not be limited to,
representatives of business, state agencies, local governments, labor,
taxpayers, and other advocacy groups. The group shall provide advice and
assistance to the committee on taxation.

(7) The department of
revenue shall provide staff to the committee for the purpose of the study.

(8) The
committee shall present a final report of the findings of the study and the
alternatives developed by the committee to the ways and means committee in the
senate and the finance committee in the house of representatives by November
30, 2002.

---
END ---