BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The use of wireless
communications devices by motorists has increased in recent years. While
wireless communications devices have assisted with quick reporting of road
emergencies, their use has also contributed to accidents and other mishaps on
Washington state roadways. When motorists hold a wireless communications
device in one hand and drive with the other, their chances of becoming involved
in a traffic mishap increase. It is the legislature's intent to phase out the
use of hand-held wireless communications devices by motorists while operating a
vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, any person operating a moving motor vehicle
while holding a wireless communications device to his or her ear is guilty of a
traffic infraction.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to a person operating:

(a) An authorized
emergency vehicle;

(b) A moving motor
vehicle using a wireless communications device in hands-free mode;

(c) A moving motor vehicle
who uses a hand-held wireless communications device to:

(i) Report illegal
activity;

(ii) Summon medical or
other emergency help;

(iii) Prevent injury to
a person or property.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "hands-free mode" means the use of a wireless
communications device with a speaker phone, headset, or earpiece.

(4) The state preempts
the field of regulating the use of wireless communications devices in motor
vehicles, and this section supersedes any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules,
or regulations enacted by a political subdivision or municipality to regulate
the use of wireless communications devices by the operator of a motor vehicle.

(5) Enforcement of this
section by law enforcement officers may be accomplished only as a secondary
action when a driver of a motor vehicle has been detained for a suspected
violation of this title or an equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect
July 1, 2005.

---
END ---