BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that collaborative transportation partnerships supplement state transportation
revenues and allow the state to use its limited resources for a greater number
of transportation projects. The legislature further finds that additional
safety rest area sites would benefit the traveling public and contribute to the
economic development of nearby communities. Therefore, the legislature directs
the department of transportation to pursue a joint safety rest area
demonstration project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary or
the secretary's designee shall solicit proposals from private and nonprofit
entities for a joint safety rest area demonstration project. To implement the
demonstration project the secretary or designee shall negotiate and enter into
agreements with private or nonprofit entities to provide safety rest area
services.

(2) Each proposal for
the demonstration project must be limited to a specific site. Each proposal
will be weighed on its own merits. If an agreement is selected, the agreement
must be negotiated as a site specific project. Proponents may submit more than
one proposal.

(3) The department may
enter into an agreement with a private or nonprofit entity if it determines
that the proposal is in the public interest, will not impair the safety or
operation of the highway, interfere with the free and safe flow of traffic, and
is consistent with the access control standards. At a minimum, the department
shall include the following requirements in the agreement:

(a) If the department
grants access rights or leases property to the proponent, the proponent shall
provide fair market value consideration to the department;

(b) If the project
involves property owned by the department, the department and the proponent
shall enter into a lease agreement under RCW 47.12.120 for the use of the
property; and

(c) The proponent shall
provide safety rest area service to meet department requirements, at no cost to
the department, as negotiated in the agreement.

(4) The term of the
agreement may not exceed twenty years.

(5) All revenues
received under the terms of the agreement for the demonstration project must be
placed in the motor vehicle fund. The department shall provide an initial
report to the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by December 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, on the status of the
project and revenues received from the project.

(6) The demonstration
project developed by this section is exempt from RCW 41.06.380 and 74.18.220.

Sec. 3. RCW 47.12.125 and 1999 c
94 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys paid to the
state of Washington under any of the provisions of RCW 47.12.120 shall be
deposited in the department's advance right of way revolving fund, except
moneys that are subject to federal aid reimbursement and moneys received from
rental of capital facilities properties, which shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund. Any moneys received from the demonstration project authorized
in section 2 of this act must be placed in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.12.244 and 1991 c
291 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created the
"advance right of way revolving fund" in the custody of the
treasurer, into which the department is authorized to deposit directly and
expend without appropriation:

(1) An initial deposit
of ten million dollars from the motor vehicle fund included in the department
of transportation's 1991‑93 budget;

(2) All moneys received
by the department as rental income from real properties that are not subject to
federal aid reimbursement, except moneys received from rental of capital
facilities properties ((as defined in chapter 47.13 RCW)). Any
moneys received from the demonstration project authorized in section 2 of this
act must be placed in the motor vehicle fund; and

(3) Any
federal moneys available for acquisition of right of way for future
construction under the provisions of section 108 of Title 23, United States
Code.

---
END ---