BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For each real
property that sells for five hundred thousand dollars or more per housing unit
or seven hundred thousand dollars or more per housing unit and accessory
dwelling unit, an excise tax is imposed upon each such sale of real property at
the rate of one percent of the selling price. An amount equal to eighty-five
percent of the proceeds of this excise tax shall remain with the county in
which the real property is located. An amount equal to fifteen percent of the
proceeds of this excise tax shall be deposited in the Washington housing trust
fund created in RCW 43.185.030.

(2) The county must use
the moneys received under this section for the purposes allowed in RCW
43.185.050(2) and may grant the moneys received under this section to any organization
eligible under RCW 43.185.060. Organizations receiving moneys under this
subsection shall use the moneys for the purposes allowed in RCW 43.185.050(2).

(3) A county may enter
into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW with a public agency, as
defined by RCW 39.34.020, for the public agency to receive and expend or grant
the money the county would otherwise expend under this section.

(4) A county may elect
to have the moneys they would otherwise receive under this section deposited in
the Washington housing trust fund created in RCW 43.185.030.

(5) For the purposes of
this section, "housing unit" means a building or portion of a
building designed for or used as the residence or living quarters of one or
more persons living together, or of one family.

(6) For
the purposes of this section, "accessory dwelling unit" means a
housing unit within or attached to a housing unit and that is subordinate in
size, location, and function to the other housing unit.

--- END ---