BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In no circumstance
will any state, county, city, or town public funds be spent on a primary if a
public declaration of party affiliation is required before a voter may
participate in the primary. This section does not apply to presidential
primaries under chapter 29.19 RCW.

(2) A
public declaration of party affiliation includes, but is not limited to,
requiring voters to register their party affiliation, requiring a public
declaration of affiliation so a voter may participate in the primary, requiring
a voter to sign a pledge to support the political parties before a voter may
participate in a primary, registering a voter with a party when the voter
selects a political party's ballot at a primary, or recording a voter's choice
of party ballot at the primary.

--- END ---