BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 90.03.330 and 1987 c
109 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After a permit
holder has completed the project as provided in the permit and has put water to
beneficial use, the permit holder must submit to the department a statement to
that effect. The statement must be made on a form provided by the department
and signed before a notary public.

(2) The department
must review the following information before it issues a water right
certificate under this section:

(a) A description
and the location of any constructed works and other equipment or methods used
for acquiring, storing, conveying, and making beneficial use of water,
including the sizes and capacities of the facilities;

(b) An accurate and
legible site map suitable for permanent recordkeeping that illustrates the
location of facilities and the lands upon which water has been beneficially
used;

(c) Photographs of
major facilities and photographic evidence of beneficial use;

(d) The source or
sources from which water is withdrawn or diverted;

(e) The beneficial uses
of water that are served by the works;

(f) The date water
was first beneficially used under the permit;

(g) The maximum
instantaneous and annual quantity of water that has been put to beneficial use
based on measurements of flow through the system during operation;

(h) A legal
description of the lands on which water has been beneficially used;

(i) For irrigation,
the acreage that has been irrigated, the crops grown, and the type of
irrigation system employed;

(j) For domestic or
municipal water supply, the number and type of housing units, businesses, or
other end uses that have received and beneficially used water from the system;

(k) For
hydroelectric power, the head, the maximum flow used during generation, the
capacity of turbines, and the maximum electrical output;

(l) Evidence that
the conditions of the permit have been complied with including, but not limited
to, the proper installation and operation of any required measuring devices,
fish screens, well inspection ports, well identification tags, and well surface
seals; and

(m) Any other
information the department determines is necessary to confirm that the permit
holder has completed the project and has put water to beneficial use.

(3) Upon a
showing satisfactory to the department that any appropriation or change of
water right has been perfected in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, it shall be the duty of the department to issue to the applicant a
certificate stating such facts in a form to be prescribed by ((him)) the
department, and such certificate shall thereupon be recorded with the
department. Any original water right certificate issued, as provided by this
chapter, shall be recorded with the department and thereafter, at the expense
of the party receiving the same, be transmitted by the department ((transmitted))
to the county auditor of the county or counties where the distributing system
or any part thereof is located, and be recorded in the office of such county
auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to the owner thereof.

(4) The permit
holder may choose at his or her expense to use a water rights examiner
certified by the department to conduct the proof examination in subsection (2)
of this section. If the person elects to use a certified water rights
examiner, the examiner must prepare a report of the proof examination and
submit it to the department. The first page of the report and the first page
of any attachments to the report, including any map or maps, must have the
written certification and signature of the water rights examiner and the permit
holder attesting to the truth and accuracy of the contents. The form of the
written certification must be specified by the department.

(5) The
department shall make its decision whether to issue a certificate within one
hundred twenty days of receiving the report of a certified water rights
examiner provided to the department under this section.

--- END ---