BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 77.70 RCW to read as follows:

In order to administer
a Puget Sound crab pot buoy tag program, the department may charge a fee to
Puget Sound crab industry licensees to reimburse the department for the
production of Puget Sound crab pot buoy tags and the administration of a Puget
Sound crab pot buoy tag program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 77.70 RCW to read as follows:

The Puget Sound crab
pot buoy tag account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
revenues from fees from section 1 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from this account may be used for the production of crab
pot buoy tags and the administration of a Puget Sound crab pot buoy tag
program. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---