BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 19.28 RCW, to be codified after RCW 19.28.301, under the subchapter
heading "provisions applicable to electrical installations and
telecommications installations," to read as follows:

Where
circuit power sources for installation of signaling circuits, power-limited
circuits, and related equipment do not exceed twenty-five volts or fifty volt
amps and where the total length of all conductors does not exceed one thousand
feet, no certificate is required. Such equipment includes fire protection
signaling systems, intrusion alarms, nonutility owned communication systems,
and similar low-energy circuits and equipment.

--- END ---