BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Ultra-fuel-efficient
vehicle" means a vehicle that averages greater than forty-six miles per
gallon of fuel as certified by the manufacturer, including but not limited to a
gasoline-electric hybrid vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

Effective with
registrations that are due or become due beginning January 1, 2003, the
department shall design and issue optional permits for owners of
manufacturer-certified ultra-fuel-efficient vehicles that will entitle the
operator of the vehicle to use special lanes as specified in RCW 46.61.165 and
47.52.025. The department shall charge an annual fee of two hundred dollars
for the permit. The permit is nontransferable. The department shall send the
fee to the state treasurer for deposit in the multimodal transportation
account.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c
206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The state department of
transportation and the local authorities are authorized to reserve all or any
portion of any highway under their respective jurisdictions, including any
designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation
vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the
highway or will aid in the conservation of energy resources. The department
may open any such lanes to use by single-occupant vehicles that are
ultra-fuel-efficient at such times or locations when the addition of these
vehicles would not unduly contribute to congestion or impede the flow of
traffic. The vehicle must also display a permit issued by the department of
licensing under section 2 of this act authorizing the use of such lanes. The
permit must be placed on the motor vehicle as prescribed by the department.
Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility
may be declared to be effective at all times or at specified times of day or on
specified days. Violation of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the
appropriate authority under this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 4. RCW 47.52.025 and 1974
ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Highway authorities of
the state, counties, and incorporated cities and towns, in addition to the
specific powers granted in this chapter, shall also have, and may exercise,
relative to limited access facilities, any and all additional authority, now or
hereafter vested in them relative to highways or streets within their
respective jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of
such limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic. Such
highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or portions
thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive or preferential
use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, or private motor
vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of passengers when such
limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway facility or
will aid in the conservation of energy resources. The department may open
any such lanes to use by single-occupant vehicles that are ultra-fuel-efficient
at such times or locations when the addition of these vehicles would not unduly
contribute to congestion or impede the flow of traffic. The vehicle must also
display a permit issued by the department of licensing under section 2 of this
act authorizing the use of such lanes. The permit must be placed on the motor
vehicle as prescribed by the department. Regulations authorizing such
exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be
effective at all time or at specified times of day or on specified days.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The department of
transportation shall work with the federal highway administration and other necessary
federal agencies to implement the intent of this act.

---
END ---