BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that each watershed in Washington is unique and requires its own management
activities and techniques to protect and enhance the quality and stability of
the watershed for the benefit of communities and residents. Such activities
and techniques are most effective and efficient when they fully integrate and
utilize the collaborative efforts of interested citizens and businesses,
nonprofit organizations, tribes, local, state, and federal agencies, and state
colleges and universities. Voluntary nonprofit organizations whose mission is
the protection, enhancement, and restoration of the state's watersheds and
natural resources perform an important public service, not only through the
projects they implement, but by helping to educate citizens about the
significance of these activities and providing a way for citizens to become
involved. The skills, community support, volunteer labor, and donations of
goods and services that they generate substantially advance protection,
enhancement, and restoration of watersheds and natural resources. Among a
large number of other worthy organizations, over two hundred coordinated
resource management groups in the state have improved management of natural
resources in their local areas through collaborative efforts, in some cases for
twenty years. With continuing population growth and pressure on resources, the
need for such programs is growing and exceeding the ability of such
organizations to meet the need without a source of administrative support.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of
the state of Washington to encourage and help sustain voluntary nonprofit
organizations formed for the purpose of protecting, enhancing, and restoring
the biological, chemical, and physical processes of watersheds, and to direct
state agencies and state colleges and universities to coordinate their
respective activities relating to these purposes with other state entities and
affected local, regional, tribal, federal government, and private nonprofit
organizations and to cooperate with and foster such activities to the greatest
degree practicable.

(2) Private nonprofit
organizations incorporated under Title 24 RCW for the purpose of protecting,
enhancing, and restoring the biological, chemical, and physical processes of
watersheds, in cooperation with interested citizens and businesses, other
nonprofit organizations, tribes, and local, state, and federal entities, may
apply to the department for administrative support grants of up to fifty
thousand dollars to maintain the organizational structure and functions
necessary to fulfill their purpose. Administrative support grants may be used
to compensate full or part-time staff, such as a director, project manager, or
volunteer coordinator, and for obtaining grants and matching funds and in-kind
donations and services, for recruiting volunteers, for providing technical and
safety training, safety equipment, and insurance, and for maintaining required
records and issuing required reports, and the like. Administrative support
grants may be renewed annually. In addition to any other relevant requirements
established by the department, applications for administrative support grants
shall include a work plan for expenditure of the grant funds, a description of
the planned activities for which the grant funds will provide administrative
support, performance measures, and documentation of community involvement.
Preference will be given to organizations that have completed projects
successfully, have projects pending, and have established cooperative
relationships with citizens, businesses, nonprofit organizations, tribes,
local, state, and federal agencies, and state colleges and universities, as
appropriate for the nature and scope of their activities. The department shall
provide administrative support grants from and to the extent of appropriations
made by the legislature to the department expressly for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The sum of two million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the
general fund to the department of ecology for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2002, to carry out the purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

---
END ---