BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.130 and 1992
c 101 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding RCW 39.36.020(1), an authority may at any time contract
indebtedness or borrow money for authority purposes and may issue general
obligation bonds in an amount not exceeding, together with any existing
indebtedness of the authority not authorized by the voters, one and one-half
percent of the value of the taxable property within the boundaries of the
authority; and with the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein voting at
an election called for that purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money
for authority purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor,
provided the total indebtedness of the authority shall not exceed five percent
of the value of the taxable property therein. Such bonds shall be issued and
sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

(2) Regional transit
authorities must honor their contractual obligations among the subareas within
their boundaries and maintain subarea equity, such that no subarea benefits at
the expense of another. These obligations include not only direct capital
improvements, operations, and expenditures, but also debt service, bond
capacity, and expenditure of bond sale proceeds. An authority shall apportion
the total bonded debt capacity among the subareas, established by agreement or
contract, within its boundaries to ensure that the respective amount of bonded
debt for each subarea is expended only within the boundaries of that subarea
and that no amount of debt shall accrue to the expenditures of another subarea
or subareas unless a vote of the people of that respective subarea first
approve such a transfer. An authority shall report annually, by the end of its
fiscal year, as to the various amounts expended in each subarea, as well as the
revenues raised by each subarea.

(3)
The term "value of the taxable property" shall have the meaning set
forth in RCW 39.36.015.

--- END ---