BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As used in this
section:

(a) "Person"
means a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(b)
"Volunteer" means to provide advice or care within the scope of the
person's license without receipt or expectation of salary or financial
remuneration.

(2) A person who
volunteers his or her services as a licensee shall not be liable in a cause of
action for the delivery of medical advice or care under the following
circumstances:

(a) The service is
performed for a public school or a private school approved under chapter
28A.195 RCW;

(b) The service is
performed during a practice or an intrastate, interstate, or international
competition when either are authorized by the school;

(c) The service is
provided to an individual who is participating in the competition or practice
but only if the individual is: (i) A student participant for a school at a
school sanctioned competition or practice; or (ii) performing a function which
is a necessary component of the competition or practice. This subsection
(2)(c)(ii) is limited to individuals who are coaching, officiating, maintaining
official records, operating equipment necessary for conducting the competition
or practice, or are members of a school band, cheerleader or yell squad, drill
team, or other school-authorized group of students who perform during a
competition; and

(d) The service is
provided in a manner which is neither grossly negligent nor willful nor wanton
misconduct.

(3) A person
volunteering his or her services under this section is not precluded from
receiving reimbursement for expenses involving travel, meals, and lodging when
such expenses are incurred solely as a result of attending a competition or
practice. Reimbursement for such expenses shall not be deemed to change the
person's status as a volunteer.

--- END ---