BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.060 and 1999
c 373 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington
commission on student learning is hereby established. The primary purposes of
the commission are to identify the knowledge and skills all public school
students need to know and be able to do based on the student learning goals in
RCW 28A.150.210, to develop student assessment and school accountability
systems, to review current school district data reporting requirements and make
recommendations on what data is necessary for the purposes of accountability
and meeting state information needs, and to take other steps necessary to
develop a performance-based education system. The commission shall include
three members of the state board of education, three members appointed by the
governor before July 1, 1992, and five members appointed no later than June 1,
1993, by the governor elected in the November 1992 election. The governor
shall appoint a chair from the commission members, and fill any vacancies in
gubernatorial appointments that may occur. The state board of education shall
fill any vacancies of state board of education appointments that may occur. In
making the appointments, educators, business leaders, and parents shall be
represented, and nominations from statewide education, business, and parent
organizations shall be requested. Efforts shall be made to ensure that the
commission reflects the racial and ethnic diversity of the state's K-12 student
population and that the major geographic regions in the state are represented.
Appointees shall be qualified individuals who are supportive of educational
restructuring, who have a positive record of service, and who will devote
sufficient time to the responsibilities of the commission to ensure that the
objectives of the commission are achieved.

(2) The commission
shall establish advisory committees. Membership of the advisory committees
shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, professionals from the office
of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education,
and other state and local educational practitioners and student assessment
specialists.

(3) The commission,
with the assistance of the advisory committees, shall:

(a) Develop essential
academic learning requirements based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Essential academic learning requirements shall be developed, to
the extent possible, for each of the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. Essential
academic learning requirements for RCW 28A.150.210(1), goal one, and the
mathematics component of RCW 28A.150.210(2), goal two, shall be completed no
later than March 1, 1995. Essential academic learning requirements that
incorporate the remainder of RCW 28A.150.210 (2), (3), and (4), goals two,
three, and four, shall be completed no later than March 1, 1996. To the
maximum extent possible, the commission shall integrate goal four and the
knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the development of the
essential academic learning requirements;

(b)(i) The commission
and superintendent of public instruction shall develop a statewide academic
assessment system for use in the elementary, middle, and high school years
designed to determine if each student has learned the essential academic
learning requirements identified in (a) of this subsection. The academic
assessment system shall include a variety of assessment methods, including
criterion-referenced and performance-based measures. Performance standards for
determining if a student has successfully completed an assessment shall be
determined by the commission and the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with the advisory committees required in subsection (2) of this
section.

(ii) The assessment
system shall be designed so that the results under the assessment system are
used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate
appropriate educational support for students who have not learned the essential
academic learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.

(iii) Assessments
measuring the essential academic learning requirements shall be available for
voluntary use by school districts and shall be required to be administered by
school districts according to the following schedule unless the legislature
takes action to delay or prevent implementation of the assessment system and
essential academic learning requirements. However, the assessments shall be
postponed until it is proven through scientific research that the assessments
are a reliable and valid measure of basic academics.

Assessments Assessments

available
for required to be

voluntary
use administered

(School
years) (School years)

Reading, Writing,

Communication,
Mathematics

- Elementary school 1996-97 1997-98

- Middle school 1997-98 2000-01

- High school 1998-99 2000-01

Science

- Middle and high 1999-00 2000-01

school

- Elementary school 2001-02 2004-05

Social Studies

- Elementary, middle, 2002-03 2005-06

and high school

Arts

- Middle and high 2003-04 2006-07

school

- Elementary school 2003-04 2007-08

Health, Fitness

- Middle and high 2003-04 2006-07

school

- Elementary school 2003-04 2007-08

The completed
assessments and assessments still in development shall be transferred by the
commission on student learning to the superintendent of public instruction by
June 30, 1999.

(iv) To the maximum
extent possible, the commission and the superintendent of public instruction
shall integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.

Assessments for goals
three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in the essential academic
learning requirements and assessments for goals one and two.

(v) The commission on
student learning may modify the essential academic learning requirements and
the assessments, as needed, before June 30, 1999. The superintendent of public
instruction may modify the essential academic learning requirements and the
assessments, as needed, after June 30, 1999. The commission and superintendent
shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and proposed
modifications to the essential academic learning requirements before the
modifications are adopted.

(vi) The commission and
the superintendent of public instruction shall develop assessments that are
directly related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds,
or on the basis of gender;

(c) After a
determination is made by the state board of education that the high school
assessment system has been implemented and that it is sufficiently reliable and
valid, successful completion of the high school assessment shall lead to a
certificate of mastery. The certificate of mastery shall be obtained by most
students at about the age of sixteen, and is evidence that the student has
successfully mastered the essential academic learning requirements during his
or her educational career. The certificate of mastery shall be required for
graduation but shall not be the only requirement for graduation. The
commission shall make recommendations to the state board of education regarding
the relationship between the certificate of mastery and high school graduation
requirements. Upon achieving the certificate of mastery, schools shall provide
students with the opportunity to pursue career and educational objectives
through educational pathways that emphasize integration of academic and
vocational education. Educational pathways may include, but are not limited
to, programs such as work-based learning, school-to-work transition, tech prep,
vocational-technical education, running start, and preparation for technical
college, community college, or university education. Any middle school, junior
high school, or high school using educational pathways shall ensure that all
participating students will continue to have access to the courses and
instruction necessary to meet admission requirements at baccalaureate
institutions. Students shall be allowed to enter the educational pathway of
their choice. Before accepting a student into an educational pathway, the
school shall inform the student's parent of the pathway chosen, the opportunities
available to the student through the pathway, and the career objectives the
student will have exposure to while pursuing the pathway. Parents and students
dissatisfied with the opportunities available through the selected educational
pathway shall be provided with the opportunity to transfer the student to any
other pathway provided in the school. Schools may not develop educational
pathways that retain students in high school beyond the date they are eligible
to graduate, and may not require students who transfer between pathways to
complete pathway requirements beyond the date the student is eligible to
graduate;

(d) Consider methods to
address the unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(e) Consider methods to
address the unique needs of highly capable students when developing the
assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(f) Develop
recommendations on the time, support, and resources, including technical
assistance, needed by schools and school districts to help students achieve the
essential academic learning requirements. These recommendations shall include
an estimate for the legislature, superintendent of public instruction, and
governor on the expected cost of implementing the academic assessment system;

(g) Develop
recommendations for consideration by the higher education coordinating board
for adopting college and university entrance requirements for public school
students that are consistent with the essential academic learning requirements
and the certificate of mastery;

(h) Review current
school district data reporting requirements for the purposes of accountability
and meeting state information needs. The commission on student learning shall
report recommendations to the joint select committee on education restructuring
by September 15, 1996, on:

(i) What data is
necessary to compare how school districts are performing before the essential
academic learning requirements and the assessment system are implemented with
how school districts are performing after the essential academic learning
requirements and the assessment system are implemented; and

(ii) What data is
necessary pertaining to school district reports under the accountability
systems developed by the commission on student learning under this section;

(i) Recommend to the
legislature, governor, state board of education, and superintendent of public
instruction:

(i) A statewide
accountability system to monitor and evaluate accurately and fairly at
elementary, middle, and high schools the level of learning occurring in
individual schools and school districts with regard to the goals included in
RCW 28A.150.210 (1) through (4). The accountability system must assess each
school individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and schools statewide. The system shall include school-site,
school district, and state-level accountability reports;

(ii) A school
assistance program to help schools and school districts that are having
difficulty helping students meet the essential academic learning requirements
as measured by performance on the elementary, middle school, and high school
assessments;

(iii) A system to
intervene in schools and school districts in which significant numbers of
students persistently fail to learn the essential academic learning
requirements or meet the standards established for the elementary, middle
school, and high school assessments; and

(iv) An awards program
to provide incentives to school staff to help their students learn the
essential academic learning requirements, with each school being assessed
individually against its own baseline, schools with similar characteristics,
and the statewide average. Incentives shall be based on the rate of percentage
change of students achieving the essential academic learning requirements and
progress on meeting the statewide average. School staff shall determine how
the awards will be spent.

The commission shall
make recommendations regarding a statewide accountability system for reading in
grades kindergarten through four by November 1, 1997. Recommendations for an
accountability system in the other subject areas and grade levels shall be made
no later than June 30, 1999;

(j) Report annually by
December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the state board of education on the progress, findings, and
recommendations of the commission; and

(k) Make
recommendations to the legislature and take other actions necessary or
desirable to help students meet the student learning goals.

(4) The commission
shall coordinate its activities with the state board of education and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) The commission
shall seek advice broadly from the public and all interested educational
organizations in the conduct of its work, including holding periodic regional
public hearings.

(6) The commission
shall select an entity to provide staff support and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide administrative oversight and
be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may direct the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to enter into subcontracts, within
the commission's resources, with school districts, teachers, higher education
faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and other individuals and
organizations to assist the commission in its deliberations.

(7) Members of the
commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

(8)(a) By September 30,
1997, the commission on student learning, the state board of education, and the
superintendent of public instruction shall jointly present recommendations to
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
regarding the high school assessments, the certificate of mastery, and high
school graduation requirements.

In preparing
recommendations, the commission on student learning shall convene an ad hoc
working group to address questions, including:

(i) What type of
document shall be used to identify student performance and achievement and how
will the document be described?

(ii) Should the
students be required to pass the high school assessments in all skill and
content areas, or only in select skill and content areas, to graduate?

(iii) How will the
criteria for establishing the standards for passing scores on the assessments
be determined?

(iv) What timeline
should be used in phasing-in the assessments as a graduation requirement?

(v) What options may be
used in demonstrating how the results of the assessments will be displayed in a
way that is meaningful to students, parents, institutions of higher education,
and potential employers?

(vi) Are there other or
additional methods by which the assessments could be used to identify
achievement such as endorsements, standards of proficiency, merit badges, or
levels of achievement?

(vii) Should the
assessments and certificate of mastery be used to satisfy college or university
entrance criteria for public school students? If yes, how should these methods
be phased-in?

(b) The ad hoc working
group shall report its recommendations to the commission on student learning,
the state board of education, and the superintendent of public instruction by
June 15, 1997. The commission shall report the ad hoc working group's
recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and
senate by July 15, 1997. Final recommendations of the commission on student
learning, the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction shall be presented to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by September 30, 1997.

(9) The
Washington commission on student learning shall expire on June 30, 1999.

--- END ---