BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.04.020 and 1987 c
295 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The county auditor of
each county shall be ex officio the supervisor of all primaries and elections,
general or special, and it shall be the county auditor's duty to provide places
for holding such primaries and elections; to appoint the precinct election
officers; to provide for their compensation; to provide ballot boxes and
ballots or voting machines, poll books, or precinct lists of registered voters,
and tally sheets, and deliver them to the precinct election officers at the
polling places; to publish and post notices of calling such primaries and
elections in the manner provided by law: PROVIDED, That notice of a ((general
election)) primary held in an even-numbered year shall indicate that
the office of precinct committee officer will be on the ballot; and to
apportion to each city, town, or district, its share of the expense of such
primaries and elections: PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to
general or special elections for any city, town, or district which is not
subject to RCW 29.13.010 and 29.13.020, but all such elections shall be held
and conducted at the time, in the manner, and by the officials (with such
notice, requirements for filing for office, and certifications by local
officers) as provided and required by the laws governing such elections.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.15.120 and 1994 c
223 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any time before
the close of business on the Thursday following the last day for candidates to
file under RCW 29.15.020 by filing, with the officer with whom the declaration
of candidacy was filed, a signed request that his or her name not be printed on
the ballot. There shall be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy
filed during special filing periods held under this title. The filing officer
may permit the withdrawal of a filing for the office of precinct committee
officer at the request of the candidate at any time if no absentee ballots have
been issued for that office and the ((general election)) primary
ballots for that precinct have not been printed. The filing officer may permit
the withdrawal of a filing for any elected office of a city, town, or special
district at the request of the candidate at any time before a primary if the
primary ballots for that city, town, or special district have not been
ordered. No filing fee may be refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this
section. Notice of the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that the
filing fee is not refundable shall be given to each candidate at the time he or
she files.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.30.060 and 1991 c
363 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Except in each county
with a population of one million or more, on or before the fifteenth day before
a primary or election, the county auditor shall prepare a sample ballot which
shall be made readily available to members of the public. The secretary of
state shall adopt rules governing the preparation of sample ballots in counties
with a population of one million or more. The rules shall permit, among other
alternatives, the preparation of more than one sample ballot by a county with a
population of one million or more for a primary or election, each of which
lists a portion of the offices and issues to be voted on in that county. The
position of precinct committee officer shall be shown on the sample ballot for
the ((general election)) primary, but the names of candidates for
the individual positions need not be shown.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.36.030 and 1991 c
81 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

If the information
contained in a request for an absentee ballot received by the county auditor is
complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote under federal or
state law, the county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the primary or
election for which the absentee ballot was requested. Otherwise, the county
auditor shall notify the applicant of the reason or reasons why the request
cannot be accepted.

At each ((general
election)) primary in an even-numbered year, each absentee voter
shall also be given a separate ballot containing the names of the candidates ((that))
who have filed for the office of precinct committee officer unless fewer
than two candidates have filed for the same political party in the absentee
voter's precinct. The ballot shall provide space for writing in the name of
additional candidates.

When mailing an
absentee ballot to a registered voter temporarily outside the state or to an
out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter, the county auditor shall
send a copy of the state voters' and candidates' pamphlet with the absentee
ballot. The county auditor shall mail all absentee ballots and related
material to voters outside the territorial limits of the United States and the
District of Columbia under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.42.040 and 1990 c
59 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

Any member of a major
political party who is a registered voter in the precinct may upon payment of a
fee of one dollar file his or her declaration of candidacy as prescribed under
RCW 29.15.010 with the county auditor for the office of precinct committee
officer of his or her party in that precinct. When elected the precinct
committee officer shall serve so long as the committee officer remains an
eligible voter in that precinct and until a successor has been elected at the
next ensuing state ((general election)) primary in the
even-numbered year.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.42.050 and 1991 c
363 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The statutory
requirements for filing as a candidate at the primaries shall apply to
candidates for precinct committee officer except that the filing period for
this office alone shall be extended to and include the Friday immediately
following the last day for political parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as
provided by RCW 29.18.150, and ((the office shall not be voted upon at the
primaries, but)) the names of all candidates must appear under the proper
party and office designations on the ballot for the ((general November election))
state primary for each even-numbered year and the one receiving the
highest number of votes shall be declared elected: PROVIDED, That to be
declared elected, a candidate must receive at least ten percent of the number
of votes cast for the candidate of the candidate's party receiving the greatest
number of votes in the precinct. Any person elected to the office of precinct
committee officer who has not filed a declaration of candidacy shall pay the
fee of one dollar to the county auditor for a certificate of election. The
term of office of precinct committee officer shall be for two years, commencing
upon completion of the official canvass of votes by the county canvassing board
of ((election)) primary returns. Should any vacancy occur in
this office by reason of death, resignation, or disqualification of the
incumbent, or because of failure to elect, the respective county chair of the
county central committee shall be empowered to fill such vacancy by
appointment: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in legislative districts having a
majority of its precincts in a county with a population of one million or more,
such appointment shall be made only upon the recommendation of the legislative
district chair: PROVIDED, That the person so appointed shall have the same
qualifications as candidates when filing for election to such office for such
precinct: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when a vacancy in the office of precinct
committee officer exists because of failure to elect at a state ((general
election)) primary, such vacancy shall not be filled until after the
organization meeting of the county central committee and the new county chair
selected as provided by RCW 29.42.030.

Sec. 7. RCW 29.81.220 and 1999 c
260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The voters' pamphlet
must contain:

(1) Information about
each ballot measure initiated by or referred to the voters for their approval
or rejection as required by RCW 29.81.250;

(2) In even-numbered
years, statements, if submitted, advocating the candidacies of nominees for the
office of president and vice-president of the United States, United States
senator, United States representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary
of state, state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance commissioner,
state senator, state representative, justice of the supreme court, judge of the
court of appeals, or judge of the superior court. Candidates may also submit a
campaign mailing address and telephone number and a photograph not more than
five years old and of a size and quality that the secretary of state determines
to be suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;

(3) In odd-numbered
years, if any office voted upon statewide appears on the ballot due to a
vacancy, then statements and photographs for candidates for any vacant office
listed in subsection (2) of this section must appear;

(4) In even-numbered
years, a section explaining how voters may participate in the election campaign
process; the address and telephone number of the public disclosure commission
established under RCW 42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements
that apply when contributions are made to candidates and political committees;

(5) In even-numbered
years the name, address, and telephone number of each political party with
nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed with the secretary of state by the
state committee of a major political party or the presiding officer of the
convention of a minor political party;

(6) In each
odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a president of the United
States is to be nominated and elected, information explaining the precinct
caucus and convention process used by each major political party to elect
delegates to its national presidential candidate nominating convention. The
pamphlet must also provide a description of the statutory procedures by which
minor political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the parties
to nominate candidates for president;

(7) ((In
even-numbered years, a description of the office of precinct committee officer
and its duties;

(8))) An application form for an absentee ballot;

(((9))) (8)
A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of language for proposed
measures under RCW 29.81.260;

(((10)))
(9) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

---
END ---