BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If a tenant is the
petitioner in an action for a protection order under chapter 26.50 RCW and he
or she notifies the landlord of the existence of a protection order that
excludes the respondent from the dwelling unit that the parties share, the
petitioner may request the landlord to change the locks of the rental
premises. The landlord may change or rekey the locks and may charge the
petitioner a reasonable fee for the service.

(2) The issuance of the
protection order shall not relieve the respondent from the financial
obligations of the rental agreement or lease.

(3) The petitioner
shall notify the landlord of the expiration date of the protection order, if
any.

(4)
Nothing in this section affects any duty on the part of the landlord to provide
security or to take other actions to protect the petitioner from harm.

--- END ---