BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that major technological, economic, and demographic changes have increased the
demand for training and education to maintain a high quality, competitive work
force, and a well-educated populace to meet the challenges of the twenty-first
century. Therefore, the legislature finds that there is increasing demand for
postsecondary educational opportunities for citizens of the state of Washington.

The legislature
declares that the policy of the state of Washington is to improve the access
to, and the quality of, this state's postsecondary educational system. The
budgetary policy of the state is to provide a level of fiscal commitment to the
state's postsecondary educational system commensurate with the responsibility
of the state to the educational and professional improvement of its citizens
and work force.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.776 and 1993
sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of the
state of Washington that the ((essential requirements level)) state
budget ((calculation)) for institutions of higher education include
enrollment levels necessary to ((maintain, by educational sector, the participation
rate funded in the 1993 fiscal year. The participation rate shall be based on
the state's estimated population ages seventeen and above by appropriate age
groups)) meet the demand for higher education in the state.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.10.778 and 1993
sp.s. c 15 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of the
state of Washington that((, for new enrollments provided under RCW
28B.10.776, the essential requirements level budget calculation for those
enrollments)) the state omnibus appropriations act shall, each
biennium, at a minimum, include:

(1) Increased state
funding, up to the fiscal growth factor established under RCW 43.135.025, for
the actual number of enrollments reported by the office of financial management
for degree-seeking students enrolled in degree courses for the most recently
available school year; and

(2) A funding
level per full-time equivalent student that is equal to the rate assumed in the
omnibus appropriations act for the last fiscal year of the previous biennium
for the instructional, primary support, and library programs, plus an inflation
factor. The inflation factor should be equivalent to the inflation factor used
to calculate basic education in the common school system budget request
submitted by the governor.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.10.784 and 1993
sp.s. c 15 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((participation
rate)) enrollment levels used to calculate ((enrollment)) state
funding levels under RCW 28B.10.776 and ((28B.10.782)) 28B.10.778
shall be ((based on)) the fall enrollment reported in the higher
education enrollment report as maintained by the office of financial
management((, fall enrollment as reported in the management information
system of the state board for community and technical colleges, and the corresponding
fall population forecast by the office of financial management. Formal
estimates of the state participation rates and enrollment levels necessary to
fulfill the requirements of RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 shall be determined
by the office of financial management)) as part of its responsibility to
develop and maintain student enrollment forecasts for colleges and universities
under RCW 43.62.050. ((Formal estimates of)) The state ((participation
rates and)) enrollment levels required by this section shall be based on
procedures and standards established by a technical work group consisting of
staff from the higher education coordinating board, the public four-year
institutions of higher education, the state board for community and technical colleges,
the fiscal and higher education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate, and the office of financial management. ((Formal estimates of
the state participation rates and)) The enrollment levels required
by this section shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate on or before November 15th of each ((even-numbered))
year. ((The higher education coordinating board shall periodically review
the enrollment goals set forth in RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 and submit
recommendations concerning modification of these goals to the governor and to
the higher education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.))

Sec. 5. RCW 28B.10.786 and 1993
sp.s. c 15 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of the
state of Washington that financial need not be a barrier to participation in
higher education. It is also the policy of the state of Washington that the ((essential
requirements level)) state budget ((calculation)) include
funding for state student financial aid programs. The ((calculation)) budget
should, at a minimum, include a funding level equal to the amount provided in
the second year of the previous biennium in the omnibus appropriations act,
adjusted for the percentage of needy resident students, by educational sector,
likely to be included in any enrollment increases ((necessary to maintain,
by educational sector, the participation rate funded in the 1993 fiscal year)).
The calculation should also be adjusted to reflect, by educational sector, any
increases in cost of attendance. The cost of attendance figures should be
calculated by the higher education coordinating board and provided to the
office of financial management and appropriate legislative committees by June
30th of each even-numbered year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28B.10.780 (Budget
calculation--Funding level) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 4; and

(2) RCW 28B.10.782 (Budget
calculation--Increased enrollment target level--Availability of information)
and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 5.

---
END ---