BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (6) of this section, a person who, while at a gun show
or event, offers to sell or transfer a firearm to another person must be licensed
as a dealer under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923 and post the license in accordance with 27
C.F.R. Sec. 178.91 and Sec. 178.100(a).

(2) The licensed dealer
shall:

(a) Perform a
background check of the prospective transferee in accordance with RCW 9.41.090
and 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.; and

(b) Obtain approval of
a transfer from the local law enforcement agency for a handgun or the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, national crime information center, for a long gun, in
accordance with RCW 9.41.090 and 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.

(3) The licensed dealer
who performs the background check on a prospective transferee shall record the
transfer, as provided in RCW 9.41.090 and 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922 and shall retain
the records in the same manner as when conducting a sale, rental, or exchange
at retail, as provided in RCW 9.41.090 and in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922.

(4) The Washington
state patrol will establish a reasonable fee to cover costs for each background
check conducted at a gun show or event.

(5) A person who
organizes, promotes, or otherwise sponsors a gun show or event shall:

(a) Ensure that any
person who, while at the gun show or event, offers to sell or transfer a
firearm to another person complies with the requirements of subsection (2)(a)
of this section;

(b) Provide the
services of a person licensed as a dealer under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923 to conduct
the transactions described in subsection (2)(a) of this section; and

(c) Post prominently a
notice, in a form to be described by the director of the department of licensing
or his or her designee, setting forth the requirements for a background check
as provided in this section.

(6) A person other than
a dealer shall only offer for sale or transfer a firearm while at a gun show or
event, if any resulting sale or transfer of the firearm is conducted through a
person licensed as a dealer under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923, and that licensed dealer
performs a background check in accordance with RCW 9.41.090 and 18 U.S.C. Sec.
921 et seq.

(7) A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.41.010 and 1997 c
338 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Firearm"
means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by
an explosive such as gunpowder.

(2) "Pistol"
means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches in length, or is
designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.

(3) "Rifle"
means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired
from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to
use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a
single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.

(4)
"Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less
than sixteen inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of
modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than
twenty-six inches.

(5) "Shotgun"
means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or redesigned, made or
remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned,
made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed
shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a
single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.

(6)
"Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels
less than eighteen inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any
means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less
than twenty-six inches.

(7) "Machine
gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical rifle,
submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that the
trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt,
or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying
ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and
fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.

(8) "Antique
firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not designed or
redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed
ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any matchlock,
flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and also any
firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which
ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily
available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(9) "Loaded"
means:

(a) There is a
cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;

(b) Cartridges are in a
clip that is locked in place in the firearm;

(c) There is a
cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a revolver;

(d) There is a
cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or

(e) There is a ball in
the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the firearm is a muzzle
loader.

(10) "Dealer"
means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms at wholesale or
retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms license under 18
U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not required to have, a
federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that
person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the
enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or part of
his or her personal collection of firearms, in a private transaction not
through a gun show or event.

(11) "Crime of
violence" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony,
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony,
manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent
liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree,
arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in
the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in the second
degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second degree;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, which is
comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony classified as a
crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(12) "Serious
offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit
any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended:

(a) Any crime of violence;

(b) Any felony
violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that is
classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of imprisonment of at
least ten years;

(c) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(d) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(e) Indecent liberties;

(f) Leading organized
crime;

(g) Promoting
prostitution in the first degree;

(h) Rape in the third
degree;

(i) Drive-by shooting;

(j) Sexual
exploitation;

(k) Vehicular assault;

(l) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(m) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as "sexual
motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(n) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125; or

(o) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is comparable to a serious
offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under
the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious offense.

(13) "Law
enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington peace officer
as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned Washington peace
officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement officer" also
includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW
10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a
concealed pistol.

(14) "Felony"
means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any federal or
out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws of this
state.

(15) "Sell"
refers to the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in consideration of
payment or promise of payment of a certain price in money.

(16) "Barrel
length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed action down the
length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or in the case of a
barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device permanently attached to
the end of the muzzle.

(17) "Family or
household member" means "family" or "household member"
as used in RCW 10.99.020.

(18)(a) "Gun
show or event" means a place or event, a gun trade show, gun collectors'
show, flea market, auction, other than a permanent retail store, at which three
or more individuals assemble to display, sell, lease, or transfer new or used firearms
or firearm components to the public and that is not exempt from collecting
sales tax under RCW 82.08.0251.

(b) "Gun show
or event" includes a place or event where ten or more firearms are offered
for transfer or transferred.

(c)
"Gun show or event" includes, but is not limited to, an area near the
gun show or event that the sponsor knows or should reasonably know will be used
for parking for the gun show or event.

---
END ---