BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of machinery and equipment that was
previously used in a farming activity if the machinery and equipment is sold by
a farmer to another farmer. "Farmer" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.04.213.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of machinery and
equipment by a farmer if the machinery and equipment was previously used in a
farming activity and is purchased or otherwise acquired from a farmer.
"Farmer" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.213.

---
END ---