BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 54.04.020 and 1931 c
1 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Municipal corporations,
to be known as public utility districts, are hereby authorized for the purposes
of chapter 1, Laws of 1931 and may be established within the limits of the
state of Washington, as provided herein.

Nothing in this
chapter may be construed to authorize public utility districts to engage in the
business of repairing electrical appliances other than those sold or leased by
the district.

Public
utility districts which on January 1, 2001, offered repair services for
electrical appliances not sold or leased by the district may continue to
provide existing utility programs which offer water heating service agreements
commonly referred to as guaranteed hot water programs.

--- END ---