BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.060 and 1995 c
306 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
following property shall be exempt from taxation:

(((1))) (a)
All art, scientific, or historical collections of associations maintaining and
exhibiting such collections for the benefit of the general public and not for
profit, together with all real and personal property of such associations used
exclusively for the safekeeping, maintaining and exhibiting of such
collections; ((and))

(b) All the real
and personal property owned by or leased to associations engaged in the
production and performance of musical, dance, artistic, dramatic, or literary
works for the benefit of the general public and not for profit, which real and
personal property is used exclusively for this production or performance;

(c) All fire engines
and other implements used for the extinguishment of fire, and the buildings
used exclusively for their safekeeping, and for meetings of fire companies, as
long as the property belongs to any city or town or to a fire company; and

(d) All property
owned by humane societies in this state in actual use by the societies.

(((a))) (2)
To receive ((this)) an exemption under subsection (1)(a) or
(b) of this section:

(a) An
organization must be organized and operated exclusively for artistic,
scientific, historical, literary, musical, dance, dramatic, or educational
purposes and receive a substantial part of its support (exclusive of income
received in the exercise or performance by such organization of its purpose or
function) from the United States or any state or any political subdivision
thereof or from direct or indirect contributions from the general public.

(b) If the property is
not currently being used for an exempt purpose but will be used for an exempt
purpose within a reasonable period of time, the nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation claiming the exemption must submit proof that a
reasonably specific and active program is being carried out to construct,
remodel, or otherwise enable the property to be used for an exempt purpose.
The property does not qualify for an exemption during this interim period if
the property is used by, loaned to, or rented to a for-profit organization or
business enterprise. Proof of a specific and active program to build or
remodel the property so it may be used for an exempt purpose may include, but
is not limited to:

(i) Affirmative action
by the board of directors, trustees, or governing body of the nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation toward an active program of construction or
remodeling;

(ii) Itemized reasons
for the proposed construction or remodeling;

(iii) Clearly
established plans for financing the construction or remodeling; or

(iv) Building permits.

(((c)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a for-profit limited partnership
created to provide facilities for the use of nonprofit art, scientific, or
historical organizations qualifies for the exemption under (b) of this
subsection through 1997 if the for-profit limited partnership otherwise
qualifies under (b) of this subsection.

(2) All fire engines
and other implements used for the extinguishment of fire, with the buildings
used exclusively for the safekeeping thereof, and for meetings of fire
companies, provided such properties belong to any city or town or to a fire
company therein.))

(3) ((Property owned
by humane societies in this state in actual use by such societies)) The
use of property exempt under subsection (1)(b) of this section for pecuniary
gain or to promote business activities, except as provided in this section,
nullifies the exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment
year. The exemption is not nullified by:

(a) The collection
of rent or donations if the amount is reasonable and does not exceed
maintenance and operation expenses created by the user;

(b) Fund-raising
activities conducted by a nonprofit organization;

(c) The use of the
property for pecuniary gain or to promote business activities for periods of
not more than twenty-one days in a year; or

(d) An inadvertent
use of the property in a manner inconsistent with the purpose for which
exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use is not part of a pattern of use.
A pattern of use is presumed when an inadvertent use is repeated in the same
assessment year or in two or more successive assessment years.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.805 and 1999 c
203 s 2 and 1999 c 139 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to qualify
for an exemption under this chapter ((and RCW 84.36.560)), the nonprofit
organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the conditions in
this section.

(2) The property must
be used exclusively for the actual operation of the activity for which
exemption is granted, unless otherwise provided, and does not exceed an amount
reasonably necessary for that purpose, except:

(a) The loan or rental
of the property does not subject the property to tax if:

(i) The rents and donations
received for the use of the portion of the property are reasonable and do not
exceed the maintenance and operation expenses attributable to the portion of
the property loaned or rented; and

(ii) Except for the
exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4) ((and)), 84.36.037, and
84.36.060(1)(b), the property would be exempt from tax if owned by the
organization to which it is loaned or rented;

(b) The use of the
property for fund-raising activities does not subject the property to tax if
the fund-raising activities are consistent with the purposes for which the
exemption is granted.

(3) The property must
be irrevocably dedicated to the purpose for which exemption has been granted,
and on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by said organization,
association, or corporation, said property will not inure directly or
indirectly to the benefit of any shareholder or individual, except a nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation which too would be entitled to
property tax exemption. This property need not be irrevocably dedicated if it
is leased or rented to those qualified for exemption under this chapter ((or
RCW 84.36.560)) for leased property, but only if under the terms of the
lease or rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
receives the benefit of the exemption.

(4) The facilities and
services must be available to all regardless of race, color, national origin or
ancestry.

(5) The organization,
association, or corporation must be duly licensed or certified where such
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation.

(6) Property sold to
organizations, associations, or corporations with an option to be repurchased
by the seller shall not qualify for exempt status.

(7) The department
shall have access to its books in order to determine whether the nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation is exempt from taxes under this
chapter ((and RCW 84.36.560)).

(8) This
section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.020, 84.36.032,
84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

---
END ---