BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 44.05.090 and 1990 c
126 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In the redistricting
plan:

(1) The commission's
plan and any plan adopted by the supreme court under RCW 44.05.100(4) must
provide for forty-nine senatorial districts and ninety-nine representative
districts.

(2) Districts
shall have a population as nearly equal as is practicable, excluding
nonresident military personnel, based on the population reported in the federal
decennial census.

(((2))) (3)
To the extent consistent with subsections (1) and (2) of this
section the commission plan should, insofar as practical, accomplish the
following:

(a) District lines
should be drawn so as to coincide with the boundaries of local political
subdivisions and areas recognized as communities of interest. The number of
counties and municipalities divided among more than one district should be as
small as possible;

(b) Districts should be
composed of convenient, contiguous, and compact territory. Land areas may be
deemed contiguous if they share a common land border or are connected by a
ferry, highway, bridge, or tunnel. Areas separated by geographical boundaries
or artificial barriers that prevent transportation within a district should not
be deemed contiguous; and

(c) Whenever
practicable, a precinct shall be wholly within a single ((legislative))
district.

(((3) The
commission's plan and any plan adopted by the supreme court under RCW
44.05.100(4) shall provide for forty-nine legislative districts.))

(4) The house of
representatives shall consist of ((ninety-eight)) ninety-nine
members, ((two)) each of whom shall be elected from and run at
large within each ((legislative)) representative district. The
senate shall consist of forty-nine members, one of whom shall be elected from
each ((legislative)) senatorial district.

(5) The
commission shall exercise its powers to provide fair and effective
representation and to encourage electoral competition. The commission's plan
shall not be drawn purposely to favor or discriminate against any political
party or group.

--- END ---