BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.33 RCW to read as follows:

The voting systems
modernization account is established in the custody of the state treasurer.
. . . . . . dollars must be transferred from the state
general fund to this account on the first day of each fiscal year.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for assisting county auditors to
acquire and use modern voting systems and modern ballot processing systems, as
provided in section 2 of this act. Only the secretary of state may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.33 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of state
shall establish a program to assist county auditors to acquire and use modern
voting systems and modern ballot processing systems from moneys in the voting
systems modernization account created under section 1 of this act. The program
will consist of providing grants to county auditors and providing staff
assistance for county auditors. Grants from this account may be used by county
auditors to: (1) Purchase modern voting systems approved by the secretary of
state under this chapter to replace punch card voting systems or provide
additional modern voting systems for counties already using modern voting
systems; (2) purchase modern ballot processing systems, including systems for
absentee ballots and mail ballots; (3) finance the operation and programming of
modern voting systems and modern ballot processing systems; and (4) provide
adequate space for counties to process and tabulate ballots using modern ballot
processing systems and modern voting systems in a timely manner. Staff
assistance will consist of staff who program modern voting systems and modern
ballot processing systems and who train county staff on programming and
operating modern voting systems and modern ballot processing systems.

Modern
voting systems are vote tallying systems approved by the secretary of state
under this chapter that are capable of providing multiple voting methods,
including optical scan voting systems, touch screen voting systems, and
Internet voting systems, also including similar poll-site ballot counting
devices and systems for transmitting unofficial returns from poll-site ballot
counting devices to central reporting or counting locations. Modern ballot
processing systems include systems that read bar codes on outer return envelopes
for absentee ballots and mail ballots, digitize signatures of registered
voters, and present digitized signatures on screens for staff to compare voter
signatures with signatures on the outer return envelopes for absentee ballots
and mail ballots.

---
END ---