BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 41.26 RCW to read as follows:

Any member of the
public employees' retirement system plan 1 who is serving as a law enforcement
officer as defined in RCW 41.26.030 may, upon reaching age fifty, transfer
their membership, member contributions including interest, and service credit
to plan 1 for the sole purpose of retirement for service.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 41.40 RCW to read as follows:

Any member
of plan 1 who is serving as a law enforcement officer as defined in RCW
41.26.030 may, upon reaching age fifty, transfer their membership, member
contributions including interest, and service credit to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 1 for the sole purpose of retirement for
service.

---
END ---