BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The comprehensive
career guidance grant program is created to provide students in grades nine
through twelve with career guidance and individual planning and to ensure the
involvement and participation of parents and guardians in the process.

(1)(a) The superintendent
of public instruction shall distribute comprehensive career guidance grants to
school districts for schools within the district that have comprehensive career
guidance programs that meet all of the following criteria:

(i) Documentation that a
school advisory or a school steering committee has been organized to evaluate
the program annually;

(ii) Evidence that
eighty percent of aggregate counselor time is devoted to direct services to
students, with at least twenty-five percent of counselors' time devoted to
individual planning and parent conferences;

(iii) A commitment to
provide program benefits to all students in the school;

(iv) Approval of the
program by the local board of education; and

(v) A requirement that
all students be provided with individual planning that includes parental
involvement consistent with sections 1 and 601, chapter 336, Laws of 1993.

(b) The superintendent
shall allocate comprehensive career guidance grants to school districts based
on the student population in grades nine through twelve in schools within the
district that have comprehensive career guidance programs that meet
qualification criteria established under this section and under rules adopted
by the superintendent.

(c) The superintendent
shall monitor the program and provide an annual report to the legislature on
its progress and success.

(d) The superintendent
shall identify best practices in the state and promote these districts'
efforts.

(e) The superintendent
may retain no more than two percent of the funds appropriated for the
comprehensive career guidance program for administration and monitoring and
evaluating progress.

(f) The superintendent
may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

(2)(a) School districts
shall use moneys received under this program at the district secondary schools
in grades nine through twelve to provide a guidance curriculum and an
individual plan and parent conference for each student at the school and to
provide system support for the comprehensive career guidance program. Such
costs may include the following:

(i) Personnel costs;

(ii) Career center
equipment;

(iii) Career center
materials;

(iv) In-service
training of personnel involved in the comprehensive career guidance program;
and

(v) Guidance curriculum
materials for use in classrooms.

(b) Funds provided
under this program may not be used for nonguidance purposes or to supplant
funds already being provided for the program.

(c) Districts shall
certify on an annual basis that previously qualified schools continue to meet
the program criteria and provide the superintendent with data and information
on the program as required by the superintendent.

(d) Districts shall use
on-site review teams to document that at least eighty percent of counselors'
time is involved in direct services to students, with at least twenty-five
percent of counselors' time devoted to individual planning and parent
conferences.

(e) Districts shall
provide training to secondary teachers on their role in assisting in the
development and implementation of individual plans.

(3) As used in this
section:

(a) "Comprehensive
career guidance" means the organization of resources to meet the
educational and occupational individual planning goals of all students and
parents.

(b) "Individual
planning" includes individual appraisal, individual advisement,
parent/student meetings, and placement and follow-up.

(c) "Individual
appraisal" means counselors or school staff working with students to
analyze and evaluate students' abilities, interests, skills and achievement,
test information, transcripts, extracurricular activities, competencies,
leadership roles, coursework, and other data as the basis for assisting
students to develop immediate and long-range plans.

(d) "Individual
advisement" means information from the individual appraisal being used
along with labor market information to help students plan personal,
educational, and career goals.

(e)
"Parent/student meetings" means counselor and staff meeting with
students and their parents annually to review the goals resulting from
individual advisement. Goals are to be revised as necessary to be consistent
with current data.

(f) "Placement and
follow-up" means counselors and staff supporting students in gathering
information, overcoming barriers, and establishing necessary linkages so that
transitions from one educational program to another, or from one school to
another, or from school to work are successful.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The sum of two million
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to
the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---