BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that there are several billion dollars worth of critical local government
projects for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, streets and roads, domestic water
systems, sanitary sewer systems, storm water systems, solid waste/recycling
systems, and adult and juvenile correction and detention facilities that are
not funded. It is the policy of the state of Washington to assist in financing
critical public works at the local level by making loans, financing guarantees,
and providing technical assistance to local government for these projects.

There are approximately
seven hundred fifty million dollars of outstanding infrastructure loans to
local governments executed under chapter 43.155 RCW that will be repaid over
the next several decades with interest. Those repayments will be used to
originate new loans. It is the intent of the legislature to facilitate and
accelerate the recycling and reloaning of these loan repayments by authorizing
the issuance of bonds to be repaid from these funds. It is also the intent of
the legislature that these bonds not be subject to the debt limit under RCW
39.42.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The state finance committee
is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in
an amount sufficient to provide net proceeds of six hundred million dollars to
be used as loans under chapter 43.155 RCW and to pay all costs necessary to
issue such bonds. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold in one or more
series and at such prices and with such terms and conditions as the state
finance committee determines. No bonds authorized in this section may be
offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of
the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The public works bond
proceeds account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the sale
of bonds sold under section 2 of this act must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for making loans under chapter 43.155 RCW and
paying expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds authorized in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. (1) The nondebt-limit
reimbursable bond retirement account is created in the state treasury. The
nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account shall be used for the
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2
of this act.

(2) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, notify the department of
community, trade, and economic development of the amount needed in the ensuing
twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest requirements on the
bonds issued under section 2 of this act. The department of community, trade,
and economic development shall ensure that the amount determined by the state
finance committee as required for debt service in the ensuing twelve months is
retained in the public works assistance account until the state treasurer
transfers the funds into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

(3) The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements on the bonds issued under section 2 of
this act.

(4) On each date on
which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on bonds issued
under section 2 of this act, the state treasurer shall transfer from the public
works assistance account for deposit into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond
retirement account, the amount computed pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section.

(5) Each year, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall report to the
treasurer: (a) The identity of the recipients of the loans generated from the
proceeds of bonds issued under section 2 of this act; and (b) if there are any
delinquencies in the repayment of such loans.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) Bonds issued under
section 2 of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the
state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the

payment of the principal
thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to
pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.

(2) The owner and
holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of
the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer
and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The bonds authorized in
section 2 of this act are a legal investment for all state funds or funds under
state control and for all funds of any other public body.

Sec. 7. RCW 39.42.060 and 1999 c
273 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money shall be issued by the state
which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by the state to exceed that
amount for which payments of principal and interest in any fiscal year would
require the state to expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of
its general state revenues, as defined in section 1(c) of Article VIII of the
Washington state Constitution for the three immediately preceding fiscal years
as certified by the treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It shall be
the duty of the state finance committee to compute annually the amount required
to pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making such
computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed money
represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness which are
secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are required to be paid,
directly or indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by
the state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other public
agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school
districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred
pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution, but
shall exclude the following:

(1) Obligations for the
payment of current expenses of state government;

(2) Indebtedness
incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;

(3) Principal of and
interest on bond anticipation notes;

(4) Any indebtedness
which has been refunded;

(5) Financing contracts
entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;

(6) Indebtedness
authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute which requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues
or from the special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;

(7) Indebtedness
authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute that requires
that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and
the interest on such indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury,
except higher education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d) fees and
charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by institutions of higher
education;

(8) Any agreement,
promissory note, or other instrument entered into by the state finance
committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection with its acquisition of bond
insurance, letters of credit, or other credit support instruments for the
purpose of guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the marketability, or both, of
any state bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(9) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes identified in RCW 43.99N.020; ((and))

(10) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of the school district bond guaranty established by
chapter 39.98 RCW; and

(11) Indebtedness
incurred for the purposes of providing financial assistance to local
governments to undertake critical public works projects pursuant to section 2
of this act.

To the extent necessary
because of the constitutional or statutory debt limitation, priorities with
respect to the issuance or guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness by the state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs
as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The
treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings
required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under
RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial
management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government
pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial
management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary
to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this
subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales
and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation
fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the public works bond proceeds
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management
cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public works bond
proceeds account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal
fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Section 8 of this act
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. Section 9 of this act
takes effect March 1, 2002.

---
END ---