BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.080 and 1992
c 101 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

An authority shall have
the following powers in addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To carry out the
planning processes set forth in RCW 81.104.100;

(2) To acquire by
purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct, add to,
improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of high
capacity transportation facilities and properties within authority boundaries
including surface, underground, or overhead railways, tramways, busways, buses,
bus sets, entrained and linked buses, ferries, or other means of local
transportation except taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks,
personal rapid transit systems or other people-moving systems, passenger
terminal and parking facilities and properties, and such other facilities and
properties as may be necessary for passenger, vehicular, and vessel access to
and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking facilities and
properties, together with all lands, rights of way, property, equipment, and
accessories necessary for such high capacity transportation systems. When
developing specifications for high capacity transportation system operating
equipment, an authority shall take into account efforts to establish or sustain
a domestic manufacturing capacity for such equipment. The right of eminent
domain shall be exercised by an authority in the same manner and by the same
procedure as or may be provided by law for cities of the first class, except
insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
Public transportation facilities and properties which are owned by any city,
county, county transportation authority, public transportation benefit area, or
metropolitan municipal corporation may be acquired or used by an authority only
with the consent of the agency owning such facilities. Such agencies are
hereby authorized to convey or lease such facilities to an authority or to
contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between
the agency and the authority.

The facilities and
properties of an authority whose vehicles will operate primarily within the
rights of way of public streets, roads, or highways, may be acquired,
developed, and operated without the corridor and design hearings that are
required by RCW 35.58.273 for mass transit facilities operating on a separate
right of way;

(3)(a) Subject to
(b) of this subsection, to dispose of any real or personal property
acquired in connection with any authority function and that is no longer
required for the purposes of the authority, in the same manner as provided for
cities of the first class. When an authority determines that a facility or any
part thereof that has been acquired from any public agency without compensation
is no longer required for authority purposes, but is required by the agency
from which it was acquired, the authority shall by resolution transfer it to
such agency;

(b) If an authority
sells land that was acquired through condemnation, then it shall remit to the
owner or owners from whom it obtained that land the difference between the
amount paid for the land when acquired through condemnation and the amount
received for the land by the sale of the land;

(4) To fix
rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such facilities and to
establish various routes and classes of service. Fares or charges may be
adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users.

--- END ---