BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.400.200 and 1997
c 141 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every school
district board of directors shall fix, alter, allow, and order paid salaries
and compensation for all district employees in conformance with this section.

(2)(a) Salaries for
certificated instructional staff shall not be less than the salary provided in
the appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an
employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

(b) Salaries for certificated
instructional staff with a masters degree shall not be less than the salary
provided in the appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule
for an employee with a masters degree and zero years of service;

(3)(a) The actual
average salary paid to basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff shall not exceed the district's average basic education and
special education program certificated instructional staff salary used for the
state basic education allocations for that school year as determined pursuant
to RCW 28A.150.410.

(b) Fringe benefit
contributions for basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection
only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act
in effect at the time the compensation is payable. For purposes of this
section, fringe benefits shall not include payment for unused leave for illness
or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors
insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits
under the Washington state retirement system; or employer contributions for
health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act
in effect at the time the compensation is payable. A school district may not
use state funds to provide employer contributions for such excess health
benefits.

(c) Salary and benefits
for certificated instructional staff in programs other than basic education and
special education shall be consistent with the salary and benefits paid to
certificated instructional staff in the basic education and special education
programs.

(4) Salaries and
benefits for certificated instructional staff may exceed the limitations in
subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for additional time,
additional responsibilities, or incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not
cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining provisions
of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed
one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance
with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of services which
are a part of the basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of
the state Constitution.

(5) Employee benefit
plans offered by any district shall comply with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275
and 28A.400.280.

(6) No
moneys appropriated in this section may be expended for sick leave benefits or
compensation during the time an employee engages in a strike or work stoppage
if the employee is using sick leave to engage in the strike or work stoppage.
During a strike or work stoppage, a school district board of directors may
require a signed statement from a licensed health care provider that an
employee's absence was due to illness or injury.

--- END ---