BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

Every
electric company that sends bills to retail customers must provide a notice in
the bill, in easily understandable language, concerning the percentage of the
retail electric customer's bill that is directly attributable to the costs for
fish protection.

--- END ---