BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that aircraft noise at large airports negatively affects the education of
children at schools located near these airports. It interferes with speech,
distracts students and teachers, makes it more difficult to concentrate, and generally
interferes with the education process. When aircraft noise at airports of
statewide significance adversely impact local schools, then the state shares in
the responsibility to mitigate the impacts. The legislature finds that the
optional noise abatement provisions in chapter 53.54 RCW have not resulted in
adequate aircraft noise abatement for many schools located near large airports
owned by port districts. It is the legislature's intent to provide to the
public K-12 schools, money for the mitigation of airport noise.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An amount equal to
all sales and use taxes paid under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on land
clearing, earth moving, site preparation, or the constructing, repairing,
decorating, renovating, expanding, or improving of new or existing buildings,
structures, or facilities, of or for a public school that is within fifteen
miles of an airport serving more than twenty scheduled jet aircraft flights per
day, shall be deposited into the airport noise mitigation account created in
subsection (2) of this section. For the purposes of this section, "public
school" has the meaning provided in RCW 28A.150.010.

(2) The
airport noise mitigation account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from subsection (1) of this section must be deposited
in the account. Monthly, the department of revenue will direct the state
treasurer to distribute money in the account to public schools within fifteen
miles of an airport serving more than twenty scheduled jet aircraft flights per
day that have paid sales and use taxes as provided in subsection (1) of this
section. Public schools receiving money under this section must use the money
for constructing, improving, or repairing school facilities when the
construction, improvement, or repair is in any way related to or necessitated
by airport noise abatement. The account is subject to the allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

---
END ---