BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

I. CREATION OF REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION INVESTMENT DISTRICT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FINDINGS. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The capacity of
many of Washington state's transportation facilities have failed to keep up
with the state's growth, particularly in major urban regions;

(2) The state cannot by
itself fund, in a timely way, many of the major capacity and other improvements
required on highways of statewide significance in the state's largest urbanized
area;

(3) Providing a
transportation system that provides efficient mobility for persons and freight
requires a shared partnership and responsibility between the state, local, and
regional governments and the private sector; and

(4) Timely construction
and development of significant transportation improvement projects can best be
achieved through enhanced funding options for governments at the county and
regional levels, using already existing tax authority to address roadway and
multimodal needs and new authority for regions to address critical projects of
statewide significance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board"
means the governing body of a regional transportation investment district.

(2)
"Department" means the Washington state department of transportation.

(3) "Highway of
statewide significance" means an existing or proposed state route or
federal interstate as designated a highway of statewide significance by the
transportation commission, its successor entity, or the legislature.

(4) "Lead
agency" means a public agency that by law can plan, design, and build a
project and has been so designated by the district.

(5) "Regional
transportation investment district" or "district" means a
municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two or more
contiguous counties and that has been created by county legislative authorities
and a vote of the people under this chapter to implement a regional
transportation investment plan.

(6) "Regional
transportation investment district coordinating committee" or "coordinating
committee" means the advisory committee created under section 103 of this
act to create and propose to county legislative authorities a regional
transportation investment plan to develop, finance, and construct
transportation projects.

(7) "Regional
transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a plan to
develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or projects.

(8)
"Transportation project" is:

(a) A capital
improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a highway of statewide significance,
including an extension, that adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or
federal highway; or

(b) A capital
improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that repairs or replaces a lane or lanes
damaged by an event declared an emergency by the governor before January 1,
2002.

A transportation
project as defined in (a) and (b) of this subsection may include the following
associated multimodal capital improvements of:

(i) Approaches to
highways of statewide significance;

(ii) High-occupancy
vehicle lanes;

(iii) Flyover ramps;

(iv) Park and ride
lots;

(v) Bus pullouts;

(vi) Vans for vanpools;

(vii) Buses; and

(viii) Signalization,
ramp metering, and other transportation system management improvements.

Operations,
preservation, and maintenance are excluded from this definition.

(9) "Weighted
vote" means a vote that reflects the population each board or coordinating
committee member represents relative to the population represented by the total
membership of the board or coordinating committee. Population must be
determined using the federal 2000 census or subsequent federal census data.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. COORDINATING COMMITTEE
FORMATION. Regional transportation investment district coordinating committees
are advisory entities that are created, convened, and empowered as follows:

(1) A county with a
population over one million five hundred thousand persons and any adjoining
counties with a population over five hundred thousand persons may create a
regional transportation investment district and shall convene a regional
transportation investment district coordinating committee.

(2) The members of the
legislative authorities participating in planning under this chapter shall
serve as the district coordinating committee. Members of the coordinating
committee receive no compensation, but may be reimbursed for travel and
incidental expenses as the coordinating committee deems appropriate.

The secretary of
transportation, or the appropriate regional administrator of the department, as
named by the secretary, shall serve on the committee as a nonvoting member.

(3) A regional
transportation investment district coordinating committee may be entitled to
state funding, as appropriated by the legislature, for start-up funding to pay
for salaries, expenses, overhead, supplies, and similar expenses ordinarily and
necessarily incurred in selecting transportation projects and funding for those
projects under this chapter. Upon creation of a regional transportation
investment district, the district shall within one year reimburse the state for
any sums advanced for these start-up costs from the state.

(4) The coordinating
committee shall conduct its affairs and formulate a regional transportation
investment plan as provided under section 104 of this act, except that it shall
elect an executive board of seven members to discharge the duties of the
coordinating committee and formulate a regional transportation investment plan,
subject to the approval of the full committee.

(5) At its first
meeting, a regional transportation investment district coordinating committee
may elect officers and provide for the adoption of rules and other operating
procedures.

(6) Governance of and
decisions by a regional transportation investment district coordinating
committee must be by a sixty‑percent weighted majority vote of the total
membership.

(7) The coordinating
committee may dissolve itself at any time by a two-thirds weighted majority
vote of the total membership of the coordinating committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. COORDINATING COMMITTEE
DUTIES. (1) A regional transportation investment district coordinating
committee shall adopt a regional transportation investment plan providing for
the selection, development, construction, and financing of transportation
projects. The regional transportation investment plan should consider land use
planning. The coordinating committee may coordinate its activities with the
department, which shall provide services, data, and personnel to assist in this
planning as desired by the coordinating committee. In addition, the
coordinating committee shall coordinate with affected cities, towns, and other
local governments that engage in transportation planning.

(2) The coordinating
committee shall:

(a) Conduct public
meetings that are needed to assure active public participation in the
development of the plan;

(b) Adopt a plan
proposing the creation of a regional transportation investment district and
recommending projects to improve mobility based on addressing transportation
improvement projects; and

(c) Recommend sources
of revenue authorized by section 105 of this act and a financing plan to fund
selected transportation projects. The overall plan of the district must
leverage the district's financial contributions so that the federal, state,
local, and other revenue sources continue to fund major congestion relief and
transportation capacity improvement projects in the district. A combination of
local, state, and federal revenues may be necessary to pay for transportation
projects, and the coordinating committee shall consider all of these revenue
sources in developing a plan.

(3) Before adopting the
plan, the coordinating committee, with assistance from the department, shall
work with the lead agency to develop accurate cost forecasts for projects.
This project costing methodology must be integrated with revenue forecasts in
developing the plan and must at a minimum include estimated project costs in
constant dollars as well as year of expenditure dollars, the range of project
costs reflected by the level of project design, project contingencies,
identification of mitigation costs, the range of revenue forecasts, and project
and plan cash flow and bond analysis. The plan submitted to the voters must
provide cost estimates for each project, including reasonable contingency
costs. Plans submitted to the voters must provide that the maximum amount
possible of the funds raised will be used to fund projects in the plan,
including environmental improvements and mitigation, and that administrative
costs be minimized. If actual revenue exceeds actual plan costs, the excess
revenues must be used to retire any outstanding debt associated with the plan.

(4) If a county opts
not to adopt the plan or participate in the regional transportation investment
district, but two or more contiguous counties do choose to continue to
participate, then the coordinating committee may, within ninety days, redefine
the regional transportation investment plan and the ballot measure to be
submitted to the people to reflect elimination of a county, and submit the
redefined plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for
their decision as to whether to continue to adopt the redefined plan and
participate. This action must be completed within sixty days after receipt of
the redefined plan.

(5) Once adopted, the
plan must be forwarded to the participating county legislative authorities to
initiate the election process under section 107 of this act. The coordinating
committee shall at the same time provide notice to each city and town within
the district, the governor, the chairs of the transportation committees of the
legislature, the secretary of transportation, and each legislator whose
legislative district is partially or wholly within the boundaries of the district.

(6) If the ballot
measure is not approved, the coordinating committee may redefine the selected
projects, financing plan, and the ballot measure. The county legislative
authorities may approve the new plan and ballot measure, and may then submit the
revised proposition to the voters at the next election or a special election.
If no ballot measure is approved by the voters by the third vote, the
coordinating committee is dissolved.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. TAXES AND FEES. (1) A
regional transportation investment district coordinating committee may, as part
of a regional transportation investment plan, recommend the imposition of some
or all of the following revenue sources, which a regional transportation
investment district may impose upon approval of the voters as provided in this
chapter:

(a) A regional sales
and use tax, as specified in section 504 of this act, of up to 0.5 percent of
the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in
the case of a use tax, upon the occurrence of any taxable event in the regional
transportation investment district;

(b) A local option
vehicle license fee, as specified under section 508 of this act, of up to one
hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the district. As used in this
subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as defined in RCW
46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined under chapter 46.04 RCW,
may be exempted from this fee;

(c) A parking tax under
RCW 82.80.030;

(d) A local motor vehicle
excise tax under RCW 81.100.060;

(e) An employer excise
tax under RCW 81.100.030; and

(f) Vehicle tolls, but
only on new facilities. Unless otherwise specified by law, the department
shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities, and
the state transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling
authority.

(2) Taxes, fees, and
tolls may not be imposed without an affirmative vote of the majority of the
voters within the boundaries of the district voting on a ballot proposition as
set forth in section 107 of this act. Revenues from these taxes and fees may
be used only to implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district
may contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate entities
for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees authorized in
this section.

(3) Existing statewide
motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes, at the distribution rates in effect
on January 1, 2001, are not intended to be altered by this chapter.

(4)(a) The state sales
and use taxes imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less
any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial construction for a
project to be constructed under this chapter must be transferred to the project
or identified as a credit on the project to defray costs or pay debt service on
that project. In the case of a toll project, the transfer or credit must be
used to lower the overall cost of the project and thereby the corresponding
tolls.

(b) This transaction is
exempt from the requirements in RCW 43.135.035(4).

(c) Government entities
constructing projects under this chapter shall report to the department of
revenue the amount of state sales or use tax covered under this subsection (4).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. PERFORMANCE CRITERIA FOR
REGIONAL PROJECT SELECTION. (1) The coordinating committee shall consider the
following criteria for selecting projects to improve corridor performance:

(a) Reduced level of
congestion and improved safety;

(b) Improved travel
time;

(c) Improved air
quality;

(d) Increases in daily
and peak period person and vehicle trip capacity;

(e) Reductions in
person and vehicle delay;

(f) Improved freight
mobility; and

(g) Cost-effectiveness
of the investment.

(2) These criteria
represent only minimum standards that must be considered in selecting
transportation improvement projects. The board shall also consider rules and
standards for benchmarks adopted by the transportation commission or its
successor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. SUBMISSION OF PLAN TO THE
VOTERS. Two or more contiguous county legislative authorities, upon receipt of
the regional transportation investment plan under section 104 of this act, may
certify the plan to the ballot, including identification of the tax options
necessary to fund the plan. County legislative authorities may draft a ballot
title, give notice as required by law for ballot measures, and perform other duties
as required to put the plan before the voters of the proposed district for
their approval or rejection as a single ballot measure that both approves
formation of the district and approves the plan. Counties must negotiate
interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan. The electorate will be
the voters voting within the boundaries of the participating counties. A
simple majority of the total persons voting on the single ballot measure to
approve the plan, establish the district, and impose the taxes and fees is
required for approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. CERTIFICATION OF
FORMATION. If the voters approve the plan, including creation of a regional
transportation investment district and imposition of taxes and fees, the
district will be declared formed. The county election officials of
participating counties shall, within fifteen days of the final certification of
the election results, publish a notice in a newspaper or newspapers of general
circulation in the district declaring the district formed, and mail copies of
the notice to the governor, the secretary of transportation, the executive
director of the regional transportation planning organization, and the county
treasurer who is serving as the district treasurer. A party challenging the
procedure or the formation of a voter-approved district must file the challenge
in writing by serving the prosecuting attorney of the participating counties
and the attorney general within thirty days after the final certification of
the election. Failure to challenge within that time forever bars further
challenge of the district's procedure or the valid formation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. BOARD COMPOSITION. (1)
The governing board of a district consists of the members of the legislative
authority of each member county, acting ex officio and independently. The
secretary of transportation or the appropriate regional administrator of the
department, as named by the secretary, shall also serve as a nonvoting member
of the board.

(2) A sixty‑percent
majority of the weighted votes of the total board membership is required to
submit to the counties a modified plan under section 114 of this act or any
other proposal to be submitted to the voters. The counties, may, with majority
vote of each county legislative authority, submit a modified plan or proposal
to the voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. BOARD ORGANIZATION. The
board shall adopt rules for the conduct of business. The board shall adopt
bylaws to govern district affairs, which may include:

(1) The time and place
of regular meetings;

(2) Rules for calling
special meetings;

(3) The method of
keeping records of proceedings and official acts;

(4) Procedures for the
safekeeping and disbursement of funds; and

(5) Any other
provisions the board finds necessary to include.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. BOARD'S POWERS AND
DUTIES. (1) The governing board of the district is responsible for the execution
of the voter-approved plan. The board shall:

(a) Impose taxes and
fees authorized by district voters;

(b) Enter into
agreements with state, local, and regional agencies and departments as
necessary to accomplish district purposes and protect the district's investment
in projects;

(c) Accept gifts,
grants, or other contributions of funds that will support the purposes and
programs of the district;

(d) Monitor and audit
the progress and execution of projects to protect the investment of the public
and annually make public its findings;

(e) Pay for services
and enter into leases and contracts, including professional service contracts;

(f) Hire no more than
ten employees, including a director or executive officer, a treasurer or
financial officer, a project manager or engineer, a project permit coordinator,
and clerical staff; and

(g) Exercise other
powers and duties as may be reasonable to carry out the purposes of the
district.

(2) It is the intent of
the legislature that existing staff resources of lead agencies be used in
implementing this chapter. A district may coordinate its activities with the
department, which shall provide services, data, and personnel to assist as desired
by the regional transportation investment district. Lead agencies for projects
that are not state facilities shall also provide staff support for the board.

(3) A district may not
acquire, hold, or dispose of real property.

(4) A district may not
own, operate, or maintain an ongoing facility, road, or transportation system.

(5) A district may
accept and expend or use gifts, grants, or donations.

(6) It is the intent of
the legislature that administrative and overhead costs of a regional
transportation investment district be minimized. For projects costing up to
fifty million dollars, administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three
percent of the total construction and design project costs per year. For
projects costing more than fifty million dollars, administrative and overhead
costs may not exceed three percent of the first fifty million dollars in costs,
plus an additional one-tenth of one percent of each additional dollar above
fifty million. These limitations apply only to the district, and do not limit
the administration or expenditures of the department.

(7) A district may use
the design‑build procedure for projects developed by it. As used in this
section "design‑build procedure" means a method of contracting
under which the district contracts with another party for that party to both
design and build the structures, facilities, and other items specified in the
contract. The requirements and limitations of RCW 47.20.780 and 47.20.785 do
not apply to the projects under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. TREASURER. The regional
transportation investment district, by resolution, shall designate a person
having experience in financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the district.
The district may designate the treasurer of a county within which the district
is located to act as its treasurer. Such a treasurer has all of the powers,
responsibilities, and duties the county treasurer has related to investing
surplus funds. The district shall require a bond with a surety company
authorized to do business in this state in an amount and under the terms and
conditions the district, by resolution, from time to time finds will protect
the district against loss. The district shall pay the premium on the bond.

In addition to the
account established in section 501 of this act, the treasurer may establish a
special account, into which may be paid district funds. The treasurer may
disburse district funds only on warrants issued by the district upon orders or
vouchers approved by the district.

If the treasurer of the
district is the treasurer of a county, all district funds must be deposited
with a county depositary under the same restrictions, contracts, and security
as provided for county depositaries. If the treasurer of the district is some
other person, all funds must be deposited in a bank or banks authorized to do
business in this state qualified for insured deposits under any federal deposit
insurance act as the district, by resolution, designates.

The district may
provide and require a reasonable bond of any other person handling moneys or
securities of the district, but the district shall pay the premium on the bond.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
113. DEBT AND BONDING. The
district may borrow money, but may not issue any debt of its own for more than
two years' duration. A district may issue notes or other evidences of
indebtedness with a maturity of not more than two years. A district may, when
authorized by the plan, enter into agreements with the lead agencies to pledge
taxes or other revenues of the district for the purpose of paying in part or
whole principal and interest on bonds issued by the lead agency. The contracts
pledging revenues and taxes are binding for the term of the agreement, but not
to exceed twenty-five years, and no tax pledged by an agreement may be
eliminated or modified if it would impair the pledge of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
114. PROJECT OR PLAN
MODIFICATION‑-ACCOUNTABILITY. (1) If a project cost exceeds its original
cost by more than twenty percent as identified in the plan:

(a) The board shall, in
coordination with the county legislative authorities, submit to the voters in
the district a ballot measure that redefines the scope of the project, its
schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve the redefined project,
the district shall terminate work on that project, except that the district may
take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement already
constructed. The remainder of any funds that would otherwise have been
expended on the terminated project must first be used to retire any outstanding
debt attributable to the plan and then may be used to implement the remainder
of the plan.

(b) Alternatively, upon
adoption of a resolution by two or more participating counties:

(i) The counties shall
submit to the voters in the district a ballot measure that redefines the scope
of the plan, its projects, its schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to
approve the redefined plan, the district shall terminate work on that plan,
except that the district may take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or connect
any improvement already constructed. The remainder of any funds must be used
to retire any outstanding debt attributable to the plan; or

(ii) The counties may
elect to have the district continue the project without submitting an
additional ballot proposal to the voters.

(2) To assure
accountability to the public for the timely construction of the transportation
improvement project or projects within cost projections, the district shall
issue a report, at least annually, to the public and copies of the report to
newspapers of record in the district. In the report, the district shall indicate
the status of project costs, project expenditures, revenues, and construction
schedules. The report may also include progress towards meeting the
performance criteria provided under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
115. STATE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION ROLE. (1) The department shall designate an office or division
of dedicated staff and services whose primary responsibility is to coordinate
the design, preliminary engineering, permitting, financing, and construction of
projects under consideration by a regional transportation investment district
coordinating committee or that are part of a regional transportation investment
plan being implemented by a regional transportation investment district.

(2) All of the powers
granted the department under Title 47 RCW relating to highway construction may,
at the request of a regional transportation investment district, be used to
implement a regional transportation investment plan and construct
transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
116. STATE OWNS IMPROVEMENTS
TO STATE FACILITIES. Any improvement to a state facility constructed under
this chapter becomes and remains the property of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
117. DISSOLUTION. Within
thirty days of the completion of the construction of the project or series of
projects forming the regional transportation investment plan, the district
shall terminate day‑to‑day operations and exist solely as a limited
entity that oversees the collection of revenue and the payment of debt service
or financing still in effect, if any. The district shall accordingly adjust
downward its employees, administration, and overhead expenses. Any taxes,
fees, or tolls imposed under an approved plan terminate when the financing or
debt service on the project or series of projects constructed is completed and
paid, thirty days from which point the district shall dissolve itself and cease
to exist. If there is no debt outstanding, then the district shall dissolve
within thirty days from completion of construction of the project or series of
projects forming the regional transportation investment plan. Notice of
dissolution must be published in newspapers of general circulation within the
district at least three times in a period of thirty days. Creditors must file
claims for payment of claims due within thirty days of the last published
notice or the claim is extinguished.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
118. OTHER REGIONS. The
legislature finds that regional solutions to the state's transportation needs
are of paramount concern. The legislature further recognizes that different
areas of the state will need the flexibility to fashion local solutions to
their transportation problems, and that regional transportation systems may
evolve over time. Areas of the state outside of King, Snohomish, and Pierce
counties are eligible for grants from the state of no more than one hundred
fifty thousand dollars to study and develop regional transportation models.
Regions electing to participate in this pilot program may form interlocal
agreements within their regions and must develop a model that can be used
within their region. Regions receiving these grants shall report to the transportation
committees in the senate and house of representatives on the positive and
negative aspects of the model as well as costs associated with it no later than
June 30, 2003.

II. JOINT BALLOT WITH RTA

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. JOINT BALLOT MEASURE. At
the option of the coordinating committee, and with the explicit approval of the
regional transit authority, the participating counties may choose to impose any
remaining high capacity transportation taxes under chapter 81.104 RCW that have
not otherwise been used by a regional transit authority and submit to the
voters a common ballot measure that creates the district, approves the regional
transportation investment plan, implements the taxes, and implements any
remaining high capacity transportation taxes within the boundaries of the
regional transportation investment district. Collection and expenditures of
any high capacity transportation taxes implemented under this section must be
determined by agreement between the participating counties or district and the
regional transit authority electing to submit high capacity transportation
taxes to the voters under a common ballot measure as provided in this section.
If the measure fails, all such unused high capacity transportation taxes revert
back to and remain with the regional transit authority. A project constructed
with this funding is not considered a "transportation project" under
section 102 of this act.

Sec. 202. RCW 81.104.140 and 1992
c 101 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Agencies authorized
to provide high capacity transportation service, including transit agencies and
regional transit authorities, and regional transportation investment
districts acting with the agreement of an agency, are hereby granted
dedicated funding sources for such systems. These dedicated funding sources,
as set forth in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170, are authorized only
for agencies located in (a) each county with a population of two hundred ten
thousand or more and (b) each county with a population of from one hundred
twenty‑five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand except for
those counties that do not border a county with a population as described under
(a) of this subsection. In any county with a population of one million or more
or in any county having a population of four hundred thousand or more bordering
a county with a population of one million or more, these funding sources may be
imposed only by a regional transit authority or a regional transportation
investment district. Regional transportation investment districts may, with
the approval of the regional transit authority within its boundaries, impose
the taxes authorized under this chapter, but only upon approval of the voters
and to the extent that the maximum amount of taxes authorized under this
chapter have not been imposed.

(2) Agencies planning
to construct and operate a high capacity transportation system should also seek
other funds, including federal, state, local, and private sector assistance.

(3) Funding sources
should satisfy each of the following criteria to the greatest extent possible:

(a) Acceptability;

(b) Ease of
administration;

(c) Equity;

(d) Implementation
feasibility;

(e) Revenue reliability;
and

(f) Revenue yield.

(4) Agencies
participating in regional high capacity transportation system development are
authorized to levy and collect the following voter‑approved local option
funding sources:

(a) Employer tax as
provided in RCW 81.104.150, other than by regional transportation investment
districts;

(b) Special motor
vehicle excise tax as provided in RCW 81.104.160; and

(c) Sales and use tax
as provided in RCW 81.104.170.

Revenues from these taxes
may be used only to support those purposes prescribed in subsection (10) of
this section. Before the date of an election authorizing an agency to impose
any of the taxes enumerated in this section and authorized in RCW 81.104.150,
81.104.160, and 81.104.170, the agency must comply with the process prescribed
in RCW 81.104.100 (1) and (2) and 81.104.110. No construction on exclusive
right of way may occur before the requirements of RCW 81.104.100(3) are met.

(5) Authorization in
subsection (4) of this section shall not adversely affect the funding authority
of transit agencies not provided for in this chapter. Local option funds may
be used to support implementation of interlocal agreements with respect to the
establishment of regional high capacity transportation service. Except when a
regional transit authority exists, local jurisdictions shall retain control
over moneys generated within their boundaries, although funds may be commingled
with those generated in other areas for planning, construction, and operation
of high capacity transportation systems as set forth in the agreements.

(6) Agencies planning
to construct and operate high capacity transportation systems may contract with
the state for collection and transference of voter‑approved local option
revenue.

(7) Dedicated high
capacity transportation funding sources authorized in RCW 81.104.150,
81.104.160, and 81.104.170 shall be subject to voter approval by a simple
majority. A single ballot proposition may seek approval for one or more of the
authorized taxing sources. The ballot title shall reference the document
identified in subsection (8) of this section.

(8) Agencies shall
provide to the registered voters in the area a document describing the systems
plan and the financing plan set forth in RCW 81.104.100. It shall also
describe the relationship of the system to regional issues such as development
density at station locations and activity centers, and the interrelationship of
the system to adopted land use and transportation demand management goals
within the region. This document shall be provided to the voters at least
twenty days prior to the date of the election.

(9) For any election in
which voter approval is sought for a high capacity transportation system plan
and financing plan pursuant to RCW 81.104.040, a local voter's pamphlet shall
be produced as provided in chapter 29.81A RCW.

(10) Agencies providing
high capacity transportation service shall retain responsibility for revenue
encumbrance, disbursement, and bonding. Funds may be used for any purpose
relating to planning, construction, and operation of high capacity
transportation systems and commuter rail systems, personal rapid transit,
busways, bus sets, and entrained and linked buses.

III. CITY MVET FOR MONORAIL

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. A new section is added
to chapter 81.104 RCW to read as follows:

MVET FOR CITY
MONORAIL. (1) The legislature finds that there is a need for large cities,
with populations of five hundred thousand or more, at their option, to
develop, construct, and operate intracity monorail systems within their
boundaries to facilitate the movement of people and mitigate traffic congestion
in highly urbanized areas.

(2) For the sole
purposes of developing, constructing, or operating an intracity monorail system
within its boundaries, a city with a population of five hundred thousand or
more may, with voter approval, impose a motor vehicle excise tax, at a rate
approved by the voters, but not exceeding one percent of the value of every
motor vehicle owned by a person residing within the city and on the state sales
and use taxes paid under the rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail car rentals
within the city. No tax may be imposed on vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070
except vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW
46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.

Before the effective
date of the resolution or ordinance imposing the tax, cities imposing a tax
under this section shall contract the administration and collection to the
state department of licensing and department of revenue, as appropriate, which
shall deduct an amount, as provided by contract, for administration and
collection expenses incurred by the department. All administrative provisions
in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW, insofar as they apply to state motor
vehicle excise taxes, also apply to taxes imposed under this section. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW,
insofar as they apply to state sales and use taxes, also apply to taxes imposed
under this section.

IV. HIGHWAYS OF STATEWIDE
SIGNIFICANCE

Sec. 401. RCW 47.05.021 and 1998 c
245 s 95 and 1998 c 171 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

LEGISLATURE MAY
DESIGNATE HIGHWAYS OF STATEWIDE SIGNIFICANCE. (1) The transportation
commission is hereby directed to conduct periodic analyses of the entire state
highway system, report thereon to the chairs of the transportation committees
of the senate and house of representatives, including one copy to the staff of
each of the committees, biennially and based thereon, to subdivide, classify,
and subclassify according to their function and importance all designated state
highways and those added from time to time and periodically review and revise
the classifications into the following three functional classes:

(a) The "principal
arterial system" shall consist of a connected network of rural arterial
routes with appropriate extensions into and through urban areas, including all
routes designated as part of the interstate system, which serve corridor
movements having travel characteristics indicative of substantial statewide and
interstate travel;

(b) The "minor
arterial system" shall, in conjunction with the principal arterial system,
form a rural network of arterial routes linking cities and other activity
centers which generate long distance travel, and, with appropriate extensions
into and through urban areas, form an integrated network providing interstate
and interregional service; and

(c) The "collector
system" shall consist of routes which primarily serve the more important
intercounty, intracounty, and intraurban travel corridors, collect traffic from
the system of local access roads and convey it to the arterial system, and on
which, regardless of traffic volume, the predominant travel distances are
shorter than on arterial routes.

(2) In making the
functional classification the transportation commission shall adopt and give
consideration to criteria consistent with this section and federal regulations
relating to the functional classification of highways, including but not
limited to the following:

(a) Urban population
centers within and without the state stratified and ranked according to size;

(b) Important traffic
generating economic activities, including but not limited to recreation,
agriculture, government, business, and industry;

(c) Feasibility of the
route, including availability of alternate routes within and without the state;

(d) Directness of
travel and distance between points of economic importance;

(e) Length of trips;

(f) Character and
volume of traffic;

(g) Preferential
consideration for multiple service which shall include public transportation;

(h) Reasonable spacing
depending upon population density; and

(i) System continuity.

(3) The transportation
commission or the legislature shall designate state highways of statewide
significance under RCW 47.06.140((, and)). If the commission
designates a state highway of statewide significance, it shall submit a
list of such facilities for adoption by the ((1999)) legislature. This
statewide system shall include at a minimum interstate highways and other
statewide principal arterials that are needed to connect major communities
across the state and support the state's economy.

(4) The transportation
commission shall designate a freight and goods transportation system. This
statewide system shall include state highways, county roads, and city streets.
The commission, in cooperation with cities and counties, shall review and make
recommendations to the legislature regarding policies governing weight
restrictions and road closures which affect the transportation of freight and
goods.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. A new section is added
to chapter 47.05 RCW to read as follows:

DESIGNATION OF STATE
ROUTE NUMBER 509. The legislature designates that portion of state route
number 509 that runs or will run from state route number 518 in the north to
the intersection with interstate 5 in the south as a state highway of statewide
significance.

V. FINANCE

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
INVESTMENT DISTRICT ACCOUNT. The regional transportation investment district
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of this
account is to act as an account into which may be deposited state money, if
any, that may be used in conjunction with district money to fund transportation
projects. Additionally, the district may deposit funds into this account for
disbursement, as appropriate, on transportation projects. Nothing in this
section requires any state matching money. All money deposited in the regional
transportation investment district account will be used for design, right of
way acquisition, capital acquisition, and construction, or for the payment of
debt service associated with these activities, for regionally funded projects
developed under this chapter. Only the district may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required for expenditures from this
account.

Sec. 502. RCW 47.56.075 and 1984 c
7 s 252 are each amended to read as follows:

TOLL ROADS‑-REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION INVESTMENT DISTRICTS. The department shall approve for
construction only such toll roads as the legislature specifically authorizes or
such toll facilities as are specifically sponsored by a regional
transportation investment district, city, town, or county.

Sec. 503. RCW 43.84.092 and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608, 2001 c 273 s 6, 2001 c 141 s 3, and 2001 c 80 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DEPOSIT OF SURPLUS
BALANCE INVESTMENT EARNINGS‑-TREASURY INCOME ACCOUNT‑-ACCOUNTS AND
FUNDS CREDITED. (EFFECTIVE MARCH 1, 2002.) (1) All earnings of investments
of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury
income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve
land account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public health supplemental
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment
board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3
account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. A new section is added
to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

SALES AND USE TAX. (1)
If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries voting on the
ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment district may impose a
sales and use tax of up to 0.5 percent of the selling price or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax. The tax authorized by this section is
in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing district. Motor
vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.320, are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed
under this subsection.

(2) A use tax may be
imposed on the privilege of using a motor vehicle within a regional
transportation investment district. The tax applies to those persons who
reside within the regional transportation investment district. The rate of the
tax may not exceed 0.5 percent of the value of the motor vehicle. The tax
authorized by this subsection is in addition to the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030 and must be imposed and collected at the time a taxable event under
RCW 82.08.020(1) or 82.12.020 takes place. All revenue received under this
subsection must be deposited in the local sales and use tax account and
distributed to the regional transportation investment district according to RCW
82.14.050. The following provisions apply to the use tax in this subsection:

(a) Where persons are
taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller shall collect the use tax from the
buyer using the collection provisions of RCW 82.08.050.

(b) Where persons are
taxable under chapter 82.12 RCW, the use tax must be collected using the
provisions of RCW 82.12.045.

(c) "Motor
vehicle" has the meaning given in RCW 46.04.320.

(d) "Person"
has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(e) The value of a
motor vehicle must be determined under RCW 82.12.010.

(f) Except as
specifically stated in this subsection (2), chapters 82.12 and 82.32 RCW apply
to the use tax. The use tax is a local tax imposed under the authority of
chapter 82.14 RCW, and chapter 82.14 RCW applies fully to the use tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. A new section is added
to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

SALES AND USE TAX
CREDIT SHIFT. A transfer or credit from the general fund of sales and use tax
paid on a transportation project being constructed by a regional transportation
investment district does not require a corresponding lowering of the state
expenditure limit to reflect this shift for purposes of RCW 43.135.035(4).

Sec. 506. RCW 82.14.050 and 1999 c
165 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

CONTRACTS FOR
COLLECTION OF SALES AND USE TAX. The counties, cities, and transportation
authorities under RCW 82.14.045 ((and)), public facilities
districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, and regional
transportation investment districts shall contract, prior to the effective
date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the
administration and collection to the state department of revenue, which shall
deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent
of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by
the department. The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this
chapter ((which)) that is collected by the department of revenue
shall be deposited by the state department of revenue in the local sales and
use tax account hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local
sales and use tax account may be spent only for distribution to counties,
cities, transportation authorities, ((and)) public facilities districts,
and regional transportation investment districts imposing a sales and use
tax. All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32
RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are
applicable to state sales and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed
pursuant to this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account shall be
credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, ((and)) public facilities
districts, and regional transportation investment districts monthly.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
507. A new section is added
to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

CREDIT ON SALES TAX ON
TOLL PROJECTS. (1) The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW, less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial
construction for a project to be constructed under chapter 36.-- RCW (sections
101 through 117, 201, and 501 of this act), must be transferred to the project
or identified as a credit on the project to defray costs or pay debt service on
that project. In the case of a toll project, this transfer or credit must be
used to lower the overall cost of the project and thereby the corresponding
tolls.

(2) This transaction is
exempt from the requirements in RCW 43.135.035(4).

(3) Government entities
constructing projects under chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 101 through 117, 201,
and 501 of this act) shall report to the department the amount of state sales
or use tax covered under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
508. A new section is added
to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

LOCAL OPTION VEHICLE
LICENSE FEE. (1) Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its
boundaries voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation
investment district may set and impose an annual local option vehicle license
fee, or a schedule of fees based upon the age of the vehicle, of up to one
hundred dollars per motor vehicle registered within the boundaries of the
region on every motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.320. Vehicles
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the International Registration Plan are
exempt from the annual local option vehicle license fee set forth in this
section. The department of licensing shall administer and collect this fee on
behalf of regional transportation investment districts and remit this fee to the
custody of the state treasurer for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

(2) The local option
vehicle license fee applies only when establishing or renewing a vehicle
registration. This fee is effective with the registration expiration date as
provided by the department of licensing.

(3) A regional
transportation investment district imposing the local option vehicle license
fee or initiating an exemption process shall enter into a contract with the
department of licensing. The contract must contain provisions that fully
recover the costs to the department of licensing for collection and
administration of the fee.

(4) A regional
transportation investment district imposing the local option fee shall delay
the effective date of the local option vehicle license fee imposed by this
section at least six months from the date of the final certification of the
approval election to allow the department of licensing to implement the
administration and collection of or exemption from the fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
509. A new section is added
to chapter 47.56 RCW to read as follows:

AUTHORIZATION FOR
DISTRICT TO IMPOSE TOLLS. Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its
boundaries voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes
authorized in section 105(1)(g) of this act, a regional transportation
investment district may impose vehicle tolls on state routes where improvements
financed in whole or in part by a regional transportation investment district
add additional lanes to a highway of statewide significance. The department
shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities
unless otherwise specified in law, and the state transportation commission, or
its successor, shall be the tolling authority.

Sec. 510. RCW 47.56.075 and 1984 c
7 s 252 are each amended to read as follows:

DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION AUTHORIZATION FOR DISTRICT TOLL FACILITIES. The department
shall approve for construction only such toll roads as the legislature
specifically authorizes or such toll facilities as are specifically sponsored
by a regional transportation investment district, city, town, or county.

Sec. 511. RCW 81.100.010 and 1990
c 43 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

DISTRICT AUTHORITY TO
IMPOSE HIGH-OCCUPANCY VEHICLE TAXES. The need for mobility, growing travel
demand, and increasing traffic congestion in urban areas necessitate
accelerated development and increased utilization of the high-occupancy
vehicle system. RCW 81.100.030 and 81.100.060 provide taxing authority that
counties or regional transportation investment districts can use in the
near term to accelerate development and increase utilization of the high‑occupancy
vehicle system by supplementing available federal, state, and local funds.

Sec. 512. RCW 81.100.030 and 1991
c 363 s 153 are each amended to read as follows:

DISTRICT AUTHORITY TO
IMPOSE HIGH-OCCUPANCY VEHICLE EMPLOYER TAX. (1) A county with a population of
one million or more, or a county with a population of from two hundred ten
thousand to less than one million that is adjoining a county with a population
of one million or more, and having within its boundaries existing or planned
high‑occupancy vehicle lanes on the state highway system, or a
regional transportation investment district for capital improvements, but only
to the extent that the tax has not already been imposed by the county, may,
with voter approval impose an excise tax of up to two dollars per employee per
month on all employers or any class or classes of employers, public and
private, including the state located in the agency's jurisdiction, measured by
the number of full-time equivalent employees. In no event may the total
taxes imposed under this section exceed two dollars per employee per month for
any single employer. The county or investment district imposing the
tax authorized in this section may provide for exemptions from the tax to such
educational, cultural, health, charitable, or religious organizations as it deems
appropriate.

Counties or
investment districts may contract with the state department of revenue or
other appropriate entities for administration and collection of the tax. Such
contract shall provide for deduction of an amount for administration and collection
expenses.

(2) The tax shall not
apply to employment of a person when the employer has paid for at least half of
the cost of a transit pass issued by a transit agency for that employee, valid
for the period for which the tax would otherwise be owed.

(3) A county or
investment district shall adopt rules ((which)) that exempt
from all or a portion of the tax any employer that has entered into an
agreement with the county or investment district that is designed to
reduce the proportion of employees who drive in single-occupant vehicles during
peak commuting periods in proportion to the degree that the agreement is
designed to meet the goals for the employer's location adopted under RCW
81.100.040.

The agreement shall
include a list of specific actions that the employer will undertake to be
entitled to the exemption. Employers having an exemption from all or part of
the tax through this subsection shall annually certify to the county or
investment district that the employer is fulfilling the terms of the
agreement. The exemption continues as long as the employer is in compliance
with the agreement.

If the tax authorized
in RCW 81.100.060 is also imposed ((by the county)), the total proceeds
from both tax sources each year shall not exceed the maximum amount which could
be collected under RCW 81.100.060.

Sec. 513. RCW 81.100.060 and 1998
c 321 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

DISTRICT AUTHORITY TO
IMPOSE HIGH-OCCUPANCY VEHICLE MOTOR VEHICLE EXCISE TAX. A county with a
population of one million or more and a county with a population of from two
hundred ten thousand to less than one million that is adjoining a county with a
population of one million or more, having within their boundaries existing or
planned high‑occupancy vehicle lanes on the state highway system,
or a regional transportation investment district for capital improvements, but
only to the extent that the surcharge has not already been imposed by the
county, may, with voter approval, impose a local surcharge of not more than
13.64 percent on the state motor vehicle excise tax paid under RCW 82.44.020(1)
on vehicles registered to a person residing within the county and on the state
sales and use taxes paid under the rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail car
rentals within the county or investment district. A county may impose the
surcharge only to the extent that it has not been imposed by the district.
No surcharge may be imposed on vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 except
vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079,
46.16.085, or 46.16.090.

Counties or
investment districts imposing a tax under this section shall contract,
before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance imposing a surcharge,
administration and collection to the state department of licensing, and
department of revenue, as appropriate, which shall deduct an amount, as
provided by contract, for administration and collection expenses incurred by
the department. All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and
82.44 RCW shall, insofar as they are applicable to ((state)) motor
vehicle excise taxes, be applicable to surcharges imposed under this section.
All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW
shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, be
applicable to surcharges imposed under this section.

If the tax authorized
in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed ((by the county)), the total proceeds
from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW 81.100.030 each year shall
not exceed the maximum amount which could be collected under this section.

Sec. 514. RCW 82.80.030 and 1990 c
42 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

DISTRICT AUTHORITY TO
IMPOSE PARKING TAX. (1) Subject to the conditions of this section, the
legislative authority of a county ((or)), city, or district
may fix and impose a parking tax on all persons engaged in a commercial parking
business within its respective jurisdiction. The jurisdiction of a county, for
purposes of this section, includes only the unincorporated area of the county.
The jurisdiction of a city, or district includes only the area within
its ((incorporated)) boundaries.

(2) In lieu of the tax
in subsection (1) of this section, a city ((or)), a county in its
unincorporated area, or a district may fix and impose a tax for the act
or privilege of parking a motor vehicle in a facility operated by a commercial
parking business.

The city ((or)),
county, or district may provide that:

(a) The tax is paid by
the operator or owner of the motor vehicle;

(b) The tax applies to
all parking for which a fee is paid, whether paid or leased, including parking
supplied with a lease of nonresidential space;

(c) The tax is
collected by the operator of the facility and remitted to the city ((or)),
county, or district;

(d) The tax is a fee
per vehicle or is measured by the parking charge;

(e) The tax rate varies
with zoning or location of the facility, the duration of the parking, the time
of entry or exit, the type or use of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors;
and

(f) Tax exempt
carpools, vehicles with handicapped decals, or government vehicles are exempt
from the tax.

(3) "Commercial
parking business" as used in this section, means the ownership, lease,
operation, or management of a commercial parking lot in which fees are
charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a covered or uncovered area
with stalls for the purpose of parking motor vehicles.

(4) The rate of the tax
under subsection (1) of this section may be based either upon gross proceeds or
the number of vehicle stalls available for commercial parking use. The rates
charged must be uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking
business.

(5) The county ((or)),
city, or district levying the tax provided for in subsection (1) or (2)
of this section may provide for its payment on a monthly, quarterly, or annual
basis. Each local government may develop by ordinance or resolution rules for
administering the tax, including provisions for reporting by commercial parking
businesses, collection, and enforcement.

(6) The proceeds of the
commercial parking tax fixed and imposed by a city or county under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be used strictly for transportation
purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070. The proceeds of the parking tax
imposed by a district must be used as provided in chapter 36.-- RCW (sections
101 through 117, 201, and 501 of this act).

Sec. 515. RCW 82.80.070 and 1991 c
141 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

REQUIRES THAT LOCAL
OPTION TAXES IMPOSED BY DISTRICT BE USED FOR DISTRICT PROJECTS. (1) The
proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local option authority of
RCW 82.80.010, 82.80.020, 82.80.030, and 82.80.050 (hereafter called
"local option transportation revenues") shall be used for
transportation purposes only, including but not limited to the following: The
operation and preservation of roads, streets, and other transportation
improvements; new construction, reconstruction, and expansion of city streets,
county roads, and state highways and other transportation improvements;
development and implementation of public transportation and high-capacity
transit improvements and programs; and planning, design, and acquisition of
right of way and sites for such transportation purposes. The proceeds
collected from excise taxes on the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle
fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010 shall be used exclusively for
"highway purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section
40 of the state Constitution.

(2) The local option
transportation revenues shall be expended for transportation uses consistent
with the adopted transportation and land use plans of the jurisdiction
expending the funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted regional
transportation plan for metropolitan planning areas.

(3) Each local
government with a population greater than eight thousand that levies or expends
local option transportation funds, is also required to develop and adopt a
specific transportation program that contains the following elements:

(a) The program shall
identify the geographic boundaries of the entire area or areas within which
local option transportation revenues will be levied and expended.

(b) The program shall
be based on an adopted transportation plan for the geographic areas covered and
shall identify the proposed operation and construction of transportation
improvements and services in the designated plan area intended to be funded in
whole or in part by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the
annual costs applicable to the program.

(c) The program shall
indicate how the local transportation plan is coordinated with applicable
transportation plans for the region and for adjacent jurisdictions.

(d) The program shall
include at least a six-year funding plan, updated annually, identifying the
specific public and private sources and amounts of revenue necessary to fund
the program. The program shall include a proposed schedule for construction of
projects and expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new development
within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional revenue is proposed
to be earmarked as future appropriations for transportation improvements in the
program.

(4) Local governments
with a population greater than eight thousand exercising the authority for
local option transportation funds shall periodically review and update their
transportation program to ensure that it is consistent with applicable local
and regional transportation and land use plans and within the means of
estimated public and private revenue available.

(5) In the case of
expenditure for new or expanded transportation facilities, improvements, and
services, priorities in the use of local option transportation revenues shall
be identified in the transportation program and expenditures shall be made
based upon the following criteria, which are stated in descending order of
weight to be attributed:

(a) First, the project
serves a multijurisdictional function;

(b) Second, it is
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion;

(c) Third, it has the
greatest person-carrying capacity;

(d) Fourth, it is
partially funded by other government funds, such as from the state
transportation improvement board, or by private sector contributions, such as
those from the local transportation act, chapter 39.92 RCW; and

(e) Fifth, it meets
such other criteria as the local government determines is appropriate.

(6) It is the intent of
the legislature that as a condition of levying, receiving, and expending local
option transportation revenues, no local government agency use the revenues to
replace, divert, or loan any revenues currently being used for transportation
purposes to nontransportation purposes. The association of Washington cities
and the Washington state association of counties, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, shall study the issue of nondiversion and
make recommendations to the legislative transportation committee for language
implementing the intent of this section by December 1, 1990.

(7) Local governments
are encouraged to enter into interlocal agreements to jointly develop and adopt
with other local governments the transportation programs required by this
section for the purpose of accomplishing regional transportation planning and
development.

(8) Local governments
may use all or a part of the local option transportation revenues for the
amortization of local government general obligation and revenue bonds issued
for transportation purposes consistent with the requirements of this section.

(9) Subsections (1)
through (8) of this section do not apply to a regional transportation
investment district imposing a tax or fee under the local option authority of
this chapter. Proceeds collected under the exercise of local option authority
under this chapter by a district must be used in accordance with chapter 36.--
RCW (sections 101 through 117, 201, and 501 of this act). Proceeds collected
under RCW 82.80.010 by a district must be used exclusively for "highway
purposes," as that term is construed under Article II, section 40 of the
Washington state Constitution.

Sec. 516. RCW 82.80.080 and 1998 c
281 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

LOCAL OPTION TAX
REVENUE DISTRIBUTION. (1) The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less
authorized deductions, generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW
82.80.010 and 82.80.020, levied by counties to the levying counties, and cities
contained in those counties, based on the relative per capita population.
County population for purposes of this section is equal to one and one-half of
the unincorporated population of the county. In calculating the distributions,
the state treasurer shall use the population estimates prepared by the state
office of financial management and shall further calculate the distribution
based on information supplied by the departments of licensing and revenue, as
appropriate.

(2) The state treasurer
shall distribute revenues, less authorized deductions, generated by the local
option taxes authorized in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.80.020 levied by qualifying
cities and towns to the levying cities and towns.

(3) The state
treasurer shall distribute to the district revenues, less authorized
deductions, generated by the local option taxes under RCW 82.80.010 or fees
under section 508 of this act levied by a district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
517. A new section is added
to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

DISTRICT DEFINED FOR
LOCAL TAXES. For the purposes of this chapter, "district" means a
regional transportation investment district created under chapter 36.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 117, 201, and 501 of this act).

VI. OTHER PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. CAPTIONS AND
SUBHEADINGS. Captions and subheadings used in this act are not part of the
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. TERMINATION OF
DISTRICTS. Regional transportation investment districts and their powers and
duties are terminated on June 30, 2006. However, nothing in this section may
be construed as impairing a district created before June 30, 2006, from
continuing to collect approved revenues and make payment on projects or debt incurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. CODIFICATION. Sections
101 through 117, 201, and 501 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605. NULL AND VOID. This act
is null and void if a transportation revenue act containing new or additional
revenue does not become law by December 31, 2002.

---
END ---