BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.44.130 and 2000 c
91 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any adult or
juvenile residing whether or not the person has a fixed residence, or who is a
student, is employed, or carries on a vocation in this state who has been found
to have committed or has been convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping
offense, or who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter
10.77 RCW of committing any sex offense or kidnapping offense, shall register
with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or
place of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified in this section.
Where a person required to register under this section is in custody of the
state department of corrections, the state department of social and health
services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile
detention facility as a result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the
person shall also register at the time of release from custody with an official
designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the person. In addition,
any such adult or juvenile who is admitted to a public or private institution
of higher education shall, within ten days of enrolling or by the first
business day after arriving at the institution, whichever is earlier, notify
the sheriff for the county of the person's residence of the person's intent to
attend the institution. Persons required to register under this section who
are enrolled in a public or private institution of higher education on June 11,
1998, must notify the county sheriff immediately. The sheriff shall notify the
institution's department of public safety and shall provide that department
with the same information provided to a county sheriff under subsection (3) of
this section.

(2) This section may
not be construed to confer any powers pursuant to RCW 4.24.500 upon the public
safety department of any public or private institution of higher education.

(3)(a) The person shall
provide the following information when registering: (i) Name; (ii) address;
(iii) date and place of birth; (iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which
convicted; (vi) date and place of conviction; (vii) aliases used; (viii) social
security number; (ix) photograph; and (x) fingerprints.

(b) Any person who
lacks a fixed residence shall provide the following information when
registering: (i) Name; (ii) date and place of birth; (iii) place of employment;
(iv) crime for which convicted; (v) date and place of conviction; (vi) aliases
used; (vii) social security number; (viii) photograph; (ix) fingerprints; and
(x) where he or she plans to stay.

(4)(a) Offenders shall
register with the county sheriff within the following deadlines. For purposes
of this section the term "conviction" refers to adult convictions and
juvenile adjudications for sex offenses or kidnapping offenses:

(i) OFFENDERS IN
CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders who committed a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 28, 1991, are in custody, as a
result of that offense, of the state department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, a local division of youth services,
or a local jail or juvenile detention facility, and (B) kidnapping offenders
who on or after July 27, 1997, are in custody of the state department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local
division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility,
must register at the time of release from custody with an official designated
by the agency that has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within
three days forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the
county of the offender's anticipated residence. The offender must also
register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the county
sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a
resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of
employment or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender
shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register. Failure to
register at the time of release and within twenty-four hours of release
constitutes a violation of this section and is punishable as provided in
subsection (((10))) (11) of this section.

When the agency with
jurisdiction intends to release an offender with a duty to register under this
section, and the agency has knowledge that the offender is eligible for
developmental disability services from the department of social and health
services, the agency shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of
the release. Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender
is to be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in
meeting the initial registration requirement under this section. Failure to
provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for any violation of
this section.

(ii) OFFENDERS NOT IN
CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on July 28,
1991, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate
sentence review board or under the department of correction's active
supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state department
of social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for sex
offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must register within
ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who, on July 27, 1997, are not
in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review
board or under the department of correction's active supervision, as defined by
the department of corrections, the state department of social and health
services, or a local division of youth services, for kidnapping offenses
committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of
July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex offender who was
required to register under this subsection (4)(a)(ii) as of July 28, 1991, or a
kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27, 1997, shall not relieve
the offender of the duty to register or to reregister following a change in residence.
The obligation to register shall only cease pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(iii) OFFENDERS UNDER
FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on or after July 23, 1995, and
kidnapping offenders who, on or after July 27, 1997, as a result of that
offense are in the custody of the United States bureau of prisons or other
federal or military correctional agency for sex offenses committed before, on,
or after February 28, 1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or
after July 27, 1997, must register within twenty-four hours from the time of
release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if
the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school,
or place of employment or vocation. Sex offenders who, on July 23, 1995, are
not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of
prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military
parole board for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990,
must register within ten days of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on
July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United
States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole
commission, or military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before,
on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997. A
change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to register
under this subsection (4)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a kidnapping offender
required to register as of July 27, 1997 shall not relieve the offender of the
duty to register or to reregister following a change in residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or
place of employment or vocation. The obligation to register shall only cease
pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE
CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders who are convicted of a sex offense
on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex offense that was committed on or after
February 28, 1990, and kidnapping offenders who are convicted on or after July
27, 1997, for a kidnapping offense that was committed on or after July 27,
1997, but who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon
sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff to register immediately upon
completion of being sentenced.

(v) OFFENDERS WHO ARE
NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON RESIDENTS. Sex offenders and kidnapping
offenders who move to Washington state from another state or a foreign country
that are not under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections, the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the state department of social and
health services at the time of moving to Washington, must register within
thirty days of establishing residence or reestablishing residence if the person
is a former Washington resident. The duty to register under this subsection
applies to sex offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a foreign
country, federal or military statutes, or Washington state for offenses
committed on or after February 28, 1990, and to kidnapping offenders convicted
under the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military
statutes, or Washington state for offenses committed on or after July 27,
1997. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders from other states or a foreign
country who, when they move to Washington, are under the jurisdiction of the
department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the
department of social and health services must register within twenty-four hours
of moving to Washington. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender
shall notify the offender of the registration requirements before the offender
moves to Washington.

(vi) OFFENDERS FOUND
NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not
guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of (A) committing a sex
offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 23,
1995, is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of
social and health services, or (B) committing a kidnapping offense on, before,
or after July 27, 1997, and who on or after July 27, 1997, is in custody, as a
result of that finding, of the state department of social and health services,
must register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the county
sheriff for the county of the person's residence. The state department of
social and health services shall provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its
custody of the duty to register. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not
guilty by reason of insanity of committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, but who was released before July 23, 1995, or any adult or
juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity of committing a
kidnapping offense but who was released before July 27, 1997, shall be required
to register within twenty-four hours of receiving notice of this registration
requirement. The state department of social and health services shall make
reasonable attempts within available resources to notify sex offenders who were
released before July 23, 1995, and kidnapping offenders who were released
before July 27, 1997. Failure to register within twenty-four hours of release,
or of receiving notice, constitutes a violation of this section and is
punishable as provided in subsection (((10))) (11) of this
section.

(vii) OFFENDERS WHO
LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person who lacks a fixed residence and leaves the
county in which he or she is registered and enters and remains within a new
county for twenty-four hours is required to register with the county sheriff
not more than twenty-four hours after entering the county and provide the
information required in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(viii) OFFENDERS WHO
LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE UNDER SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a
fixed residence and who are under the supervision of the department shall
register in the county of their supervision.

(ix) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE
TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders
required to register in Washington, who move to another state, or who work,
carry on a vocation, or attend school in another state shall register a new
address, fingerprints, and photograph with the new state within ten days after
establishing residence, or after beginning to work, carry on a vocation, or
attend school in the new state. The person must also send written notice
within ten days of moving to the new state or to a foreign country to the
county sheriff with whom the person last registered in Washington state. The
county sheriff shall promptly forward this information to the Washington state
patrol.

(b) Failure to register
within the time required under this section constitutes a per se violation of
this section and is punishable as provided in subsection (((10))) (11)
of this section. The county sheriff shall not be required to determine whether
the person is living within the county.

(c) An arrest on
charges of failure to register, service of an information, or a complaint for a
violation of this section, or arraignment on charges for a violation of this
section, constitutes actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged
with the crime of failure to register under this section who asserts as a
defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register immediately
following actual notice of the duty through arrest, service, or arraignment.
Failure to register as required under this subsection (4)(c) constitutes
grounds for filing another charge of failing to register. Registering
following arrest, service, or arraignment on charges shall not relieve the
offender from criminal liability for failure to register prior to the filing of
the original charge.

(d) The deadlines for
the duty to register under this section do not relieve any sex offender of the
duty to register under this section as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.

(5)(a) If any person
required to register pursuant to this section changes his or her residence
address within the same county, the person must send written notice of the
change of address to the county sheriff within seventy-two hours of moving. If
any person required to register pursuant to this section moves to a new county,
the person must send written notice of the change of address at least fourteen
days before moving to the county sheriff in the new county of residence and
must register with that county sheriff within twenty-four hours of moving. The
person must also send written notice within ten days of the change of address
in the new county to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered.
The county sheriff with whom the person last registered shall promptly forward
the information concerning the change of address to the county sheriff for the
county of the person's new residence. Upon receipt of notice of change of
address to a new state, the county sheriff shall promptly forward the information
regarding the change of address to the agency designated by the new state as
the state's offender registration agency.

(b) It is an
affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed to send a notice at
least fourteen days in advance of moving as required under (a) of this
subsection that the person did not know the location of his or her new
residence at least fourteen days before moving. The defendant must establish
the defense by a preponderance of the evidence and, to prevail on the defense, must
also prove by a preponderance that the defendant sent the required notice
within twenty-four hours of determining the new address.

(6)(a) Any person
required to register under this section who lacks a fixed residence shall
provide written notice to the sheriff of the county where he or she last
registered within fourteen days after ceasing to have a fixed residence. The
notice shall include the information required by subsection (3)(b) of this
section, except the photograph and fingerprints. The county sheriff may, for
reasonable cause, require the offender to provide a photograph and
fingerprints. The sheriff shall forward this information to the sheriff of the
county in which the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside
in another county.

(b) A person who lacks
a fixed residence must report in person to the sheriff of the county where he
or she is registered. If he or she has been classified as a risk level I sex
or kidnapping offender, he or she must report monthly. If he or she has been
classified as a risk level II or III sex or kidnapping offender, he or she must
report weekly. The lack of a fixed residence is a factor that may be
considered in determining a sex offender's risk level.

(c) If any person
required to register pursuant to this section does not have a fixed residence,
it is an affirmative defense to the charge of failure to register, that he or
she provided written notice to the sheriff of the county where he or she last
registered within fourteen days after ceasing to have a fixed residence and has
subsequently complied with the requirements of subsections (4)(a)(vii) or
(viii) and (6) of this section. To prevail, the person must prove the defense
by a preponderance of the evidence.

(7) A sex offender
subject to registration requirements under this section who applies to change
his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any other law shall submit a copy of the
application to the county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and
to the state patrol not fewer than five days before the entry of an order
granting the name change. No sex offender under the requirement to register
under this section at the time of application shall be granted an order
changing his or her name if the court finds that doing so will interfere with
legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall be denied when
the name change is requested for religious or legitimate cultural reasons or in
recognition of marriage or dissolution of marriage. A sex offender under the
requirement to register under this section who receives an order changing his
or her name shall submit a copy of the order to the county sheriff of the
county of the person's residence and to the state patrol within five days of
the entry of the order.

(8) Any person required
to register under this section who: (a) Is a prospective tenant under chapter
59.18 or 59.20 RCW shall disclose such requirement to the landlord before
entering into a rental agreement; and (b) is a tenant under chapter 59.18 or
59.20 RCW shall disclose such requirement to the landlord within seventy-two
hours after the duty to register arises.

(9) The county
sheriff shall obtain a photograph of the individual and shall obtain a copy of
the individual's fingerprints.

(((9))) (10)
For the purpose of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 70.48.470, and
72.09.330:

(a) "Sex
offense" means any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030 and
any violation of RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor), 9.68A.050
(dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct),
9.68A.060 (sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct), 9.68A.090 (communication with minor for immoral purposes),
9.68A.100 (patronizing juvenile prostitute), or 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct
with a minor in the second degree), as well as any gross misdemeanor that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030.

(b) "Kidnapping
offense" means the crimes of kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in
the second degree, and unlawful imprisonment as defined in chapter 9A.40 RCW,
where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the minor's parent.

(c)
"Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that
is full-time or part-time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or for
an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any calendar year. A
person is employed or carries on a vocation whether the person's employment is
financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of government or
educational benefit.

(d) "Student"
means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or part-time basis, in any
public or private educational institution. An educational institution includes
any secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of
higher education.

(((10))) (11)
A person who knowingly fails to register with the county sheriff or notify the
county sheriff or make the disclosure required under subsection (8) of this
section, or who changes his or her name without notifying the county
sheriff and the state patrol, as required by this section is guilty of a class
C felony if the crime for which the individual was convicted was a felony sex
offense as defined in subsection (((9))) (10)(a) of this section
or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony sex offense as defined in subsection (((9)))
(10)(a) of this section. If the crime was other than a felony or a
federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this
state would be other than a felony, violation of this section is a gross
misdemeanor.

(((11)))
(12) A person who knowingly fails to register or make the disclosure
required under subsection (8) of this section, or who moves within the
state without notifying the county sheriff, as required by this section
is guilty of a class C felony if the crime for which the individual was
convicted was a felony kidnapping offense as defined in subsection (((9)))
(10)(b) of this section or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an
offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony kidnapping offense
as defined in subsection (((9))) (10)(b) of this section. If the
crime was other than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an
offense that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---