BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 65.16.020 and 1961 c
279 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The qualifications of a
legal newspaper are that such newspaper shall have been published regularly, at
least once a week, in the English language, as a newspaper of general circulation,
in the city or town where the same is published at the time of application for
approval, for at least six months prior to the date of such application; shall
be compiled either in whole or in part in an office maintained at the place of
publication; shall contain news of general interest as contrasted with news of
interest primarily to an organization, group or class; shall have a policy
to print all statutorily required legal notices; and shall hold a ((second))
periodical class mailing permit: PROVIDED, That in case of the
consolidation of two or more newspapers, such consolidated newspaper shall be
considered as qualified if either or any of the papers so consolidated would be
a qualified newspaper at the date of such legal publication, had not such consolidation
taken place: PROVIDED, That this section shall not disqualify as a legal
newspaper any publication which, prior to June 8, 1961, was adjudged a legal
newspaper, so long as it continues to meet the requirements under which it
qualified.

Sec. 2. RCW 4.24.550 and 1998 c
220 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Public agencies are
authorized to release information to the public regarding sex offenders and
kidnapping offenders when the agency determines that disclosure of the
information is relevant and necessary to protect the public and counteract the
danger created by the particular offender. This authorization applies to
information regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex
offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense as defined by RCW
9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence
review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense; (c) any
person committed as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a
sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d) any person found not guilty of a
sex offense or kidnapping offense by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77
RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense and subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.

(2) The extent of the
public disclosure of relevant and necessary information shall be rationally
related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the community; (b)
the locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly
found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members for information to
enhance their individual and collective safety.

(3) Local law
enforcement agencies shall consider the following guidelines in determining the
extent of a public disclosure made under this section: (a) For offenders
classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with other
appropriate law enforcement agencies and may disclose, upon request, relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to any victim or witness to the offense and
to any individual community member who lives near the residence where the
offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; (b) for offenders
classified as risk level II, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary,
and accurate information to public and private schools, child day care centers,
family day care providers, businesses and organizations that serve primarily
children, women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and community groups near
the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly
found; and (c) for offenders classified as risk level III, the agency may also
disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the public at large.

(4) The county
sheriff with whom an offender classified as risk level III is registered shall
cause to be published by legal notice, advertising, or news release a sex
offender community notification that conforms to the guidelines established
under RCW 4.24.5501 in at least one legal newspaper with general circulation in
the area of the sex offender's registered address or location. The county
sheriff shall also cause to be published consistent with this subsection a
current list of level III registered sex offenders, twice yearly. This list
shall be maintained by the county sheriff on a publicly accessible web site and
shall be updated at least once per month.

(5) Local law
enforcement agencies that disseminate information pursuant to this section
shall: (a) Review available risk level classifications made by the department
of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the
indeterminate sentence review board; (b) assign risk level classifications to
all offenders about whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a good
faith effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days before
the offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves from another
jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of the offender's
move, except that in no case may this notification provision be construed to
require an extension of an offender's release date. The juvenile court shall
provide local law enforcement officials with all relevant information on
offenders allowed to remain in the community in a timely manner.

(((5))) (6)
An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as
defined in RCW 4.24.470 is immune from civil liability for damages for any
discretionary risk level classification decisions or release of relevant and
necessary information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or
agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this section
applies to risk level classification decisions and the release of relevant and
necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure is
authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or official to
classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by the
department of corrections, the department of social and health services, or the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of any relevant and
necessary information based on that different classification shall not, by
itself, be considered gross negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided
under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information
to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.

(((6))) (7)
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall
impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency
for failing to release information authorized under this section.

(((7))) (8)
Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated
in subsection (1) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be
provided by law.

(((8)))
(9) When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an
offender differently than the offender is classified by the department of
corrections, the department of social and health services, or the indeterminate
sentence review board, the law enforcement agency or official shall notify the
appropriate department or the board and submit its reasons supporting the
change in classification.

---
END ---