BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. There is established in
the employment security department the domestic violence unemployment insurance
special benefits program. The commissioner shall administer the program using
the funds appropriated by the legislature for this act. The expenses incurred
by the commissioner in carrying out this chapter shall be paid entirely out of
the funds appropriated by the legislature for this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. In order to be eligible
for benefits under the domestic violence unemployment insurance special
benefits program, an applicant must have been a victim of domestic violence, as
defined in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, within two
years before the application date for benefits, and must show that he or she is
seeking safety or relief from the domestic violence by:

(1) Relocating to a
residence that is separate from the perpetrator; and

(2) Filing a police
report or obtaining a restraining order against the perpetrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. In addition to the
requirements of section 2 of this act, in order to be eligible for benefits
under the domestic violence unemployment insurance special benefits program, an
applicant must either be unemployed based on a necessity to protect the
applicant or the applicant's immediate family members from domestic violence,
as defined in RCW 26.50.010, and have been denied unemployment insurance
benefits under chapter 50.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. To the extent that funds
are available, if a person establishes eligibility under sections 2 and 3 of
this act, the commissioner shall provide unemployment insurance special
benefits in the form of a weekly wage subsidy to the person beginning with the
calendar week in which application was made for unemployment insurance
benefits. The weekly wage subsidy will be an amount equal to the weekly
benefit amount the applicant would have received if benefits had not been
denied under chapter 50.20 RCW. However, the duration and amount of the weekly
wage subsidy received by the applicant may not exceed the maximum unemployment
insurance benefit amount established in RCW 50.20.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The employment security
department shall provide information to applicants for unemployment insurance
special benefits regarding local services provided under chapter 70.123 RCW and
the availability of protection orders under chapter 26.50 RCW.

(2) Weekly wage
subsidies are not unemployment insurance benefits under this title and the
issuance of wage subsidies shall not affect an employer's payment contribution
determined under chapter 50.24 RCW, or an employer's experience rating
determined under chapter 50.29 RCW.

(3) Information or
records concerning an individual receiving or applying for a weekly wage
subsidy under this program is subject to chapter 50.13 RCW and is not subject
to discovery in any judicial proceeding unless the requirements of RCW
70.123.075 are satisfied.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. The sum of three hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the public safety and education account to the employment security department
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, to carry out the purposes of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 5 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 50 RCW.

---
END ---