BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that existing transportation facilities in many regions of the state
are inadequate to address mobility needs. The legislature finds that a single
statewide board whose members are appointed by the governor and which is
assisted by regional advisory committees can be more effective than separate
local jurisdictions at planning and funding regional transportation
improvement. It is the policy of the state of Washington to enable the
creation of a statewide board and regional committees to plan and fund regional
transportation needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions set forth
in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Puget Sound
transportation commission" or "commission" means the body
established under section 3 of this act.

(2)
"Transportation projects" or "projects" means improvements
to streets, highways, roads, ferries, transit, or high capacity transportation.

(3) "Urban
congestion district" or "district" means an area designated by
the governor that follows the established boundaries of a county, school
district, legislative district, or any combination of those three.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The Puget Sound transportation
commission is created.

(2) The commission is
composed of nine members. The following members are appointed by the governor
for terms of four years:

(a) Two members
appointed from a list of at least four persons nominated by the association of
Washington cities or its successor;

(b) Two members
appointed from a list of at least four persons nominated by the Washington
state association of counties or its successor;

(c) One member of a
public transit system;

(d) One member
representing the environmental community;

(e) One member
representing the construction industry;

(f) One member
representing the department of transportation;

(g) One member from the
office of financial management.

(3) All members are
subject to confirmation by the senate except for those listed in subsection
(2)(f) and (g) of this section.

(4) Members of the
commission will be reimbursed for reasonable and customary travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) If a vacancy on the
commission occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise, the governor shall fill
the vacant position for the unexpired term. Each vacancy in a position
appointed from lists provided by the associations and departments under
subsection (2) of this section must be filled from a list of at least four
persons nominated by the relevant association or associations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. The governor shall
designate urban congestion districts. The boundary lines of these districts
must meet the criteria established in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The commission, with
the advice of the corridor advisory boards, shall designate transportation
projects, exclusive of maintenance and preservation, that will be funded under
this chapter.

(2) The commission
shall use the benchmarks set forth in section 9 of this act as a guideline when
selecting transportation projects.

(3) Once the commission
has chosen a project or projects, it shall develop a funding and financing package
to pay for the projects selected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The commission shall
create a corridor advisory board for each urban congestion district designated
by the governor.

(2) The board shall
provide policy advice to the commission in selecting the project or projects to
be funded and the different revenue options.

(3) The board shall
allow representatives of major employers within the region, the department,
transit districts, port districts, and representatives of cities, towns, and
counties within the affected corridor to participate in policymaking.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. (1) The commission may
impose, within an urban congestion district, the following voter-approved local
option funding sources:

(a) An excise tax of up
to two dollars per month per employee on all employees located within the
district, measured by the number of full-time equivalent employees. This tax
may not be imposed within a county that is already imposing an excise tax under
RCW 81.100.030 or within the jurisdiction that is already imposing an employee
tax under RCW 81.104.150;

(b) A local option
vehicle license fee of up to seventy-five dollars per vehicle;

(c) Tolls on road
improvements;

(d) A local option
motor vehicle fuel tax of up to six cents per gallon; and

(e) A local option
commercial vehicle charge of up to one hundred fifty dollars per commercial
vehicle.

(2) No taxes may be
imposed without a vote of the people within the boundaries of the district on a
referendum as set forth in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The commission must
submit, as a referendum to a vote of the people, the projects it has selected
and any funding package that requires the imposition of additional taxes in the
district. The referendum must specify that the additional tax will be
dedicated to funding the specific improvement projects chosen by the
commission. Upon a majority vote of the people in favor of the project list
and the increased taxes, the commission shall not change the boundaries of the
district, project list, or taxes imposed or collected except by a majority vote
of the people in the affected urban congestion district. A commission may not
undertake construction or work associated with an improvement project, other
than that work necessary to prepare the referendum, without approval of the
referendum by a majority vote of the people.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The commission shall use
as a guide the following benchmarks when choosing projects by selecting
projects that move towards the following benchmarks:

(1) Traffic congestion
on urban interstate highways does not exceed the national mean for interstate
highways;

(2) Driver delay in
metropolitan areas does not exceed the national mean for metropolitan areas;

(3) The number of
traffic accidents on systems throughout the state continues to decline;

(4) Air quality is
maintained at federally required levels;

(5) Freight mobility is
accommodated within the transportation system; and

(6) Overall hours of
travel delay per person in congested corridors are reduced to and maintained at
reasonable levels.

These benchmarks
represent only minimum standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The department shall
create a division of dedicated staff and services whose sole responsibility is
to coordinate the design, preliminary engineering, permit, financing, and
construction of projects selected by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The Puget Sound
transportation commission matching account is created within the motor vehicle
fund. The state treasurer shall administer the account, and invest all moneys
deposited in it. Funds within the matching account must be used solely to match
up to sixty-five percent of the total costs of a project or projects selected
by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A project or series of
projects selected by the commission, and that has sought and obtained voter
approval of the project or series of projects, as well as a source of revenue
from which to fund all or a portion of the project or series of projects, is
eligible for matching funds from the Puget Sound transportation commission
matching account of up to sixty-five percent of the total costs of the project
or series of projects selected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The department is
responsible for projects selected by the commission, the funding for which has
been approved by the voters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 13 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

---
END ---