BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature, in an
effort to protect the safety of Washington state residents, has authorized the
civil commitment of sexually violent predators and funded a program for the
treatment of such persons at the special commitment center on McNeil Island.
As a result of the treatment funded by the legislature, some of the persons
judged to be sexually violent predators have progressed to the point where they
have secured court orders permitting them to be housed in a setting less
restrictive than the present special commitment center at McNeil Island,
subject to appropriate strict supervision.

Housing in a less
restrictive setting on McNeil Island is a step in the treatment of some of the
persons committed to the special commitment center, and without this step for
those judged by court order to be eligible, the special commitment center may
fail to fulfill its statutory and constitutional purpose.

Therefore, the
legislature intends by this act to ensure the prompt siting and timely
operation of a less restrictive alternative treatment facility on McNeil Island
in furtherance of the treatment and other purposes of chapter 71.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary is
authorized to site and operate a less restrictive alternative treatment
facility for sexually violent predators on court-ordered conditional release
from the special commitment center as provided under RCW 71.09.090, on McNeil
Island.

(2) Notwithstanding RCW
36.70A.103 or any other law, until December 31, 2003, to the extent siting a
less restrictive alternative treatment facility on McNeil Island is
inconsistent with local comprehensive plans and/or development regulations,
this statute preempts and supersedes those local plans and regulations.

(3) Nothing in this
section limits the state's authority to site an essential public facility under
RCW 36.70A.200 in conformance with local comprehensive plans and development
regulations.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.103 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

State agencies shall
comply with the local comprehensive plans and development regulations and
amendments thereto adopted pursuant to this chapter except as otherwise
provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---