BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 70.02 RCW to read as follows:

A licensed
health care provider or health care facility must not administer or provide a
drug or other product to a human subject participating in human subject
research without disclosing any beneficial interest as defined in RCW 42.52.010
in the drug or other product or entity promoting the drug or product.

--- END ---