BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

PART I

GENERAL PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. The legislature intends
the following omnibus bill to address the management of sex offenders in the
civil commitment and criminal justice systems for purposes of public health,
safety, and welfare. Provisions address siting of and continued operation of
facilities for persons civilly committed under chapter 71.09 RCW and sentencing
of persons who have committed sex offenses. Other provisions address the need
for sex offender treatment providers with specific credentials. Additional
provisions address the continued operation or authorized expansion of criminal
justice facilities at McNeil Island, because these facilities are impacted by
the civil facilities on McNeil Island for persons committed under chapter 71.09
RCW.

Sec. 102. RCW 71.09.020 and 2001 c
286 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) (("Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged
with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or
personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(2) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.)) "Department"
means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court‑ordered treatment in a setting
less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set
forth in RCW 71.09.092.

(3) "Likely to
engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure
facility" means that the person more probably than not will engage in such
acts if released unconditionally from detention on the sexually violent
predator petition. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent overt act if
the person is not totally confined at the time the petition is filed under RCW
71.09.030.

(4) "Mental
abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the
emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission
of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the
health and safety of others.

(5)
"Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b)
individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the
primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual acquaintance with
whom no substantial personal relationship exists.

(((5))) (6)
"Recent overt act" means any act or threat that has either caused
harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such
harm in the mind of an objective person who knows of the history and mental
condition of the person engaging in the act.

(((6))) (7)
"Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility"
means an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the
public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment center.
Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and private schools,
school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public
parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and
community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, and public
libraries.

(8)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the
secretary's designee.

(9) "Secure
facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly confined under
the provisions of this chapter that includes security measures sufficient to protect
the community. Such facilities include total confinement facilities, secure
community transition facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered
placement under RCW 71.09.096.

(10) "Secure
community transition facility" means a residential facility for persons
civilly committed and conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative
under this chapter. A secure community transition facility has supervision and
security, and either provides or ensures the provision of sex offender treatment
services. Secure community transition facilities include but are not limited
to the facilities established pursuant to section 201 of this act and any
community‑based facilities established under this chapter and operated by
the secretary or under contract with the secretary.

(11)
"Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or
after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the
first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child
in the first or second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree,
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child
under age fourteen, incest against a child under age fourteen, or child
molestation in the first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at
any time prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent
offense as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would be a
sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in
the first or second degree, assault in the first or second degree, assault of a
child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree,
burglary in the first degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment,
which act, either at the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently
during civil commitment proceedings pursuant to this chapter ((71.09
RCW)), has been determined beyond a reasonable doubt to have been sexually
motivated, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described
in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection.

(((7) "Less
restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less
restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set forth in
RCW 71.09.092.

(8)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or his
or her designee.))

(12) "Sexually
violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged
with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or
personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(13) "Total
confinement facility" means a facility that provides supervision and sex
offender treatment services in a total confinement setting. Total confinement
facilities include the special commitment center and any similar facility
designated as a secure facility by the secretary.

PART
II

SITING AND OPERATION OF SECURE COMMUNITY
TRANSITION FACILITIES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The secretary is
authorized to site, construct, occupy, and operate a secure community
transition facility on McNeil Island for persons authorized to petition for a
less restrictive alternative under RCW 71.09.090(1) and who are conditionally
released and a special commitment center on McNeil Island with up to four
hundred four beds as a total confinement facility under this chapter, subject
to appropriated funding for those purposes. The secure community transition
facility shall be authorized for the number of beds needed to ensure compliance
with the orders of the superior courts under this chapter and the federal
district court for the western district of Washington. The total number of
beds shall be comprised of fifteen transitional beds and nine long-term beds.

(b) For purposes of
this subsection, "long-term beds" means beds for persons whose
progress toward a less restrictive alternative at a level less secure than the
secure community transition facility established in this subsection and whose
transition into more complete community involvement is projected to take
substantially longer than the average resident of this facility.

(2) Notwithstanding RCW
36.70A.103 or any other law, this statute preempts and supersedes local plans,
development regulations, permitting requirements, inspection requirements, and
all other laws as necessary to enable the secretary to site, construct, occupy,
and operate a secure community transition facility on McNeil Island and a total
confinement facility on McNeil Island.

(3) To the greatest
extent possible, until June 30, 2003, persons who were not civilly committed
from the county in which the secure community transition facility established
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is located may not be conditionally
released to a setting in that same county less restrictive than that facility.

(4) The department
must:

(a) Identify the
minimum and maximum number of secure community transition facility beds in
addition to the facility established under subsection (1) of this section that
may be necessary for the period of May 2004 through May 2007 and provide notice
of these numbers to all counties by August 31, 2001;

(b) In consultation
with the joint select committee established in section 225 of this act, develop
and publish a notice of proposed rules containing criteria for the siting and
operation of secure community transition facilities by October 1, 2001; and

(c) Provide a status
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002, on
the development of facilities under the incentive program established in
section 204 of this act. The report shall include a projection of the
anticipated number of secure community transition facility beds that will
become operational between May 2004 and May 2007. If it appears that an
insufficient number of beds will be operational, the department's report shall
recommend a progression of methods to facilitate siting in counties and cities
including, if necessary, preemption of local land use planning process and
other laws.

(5)(a) The total number
of secure community transition facility beds that may be required to be sited
in a county between the effective date of this section and June 30, 2008, may
be no greater than the total number of persons civilly committed from that
county, or detained at the special commitment center under a pending civil
commitment petition from that county where a finding of probable cause had been
made on April 1, 2001. The total number of secure community transition
facility beds required to be sited in each county between July 1, 2008, and
June 30, 2015, may be no greater than the total number of persons civilly
committed from that county or detained at the special commitment center under a
pending civil commitment petition from that county where a finding of probable
cause had been made as of July 1, 2008.

(b) Counties and cities
that provide secure community transition facility beds above the maximum number
that they could be required to site under this subsection are eligible for a
bonus grant under the incentive provisions in section 204 of this act. The
county where the special commitment center is located shall receive this bonus
grant for the number of beds in the facility established in subsection (1) of
this section in excess of the maximum number established by this subsection.

(c) No secure community
transition facilities in addition to the one established in subsection (1) of
this section may be required to be sited in the county where the special
commitment center is located until after June 30, 2008, provided however, that
the county and its cities may elect to site additional secure community
transition facilities and shall be eligible under the incentive provisions of
section 204 of this act for any additional facilities meeting the requirements
of that section.

(6) In identifying
potential sites within a county for the location of a secure community
transition facility, the department shall work with and assist local
governments to provide for the equitable distribution of such facilities unless
the local government affirmatively decides to group similar facilities.

(7)(a) "Equitable
distribution" means siting or locating secure community transition
facilities in a manner that will not cause a disproportionate grouping of
similar facilities either in any one county, or in any one jurisdiction or
community within a county, as relevant; and

(b)
"Jurisdiction" means a city, town, or geographic area of a county in
which district political or judicial authority may be exercised.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary is
authorized to operate a correctional facility on McNeil Island for the
confinement of sex offenders and other offenders sentenced by the courts, and
to make necessary repairs, renovations, additions, and improvements to state
property for that purpose, notwithstanding any local comprehensive plans,
development regulations, permitting requirements, or any other local laws.
Operation of the correctional facility and other state facilities authorized by
this section and other law includes access to adequate docking facilities on
state-owned tidelands at the town of Steilacoom.

Sec. 203. RCW 36.70A.103 and 1991
sp.s. c 32 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

State agencies shall
comply with the local comprehensive plans and development regulations and
amendments thereto adopted pursuant to this chapter except as otherwise
provided in sections 201 (1) and (2) and 202 of this act.

The provisions of
this act do not affect the state's authority to site any other essential public
facility under RCW 36.70A.200 in conformance with local comprehensive plans and
development regulations adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon receiving the
notification required by section 201 of this act, counties must promptly notify
the cities within the county of the maximum number of secure community transition
facility beds that may be required and the projected number of beds to be
needed in that county.

(2) The incentive
grants provided under this section are subject to the following provisions:

(a) Counties and the
cities within the county must notify each other of siting plans to promote the
establishment and equitable distribution of secure community transition
facilities. In coordinating and deciding upon the siting of secure community
transition facilities, great weight shall be given by the county and cities
within the county to the number and location of existing residential facility
beds operated by the department of corrections or the mental health division of
the department of social and health services in the county;

(b) Development
regulations, ordinances, plans, laws, and criteria established for siting must
be consistent with statutory requirements and rules applicable to siting and
operating secure community transition facilities;

(c) The minimum size
for any facility is three beds; and

(d) The department must
approve any sites selected.

(3) Any county or city
that makes a commitment to initiate the process to site one or more secure
community transition facilities by February 1, 2002, shall receive a planning
grant as proposed and approved by the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

(4) Any county or city
that has issued all necessary permits by May 1, 2003, for one or more secure
community transition facilities that comply with the requirements of this
section shall receive an incentive grant in the amount of fifty thousand
dollars for each bed sited.

(5) To encourage the
rapid permitting of sites, any county or city that has issued all necessary
permits by January 1, 2003, for one or more secure community transition
facilities that comply with the requirements of this section shall receive a
bonus in the amount of twenty percent of the amount provided under subsection
(4) of this section.

(6) Any county or city
that establishes secure community transition facility beds in excess of the
maximum number that could be required to be sited in that county shall receive
a bonus payment of one hundred thousand dollars for each bed established in
excess of the maximum requirement.

(7) No payment shall be
made under this section until all necessary permits have been issued.

Sec. 205. RCW 36.70A.200 and 1998
c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The comprehensive
plan of each county and city that is planning under ((this chapter)) RCW
36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting essential
public facilities. Essential public facilities include those facilities that
are typically difficult to site, such as airports, state education facilities
and state or regional transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140,
state and local correctional facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and
in-patient facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health
facilities, ((and)) group homes, and secure community transition
facilities as defined in RCW 71.09.020.

(2) Each county and
city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not later than the deadline specified
in RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process, or amend its existing process, for
identifying and siting essential public facilities, and adopt or amend its
development regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of secure
community transition facilities consistent with statutory requirements and
rules applicable to these facilities.

(3) Any city or
county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not later than the deadline
specified in RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process for siting secure community
transition facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as
necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities consistent with
statutory requirements and rules applicable to these facilities.

(4) The office
of financial management shall maintain a list of those essential state public
facilities that are required or likely to be built within the next six years.
The office of financial management may at any time add facilities to the list.

(5) No local
comprehensive plan or development regulation may preclude the siting of
essential public facilities. No county or city may preclude the siting of
secure community transition facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
act shall not be construed to limit siting of secure community transition
facilities to residential neighborhoods.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. Beginning on the
effective date of this section, the state shall immediately enter into
negotiations for a mitigation agreement with: (1) The county in which the
secure community transition facility established pursuant to section 201(1) of
this act is located; (2) each community in which the persons from that facility
will reside or regularly spend time in pursuant to court orders for regular
work or education, or to receive social services, or will regularly be
transported through to reach those other communities; and (3) educational
institutions in the communities identified in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. The negotiations must be toward an agreement that will provide state
funding, as appropriated for this purpose, in an amount adequate to mitigate
anticipated or realized increased costs resulting from any increased risks to
public safety brought about by the presence of sexually violent predators in
those communities due to the siting of the secure community transition facility
established pursuant to section 201(1) of this act. This section expires June
30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall make reasonable efforts to distribute the impact of the employment,
education, and social services needs of the residents of the secure community
transition facility established pursuant to section 201(1) of this act among
the adjoining counties and not to concentrate the residents' use of resources
in any one community.

(2) The department
shall develop policies to ensure that, to the extent possible, placement of
persons eligible in the future for conditional release to a setting less
restrictive than the facility established pursuant to section 201(1) of this
act will be equitably distributed among the counties and within jurisdictions
in the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. The department of social
and health services shall, by August 1, 2001, and prior to operating the secure
community transition facility established pursuant to section 201(1) of this
act, hold at least three public hearings in the affected communities within the
county where the facility is located.

The purpose of the
public hearings is to seek input from county and city officials, local law
enforcement officials, and the public regarding operations and security
measures needed to adequately protect the community from any increased risk to
public safety brought about by the presence of persons conditionally released
from the special commitment center in these communities due to the siting of
the facility. The department shall ensure that persons have a full opportunity
to speak to the issues to be addressed during each hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. The secretary of social
and health services shall coordinate with the secretary of corrections and the
appropriate local or state law enforcement agency or agencies to establish a
twenty-four-hour law enforcement presence on McNeil Island before any person is
admitted to the secure community transition facility established under section
201(1) of this act. Law enforcement shall coordinate with the emergency
response team for McNeil Island to provide planning and coordination in the
event of an escape from the special commitment center or the secure community
transition facility.

In addition, or if no
law enforcement agency will provide a law enforcement presence on the island,
not more than ten correctional employees, as selected by the secretary of
corrections, who are members of the emergency response team for the McNeil
Island correctional facility, shall have the powers and duties of a general
authority peace officer while acting in a law enforcement capacity. If there
is no law enforcement agency to provide the law enforcement presence, those
correctional employees selected as peace officers shall provide a
twenty-four-hour presence and shall not have correctional duties at the
correctional facility in addition to the emergency response team while acting
in a law enforcement capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By August 1, 2001,
the department must provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with
a transportation plan to address the issues of coordinating the movement of residents
of the secure community transition facility established pursuant to section
201(1) of this act between McNeil Island and the mainland with the movement of
others who must use the same docks or equipment within the funds appropriated
for this purpose.

(2) If the department
does not provide a separate vessel for transporting residents of the secure
community transition facility established in section 201(1) of this act between
McNeil Island and the mainland, the plan shall include at least the following
components:

(a) The residents shall
be separated from minors and vulnerable adults, except vulnerable adults who
have been found to be sexually violent predators.

(b) The residents shall
not be transported during times when children are normally coming to and from
the mainland for school.

(3) The department
shall designate a separate waiting area at the points of debarkation, and
residents shall be required to remain in this area while awaiting
transportation.

(4) The department
shall provide law enforcement agencies in the counties and cities in which
residents of the secure community transition facility established pursuant to
section 201(1) of this act regularly participate in employment, education, or
social services, or through which these persons are regularly transported, with
a copy of the court's order of conditional release with respect to these
persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

When considering whether
a person civilly committed under this chapter and conditionally released to a
secure community transition facility is appropriate for release to a placement
that is less restrictive than that facility, the court shall comply with the
procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.090 through 71.09.096. In addition, the
court shall consider whether the person has progressed in treatment to the
point that a significant change in the person's routine, including but not
limited to a change of employment, education, residence, or sex offender
treatment provider will not cause the person to regress to the point that the
person presents a greater risk to the community than can reasonably be
addressed in the proposed placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except with respect
to the secure community transition facility established pursuant to section 201
of this act, the secretary shall adopt rules that balance the average response
time of emergency services to the general area of a proposed secure community
transition facility against the proximity of the proposed site to risk
potential activities and facilities in existence at the time the site is listed
for consideration.

(2) In balancing the
competing criteria of proximity and response time the rule shall endeavor to
achieve an average law enforcement response time not greater than five minutes
and in no case shall the rule permit location of a facility adjacent to,
immediately across a street or parking lot from, or within the line of sight of
a risk potential activity or facility in existence at the time a site is listed
for consideration. "Within the line of sight" means that it is
possible to reasonably visually distinguish and recognize individuals.

(3) The rule shall
require that great weight be given to sites that are the farthest removed from
any risk potential activity.

(4) The rule shall
specify how distance from the location is measured and any variations in the
measurement based on the size of the property within which a proposed facility
is to be located.

(5) The rule shall
establish a method to analyze and compare the criteria for each site in terms
of public safety and security, site characteristics, and program components.
In making a decision regarding a site following the analysis and comparison,
the secretary shall give priority to public safety and security
considerations. The analysis and comparison of the criteria are to be
documented and made available at the public hearings prescribed in section 219
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary shall
establish criteria for the siting of secure community transition facilities,
other than the secure community transition facility established pursuant to
section 201 of this act, which shall include at least the following minimum
requirements:

(1) Any real property
listed for consideration for the location of or use as a secure community
transition facility must meet all of the following criteria:

(a) The proximity and
response time criteria established under section 213 of this act;

(b) The site or
building is available for lease for the anticipated use period or for purchase;

(c) Security monitoring
services and appropriate back-up systems are available and reliable;

(d) Appropriate mental
health and sex offender treatment providers must be available within a
reasonable commute; and

(e) Appropriate
permitting for a secure community transition facility must be possible under
the zoning code of the local jurisdiction.

(2) For sites which
meet the criteria of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
analyze and compare the criteria in subsections (3) through (5) of this section
using the method established in section 213 of this act.

(3) Public safety and
security criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Whether limited
visibility between the facility and adjacent properties can be achieved prior
to placement of any person;

(b) The distance from,
and number of, risk potential activities and facilities, as measured using the
rules adopted under section 213 of this act;

(c) The existence of or
ability to establish barriers between the site and the risk potential
facilities and activities;

(d) Suitability of the
buildings to be used for the secure community transition facility with regard
to existing or feasibly modified features; and

(e) The availability of
electronic monitoring that allows a resident's location to be determined with
specificity.

(4) Site
characteristics criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Reasonableness of
rental, lease, or sale terms including length and renewability of a lease or
rental agreement;

(b) Traffic and access
patterns associated with the real property;

(c) Feasibility of
complying with zoning requirements within the necessary time frame; and

(d) A contractor or
contractors are available to install, monitor, and repair the necessary
security and alarm systems.

(5) Program
characteristics criteria shall include at least the following:

(a) Reasonable
proximity to available medical, mental health, sex offender, and chemical
dependency treatment providers and facilities;

(b) Suitability of the
location for programming, staffing, and support considerations;

(c) Proximity to
employment, educational, vocational, and other treatment plan components.

(6) For purposes of
this section "available" or "availability" of qualified
treatment providers includes provider qualifications and willingness to provide
services, average commute time, and cost of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Security systems
for all secure community transition facilities shall meet the following minimum
qualifications:

(a) The security panel
must be a commercial grade panel with tamper-proof switches and a key-lock to
prevent unauthorized access.

(b) There must be an
emergency electrical supply system which shall include a battery back-up system
and a generator.

(c) The system must
include personal panic devices for all staff.

(d) The security system
must be capable of being monitored and signaled either by telephone through
either a land or cellular telephone system or by private radio network in the
event of a total dial-tone failure or through equivalent technologies.

(e) The department
shall issue photo-identification badges to all staff which must be worn at all
times.

(2) Security systems
for the secure community transition facility established pursuant to section
201(1) of this act shall also include a fence and provide the maximum
protection appropriate in a civil facility for persons in less than total
confinement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Secure community
transition facilities shall meet the following minimum staffing requirements:

(a) At any time the
census of a facility is six or fewer residents, the facility shall maintain a
minimum staffing ratio of one staff per resident during normal waking hours and
two awake staff per three residents during normal sleeping hours.

(b) At any time the
census of a facility is six or fewer residents, all staff shall be classified
as residential rehabilitation counselor II or have a classification that
indicates a higher level of skill, experience, and training.

(c) Before being
assigned to a facility, all staff shall have training in sex offender issues,
self-defense, and crisis de-escalation skills in addition to departmental
orientation and, as appropriate, management training. All staff with resident
treatment or care duties must participate in ongoing in-service training.

(d) All staff must pass
a departmental background check and the check is not subject to the limitations
in chapter 9.96A RCW. A person who has been convicted of a felony, or any sex
offense, may not be employed at the secure community transition facility or be
approved as an escort for a resident of the facility.

(2) With respect to the
facility established pursuant to section 201(1) of this act, the department shall,
no later than December 1, 2001, provide a staffing plan to the appropriate
committees of the legislature that will cover the growth of that facility to
its full capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. A new section is added to
chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless otherwise
ordered by the court:

(a) Residents of a
secure community transition facility shall wear electronic monitoring devices
at all times. To the extent that electronic monitoring devices that employ
global positioning system technology are available and funds for this purpose
are appropriated by the legislature, the department shall use these devices.

(b) At least one staff
member, or other court‑authorized and department‑approved person
must escort each resident when the resident leaves the secure community
transition facility for appointments, employment, or other approved
activities. Escorting persons must supervise the resident closely and maintain
close proximity to the resident. The escort must immediately notify the
department of any serious violation, as defined in section 221 of this act, by
the resident and must immediately notify law enforcement of any violation of
law by the resident.

(2) Staff members of
the special commitment center and any other total confinement facility and any
secure community transition facility must be trained in self-defense and
appropriate crisis responses including incident de-escalation. Prior to
escorting a person outside of a facility, staff members must also have training
in the offense pattern of the offender they are escorting.

(3) Any escort must
carry a cellular telephone or a similar device at all times when escorting a
resident of a secure community transition facility.

(4) The department
shall require training in offender pattern, self-defense, and incident response
for all court-authorized escorts who are not employed by the department or the
department of corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. A new section is added to
chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 217 of this act, residents of the secure community
transition facility established pursuant to section 201(1) of this act must be
escorted at any time the resident leaves the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department
operates, or the secretary enters into a contract to operate, a secure
community transition facility except the secure community transition facility
established pursuant to section 201(1) of this act, the secure community
transition facility may be operated only after the public notification and
opportunities for review and comment as required by this section.

(2) The secretary shall
establish a process for early and continuous public participation in
establishing or relocating secure community transition facilities. The process
shall include, at a minimum, public meetings in the local communities affected,
as well as opportunities for written and oral comments, in the following
manner:

(a) If there are more
than three sites initially selected as potential locations and the selection
process by the secretary or a service provider reduces the number of possible
sites for a secure community transition facility to no fewer than three, the
secretary or the chief operating officer of the service provider shall notify
the public of the possible siting and hold at least two public hearings in each
community where a secure community transition facility may be sited.

(b) When the secretary
or service provider has determined the secure community transition facility's
location, the secretary or the chief operating officer of the service provider
shall hold at least one additional public hearing in the community where the
secure community transition facility will be sited.

(c) When the secretary
has entered negotiations with a service provider and only one site is under
consideration, then at least two public hearings shall be held.

(d) To provide adequate
notice of, and opportunity for interested persons to comment on, a proposed
location, the secretary or the chief operating officer of the service provider
shall provide at least fourteen days' advance notice of the meeting to all
newspapers of general circulation in the community, all radio and television
stations generally available to persons in the community, any school district
in which the secure community transition facility would be sited or whose
boundary is within two miles of a proposed secure community transition
facility, any library district in which the secure community transition
facility would be sited, local business or fraternal organizations that request
notification from the secretary or agency, and any person or property owner
within a one-half mile radius of the proposed secure community transition
facility. Before initiating this process, the department of social and health
services shall contact local government planning agencies in the communities
containing the proposed secure community transition facility. The department
of social and health services shall coordinate with local government agencies
to ensure that opportunities are provided for effective citizen input and to
reduce the duplication of notice and meetings.

(3) If local government
land use regulations require that a special use or conditional use permit be
submitted and approved before a secure community transition facility can be
sited, and the process for obtaining such a permit includes public notice and
hearing requirements similar to those required under this section, the
requirements of this section shall not apply to the extent they would duplicate
requirements under the local land use regulations.

(4) This section
applies only to secure community transition facilities sited after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
develop a process with local governments that allows each community in which a
secure community transition facility is located to establish operational
advisory boards of at least seven persons for the secure community transition
facilities. The department may conduct community awareness activities to
publicize this opportunity. The operational advisory boards developed under
this section shall be implemented following the decision to locate a secure
community transition facility in a particular community.

(2) The operational
advisory boards may review and make recommendations regarding the security and
operations of the secure community transition facility and conditions or
modifications necessary with relation to any person who the secretary proposes
to place in the secure community transition facility.

(3) The facility
management must consider the recommendations of the community advisory boards.
Where the facility management does not implement an operational advisory board
recommendation, the management must provide a written response to the
operational advisory board stating its reasons for its decision not to
implement the recommendation.

(4) The operational
advisory boards, their members, and any agency represented by a member shall
not be liable in any cause of action as a result of its recommendations unless
the advisory board acts with gross negligence or bad faith in making a
recommendation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
adopt a violation reporting policy for persons conditionally released to less
restrictive alternative placements. The policy shall require written
documentation by the department and service providers of all violations of
conditions set by the department, the department of corrections, or the court
and establish criteria for returning a violator to the special commitment
center or a secure community transition facility with a higher degree of
security. Any conditionally released person who commits a serious violation of
conditions shall be returned to the special commitment center, unless arrested
by a law enforcement officer, and the court shall be notified immediately and
shall initiate proceedings under RCW 71.09.098 to revoke or modify the less
restrictive alternative placement. Nothing in this section limits the
authority of the department to return a person to the special commitment center
based on a violation that is not a serious violation as defined in this
section. For the purposes of this section, "serious violation"
includes but is not limited to:

(a) The commission of
any criminal offense;

(b) Any unlawful use or
possession of a controlled substance; and

(c) Any violation of
conditions targeted to address the person's documented pattern of offense that
increases the risk to public safety.

(2) When a person is
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative under this chapter and
is under the supervision of the department of corrections, notice of any
violation of the person's conditions of release must also be made to the
department of corrections.

(3) Whenever the
secretary contracts with a service provider to operate a secure community
transition facility, the contract shall include a requirement that the service
provider must report to the department of social and health services any known
violation of conditions committed by any resident of the secure community
transition facility.

(4) The secretary shall
document in writing all violations, penalties, actions by the department of
social and health services to remove persons from a secure community transition
facility, and contract terminations. The secretary shall compile this
information and submit it to the appropriate committees of the legislature on an
annual basis. The secretary shall give great weight to a service provider's
record of violations, penalties, actions by the department of social and health
services or the department of corrections to remove persons from a secure
community transition facility, and contract terminations in determining whether
to execute, renew, or renegotiate a contract with a service provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever the secretary
contracts with a provider to operate a secure community transition facility,
the secretary shall include in the contract provisions establishing
intermediate contract enforcement remedies.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

A conditional release
from a total confinement facility to a less restrictive alternative is a
release that subjects the conditionally released person to the registration
requirements specified in RCW 9A.44.130 and to community notification under RCW
4.24.550.

When a person is
conditionally released to the secure community transition facility established
pursuant to section 201(1) of this act, the sheriff must provide each household
on McNeil Island with the community notification information provided for under
RCW 4.24.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

When a person civilly
committed under this chapter is conditionally released to a less restrictive
alternative placement at a facility owned or operated under contract with the
state, any employer who hires the person for a position or any educational
institution that enrolls the person for a program is eligible for an incentive
grant from the state up to five thousand dollars per year that the person
remains employed or enrolled on at least a half-time basis in a job or program
that meets requirements approved by the court. The provisions of this section
may not establish employer or educational institution liability for the
subsequent criminal acts of a conditionally released person for the decision to
hire or enroll that person. An employer or educational institution that
accepts an incentive grant under this section shall not be civilly liable for
the subsequent criminal acts of a conditionally released person unless the
employer's or educational institution's conduct constitutes gross negligence or
intentional misconduct. An employer that hires a conditionally released person
must notify all other employees of the conditionally released person's status.
Notification for conditionally released persons who enroll in an institution of
higher education shall be made pursuant to the provisions of RCW 9A.44.130
related to sex offenders enrolled in institutions of higher education and RCW
4.24.550. This section applies only to conditionally released persons whose
court approved treatment plan includes permission or a requirement for the
person to obtain education or employment and to employment positions or
educational programs that meet the requirements of the court-approved treatment
plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
225. (1) A joint select
committee on the equitable distribution of secure community transition
facilities is established.

(2) The joint select
committee shall consist of the following persons:

(a) One member from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of
the senate, at least one member being a member of the senate human services and
corrections committee;

(b) One member from
each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by
the co-speakers of the house of representatives, at least one member being a member
of the house criminal justice and corrections committee;

(c) One member from the
department of social and health services;

(d) One member from the
Washington state association of counties;

(e) One member from the
association of Washington cities;

(f) One member
representing crime victims, appointed jointly by the president of the senate
and the co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(g) One person selected
by the governor; and

(h) Two persons
representing local law enforcement, one representing cities and one
representing counties.

(3) The chair of the
joint select committee shall be a legislative member chosen by the joint select
committee members.

(4) The joint select
committee shall review and make recommendations regarding:

(a) Any necessary
specifications or revisions to the policy of equitable distribution of secure
community transition facilities;

(b) Any necessary
revisions to the provisions related to siting and operating secure community
transition facilities in sections 213 through 218 and 222 of this act; and

(c) Except with respect
to the facility established pursuant to section 201(1) of this act, a method
for determining possible mitigation measures for compensating communities for
any increased risks to public safety brought about by the siting of a secure
community transition facility in a community.

(5) The joint select
committee shall present a report of its findings and recommendations to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, including any proposed
legislation, not later than November 15, 2001.

(6) The joint select
committee may, where feasible, consult with individuals from the public and
private sector in carrying out its duties under this section.

(7) Nonlegislative
members of the joint select committee shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Legislative members of the joint select committee shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120.

(8) Staff of senate
committee services and the office of program research of the house of
representatives shall provide support to the joint select committee.

(9) This section
expires March 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
226. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this act
shall operate to restrict a court's authority to make less restrictive
alternative placements to a committed person's individual residence or to a
setting less restrictive than a secure community transition facility. A
court-ordered less restrictive alternative placement to a committed person's
individual residence is not a less restrictive alternative placement to a
secure community transition facility.

PART
III

SENTENCING STRUCTURE

Sec. 301. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2001 c
287 s 4 and 2001 c 95 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1) "Board"
means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement
authorized by RCW 9.94A.145, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the
offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving payment
thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering daily
the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a
departmental account.

(((2))) (3)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(((3))) (4)
"Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department
who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(((4))) (5)
"Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of
confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.120(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, 9.94A.137, 9.94A.700 through
9.94A.715, or 9.94A.383, served in the community subject to controls placed on
the offender's movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed
on community custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the
department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by the
court, based upon the risk to community safety.

(((5))) (6)
"Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of
community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.715, as
established by the commission or the legislature under RCW 9.94A.040, for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.

(((6))) (7)
"Community placement" means that period during which the offender is
subject to the conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision,
which begins either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease
supervision) or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely
community custody, entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the
two.

(((7))) (8)
"Community service" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(((8))) (9)
"Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions
imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524.
Where the court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has
contributed to his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject
to available resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate
compact for out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW
9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and
should be considered the same as probation by other states.

(((9))) (10)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(((10))) (11)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(((11))) (12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(((12))) (13)
"Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions
and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or
elsewhere. The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms
thereof; and (b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(((13))) (14)
"Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals
the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(((14))) (15)
"Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to
monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions,
and in which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(((15))) (16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(((16))) (17)
"Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude
the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial
confinement, of community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of
community service work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation.
The fact that an offender through earned release can reduce the actual period
of confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.

(((17))) (18)
"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender
remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law
to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings"
means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated
as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any
other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment,
or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation,
specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement
programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title
74 RCW.

(((18))) (19)
"Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense
or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(((19))) (20)
"Drug offense" means:

(a) Any felony
violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW
69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined
as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture,
distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(((20))) (21)
"Earned release" means earned release from confinement as provided in
RCW 9.94A.150.

(((21))) (22)
"Escape" means:

(a) ((Escape by a))
Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.--- (section 1,
chapter 287, Laws of 2001, as amended by section 360, chapter ... (this
act), Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.)), escape in the first degree (RCW
9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to
return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work
release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the
department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(((22))) (23)
"Felony traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide
(RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer
(RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(((23))) (24)
"Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court
to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(((24))) (25)
"First-time offender" means any person who has no prior convictions
for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW
9.94A.650.

(((25))) (26)
"Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to
electronic surveillance.

(((26))) (27)
"Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by
a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations
which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims'
compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or
interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a
result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or
vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment
to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident
resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(((27))) (28)
"Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal
conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the
second degree;

(c) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation
in the second degree;

(e) Controlled
substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the
first degree;

(g) Incest when
committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(j) Leading organized
crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the
first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the
second degree;

(m) Promoting prostitution
in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third
degree;

(o) Robbery in the
second degree;

(p) Sexual
exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault;

(r) Vehicular homicide,
when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502,
or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B
felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony
with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u) Any felony offense
in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most
serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior
conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c),
chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11,
1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction
for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child
under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and
perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW
9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27,
1997.

(((28))) (29)
"Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(((29))) (30)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(((30))) (31)
"Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in
a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or
any other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been
ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of
each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial
confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination
of work crew and home detention.

(((31))) (32)
"Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been
convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered
most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW
9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one
conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been
convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping
in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree,
or burglary in the first degree((, with a finding of sexual motivation));
or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection (((31)))
(32)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the
commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an
offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an
offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child
in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender
was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(((32))) (33)
"Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's community
placement that is not community custody.

(((33))) (34)
"Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time
as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(((34))) (35)
"Risk assessment" means the application of an objective instrument
supported by research and adopted by the department for the purpose of
assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature
of the harm done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender
related to risk, the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information
provided to the department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall
not be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(((35))) (36)
"Serious traffic offense" means:

(a) Driving while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual
physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended
vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal,
out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(((36))) (37)
"Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and
means:

(a)(i) Murder in the
first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the
second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(v) Assault in the
first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first
degree;

(viii) Assault of a
child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies;
or

(b) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(((37))) (38)
"Sex offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.130(11);

(ii) A violation of RCW
9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is
a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or

(iv) A felony that is,
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a
finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(((38))) (39)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification.

(((39))) (40)
"Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary
range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(((40))) (41)
"Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for
which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in
chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other
statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.

(((41))) (42)
"Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries
of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state
or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(((42))) (43)
"Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and
assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks
prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program.
The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's
requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(((43))) (44)
"Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological,
physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the
crime charged.

(((44))) (45)
"Violent offense" means:

(a) Any of the
following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined
under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal
solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in
the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in
the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties
if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the
second degree;

(vii) Arson in the
second degree;

(viii) Assault in the
second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child
in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the
first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the
second degree;

(xii) Drive-by
shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular
assault; and

(xiv) Vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for
a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is
comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this
subsection; and

(c) Any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this
subsection.

(((45))) (46)
"Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of
civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW
9.94A.135.

(((46))) (47)
"Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program as
provided in RCW 9.94A.137 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of
corrections by requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of
real-world job and vocational experiences, character-building work ethics
training, life management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation,
counseling, literacy training, and basic adult education.

(((47))) (48)
"Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study
at school.

Sec. 302. RCW 9.94A.715 and 2001 c
10 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a court
sentences a person to the custody of the department for a sex offense not
sentenced under section 303 of this act, a violent offense, any crime
against persons under RCW 9.94A.440(2), or a felony offense under chapter 69.50
or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition
to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
for the community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.040 or up to the
period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2),
whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon completion
of the term of confinement; (b) at such time as the offender is transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150
(1) and (2); or (c) with regard to offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660,
upon failure to complete or administrative termination from the special drug offender
sentencing alternative program.

(2)(a) Unless a
condition is waived by the court, the conditions of community custody shall
include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also
include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the
offender to participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the
offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department
shall enforce such conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

(b) As part of any
sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this
subsection, the court shall also require the offender to comply with any
conditions imposed by the department under RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall
assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify additional
conditions of the offender's community custody based upon the risk to community
safety. In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and to obey
all laws.

(c) The department may
not impose conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the court and may
not contravene or decrease court imposed conditions. The department shall
notify the offender in writing of any such conditions or modifications. In
setting, modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(3) If an offender
violates conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to this
section during community custody, the department may transfer the offender to a
more restrictive confinement status and impose other available sanctions as
provided in RCW 9.94A.205 and 9.94A.207.

(4) Except for terms of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the department shall discharge the
offender from community custody on a date determined by the department, which
the department may modify, based on risk and performance of the offender,
within the range or at the end of the period of earned release, whichever is
later.

(5) At any time prior
to the completion or termination of a sex offender's term of community custody,
if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may impose
and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to
this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as
it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition extended
under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the offender's term of
community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for the
purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of court as
provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court extends a condition beyond the
expiration of the term of community custody, the department is not responsible
for supervision of the offender's compliance with the condition.

(6) Within the funds
available for community custody, the department shall determine conditions and
duration of community custody on the basis of risk to community safety, and
shall supervise offenders during community custody on the basis of risk to
community safety and conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall
adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

(7) By the close of the
next business day after receiving notice of a condition imposed or modified by
the department, an offender may request an administrative review under rules
adopted by the department. The condition shall remain in effect unless the
reviewing officer finds that it is not reasonably related to any of the following:
(a) The crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) An offender who is
not a persistent offender shall be sentenced under this section if the
offender:

(a) Is convicted of:

(i) Rape in the first
degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the first degree, child
molestation in the first degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;

(ii) Any of the
following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first
degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first degree, assault
in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree, or burglary in
the first degree; or

(iii) An attempt to
commit any crime listed in this subsection (1)(a);

committed on or after the
effective date of this section; or

(b) Has a prior
conviction for an offense listed in RCW 9.94A.030(32)(b), and is convicted of
any sex offense which was committed after the effective date of this section.

For purposes of this subsection
(1)(b), failure to register is not a sex offense.

(2) An offender
convicted of rape of a child in the first or second degree or child molestation
in the first degree who was seventeen years of age or younger at the time of
the offense shall not be sentenced under this section.

(3) Upon a finding that
the offender is subject to sentencing under this section, the court shall
impose a sentence to a maximum term consisting of the statutory maximum
sentence for the offense and a minimum term either within the standard sentence
range for the offense, or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.390, if the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.

(4) A person sentenced
under subsection (3) of this section shall serve the sentence in a facility or
institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state.

(5) When a court
sentences a person to the custody of the department under this section, the
court shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender
to community custody under the supervision of the department and the authority
of the board for any period of time the person is released from total
confinement before the expiration of the maximum sentence.

(6)(a) Unless a
condition is waived by the court, the conditions of community custody shall
include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also
include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the
offender to participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the
offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the
department and the board shall enforce such conditions pursuant to sections
304, 307, and 308 of this act.

(b) As part of any
sentence under this section, the court shall also require the offender to
comply with any conditions imposed by the board under sections 304 and 306
through 309 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. A new section is added
to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) When an offender is
sentenced under section 303 of this act, the department shall assess the
offender's risk of recidivism and shall recommend to the board any additional or
modified conditions of the offender's community custody based upon the risk to
community safety. In addition, the department shall make a recommendation with
regard to, and the board may require the offender to participate in,
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and obey all
laws. The board must consider and may impose department-recommended
conditions.

(2) The department may
not recommend and the board may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed
conditions. The board shall notify the offender in writing of any such
conditions or modifications.

(3) In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the department shall
be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(4) If an offender
violates conditions imposed by the court, the department, or the board during
community custody, the board or the department may transfer the offender to a
more restrictive confinement status and impose other available sanctions as
provided in section 309 of this act.

(5) By the close of the
next business day, after receiving notice of a condition imposed by the board
or the department, an offender may request an administrative hearing under
rules adopted by the board. The condition shall remain in effect unless the
hearing examiner finds that it is not reasonably related to any of the
following:

(a) The crime of
conviction;

(b) The offender's risk
of reoffending; or

(c) The safety of the
community.

(6) An offender
released by the board under section 306 of this act shall be subject to the
supervision of the department until the expiration of the maximum term of the
sentence. The department shall monitor the offender's compliance with
conditions of community custody imposed by the court, department, or board, and
promptly report any violations to the board. Any violation of conditions of
community custody established or modified by the board shall be subject to the
provisions of sections 307 through 310 of this act.

(7) If the department
finds that an emergency exists requiring the immediate imposition of conditions
of release in addition to those set by the board under section 306 of this act
and subsection (1) of this section in order to prevent the offender from
committing a crime, the department may impose additional conditions. The
department may not impose conditions that are contrary to those set by the
board or the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed or
board-imposed conditions. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall take
effect immediately after notice to the offender by personal service, but shall
not remain in effect longer than seven working days unless approved by the
board under subsection (1) of this section within seven working days.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. A new section is added
to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
provide offenders sentenced under section 303 of this act with the opportunity
for sex offender treatment during incarceration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. A new section is added
to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Before the
expiration of the minimum term, as part of the end of sentence review process
under RCW 72.09.340, 72.09.345, and where appropriate, 72.09.370, the
department shall conduct, and the offender shall participate in, an examination
of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are recognized by experts in
the prediction of sexual dangerousness, and including a prediction of the
probability that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released.

(b) The board may
contract for an additional, independent examination, subject to the standards
in this section.

(2) The board shall
impose the conditions and instructions provided for in RCW 9.94A.720. The
board shall consider the department's recommendations and may impose conditions
in addition to those recommended by the department. The board may impose or
modify conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.

(3) No later than
ninety days before expiration of the minimum term, but after the board receives
the results from the end of sentence review process and the recommendations for
additional or modified conditions of community custody from the department, the
board shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be
set by the board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate
in an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining whether to
release the offender. The board shall order the offender released, under such
affirmative and other conditions as the board determines appropriate, unless
the board determines by a preponderance of the evidence that, despite such
conditions, it is more likely than not that the offender will commit sex
offenses if released. If the board does not order the offender released, the
board shall establish a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional two
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. A new section is added
to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the board
or a community corrections officer of this state has reason to believe an
offender released under section 306 of this act has violated a condition of
community custody or the laws of this state, any community corrections officer
may arrest or cause the arrest and detention of the offender pending a
determination by the board whether sanctions should be imposed or the
offender's community custody should be revoked. The community corrections
officer shall report all facts and circumstances surrounding the alleged
violation to the board, with recommendations.

(2) If the board or the
department causes the arrest or detention of an offender for a violation that
does not amount to a new crime and the offender is arrested or detained by
local law enforcement or in a local jail, the board or department, whichever
caused the arrest or detention, shall be financially responsible for local
costs. Jail bed costs shall be allocated at the rate established under RCW
9.94A.207(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. A new section is added
to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

Any offender released
under section 306 of this act who is arrested and detained in physical custody
by the authority of a community corrections officer, or upon the written order
of the board, shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the board and the issuance by the board
of an order reinstating the offender's release on the same or modified
conditions. All chiefs of police, marshals of cities and towns, sheriffs of
counties, and all police, prison, and peace officers and constables shall
execute any such order in the same manner as any ordinary criminal process.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. A new section is added to
chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If an offender
released by the board under section 306 of this act violates any condition or
requirement of community custody, the board may transfer the offender to a more
restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of the
sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community custody or in
detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation and subject to the
limitations of subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Following the hearing
specified in subsection (3) of this section, the board may impose sanctions
such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work crew,
community service, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or
counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community, or may suspend or revoke the
release to community custody whenever an offender released by the board under
section 306 of this act violates any condition or requirement of community
custody.

(3) If an offender
released by the board under section 306 of this act is accused of violating any
condition or requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a
hearing before the board prior to the imposition of sanctions. The hearing
shall be considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and shall not be
subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall develop hearing procedures and a
structure of graduated sanctions consistent with the hearing procedures and
graduated sanctions developed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.205. The board may suspend
the offender's release to community custody and confine the offender in a
correctional institution owned, operated by, or operated under contract with
the state prior to the hearing unless the offender has been arrested and
confined for a new criminal offense.

(4) The hearing
procedures required under subsection (3) of this section shall be developed by
rule and include the following:

(a) Hearings shall be
conducted by members of the board unless the board enters into an agreement
with the department to use the hearing officers established under RCW
9.94A.205;

(b) The board shall
provide the offender with written notice of the violation, the evidence relied
upon, and the reasons the particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall
include a statement of the rights specified in this subsection, and the
offender's right to file a personal restraint petition under court rules after
the final decision of the board;

(c) The hearing shall
be held unless waived by the offender, and shall be electronically recorded.
For offenders not in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within
fifteen working days, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of the
violation. For offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held
within five working days, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of
the violation;

(d) The offender shall
have the right to: (i) Be present at the hearing; (ii) have the assistance of
a person qualified to assist the offender in the hearing, appointed by the
hearing examiner if the offender has a language or communications barrier;
(iii) testify or remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary
evidence; (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and (vi) be
represented by counsel if revocation of the release to community custody is a
possible sanction for the violation; and

(e) The sanction shall
take effect if affirmed by the hearing examiner. Within seven days after the
hearing examiner's decision, the offender may appeal the decision to a panel of
three reviewing examiners designated by the chair of the board or by the
chair's designee. The sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of
the panel finds that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the
following: (i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii)
the offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.

(5) For purposes of
this section, no finding of a violation of conditions may be based on
unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. A new section is added
to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

In the event the board
suspends release status of an offender released under section 306 of this act
by reason of an alleged violation of a condition of release, or pending
disposition of a new criminal charge, the board may nullify the suspension
order and reinstate release under previous conditions or any new conditions the
board determines advisable. Before the board may nullify a suspension order
and reinstate release, it shall determine that the best interests of society
and the offender shall be served by such reinstatement rather than return to
confinement.

Sec. 311. RCW 9.94A.060 and 1996 c
232 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission
consists of twenty voting members, one of whom the governor shall designate as
chairperson. With the exception of ex officio voting members, the voting
members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate.

(2) The voting
membership consists of the following:

(a) The head of the
state agency having general responsibility for adult correction programs, as an
ex officio member;

(b) The director of
financial management or designee, as an ex officio member;

(c) ((Until the
indeterminate sentence review board ceases to exist pursuant to RCW 9.95.0011,))
The chair of the indeterminate sentence review board, as an ex
officio member;

(d) The head of the
state agency, or the agency head's designee, having responsibility for juvenile
corrections programs, as an ex officio member;

(e) Two prosecuting
attorneys;

(f) Two attorneys with
particular expertise in defense work;

(g) Four persons who
are superior court judges;

(h) One person who is
the chief law enforcement officer of a county or city;

(i) Four members of the
public who are not prosecutors, defense attorneys, judges, or law enforcement
officers, one of whom is a victim of crime or a crime victims' advocate;

(j) One person who is
an elected official of a county government, other than a prosecuting attorney
or sheriff;

(k) One person who is
an elected official of a city government;

(l) One person who is
an administrator of juvenile court services.

In making the
appointments, the governor shall endeavor to assure that the commission
membership includes adequate representation and expertise relating to both the
adult criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system. In making the
appointments, the governor shall seek the recommendations of Washington
prosecutors in respect to the prosecuting attorney members, of the Washington
state bar association in respect to the defense attorney members, of the
association of superior court judges in respect to the members who are judges,
of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs in respect to the
member who is a law enforcement officer, of the Washington state association of
counties in respect to the member who is a county official, of the association
of Washington cities in respect to the member who is a city official, of the
office of crime victims advocacy and other organizations of crime victims in
respect to the member who is a victim of crime or a crime victims' advocate,
and of the Washington association of juvenile court administrators in respect
to the member who is an administrator of juvenile court services.

(3)(a) All voting
members of the commission, except ex officio voting members, shall serve terms
of three years and until their successors are appointed and confirmed.

(b) The governor shall
stagger the terms of the members appointed under subsection (2)(j), (k), and
(l) of this section by appointing one of them for a term of one year, one for a
term of two years, and one for a term of three years.

(4) The speaker of the
house of representatives and the president of the senate may each appoint two
nonvoting members to the commission, one from each of the two largest caucuses
in each house. The members so appointed shall serve two-year terms, or until
they cease to be members of the house from which they were appointed, whichever
occurs first.

(5) The members of the
commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. Legislative members shall be reimbursed by their respective
houses as provided under RCW 44.04.120((, as now existing or hereafter
amended)). Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250.

Sec. 312. RCW 9.94A.120 and 2001 c
10 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a person is
convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as provided in this
chapter.

(2)(a) The court shall
impose a sentence as provided in the following sections and as applicable in
the case:

(i) Unless another term
of confinement applies, the court shall impose a sentence within the standard
sentence range established in RCW 9.94A.310;

(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and
9.94A.705, relating to community placement;

(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and
9.94A.715, relating to community custody;

(iv) RCW 9.94A.383,
relating to community custody for offenders whose term of confinement is one year
or less;

(v) RCW 9.94A.560,
relating to persistent offenders;

(vi) RCW 9.94A.590,
relating to mandatory minimum terms;

(vii) RCW 9.94A.650,
relating to the first-time offender waiver;

(viii) RCW 9.94A.660,
relating to the drug offender sentencing alternative;

(ix) RCW 9.94A.670,
relating to the special sex offender sentencing alternative;

(x) Section 303 of
this act, relating to certain sex offenses;

(xi) RCW
9.94A.390, relating to exceptional sentences;

(((xi))) (xii)
RCW 9.94A.400, relating to consecutive and concurrent sentences.

(b) If a standard
sentence range has not been established for the offender's crime, the court
shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one year of
confinement; community service work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community
supervision not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and sanctions
as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other legal financial
obligations. The court may impose a sentence which provides more than one year
of confinement if the court finds reasons justifying an exceptional sentence as
provided in RCW 9.94A.390.

(3) If the court
imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less, the court may,
in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on consecutive or
intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days of confinement
shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule
court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(4) If a sentence
imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, it shall be imposed
as provided in RCW 9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145.

(5) Except as provided
under RCW 9.94A.140(4) and 9.94A.142(4), a court may not impose a sentence
providing for a term of confinement or community supervision, community
placement, or community custody which exceeds the statutory maximum for the
crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6) The sentencing
court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time served before the
sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the offense for which
the offender is being sentenced.

(7) The court shall
order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.140 and 9.94A.142.

(8) As a part of any
sentence, the court may impose and enforce crime-related prohibitions and
affirmative conditions as provided in this chapter.

(9) The court may order
an offender whose sentence includes community placement or community
supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate in
available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status
evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the offender's
competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(10) In any sentence of
partial confinement, the court may require the offender to serve the partial
confinement in work release, in a program of home detention, on work crew, or
in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(11) In sentencing an
offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined in RCW
10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the offense
for which the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part
of any term of community supervision, community placement, or community
custody, order the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator
program approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 313. RCW 9.94A.190 and 2000 c
28 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A sentence that
includes a term or terms of confinement totaling more than one year shall be
served in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by
the state. Except as provided in subsection (3) or (5) of this section,
a sentence of not more than one year of confinement shall be served in a
facility operated, licensed, or utilized under contract, by the county, or if
home detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in the residence of
either the offender or a member of the offender's immediate family.

(2) If a county uses a
state partial confinement facility for the partial confinement of a person
sentenced to confinement for not more than one year, the county shall reimburse
the state for the use of the facility as provided in this subsection. The
office of financial management shall set the rate of reimbursement based upon
the average per diem cost per offender in the facility. The office of
financial management shall determine to what extent, if any, reimbursement
shall be reduced or eliminated because of funds provided by the legislature to
the department for the purpose of covering the cost of county use of state
partial confinement facilities. The office of financial management shall
reestablish reimbursement rates each even-numbered year.

(3) A person who is
sentenced for a felony to a term of not more than one year, and who is
committed or returned to incarceration in a state facility on another felony
conviction, either under the indeterminate sentencing laws, chapter 9.95 RCW,
or under this chapter shall serve all terms of confinement, including a
sentence of not more than one year, in a facility or institution operated, or
utilized under contract, by the state, consistent with the provisions of RCW
9.94A.400.

(4) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, a sentence imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660
which has a standard sentence range of over one year, regardless of length,
shall be served in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state.

(5) Sentences
imposed pursuant to section 303 of this act shall be served in a facility or
institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state.

Sec. 314. RCW 9.94A.390 and 2000 c
28 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The court may impose a
sentence outside the standard sentence range for an offense if it finds,
considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence. Whenever a sentence
outside the standard sentence range is imposed, the court shall set forth the
reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of law. A
sentence outside the standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence unless
it is imposed on an offender sentenced under section 303 of this act. An
exceptional sentence imposed on an offender sentenced under section 303 of this
act shall be to a minimum term set by the court and a maximum term equal to the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense of conviction under chapter 9A.20
RCW.

If the sentencing court
finds that an exceptional sentence outside the standard sentence range should
be imposed, the sentence is subject to review only as provided for in RCW
9.94A.210(4).

A departure from the
standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2) governing whether sentences are to be
served consecutively or concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the
limitations in this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state
as set forth in RCW 9.94A.210 (2) through (6).

The following are
illustrative factors which the court may consider in the exercise of its
discretion to impose an exceptional sentence. The following are illustrative
only and are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.

(1) Mitigating
Circumstances

(a) To a significant
degree, the victim was an initiator, willing participant, aggressor, or
provoker of the incident.

(b) Before detection,
the defendant compensated, or made a good faith effort to compensate, the
victim of the criminal conduct for any damage or injury sustained.

(c) The defendant
committed the crime under duress, coercion, threat, or compulsion insufficient
to constitute a complete defense but which significantly affected his or her
conduct.

(d) The defendant, with
no apparent predisposition to do so, was induced by others to participate in
the crime.

(e) The defendant's
capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct, or to conform
his or her conduct to the requirements of the law, was significantly impaired.
Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol is excluded.

(f) The offense was
principally accomplished by another person and the defendant manifested extreme
caution or sincere concern for the safety or well-being of the victim.

(g) The operation of
the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a presumptive sentence
that is clearly excessive in light of the purpose of this chapter, as expressed
in RCW 9.94A.010.

(h) The defendant or
the defendant's children suffered a continuing pattern of physical or sexual
abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a response to that abuse.

(2) Aggravating
Circumstances

(a) The defendant's
conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested deliberate
cruelty to the victim.

(b) The defendant knew
or should have known that the victim of the current offense was particularly
vulnerable or incapable of resistance due to extreme youth, advanced age,
disability, or ill health.

(c) The current offense
was a violent offense, and the defendant knew that the victim of the current
offense was pregnant.

(d) The current offense
was a major economic offense or series of offenses, so identified by a
consideration of any of the following factors:

(i) The current offense
involved multiple victims or multiple incidents per victim;

(ii) The current
offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss substantially greater than
typical for the offense;

(iii) The current
offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or occurred over a
lengthy period of time; or

(iv) The defendant used
his or her position of trust, confidence, or fiduciary responsibility to
facilitate the commission of the current offense.

(e) The current offense
was a major violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50
RCW (VUCSA), related to trafficking in controlled substances, which was more
onerous than the typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of
ANY of the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:

(i) The current offense
involved at least three separate transactions in which controlled substances
were sold, transferred, or possessed with intent to do so;

(ii) The current
offense involved an attempted or actual sale or transfer of controlled
substances in quantities substantially larger than for personal use;

(iii) The current
offense involved the manufacture of controlled substances for use by other
parties;

(iv) The circumstances
of the current offense reveal the offender to have occupied a high position in
the drug distribution hierarchy;

(v) The current offense
involved a high degree of sophistication or planning, occurred over a lengthy
period of time, or involved a broad geographic area of disbursement; or

(vi) The offender used
his or her position or status to facilitate the commission of the current
offense, including positions of trust, confidence or fiduciary responsibility
(e.g., pharmacist, physician, or other medical professional).

(f) The current offense
included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW 9.94A.127.

(g) The offense was
part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of the same victim under the age of
eighteen years manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of
time.

(h) The current offense
involved domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the
following was present:

(i) The offense was
part of an ongoing pattern of psychological, physical, or sexual abuse of the
victim manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time;

(ii) The offense
occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or the offender's minor children
under the age of eighteen years; or

(iii) The offender's
conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested deliberate cruelty
or intimidation of the victim.

(i) The operation of
the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a presumptive sentence
that is clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(j) The defendant's
prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored foreign criminal history results
in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light of the purpose
of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(k) The offense
resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of rape.

(l) The defendant knew
that the victim of the current offense was a youth who was not residing with a
legal custodian and the defendant established or promoted the relationship for
the primary purpose of victimization.

Sec. 315. RCW 9.94A.590 and 2000 c
28 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following
minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and shall not be varied or
modified under RCW 9.94A.390:

(a) An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years.

(b) An offender
convicted of the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in
the first degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in
death or intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total
confinement not less than five years.

(c) An offender
convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree shall be sentenced to a term
of total confinement not less than five years.

(d) An offender
convicted of the crime of sexually violent predator escape shall be sentenced
to a minimum term of total confinement not less than sixty months.

(2) During such minimum
terms of total confinement, no offender subject to the provisions of this
section is eligible for community custody, earned release time, furlough, home
detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of
early release authorized under RCW 9.94A.150, or any other form of authorized
leave of absence from the correctional facility while not in the direct custody
of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply:
(a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment; (b) for
the purpose of commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an
offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree; or (c) for an
extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

Sec. 316. RCW 9.94A.670 and 2000 c
28 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply to this
section only.

(a) "Sex offender
treatment provider" or "treatment provider" means a certified
sex offender treatment provider as defined in RCW 18.155.020.

(b) "Victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a result of the crime charged.
"Victim" also means a parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(2) An offender is
eligible for the special sex offender sentencing alternative if:

(a) The offender has
been convicted of a sex offense other than a violation of RCW 9A.44.050 or a
sex offense that is also a serious violent offense;

(b) The offender has no
prior convictions for a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or any other
felony sex offenses in this or any other state; and

(c) The offender's
standard sentence range for the offense includes the possibility of confinement
for less than eleven years.

(3) If the court finds
the offender is eligible for this alternative, the court, on its own motion or
the motion of the state or the offender, may order an examination to determine
whether the offender is amenable to treatment.

(a) The report of the
examination shall include at a minimum the following:

(i) The offender's
version of the facts and the official version of the facts;

(ii) The offender's
offense history;

(iii) An assessment of
problems in addition to alleged deviant behaviors;

(iv) The offender's
social and employment situation; and

(v) Other evaluation
measures used.

The report shall set forth
the sources of the examiner's information.

(b) The examiner shall
assess and report regarding the offender's amenability to treatment and
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided
and shall include, at a minimum:

(i) Frequency and type
of contact between offender and therapist;

(ii) Specific issues to
be addressed in the treatment and description of planned treatment modalities;

(iii) Monitoring plans,
including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements,
and monitoring by family members and others;

(iv) Anticipated length
of treatment; and

(v) Recommended
crime-related prohibitions.

(c) The court on its
own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a second
examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The examiner
shall be selected by the party making the motion. The offender shall pay the
cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the defendant to
be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(4) After receipt of
the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and the community
will benefit from use of this alternative and consider the victim's opinion
whether the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this
section. If the court determines that this alternative is appropriate, the
court shall then impose a sentence or, pursuant to section 303 of this act,
a minimum term of sentence, within the standard sentence range. If the
sentence imposed is less ((then [than])) than eleven years of
confinement, the court may suspend the execution of the sentence and impose the
following conditions of suspension:

(a) The court shall
place the offender on community custody for the length of the suspended
sentence, the length of the maximum term imposed pursuant to section 303 of
this act, or three years, whichever is greater, and require the offender to
comply with any conditions imposed by the department under RCW 9.94A.720.

(b) The court shall
order treatment for any period up to three years in duration. The court, in
its discretion, shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or inpatient sex
offender treatment, if available. A community mental health center may not be
used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex offender treatment
providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
community corrections officer, and the court. If any party or the court
objects to a proposed change, the offender shall not change providers or
conditions without court approval after a hearing.

(5) As conditions of
the suspended sentence, the court may impose one or more of the following:

(a) Up to six months of
confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of confinement for that offense;

(b) Crime-related
prohibitions;

(c) Require the
offender to devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(d) Remain within
prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the community
corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(e) Report as directed
to the court and a community corrections officer;

(f) Pay all
court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;

(g) Perform community
service work; or

(h) Reimburse the
victim for the cost of any counseling required as a result of the offender's
crime.

(6) At the time of
sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing for three
months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.

(7) The sex offender
treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the offender's progress in
treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference the
treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance,
offender's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the offender's
relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court
at sentencing.

(8) Prior to the
treatment termination hearing, the treatment provider and community corrections
officer shall submit written reports to the court and parties regarding the
offender's compliance with treatment and monitoring requirements, and
recommendations regarding termination from treatment, including proposed
community custody conditions. Either party may request, and the court may
order, another evaluation regarding the advisability of termination from
treatment. The offender shall pay the cost of any additional evaluation
ordered unless the court finds the offender to be indigent in which case the
state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the court may:
(a) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (b) terminate treatment,
or (c) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of community custody.

(9) If a violation of
conditions occurs during community custody, the department shall either impose
sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a) or refer the violation to the
court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence as provided for in subsections
(6) and (8) of this section.

(10) The court may
revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of community
custody and order execution of the sentence if: (a) The offender violates the
conditions of the suspended sentence, or (b) the court finds that the offender
is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All confinement time
served during the period of community custody shall be credited to the offender
if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(11) Examinations and
treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be conducted by sex
offender treatment providers certified by the department of health pursuant to
chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court finds that:

(a) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; or

(b)(i) No certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance
of the offender's home; and

(ii) The evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this section and the rules adopted by the department
of health.

(12) If the offender is
less than eighteen years of age when the charge is filed, the state shall pay
for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
317. A new section is added
to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

(1) "Board"
means the indeterminate sentence review board.

(2) "Community
custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence subject to controls
including crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions from the court,
the board, or the department of corrections based on risk to community safety,
that is served under supervision in the community, and which may be modified or
revoked for violations of release conditions.

(3) "Crime-related
prohibition" has the meaning defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(4)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(5) "Parole"
means that portion of a person's sentence for a crime committed before July 1,
1984, served on conditional release in the community subject to board controls
and revocation and under supervision of the department.

(6)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of corrections or
his or her designee.

Sec. 318. RCW 9.95.005 and 1986 c
224 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall meet at
((the penitentiary and the reformatory)) major state correctional
institutions at such times as may be necessary for a full and complete
study of the cases of all convicted persons whose durations of confinement are
to be determined by it ((or)); whose community custody
supervision is under the board's authority; or whose applications for
parole come before it. Other times and places of meetings may also be fixed by
the board.

The superintendents of
the different institutions shall provide suitable quarters for the board and
assistants while in the discharge of their duties.

Sec. 319. RCW 9.95.010 and 1955 c
133 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

When a person, whose
crime was committed before July 1, 1984, is convicted of any felony, except
treason, murder in the first degree, or carnal knowledge of a child under ten
years, and a new trial is not granted, the court shall sentence such person to
the penitentiary, or, if the law allows and the court sees fit to exercise such
discretion, to the reformatory, and shall fix the maximum term of such person's
sentence only.

The
maximum term to be fixed by the court shall be the maximum provided by law for
the crime of which such person was convicted, if the law provides for a maximum
term. If the law does not provide a maximum term for the crime of which such
person was convicted the court shall fix such maximum term, which may be for
any number of years up to and including life imprisonment but in any case where
the maximum term is fixed by the court it shall be fixed at not less than
twenty years.

Sec. 320. RCW 9.95.011 and 1993 c
144 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When the
court commits a convicted person to the department of corrections on or after
July 1, 1986, for an offense committed before July 1, 1984, the court shall, at
the time of sentencing or revocation of probation, fix the minimum term. The
term so fixed shall not exceed the maximum sentence provided by law for the
offense of which the person is convicted.

The court shall attempt
to set the minimum term reasonably consistent with the purposes, standards, and
sentencing ranges adopted under RCW 9.94A.040, but the court is subject to the
same limitations as those placed on the board under RCW 9.92.090, 9.95.040 (1)
through (4), 9.95.115, 9A.32.040, 9A.44.045, and chapter 69.50 RCW. The
court's minimum term decision is subject to review to the same extent as a
minimum term decision by the parole board before July 1, 1986.

Thereafter, the
expiration of the minimum term set by the court minus any time credits earned
under RCW 9.95.070 and 9.95.110 constitutes the parole eligibility review date,
at which time the board may consider the convicted person for parole under RCW
9.95.100 and 9.95.110 and chapter 72.04A RCW. Nothing in this section affects
the board's authority to reduce or increase the minimum term, once set by the
court, under RCW 9.95.040, 9.95.052, 9.95.055, 9.95.070, 9.95.080, 9.95.100,
9.95.115, 9.95.125, or 9.95.047.

(2) Not less than
ninety days prior to the expiration of the minimum term of a person sentenced
under section 303 of this act, for a sex offense committed on or after July 1,
2001, less any time credits permitted by statute, the board shall review the
person for conditional release to community custody as provided in section 306
of this act. If the board does not release the person, it shall set a new
minimum term not to exceed an additional two years. The board shall review the
person again not less than ninety days prior to the expiration of the new
minimum term.

Sec. 321. RCW 9.95.017 and 1986 c
224 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board
shall cause to be prepared criteria for duration of confinement, release on
parole, and length of parole for persons committed to prison for crimes
committed before July 1, 1984.

The proposed criteria
should take into consideration RCW 9.95.009(2). Before submission to the
governor, the board shall solicit comments and review on their proposed
criteria for parole release. These proposed criteria shall be submitted for
consideration by the 1987 legislature.

(2) Persons
committed to the department of corrections and who are under the authority of
the board for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2001, are subject to the
provisions for duration of confinement, release to community custody, and
length of community custody established in sections 303 through 310 of this
act.

Sec. 322. RCW 9.95.020 and 1955 c
133 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If the sentence of a
person so convicted is not suspended by the court, the superintendent of ((the
penitentiary or the superintendent of the reformatory)) a major state
correctional institution shall receive such person, if committed to his or
her institution, and imprison ((him)) the person until
released under the provisions of this chapter, under section 306 of this act,
upon the completion of the statutory maximum sentence, or through the
action of the governor.

Sec. 323. RCW 9.95.032 and 1984 c
114 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Such statement shall be
signed by the prosecuting attorney and approved by the judge by whom the
judgment was rendered and shall be delivered to the sheriff, traveling guard,
department of corrections personnel, or other officer executing the sentence, and
a copy of such statement shall be furnished to the defendant or his or her
attorney. Such officer shall deliver the statement, at the time of the
prisoner's commitment, to the superintendent of the institution to which such
prisoner has been ((sentenced and)) committed. The superintendent shall
make such statement available for use by the board ((of prison terms and
paroles)).

Sec. 324. RCW 9.95.052 and 1986 c
224 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

At any time after the
board (or the court after July 1, 1986) has determined the minimum term of
confinement of any person subject to confinement in a state correctional
institution for a crime committed before July 1, 1984, the board may
request the superintendent of such correctional institution to conduct a full
review of such person's prospects for rehabilitation and report to the board
the facts of such review and the resulting findings. Upon the basis of such
report and such other information and investigation that the board deems
appropriate, the board may redetermine and refix such convicted person's
minimum term of confinement whether the term was set by the board or the court.

The board shall not
reduce a person's minimum term of confinement unless the board has received
from the department of corrections all institutional conduct reports relating
to the person.

Sec. 325. RCW 9.95.055 and 1992 c
7 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The indeterminate
sentence review board is hereby granted authority, in the event of a
declaration by the governor that a war emergency exists, including a general
mobilization, and for the duration thereof only, to reduce downward the minimum
term, as set by the board, of any inmate under the jurisdiction of the board
confined in a state correctional facility, who will be accepted by and inducted
into the armed services: PROVIDED, That a reduction downward shall not be made
under this section for those inmates who are confined for treason, murder in the
first degree or carnal knowledge of a female child under ten years: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That no such inmate shall be released under this section who
is ((found to be a sexual psychopath under the provisions of and as defined
by chapter 71.12 RCW)) being considered for civil commitment as a
sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or was sentenced under
section 303 of this act for a crime committed on or after July 1, 2001.

Sec. 326. RCW 9.95.064 and 1989 c
276 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to
minimize the trauma to the victim, the court may attach conditions on release
of ((a defendant)) an offender under RCW 9.95.062, convicted
of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, regarding the whereabouts of the
defendant, contact with the victim, or other conditions.

(2)
Offenders released under section 306 of this act are subject to crime-related
prohibitions and affirmative conditions established by the court, the
department of corrections, or the board pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 and sections
303 through 310 of this act.

Sec. 327. RCW 9.95.070 and 1999 c
143 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every
prisoner, convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, who has a
favorable record of conduct at the penitentiary or the reformatory, and who
performs in a faithful, diligent, industrious, orderly and peaceable manner the
work, duties, and tasks assigned to him or her to the satisfaction of
the superintendent of the penitentiary or reformatory, and in whose behalf the
superintendent of the penitentiary or reformatory files a report certifying
that his or her conduct and work have been meritorious and recommending
allowance of time credits to him or her, shall upon, but not until, the
adoption of such recommendation by the indeterminate sentence review board, be
allowed time credit reductions from the term of imprisonment fixed by the
board.

(2) Offenders
sentenced under section 303 of this act for a crime committed on or after July
1, 2001, are subject to the earned release provisions for sex offenders
established in RCW 9.94A.150.

Sec. 328. RCW 9.95.080 and 1992 c
7 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

In case any ((convicted))
person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, and under the
jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board undergoing sentence in
a state correctional ((facility)) institution commits any
infractions of the rules and regulations of the institution, the board may
revoke any order theretofore made determining the length of time such convicted
person shall be imprisoned, including the forfeiture of all or a portion of
credits earned or to be earned, pursuant to the provisions of RCW 9.95.110, and
make a new order determining the length of time the person shall serve, not
exceeding the maximum penalty provided by law for the crime for which the
person was convicted, or the maximum fixed by the court. Such revocation and
redetermination shall not be had except upon a hearing before the indeterminate
sentence review board. At such hearing the convicted person shall be present
and entitled to be heard and may present evidence and witnesses in his or her
behalf.

Sec. 329. RCW 9.95.090 and 1999 c
143 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board
shall require of every able bodied ((convicted person imprisoned in the
penitentiary or the reformatory)) offender confined in a state
correctional institution for a crime committed before July 1, 1984, as many
hours of faithful labor in each and every day during his or her term of
imprisonment as shall be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the
institution in which he or she is confined.

(2) Offenders
sentenced under section 303 of this act for crimes committed on or after July
1, 2001, shall perform work or other programming as required by the department
of corrections during their term of confinement.

Sec. 330. RCW 9.95.100 and 1955 c
133 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Any ((convicted))
person convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984, and
undergoing sentence in ((the penitentiary or the reformatory)) a
state correctional institution, not sooner released under the provisions of
this chapter, shall, in accordance with the provisions of law, be discharged
from custody on serving the maximum punishment provided by law for the offense
of which such person was convicted, or the maximum term fixed by the court
where the law does not provide for a maximum term. The board shall not,
however, until his or her maximum term expires, release a prisoner,
unless in its opinion his or her rehabilitation has been complete and he
or she is a fit subject for release.

Sec. 331. RCW 9.95.110 and 1999 c
143 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board
may permit ((a convicted person)) an offender convicted of a crime
committed before July 1, 1984, to leave the buildings and enclosures of ((the
penitentiary or the reformatory)) a state correctional institution
on parole, after such convicted person has served the period of confinement
fixed for him or her by the board, less time credits for good behavior
and diligence in work: PROVIDED, That in no case shall an inmate be credited
with more than one-third of his or her sentence as fixed by the board.

The board may establish
rules and regulations under which ((a convicted person)) an offender
may be allowed to leave the confines of ((the penitentiary or the
reformatory)) a state correctional institution on parole, and may
return such person to the confines of the institution from which he or she
was paroled, at its discretion.

(2) The board may
permit an offender convicted of a crime committed on or after July 1, 2001, and
sentenced under section 303 of this act, to leave a state correctional
institution on community custody according to the provisions of sections 303
through 310 of this act. The person may be returned to the institution
following a violation of his or her conditions of release to community custody
pursuant to the hearing provisions of section 309 of this act.

Sec. 332. RCW 9.95.115 and 1989 c
259 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The indeterminate
sentence review board is hereby granted authority to parole any person
sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections, under a mandatory
life sentence for a crime committed ((prior to)) before July 1,
1984, except those persons sentenced to life without the possibility of
parole. No such person shall be granted parole unless the person has been
continuously confined therein for a period of twenty consecutive years less
earned good time: PROVIDED, That no such person shall be released under parole
who is ((found to be a sexual psychopath under the provisions of and as
defined by chapter 71.06 RCW)) subject to civil commitment as a sexually
violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW.

Sec. 333. RCW 9.95.120 and 1999 c
143 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the board or a
((probation and parole)) community corrections officer of this
state has reason to believe a ((convicted)) person convicted of a
crime committed before July 1, 1984, has breached a condition of his or
her parole or violated the law of any state where he or she may then
be or the rules and regulations of the board, any ((probation and parole))
community corrections officer of this state may arrest or cause the
arrest and detention and suspension of parole of such convicted person pending
a determination by the board whether the parole of such convicted person shall
be revoked. All facts and circumstances surrounding the violation by such
convicted person shall be reported to the board by the ((probation and
parole)) community corrections officer, with recommendations. The
board, after consultation with the secretary of corrections, shall make all
rules and regulations concerning procedural matters, which shall include the
time when state ((probation and parole)) community corrections
officers shall file with the board reports required by this section, procedures
pertaining thereto and the filing of such information as may be necessary to
enable the board to perform its functions under this section. On the basis of
the report by the ((probation and parole)) community corrections
officer, or at any time upon its own discretion, the board may revise or modify
the conditions of parole or order the suspension of parole by the issuance of a
written order bearing its seal, which order shall be sufficient warrant for all
peace officers to take into custody any convicted person who may be on parole
and retain such person in their custody until arrangements can be made by the
board for his or her return to a state correctional institution for
convicted felons. Any such revision or modification of the conditions of
parole or the order suspending parole shall be personally served upon the
parolee.

Any parolee arrested
and detained in physical custody by the authority of a state ((probation and
parole)) community corrections officer, or upon the written order of
the board, shall not be released from custody on bail or personal recognizance,
except upon approval of the board and the issuance by the board of an order of
reinstatement on parole on the same or modified conditions of parole.

All chiefs of police,
marshals of cities and towns, sheriffs of counties, and all police, prison, and
peace officers and constables shall execute any such order in the same manner
as any ordinary criminal process.

Whenever a paroled
prisoner is accused of a violation of his or her parole, other than the
commission of, and conviction for, a felony or misdemeanor under the laws of
this state or the laws of any state where he or she may then be, he or
she shall be entitled to a fair and impartial hearing of such charges
within thirty days from the time that he or she is served with charges
of the violation of conditions of ((his)) parole after his or her
arrest and detention. The hearing shall be held before one or more members of
the board at a place or places, within this state, reasonably near the site of
the alleged violation or violations of parole.

In the event that the
board suspends a parole by reason of an alleged parole violation or in the
event that a parole is suspended pending the disposition of a new criminal
charge, the board shall have the power to nullify the order of suspension and
reinstate the individual to parole under previous conditions or any new
conditions that the board may determine advisable. Before the board shall
nullify an order of suspension and reinstate a parole they shall have
determined that the best interests of society and the individual shall best be
served by such reinstatement rather than a return to a penal institution.

Sec. 334. RCW 9.95.121 and 1981 c
136 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For offenders convicted
of crimes committed before July 1, 1984, within fifteen days from the date
of notice to the department of corrections of the arrest and detention of the
alleged parole violator, he or she shall be personally served by a state
((probation and parole)) community corrections officer with a
copy of the factual allegations of the violation of the conditions of parole,
and, at the same time shall be advised of his or her right to an on-site
parole revocation hearing and of his or her rights and privileges as
provided in RCW 9.95.120 through 9.95.126. The alleged parole violator, after
service of the allegations of violations of the conditions of parole and the
advice of rights may waive the on-site parole revocation hearing as provided in
RCW 9.95.120, and admit one or more of the alleged violations of the conditions
of parole. If the board accepts the waiver it shall either, (1) reinstate the
parolee on parole under the same or modified conditions, or (2) revoke the
parole of the parolee and enter an order of parole revocation and return to
state custody. A determination of a new minimum sentence shall be made within
thirty days of return to state custody which shall not exceed the maximum
sentence as provided by law for the crime of which the parolee was originally
convicted or the maximum fixed by the court.

If the waiver made by
the parolee is rejected by the board it shall hold an on-site parole revocation
hearing under the provisions of RCW 9.95.120 through 9.95.126.

(2) Offenders sentenced
under section 303 of this act are subject to the violation hearing process
established in section 309 of this act.

Sec. 335. RCW 9.95.122 and 1999 c
143 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At any
on-site parole revocation hearing for a person convicted of a crime
committed before July 1, 1984, the alleged parole violator shall be
entitled to be represented by an attorney of his or her own choosing and
at his or her own expense, except, upon the presentation of satisfactory
evidence of indigency and the request for the appointment of an attorney by the
alleged parole violator, the board may cause the appointment of an attorney to
represent the alleged parole violator to be paid for at state expense, and, in
addition, the board may assume all or such other expenses in the presentation
of evidence on behalf of the alleged parole violator as it may have
authorized: PROVIDED, That funds are available for the payment of attorneys'
fees and expenses. Attorneys for the representation of alleged parole
violators in on-site hearings shall be appointed by the superior courts for the
counties wherein the on-site parole revocation hearing is to be held and such
attorneys shall be compensated in such manner and in such amount as shall be
fixed in a schedule of fees adopted by rule of the board.

(2) The rights of
offenders sentenced under section 303 of this act are defined in section 309 of
this act.

Sec. 336. RCW 9.95.123 and 1999 c
143 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

In conducting on-site
parole or community custody revocation hearings or community custody
violations hearings, the board shall have the authority to administer oaths
and affirmations, examine witnesses, receive evidence, and issue subpoenas for
the compulsory attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence for
presentation at such hearings. Subpoenas issued by the board shall be
effective throughout the state. Witnesses in attendance at any on-site parole or
community custody revocation hearing shall be paid the same fees and
allowances, in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided for
witnesses in the courts of the state in accordance with chapter 2.40 RCW ((as
now or hereafter amended)). If any person fails or refuses to obey a
subpoena issued by the board, or obeys the subpoena but refuses to testify
concerning any matter under examination at the hearing, the board may petition
the superior court of the county where the hearing is being conducted for
enforcement of the subpoena: PROVIDED, That an offer to pay statutory fees and
mileage has been made to the witness at the time of the service of the
subpoena. The petition shall be accompanied by a copy of the subpoena and
proof of service, and shall set forth in what specific manner the subpoena has
not been complied with, and shall ask an order of the court to compel the
witness to appear and testify before the board. The court, upon such petition,
shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time
and place to be fixed in such order and then and there to show cause why he or
she has not responded to the subpoena or has refused to testify. A copy of
the order shall be served upon the witness. If it appears to the court that
the subpoena was properly issued and that the particular questions which the
witness refuses to answer are reasonable and relevant, the court shall enter an
order that the witness appear at the time and place fixed in the order and
testify or produce the required papers, and on failing to obey ((said)) the
order, the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

Sec. 337. RCW 9.95.124 and 1999 c
143 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

At all on‑site
parole revocation hearings for offenders convicted of crimes committed
before July 1, 1984, the ((probation and parole)) community
corrections officers of the department of corrections, having made the
allegations of the violations of the conditions of parole, may be represented
by the attorney general. The attorney general may make independent
recommendations to the board about whether the violations constitute sufficient
cause for the revocation of the parole and the return of the parolee to a state
correctional institution for convicted felons. The hearings shall be open to
the public unless the board for specifically stated reasons closes the hearing
in whole or in part. The hearings shall be recorded either manually or by a
mechanical recording device. An alleged parole violator may be requested to
testify and any such testimony shall not be used against him or her in
any criminal prosecution. The board shall adopt rules governing the formal and
informal procedures authorized by this chapter and make rules of practice
before the board in on‑site parole revocation hearings, together with
forms and instructions.

Sec. 338. RCW 9.95.125 and 1993 c
140 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

After the on‑site
parole revocation hearing for a person convicted of a crime committed before
July 1, 1984, has been concluded, the members of the board having heard the
matter shall enter their decision of record within ten days, and make findings
and conclusions upon the allegations of the violations of the conditions of
parole. If the member, or members having heard the matter, should conclude
that the allegations of violation of the conditions of parole have not been
proven by a preponderance of the evidence, or, those which have been proven by
a preponderance of the evidence are not sufficient cause for the revocation of
parole, then the parolee shall be reinstated on parole on the same or modified
conditions of parole. For parole violations not resulting in new convictions,
modified conditions of parole may include sanctions according to an
administrative sanction grid. If the member or members having heard the matter
should conclude that the allegations of violation of the conditions of parole
have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence and constitute sufficient
cause for the revocation of parole, then such member or members shall enter an
order of parole revocation and return the parole violator to state custody.
Within thirty days of the return of such parole violator to a state
correctional institution ((for convicted felons)) the board shall enter
an order determining a new minimum term not exceeding the maximum penalty
provided by law for the crime for which the parole violator was originally
convicted or the maximum fixed by the court.

Sec. 339. RCW 9.95.126 and 1969 c
98 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

All officers and
employees of the state, counties, cities and political subdivisions of this
state shall cooperate with the board ((of prison terms and paroles)) in
making available suitable facilities for conducting parole or community
custody revocation hearings.

Sec. 340. RCW 9.95.130 and 1993 c
140 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

From and after the
suspension, cancellation, or revocation of the parole of any ((convicted
person)) offender convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984,
and until his or her return to custody the ((convicted person)) offender
shall be deemed an escapee and a fugitive from justice. The indeterminate
sentence review board may deny credit against the maximum sentence any time
during which he or she is an escapee and fugitive from justice.

Sec. 341. RCW 9.95.140 and 1992 c
7 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((indeterminate
sentence review)) board shall cause a complete record to be kept of every
prisoner under the jurisdiction of the board released on parole or community
custody. Such records shall be organized in accordance with the most
modern methods of filing and indexing so that there will be always immediately
available complete information about each such prisoner. Subject to
information sharing provisions related to mentally ill offenders, the end of
sentence review committee, and the department of corrections, the board may
make rules as to the privacy of such records and their use by others than the
board and its staff. ((In determining the rules regarding dissemination of
information regarding convicted)) Sex offenders convicted of
crimes committed before July 1, 1984, who are under the board's
jurisdiction((,)) shall be subject to the determinations of the end
of sentence review committee regarding risk level and subject to sex offender
registration and community notification. The board ((shall consider the
provisions of section 116, chapter 3, Laws of 1990 and RCW 4.24.550 and))
shall be immune from liability for the release of information concerning sex
offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550.

The superintendents of
state correctional facilities and all officers and employees thereof and all
other public officials shall at all times cooperate with the board and furnish
to the board, its officers, and employees such information as may be necessary
to enable it to perform its functions, and such superintendents and other
employees shall at all times give the members of the board, its officers, and
employees free access to all prisoners confined in the state correctional facilities.

(2) Offenders
sentenced under section 303 of this act shall be subject to the determinations
of the end of sentence review committee regarding risk level and subject to sex
offender registration and community notification.

(3) The end of
sentence review committee shall make law enforcement notifications for
offenders under board jurisdiction on the same basis that it notifies law
enforcement regarding offenders sentenced under chapter 9.94A RCW for crimes
committed after July 1, 1984.

Sec. 342. RCW 9.95.190 and 1992 c
7 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of RCW
9.95.010 through 9.95.170, inclusive, shall apply to all convicted persons
serving time in a state correctional facility for crimes committed before
July 1, 1984, to the end that at all times the same provisions relating to
sentences, imprisonments, and paroles of prisoners shall apply to all inmates
thereof.

Sec. 343. RCW 9.95.250 and 1981 c
136 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to carry out
the provisions of this chapter 9.95 RCW the parole officers working under the
supervision of the secretary of corrections shall be known as ((probation
and parole)) community corrections officers.

Sec. 344. RCW 9.95.280 and 1999 c
143 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may deputize
any person (regularly employed by another state) to act as an officer and agent
of this state in effecting the return of any person convicted of a crime
committed before July 1, 1984, who has violated the terms and conditions of
parole or probation as granted by this state. In any matter relating to the
return of such a person, any agent so deputized shall have all the powers of a
police officer of this state.

Sec. 345. RCW 9.95.290 and 1955 c
183 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any deputization
pursuant to this statute with regard to an offender convicted of a crime
committed before July 1, 1984, shall be in writing and any person
authorized to act as an agent of this state pursuant hereto shall carry formal
evidence of his or her deputization and shall produce the same upon
demand.

Sec. 346. RCW 9.95.300 and 1999 c
143 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The board may enter
into contracts with similar officials of any other state or states for the
purpose of sharing an equitable portion of the cost of effecting the return of
any person who has violated the terms and conditions of parole ((or)),
probation, or community custody as granted by this state.

Sec. 347. RCW 9.95.310 and 1986 c
125 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of RCW
9.95.310 through 9.95.370 is to provide necessary assistance, other than
assistance which is authorized to be provided under the vocational
rehabilitation laws, Title 28A RCW, under the public assistance laws, Title 74
RCW or the ((department of)) employment security department or
other state agency, for parolees, inmates assigned to work/training release
facilities, discharged prisoners and persons convicted of a felony committed
before July 1, 1984, and granted probation in need and whose capacity to
earn a living under these circumstances is impaired; and to help such persons
attain self‑care and/or self-support for rehabilitation and restoration
to independence as useful citizens as rapidly as possible thereby reducing the
number of returnees to the institutions of this state to the benefit of such
person and society as a whole.

Sec. 348. RCW 9.95.320 and 1986 c
125 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of corrections or his or her designee may provide to any parolee,
inmate assigned to a work/training release facility, discharged prisoner and
persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984, and granted
probation in need and without necessary means, from any funds legally available
therefor, such reasonable sums as he or she deems necessary for the
subsistence of such person and his or her family until such person has
become gainfully employed. Such aid may be made under such terms and
conditions, and through local parole or probation officers if necessary, as the
secretary of corrections or his or her designee may require and shall be
supplementary to any moneys which may be provided under public assistance or
from any other source.

Sec. 349. RCW 9.95.340 and 1986 c
125 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Any funds
in the hands of the department of corrections, or which may come into its
hands, which belong to discharged prisoners, inmates assigned to work/training
release facilities, parolees or persons convicted of a felony and granted
probation who absconded, or whose whereabouts are unknown, shall be deposited
in the community services revolving fund. Said funds shall be used to defray
the expenses of clothing and other necessities and for transporting discharged
prisoners, inmates assigned to work/training release facilities, parolees and
persons convicted of a felony and granted probation who are without means to
secure the same. All payments disbursed from these funds shall be repaid,
whenever possible, by discharged prisoners, inmates assigned to work/training
release facilities, parolees and persons convicted of a felony and granted
probation for whose benefit they are made. Whenever any money belonging to
such persons is so paid into the revolving fund, it shall be repaid to them in
accordance with law if a claim therefor is filed with the department of
corrections within five years of deposit into said fund and upon a clear
showing of a legal right of such claimant to such money. This section
applies to persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984.

Sec. 350. RCW 9.95.350 and 1986 c
125 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

All money or other
property paid or delivered to a ((probation or parole)) community
corrections officer or employee of the department of corrections by or for
the benefit of any discharged prisoner, inmate assigned to a work/training
release facility, parolee or persons convicted of a felony and granted
probation shall be immediately transmitted to the department of corrections and
it shall enter the same upon its books to his or her credit. Such money
or other property shall be used only under the direction of the department of
corrections.

If such person
absconds, the money shall be deposited in the revolving fund created by RCW
9.95.360, and any other property, if not called for within one year, shall be
sold by the department of corrections and the proceeds credited to the
revolving fund.

If any person, files a
claim within five years after the deposit or crediting of such funds, and
satisfies the department of corrections that he or she is entitled
thereto, the department may make a finding to that effect and may make payment
to the claimant in the amount to which he or she is entitled.

This
section applies to persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984.

Sec. 351. RCW 9.95.360 and 1986 c
125 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of
corrections shall create, maintain, and administer outside the state treasury a
permanent revolving fund to be known as the "community services revolving
fund" into which shall be deposited all moneys received by it under RCW
9.95.310 through 9.95.370 and any appropriation made for the purposes of RCW
9.95.310 through 9.95.370. All expenditures from this revolving fund shall be
made by check or voucher signed by the secretary of corrections or his or
her designee. The community services revolving fund shall be deposited by
the department of corrections in such banks or financial institutions as it may
select which shall give to the department a surety bond executed by a surety
company authorized to do business in this state, or collateral eligible as
security for deposit of state funds in at least the full amount of deposit.

This
section applies to persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984.

Sec. 352. RCW 9.95.370 and 1981 c
136 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of
corrections or his or her designee shall enter into a written agreement
with every person receiving funds under RCW 9.95.310 through 9.95.370 that such
person will repay such funds under the terms and conditions in said agreement.
No person shall receive funds until such an agreement is validly made. This
section applies to persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984.

Sec. 353. RCW 9.95.900 and 1981 c
137 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the following sections of law
do not apply to any felony offense committed on or after July 1, 1984: RCW ((9.95.003,
9.95.005, 9.95.007,)) 9.95.010, 9.95.011, 9.95.013, 9.95.015, 9.95.017,
((9.95.020, 9.95.030, 9.95.031, 9.95.032,)) 9.95.040, 9.95.045,
9.95.047, 9.95.052, ((9.95.070,)) 9.95.080, ((9.95.090,))
9.95.100, ((9.95.110,)) 9.95.115, 9.95.116, 9.95.120, ((9.95.121,
9.95.122, 9.95.123,)) 9.95.124, 9.95.125, ((9.95.126,)) 9.95.130, ((9.95.140,
9.95.150, 9.95.160, 9.95.170,)) 9.95.190, 9.95.200, 9.95.204, 9.95.206,
9.95.210, 9.95.212, 9.95.214, 9.95.220, 9.95.230, 9.95.240, 9.95.250,
9.95.260, 9.95.265, 9.95.280, 9.95.290, 9.95.310, 9.95.320, 9.95.330,
9.95.340, 9.95.350, ((and)) 9.95.360, 9.95.370, 72.04A.070, and
72.04A.080.

(2) The
following sections apply to any felony offense committed before July 1, 1984,
and to any offense sentenced under section 303 of this act and committed on or
after July 1, 2001: RCW 9.95.003, 9.95.005, 9.95.007, 9.95.020, 9.95.030,
9.95.031, 9.95.032, 9.95.055, 9.95.060, 9.95.062, 9.95.063, 9.95.064, 9.95.070,
9.95.090, 9.95.110, 9.95.121, 9.95.122, 9.95.123, 9.95.126, 9.95.140, 9.95.150,
9.95.160, 9.95.170, 9.95.300, and 9.96.050.

Sec. 354. RCW 9A.28.020 and 1994 c
271 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of an attempt to commit a crime if, with intent to commit a specific
crime, he or she does any act which is a substantial step toward the
commission of that crime.

(2) If the conduct in
which a person engages otherwise constitutes an attempt to commit a crime, it
is no defense to a prosecution of such attempt that the crime charged to have
been attempted was, under the attendant circumstances, factually or legally
impossible of commission.

(3) An attempt to
commit a crime is a:

(a) Class A felony when
the crime attempted is murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
((or)) arson in the first degree, child molestation in the first
degree, indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, rape in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the first degree, or rape of a
child in the second degree;

(b) Class B felony when
the crime attempted is a class A felony other than ((murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, or arson in the first degree)) an
offense listed in (a) of this subsection;

(c) Class C felony when
the crime attempted is a class B felony;

(d) Gross misdemeanor
when the crime attempted is a class C felony;

(e) Misdemeanor when
the crime attempted is a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor.

Sec. 355. RCW 9A.36.021 and 1997 c
196 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of assault in the second degree if he or she, under circumstances not amounting
to assault in the first degree:

(a) Intentionally
assaults another and thereby recklessly inflicts substantial bodily harm; or

(b) Intentionally and
unlawfully causes substantial bodily harm to an unborn quick child by
intentionally and unlawfully inflicting any injury upon the mother of such
child; or

(c) Assaults another
with a deadly weapon; or

(d) With intent to
inflict bodily harm, administers to or causes to be taken by another, poison or
any other destructive or noxious substance; or

(e) With intent to
commit a felony, assaults another; or

(f) Knowingly inflicts
bodily harm which by design causes such pain or agony as to be the equivalent
of that produced by torture.

(2) Assault in the
second degree is a class B felony, except that assault in the second degree
with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135 is a class
A felony.

Sec. 356. RCW 9A.40.030 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.40.030 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of kidnapping in the second degree if he or she intentionally abducts
another person under circumstances not amounting to kidnapping in the first
degree.

(2) In any prosecution
for kidnapping in the second degree, it is a defense if established by the
defendant by a preponderance of the evidence that (a) the abduction does not
include the use of or intent to use or threat to use deadly force, and (b) the
actor is a relative of the person abducted, and (c) the actor's sole intent is
to assume custody of that person. Nothing contained in this paragraph shall
constitute a defense to a prosecution for, or preclude a conviction of, any
other crime.

(3) Kidnapping in the
second degree is a class B felony, except that kidnapping in the second
degree with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135 is
a class A felony.

Sec. 357. RCW 9A.44.093 and 1994 c
271 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree when: (a) The
person has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to
have, sexual intercourse with another person who is at least sixteen years old
but less than eighteen years old and not married to the perpetrator, if the
perpetrator is at least sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant
relationship to the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within that
relationship in order to engage in or cause another person under the age of
eighteen to engage in sexual intercourse with the victim; or (b) the person
is a school employee who has, or knowingly causes another person under the age
of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse with a registered student of the school
who is at least sixteen years old and not married to the employee, if the
employee is at least sixty months older than the student.

(2) Sexual misconduct
with a minor in the first degree is a class C felony.

(3) For the purposes
of this section, "school employee" means an employee of a common
school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade kindergarten through twelve
employee of a private school under chapter 28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as
a student of the common school or private school.

Sec. 358. RCW 9A.44.096 and 1994 c
271 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree when: (a) The
person has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to
have, sexual contact with another person who is at least sixteen years old but
less than eighteen years old and not married to the perpetrator, if the
perpetrator is at least sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant
relationship to the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within that
relationship in order to engage in or cause another person under the age of
eighteen to engage in sexual contact with the victim; or (b) the person is a
school employee who has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of
eighteen to have, sexual contact with a registered student of the school who is
at least sixteen years old and not married to the employee, if the employee is
at least sixty months older than the student.

(2) Sexual misconduct
with a minor in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) For the purposes
of this section, "school employee" means an employee of a common
school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade kindergarten through twelve
employee of a private school under chapter 28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as
a student of the common school or private school.

Sec. 359. RCW 9A.44.100 and 1997 c
392 s 515 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of indecent liberties when he or she knowingly causes another person who
is not his or her spouse to have sexual contact with him or her
or another:

(a) By forcible
compulsion;

(b) When the other
person is incapable of consent by reason of being mentally defective, mentally
incapacitated, or physically helpless;

(c) When the victim is
developmentally disabled and the perpetrator is a person who is not married to
the victim and who has supervisory authority over the victim;

(d) When the
perpetrator is a health care provider, the victim is a client or patient, and
the sexual contact occurs during a treatment session, consultation, interview,
or examination. It is an affirmative defense that the defendant must prove by
a preponderance of the evidence that the client or patient consented to the
sexual contact with the knowledge that the sexual contact was not for the
purpose of treatment;

(e) When the victim is
a resident of a facility for mentally disordered or chemically dependent
persons and the perpetrator is a person who is not married to the victim and
has supervisory authority over the victim; or

(f) When the victim is
a frail elder or vulnerable adult and the perpetrator is a person who is not
married to the victim and who has a significant relationship with the victim.

(2) Indecent liberties
is a class B felony, except that indecent liberties by forcible compulsion
is a class A felony.

Sec. 360. RCW 9A.76.--- and 2001 c
287 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty
of ((escape by a)) sexually violent predator escape if((,
having been committed to the department of social and health services as a
sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW, he or she:

(a) Escapes from
custody;

(b) Escapes from a
commitment facility;

(c) Escapes from a
less restrictive alternative facility; or

(d) While on
conditional release and residing in a location other than at a commitment
center or less restrictive alternative facility, leaves or remains absent from
the state of Washington without prior court authorization)):

(a) Having been
found to be a sexually violent predator and confined to the special commitment
center or another secure facility under court order, the person escapes from
the secure facility;

(b) Having been
found to be a sexually violent predator and being under an order of conditional
release, the person leaves or remains absent from the state of Washington
without prior court authorization; or

(c) Having been
found to be a sexually violent predator and being under an order of conditional
release, the person: (i) Without authorization, leaves or remains absent from
his or her residence, place of employment, educational institution, or
authorized outing; (ii) tampers with his or her electronic monitoring device or
removes it without authorization; or (iii) escapes from his or her escort.

(2) ((Escape by a))
Sexually violent predator escape is a class ((B)) A
felony with a minimum sentence of sixty months, and shall be sentenced under
section 303 of this act.

Sec. 361. RCW 9.94A.320 and 2001 c
310 s 4, 2001 c 287 s 3, 2001 c 224 s 3, 2001 c 222 s 24, and 2001 c 207 s 3
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated
Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide
by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious
explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder
1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder
2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious
explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault
1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape
1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape
of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter
1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape
2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild
Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

((Escape
by a)) Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.--- (section 1,
chapter 287, Laws of 2001, as amended by section 360, chapter ... (this
act), Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.))

Indecent
Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping
1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading
Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious
explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture
of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over
18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault
of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled
Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive
devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
(RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over
18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except
flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3
years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery
1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual
Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular
Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIIIArson
1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver
or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Hit
and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide
by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter
2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession
of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting
Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling
for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft
of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular
Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary
1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child
Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing
in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by
Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide
by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent
Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing
Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving
a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious
placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending,
bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct
(RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful
Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use
of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular
Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail
Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(((2))) (3)(a))

Bribery
(RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest
1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating
a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating
a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious
placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II
(except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft
of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful
Storage of Anhydrous Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

VAbandonment
of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing
money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail
Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(((2))) (3)(b))

Child
Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal
Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial
Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery
of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under
eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion
1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate
Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate
Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest
2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping
2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury
1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent
prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession
of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape
3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering
Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual
Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually
Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking
(RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson
2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault
2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault
by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing
a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial
Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape
1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit
and Run‑-Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit
and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent
Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing
Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious
Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or
V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential
Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery
2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft
of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats
to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use
of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular
Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment
of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault
3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault
of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail
Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(((2))) (3)(c))

Burglary
2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication
with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal
Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal
Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial
Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery
of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape
2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion
2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment
(RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating
a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing
Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining
a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious
Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture,
deliver, or possess with intent to deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled
substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing
a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury
2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession
of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession
of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting
Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities
Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering
with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone
Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft
of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful
Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful
possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful
Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Willful
Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

IIComputer
Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create,
deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape
from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health
Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious
Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession
of controlled substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or
II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft
1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five
hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking
in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful
Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed
Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

IAttempting
to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False
Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged
Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged
Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery
(RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious
Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess
Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or
Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession
of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless
Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking
Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft
2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft
of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred fifty
dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful
Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful
Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle
Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 362. RCW 72.09.370 and 1999 c
214 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall
identify offenders in confinement or partial confinement who: (a) Are
reasonably believed to be dangerous to themselves or others; and (b) have a
mental disorder. In determining an offender's dangerousness, the secretary
shall consider behavior known to the department and factors, based on research,
that are linked to an increased risk for dangerousness of mentally ill
offenders and shall include consideration of an offender's chemical dependency
or abuse.

(2) Prior to release of
an offender identified under this section, a team consisting of representatives
of the department of corrections, the division of mental health, and, as
necessary, the indeterminate sentence review board, other divisions or
administrations within the department of social and health services,
specifically including the division of alcohol and substance abuse and the
division of developmental disabilities, the appropriate regional support
network, and the providers, as appropriate, shall develop a plan, as determined
necessary by the team, for delivery of treatment and support services to the
offender upon release. The team may include a school district representative
for offenders under the age of twenty-one. The team shall consult with the
offender's counsel, if any, and, as appropriate, the offender's family and
community. The team shall notify the crime victim/witness program, which shall
provide notice to all people registered to receive notice under RCW 9.94A.155
of the proposed release plan developed by the team. Victims, witnesses, and
other interested people notified by the department may provide information and
comments to the department on potential safety risk to specific individuals or
classes of individuals posed by the specific offender. The team may recommend:
(a) That the offender be evaluated by the county designated mental health
professional, as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW; (b) department-supervised
community treatment; or (c) voluntary community mental health or chemical
dependency or abuse treatment.

(3) Prior to release of
an offender identified under this section, the team shall determine whether or
not an evaluation by a county designated mental health professional is needed.
If an evaluation is recommended, the supporting documentation shall be
immediately forwarded to the appropriate county designated mental health
professional. The supporting documentation shall include the offender's
criminal history, history of judicially required or administratively ordered
involuntary antipsychotic medication while in confinement, and any known
history of involuntary civil commitment.

(4) If an evaluation by
a county designated mental health professional is recommended by the team, such
evaluation shall occur not more than ten days, nor less than five days, prior
to release.

(5) A second evaluation
by a county designated mental health professional shall occur on the day of
release if requested by the team, based upon new information or a change in the
offender's mental condition, and the initial evaluation did not result in an
emergency detention or a summons under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(6) If the county
designated mental health professional determines an emergency detention under
chapter 71.05 RCW is necessary, the department shall release the offender only
to a state hospital or to a consenting evaluation and treatment facility. The
department shall arrange transportation of the offender to the hospital or
facility.

(7) If the county
designated mental health professional believes that a less restrictive
alternative treatment is appropriate, he or she shall seek a summons, pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW, to require the offender to appear at an
evaluation and treatment facility. If a summons is issued, the offender shall
remain within the corrections facility until completion of his or her term of
confinement and be transported, by corrections personnel on the day of
completion, directly to the identified evaluation and treatment facility.

(8) The secretary shall
adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
363. A new section is added
to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

The indeterminate
sentence review board, in fulfilling its duties under the provisions of this
act, shall be considered a parole board as that concept was treated in law
under the state's indeterminate sentencing statutes.

PART
IV

SEX OFFENDER TREATMENT PROVIDERS

Sec. 401. RCW 18.155.020 and 2000
c 171 s 33 and 2000 c 28 s 38 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter:

(1) "Certified sex
offender treatment provider" means a licensed, certified, or registered
health professional who is certified to examine and treat sex offenders
pursuant to chapters 9.94A and 13.40 RCW ((9.94A.670 and 13.40.160))
and sexually violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(4) "Sex offender
treatment provider" means a person who counsels or treats sex offenders
accused of or convicted of a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030.

Sec. 402. RCW 18.155.030 and 2000
c 171 s 34 and 2000 c 28 s 39 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) No person shall
represent himself or herself as a certified sex offender treatment provider
without first applying for and receiving a certificate pursuant to this
chapter.

(2) Only a certified
sex offender treatment provider may perform or provide the following services:

(a) Evaluations
conducted for the purposes of and pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670 and 13.40.160;

(b) Treatment of
convicted sex offenders who are sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant
to ((RCW 9.94A.670)) chapter 9.94A RCW and adjudicated juvenile
sex offenders who are ordered into treatment pursuant to ((RCW 13.40.160))
chapter 13.40 RCW;

(c) Except as
provided under subsection (3) of this section, treatment of sexually violent
predators who are conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative pursuant
to chapter 71.09 RCW.

(3) A certified sex
offender treatment provider may not perform or provide treatment of sexually
violent predators under subsection (2)(c) of this section if the certified sex
offender treatment provider has been:

(a) Convicted of a
sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Convicted in any
other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws of this state would be
classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(c) Suspended or
otherwise restricted from practicing any health care profession by competent
authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
403. A new section is added
to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A certified sex
offender treatment provider, acting in the course of his or her duties,
providing treatment to a person who has been released to a less restrictive
alternative under chapter 71.09 RCW or to a level III sex offender on community
custody as a court or department ordered condition of sentence is not negligent
because he or she treats a high risk offender; sex offenders are known to have
a risk of reoffense. The treatment provider is not liable for civil damages
resulting from the reoffense of a client unless the treatment provider's acts
or omissions constituted gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
This limited liability provision does not eliminate the treatment provider's
duty to warn of and protect from a client's threatened violent behavior if the
client communicates a serious threat of physical violence against a reasonably
ascertainable victim or victims. This limited liability provision applies only
to the conduct of certified sex offender treatment providers and not the
conduct of the state.

(2) Sex offender
treatment providers who provide services to the department of corrections by
identifying risk factors and notifying the department of risks for the subset
of high risk offenders who are not amenable to treatment and who are under
court order for treatment or supervision are practicing within the scope of
their profession.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
404. A new section is added
to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Examinations and
treatment of sexually violent predators who are conditionally released to a
less restrictive alternative under this chapter shall be conducted only by sex
offender treatment providers certified by the department of health under
chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court or the department of social and health
services finds that: (a) The court-ordered less restrictive alternative
placement is located in another state; (b) the treatment provider is employed
by the department; or (c)(i) all certified treatment providers become
unavailable to provide treatment within a reasonable geographic distance of the
person's home, as determined in rules adopted by the department of social and
health services; and (ii) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with the
rules adopted by the department of social and health services.

A treatment provider
approved by the department of social and health services under (c) of this
subsection, who is not certified by the department of health, shall consult
with a certified provider during the person's period of treatment to ensure
compliance with the rules adopted by the department of health. The frequency
and content of the consultation shall be based on the recommendation of the
certified provider.

(2) A treatment
provider, whether or not he or she is employed or approved by the department of
social and health services under subsection (1) of this section or otherwise
certified, may not perform or provide treatment of sexually violent predators
under this section if the treatment provider has been:

(a) Convicted of a sex
offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Convicted in any
other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws of this state would be
classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(c) Suspended or
otherwise restricted from practicing any health care profession by competent
authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction.

(3) Nothing in this
section prohibits a qualified expert from examining or evaluating a sexually
violent predator who has been conditionally released for purposes of presenting
an opinion in court proceedings.

PART
V

TECHNICAL PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 9.95.0011 (Indeterminate sentence
review board--Report--Recommendation of governor) and 1997 c 350 s 1, 1989 c
259 s 4, & 1986 c 224 s 12; and

(2) RCW 9.95.145 (Sex offenders--Release of
information--Classification of offenders) and 1997 c 364 s 5 & 1990 c 3 s
127.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. The secretary of
corrections, the secretary of social and health services, and the indeterminate
sentence review board may adopt rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. (1) Sections 301 through
363 of this act shall not affect the validity of any sentence imposed under any
other law for any offense committed before, on, or after the effective date of
this section.

(2) Sections 301 through
363 of this act shall apply to offenses committed on or after the effective
date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 505. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for sections 301 through 363 and 501 of this act which take
effect September 1, 2001.

---
END ---