BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.30 RCW to read as follows:

For the primary, a
ballot will be created for each major political party containing only that
major political party's candidates for partisan office, including candidates
for precinct committee officer under RCW 29.42.040. In addition, a separate
ballot containing minor party candidates and independent candidates for
partisan office will be created.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.30 RCW to read as follows:

For the primary, all
major political party ballots and the minor party and independent candidate
ballot will contain the names of all candidates for nonpartisan office and any
ballot measures that have been properly certified for the ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each major
political party may require that the secretary of state adopt rules to provide
for any declaration of party affiliation required by that party.

(2) The secretary of
state shall adopt rules in accordance with this title and chapter 34.05 RCW to
provide for any declaration required by a major political party and to provide
for uniformity in primary ballot preparation and the recording of voter party
affiliation.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.42.040 and 1990 c
59 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

Any member of a major
political party who is a registered voter in the precinct may upon payment of a
fee of one dollar file his or her declaration of candidacy as prescribed under
RCW 29.15.010 with the county auditor for the office of precinct committee
officer of his or her party in that precinct. When elected the precinct
committee officer shall serve so long as the committee officer remains an
eligible voter in that precinct and until a successor has been elected at the
next ensuing state ((general election)) primary in the
even-numbered year.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.42.050 and 1991 c
363 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The statutory requirements
for filing as a candidate at the primaries shall apply to candidates for
precinct committee officer ((except that the filing period for this office
alone shall be extended to and include the Friday immediately following the
last day for political parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by
RCW 29.18.150, and the office shall not be voted upon at the primaries, but the
names of all candidates must appear under the proper party and office
designations on the ballot for the general November election for each
even-numbered year)), and the ((one)) precinct committee
officer candidate receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared
elected: PROVIDED, That to be declared elected, a candidate must receive at
least ten percent of the number of votes cast for the candidate of the
candidate's party receiving the greatest number of votes in the precinct. Any
person elected to the office of precinct committee officer who has not filed a
declaration of candidacy shall pay the fee of one dollar to the county auditor
for a certificate of election. The term of office of precinct committee
officer shall be for two years, commencing upon completion of the official
canvass of votes by the county canvassing board of election returns. Should
any vacancy occur in this office by reason of death, resignation, or
disqualification of the incumbent, or because of failure to elect, the
respective county chair of the county central committee shall be empowered to
fill such vacancy by appointment: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in legislative
districts having a majority of its precincts in a county with a population of
one million or more, such appointment shall be made only upon the
recommendation of the legislative district chair: PROVIDED, That the person so
appointed shall have the same qualifications as candidates when filing for
election to such office for such precinct: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when a
vacancy in the office of precinct committee officer exists because of failure
to elect at a state ((general election)) primary, such vacancy
shall not be filled until after the organization meeting of the county central
committee and the new county chair selected as provided by RCW 29.42.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 29.51 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When a voter is
signing the precinct list in order to cast a ballot at a primary, the precinct
election officials shall allow the voter to select either a ballot for one of
the major political parties or a ballot that includes minor political party and
independent candidates. A voter may not cast more than one ballot.

(2) The precinct list
will contain by each voter's name and address a list of signature boxes for
each major political party and for the minor political party and independent
candidate ballot. Next to each signature box will be any statement of party
affiliation as submitted by the major political parties. No voter may receive
a ballot before signing the declaration of party affiliation if required by the
political party.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 29.27 RCW to read as follows:

At least forty-eight
hours before the certification of election results, each precinct list
detailing the party ballot that each voter selected must be sent by electronic
facsimile to the state chair of each major political party.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. RCW 29.18.200 (Blanket primary
authorized) and 1990 c 59 s 88 & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.200 are each repealed.

---
END ---