BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) A budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the
several amounts specified in parts I through VIII of this act, or so much
thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages, and other
expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for other specified
purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30,
2003, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of the state
hereinafter named.

(2) Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this act.

(a) "Fiscal year
2002" or "FY 2002" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002.

(b) "Fiscal year
2003" or "FY 2003" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003.

(c) "FTE"
means full time equivalent.

(d) "Lapse"
or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated
status.

(e) "Provided
solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified
purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of
an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is unnecessary to
fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
101. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 28,313,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 28,497,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 56,855,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to
Project Citizen, a program of the national conference of state legislatures to
promote student civic involvement.

(2) $15,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
for the legislature to continue the services of expert counsel on legal and
policy issues relating to services for persons with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. FOR THE SENATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 22,863,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 23,999,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 45,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 46,907,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for allocation to
Project Citizen, a program of the national conference of state legislatures to
promote student civic involvement.

(2) $15,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
for the legislature to continue the services of expert counsel on legal and
policy issues relating to services for persons with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT
AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,736,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,238,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,974,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct an
evaluation of the client outcomes of the high school transition program
operated by the department of social and health services division of
developmental disabilities. The study shall identify the different approaches
that have been used in providing transition services and whether some
approaches are more or less successful in helping young adults with
developmental disabilities achieve greater levels of independence. The study
shall evaluate how transition programs reduce the level of support provided to
clients as they achieve greater levels of independence, and shall be submitted
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002.

(2) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a capacity
planning study of the capital facilities of the state school for the deaf. The
committee's study shall be carried out in conjunction with the study of
educational service delivery models conducted by the state institute for public
policy. The study shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 30, 2002.

(3) $35,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for
the joint legislative audit and review committee to conduct a review of water
conservancy boards. The review shall include an assessment of the operating
costs of existing boards; the sources of funding for board operations; sources
of in-kind support for board operations; assessment of the value of water
rights subject to change or transfer decisions; the range of costs of
processing water right transfer applications by the boards as well as by the
department of ecology for applications filed directly with the department; the
costs to the department of training, assistance, and review of board
recommendations on applications; board membership and board recordkeeping; and
public participation procedures for both the water conservancy boards and the
department of ecology. The committee shall submit its review by January 1,
2003, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(4) $40,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for a
follow-up review to report number 98-3, the performance audit of the department
of corrections. The follow-up study shall include but not be limited to a
review of:

(a) Community
supervision activities performed by the department;

(b) The implementation
of risk-based classification and community placement models;

(c) The early implementation
of the offender accountability act; and

(d) The cost impacts of
the risk-based models and the offender accountability act.

The committee shall
consult with the Washington state institute for public policy regarding data
and findings from the institute's current studies on these issues. A report of
the follow-up study shall be submitted to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 21, 2001. Upon the completion of the
follow-up review, the committee shall make a determination whether an
additional phase of study is needed. If further study is indicated, the
committee shall submit to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature its plan and cost estimate for such study by March 29, 2002.

(5) $140,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided for a
study of children's mental health in Washington. The study shall include but
not be limited to:

(a) A review of plans
and services for children, including those for early periodic screening,
diagnosis, and treatment;

(b) A review of the
implementation of the plans;

(c) A review of the
availability and reliability of fiscal, program, and outcome data relating to
mental health services provided to children; and

(d) A survey of mental
health services for children among the state's regional support networks.

The committee shall
make recommendations, as appropriate, for the improvement of services and
system performance, including the need for performance and client outcome
measures. The committee may contract for consulting services in conducting the
study. The committee shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by July 1, 2002.

(6) $300,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $300,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a performance audit of school district compliance with state and
federal regulations concerning special education. The audit will focus on
determining the extent throughout the state to which (a) students are
appropriately evaluated as being initially eligible for and retaining their
eligibility in special education; (b) students' individual education programs
(IEP's) reflect their initial and continuing evaluations; (c) special education
students are receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with their
IEP's; and (d) special education students are being properly counted for
purposes of state and federal funding. As part of its focus on compliance, the
audit shall quantify the statewide fiscal impact of district noncompliance with
regulations. The performance audit shall further evaluate and make
recommendations on the kind and extent of auditing and monitoring functions
that are needed to ensure that (a) the full amount of state and federal funds
are recovered when districts are out of compliance with regulations, and (b)
district corrective action plans are developed so as to avoid future
noncompliance. The committee may contract for consulting services for all or
any part of this performance audit. A final report shall be provided to the
legislature no later than September 1, 2003. Interim findings shall be
submitted by September 30, 2002.

(7) Within the amounts
provided in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall conduct a study of the Washington management service. The study shall
include findings regarding (a) growth in the number of positions in the
Washington management service, (b) growth in salary levels and structure since
the Washington management service's inception, and (c) other compensation
practices used within the Washington management service. The department of
personnel shall cooperate with the committee in conducting the study and
provide information as requested by the committee. The committee shall provide
a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2001.

(8) Within the amounts
provided in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall review all aspects of the mental health prevalence study completed in
accordance with section 204 of this act, including but not limited to the
contractor selection process, if any; the study design and workplan; the
implementation of the study; and the draft and final reports.

(9) The committee shall
study and report on pipeline safety as provided in section 149 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
104. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION
AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,329,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,462,000

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation...................... ........ $ 203,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,994,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
105. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
ACTUARY

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,923,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
106. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE
SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,421,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 7,043,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 13,464,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,909,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,038,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,947,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $41,000
of the general fund fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $43,000 of the general
fund fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely for the uniform legislation
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
108. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve operating efficiencies
within the financial resources available to the legislative branch, the
executive rules committee of the house of representatives and the facilities
and operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds among
the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review
committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
legislative transportation committee, office of the state actuary, joint
legislative systems committee, and statute law committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
109. FOR THE SUPREME COURT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 5,423,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 5,510,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 10,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
110. FOR THE LAW LIBRARY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,982,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,983,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,965,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
111. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 12,746,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 12,878,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 25,624,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $505,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $606,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for lease increases associated with the division I facility. Within the
funds provided in this subsection, the court of appeals shall conduct a space
planning study exploring options dealing with remodeling existing space to
accommodate needs and evaluating the cost and benefits of moving to another
location.

(2) $168,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $159,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for providing compensation adjustments to nonjudicial staff of the court
of appeals. Within the funds provided in this subsection, the court of appeals
shall determine the specific positions to receive compensation adjustments
based on recruitment and retention difficulties, new duties or responsibilities
assigned, and salary inversion or compression within the court of appeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
112. FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL
CONDUCT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 955,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 969,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,924,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
113. FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 14,247,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 14,386,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 29,634,000

Judicial Information
Systems Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 27,758,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 86,025,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in
the judicial information systems account appropriation shall be used for the
operations and maintenance of technology systems that improve services provided
by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the office of public defense, and
the administrator for the courts.

(2) No moneys
appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for the
courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. As required by Article
IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's Opinion
No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of these employer
contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or counties
in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall continue to implement
procedures for the collection and disbursement of these employer
contributions. During each fiscal year in the 2001-03 biennium, the office of
the administrator for the courts shall send written notice to the office of
community development in the department of community, trade, and economic
development when each county pays its fifty percent share for the year.

(3) $223,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
gender and justice commission.

(4) $308,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
minority and justice commission.

(5) $278,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $285,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $263,000 of
the public safety and education account appropriation are provided solely for
the workload associated with tax warrants and other state cases filed in
Thurston county.

(6) $750,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $750,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for court-appointed special advocates in dependency matters. The
administrator for the courts, after consulting with the association of juvenile
court administrators and the association of court-appointed special
advocate/guardian ad litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer
court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution
of funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally accessible
to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs.
The administrator for the courts shall not retain more than six percent of
total funding to cover administrative or any other agency costs.

(7) $750,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for judicial program enhancements. Within the funding provided in this
subsection, the administrator for the courts, in consultation with the supreme
court, shall determine the program or programs to receive an enhancement.
Among the programs that may be funded from the amount provided in this
subsection are unified family courts.

(8) $1,618,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for increases for juror pay. The office of the administrator for the
courts may contract with local governments to provide additional juror pay. The
contract shall provide that the local government is responsible for the first
ten dollars of juror compensation for each day or partial day of jury service,
and the state shall reimburse the local government for any additional
compensation, excluding the first day, up to a maximum of fifteen dollars per
day.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
114. FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 600,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,626,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 13,226,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $233,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing constitutionally
mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

(2) $51,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of chapter 303, Laws of 1999 (court funding).

(3) Amounts provided
from the public safety and education account appropriation in this section
include funding for investigative services in death penalty personal restraint
petitions.

(4) The entire general
fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of a
dependency and termination legal representation funding pilot program.

(a) The goal of the
pilot program shall be to enhance the quality of legal representation in
dependency and termination hearings, thereby reducing the number of
continuances requested by contract attorneys, including those based on the
unavailability of defense counsel. To meet the goal, the pilot shall include
the following components:

(i) A maximum caseload
requirement of 90 dependency and termination cases per full-time attorney;

(ii) Implementation of
enhanced defense attorney practice standards, including but not limited to
those related to reasonable case preparation and the delivery of adequate
client advice, as developed by Washington state public defense attorneys and
included in the office of public defense December 1999 report Costs of
Defense and Children's Representation in Dependency and Termination Hearings;

(iii) Use of
investigative and expert services in appropriate cases; and

(iv) Effective
implementation of indigency screening of all dependency and termination
parents, guardians, and legal custodians represented by appointed counsel.

(b) The pilot program
shall be established in one eastern and one western Washington juvenile court.

(c) The director shall
contract for an independent evaluation of the pilot program benefits and
costs. A final evaluation shall be submitted to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature no later than February 1, 2002.

(d) The chair of the
office of public defense advisory committee shall appoint an implementation
committee to:

(i) Develop criteria
for a statewide program to improve dependency and termination defense;

(ii) Examine caseload
impacts to the courts resulting from improved defense practices; and

(iii) Identify methods
for the efficient use of expert services and means by which parents may
effectively access services.

If sufficient funds are
available, the office of public defense shall contract with the Washington
state institute for public policy to research how reducing dependency and
termination case delays affects foster care and to identify factors that are
reducing the number of family reunifications that occur in dependency and
termination cases.

(5) $50,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the evaluation required in chapter 92, Laws of 2000 (DNA testing).

(6) $235,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the office of public defense to contract with an existing public
defender association to establish a capital defense assistance center.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
115. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,537,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,524,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 219,000

Water Quality Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,908,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 13,188,000

The appropriations in this
section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $3,204,000 of
the water quality account appropriation and $209,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for the Puget Sound water quality action team
to implement the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items PSAT-01 through
PSAT-05.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
116. FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 449,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 451,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
117. FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,910,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,903,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,813,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
118. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002) ........ $ 10,513,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 8,707,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 7,295,000

Archives and Records
Management Account‑-Private/

Local Appropriation............................. $ 3,860,000

Department of Personnel
Service Account

Appropriation................................... $ 719,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 31,094,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,296,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election
costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures.
Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs that the
secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.

(2) $2,193,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,712,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the verification of initiative and referendum petitions, maintenance
of related voter registration records, and the publication and distribution of
the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(3) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW 29.27.072.

(4)(a) $1,944,004 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,986,772
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce
gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events
of statewide significance during the 2001-2003 biennium. An eligible nonprofit
organization must be formed solely for the purpose of, and be experienced in,
providing gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations
and other events of statewide significance and must have received a
determination of tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code. The funding level for each year of the contract shall
be based on the amount provided in this subsection and adjusted to reflect the
implicit price deflator for the previous year. The nonprofit organization
shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution.
The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all
criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(b) The legislature
finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure
continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that
purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a four-year contract with the
nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage through June 30,
2006.

(c) The nonprofit
organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial
statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success
of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d) No portion of any
amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or
indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i) Attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the
state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision
of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of
any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;

(ii) Making
contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii) Providing any:
(A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a
public officer or employee.

(5)(a) $149,316 of the
archives and records management‑-state appropriation and $597,266 of the
archives and records management‑-private/local appropriation are provided
solely for the construction of an eastern regional archives. The amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse if:

(i) The financing
contract for the construction of an eastern regional archives building is not
authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal biennium; or

(ii) Substitute House
Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on county auditor recording fees) is
not enacted by June 30, 2001.

(b) $613,879 of the
archives and records management‑-state appropriation and $463,102 of the
archives and records management‑-private/local appropriation are provided
solely for the design and establishment of an electronic data archive,
including the acquisition of hardware and software. The amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse if:

(i) The financing
contract for acquisition of technology hardware and software for the electronic
data archive is not authorized in the capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal
biennium; or

(ii) Substitute House
Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on county auditor recording fees) is
not enacted by June 30, 2001.

(6) If the financing
contract for expansion of the state records center is not authorized in the
capital budget for fiscal biennium 2001-03, then $641,000 of the archives and
records management account‑-state appropriation shall lapse.

(7) $867,000 of the
archives and records management account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for operation of the central microfilming bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
119. FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF
INDIAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 269,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 551,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
120. FOR THE COMMISSION ON
ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 233,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 233,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
121. FOR THE STATE TREASURER

State Treasurer's Service
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
122. FOR THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 856,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 20,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 876,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: On
January 1, 2003, any unspent portions of this appropriation shall be deposited
in the common school construction fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
123. FOR THE STATE AUDITOR

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,068,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,144,000

State Auditing Services
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation............ ................. $ 13,540,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 15,752,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Audits of school
districts by the division of municipal corporations shall include findings
regarding the accuracy of: (a) Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience
and education of the district's certified instructional staff, as reported to
the superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.

(2) $910,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $910,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school
district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district
program audits of state funded public school programs; establish the specific
amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the
amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.

(3) $290,000 of the
general fund-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $120,000 of the
general fund-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are for the state auditor
to conduct a performance and financial audit of the port of Seattle third
runway project. The audit shall: (a) Review and document the financial
history of the project; (b) evaluate the performance measures used by the port
of Seattle for the project; (c) evaluate the current project schedule and cost
estimates; (d) review the sources of funding and evaluate the adequacy of
funding necessary to complete the project; (e) evaluate the effect of project
costs on the competitive operation of Seattle-Tacoma international airport and
development of future regional airport facilities; and (f) identify and
evaluate emerging regional and state issues that may affect the project's
scope, budget or schedule.

(4) The audit shall be
performed in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards
as promulgated by the United States general accounting office. The auditor may
contract for consulting services in carrying out this audit. Upon completion
of the audit, the auditor shall report the findings to the appropriate
legislative committees by November 20, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
124. FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON
SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 80,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 152,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 232,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
125. FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,811,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,806,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,868,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,789,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 277,000

New Motor Vehicle
Arbitration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,163,000

Legal Services Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 146,348,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 162,062,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The attorney
general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and
actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The
report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days
after the end of each fiscal year.

(2) The attorney
general and the office of financial management shall modify the attorney
general billing system to meet the needs of user agencies for greater
predictability, timeliness, and explanation of how legal services are being
used by the agency. The attorney general shall provide the following
information each month to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The full-time
equivalent attorney services provided for the month; (b) the full-time
equivalent investigator services provided for the month; (c) the full-time
equivalent paralegal services provided for the month; and (d) direct legal
costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged to the agency for the month.

(3) Prior to entering
into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state, that exceeds five
million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of financial
management and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
126. FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST
COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 631,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 619,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
127. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 70,412,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 70,352,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 173,342,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 7,980,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,800,000

Public Works Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,911,000

Film and Video Promotion
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,000

Building Code Council
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,061,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,777,000

Low-Income Weatherization
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,292,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 6,081,000

Manufactured Home
Installation Training Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 256,000

Community Economic
Development Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 113,000

Washington Housing Trust
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,597,000

Public Facility
Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 550,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 352,549,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature that the department of community, trade, and economic
development receive separate programmatic allotments for the office of
community development and the office of trade and economic development. Any
appropriation made to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of either office
shall be credited to the appropriate office.

(2) $3,085,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,085,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a contract with the Washington technology center. For work
essential to the mission of the Washington technology center and conducted in
partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any increased indirect
rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the absolute amount paid
during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium.

(3) $61,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $62,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item
OCD-01.

(4) $10,403,445 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for the drug
control and system improvement formula grant program, to be distributed in
state fiscal year 2002 as follows:

(a) $3,603,250 to local
units of government to continue multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(b) $620,000 to the
department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program in support of
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c) $1,363,000 to the
Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and supervisory
support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d) $200,000 to the
department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e) $991,000 to the
department of social and health services, division of alcohol and substance
abuse, for drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f) $302,551 to the
department for training and technical assistance of public defenders
representing clients with special needs;

(g) $88,000 to the
department to continue a substance abuse treatment in jails program, to test
the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h) $697,075 to the
department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i) $903,000 to the
department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation
administration, to continue youth violence prevention and intervention
projects;

(j) $60,000 to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to complete the state and
local components of the national incident-based reporting system;

(k) $60,000 to the
department for community-based advocacy services to victims of violent crime,
other than sexual assault and domestic violence;

(l) $91,000 to the
department to continue the governor's council on substance abuse;

(m) $99,000 to the
department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant programs;

(n) $500,469 to the
office of financial management for criminal history records improvement; and

(o) $825,100 to the
department for required grant administration, monitoring, and reporting on
Byrne formula grant programs.

These amounts represent
the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each program. No program may
expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this subsection.
If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this subsection become available,
whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the
department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and applied to
the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs and projects in the
succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget request for the succeeding year,
the department shall estimate and request authority to spend any funds
remaining in reserve as a result of this subsection.

(5) $470,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $470,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for rural economic development activities including $200,000 for the
Washington manufacturing service, and $100,000 for business retention and
expansion.

(6) $1,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,250,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters for homeless families
with children.

(7) $2,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to operate transitional housing for homeless families with
children. The grants may also be used to make partial payments for rental
assistance.

(8) $1,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,250,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for consolidated emergency assistance to homeless families with children.

(9) $205,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $205,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to Washington Columbia river gorge counties to implement
their responsibilities under the national scenic area management plan. Of this
amount, $390,000 is provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is provided for
Clark county.

(10) $698,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $698,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $1,101,000 of
the administrative contingency account appropriation are provided solely for
contracting with associate development organizations to maintain existing
programs.

(11) $600,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for sexual
assault prevention and treatment programs.

(12) $680,000 of the
Washington housing trust account appropriation is provided solely to conduct a
pilot project designed to lower infrastructure costs for residential
development.

(13) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided to
the department solely for providing technical assistance to developers of
housing for farmworkers.

(14) $370,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $371,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $25,000 of
the film and video promotion account appropriation are provided solely for the
film office to bring film and video production to Washington state.

(15) $22,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $23,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely as a matching grant to support the Washington state senior
games. State funding shall be matched with at least an equal amount of private
or local governmental funds.

(16) $500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to food banks and food distribution centers to increase their
ability to accept, store, and deliver perishable food.

(17) $230,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $230,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and the entire
community economic development account appropriation are provided solely for
support of the developmental disabilities endowment governing board and startup
costs of the endowment program. Startup costs are a loan from the state
general fund and will be repaid from funds within the program as determined by
the governing board. The governing board may use state appropriations to
implement a sliding-scale fee waiver for families earning below 150 percent of
the state median family income. The director of the department, or the
director of the subsequent department of community development, may implement
fees to support the program as provided under RCW 43.330.152.

(18) $380,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
community-based legal advocates to assist sexual assault victims with both
civil and criminal justice issues. If Senate Bill No. 5309 is not enacted by
June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(19) $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a contract with a food distribution program for communities in the
southwestern portion of the state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon
fishing closures and reductions. The department may not charge administrative
overhead or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.

(20) $120,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $120,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely as one-time pass-through funding to currently licensed
overnight youth shelters.

(21) Repayments of
outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600, the mortgage and rental
assistance program, shall be remitted to the department, including any current
revolving account balances. The department shall contract with a lender or
contract collection agent to act as a collection agent of the state. The
lender or contract collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding
loans, and deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the account
may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and shall be
considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the state. Repayments of
loans granted under this chapter shall be made to the lender or contract
collection agent as long as the loan is outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal
of the chapter.

(22) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the community connections program in Walla Walla.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
128. FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE
FORECAST COUNCIL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 512,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 514,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,026,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
129. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 12,456,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 12,024,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,657,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account‑‑State
Appropriation............... $ 229,000

State Auditing Services
Revolving

Account‑‑State
Appropriation............... $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 48,391,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
office of financial management shall review policies and procedures regarding
purchasing of information technology upgrades by state agencies. Information technology
upgrades include replacement workstations, network equipment, operating systems
and application software. The review shall document existing policies and
procedures, and shall compare alternative upgrade policies that reduce the
overall cost to state government for maintaining adequate information
technology to meet the existing business needs of state agencies. Findings and
recommendations from this review shall be reported to appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
130. FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS

Administrative Hearings
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 21,938,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 17,297,000

Higher Education Personnel
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,636,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,933,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
department of personnel may charge agencies through the data processing
revolving account up to $561,000 in fiscal year 2002 to study the development
of a new personnel and payroll system. Funding to cover these expenses shall
be realized from agency FICA savings associated with the pretax benefits
contributions plans. Funding is subject to section 902 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
132. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY

Lottery Administrative
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 22,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
133. FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC
AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 226,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 234,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
134. FOR THE COMMISSION ON
AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 211,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 209,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
135. FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD

Department of Personnel
Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,679,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-OPERATIONS

Dependent Care
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 378,000

Department of Retirement
Systems Expense Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 49,244,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 49,622,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for support of the information systems project known as the electronic
document image management system.

(2) $120,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely for locating inactive members entitled to retirement benefits.

(3) $117,000 of the department
of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided solely for
modifications to the retirement information systems to accommodate tracking of
postretirement employment on an hourly basis.

(4) $440,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account is provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5143 (Washington state patrol
retirement systems plan 2).

(5) $6,420,000 of the
department of retirement systems expense account is provided solely for the
implementation of public employees' retirement system plan 3 (chapter 247, Laws
of 2000).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
137. FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD

State Investment Board
Expense Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,876,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
138. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 72,820,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 77,929,000

Timber Tax Distribution
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,981,000

Waste
Education/Recycling/Litter Control‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 101,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 67,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 155,912,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$269,000 of the general
fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $49,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to establish and provide staff support to a committee on taxation to
study the elasticity, equity, and adequacy of the state's tax system.

(1) The committee shall
consist of eleven members. The department shall appoint six academic scholars
from the fields of economics, taxation, business administration, public
administration, public policy, and other relevant disciplines as determined by
the department, after consulting with the majority and minority leaders in the
senate, the co-speakers in the house of representatives, the chair of the ways
and means committee in the senate, and the co-chairs of the finance committee
in the house of representatives. The governor and the chairs of the majority
and minority caucuses in each house of the legislature shall each appoint one
member to the committee. These appointments may be legislative members. The
members of the committee shall either elect a voting chair from among their
membership or a nonvoting chair who is not a member of the committee. Members
of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) The purpose of the
study is to determine how well the current tax system functions and how it
might be changed to better serve the citizens of the state in the twenty-first
century. In reviewing options for changes to the tax system, the committee
shall develop multiple alternatives to the existing tax system. To the extent
possible, the alternatives shall be designed to increase the harmony between
the tax system of this state and the surrounding states, encourage commerce and
business creation, and encourage home ownership. In developing alternatives,
the committee shall examine and consider the effects of tax incentives,
including exemptions, deferrals, and credits. The alternatives shall range
from incremental improvements in the current tax structure to complete
replacement of the tax structure. In conducting the study, the committee shall
examine the tax structures of other states and review previous studies
regarding tax reform in this state. In developing alternatives, the committee
shall be guided by administrative simplicity, economic neutrality, fairness,
stability, and transparency. Most of the alternatives presented by the
committee to the legislature shall be revenue neutral and contain no income
tax.

(3) The department
shall create an advisory group to include, but not be limited to,
representatives of business, state agencies, local governments, labor,
taxpayers, and other advocacy groups. The group shall provide advice and
assistance to the committee.

(4) The committee shall
present a final report of its findings and alternatives to the ways and means
committee in the senate and the finance committee in the house of
representatives by November 30, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
139. FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,193,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,038,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
140. FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH
COUNCIL

City and Town Research
Services Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,814,000

County Research Services
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 761,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
141. FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND
WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

OMWBE Enterprises Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
142. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 549,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 630,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,930,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 444,000

State Capitol Vehicle
Parking Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 154,000

General Administration
Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 41,419,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 45,126,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall conduct a review of the ultimate purchasing system to evaluate the
following: (a) The degree to which program objectives and assumptions were
achieved; (b) the degree to which planned schedule of phases, tasks, and
activities were accomplished; (c) an assessment of estimated and actual costs
of each phase; (d) an assessment of project cost recovery/cost avoidance,
return on investment, and measurable outcomes as each relate to the agency's
business functions and other agencies' business functions; and (e) the degree
to which integration with the agency and state information technology
infrastructure was achieved. The department will receive written input from
participating pilot agencies that describes measurable organizational benefits
and cost avoidance opportunities derived from use of the ultimate purchasing
system. The performance review shall be submitted to the office of financial management
and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by July 1, 2002.

(2) $60,000 of the
general administration services account appropriation is provided solely for
costs associated with the development of the information technology
architecture to link the risk management information system and the tort
division's case management system, and the reconciliation of defense cost
reimbursement information.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
143. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION SERVICES

Data Processing Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,706,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Fifteen independent
private, nonprofit colleges, located in Washington state, have requested
connection to the K-20 educational telecommunications network. These K-20
connections shall be provided to the private schools on a full cost
reimbursement basis, net of the value of services and information provided by
the private institutions, based on criteria approved by the K-20 board.

(2) Some private K-12
schools have requested limited "pilot connections" to the K-20
network to test the technical and economic feasibility of one or more
connection models. These K-20 connections shall be provided to the private
K-12 schools on a full cost reimbursement basis, net of the value of services
and information provided by the private K-12 schools based on criteria approved
by the K-20 board.

(3) In the 2001-03
biennium, the department shall incorporate statewide elements for a common
technology infrastructure into the state strategic information technology plan
that state agencies shall then use in establishing individual agency business
applications.

(4) The department
shall implement the $10,800,000 service rate reduction it proposed on August
14, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
144. FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 622,000

Insurance Commissioners
Regulatory Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 29,053,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 29,675,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $693,000
of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is provided
solely for moving and renovation costs associated with the colocation of the
agency's Olympia-area facilities. Expenditures from this amount shall be
subject to the approval of the department of general administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
145. FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified Public
Accountants' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,716,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $355,000
of the certified public accountants' account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593 (public
accountancy act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, this amount
shall lapse. During fiscal years 2002 and 2003, the board is authorized to
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor pursuant to RCW 43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
146. FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION
COUNCIL

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 276,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000
of the death investigation account appropriation is provided solely for
providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death
investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for
awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
147. FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION

Horse Racing Commission
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,504,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
148. FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,483,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,484,000

Liquor Control Board
Construction and Maintenance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 8,114,000

Liquor Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 142,148,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 153,229,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,573,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the agency
information technology upgrade. This amount provided in this subsection is
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

(2) $4,803,000 of the
liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the costs
associated with the development and implementation of a merchandising business
system. Expenditures of any funds for this system are conditioned upon the
approval of the merchandising business system's feasibility study by the
information services board. The amount provided in this subsection is also
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
149. FOR THE UTILITIES AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Public Service Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 27,108,000

Pipeline Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,305,000

Pipeline Safety Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 822,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 31,235,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,011,000 of the
pipeline safety account‑-state appropriation and $822,000 of the pipeline
safety account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (pipeline safety). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(2) $294,000 of the
pipeline safety account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for an
interagency agreement with the joint legislative audit and review committee for
a report on hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs. The committee
shall review staff use, inspection activity, fee methodology, and costs of the
hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety programs and report to the appropriate
legislative committees by July 1, 2003. The report shall include a comparison
of interstate and intrastate programs, including but not limited to the number
and complexity of regular and specialized inspections, mapping requirements for
each program, and allocation of administrative costs to each program. If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (pipeline safety) is not enacted by June 30,
2001, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
150. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER
FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer Firefighters'
Relief and Pension

Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
151. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 9,165,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 8,979,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 22,509,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 234,000

Enhanced 911 Account‑-State
Appropriation...... $ 16,544,000

Disaster Response Account‑-State
Appropriation. $ 582,000

Disaster Response Account‑-Federal
Appropriation $ 3,392,000

Worker and Community Right
to Know Fund‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 283,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 37,884,000

Nisqually Earthquake
Account‑‑Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 157,795,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 257,367,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $582,000 of the
disaster response account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
state share of response and recovery costs associated with federal emergency
management agency (FEMA) disasters approved in the 1999-01 biennium budget.
The military department may, upon approval of the director of financial
management, use portions of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation to offset costs of new disasters occurring before June 30, 2003.
The military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing disaster
costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from
the previous estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total
remaining costs to be paid; and (d) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by individual disaster, by fund, and by
type of assistance. The military department shall also submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees
detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund
balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end
of the 2001-03 biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.

(2) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of the conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter
28B.103 RCW.

(3) $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5256 (emergency management
compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $35,000 of the
general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $35,000 of
the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided
solely for the north county emergency medical service.

(5) $1,374,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation and $3,861,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for the military department's costs associated with coordinating the state's
response to the February 28, 2001, earthquake.

(6) $1,347,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation and $5,359,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for mitigation costs associated with the earthquake for state and local
agencies. Of the amount from the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state
appropriation, $898,000 is provided for the state matching share for state
agencies and $449,000 is provided for one-half of the local matching share for
local entities. The amount provided for the local matching share constitutes a
revenue distribution for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).

(7) $35,163,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-state appropriation and $148,575,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for public assistance costs associated with the earthquake for state and local
agencies. Of the amount from the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state
appropriation, $20,801,000 is provided for the state matching share for state
agencies and $14,362,000 is provided for one-half of the local matching share
for local entities. The amount provided for the local matching share
constitutes a revenue distribution for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1). Upon
approval of the director of the office of financial management, the military
department may use portions of the Nisqually earthquake account‑-state
appropriations to cover other response and recovery costs associated with the
Nisqually earthquake that are not eligible for federal emergency management
agency reimbursement. The military department is to submit a quarterly report
detailing the costs authorized under this subsection to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
152. FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT
RELATIONS COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,154,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,164,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
153. FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS
BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,497,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,506,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,003,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
154. FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND
TRADE CENTER

State Convention and Trade
Center Operating

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 37,848,000

State Convention and Trade
Center Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 29,886,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ 67,734,000

(End
of part)

PART
II

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services
shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment
modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this
act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for
other than that purpose, except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

(2) The department of
social and health services shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the
office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees.
As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes
block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(3) The appropriations
to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended
for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act.

(4) In the event the
department receives additional unrestricted federal funds or achieves savings
in excess of that anticipated in this act, the department shall use up to
$5,000,000 of such funds to initiate a pilot project providing integrated
support services to homeless individuals needing mental health services,
alcohol or substance abuse treatment, medical care, or who demonstrate
community safety concerns. Before such a pilot project is initiated, the
department shall notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the plans
for such a pilot project including the source of funds to be used.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 225,789,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 239,013,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 372,408,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 987,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 5,702,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 844,299,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,237,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, $2,288,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $1,590,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the category
of services titled "intensive family preservation services."

(2) $685,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $701,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided to
contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care facility. The
facility shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through two
years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must
be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or
foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to parents accepting placement of children from the
facility. The facility may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents
for infants served by the facility. The department shall not require case
management as a condition of the contract.

(3) $524,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $536,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided for up to
three nonfacility-based programs for the training, consultation, support, and
recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive parents of children through age
three in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers,
except that each program may serve up to three medically fragile
nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs,
preference shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing pediatric
interim care program.

(4) $1,260,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, $1,248,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $4,196,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely for the family policy council and community public health and safety
networks. The funding level for the family policy council and community public
health and safety networks represents a 25 percent reduction below the funding
level for the 1999-2001 biennium. Funding levels shall be reduced 25 percent
for both the family policy council and network grants. Reductions to network
grants shall be allocated so as to maintain current funding levels, to the
greatest extent possible, for projects with the strongest evidence of positive
outcomes and for networks with substantial compliance with contracts for
network grants.

(5) $2,215,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, $4,394,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $5,604,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for reducing the
average caseload level per case-carrying social worker. Average caseload
reductions are intended to increase the amount of time social workers spend in
direct contact with the children, families, and foster parents involved with
their open cases. The department shall use some of the funds provided in
several local offices to increase staff that support case-carrying social
workers in ways that will allow social workers to increase direct contact time
with children, families, and foster parents. To achieve the goal of reaching
an average caseload ratio of 1:24 by the end of fiscal year 2003, the
department shall develop a plan for redeploying 30 FTEs to case-carrying social
worker and support positions from other areas in the children and family
services budget. The FTE redeployment plan shall be submitted to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2001.

(6) $1,000,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and $1,000,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided solely
for increasing foster parent respite care services that improve the retention
of foster parents and increase the stability of foster placements. The
department shall report quarterly to the appropriate committees of the
legislature progress against appropriate baseline measures for foster parent
retention and stability of foster placements.

(7) $1,050,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for increasing
kinship care placements for children who otherwise would likely be placed in
foster care. These funds shall be used for extraordinary costs incurred by
relatives at the time of placement, or for extraordinary costs incurred by
relatives after placement if such costs would likely cause a disruption in the
kinship care placement. $50,000 of the funds provided shall be contracted to
the Washington institute for public policy to conduct a study of kinship care
placements. The study shall examine the prevalence and needs of families who
are raising related children and shall compare services and policies of
Washington state with other states that have a higher rate of kinship care
placements in lieu of foster care placements. The study shall identify possible
changes in services and policies that are likely to increase appropriate
kinship care placements.

(8) $3,386,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation, $7,671,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $20,819,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for increases
in the cost per case for foster care and adoption support. $16,000,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount shall remain unalloted until the office of
financial management approves a plan submitted by the department to achieve a
higher rate of federal earnings in the foster care program. That plan shall
also be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature and shall
indicate projected federal revenue compared to actual fiscal year 2001 levels.
Within the amounts provided for foster care, the department shall increase the
basic rate for foster care to an average of $420 per month on July 1, 2001, and
to an average of $440 per month on July 1, 2002. The department shall use the
remaining funds provided in this subsection to pay for increases in the cost
per case for foster care and adoption support. The department shall seek to
control rate increases and reimbursement decisions for foster care and adoption
support cases such that the cost per case for family foster care, group care,
receiving homes, and adoption support does not exceed the amount assumed in the
projected caseload expenditures plus the amounts provided in this subsection.

(9) $1,767,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $2,461,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $1,485,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for rate and
capacity increases for child placing agencies. Child placing agencies shall
increase their capacity by 15 percent in fiscal year 2002 and 30 percent in
fiscal year 2003.

(10) The department
shall provide secure crisis residential facilities across the state in a manner
that: (a) Retains geographic provision of these services; and (b) retains beds
in high use areas.

(11) $125,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for a foster parent retention program. This program is
directed at foster parents caring for children who act out sexually, as
described in House Bill No. 1525 (foster parent retention program).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 35,248,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 36,456,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 14,609,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 380,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive

Account‑-Federal Appropriation.............. $ 9,361,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 6,196,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 21,972,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 124,222,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $686,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance account for costs
to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this
subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b) $5,980,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide
funding for county impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338,
Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(c) $1,161,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,162,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,190,000 of
the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this
subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.

(d) $2,515,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally
committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award
these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the
provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall
assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(e) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with the
institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions).

(f) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a contract for expanded services of the teamchild project.

(g) $423,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $924,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $174,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, $196,000 of the public safety and
education assistance account appropriation, and $690,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to
increase payment rates for contracted service providers.

(h) $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 167, Laws of 1999 (firearms on school
property). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide
funding for county impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 167,
Laws of 1999, and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.

(i) $3,441,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,441,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the
costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth
petitions. The department shall not retain any portion of these funds to cover
administrative or any other departmental costs. The department, in conjunction
with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than average
per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than
average per-petition processing costs.

(j) $6,000,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators to fund the
costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth
petitions. To the extent that distributions made under (i) and (j) of this
subsection and pursuant to section 801 of this act exceed actual costs of
processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions,
the department, in consultation with the respective juvenile court
administrator and the county, may approve expenditure of funds provided in this
subsection on other costs of the civil or criminal justice system. When this
occurs, the department shall notify the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees. The department shall not retain any portion of
these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental costs. The
department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall
develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither
reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs nor
shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing
costs.

(k) The distributions
made under (i) and (j) of this subsection and distributions from the county
criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act
constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or
increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(l) Each quarter during
the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions
processed and the total actual costs of processing the petitions in each of the
following categories: Truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk
youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no later than 45
days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward this
information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(m) $1,692,000 of the
juvenile accountability incentive account‑-federal appropriation is
provided solely for the continued implementation of a pilot program to provide
for postrelease planning and treatment of juvenile offenders with co-occurring
disorders.

(n) $22,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is provided
solely for the evaluation of the juvenile offender co-occurring disorder pilot
program implemented pursuant to (m) of this subsection.

(o) $900,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $900,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the continued implementation of the juvenile violence prevention
grant program established in section 204, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.

(p) $33,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $29,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1070 (juvenile offender basic
training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(q) $21,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $42,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5468 (chemical dependency).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(r) The juvenile
rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the juvenile court
administrators, may agree on a formula to allow the transfer of funds among
amounts appropriated for consolidated juvenile services, community juvenile
accountability act grants, the chemically dependent disposition alternative,
and the special sex offender disposition alternative.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 47,565,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 49,695,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 14,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 740,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 15,280,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 113,294,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$84,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted service providers.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,738,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,765,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 307,000

Juvenile Accountability
Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,100,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 5,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY
SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 191,089,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 194,884,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 339,077,000

General Fund‑-Local
Appropriation.............. $ 4,363,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,450,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 731,863,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Regional support
networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
implementation of working agreements with the vocational rehabilitation program
which will maximize the use of federal funding for vocational programs.

(b) From the general
fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the secretary of social
and health services shall assure that regional support networks reimburse the
aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state cost of
medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c) $388,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,927,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,349,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and operation of community residential and support services for
persons whose treatment needs would be better served by, but which comprise
substantial barriers to, community placement. In the event that enough
patients are not transitioned or diverted from the state hospitals to close at
least two hospital wards by July 2002, and two additional wards by April 2003,
a proportional share of these funds shall be transferred to the appropriations
in subsection (2) of this section to support continued care of the patients in
the state hospitals. Primary responsibility and accountability for provision
of appropriate community support for persons placed with these funds shall
reside with the mental health program and the regional support networks, with
partnership and active support from the alcohol and substance abuse and from
the aging and adult services programs. The department shall negotiate
performance-based incentive contracts with those regional support networks
which have the most viable plans for providing appropriate community support
services for significant numbers of persons from their area who would otherwise
be served in the state hospitals. The funds appropriated in this subsection
shall not be considered "available resources" as defined in RCW
71.24.025 and are not subject to the standard allocation formula applied in
accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a).

(d) At least $1,000,000
of the federal block grant funding appropriated in this subsection shall be
used for (i) initial development, training, and operation of the community
support teams which will work with long-term state hospital residents prior and
subsequent to their return to the community; and (ii) development of support
strategies which will reduce the unnecessary and excessive use of state and
local hospitals for short-term crisis stabilization services. Such strategies
may include training and technical assistance to community long-term care and
substance abuse providers; the development of diversion beds and stabilization
support teams; examination of state hospital policies regarding admissions; and
the development of new contractual standards to assure that the statutory
requirement that 85 percent of short-term detentions be managed locally is
being fulfilled. The department shall report to the fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature on the results of these efforts by November 1,
2001, and again by November 1, 2002.

(e) The department is
authorized to implement a new formula for allocating available resources among
the regional support networks. The distribution formula shall use the number
of persons eligible for the state medical programs funded under chapter 74.09
RCW as the measure of the requirement for the number of acutely mentally ill,
chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed children, and
seriously disturbed in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a). The new formula
shall be phased in over a period of no less than six years. Furthermore, the
department shall increase the medicaid capitation rates which a regional
support network would otherwise receive under the formula by an amount
sufficient to assure that total funding allocated to the regional support network
in fiscal year 2002 increases by up to 2.1 percent over the amount actually
paid to that regional support network in fiscal year 2001, and by up to an
additional 2.3 percent in fiscal year 2003, if total funding to the regional
support network would otherwise increase by less than those percentages under
the new formula, and provided that the nonfederal share of the higher medicaid
payment rate is provided by the regional support network from local funds.

(f) Within funds
appropriated in this subsection, the department shall contract with the Clark
county regional support network for development and operation of a project
demonstrating collaborative methods for providing intensive mental health
services in the school setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who
are medicaid eligible. Project services are to be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision of, mental
health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter 275-57 WAC. The department
shall increase medicaid payments to the regional support network by the amount
necessary to cover the necessary and allowable costs of the demonstration, not
to exceed the upper payment limit specified for the regional support network in
the department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal government after
meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in this subsection.
The regional support network shall provide the department with (i) periodic
reports on project service levels, methods, and outcomes; and (ii) an
intergovernmental transfer equal to the state share of the increased medicaid
payment provided for operation of this project.

(g) The health services
account appropriation is provided solely for implementation of strategies which
the department and the affected regional support networks conclude will best
assure continued availability of community-based inpatient psychiatric services
in all areas of the state. Such strategies may include, but are not limited
to, emergency contracts for continued operation of inpatient facilities
otherwise at risk of closure because of demonstrated uncompensated care;
start-up grants for development of evaluation and treatment facilities; and
increases in the rate paid for inpatient psychiatric services for medically
indigent and/or general assistance for the unemployed patients. The funds
provided in this subsection must be: (i) Prioritized for use in those areas of
the state which are at greatest risk of lacking sufficient inpatient psychiatric
treatment capacity, rather than being distributed on a formula basis; (ii)
prioritized for use by those hospitals which do not receive low-income
disproportionate share hospital payments as of the date of application for
funding; and (iii) matched on a one-quarter local, three-quarters state basis
by funding from the regional support network or networks in the area in which
the funds are expended. Payments from the amount provided in this subsection
shall not be made to any provider that has not agreed that, except for
prospective rate increases, the payment shall offset, on a dollar-for-dollar
basis, any liability that may be established against, or any settlement that
may be agreed to by the state, regarding the rate of state reimbursement for
inpatient psychiatric care. The funds provided in this subsection shall not be
considered "available resources" as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are
not subject to the distribution formula established pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 85,836,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 83,001,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 139,098,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 29,289,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 337,224,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The state mental
hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and
supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is
cost-effective to do so.

(b) The mental health
program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor provided by the
Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c) The department
shall seek to reduce the census of the two state psychiatric hospitals by 120
beds by April 2003 by arranging and providing community residential, mental
health, and other support services for long-term state hospital patients whose
treatment needs would be better served by a community placement. No such
patient is to move from the hospital until a team of community professionals
has become familiar with the person and their treatment plan; assessed their
strengths, preferences, and needs; arranged a safe, clinically-appropriate, and
stable place for them to live; assured that other needed medical, behavioral,
and social services are in place; and is contracted to monitor the person's
progress on an ongoing basis. The department and the regional support networks
shall endeavor to assure that hospital patients are able to return to their
area of origin, and that placements are not concentrated in proximity to the
hospitals.

(d) For each month
subsequent to the month in which a state hospital bed has been closed in
accordance with (c) of this subsection, the mental health program shall
transfer to the medical assistance program state funds equal to the state share
of the monthly per capita expenditure amount estimated for categorically
needy-disabled persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.

(e) The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1,
2001, and by November 1, 2002, on its plans for and progress toward achieving
the objectives set forth in (c) of this subsection.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 19,137,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 21,541,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 40,678,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $2,162,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,798,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
operational costs associated with a less restrictive step-down placement
facility on McNeil Island. Funding provided in this subsection is sufficient
to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6151 (high risk sex offenders in
the civil commitment and criminal justice systems) and provide one-time
mitigation funding for jurisdictions affected by the placement of less
restrictive alternative facilities for persons conditionally released from the
special commitment center at McNeil Island.

(b) By October 1, 2001,
the department shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate detailing
information on plans for increasing the efficiency of staffing patterns at the
new civil commitment center facility being constructed on McNeil Island.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 444,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 443,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,082,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,969,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,104,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 3,231,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 5,796,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 12,131,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $113,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $164,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
institute for public policy to evaluate the impacts of chapter 214, Laws of
1999 (mentally ill offenders), chapter 217, Laws of 2000 (atypical
anti-psychotic medications), chapter 297, Laws of 1998 (commitment of mentally
ill persons), and chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit).

(b) $168,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $243,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $411,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
development of a new system for measuring and tracking the outcomes of
community mental health services.

(c) $125,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $125,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$250,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are provided
solely for a study of the prevalence of mental illness among the state's
regional support networks. The study shall examine how reasonable estimates of
the prevalence of mental illness relate to the incidence of persons enrolled in
medical assistance programs in each regional support network area. In
conducting this study, the department shall consult with the joint legislative
audit and review committee, regional support networks, community mental health
providers, and mental health consumer representatives. The department shall
submit a final report on its findings to the fiscal, health care, and human
services committees of the legislature by November 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 231,693,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 242,347,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 396,151,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 741,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 870,932,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The health services
account appropriation and $753,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who
are employed through state contracts for twenty hours per week or more.
Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made only
to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage
either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan with
substantially equivalent benefits.

(b) $902,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $3,372,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $4,056,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for community
services for residents of residential habilitation centers (RHCs) who are able
to be adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings. The department shall ensure that the average cost
per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$280. If the number and timing of residents choosing to move into community
settings is not sufficient to achieve the RHC cottage consolidation plan assumed
in the appropriations in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
transfer sufficient appropriations from this subsection to subsection (2) of
this section to cover the added costs incurred in the RHCs. The department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of residents moving into
community settings and the actual expenditures for all community services to
support those residents.

(c) $1,440,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $3,041,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $4,311,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for expanded
community services for persons with developmental disabilities who also have
community protection issues or are diverted or discharged from state
psychiatric hospitals. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed $275.
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served
with these additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds
of services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual expenditures
for all community services to support these clients.

(d) $1,005,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $2,262,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,588,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
increasing case/resource management resources to improve oversight and quality
of care for persons enrolled in the medicaid home and community services waiver
for persons with developmental disabilities. The department shall not increase
total enrollment in home and community based waivers for persons with
developmental disabilities except for increases assumed in additional funding
provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section. Prior to submitting to
the health care financing authority any additional home and community based
waiver request for persons with developmental disabilities, the department
shall submit a summary of the waiver request to the appropriate committees of
the legislature. The summary shall include eligibility criteria, program
description, enrollment projections and limits, and budget and cost
effectiveness projections that distinguish the requested waiver from other
existing or proposed waivers.

(e) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for employment, or other day activities and training programs, for young
adults with developmental disabilities who complete their high school
curriculum in 2001 or 2002. These services are intended to assist with the
transition to work and more independent living. Funding shall be used to the
greatest extent possible for vocational rehabilitation services matched with
federal funding. In recent years, the state general fund appropriation for
employment and day programs has been underspent. These surpluses, built into
the carry forward level budget, shall be redeployed for high school transition
services.

(f) $369,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and $369,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided solely
for continuation of the autism pilot project started in 1999.

(g) $4,049,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,734,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,369,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to increase compensation
by an average of fifty cents per hour for low-wage workers providing
state-funded services to persons with developmental disabilities. These funds,
along with funding provided for vendor rate increases, are sufficient to raise
wages an average of fifty cents and cover the employer share of unemployment
and social security taxes on the amount of the wage increase. In consultation
with the statewide associations representing such agencies, the department
shall establish a mechanism for testing the extent to which funds have been
used for this purpose, and report the results to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by February 1, 2002.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 71,977,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 69,303,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 145,641,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 10,230,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 297,151,000

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,601,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,623,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,413,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,637,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000
of the fiscal year 2002 general fund‑-state appropriation and $50,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided
solely for increasing the contract amount for the southeast Washington deaf and
hard of hearing services center due to increased workload.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,995,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 518,911,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 537,907,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,078,417,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 4,324,000

Health Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,523,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,144,082,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire health
services account appropriation, $1,210,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,423,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $6,794,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours per
week. Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made
only to the subsidized basic health plan, and only for persons with incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level. Home care agencies may obtain
coverage either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan
with substantially equivalent benefits.

(2) $1,706,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,706,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, plus the
associated vendor rate increase for each year, are provided solely for
operation of the volunteer chore services program.

(3) For purposes of
implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate shall be no more than $128.79 for fiscal year 2002, and no more than
$134.45 for fiscal year 2003. For all facilities, the therapy care, support
services, and operations component rates established in accordance with chapter
74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by 2.1 percent
effective July 1, 2001, and by an additional 2.3 percent effective July 1,
2002. For case-mix facilities, direct care component rates established in
accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall also be adjusted for economic trends
and conditions by 2.1 percent effective July 1, 2001, and by an additional 2.3
percent effective July 1, 2002. Additionally, to facilitate the transition to
a fully case-mix based direct care payment system, the median price per
case-mix unit for each of the applicable direct care peer groups shall be
increased on a one-time basis by 2.64 percent effective July 1, 2002.

(4) In accordance with
Substitute House Bill No. 2242 (nursing home rates), the department shall issue
certificates of capital authorization which result in up to $10 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2003; in
up to $27 million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2004; and in up to $27 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2005.

(5) Adult day health
services shall not be considered a duplication of services for persons
receiving care in long-term care settings licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36,
or 70.128 RCW.

(6) Within funds
appropriated in this section and in section 204 of this act, the aging and
adult services program shall coordinate with and actively support the efforts
of the mental health program and of the regional support networks to provide
stable community living arrangements for persons with dementia and traumatic
brain injuries who have been long-term residents of the state psychiatric
hospitals. The aging and adult services program shall report to the health
care and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2001, and by
November 1, 2002, on the actions it has taken to achieve this objective.

(7) Within funds
appropriated in this section and in section 204 of this act, the aging and
adult services program shall devise and implement strategies in partnership
with the mental health program and the regional support networks to reduce the
use of state and local psychiatric hospitals for the short-term stabilization
of persons with dementia and traumatic brain injuries. Such strategies may
include training and technical assistance to help long-term care providers
avoid and manage behaviors which might otherwise result in psychiatric
hospitalizations; monitoring long-term care facilities to assure residents are
receiving appropriate mental health care and are not being inappropriately
medicated or hospitalized; the development of diversion beds and stabilization
support teams; and the establishment of systems to track the use of psychiatric
hospitals by long-term care providers. The aging and adult services program
shall report to the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2001, and by November 1, 2002, on the actions it has taken to
achieve this objective.

(8) In accordance with
Substitute House Bill No. 1341, the department may implement two medicaid
waiver programs for persons who do not qualify for such services as
categorically needy, subject to federal approval and the following conditions
and limitations:

(a) One waiver program
shall include coverage of home-based services, and the second shall include
coverage of care in community residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver
covering home-based services shall not exceed 150 persons by the end of fiscal
year 2002, nor 200 persons by the end of fiscal year 2003. Enrollment in the
waiver covering community residential services shall not exceed 500 persons by
the end of fiscal year 2002, nor 900 persons by the end of fiscal year 2003.

(b) For each month of
waiver service delivered to a person who was not covered by medicaid prior to
their enrollment in the waiver, the aging and adult services program shall
transfer to the medical assistance program state and federal funds equal to the
monthly per capita expenditure amount, net of drug rebates, estimated for
medically needy-aged persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.

(c) The department
shall identify the number of medically needy nursing home residents, and
enrollment and expenditures on each of the two medically needy waivers, on
monthly management reports.

(d) The department
shall track and report to health care and fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 15, 2002, on the types of long-term care support a sample of waiver
participants were receiving prior to their enrollment in the waiver, how those
services were being paid for, and an assessment of their adequacy.

(9) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW
which meets all of the following criteria: (a) The nursing home entered into
an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1, 1980; (b)
the lessee purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980; and (c) the
lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home after
January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided pursuant to
this subsection shall not be subject to the settlement, audit, or rate-setting
requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(10) $364,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $364,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $740,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for payment
of exceptional care rates so that persons with Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias who might otherwise require nursing home or state hospital care can
instead be served in boarding home-licensed facilities which specialize in the
care of such conditions.

(11) From funds
appropriated in this section, the department shall increase compensation for
individual and for agency home care providers. Payments to individual home
care providers are to be increased from $7.18 per hour to $7.68 per hour on
July 1, 2001. Payments to agency providers are to be increased to $13.30 per
hour on July 1, 2001, and to $13.44 per hour on July 1, 2002. All but 18 cents
per hour of the July 1, 2001, increase to agency providers is to be used to
increase wages for direct care workers. The appropriations in this section also
include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and social
security taxes on the amount of the wage increase required by this subsection.

(12) $2,507,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $2,595,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,100,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
prospective rate increases intended to increase compensation by an average of
fifty cents per hour for low-wage workers in agencies which contract with the
state to provide community residential services for persons with functional
disabilities. In consultation with the statewide associations representing
such agencies, the department shall establish a mechanism for testing the
extent to which funds have been used for this purpose, and report the results
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by February 1, 2002. The amounts
in this subsection also include the funds needed for the employer share of
unemployment and social security taxes on the amount of the wage increase.

(13) $1,082,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,082,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,204,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
prospective rate increases intended to increase compensation for low-wage
workers in nursing homes which contract with the state. For fiscal year 2002,
the department shall add forty-five cents per patient day to the direct care
rate which would otherwise be paid to each nursing facility in accordance with
chapter 74.46 RCW. For fiscal year 2003, the department shall increase the
median price per case-mix unit for each of the applicable peer groups by
nine-tenths of one percent in order to distribute the available funds. In
consultation with the statewide associations representing nursing facilities,
the department shall establish a mechanism for testing the extent to which
funds have been used for this purpose, and report the results to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by February 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 436,440,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 424,870,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,356,351,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 31,788,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,249,449,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $282,081,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $278,277,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
$1,254,197,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and
$29,352,000 of the general fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely
for the WorkFirst program and child support operations. WorkFirst expenditures
include TANF grants, diversion services, subsidized child care, employment and
training, other WorkFirst related services, allocated field services operating
costs, and allocated economic services program administrative costs. Within
the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall:

(a) Continue to
implement WorkFirst program improvements that are designed to achieve progress
against outcome measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures
of job retention and wage progression shall be developed and reported quarterly
to appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who
leave assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. An
increased attention to job retention and wage progression is necessary to
emphasize the legislature's goal that the WorkFirst program succeed in helping
recipients gain long-term economic independence and not cycle on and off public
assistance. The wage progression measure shall report the median percentage
increase in quarterly earnings and hourly wage after 12 months, 24 months, and
36 months. The wage progression report shall also report the percent with
earnings above one hundred percent and two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level. The report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with
similar workers who did not participate in WorkFirst. The department shall
also report the percentage of families who have returned to temporary
assistance for needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months.

(b) Develop
informational materials that educate families about the difference between cash
assistance and work support benefits. These materials must explain, among
other facts, that the benefits are designed to support their employment, that
there are no time limits on the receipt of work support benefits, and that
immigration or residency status will not be affected by the receipt of
benefits. These materials shall be posted in all community service offices and
distributed to families. Materials must be available in multiple languages.
When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy families program,
receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a temporary assistance for
needy families application, the department of social and health services shall
educate them about the difference between cash assistance and work support
benefits and offer them the opportunity to begin or to continue receiving work
support benefits, so long as they are eligible. The department shall provide
this information through in-person interviews, over the telephone, and/or
through the mail. Work support benefits include food stamps, medicaid for all
family members, medicaid or state children's health insurance program for
children, and child care assistance. The department shall report annually to
the legislature the number of families who have had exit interviews, been
reached successfully by phone, and been sent mail. The report shall also
include the percentage of families who elect to continue each of the benefits
and the percentage found ineligible by each substantive reason code. A
substantive reason code shall not be "other." The report shall
identify barriers to informing families about work support benefits and
describe existing and future actions to overcome such barriers.

(c) From the amounts
provided in this subsection, provide $50,000 from the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 from the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 to the Washington institute for public
policy for continuation of the WorkFirst evaluation database.

(d) Submit a report by
December 1, 2001, to the fiscal committees of the legislature containing a
spending plan for the WorkFirst program. The plan shall identify how spending
levels in the 2001-2003 biennium will be adjusted by June 30, 2003, to be
sustainable within available federal grant levels and the carryforward level of
state funds.

(2) $48,341,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $48,341,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients in the general
assistance‑-unemployable program. Within these amounts, the department
may expend funds for services that assist recipients to reduce their dependence
on public assistance, provided that expenditures for these services and cash
assistance do not exceed the funds provided.

(3) $5,632,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $5,632,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the food assistance program for legal immigrants. The level of
benefits shall be equivalent to the benefits provided by the federal food stamp
program.

(4) $48,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
solely to implement chapter 111, Laws of 2001 (veterans/Philippines).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE
ABUSE PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 38,047,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 38,938,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 91,695,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 723,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,733,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 52,510,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 235,646,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,610,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,622,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for expansion of 35 drug and alcohol treatment beds for persons
committed under RCW 70.96A.140. Patients meeting the commitment criteria of
RCW 70.96A.140 but who voluntarily agree to treatment in lieu of commitment
shall also be eligible for treatment in these additional treatment beds. The
department shall develop specific placement criteria for these expanded
treatment beds to ensure that this new treatment capacity is prioritized for
persons incapacitated as a result of chemical dependency and who are also high
utilizers of hospital services. These additional treatment beds shall be
located in the eastern part of the state.

(2) $2,800,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for expansion of treatment for persons gravely disabled by abuse and
addiction to alcohol and other drugs including methamphetamine.

(3) $1,083,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for adult and juvenile drug courts that have a net loss of federal grant
funding in state fiscal year 2002 and state fiscal year 2003. This
appropriation is intended to cover approximately one-half of lost federal
funding. It is the intent of the legislature to provide state assistance to
counties to cover a part of lost federal funding for drug courts for a maximum
of three years.

(4) $1,993,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation and $951,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for drug and
alcohol treatment for SSI clients. The department shall continue research and
post-program evaluation of these clients to further determine the
post-treatment utilization of medical services and the service effectiveness of
consolidation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,028,885,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,130,904,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,637,511,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 276,147,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 1,043,310,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,125,957,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department
shall increase its efforts to restrain the growth of health care costs. The
appropriations in this section anticipate that the department implements a
combination of cost containment and utilization strategies sufficient to reduce
general fund‑-state costs by approximately 3 percent below the level
projected for the 2001-03 biennium in the March 2001 forecast. The department
shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2001, on
its specific plans and semiannual targets for accomplishing these savings. The
department shall report again to the fiscal committees by March 1, 2002, and by
September 1, 2002, on actual performance relative to the semiannual targets.
If satisfactory progress is not being made to achieve the targeted savings, the
reports shall include recommendations for additional or alternative measures to
control costs. Such measures may include the imposition of ratable reductions
directly related to those services in which other efforts to control costs have
been least effective.

(2) The department
shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to children through age 18
residing in households with incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty
level.

(3) In determining
financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the department is
authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds
or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(4) $502,000 of the
health services account appropriation, $400,000 of the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, and $1,676,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1058
(breast and cervical cancer treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2001, or if private funding is not contributed equivalent to the general fund‑-private/local
appropriation, the funds appropriated in this subsection shall lapse.

(5) $620,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,380,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,000,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of a "ticket to work" medicaid buy-in program for
working persons with disabilities, operated in accordance with the following
conditions:

(a) To be eligible, a
working person with a disability must have total income which is less than 450
percent of poverty;

(b) Participants shall
participate in the cost of the program by paying (i) a monthly enrollment fee
equal to fifty percent of any unearned income in excess of the medicaid
medically needy standard; and (ii) a monthly premium equal to 5 percent of all
unearned income, plus 5 percent of all earned income after disregarding the
first sixty-five dollars of monthly earnings, and half the remainder;

(c) The department
shall establish more restrictive eligibility standards than specified in this
subsection to the extent necessary to operate the program within appropriated
funds;

(d) The department may
require point-of-service copayments as appropriate, except that copayments
shall not be so high as to discourage appropriate service utilization,
particularly of prescription drugs needed for the treatment of psychiatric
conditions; and

(e) The department
shall establish systems for tracking and reporting enrollment and expenditures
in this program, and the prior medical assistance eligibility status of new
program enrollees. The department shall additionally survey the prior and
current employment status and approximate hours worked of program enrollees,
and report the results to the fiscal and health care committees of the
legislature by January 15, 2003.

(6) From funds
appropriated in this section, the department shall design, implement, and
evaluate pilot projects to assist individuals with at least three different
diseases to improve their health, while reducing total medical expenditures.
The projects shall involve (a) identifying persons who are seriously or
chronically ill due to a combination of medical, social, and functional
problems; and (b) working with the individuals and their care providers to
improve adherence to state-of-the-art treatment regimens. The department shall
report to the health care and the fiscal committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2002, on the particular disease states, intervention protocols, and
delivery mechanisms it proposes to test.

(7) Sufficient funds
are appropriated in this section for the department to continue full-scope
dental coverage, vision coverage, and podiatry services for medicaid-eligible
adults.

(8) The legislature
reaffirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to
remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.

(9) $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $80,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $160,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
newborn referral program to provide access and outreach to reduce infant
mortality.

(10) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $31,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $62,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020 (dental sealants). If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020 is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11) In accordance with
RCW 74.46.625, $376,318,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $144,896,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $542,089,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes
operated by rural public hospital districts. The payments shall be conditioned
upon (a) a contractual commitment by the association of public hospital
districts and participating rural public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the state treasurer, for deposit into the health
services account, equal to at least 98 percent of the supplemental payments;
and (b) a contractual commitment by the participating districts to not allow
expenditures covered by the supplemental payments to be used for medicaid
nursing home rate-setting. The participating districts shall retain no more
than a total of $20,000,000 for the 2001-03 biennium.

(12) $38,690,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $40,189,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $80,241,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
additional disproportionate share and medicare upper payment limit payments to
public hospital districts. The payments shall be conditioned upon a
contractual commitment by the participating public hospital districts to make
an intergovernmental transfer to the health services account equal to at least
86.5 percent of the additional payments. At least 28 percent of the amounts
retained by the participating hospital districts shall be allocated to the
state's teaching hospitals.

(13) $412,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $862,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$730,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1162 (small rural
hospitals). If Substitute House Bill No. 1162 is not enacted by June 30, 2001,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14) From funds
appropriated in this section, the department shall continue to provide medicaid
matching funding for funds contributed by local jurisdictions for purposes of
conducting eligibility outreach to children and under-served groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 11,309,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 9,780,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 83,738,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 360,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 105,187,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
division of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative interagency
agreements with state and local organizations to improve and expand employment
opportunities for people with severe disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 30,444,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 29,369,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 50,562,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 810,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 111,185,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) By November 1,
2001, the secretary shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on
the actions the secretary has taken, or proposes to take, within current
funding levels to resolve the organizational problems identified in the
department's February 2001 report to the legislature on current systems for
billing third-party payers for services delivered by the state psychiatric
hospitals. The secretary is authorized to transfer funds from this section to
the mental health program to the extent necessary to achieve the organizational
improvements recommended in that report.

(2) By November 1,
2001, the department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature
with the least costly plan for assuring that billing and accounting
technologies in the state psychiatric hospitals adequately and efficiently
comply with standards set by third-party payers. The plan shall be developed
with participation by and oversight from the office of financial management,
the department's information systems services division, and the department of
information services.

(3) The department
shall reconstitute the payment integrity program to place greater emphasis upon
the prevention of future billing errors, and shall rename the program so as to
not suggest a lack of integrity on the part of providers who have made inadvertent
billing errors. In keeping with this revised focus, the department shall also
increase to one thousand dollars the cumulative total of apparent billing
errors allowed before a provider is contacted for repayment.

(4) By September 1,
2001, the department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature
results from the payment review program. The report shall include actual costs
recovered and estimated costs avoided for fiscal year 2001. The report shall
document criteria and methodology used for determining avoided costs. The
department shall provide annual updates to the report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by September 1st of each year for the preceding fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 43,053,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 43,053,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 26,665,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 112,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. FOR THE STATE HEALTH
CARE AUTHORITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,655,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 6,654,000

State Health Care Authority
Administrative

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 20,091,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 499,148,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,611,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 536,159,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,551,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $6,550,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for health care services provided through local community clinics.

(2) Within funds
appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of this 2001 act, the
health care authority shall continue to provide an enhanced basic health plan
subsidy option for foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers
in state-funded home care programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster
parents and home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the
federal poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at a
cost of ten dollars per covered worker per month.

(3) The health care
authority shall require organizations and individuals which are paid to deliver
basic health plan services and which choose to sponsor enrollment in the
subsidized basic health plan to pay the following: (i) A minimum of fifteen
dollars per enrollee per month for persons below 100 percent of the federal
poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee per month for
persons whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the federal
poverty level.

(4) The health care
authority shall solicit information from the United States office of personnel
management, health plans, and other relevant sources, regarding the cost of
implementation of mental health parity by the federal employees health benefits
program in 2001. A progress report shall be provided to the senate and house
of representatives fiscal committees by July 1, 2002, and a final report shall
be provided to the legislature by November 15, 2002, on the study findings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,688,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,700,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,544,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,032,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL
INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 14,692,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 14,694,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 29,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
TRAINING COMMISSION

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

Local Appropriation........................ $ 460,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 148,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 18,439,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 19,047,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $124,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to allow
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to increase the
technical and training support provided to the local criminal justice agencies
on the new incident-based reporting system and the national incident-based
reporting system.

(2) $136,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to allow
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys to enhance the training
provided to criminal justice personnel.

(3) $22,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase payment rates for the criminal justice training commission's
contracted food service provider.

(4) $31,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely to
increase payment rates for the criminal justice training commission's contract
with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(5) $65,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
regionalized training programs for school district and local law enforcement
officials on school safety issues.

(6) $233,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for training
and equipping local law enforcement officers to respond to methamphetamine
crime.

(7) $374,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1062 (certification of peace officers). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(8) $450,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for grants
to be distributed by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
for electronic mapping of school facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 7,738,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 7,682,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,250,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,862,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation............ ................. $ 6,950,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,200,000

Asbestos Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 688,000

Electrical License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,412,000

Farm Labor Revolving
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,281,000

Public Works Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,856,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 179,186,000

Accident Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 11,568,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 176,715,000

Medical Aid Account‑-Federal
Appropriation..... $ 2,438,000

Plumbing Certificate
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,015,000

Pressure Systems Safety
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,274,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 455,143,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Pursuant to RCW
7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims compensation program
within the public safety and education account funds appropriated in this
section. In the event that cost containment measures are necessary, the
department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b) develop preferred
provider contracts; or (c) other cost containment measures. Cost containment
measures shall not include holding invoices received in one fiscal period for
payment from appropriations in subsequent fiscal periods. No more than $5,248,000
of the public safety and education account appropriation shall be expended for
department administration of the crime victims compensation program.

(2) $1,438,000 of the
accident account‑-state appropriation and $1,438,000 of the medical aid
account‑-state appropriation are provided for the one-time cost of
implementing a recent state supreme court ruling regarding the calculation of
workers' compensation benefits. This decision significantly increases the
complexity of calculating benefits and therefore increases the administrative
and legal costs of the workers' compensation program. The department shall
develop and report to appropriate committees of the legislature proposed
statutory language that provides greater certainty and simplicity in the
calculation of benefits. The report shall be submitted by October 1, 2001.

(3) It is the intent of
the legislature that elevator inspection fees shall fully cover the cost of the
elevator inspection program. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2001-03
fiscal biennium the department may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor, if the increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of the elevator
inspection program.

(4) The department
shall not expend any funds from amounts provided in this section for the
occupational safety and health impact grants program unless separate
legislation is passed that specifically authorizes such expenditures,
appropriates funds, and provides accountability for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE
REVIEW BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 999,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 999,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,529,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,533,000

Charitable, Educational,
Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,069,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,619,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,643,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 155,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,663,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,080,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL
SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,832,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,600,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 28,699,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 25,614,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 65,745,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following terms and conditions: $3,664,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation and $7,129,000 of the general
fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely for the department to
acquire, establish, and operate a nursing facility dedicated to serving men and
women from Washington who have served in the nation's armed forces.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 65,308,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 66,941,000

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 24,186,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 276,840,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 81,526,000

Hospital Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,718,000

Health Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 38,456,000

Emergency Medical Services
and Trauma Care Systems

Trust Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 14,858,000

Safe Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,701,000

Drinking Water Assistance
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,400,000

Waterworks Operator
Certification‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 622,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 3,328,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 257,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 45,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,817,000

Medical Test Site Licensure
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,369,000

Youth Tobacco Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,797,000

Tobacco Prevention and
Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 34,992,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 631,161,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department or
any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees charged to the
drinking water operator certification, newborn screening, radioactive
materials, x-ray compliance, drinking water plan review, midwifery, hearing and
speech, veterinarians, psychologists, pharmacists, hospitals, podiatrists, and
home health and home care programs, in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet the actual costs
of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section.

(2) $339,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $339,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for technical assistance to local governments and special districts on
water conservation and reuse.

(3) $1,675,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $1,676,000 of the
general fund‑-state fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely
for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and agency action
items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.

(4) The department of
health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state
general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The
department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted
federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act
or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any
moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects
or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(5) $5,779,000 of the
health services account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,665,000
of the health services account‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for purchase and distribution of the pneumococcal conjugate
vaccine as part of the state's program of universal access to essential
childhood vaccines.

(6) $85,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $65,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1365 (infant and
child products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7) $58,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1590
(breastfeeding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8) From funds
appropriated in this section, the state board of health shall convene a
broadly-based task force to review the available information on the potential
risks and benefits to public and personal health and safety, and to individual
privacy, of emerging technologies involving human deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA).
The board may reimburse task force members for travel expenses according to RCW
43.03.220. The task force shall consider information provided to it by
interested persons on: (a) The incidence of discriminatory actions based upon
genetic information; (b) strategies to safeguard civil rights and privacy
related to genetic information; (c) remedies to compensate individuals for
inappropriate use of their genetic information; and (d) incentives for further
research and development on the use of DNA to promote public health, safety,
and welfare. The task force shall report on its findings and any
recommendations to appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1,
2002.

(9) $533,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,067,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for performance-based contracts with local jurisdictions to
assure the safety of drinking water provided by small "group B" water
systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT SERVICES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 36,156,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 36,365,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,576,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement

Account Appropriation...................... $ 3,254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 77,351,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$4,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$4,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $3,254,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
are provided solely for the replacement of the department's offender-based
tracking system. This amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of section 902 of this act. The department shall prepare an
assessment of the fiscal impact of any changes to the replacement project. The
assessment shall:

(a) Include a
description of any changes to the replacement project;

(b) Provide the
estimated costs for each component in the 2001-03 and subsequent biennia;

(c) Include a schedule
that provides the time estimated to complete changes to each component of the
replacement project; and

(d) Be provided to the
office of financial management, the department of information services, the
information services board, and the staff of the fiscal committees of the
senate and the house of representatives no later than November 1, 2002.

(2) CORRECTIONAL
OPERATIONS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 396,557,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 406,403,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,096,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 1,614,000

Public Health Services
Account Appropriation... $ 1,453,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 818,123,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department may
expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered into for mitigation of
severe overcrowding in local jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual
costs shall be deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not
exceed revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery of
costs.

(b) The department
shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the Washington
corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that provided in the
1995-97 biennium.

(c) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(d) $553,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,171,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to increase payment rates for contracted education providers, contracted
chemical dependency providers, and contracted work release facilities.

(e) During the 2001-03
biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for offender pay phone and
other telephone services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors: (i) The
lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone
call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department to
provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient revenues for
the activities funded from the institutional welfare betterment account as of
January 1, 2000.

(f) For the acquisition
of properties and facilities, the department of corrections is authorized to
enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. This
authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option to purchase
or lease-purchase approximately 50 work release beds in facilities throughout
the state for $3,500,000.

(g) $22,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $76,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6151 (high
risk sex offenders in the civil commitment and criminal justice systems). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(h) The department may
acquire a ferry for no more than $1,000,000 from Washington state ferries.
Funds expended for this purpose will be recovered from the sale of marine
assets.

(3) COMMUNITY
SUPERVISION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 61,427,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 62,934,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,125,000

Public Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 15,841,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.... ............ $ 141,327,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department of
corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the least possible
impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff, and correctional
industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff
means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(b) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the department of corrections to contract with the institute for
public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter 196, Laws of 1999
(offender accountability act) and sections 7 through 12 of chapter 197, Laws of
1999 (drug offender sentencing).

(c) $16,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $34,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
to increase payment rates for contracted chemical dependency providers.

(d) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5118 (interstate
compact for adult offender supervision). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL
INDUSTRIES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 631,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 629,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,260,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$110,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $110,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for transfer to the jail industries board. The board
shall use the amounts provided only for administrative expenses, equipment
purchases, and technical assistance associated with advising cities and
counties in developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and
efficient offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY
PAYMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 18,568,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 18,569,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 37,137,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES
FOR THE BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,693,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,628,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,140,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 80,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 14,541,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to increase state assistance for a comprehensive program of
training and support services for persons who are both deaf and blind.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 936,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 857,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,793,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

$78,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely for the
sentencing guidelines commission to conduct a comprehensive review and
evaluation of state sentencing policy. The review and evaluation shall include
an analysis of whether current sentencing ranges and standards, as well as
existing mandatory minimum sentences, existing sentence enhancements, and
special sentencing alternatives, are consistent with the purposes of the
sentencing reform act as set out in RCW 9.94A.010, including the intent of the
legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender and alternatives
to confinement for the nonviolent offender. The review and evaluation shall
also examine whether current sentencing ranges and standards are consistent
with existing corrections capacity.

The review and
evaluation shall consider studies on the cost-effectiveness of sentencing
alternatives, as well as the fiscal impact of sentencing policies on state and
local government. In conducting the review and evaluation, the commission
shall consult with the superior court judges' association, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington defenders' association,
the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, organizations representing crime
victims, and other organizations and individuals with expertise and interest in
sentencing policy.

Not later than December
1, 2001, the commission shall present to the appropriate standing committees of
the legislature the report of its comprehensive review and evaluation, together
with any recommendations for revisions and modifications to state sentencing
policy, including sentencing ranges and standards, mandatory minimum sentences,
and sentence enhancements. If implementation of the recommendations of the
commission would result in exceeding the capacity of correctional facilities, the
commission shall at the same time present to the legislature a list of revised
standard sentence ranges which are consistent with currently authorized rated
and operational corrections capacity, and consistent with the purposes of the
sentencing reform act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 180,628,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 30,119,000

Unemployment Compensation
Administration Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 181,677,000

Administrative Contingency
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,914,000

Employment Service
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,001,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 426,339,000

(End
of part)

PART
III

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER
GORGE COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 398,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 391,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation........... $ 749,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,538,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $40,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $40,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to implement the scenic area management plan for Klickitat
county. If Klickitat county adopts an ordinance to implement the scenic area
management plan in accordance with the national scenic area act, P.L. 99-663,
then the amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided as a grant to
Klickitat county to implement its responsibilities under the act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
ECOLOGY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 46,633,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 44,481,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 56,805,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 4,351,000

Special Grass Seed Burning
Research Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 14,000

Reclamation Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,810,000

Flood Control Assistance
Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 4,098,000

State Emergency Water
Projects Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 878,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 13,537,000

State Drought Preparedness
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,325,000

State and Local
Improvements Revolving Account

(Water Supply
Facilities)‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 587,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation. ... $ 12,481,000

Wood Stove Education and
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 353,000

Worker and Community
Right-to-Know Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,288,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 68,931,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Local Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,751,000

Water Quality Permit
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 23,827,000

Underground Storage Tank
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,682,000

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 504,000

Biosolids Permit Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 589,000

Hazardous Waste Assistance
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,308,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,066,000

Oil Spill Prevention
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,921,000

Air Operating Permit
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,608,000

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,898,000

Oil Spill Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,078,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 5,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 467,000

Water Pollution Control
Revolving Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 2,316,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 324,942,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,874,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $3,874,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $394,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,070,000 of the oil spill
prevention account‑-state appropriation, and $3,686,000 of the water
quality permit account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DOE-01,
DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE‑07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.

(2) $500,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided for an assessment of the
financial assurance requirements of hazardous waste management facilities. By
September 30, 2002, the department shall provide to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature a report that: (a) Evaluates current
statutes and regulations governing hazardous waste management facilities; (b)
analyzes and makes recommendations for improving financial assurance regulatory
control; and (c) makes recommendations for funding financial assurance
regulatory control of hazardous waste management facilities.

(3) $250,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $250,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $564,000 of the state drought
preparedness account‑‑state appropriation, and $549,000 of the
water quality account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for
enhanced streamflow monitoring in critical salmon recovery basins. $640,000 of
this amount is provided solely to implement the Puget Sound work plan and
agency action item DOE-01.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation in this section is provided solely
for the department to work in cooperation with local jurisdictions to address
emerging stormwater management requirements. This work shall include
developing a storm water manual for eastern Washington, technical assistance to
local jurisdictions, and increased implementation of the department's existing
storm water program. $200,000 of this amount is provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-06.

(5) $383,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $383,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for water conservation plan review, technical assistance, and project
review for water conservation and reuse projects. By December 1, 2003, the
department in cooperation with the department of health shall report to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the activities and
achievements related to water conservation and reuse during the past two
biennia. The report shall include an overview of technical assistance
provided, reuse project development activities, and water conservation
achievements.

(6) $3,424,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for
methamphetamine lab clean up activities.

(7) $800,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely to implement the
department's persistent, bioaccumulative toxic chemical strategy. $54,000 of
this amount shall be allocated to the department of health to assist with this effort.

(8) Up to $11,365,000
of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided for the
remediation of contaminated sites. Of this amount, up to $2,000,000 may be
used to pay existing site remediation liabilities owed to the federal environmental
protection agency for clean-up work that has been completed. The department
shall carefully monitor actual revenue collections into the state toxics
control account, and is authorized to limit actual expenditures of the
appropriation provided in this section consistent with available revenue.

(9) $200,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided to assess the
effectiveness of the state's current toxic pollution prevention and dangerous
waste programs and policies. The department shall work with affected
stakeholder groups and the public to evaluate the performance of existing
programs, and identify feasible methods of reducing the generation of these
wastes. The department shall report its findings to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by September 30, 2002.

(10) $1,200,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely for the
department, in conjunction with affected local governments, to address emergent
areawide soil contamination problems. The department's efforts will include
public involvement processes and completing assessments of the geographical
extent of toxic contamination including highly contaminated areas.

(11) $170,000 of the
oil spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02 through a
contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to develop an
educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(12) $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $3,000,000 of
the water quality account appropriation are provided solely to implement
chapter 237, Laws of 2001 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832, water
resources management) and to support the processing of applications for changes
and transfers of existing water rights.

(13) $4,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,500,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for grants to local governments to conduct watershed planning.

(14) $3,114,000 of the
water quality account appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1832 (water resources management). Of this amount:
(a) $2,100,000 is provided for grants to local governments for targeted
watershed assessments consistent with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832;
and (b) the remainder of the funding is provided solely for development of a
state environmental policy act template to streamline environmental review,
creation of a blue ribbon panel to develop long-term watershed planning implementation
funding options, and technical assistance.

(15) $50,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is for a
conservation district in the Moses Lake region for a culvert removal project on
Rocky Ford creek for the purpose of reducing flooding and improving water
quality.

(16) $150,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
for the conservation commission for the Washington grazing lands conservation
initiative's establishment of the Washington watershed, science, and technology
program to provide technical assistance to private landowners in conducting
water quality monitoring, riparian vegetation management, and noxious weed
control.

(17) $75,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is for a
conservation district in the Palouse region for a pilot project to evaluate the
ability of existing voluntary and regulatory programs to improve water quality in
water quality limited segments listed pursuant to section 303(d) of the federal
clean water act.

(18) $200,000 of the
water quality account appropriation is provided solely to provide coordination
and assistance to groups established for the purpose of protecting, enhancing,
and restoring the biological, chemical, and physical processes of watersheds.
These groups may include those involved in coordinated resource management,
regional fisheries enhancement groups, conservation districts, watershed councils,
and private nonprofit organizations incorporated under Title 24 RCW.

(19) $325,000 of the
state drought preparedness account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for an environmental impact statement of the Pine Hollow reservoir
project to be conducted in conjunction with the local irrigation district.

(20) $1,700,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $280,000 of
the oil spill prevention account appropriation are provided solely for oil
spill prevention measures in Puget Sound. Of these amounts:

(a) The general fund
appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to provide for
charter safety tug services. Safety tug services shall include: (i) The
placement of a dedicated tug at Neah Bay for not less than 200 days in fiscal
year 2002; and (ii) other safety tug services that may be dispatched by the
department at the request of the United States coast guard captain of the port
for Puget Sound to the areas or incidents that the department deems to be of
highest concern. By January 10, 2002, the department shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the number of dispatches,
response time and distance, and other factors pertaining to the safety tug
services. The general fund‑-state appropriation in this subsection is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action item DOE-09;

(b) $100,000 of the oil
spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely for the department to
conduct a vessel transponder feasibility study for Washington waters and
undertake a trial vessel tracking program using transponders. In conducting
the feasibility study and trial program, the department of ecology shall
consult with state pilotage authorities, the maritime industry and the United
States coast guard; and

(c) $180,000 of the oil
spill prevention account appropriation is provided solely to acquire vessel
incident reporting information.

The governor shall
request the federal government to provide ongoing resources to station a
dedicated rescue tug at Neah Bay.

(21) $600,000 of the
water quality account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
setting instream flows in six basins not currently planning under the watershed
planning act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 30,798,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 31,366,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,690,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 60,000

Winter Recreation Program
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 787,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 274,000

Snowmobile Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 4,682,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 337,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 48,000

Water Trail Program Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,000

Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 26,420,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 97,486,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Fees approved by
the state parks and recreation commission in 2001 are authorized to exceed the
fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(2) The state parks and
recreation commission, in collaboration with the office of financial management
and legislative staff, shall develop a cost-effective and readily accessible
approach for reporting revenues and expenditures at each state park. The
reporting system shall be complete and operational by December 1, 2001.

(3) The appropriation
in this section from the off-road vehicle account‑‑state is
provided under RCW 46.09.170(1)(c) and is provided solely to bring off-road
vehicle recreation facilities into compliance with the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.

(4) $79,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $79,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $8,000 of the
winter recreation program account‑‑state appropriation are provided
solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest avalanche center.

(5) $432,000 of the
parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is provided for the
operation of the Silver Lake visitor center. If a long-term management
agreement is not reached with the U.S. forest service by September 30, 2001,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $189,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item P+RC-02.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 393,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 395,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 8,358,000

Firearms Range Account‑-State
Appropriation......... $ 13,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,584,000

Recreation Resources
Account‑-Federal Appropriation. $ 481,000

NOVA Program Account‑-State
Appropriation........... $ 611,000

Water Quality Account‑‑State
Appropriation.......... $ 700,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑‑State Appropriation.... $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 14,035,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $250,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $250,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
$500,000 of the water quality account appropriation, and $500,000 of the state
toxics control account appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter
298, Laws of 2001, Substitute Senate Bill No. 5637 (watershed health monitoring
and assessment) and for the development of a comprehensive salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring strategy and action plan. The strategy and action
plan shall address the monitoring recommendations of the independent science
panel in its report, Recommendations for Monitoring Salmonid Recovery in
Washington State (December 2000), and of the joint legislative audit and
review committee in its report Investing in the Environment: Environmental
Quality Grant and Loan Programs Performance Audit (January 2001). The
action plan shall include an assessment of state agency operations related to
monitoring, evaluation, and adaptive management of salmon recovery and
watershed health; any operational or statutory changes necessary to implement
the strategy and action plan; and funding recommendations.

(2) $8,000,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the forest and fish agreement rules. These funds will be passed through to the
department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife.

(3) By August 1, 2001,
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall complete the public
lands inventory project and submit the project report to the joint legislative
audit and review committee for review.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL
HEARINGS OFFICE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 846,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 847,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,693,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. FOR THE CONSERVATION
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,207,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,196,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 3,739,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,142,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the
water quality account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for
the agriculture, fish, and water negotiations to develop best management
practices that will protect and recover salmon. The commission shall make
grants to allow interest groups to participate in the negotiations.

(2) $1,601,000 of the
water quality account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the
completion of limiting factors analysis for watersheds affected by listings of
salmon and bull trout under the federal endangered species act.

(3) $247,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $247,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action item CC-01.

(4) By March 1, 2002,
the conservation reserve enhancement program contract with the federal farm
service agency shall be proposed for amendment to allow funding of flexible
riparian buffer standards consistent with: (a) The recommendations of the
state's agriculture/fish/water negotiation process; or (b) ordinances adopted
through municipal regulations in compliance with the state growth management
act requirement to protect critical areas. These ordinances shall be
scientifically defensible and include programs for monitoring and adaptive
management.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
FISH AND WILDLIFE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 50,950,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 51,412,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 37,366,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 24,365,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 475,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,094,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 586,000

Recreational Fisheries
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,032,000

Warm Water Game Fish
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,567,000

Eastern Washington Pheasant
Enhancement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 750,000

Wildlife Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 48,518,000

Wildlife Account‑-Federal
Appropriation........ $ 38,182,000

Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,133,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,941,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,591,000

Game Special Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Water Quality
Account--State Appropriation..... $ 1,000,000

Environmental Excellence
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,000

Regional Fisheries Salmonid
Recovery Account‑-

Federal Appropriation...................... $ 1,750,000

Oil Spill Administration
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 963,000

Oyster Reserve Land Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 135,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 295,175,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,682,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,682,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
items DFW-01 through DFW-07.

(2) Any indirect cost
reimbursement received by the department from federal grants must be spent on
agency administrative activities and cannot be redirected to direct program
activities.

(3) $200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $200,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the department to update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory.

(4) $550,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $550,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for salmonid smolt production monitoring.

(5) $250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $250,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the department to implement a hatchery endangered species act
response. The response shall include emergency hatchery responses, production,
and retrofitting of hatcheries for salmon recovery.

(6) $600,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $600,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for local salmon recovery technical assistance.

(7) $1,625,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,625,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to fund grants to lead entities established under chapter 77.85 RCW.
The department, in consultation with the lead entity advisory group and individual
lead entities, shall establish an application process and evaluation criteria
to allocate funds to up to 26 lead entities to provide core activities
identified in chapter 77.85 RCW. Grants to individual lead entities may range
from $37,500 to $150,000 per year.

(8) $125,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $125,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for a grant to the lower Skykomish River habitat conservation group for the
purpose of developing a salmon recovery plan, in coordination with the lead
entity established under chapter 77.85 RCW for that area. The salmon recovery
plan must be consistent with the regional recovery plans of the Puget Sound
shared strategy and criteria developed by the department for the regional
salmon recovery planning program.

(9) $1,000,000 of the
water quality‑-state appropriation is provided solely to fund grants to
lead entities established under chapter 77.85 RCW or watershed planning units
established under chapter 90.82 RCW that agree to coordinate the development of
comprehensive local and regional salmon recovery plans. The department shall
establish a model for local and regional plans as well as eligibility and
evaluation criteria for distribution of funds to lead entities and watershed
planning units. No annual grant shall exceed $125,000 per year.

(10) $91,000 of the
warm water game fish account appropriation is provided solely for warm water
fish culture at the Rod Meseberg warm water fish production facility.

(11) $300,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $300,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to fund four cooperative compliance programs, two in Western Washington
and two in Eastern Washington. The cooperative compliance program shall
conduct fish screen, fish way, and fish passage barrier assessments and
correction plans for landowners seeking cooperative compliance agreements with
the department.

(12) $650,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $650,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $5,000,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for economic
adjustment assistance to fishermen pursuant to the 1999 Pacific salmon treaty
agreement.

(13) $2,000,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided for cooperative
volunteer projects.

(14) $810,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $790,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$250,000 of the wildlife account‑-state appropriation are provided solely
for enforcement and biological staff to respond and take appropriate action to
public complaints regarding bear and cougar.

(15) The department
shall evaluate the fish program to determine if activities are aligned with
agency objectives. The report will include a core function analysis of all
fish program activity to determine if specific activities support the agency's
strategic plan. The department shall submit a report to the legislature and
the office of financial management by September 1, 2002.

(16) The department
shall implement a lands program manager consolidation program. The
consolidation program shall target the department's south central region. The
savings from this consolidation shall be used by the department for additional
maintenance on agency lands within the south central region.

(17) The department
shall implement a survey of all agency lands to evaluate whether agency lands
support the agency's strategic plan and goals. The department shall submit a
report to the governor and legislature by September 1, 2002, identifying those
lands not conforming with the agency's strategic plan and which should be
divested.

(18) $388,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $388,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to implement the forests and fish agreement and includes
funding to continue statewide coordination and implementation of the forests
and fish rules, integration of portions of the hydraulic code into the forest
practices rules to provide permit streamlining, and sharing the responsibility
of developing and implementing the required forests and fish agreement
monitoring and adaptive management program.

(19) $194,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $195,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for staff to represent the state's fish and wildlife interests
in hydroelectric project relicensing processes by the federal energy regulatory
commission.

(20) $156,000 of the
wildlife account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a youth
fishing coordinator to develop partnerships with local communities, and to
identify, develop, fund, and promote youth fishing events and opportunities.
Event coordination and promotion services shall be contracted to a private consultant.

(21) $135,000 of the
oyster reserve land account appropriation is provided solely to implement
chapter 273, Laws of 2001, Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1658
(state oyster reserve lands).

(22) $43,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $42,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive center.

(23) $32,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $33,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to support the activities of the aquatic nuisance species coordination
committee to foster state, federal, tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic
nuisance species issues. The committee shall strive to prevent the
introduction of nonnative aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species
that are introduced.

(24) $25,000 of the
wildlife account‑‑state appropriation is provided solely for the
WildWatchCam program to provide internet transmission of live views of
wildlife.

(25) $8,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $7,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the payment of the department's share of approved lake
management district assessments. By December 15, 2001, the department shall
provide the legislature a summary of its activities related to lake management
districts as well as recommendations for establishing equitable lake management
district assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 36,709,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 36,266,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,440,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,865,000

Forest Development Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 52,511,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,684,000

Surveys and Maps Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,689,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,458,000

Resources Management Cost
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 85,979,000

Surface Mining Reclamation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,549,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 625,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 2,900,000

Aquatic Land Dredged
Material Disposal Site

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,056,000

Natural Resource
Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account Appropriation...................... $ 34,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 629,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 64,000

Agricultural College Trust
Management Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,790,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 237,248,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $998,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01,
DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(2)(a) $625,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation, $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,250,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,900,000 of the water quality account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 4, Laws of 1999
sp. sess. (forest practices and salmon recovery).

(b) $250,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for and shall be
expended to develop a small forest landowner data base in ten counties.
$150,000 of the amount in this subsection shall be used to purchase the data.
$100,000 of the amount in this subsection shall purchase contracted analysis of
the data.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
forest development account appropriation is provided solely for road
decommissioning, maintenance, and repair in the Lake Whatcom watershed.

(4) $543,000 of the
forest fire protection assessment account appropriation, $22,000 of the forest
development account appropriation, and $76,000 of the resource management cost
account appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 279, Laws of 2001,
Substitute House Bill No. 2104, (modifying forest fire protection assessments).

(5) $895,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $895,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.

(6) The entire
appropriation from the access road revolving fund is provided solely for and
shall be expended to survey, map, and evaluate and construct, improve, or
abandon trust land roads to meet the requirements of the forests and fish
agreement.

(7) $4,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely to compensate the forest board trust for a portion of the lease
to the Crescent television improvement district consistent with RCW 79.12.055.

(8) The appropriation
from the off-road vehicle account‑‑state is provided under RCW
46.09.170(1)(a)(ii) and is provided solely for projects that bring off-road
vehicle recreation facilities into compliance with the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act
and do not compromise or impair sensitive natural resources.

(9) $828,000 of the
surface mine reclamation account appropriation is provided to implement
Engrossed House Bill No. 1845 (surface mining fees). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10) $800,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation and $200,000 of the resources
management cost account appropriation are provided solely to improve asset
management on state-owned aquatic lands. The department shall streamline the
use authorization process for businesses operating on state-owned aquatic lands
and issue decisions on 325 pending lease applications by June 30, 2002. The
department, in consultation with the attorney general, shall develop a
strategic program to resolve claims related to contaminated sediments on
state-owned aquatic lands.

(11) $246,000 of the
resource management cost account appropriation is provided to the department
for continuing control of spruce budworm.

(12) $100,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account is provided solely for the development and
initial implementation of a statewide management plan for the following marine
reserves: Cherry Point marine reserve, Fidalgo Bay marine reserve,
Commencement Bay marine reserve, Cypress Island marine reserve, and Maury
Island marine reserve.

(13) $7,657,859 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $7,657,859 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for emergency fire suppression.

(14) $7,216,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $6,584,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for fire protection activities and to implement provisions of the 1997
tridata fire program review.

(15) $275,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $275,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$550,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account‑-state appropriation
are provided solely to the department for planning, management, and stewardship
of natural area preserves and natural resources conservation areas.

(16) $187,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $188,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $375,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account‑-state appropriation are provided
solely to the department for maintenance and stewardship of public lands.

(17) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $400,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for
spartina control.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 8,165,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 8,024,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,636,000

General fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,110,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,304,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,672,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 26,911,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $36,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $37,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action item DOA-01.

(2) $832,000 of the
state toxics control account appropriation and $298,000 of the agricultural
local account are provided solely to establish a program to monitor pesticides
in surface water, evaluate pesticide exposure on salmon species listed under
the provisions of the endangered species act, and implement actions needed to
protect salmonids.

(3) $1,480,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely to initiate
a four-year plan to eradicate infestations of spartina in Puget Sound, Hood
Canal, and Grays Harbor and begin the reduction in spartina infestations in
Willapa Bay.

(4) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to the small
farm and direct marketing program to support small farms in complying with
federal, state, and local regulations, facilitating access to food processing
centers, and assisting with grant funding requests.

(5) $350,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $350,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $700,000 of
the general fund‑-private/local appropriation are provided solely to
implement chapter 324, Laws of 2001 (Substitute House Bill No. 1891, marketing
of agriculture). Of these amounts, $40,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation is provided solely to match funds provided by the red raspberry
commission to address unfair trade practices by other countries that result in
sales in Washington that are below the cost of production in Washington.

(6) $450,000 of the
state toxics control account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
deposit in the agricultural local nonappropriated account for the plant pest
account to reimburse county horticultural pest and disease boards for the costs
of pest control activities, including tree removal, conducted under their
existing authorities in chapters 15.08 and 15.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. FOR THE WASHINGTON
POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability
Insurance Program Trust Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 1,003,000

(End
of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 5,389,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 5,377,000

Architects' License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 707,000

Cemetery Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 214,000

Professional Engineers'
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,032,000

Real Estate Commission‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 6,777,000

Master License Account‑-State
Appropriation.... $ 8,409,000

Uniform Commercial Code
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,104,000

Real Estate Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 301,000

Funeral Directors and
Embalmers Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 490,000

Washington Real Estate
Research Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 316,000

Data Processing Revolving
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 23,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 34,139,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: In
accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is the policy of the state of Washington that
the cost of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For each
licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall set fees at
levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering the licensing
program, including any costs associated with policy enhancements funded in the
2001-03 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2001-03 fiscal
biennium, the department may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor if the increases are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 21,890,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 8,066,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,178,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 369,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,899,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,070,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,490,000

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 987,000

Fire Service Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 125,000

Fire Service Training
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,328,000

State Toxics Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 461,000

Violence Reduction and Drug
Enforcement Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 277,000

Fingerprint Identification
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,684,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 68,824,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $354,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for
additional law enforcement and security coverage on the west capitol campus.

(2) When a program
within the agency is supported by more than one fund and one of the funds is
the state general fund, the agency shall charge its expenditures in such a
manner as to ensure that each fund is charged in proportion to its support of
the program. The agency may adopt guidelines for the implementation of this
subsection. The guidelines may account for federal matching requirements,
budget provisos, or other requirements to spend other moneys in a particular
manner.

(3) $100,000 of the
public safety and education account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5896 (DNA testing of evidence).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4) $1,419,000 of the
public safety and education account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for combating the proliferation of methamphetamine labs. The amounts in this
subsection are provided solely for the following activities: (a) The
establishment of a regional methamphetamine enforcement, training, and
education program; (b) additional members for the statewide methamphetamine
incident response team; and (c) two forensic scientists with the necessary
equipment to perform lab analysis in the crime laboratory division.

(5) A study regarding
the mobilization of state fire service resources in response to state declared
mobilizations shall be performed by the chief of the Washington state patrol
through the director of fire protection. The study shall examine and evaluate
the cost effectiveness and efficiency of the fire services mobilization plan,
and the fire resources mobilization processes and procedures. One member of
each of the following organizations shall be represented and shall provide
assistance to the director of fire protection with this task: Emergency
management division, department of natural resources, Washington state fire
commissioners, Washington state association of fire chiefs, Washington state
association of fire fighters, and the Washington state fire fighters council.
In addition, one rural fire chief and one urban fire chief shall be
designated. The chief of the Washington state patrol shall report the findings
through the director of fire protection to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2001.

(6)
Beginning in fiscal year 2003, the funding provided in this subsection assumes
a transfer of $12,623,000 of state patrol expenditures from the omnibus
operating budget to the transportation budget. If new transportation revenue
is not enacted before this time, the omnibus budget will restore this funding
in the 2002 legislative session.

(End
of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY
OPERATIONS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 12,357,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 12,266,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,668,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 48,291,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) $11,385,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $11,394,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. Of this amount, $350,000 is provided in each fiscal year
for upgrading information systems including the general apportionment and
student information systems.

(b) $541,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $441,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education,
including basic education assistance activities. Of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $100,000 is provided solely for certificate
of mastery development and validation.

(c) $431,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $431,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator
standards board.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 17,274,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 19,407,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 213,016,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 249,697,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are provided solely for the statewide programs specified in
this subsection and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY

(i) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $150,000 of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided
for alcohol and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(ii) A maximum
$2,621,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $2,621,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for a corps of nurses located at educational
service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction,
to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students,
health education, and training for school staff.

(iii) A maximum of
$100,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and a maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided to create a school safety center subject to the
following conditions and limitations.

(A) The safety center
shall: Disseminate successful models of school safety plans and cooperative
efforts; provide assistance to schools to establish a comprehensive safe school
plan; select models of cooperative efforts that have been proven successful;
act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state; coordinate
activities relating to school safety; review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training; and develop and maintain a school
safety information web site.

(B) The school safety
center shall be established in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall participate in a
school safety center advisory committee that includes representatives of
educators, classified staff, principals, superintendents, administrators, the
American society for industrial security, the state criminal justice training
commission, and others deemed appropriate and approved by the school safety
center advisory committee. Members of the committee shall be chosen by the
groups they represent. In addition, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall appoint representatives of law enforcement to participate
on the school safety center advisory committee. The advisory committee shall
select a chair.

(C) The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop a training program, using the best
practices in school safety, for all school safety personnel.

(iv) A maximum of
$113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and a
maximum of $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided for a school safety training program provided by the criminal
justice training commission subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(A) The criminal
justice training commission with assistance of the school safety center
advisory committee established in section 2(b)(iii) of this section shall
develop manuals and curricula for a training program for all school safety
personnel.

(B) The Washington
state criminal justice training commission, in collaboration with the advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety personnel
hired after the effective date of this section.

(v) A maximum of
$250,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and a maximum of $250,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for training in school
districts regarding the prevention of bullying and harassment. The
superintendent of public instruction shall use the funds to develop a model
bullying and harassment prevention policy and training materials for school and
educational service districts. The information may be disseminated in a
variety of ways, including workshops and other staff development activities
such as videotape or broadcasts.

(vi) A maximum of
$6,042,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and a maximum of $6,028,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for a safety allocation to
districts subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(A) The funds shall be
allocated at a maximum rate of $6.36 per year per full-time equivalent K-12
student enrolled in each school district in the prior school year.

(B) Districts shall
expend funds allocated under this section to develop and implement strategies
identified in a comprehensive safe school plan pursuant to House Bill No. 1818
(student safety) or Senate Bill No. 5543 (student safety). If neither bill is enacted
by June 30, 2001, expenditures of the safety allocation shall be subject to
(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection (a)(vi)(B).

(i) School districts
shall use the funds for school safety purposes and are encouraged to prioritize
the use of funds allocated under this section for the development, by September
1, 2002, of school-based comprehensive safe school plans that include
prevention, intervention, all-hazards/crisis response, and post crisis recovery
components. When developing comprehensive safe school plans, school districts
are encouraged to use model school safety plans as developed by the school
safety center. Implementation of comprehensive safe school plans may include,
but is not limited to, employing or contracting for building security monitors
in schools during school hours and school events; research-based early
prevention and intervention programs; training for school staff, including
security personnel; equipment; school safety hotlines; before, during, and
after-school student and staff safety; minor building renovations related to
student and staff safety and security; and other purposes identified in the
comprehensive safe school plan.

(ii) Each school may
conduct an evaluation of its comprehensive safe school plan and conduct reviews,
drills, or simulated practices in coordination with local fire, law
enforcement, and medical emergency management agencies.

(iii) By September 1,
2002, school districts shall provide the superintendent of public instruction
information regarding the purposes for which the safety allocation funding was
used and the status of the comprehensive safe school plans for the schools in
the school district.

(vii) A maximum of
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, a
maximum of $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $400,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
transferred from the department of health are provided for a program that
provides grants to school districts for media campaigns promoting sexual
abstinence and addressing the importance of delaying sexual activity,
pregnancy, and childbearing until individuals are ready to nurture and support
their children. Grants to the school districts shall be for projects that are
substantially designed and produced by students. The grants shall require a
local private sector match equal to one-half of the state grant, which may
include in-kind contribution of technical or other assistance from consultants
or firms involved in public relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics
or video production or other related fields.

(viii) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for a nonviolence and leadership training program
provided by the institute for community leadership. The program shall provide
the following:

(A) Statewide
nonviolence leadership coaches training program for certification of teachers
and community members in nonviolence leadership workshops;

(B) Statewide
leadership nonviolence student exchanges, training, and speaking opportunities
for student workshop participants; and

(C) A request for
proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence leadership
workshops serving at least 12 school districts with direct programming in 36
elementary, middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.

(ix) A maximum of
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for school district petitions to juvenile court
for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation
of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions
filed.

(b) TECHNOLOGY

(i) A maximum of
$2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for K-20 telecommunications network technical
support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions
in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing
capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering
and advanced technical support for the network. A maximum of $650,000 of this
amount may be expended for state-level administration and staff training on the
K-20 network.

(ii) A maximum of
$617,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $1,112,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the Washington state leadership assistance
for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the
Pacific Science Center.

(c) GRANTS AND
ALLOCATIONS

(i) A maximum of
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
a maximum of $1,975,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for Senate Bill No. 5695 (alternative
certification routes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse. The stipend allocation per teacher
candidate and mentor pair shall not exceed $28,318. The professional educator
standards board shall report to the education committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2002, on the districts applying for partnership grants, the
districts receiving partnership grants, and the number of interns per route
enrolled in each district.

(ii) A maximum of
$31,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
a maximum of $31,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided for operation of the Cispus environmental learning
center.

(iii) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the Washington civil liberties education
program.

(iv) A maximum of
$2,150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $2,150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for complex need grants. The maximum grants for
eligible districts are specified in LEAP Document 30C as developed on April 27,
1997, at 03:00 hours.

(v) A maximum of
$1,377,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $1,377,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for educational centers, including state support
activities. $100,000 of this amount is provided to help stabilize funding
through distribution among existing education centers that are currently funded
by the state at an amount less than $100,000 a biennium.

(vi) A maximum of
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
a maximum of $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided for an organization in southwest Washington that
received funding from the Spokane educational center in the 1995-97 biennium
and provides educational services to students who have dropped out of school.

(vii) A maximum of
$1,262,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $1,262,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for in-service training and educational programs
conducted by the Pacific Science Center.

(viii) A maximum of
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided to support vocational student leadership
organizations.

(ix) $9,900,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the Washington Reads
project to enhance high quality reading instruction and school programs.

(x) A maximum of
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the World War II oral history project.

(xi) $30,700,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for school renovation
grants for school districts with urgent school renovation needs, special
education-related renovations, and technology related renovations.

(xii) $1,952,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for LINKS technology
challenge grants to integrate educational reform with state technology systems
and development of technology products that enhance professional development
and classroom instruction.

(xiii) $423,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the advanced
placement fee program to increase opportunities for low-income students and
under-represented populations to participate in advanced placement courses and
to increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses to
students.

(xiv) $12,318,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for comprehensive
school reform demonstration projects to provide grants to low-income schools
for improving student achievement through adoption and implementation of
research-based curricula and instructional programs.

(xv) $4,228,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for teacher quality
enhancement through provision of consortia grants to school districts and
higher education institutions to improve teacher preparation and professional
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,760,826,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 3,751,350,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,512,176,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
certificated staff salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be
determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated pursuant to
this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in (d) through
(f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6
shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under
(d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be as
follows:

(a) On the basis of
each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments, excluding full-time
equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated staff unit
allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i) Four certificated
administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-12;

(ii) 49 certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
K-3;

(iii) Forty‑six certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
4-12; and

(iv) An additional 4.2
certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3 and an additional 7.2
certificated instructional staff units for grade 4. Any funds allocated for
the additional certificated units provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be
considered as basic education funding;

(v) For class size
reduction and expanded learning opportunities under the better schools program,
an additional 2.2 certificated instructional staff units for grades K-4 per
thousand full-time equivalent students. Funds allocated for these additional
certificated units shall not be considered as basic education funding. The
allocation may be used for reducing class sizes in grades K-4 or to provide
additional classroom contact hours for kindergarten, before-and-after-school
programs, weekend school programs, summer school programs, and intercession
opportunities to assist elementary school students in meeting the essential
academic learning requirements and student assessment performance standards.
For purposes of this subsection, additional classroom contact hours provided by
teachers beyond the normal school day under a supplemental contract shall be
converted to a certificated full-time equivalent by dividing the classroom
contact hours by 900.

(A) Funds provided
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in excess of the amount required to
maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b)
shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual ratio equal to or
greater than 55.4 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-4. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio achieved in
that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B) Districts at or
above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 55.4 funding
ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned to
basic education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C) Any district
maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 55.4 certificated instructional
staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may use
allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in excess of
that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b)
to employ additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) shall only be expended to reduce class size in
grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional funding ratio
amount may be expended for provision of classified instructional assistants;

(b) For school
districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent students whose
full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month exceeds the
first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5 percent, an
additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such increased
enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time equivalent
students been included in the normal enrollment count for that particular
month;

(c)(i) On the basis of
full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(A) Vocational
education programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction, a
maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent vocational
students; and

(B) Skills center
programs meeting the standards for skills center funding established in January
1999 by the superintendent of public instruction, 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative units for each
16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students; and

(ii) Vocational
full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as
the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be
adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same monthly basis as those
adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support;

(d) For districts
enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district
which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of education
and enroll not more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:

(i) For those enrolling
no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and
0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than
five students, plus one‑twentieth of a certificated instructional staff
unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii) For those
enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not
more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated instructional
staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e) For specified
enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five but not more
than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8,
and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than
twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8
and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state board of
education:

(i) For enrollment of
up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative
staff units; and

(ii) For enrollment of
up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8,
0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative staff units;

(f) For districts
operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades
9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i) For remote and
necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty‑five
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one‑half
certificated instructional staff units and one‑quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;

(ii) For all other
small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff
units and one‑half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the
first sixty average annual full time equivalent students, and additional staff
units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and
0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty‑three
and one‑half average annual full time equivalent students.

Units calculated under
(f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated staff units at the
rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff units and four
certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational full-time
equivalent students.

(g) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half
of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h) For each nonhigh
school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average
full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students,
operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one‑half
of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3) Allocations for
classified salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be
calculated using formula‑generated classified staff units determined as
follows:

(a) For enrollments
generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection (2)(d) through
(h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three certificated
staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b) For all other
enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time equivalent
enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students; and

(c) For each nonhigh
school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time
equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional
one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4) Fringe benefit
allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 11.27 percent in the 2001-02
school year and 11.27 percent in the 2002-03 school year for certificated
salary allocations provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of
12.92 percent in the 2001-02 school year and 12.92 percent in the 2002-03
school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of
this section.

(5) Insurance benefit
allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate specified in section
504(3) of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows:

(a) The number of
certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this section; and

(b) The number of
classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied
by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that, for the
purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with
no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.

(6)(a) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit allocated
under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section, there shall
be provided a maximum of $8,519 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02
school year and a maximum of $8,715 per certificated staff unit in the 2002-03
school year.

(b) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $20,920 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school
year and a maximum of $21,401 per certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school
year.

(c) For
nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated staff
unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $16,233 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school
year and a maximum of $16,606 per certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school
year.

(7) Allocations for
substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at a maintenance
rate of $494.34 for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years per allocated
classroom teachers exclusive of salary increase amounts provided in section 504
of this act. Solely for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom
teachers shall be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio between
the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and the number of
actual basic education certificated instructional staff reported statewide for
the prior school year.

(8) Any school district
board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by
submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any
portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The
superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if
it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be
for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant
to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9) The superintendent
may distribute a maximum of $6,510,000 outside the basic education formula
during fiscal years 2002 and 2003 as follows:

(a) For fire protection
for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of $480,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $491,000 may be expended in fiscal
year 2003;

(b) For summer
vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $2,098,000 may be expended
each fiscal year;

(c) A maximum of
$343,000 may be expended for school district emergencies; and

(d) A maximum of
$500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing skills training
for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work
programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds
shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent
student enrolled in those programs.

(10) For purposes of
RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student in state basic
education appropriations provided under this act, including appropriations for
salary and benefits increases, is 2.5 percent from the 2000-01 school year to
the 2001-02 school year, and 3.3 percent from the 2000-01 school year to the
2002-03 school year.

(11) If two or more
school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic
education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this
section, the following shall apply:

(a) For three school
years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff
units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units
received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and

(b) For the fourth
through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the
basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school
year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section shall
be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund allocations for
certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff
units under section 502 of this act:

(a) Salary allocations
for certificated instructional staff units shall be determined for each district
by multiplying the district's certificated instructional total base salary
shown on LEAP Document 12E for the appropriate year, by the district's average
staff mix factor for basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document 1S; and

(b) Salary allocations
for certificated administrative staff units and classified staff units for each
district shall be based on the district's certificated administrative and
classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 12E for the
appropriate year.

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Basic
education certificated instructional staff" is defined as provided in RCW
28A.150.100 and "special education certificated staff" means staff assigned
to the state-supported special education program pursuant to chapter 28A.155
RCW in positions requiring a certificate;

(b) "LEAP Document
1S" means the computerized tabulation establishing staff mix factors for
certificated instructional staff according to education and years of
experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee on March 25, 1999, at 16:55 hours; and

(c) "LEAP Document
12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2001-02 and 2002-03 school year
salary allocations for certificated administrative staff and classified staff
and derived and total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
March 13, 2001, at 16:32 hours.

(3) Incremental fringe
benefit factors shall be applied to salary adjustments at a rate of 10.63
percent for school years 2001-02 and 2002-03 for certificated staff and 9.42
percent for school years 2001-02 and 2002-03 for classified staff.

(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410, the following state‑wide salary allocation schedules for
certificated instructional staff are established for basic education salary
allocations:

K-12 Salary Schedule
for Certificated Instructional Staff

2001-02
School Year

Years of

Service BA
BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 27,467 28,209 28,977 29,746 32,219

1 27,836 28,588 29,366 30,171 32,668

2 28,464 29,231 30,025 30,900 33,414

3 29,401 30,192 31,009 31,931 34,490

4 30,063 30,896 31,727 32,689 35,290

5 30,750 31,595 32,443 33,468 36,085

6 31,147 31,974 32,850 33,928 36,531

7 32,164 33,010 33,909 35,055 37,724

8 33,195 34,088 35,008 36,248 38,954

9 35,205 36,169 37,455 40,223

10 37,344 38,724 41,529

11 40,029 42,895

12 41,293 44,298

13 45,736

14 47,181

15 48,408

16 or more 49,376

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 33,811 32,931 35,403 36,996

1 34,252 33,297 35,793 37,377

2 35,030 33,995 36,509 38,124

3 36,177 35,027 37,585 39,273

4 37,007 35,755 38,355 40,072

5 37,853 36,503 39,121 40,889

6 38,308 36,904 39,508 41,285

7 39,569 38,031 40,700 42,546

8 40,867 39,225 41,930 43,843

9 42,201 40,430 43,200 45,177

10 43,572 41,700 44,505 46,549

11 44,979 43,005 45,872 47,956

12 46,446 44,362 47,275 49,422

13 47,947 45,766 48,712 50,923

14 49,505 47,212 50,251 52,481

15 50,792 48,439 51,557 53,846

16 or more 51,808 49,407 52,589 54,923

K-12 Allocation Salary
Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2002-03
School Year

Years of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 28,318 29,083 29,875 30,668 33,217

1 28,699 29,473 30,276 31,106 33,680

2 29,345 30,137 30,955 31,857 34,449

3 30,312 31,127 31,970 32,920 35,559

4 30,994 31,854 32,710 33,702 36,383

5 31,703 32,574 33,448 34,505 37,203

6 32,112 32,964 33,868 34,979 37,663

7 33,160 34,033 34,959 36,141 38,893

8 34,223 35,145 36,092 37,372 40,161

9 36,295 37,289 38,616 41,470

10 38,501 39,923 42,815

11 41,269 44,225

12 42,572 45,671

13 47,153

14 48,642

15 49,907

16 or more 50,906

Years of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 34,859 33,951 36,500 38,142

1 35,313 34,328 36,902 38,535

2 36,116 35,048 37,640 39,305

3 37,298 36,112 38,750 40,490

4 38,153 36,863 39,544 41,314

5 39,026 37,634 40,333 42,156

6 39,495 38,047 40,732 42,564

7 40,795 39,210 41,961 43,864

8 42,133 40,440 43,229 45,201

9 43,509 41,683 44,538 46,577

10 44,922 42,992 45,884 47,991

11 46,373 44,337 47,293 49,442

12 47,885 45,736 48,739 50,953

13 49,432 47,184 50,221 52,501

14 51,039 48,675 51,808 54,107

15 52,366 49,940 53,155 55,514

16 or more 53,413 50,938 54,218 56,624

(b) As used in this
subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the number of
credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c) For credits earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree, any credits in
excess of forty‑five credits may be counted after the masters degree.
Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer
to the total of:

(i) Credits earned
since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii) Any credits in
excess of forty‑five credits that were earned after the baccalaureate
degree but before the masters degree.

(5) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "BA"
means a baccalaureate degree.

(b) "MA"
means a masters degree.

(c) "PHD"
means a doctorate degree.

(d) "Years of
service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction.

(e) "Credits"
means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed
in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6) No more than ninety
college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate
degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state salary
allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a) The employee has a
masters degree; or

(b) The credits were
used in generating state salary allocations before January 1, 1992.

(7) The certificated
instructional staff base salary specified for each district in LEAP Document
12E and the salary schedules in subsection (4)(a) of this section include three
learning improvement days originally added in the 1999-00 school year. A
school district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds for school
years 2001-02 and 2002-03, only if three days have been added to the base
contract in effect for the 1998-99 school year. If fewer than three days are
added, the additional learning improvement allocation shall be adjusted
accordingly. The additional days shall be for activities related to improving
student learning consistent with education reform implementation. The length
of a learning improvement day shall not be less than the length of a full day
under the base contract. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure
that school districts adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.

(8) The salary
allocation schedules established in this section are for allocation purposes
only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 122,747,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 271,329,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 394,076,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $318,024,000 is
provided for a cost of living adjustment for state formula staff units of 3.7
percent effective September 1, 2001, and another salary adjustment effective on
September 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature
consistent with the provisions of chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure
No. 732). The appropriations include associated incremental fringe benefit
allocations at rates of 10.63 percent for school years 2001-02 and 2002-03 for
certificated staff and 9.42 percent for school years 2001-02 and 2002-03 for
classified staff.

(a) The appropriations
in this section include the increased portion of salaries and incremental
fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this
act, in accordance with chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732).
Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of superintendent of
public instruction and the education reform program are provided in part VII of
this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic education) are based on
the salary allocation schedules and methodology in section 502 of this act.
Increases for special education result from increases in each district's basic
education allocation per student. Increases for educational service districts
and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of
public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and
benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b) The appropriations
in this section provide cost-of-living and incremental fringe benefit
allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

School
Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per
weighted pupil mile) $ 0.77 $ 1.44

Highly Capable (per formula
student) $ 8.75 $ 16.35

Transitional Bilingual
Education (per eligible

bilingual student) $
22.73 $ 42.48

Learning Assistance (per
entitlement unit) $ 11.23 $ 20.99

Substitute Teacher
(allocation per teacher,

section 502(7)) $
18.29 $ 34.18

(2) This act appropriates
general fund‑-state funds for the purpose of providing the annual salary
cost-of-living increase required by section 2, chapter 4, Laws of 2001
(Initiative Measure No. 732) for teachers and other school district employees
in the state-funded salary base. For employees not included in the
state-funded salary base, the annual salary cost-of-living increase may be
provided by school districts from the federal funds appropriated in this act
and local revenues, including the adjusted levy base as provided in RCW
84.52.053 and section 502 of this act, and state discretionary funds provided
under this act.

(3) $76,052,000 is
provided for adjustments to insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance
rate for insurance benefit allocations is $427.73 per month for the 2001-02 and
2002-03 school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $453.55 per month for the 2001-02 school year and $490.04 per month
for the 2002-03 school year at the following rates:

School
Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per
weighted pupil mile) $ 0.24 $ 0.57

Highly Capable (per formula
student) $ 1.67 $ 3.96

Transitional Bilingual
Education (per eligible

bilingual student) $
4.18 $ 10.09

Learning Assistance (per
entitlement unit) $ 3.29 $ 7.93

(4) The rates specified
in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
505. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 193,198,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 194,293,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 387,491,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$767,000 of this fiscal year 2002 appropriation and a maximum of $785,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 appropriation may be expended for regional transportation
coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall
ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding
shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.

(3) $15,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $20,000 of the fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided solely for the transportation of students enrolled
in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be limited to low-income
students who are transferring to "choice" programs solely for
educational reasons.

(4) Allocations for
transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement rates of $37.11 per
weighted mile in the 2001-02 school year and $37.38 per weighted mile in the
2002-03 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in
section 504 of this act. Allocations for transportation of students
transported more than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as
determined by superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for transportation of
students living within one radius mile shall be based on the number of enrolled
students in grades kindergarten through five living within one radius mile of
their assigned school multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rate for the
school year multiplied by 1.29.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
506. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,100,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 3,100,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 225,630,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 231,830,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs.

(2) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $100,000 of
the 2003 fiscal year appropriation are provided for summer food programs for
children in low-income areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
507. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 419,264,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 420,644,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 256,092,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,096,000,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding for special
education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW
28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as
a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation
accruing through sections 502 and 504 of this act. To the extent a school
district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students
under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it
shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.

(2)(a) Effective with
the 2001-02 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall change
the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related accounting requirements to
ensure that:

(i) Special education
students are basic education students first;

(ii) As a class,
special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation;
and

(iii) Special education
students are basic education students for the entire school day.

(b) Effective with the
2001-02 school year, the S-275 and accounting changes shall supercede any prior
excess cost methodologies and shall be required of all school districts.

(3) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(4) The superintendent
of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school districts based on
two categories: The optional birth through age two program for special
education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the
mandatory special education program for special education eligible students
ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible student"
means a student receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a
properly formulated individualized education program.

(5)(a) For the 2001-02
and 2002-03 school years, the superintendent shall distribute state funds to
each district based on the sum of:

(i) A district's annual
average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed infants and toddlers
ages birth through two, multiplied by the district's average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and

(ii) A district's
annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment multiplied by
the funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this
section, multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.

(b) For purposes of
this subsection, "average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student" for a district shall be based on the staffing ratios
required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not include enhancements, secondary
vocational education, or small schools.

(6) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Annual
average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment" means the
resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an interdistrict
cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(b) "Enrollment
percent" means the district's resident special education annual average
enrollment, excluding the birth through age two enrollment, as a percent of the
district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment. For
the 2001-02 and the 2002-03 school years, each district's funded enrollment
percent shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent for the
school year for which the allocation is being determined or 12.7 percent for
the 2001-02 school year or 13.0 percent for the 2002-03 school year.

(7) At the request of
any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost
services for special education students of the districts are provided by the
cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be 12.7 percent for the
2001-02 school year and 13.0 percent for the 2002-03 school year, and shall be
calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For
purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.

(8) A maximum of
$12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $10,623,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided as safety net funding for districts with
demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. Safety net funding shall be
awarded by the state safety net oversight committee.

(a) The safety net
oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts adversely
affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding formula. Awards
shall be based on the lesser of the amount required to maintain the 1994-95
state special education excess cost allocation to the school district in
aggregate or on a dollar per funded student basis.

(b) The committee shall
then consider unmet needs for districts that can convincingly demonstrate that
all legitimate expenditures for special education exceed all available revenues
from state funding formulas. In the determination of need, the committee shall
also consider additional available revenues from federal and local sources.
Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.

(c) The maximum
allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net eligibility may not exceed
the federal restricted indirect cost rate for the district plus one percent.

(d) Safety net awards
shall be adjusted based on the percent of potential medicaid eligible students
billed as calculated by the superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws
of 1999.

(e) Safety net awards
must be adjusted for any audit findings or exceptions related to special
education funding.

(f) The superintendent
may expend up to $120,000 per year of the amounts provided in this subsection
to provide staff assistance to the committee in analyzing applications for
safety net funds received by the committee.

(9) The superintendent
of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as are necessary to
administer the special education funding and safety net award process. Prior
to revising any standards, procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall
consult with the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of
the legislature.

(10) The safety net
oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public instruction shall
consist of:

(a) One staff from the
office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b) Staff of the office
of the state auditor;

(c) Staff of the office
of the financial management; and

(d) One or more
representatives from school districts or educational service districts
knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(11) To the extent
necessary, $5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall be
expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or more
individual special education students. If safety net awards to meet the
extraordinary needs exceed $5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation, the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. General fund‑-state
funds shall not be expended for this purpose.

(12) A maximum of
$678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state appropriations to
fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time equivalent aides at
children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This amount is in lieu of
money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special
education program.

(13) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for projects to provide
special education students with appropriate job and independent living skills,
including work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(14) The superintendent
shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85
percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal
funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education
services from educational service districts, and for staff development
activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(15) A maximum of
$1,200,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation may be expended by
the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion strategies by
school districts for provision of special education services. The
superintendent shall prepare an information database on laws, best practices,
examples of programs, and recommended resources. The information may be
disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.

(16) A school district
may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of general fund‑-state
funds allocated under this program; however, carry over funds shall be expended
in the special education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
508. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 3,595,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,588,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,183,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in each
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) A maximum of
$253,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund appropriation and a maximum of
$254,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund appropriation may be expended for
regional traffic safety education coordinators.

(3) Allocations to
provide tuition assistance for students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch who complete the program shall be a maximum of $203.97 per eligible
student in the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
509. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 4,768,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 4,768,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 9,536,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The educational
service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the
superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

(2) $250,000 of the
general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $250,000 of the general
fund appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for student
teaching centers as provided in RCW 28A.415.100.

(3) A maximum of
$250,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund appropriation and a maximum of
$250,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund appropriation are provided for
centers for the improvement of teaching pursuant to RCW 28A.415.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
510. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 136,315,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 148,329,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 284,644,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
511. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 19,133,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 19,115,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 46,796,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund‑-state
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) State funding
provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a
220‑day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall
monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs
to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.

(3) State funding for
each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual
average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each
category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97
biennium.

(4) The funded staffing
ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of
corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99
biennium.

(5) $141,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $139,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related
support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not
sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff
to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and health
services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under
the department of corrections, and programs for juveniles under the juvenile
rehabilitation administration.

(6) Ten percent of the
funds allocated for each institution may be carried over from one year to the
next.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
512. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,443,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 6,397,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 12,840,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Allocations for
school district programs for highly capable students shall be distributed at a
maximum rate of $328.10 per funded student for the 2001-02 school year and
$328.05 per funded student for the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded
students shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.

(3) $175,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $175,000 of the fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided for the centrum program at Fort Worden state park.

(4) $93,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $93,000 of the fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided for the Washington imagination network and future
problem-solving programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
513. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY
SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 288,166,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
514. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 37,039,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 39,906,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 79,945,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $322,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $322,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the academic achievement and accountability commission.

(2) $11,209,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $10,872,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$3,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided for
development and implementation of the Washington assessments of student
learning. Up to $689,000 of the appropriation may be expended for data
analysis and data management of test results.

(3) $1,095,000 of the
fiscal year 2002 general fund‑‑state appropriation and $1,095,000
of the fiscal year 2003 general fund‑‑state appropriation are
provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom assistants and
certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as provided in RCW
28A.415.310.

(4) $4,695,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,695,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy.
Up to $200,000 of the amount in this subsection may be used each fiscal year to
operate a mentor academy to help districts provide effective training for peer
mentors. Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.

(a) A teacher
assistance program is a program that provides to a first year beginning teacher
peer mentor services that include but are not limited to:

(i) An orientation
process and individualized assistance to help beginning teachers who have been
hired prior to the start of the school year prepare for the start of a school
year;

(ii) The assignment of
a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the beginning teacher include but are
not limited to constructive feedback, the modeling of instructional strategies,
and frequent meetings and other forms of contact;

(iii) The provision by
peer mentors of strategies, training, and guidance in critical areas such as
classroom management, student discipline, curriculum management, instructional
skill, assessment, communication skills, and professional conduct. A district
may provide these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including cohort
groups, of beginning teachers;

(iv) The provision of
release time, substitutes, mentor training in observation techniques, and other
measures for both peer mentors and beginning teachers, to allow each an
adequate amount of time to observe the other and to provide the classroom
experience that each needs to work together effectively;

(v) Assistance in the
incorporation of the essential academic learning requirements into instructional
plans and in the development of complex teaching strategies, including
strategies to raise the achievement of students with diverse learning styles
and backgrounds; and

(vi) Guidance and
assistance in the development and implementation of a professional growth
plan. The plan shall include a professional self-evaluation component and one
or more informal performance assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in
any evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer mentor
has assisted through this program.

(b) In addition to the
services provided in (a) of this subsection, an eligible peer mentor program
shall include but is not limited to the following components:

(i) Strong
collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning teacher's principal, and the
beginning teacher;

(ii) Stipends for peer
mentors and, at the option of a district, for beginning teachers. The stipends
shall not be deemed compensation for the purposes of salary lid compliance
under RCW 28A.400.200 and are not subject to the continuing contract provisions
of Title 28A RCW; and

(iii) To the extent
that resources are available for this purpose and that assistance to beginning
teachers is not adversely impacted, the program may serve second year and more
experienced teachers who request the assistance of peer mentors.

(5) $2,025,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,025,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on
school district technology development, promoting standards for school district
technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support centers,
including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW. The
superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to facilitate
the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to school districts
which includes the following: Creation of a general listing of the types of
available online curriculum courses; a survey conducted by each regional
educational technology support center of school districts in its region
regarding the types of online curriculum courses desired by school districts; a
process to evaluate and recommend to school districts the best online courses
in terms of curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.

(6) $3,600,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $3,600,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of care for
children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant proposals
from school districts shall contain local plans designed collaboratively with
community service providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area
in which the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible. Grant
funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(7) $2,500,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,500,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through
28A.235.155.

(8) $1,409,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,409,000 of
the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents,
principals, and program administrators.

(9) $1,828,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,828,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the mathematics helping corps subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(a) In order to
increase the availability and quality of technical mathematics assistance
statewide, the superintendent of public instruction shall employ mathematics
school improvement specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts.
The specialists shall be hired by and work under the direction of a statewide
school improvement coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall
serve on a rotating basis from one to three years and shall not be permanent
employees of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) The school
improvement specialists shall provide the following:

(i) Assistance to
schools to disaggregate student performance data and develop improvement plans
based on those data;

(ii) Consultation with
schools and districts concerning their performance on the Washington assessment
of student learning and other assessments emphasizing the performance on the
mathematics assessments;

(iii) Consultation
concerning curricula that aligns with the essential academic learning
requirements emphasizing the academic learning requirements for mathematics,
the Washington assessment of student learning, and meets the needs of diverse
learners;

(iv) Assistance in the
identification and implementation of research-based instructional practices in
mathematics;

(v) Staff training that
emphasizes effective instructional strategies and classroom-based assessment
for mathematics;

(vi) Assistance in
developing and implementing family and community involvement programs
emphasizing mathematics; and

(vii) Other assistance
to schools and school districts intended to improve student mathematics
learning.

(10) A maximum of
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for summer accountability institutes offered by
the superintendent of public instruction and the academic achievement and
accountability commission. The institutes shall provide school district staff
with training in the analysis of student assessment data, information regarding
successful district and school teaching models, research on curriculum and
instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve instruction in
reading, mathematics, language arts, and guidance and counseling.

(11) $4,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $4,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the Washington reading corps subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a) Grants shall be
allocated to schools and school districts to implement proven, research-based
mentoring and tutoring programs in reading for low-performing students in
grades K-6. If the grant is made to a school district, the principals of
schools enrolling targeted students shall be consulted concerning design and
implementation of the program.

(b) The programs may be
implemented before, after, or during the regular school day, or on Saturdays,
summer, intercessions, or other vacation periods.

(c) Two or more schools
may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d) A program is
eligible for a grant if it meets the following conditions:

(i) The program employs
methods of teaching and student learning based on reliable reading/literacy
research and effective practices;

(ii) The program design
is comprehensive and includes instruction, on-going student assessment,
professional development, parental/community involvement, and program
management aligned with the school's reading curriculum;

(iii) It provides
quality professional development and training for teachers, staff, and
volunteer mentors and tutors;

(iv) It has measurable
goals for student reading aligned with the essential academic learning
requirements; and

(v) It contains an
evaluation component to determine the effectiveness of the program.

(e) Funding priority
shall be given to low-performing schools.

(f) Beginning and
end-of-program testing data shall be available to determine the effectiveness
of funded programs and practices. Common evaluative criteria across programs,
such as grade-level improvements shall be available for each reading corps
program. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide program
evaluations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
Administrative and evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual
appropriation for the program.

(g) Grants provided
under this section may be used by schools and school districts for expenditures
from September 2001 through August 31, 2003.

(12) $307,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $530,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for salary bonuses for teachers who attain certification by the national
board for professional teaching standards.

(a) In the 2001-02
school year, teachers who have attained certification by the national board in
the 2000-01 school year or the 2001-02 school year shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500.

(b) In the 2002-03
school year, teachers who have attained certification by the national board in
the 2001-02 school year or the 2002-03 school year shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500.

(c) The annual bonus
shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall not be included in the definition
of "earnable compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).

(d) It is the intent of
the legislature that teachers achieving certification by the national board of
professional teaching standards will receive no more than two bonus payments
under this subsection.

(13) $625,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $625,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for a principal support program. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may contract with an independent organization to administer the
program. The program shall include: (a) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate; and (b)
participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of between one and
three years with the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her
build the skills identified as critical to the success of the professional
growth plan.

(14) $71,000 of the
general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $71,000
of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the second grade reading test. The funds shall be expended
for assessment training for new second grade teachers and replacement of
assessment materials.

(15) $384,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $384,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for the superintendent to assist schools in implementing high academic
standards, aligning curriculum with these standards, and training teachers to
use assessments to improve student learning. Funds may also be used to
increase community and parental awareness of education reform.

(16) $130,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $130,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment
data, and other information that assists schools and teachers implementing
higher academic standards.

(17) $2,357,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $5,343,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely
for the implementation of focused assistance pursuant to Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5625 (focused assistance to schools). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
515. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 43,044,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 45,171,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 88,215,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) The superintendent
shall distribute a maximum of $687.19 per eligible bilingual student in the
2001-02 school year and $687.19 in the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary
and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.

(3) The superintendent
may withhold up to $295,000 in school year 2001-02 and up to $268,000 in school
year 2002-03, and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, for the central provision of assessments as provided in
section 2(1) and (2) of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2025.

(4) $70,000 of the
amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely to develop a system
for the tracking of current and former transitional bilingual program students.

(5) Sufficient funding
is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2025
(schools/bilingual instruction).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
516. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 70,593,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 68,817,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 139,410,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Funding for school
district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at maximum rates of
$408.38 per funded unit for the 2001-02 school year and $409.41 per funded unit
for the 2002-03 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided under section 504 of this act.

(3) For purposes of
this section, "test results" refers to the district results from the
norm-referenced test administered in the specified grade level. The
norm-referenced test results used for the third and sixth grade calculations
shall be consistent with the third and sixth grade tests required under RCW
28A.230.190 and 28A.230.193.

(4) A school district's
funded units for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years shall be the sum of the
following:

(a) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6, multiplied by the 5-year average
4th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 3rd grade test
becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag;
and

(b) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9, multiplied by the 5-year average
8th grade lowest quartile test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 6th grade test
becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades
on a 1-year lag; and

(c) The district's
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by the 5-year
average 11th grade lowest quartile test results, multiplied by 0.92. As the
9th grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average
for these grades on a 1-year lag; and

(d) If, in the prior
school year, the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded the state
average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible for free
and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result
by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.

(5) School districts
may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of funds allocated
under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning
assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
517. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 19,515,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 17,516,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 37,031,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Each general fund
fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2) Funds are provided
for local education program enhancements to meet educational needs as
identified by the school district, including alternative education programs.

(3) Allocations for the
2001-02 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of $18.48 per full-time
equivalent student and $18.48 per full-time equivalent student for the 2002-03
school year. Allocations shall be made on the monthly apportionment payment
schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250 and shall be based on school district
annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades kindergarten through
twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not more than one
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for small school
plants within any school district designated as remote and necessary schools,
the allocations shall be as follows:

(a) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students;

(b) Enrollment of not
more than twenty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven
and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time equivalent students;
and

(c) Enrollment of not
more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine
through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time equivalent
students.

(4) Funding provided
pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition of basic education
for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the state's funding
duty thereunder.

(5) The superintendent
shall not allocate up to one-fourth of a district's funds under this section
if:

(a) The district is not
maximizing federal matching funds for medical services provided through special
education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX
funding); or

(b) The district is not
in compliance in filing truancy petitions as required under chapter 312, Laws
of 1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
518. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BETTER SCHOOLS PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 8,996,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$8,996,000 is provided solely to complete the 2000-01 school year allocation
for class size reduction and expanded learning opportunities pursuant to
section 518, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
519. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM

Student Achievement Fund‑-State

Appropriation (FY 2002).................... $ 184,232,000

Student Achievement Fund‑-State

Appropriation (FY 2003).................... $ 209,068,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 393,300,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation
is allocated for the following uses as specified in chapter 28A.505 RCW as
amended by chapter 3, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 728):

(a) To reduce class
size by hiring certificated elementary classroom teachers in grades K-4 and
paying nonemployee-related costs associated with those new teachers;

(b) To make selected
reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such as small high school writing
classes;

(c) To provide extended
learning opportunities to improve student academic achievement in grades K-12,
including, but not limited to, extended school year, extended school day,
before-and-after-school programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school
programs, summer school, and all-day kindergarten;

(d) To provide
additional professional development for educators including additional paid
time for curriculum and lesson redesign and alignment, training to ensure that
instruction is aligned with state standards and student needs, reimbursement
for higher education costs related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge,
and mentoring programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The
funding shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and extend day
teaching contracts;

(e) To provide early
assistance for children who need prekindergarten support in order to be
successful in school; or

(f) To provide
improvements or additions to school building facilities which are directly
related to the class size reductions and extended learning opportunities under
(a) through (c) of this subsection.

(2) Funding for school
district student achievement programs shall be allocated at a maximum rate of
$193.92 per FTE student for the 2001-02 school year and $220.59 per FTE student
for the 2002-03 school year. For the purposes of this section and in
accordance with RCW 84.52.‑‑‑ (section 5 of Initiative
Measure No. 728), FTE student refers to the annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment of the school district in grades kindergarten through twelve for the
prior school year.

(3) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall distribute ten percent of the annual
allocation to districts each month for the months of September through June.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
520. K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND
PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS. State
general fund appropriations provided to the superintendent of public
instruction for state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V
of this act may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general fund
moneys from school districts and educational service districts for a prior
fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment payments for the
current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year adjustments on
apportionment reports for the current period. Such recoveries shall not be
treated as revenues to the state, but as a reduction in the amount expended
against the appropriation for the current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
521. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 36,720,000

Education Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 154,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 191,220,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $18,000,000 in
fiscal year 2002 and $18,720,000 in fiscal year 2003 of the education savings
account appropriation shall be deposited in the common school construction
account.

(2)
$154,500,000 of the education construction account appropriation shall be
deposited in the common school construction account.

(End
of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec.
601. The appropriations in
sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a) The salary
increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the only allowable
salary increases provided at institutions of higher education, excluding
increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related
to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases associated
with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1).

(b) Each institution of
higher education shall provide to each classified staff employee as defined by
the office of financial management, except for classified staff at the
technical colleges, a salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001. The
technical colleges shall provide to classified employees under chapter 41.56
RCW an average salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001. Funds are also
provided for salary increases for all classified employees on July 1, 2002, in
a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature and, in the case
of technical college classified staff, consistent with the provisions of
Initiative 732.

(c) Each institution of
higher education, except for the community and technical colleges, shall
provide to state-funded instructional and research faculty, exempt professional
staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and
research assistants as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other state-funded nonclassified staff, including those employees under RCW
28B.16.015, an average salary increase of 3.7 percent on July 1, 2001. Funds
are also provided for salary increases for these employee groups on July 1,
2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature. Each
institution may provide the same average increases to similar positions that
are not state-funded.

(d) The community and
technical colleges shall provide to academic employees, exempt professional
staff, and academic administrators an average salary increase of 3.7 percent on
July 1, 2001. Funds are also provided for salary increases for these groups on
July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature
and, in the case of community college academic employees and technical college
employees, consistent with the provisions of Initiative 732.

(e) For employees under
the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions of RCW
28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1), distribution of the salary increases will be in
accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an
increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above
the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's
position is allocated.

(f) Each institution of
higher education receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of
this act may provide additional salary increases to instructional and research
faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the
office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not
including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Any salary increase granted under
the authority of this subsection (2)(f) shall not be included in an
institution's salary base. It is the intent of the legislature that general
fund‑-state support for an institution shall not increase during the
current or any future biennium as a result of any salary increases authorized
under this subsection (2)(f).

(g) To collect
consistent data for use by the legislature, the office of financial management,
and other state agencies for policy and planning purposes, institutions of
higher education shall report personnel data to be used in the department of
personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with uniform reporting
procedures established by the department of personnel.

(h) Specific salary
increases authorized in sections 603 through 609 of this act are in addition to
any salary increase provided in this subsection.

(3) The tuition fees,
as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 academic years,
other than the summer term, may be adjusted by the governing boards of the
state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
state board for community and technical colleges as provided in this
subsection.

(a) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards and the state board may implement an
increase no greater than six and seven-tenths percent over tuition fees charged
to full-time students for the 2000-01 academic year.

(b) For the 2002-03
academic year, the governing boards and the state board may implement an
increase no greater than six and one-tenth percent over the tuition fees
charged to full-time students for the 2001-02 academic year.

(c) For the 2001-02
academic year, the governing boards may implement an increase for law and
graduate business programs no greater than twelve percent over tuition fees
charged to law and graduate business students for the 2000-01 academic year.

(d) For the 2002-03
academic year, the governing boards may implement an increase for law and
graduate business programs no greater than twelve percent over tuition fees
charged to law and graduate business students for the 2001-02 academic year.

(e) For the 2001-02 and
the 2002-03 academic years, the state board for community and technical
colleges may increase fees differentially based on student credit hour load,
but the percentage increase for students taking fifteen or fewer credits shall
not exceed the limits in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section.

(f) For the 2001-03
biennium, the governing boards and the state board may adjust full-time
operating fees for factors that may include time of day and day of week, as
well as delivery method and campus, to encourage full use of the state's
educational facilities and resources.

(g) The tuition
increases adopted under (a), (b), (e), and (f) of this subsection need not
apply uniformly across student categories as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW so
long as the increase for each student category does not exceed the percentages
specified in this subsection.

(4) In addition to waivers
granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and the
state board may waive all or a portion of the operating fees for any student.
State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and
fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.

(5) Pursuant to RCW
43.15.055, institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under
sections 603 through 609 of this act are authorized to increase summer term
tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor during the 2001-03 biennium.
Tuition levels increased pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per
credit hour rate calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under
this act.

(6) Community colleges
may increase services and activities fee charges in excess of the fiscal growth
factor up to the maximum level authorized by the state board for community and
technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
602. The appropriations in
sections 603 through 609 of this act provide state general fund support for
full-time equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher
education. Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments by institutions assumed in this act.

2001-2002 2002-2003

Annual Annual

Average Average

University of Washington

Main campus 32,321 32,427

Bothell branch 1,169 1,235

Tacoma branch 1,330 1,484

Washington State University

Main campus 17,332 17,332

Spokane branch 551 593

Tri-Cities branch 616 616

Vancouver branch 1,071 1,153

Central Washington
University 7,470 7,470

Eastern Washington
University 7,933 8,017

The Evergreen State College 3,754 3,837

Western Washington
University 10,976 11,126

State Board for Community
and

Technical Colleges 125,082 126,902

When allocating newly
budgeted enrollments, each institution of higher education shall give priority
to high demand fields, including but not limited to technology, health
professions, and education. At the end of each fiscal year, each institution
of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a report to the higher education coordinating board detailing how
newly budgeted enrollments have been allocated.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
603. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 514,022,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 542,954,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,404,000

Education Savings Account‑-State

Appropriation (FY 2003).................... $ 4,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.............. ... $ 1,072,880,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The technical
colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor to
conform with the percentage increase in community college operating fees.

(2) $2,475,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $5,025,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to increase salaries and related benefits for part-time faculty. The
board shall report by December 1 of each fiscal year to the office of financial
management and legislative fiscal and higher education committees on (a) the
distribution of state funds; (b) wage adjustments for part-time faculty; and
(c) progress to achieve the long-term performance targets for each district,
with respect to use of part-time faculty, pursuant to the faculty mix study
conducted under section 603, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.

(3) $990,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,010,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for faculty salary increments and associated benefits and may be used in
combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide
faculty salary increments and associated benefits. To the extent general
salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the general salary
increase shall be reduced by the same amount.

(4) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for a program to fund the start-up of new community and technical college
programs in rural counties as defined under RCW 43.160.020(12) and in
communities impacted by business closures and job reductions. Successful
proposals must respond to local economic development strategies and must
include a plan to continue programs developed with this funding.

(5) $326,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $640,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for allocation to twelve college districts identified in (a) through (l)
of this subsection to prepare students for transfer to the state technology
institute at the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington. The appropriations
in this section are intended to supplement, not supplant, general enrollment
allocations by the board to the districts under (a) through (l) of this
subsection:

(a) Bates Technical
College;

(b) Bellevue Community
College;

(c) Centralia Community
College;

(d) Clover Park
Community College;

(e) Grays Harbor
Community College;

(f) Green River
Community College;

(g) Highline Community
College;

(h) Tacoma Community
College;

(i) Olympic Community
College;

(j) Pierce District;

(k) Seattle District;
and

(l) South Puget Sound
Community College.

(6) $28,761,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $28,761,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely as special funds for training and related support services, including
financial aid, as specified in chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and
training for unemployed workers).

(a) Funding is provided
to support up to 7,200 full-time equivalent students in each fiscal year.

(b) In directing these
resources during the 2001-03 biennium, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall give considerable attention to the permanent
dislocation of workers from industries facing rapidly rising energy costs, such
as direct service industries.

(7) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for tuition support for students enrolled in work-based learning programs.

(8) $567,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $568,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job
skills program.

(9) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are solely for
higher education student child care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.

(10) $212,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $212,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
for allocation to Olympic college. The college shall contract with accredited
baccalaureate institution(s) to bring a program of upper-division courses to
Bremerton. Funds provided are sufficient to support at least 30 additional
annual full-time equivalent students. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature on the implementation
of this subsection by December 1st of each fiscal year.

(11) The entire
education savings account appropriation is provided solely to support the
development of a multicollege student-centered online service center for
distance learners, including self-service internet applications and staff
support 24 hours per day. Moneys may be allocated by the office of financial
management in fiscal year 2003 upon certification that sufficient cash is
available beyond the appropriations made for the 2001-03 biennium for the
purposes of common school construction.

(12) The appropriations
in this section assume that $3,000,000 of the colleges' operating fee accounts
will be used to deliver adult basic education courses including
English-as-a-Second Language and general education development exam
preparation. The legislature intends that colleges stop waiving fees
universally and charge not less than $5.00 a credit hour for adult basic
education to help defray state expense and increase positive educational
outcomes for enrolled students. Fees may be waived for students with limited
income.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
604. FOR UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 345,846,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 360,847,000

Death Investigations
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 259,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 5,891,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 5,945,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 718,788,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university may
reallocate 10 percent of newly budgeted enrollments to campuses other than as
specified by the legislature in section 602 of this act in order to focus on
high demand areas. The university shall report the details of these
reallocations to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature for monitoring purposes by the 10th day
of the academic quarter that follows the reallocation actions. The report
shall provide details of undergraduate and graduate enrollments at the main
campus and each of the branch campuses.

(2) $2,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to create a state resource for technology education in the form of an
institute located at the University of Washington, Tacoma. It is the intent of
the legislature that at least ninety-nine of the full-time equivalent
enrollments allocated to the university's Tacoma branch campus for the 2002-03
academic year may be used to establish the technology institute. The
university will expand undergraduate and graduate degree programs meeting
regional technology needs including, but not limited to, computing and software
systems. As a condition of these appropriations:

(a) The university will
work with the state board for community and technical colleges, or individual
colleges where necessary, to establish articulation agreements in addition to
the existing associate of arts and associate of science transfer degrees. Such
agreements shall improve the transferability of students and in particular,
students with substantial applied information technology credits.

(b) The university will
establish performance measures for recruiting, retaining and graduating
students, including nontraditional students, and report back to the governor
and legislature by September 2002 as to its progress and future steps.

(3) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for research faculty clusters in the advanced technology initiative
program.

(4) The department of
environmental health shall report to the legislature the historical, current,
and anticipated use of funds provided from the accident and medical aid
accounts. The report shall be submitted prior to the convening of the 2002
legislative session.

(5) $259,000 of the
death investigations account appropriation is provided solely for the forensic
pathologist fellowship program.

(6) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item UW-01.

(7) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the Olympic natural resource center.

(8) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriations are provided solely for the school of
medicine to conduct a survey designed to evaluate characteristics, factors and
probable causes for the high incidence of multiple sclerosis cases in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
605. FOR WASHINGTON STATE
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 201,343,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 209,789,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 411,132,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The university may
reallocate 10 percent of newly budgeted enrollments to campuses other than
specified by the legislature in section 602 of this act in order to focus on
high demand areas. The university will report the details of these
reallocations to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature for monitoring purposes by the 10th day
of the academic quarter that follows the reallocation actions. The report will
provide details of undergraduate and graduate enrollments at the main campus
and each of the branch campuses.

(2) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for research faculty clusters in the advanced technology initiative
program.

(3) $165,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $166,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item WSU-01.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
606. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 45,513,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 47,344,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 92,857,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
607. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 44,144,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 44,934,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 89,078,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $700,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided
solely for the development and implementation of the university's enrollment
stabilization recovery and growth plan. The university shall report back to
the fiscal committees of the legislature, the office of financial management,
and the higher education coordinating board at the end of each fiscal year with
details of its actions and progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
608. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE
COLLEGE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 25,324,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 26,237,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 51,561,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to complete studies of services described
in section 202(1), chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess.

(2) $11,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $54,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to conduct an outcome evaluation
pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 5416 (drug-affected infants). The
institute shall provide a report to the fiscal, health, and human services
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall be used to
evaluate outcomes across state health and social service pilot projects and
other national models involving women who have given birth to a drug-affected
infant, comparing gains in positive birth outcomes for resources invested, in
which case the institute's findings and recommendations will be provided by
November 15, 2002.

(3) $11,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $33,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to evaluate partnership grant
programs for alternative teacher certification pursuant to Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5695. An interim report shall be provided to the
fiscal and education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002, and a
final report by December 1, 2004.

(4) $60,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to examine options for revising the state's
funding formula for the learning assistance program to enhance accountability
for school performance in meeting education reform goals. The institute shall
submit its report to the appropriate legislative fiscal and policy committees
by June 30, 2002.

(5) $50,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to study the prevalence and needs of
families who are raising related children. The study shall compare services
and policies of Washington state with other states that have a high rate of
kinship care placements in lieu of foster care placements. The study shall
identify possible changes in services and policies that are likely to increase
appropriate kinship care placements. A report shall be provided to the fiscal
and human services committees of the legislature by June 1, 2002.

(6) $35,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $15,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to examine various educational
delivery models for providing services and education for students through the
Washington state school for the deaf. The institute's report, in conjunction
with the capacity planning study from the joint legislative audit and review
committee, shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 30, 2002.

(7) $30,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to examine the structure, policies, and
recent experience in states where welfare recipients may attend college
full-time as their required TANF work activity. The institute will provide
findings and recommend how Washington could consider adding this feature in a
targeted, cost-neutral manner that would complement the present-day WorkFirst
efforts and caseload. The institute shall provide a report to the human
services, higher education, and fiscal committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2001.

(8) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the institute for public policy to research and evaluate strategies
for constraining the growth in state health expenditures. Specific research
topics, approaches, and timelines shall be identified in consultation with the
fiscal committees of the legislature.

(9) $100,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided solely
for the institute for public policy to conduct a comprehensive review of the
costs and benefits of existing juvenile crime prevention and intervention
programs. This evaluation shall also consider what changes could result in
more cost-effective and efficient funding for juvenile crime prevention and
intervention programs presently supported with state funds. The institute for
public policy shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
legislative fiscal and policy committees by October 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
609. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 59,733,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 62,833,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 122,566,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $753,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$1,032,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for the operations of the North Snohomish, Island, Skagit
(NSIS) higher education consortium.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
610. FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,345,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,408,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 5,389,000

The appropriations in
this section are provided to carry out the policy coordination, planning,
studies and administrative functions of the board and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1) $150,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $150,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to continue the teacher training pilot program pursuant to chapter 177,
Laws of 1999.

(2) $105,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $245,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to continue a demonstration project to improve rural access to
post-secondary education by bringing distance learning technologies into Jefferson
county.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
611. FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 123,645,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 136,205,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 7,511,000

Advanced College Tuition
Payment Program Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 3,604,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 270,965,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $534,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $529,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2) $234,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $240,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the western interstate commission for higher education.

(3) $1,000,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the health professional conditional scholarship and loan program
under chapter 28B.115 RCW. This amount shall be deposited to the health
professional loan repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out the
purposes of the program.

(4) $1,000,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriations is provided solely to continue a demonstration
project that enables classified public K-12 employees to become future
teachers, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Within available
funds, the board may renew and offer conditional scholarships of up to $4,000
per year for full or part-time studies that may be forgiven in exchange for
teaching service in Washington's public K-12 schools. In selecting loan
recipients, the board shall take into account the applicant's demonstrated
academic ability and commitment to serve as a teacher within the state of
Washington.

(b) Loans shall be
forgiven at the rate of one year of loan for two years of teaching service.
Recipients who teach in geographic or subject-matter shortage areas, as
specified by the office of the superintendent for public instruction, may have
their loans forgiven at the rate of one year of loan for one year of teaching
service;

(c) Recipients who fail
to fulfill the required teaching service shall be required to repay the
conditional loan with interest. The board shall define the terms for
repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees and deferments, and may
adopt other rules as necessary to implement this demonstration project.

(d) The board may
deposit this appropriation and all collections into the student loan account
authorized in RCW 28B.102.060.

(e) The board will
provide the legislature and governor with findings about the impact of this
demonstration project on persons entering the teaching profession in shortage
areas by no later than January of 2002.

(5) $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $75,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for higher education student child care matching grants under chapter
28B.135 RCW.

(6) $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $25,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the benefit of students who participate in college assistance
migrant programs (CAMP) operating in Washington state. To ensure timely state
aid, the board may establish a date after which no additional grants would be
available for the 2001-02 and 2002-03 academic years. The board shall disperse
grants in equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.

(7) $120,156,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $133,965,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for student financial aid, including all administrative costs.
Of these amounts:

(a) $90,566,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $102,667,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are
provided solely for the state need grant program. After April 1 of each fiscal
year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state need grant
program may be transferred to the state work study program;

(b) $16,340,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $17,360,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the state work study program. After April 1 of each fiscal year, up
to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state work study program may
be transferred to the state need grant program;

(c) $2,920,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $2,920,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for educational opportunity grants. The board may deposit sufficient
funds from its appropriation into the state education trust fund as established
in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new
recipient of the educational opportunity grant award. For the purpose of
establishing eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program for placebound
students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the branch campus
service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington;

(d) A maximum of 2.1
percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
may be expended for financial aid administration, excluding the 4 percent state
work study program administrative allowance provision;

(e) $1,241,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $1,428,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any Washington scholars
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the
board to the Washington award for vocational excellence;

(f) $588,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $589,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to implement Washington award for vocational excellence program. Any
Washington award for vocational program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each
year may be transferred by the board to the Washington scholars program;

(g) $251,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $251,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000 each. Of the
amounts provided, no more than $5,200 each year is for the administration of
the community scholarship matching grant program. To be eligible for the
matching grant, a nonprofit community organization organized under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised
$2,000 in new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
act. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching grant and
preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with the citizens'
scholarship foundation; and

(h) $8,250,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $8,750,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for the Washington promise scholarship program subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(i) Within available
funds, the higher education coordinating board shall award scholarships for use
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of Washington to as
many students as possible from among those qualifying under (iv) of this
subsection. Each qualifying student will receive two consecutive annual
installments, the value of each not to exceed the full-time annual resident
tuition rates charged by community colleges.

(ii) Of the amounts
provided, no more than $260,000 each year is for administration of the
Washington promise scholarship program.

(iii) Other than funds
provided for program administration, the higher education coordinating board
shall deposit all money received for the program in the Washington promise
scholarship account, a nonappropriated fund in the custody of the state
treasurer. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for these scholarships, private contributions,
and receipts from refunds of tuition and fees.

(iv) Scholarships in
the 2001-03 biennium shall be awarded to students who graduate from high school
or its equivalent whose family income does not exceed one hundred thirty-five
percent of the state's median family income, adjusted for family size, if they
meet any of the following academic criteria:

(A) Students graduating
from public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW must be
in the top fifteen percent of their graduating class, or must equal or exceed a
cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their first attempt;

(B) Students
participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test score of 1200 on their
first attempt.

(v) For students
eligible under (iv) of this subsection, the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide the higher education coordinating board with the
names, addresses, and unique numeric identifiers of students in the top fifteen
percent or who meet the scholastic aptitude test score requirement, as
appropriate in each of the respective high school senior or home based
instruction classes in Washington state. This shall be provided no later than
October 1 of each year.

(vi) Scholarships
awarded under this section may only be used at accredited institutions of higher
education in the state of Washington for college-related expenses, including
but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, materials, and
transportation. The Washington promise scholarship award shall not supplant
other scholarship awards, financial aid, or tax programs related to
postsecondary education. Scholarships may not be transferred or refunded to
students.

(vii) The higher
education coordinating board shall evaluate the impact and effectiveness of the
Washington promise scholarship program. The evaluation shall include, but not
be limited to: (A) An analysis of other financial assistance promise
scholarship recipients are receiving through other federal, state, and
institutional programs, including grants, work study, tuition waivers, tax
credits, and loan programs; (B) an analysis of whether the implementation of
the promise scholarship program has had an impact on student indebtedness; and
(C) an evaluation of what types of students are successfully completing high
school but do not have the financial ability to attend college because they
cannot obtain financial aid or the financial aid is insufficient. The board
shall report its findings to the governor and the legislature by December 1,
2002.

(viii) The higher
education coordinating board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
612. FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,762,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,720,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 44,987,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 48,469,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $500,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for the operations and development of the inland northwest
technology education center (INTEC) as a regional resource and model for the
rapid deployment of skilled workers trained in the latest technologies for
Washington. The board shall serve as an advisor to and fiscal agent for INTEC,
and will report back to the governor and legislature by September 2002 as to
the progress and future steps for INTEC as this new public-private partnership
evolves.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
613. FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE
RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 1,500,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 1,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
614. FOR WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 8,791,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 8,786,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 6,976,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 24,553,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: At least
$2,700,000 shall be expended for a contract with the Seattle public library for
library services for the Washington book and braille library.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
615. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS
COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 2,873,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 2,874,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation.................. $.................................. 1,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 6,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
616. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 2,899,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 3,129,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 6,028,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $90,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$285,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
are provided solely for activities related to the Lewis and Clark Bicentennial.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
617. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 1,674,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 1,535,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 3,209,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
618. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002)......... $ 4,520,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 4,591,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation........... $ 1,173,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 10,284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
619. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE
DEAF

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 7,395,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 7,439,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 232,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 15,066,000

(End
of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
701. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT
TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 644,097,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 552,290,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 11,351,000

Debt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retire Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 2,591,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,210,329,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriations are for deposit into the debt-limit general fund
bond retirement account. The appropriation for fiscal year 2002 shall be deposited
in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
702. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade
Center Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 39,950,000

Accident Account‑-State
Appropriation.......... $ 5,590,000

Medical Aid Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $...................................... 5,590,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 51,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
703. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL
OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 24,542,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 26,706,000

Capitol Historic District
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 454,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 815,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 348,000

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 35,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable
Bond Retirement Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 128,043,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 180,943,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
general fund appropriation is for deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund
bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
704. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE
EXPENSES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 567,000

General Fund‑-State Appropriation
(FY 2003).... $ 568,000

Higher Education
Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 77,000

State Higher Education
Construction Account‑‑

State Appropriation........................ $ 42,000

State Building Construction
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,488,000

State Vehicle Parking
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000

Capitol Historic District
Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 130,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
705. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EMERGENCY FUND

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 850,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 850,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,700,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations in this section are for the governor's emergency fund for the
critically necessary work of any agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
706. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of three million dollars, or so much
thereof as may be available on June 30, 2001, from the total amount of unspent
fiscal year 2001 fire contingency funding in the disaster response account and
the moneys appropriated to the disaster response account in section 707 of this
act, is appropriated for the purpose of making allocations to the military
department for fire mobilizations costs or to the department of natural
resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
707. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE CONTINGENCY
INITIATIVE.

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
entire amount is appropriated to the disaster response account for the purposes
specified in section 706 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
708. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL
JUSTICE COSTS

Public Safety and Education‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 975,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of financial management shall distribute the appropriation to the
following counties in the amounts designated for extraordinary criminal justice
costs:

Cowlitz.................................... $ 89,000

Franklin................................... $ 303,000

Klickitat.................................. $ 45,000

Skagit..................................... $ 102,000

Spokane.................................... $ 192,000

Thurston................................... $ 122,000

Yakima..................................... $ 121,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
709. BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and institutions of the state may
expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial
management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or
institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
710. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES‑-DISTRIBUTION OF EXCESS FUNDS FROM THE FOREST DEVELOPMENT
ACCOUNT

Forest Development Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is provided solely for distribution of state forest land revenues
to taxing authorities that received such revenue from fiscal year 1996 through
fiscal year 2000.

(1) Within fifteen days
of the effective date of this section, the department shall transmit funds in
the amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section to the county
treasurers of the counties receiving the funds.

(2) The county
treasurers of the counties listed in this section shall distribute funds
received from this appropriation to taxing authorities in proportion to the
state forest board land funds distributed to the taxing authorities based on
information available for the fiscal years 1996 through 2000. Funds to be
credited to the state of Washington and funds credited to school district
general levies shall be remitted to the state of Washington within thirty days
after the effective date of this section for deposit into the general fund‑-state
account.

(3) Funds shall be
distributed in the following amounts:

Clallam.................................... $ 1,488,192

Clark...................................... $ 510,515

Cowlitz.................................... $ 339,189

Grays Harbor............................... $ 310,945

Jefferson.................................. $ 212,812

King....................................... $ 212,433

Kitsap..................................... $ 127,301

Klickitat.................................. $ 74,728

Lewis...................................... $ 1,533,114

Mason...................................... $ 222,237

Pacific.................................... $ 354,315

Pierce..................................... $ 100,930

Skagit..................................... $ 1,161,074

Skamania................................... $ 213,433

Snohomish.................................. $ 1,263,596

Stevens.................................... $ 3,793

Thurston................................... $ 850,395

Wahkiakum.................................. $ 292,346

Whatcom.................................... $ 728,653

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
711. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-DIGITAL GOVERNMENT POOL

Digital Government
Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The digital
government revolving account appropriation is provided solely to provide
digital services of government to citizens, businesses, and to state and other
governments. The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of information services, shall allocate these funds as needed for
digital government projects.

(2) To facilitate the
transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer is
directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to
the digital government revolving account, hereby created in the state treasury,
in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management for
digital government projects.

(3) Agencies receiving
these allocations shall report at a minimum to the information services board
and to the office of financial management on the progress of digital government
projects and efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
712. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-TECHNOLOGY POOL

Digital Government
Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,518,456

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The digital
government revolving account appropriation is provided solely for an
information technology funding pool for state executive branch agencies,
excluding schools and institutions of higher education. The department may
distribute funding from the pool for information technology purposes, including
infrastructure improvements, technology required to satisfy federal reporting
requirements, equipment purchase and replacement, web site and internet
services, and software and systems upgrades. Projects may include information
technology projects that were requested in agency budget requests but that are
not specifically funded in agency appropriations (for example technology
improvements in the department of community, trade, and economic development,
data warehouse in the department of revenue, and system security and
infrastructure in small agencies).

(2) Agencies that wish
to receive these funds may make an application to the office of financial
management. The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of information services and using criteria adopted by the
information services board, shall allocate these funds as needed for digital
government projects. The office of financial management shall not distribute
funding for a specific project unless it is determined that there will be no
net increase in ongoing operating costs resulting from the project.

(3) Allocations from
this section may be made only for items and in proportion to the extent to
which items would be typically funded by the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
713. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-DIGITAL GOVERNMENT
REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 2,050,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,050,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION........................ $ 4,100,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for deposit in the digital
government revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
714. DEATH BENEFIT‑-COMMON SCHOOLS. For the period from July 1, 2001, through June
30, 2003, a one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a
sundry claim to the estate of an employee in the common school system of the
state who is killed in the course of employment. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the director of the department of general administration by order
under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
715. DEATH BENEFIT‑-STATE AGENCIES. For the period from July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2003, a one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a
sundry claim to the estate of an employee of any state agency or higher
education institution not otherwise provided a death benefit through coverage
under their enrolled retirement system. The determination of eligibility for
the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
director of the department of general administration by order under RCW
51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
716. FOR THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,666,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 18,802,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,008,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 420,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 17,935,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION......... ........ $ 51,831,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The monthly
employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees'
benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed
$455.57 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2002, and $494.14 for fiscal year
2003.

(b) Within the rates in
(a) of this subsection, $2.02 per eligible employee shall be included in the
employer funding rate for fiscal year 2002, and $4.10 per eligible employee
shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal year 2003, solely to increase
life insurance coverage in accordance with a court approved settlement in Burbage
et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no.
94-2-02560-8).

(c) In order to achieve
the level of funding provided for health benefits, the public employees'
benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium
copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of
managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.

(d) The health care
authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical
plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals,
subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of prior
uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not
be used for administrative expenditures.

(2) To facilitate the
transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer is
directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account to
the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase revolving fund in
accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

(3) The health care
authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board,
shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or
disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for parts
A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2002, through
December 31, 2002, the subsidy shall be $85.84. Starting January 1, 2003, the
subsidy shall be $102.55 per month.

(4) Technical colleges,
school districts, and educational service districts shall remit to the health
care authority for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a) For each full-time
employee, $32.21 per month beginning September 1, 2001, and $37.10 beginning
September 1, 2002;

(b) For each part-time
employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible for employer
fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $32.49 each month beginning
September 1, 2001, and $37.69 beginning September 1, 2002, prorated by the
proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee
that the part-time employee receives.

The remittance requirements
specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical
college, school district, or educational service district who purchase
insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

(5) The salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes amounts sufficient
to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium levels specified in
subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 2001-2003 transportation
appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
717. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July
1, 2001, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the
judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis
consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1) There is
appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 15,552,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 16,668,000

The appropriations in
this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations include reductions to reflect savings resulting from the
implementation of state pension contribution rates effective July 1, 2001, as
provided in Senate Bill No. 6167 or House Bill No. 2236.

(2) There is
appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 6,000,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 6,000,000

(3) There is
appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 250,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 44,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
718. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ (17,246,000)

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ (17,499,000)

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. (11,469,000)

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ (683,000)

Special Account Retirement
Contribution Increase

Revolving Account
Appropriation............. $ (25,895,000)

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ (72,792,000)

The appropriations in
this section are provided solely to reduce agency and higher education
institutions appropriations to reflect savings resulting from the
implementation of employer pension contribution rates, effective July 1, 2001,
for the public employees' retirement system, and effective September 1, 2001,
for the teachers' retirement system, as provided in Senate Bill No. 6167 or
House Bill No. 2236.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
719. SALARY COST OF LIVING
ADJUSTMENT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 42,958,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 75,247,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 38,992,000

General Fund‑‑Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 2,388,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 94,554,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.... ............ $ 254,139,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) In addition to the
purposes set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, appropriations
in this section are provided solely for a 3.7 percent salary increase effective
July 1, 2001, for all classified employees, except the certificated employees
of the state schools for the deaf and blind, and including those employees in
the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction
of the personnel resources board. Funds are also provided for salary increases
for classified employees on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to be
determined by the 2002 legislature.

(2) The appropriations
in this section are sufficient to fund a 3.7 percent salary increase effective
July 1, 2001, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees
exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the
commission on salaries for elected officials. Funds are also provided for
salary increases for these employees on July 1, 2002, in a percentage amount to
be determined by the 2002 legislature.

(3) The salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation in this section includes
funds sufficient to fund a 3.7 percent salary increase effective July 1, 2001,
for ferry workers consistent with the 2001-03 transportation appropriations
act. Funds are also provided for salary increases for ferry workers on July 1,
2002, in a percentage amount to be determined by the 2002 legislature.

(4)(a) No salary
increase may be paid under this section to any person whose salary has been
Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the personnel resources board.

(b) The average salary
increases paid under this section to agency officials whose maximum salaries
are established by the committee on agency official salaries shall not exceed
the average increases provided by subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
720. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY
REVOLVING ACCOUNT

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 11,264,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 11,264,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION........................ $ 22,528,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations
in this section are for appropriation to the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering operational and transport costs incurred by
the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services to
network participants.

(2) Use of these moneys
to connect public libraries are limited to public libraries which have in place
a policy of internet safety applied to publicly available computers with
internet access via the K-20 educational network that protects against access
to visual depictions that are (a) obscene under chapter 9.68 RCW; or (b) sexual
exploitation of children under chapter 9.68A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
721. FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL‑-SALARY ADJUSTMENTS

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 989,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 2,082,000

Legal Services Revolving
Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,071,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,142,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations are provided solely for increases in salaries and related
benefits of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2001, and another
increase effective July 1, 2002. This funding is provided solely for: (1)
Increases in beginning salaries; (2) merit-based increases to recognize
outstanding performance; and (3) increases to address critical recruitment and
retention problems in specialty practice areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
722. FOR THE OFFICE OF
FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COMPENSATION ACTIONS OF
PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 9,179,000

General Fund‑‑State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 18,359,000

General Fund‑‑Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 10,392,000

Salary and Insurance
Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,735,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 40,665,000

The appropriations in
this section shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding
is provided to implement the salary increase recommendations of the Washington
personnel resources board for the priority classes identified through item 8B
pursuant to RCW 41.06.152. The salary increases shall be effective January 1,
2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
723. INCENTIVE SAVINGS‑‑FY 2002. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so
much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2002, from the total amount of
unspent fiscal year 2002 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for
the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1) Of the total
appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable to incentive
savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is appropriated to the
savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the quality, efficiency,
and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the agency that generated
the savings.

(2) The remainder of
the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars, is appropriated
to the education savings account.

(3) For purposes of
this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund appropriations
does not include the appropriations made in this section or any amounts
included in across-the-board allotment reductions under RCW 43.88.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
724. INCENTIVE SAVINGS‑-FY 2003. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so
much thereof as may be available on June 30, 2003, from the total amount of
unspent fiscal year 2003 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for
the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1) Of the total
appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable to incentive
savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is appropriated to the
savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the quality, efficiency,
and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the agency that generated
the savings.

(2) The remainder of
the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars, is appropriated
to the education savings account.

(3) For purposes of
this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund appropriations
does not include the appropriations made in this section or any amounts
included in across-the-board allotment reductions under RCW 43.88.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
725. PUGET SOUND FERRY
OPERATIONS ACCOUNT

State Surplus Assets Reserve
Fund‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 30,000,000

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations in this section are for appropriation to the Puget Sound ferry
operations account to carry out the purposes of the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
726. LOCAL GOVERNMENT
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

(1) It is the intent of
the legislature to provide state funding for the 2001-03 biennium for a portion
of local governments' costs for public safety, criminal justice, public health,
and other operations.

(2) Moneys appropriated
in sections 727, 728, and 729 of this act constitute a transfer to the state of
local government costs under RCW 43.135.060(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
727. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY CORPORATION
ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 24,410,534

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 25,137,970

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 49,548,504

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The department
shall withhold distributions under subsection (2) of this section to any county
that has not paid its fifty percent share of the employer contribution on
behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and federal
social security and medicare and medical aid benefits for the fiscal year. As
required by Article IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney
General's Opinion No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of
these employer contributions shall be shared equally between the state and
county or counties in which the judges serve.

(b) After receiving
written notification from the office of the administrator for the courts that a
county has paid its fifty percent share as required under (a) of this
subsection, the department shall distribute the amount designated for the
fiscal year under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The director of community,
trade, and economic development shall distribute the appropriations to the
following counties in the amounts designated:

2001-03

County FY 2002 FY 2003 Biennium

Adams 290,303 295,993 586,296

Asotin 422,074 434,598 856,672

Benton 966,480 999,163 1,965,643

Chelan 637,688 651,982 1,289,670

Clallam 444,419 454,391 898,810

Clark 641,571 678,997 1,320,568

Columbia 561,888 572,901 1,134,789

Cowlitz 771,879 795,808 1,567,687

Douglas 505,585 528,184 1,033,769

Ferry 389,909 397,551 787,460

Franklin 442,624 464,018 906,642

Garfield 571,303 582,501 1,153,804

Grant 579,631 604,072 1,183,703

Grays Harbor 540,315 550,905 1,091,220

Island 483,589 503,205 986,794

Jefferson 239,914 249,924 489,838

King 2,661,862 2,720,716 5,382,578

Kitsap 469,992 480,178 950,170

Kittitas 366,971 383,027 749,998

Klickitat 204,726 217,555 422,281

Lewis 583,702 598,004 1,181,706

Lincoln 290,754 302,151 592,905

Mason 905,060 930,959 1,836,019

Okanogan 548,848 560,332 1,109,180

Pacific 344,047 350,790 694,837

Pend Oreille 280,342 285,837 566,179

Pierce 1,246,530 1,284,087 2,530,617

San Juan 85,712 91,859 177,571

Skagit 911,491 944,914 1,856,405

Skamania 172,840 176,228 349,068

Snohomish 1,017,209 1,058,571 2,075,780

Spokane 804,124 823,359 1,627,483

Stevens 811,482 835,598 1,647,080

Thurston 1,031,888 1,061,579 2,093,467

Wahkiakum 507,528 517,476 1,025,004

Walla Walla 241,341 247,105 488,446

Whatcom 408,025 429,069 837,094

Whitman 134,870 138,191 273,061

Yakima 1,892,018 1,936,192 3,828,210

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 24,410,534 25,137,970 49,548,504

NEW SECTION. Sec.
728. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
ASSISTANCE

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 45,884,610

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 47,251,839

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 93,136,449

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The director of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the appropriation
to the following cities and municipalities in the amounts designated:

2001-03

City FY 2002 FY 2003 Biennium

Aberdeen 119,986 123,562 243,548

Airway Heights 111,259 114,575 225,834

Albion 66,339 68,316 134,655

Algona 32,672 33,646 66,318

Almira 12,519 12,892 25,411

Anacortes 70,930 73,044 143,974

Arlington 42,344 43,606 85,950

Asotin 57,623 59,340 116,963

Auburn 192,405 198,139 390,544

Bainbridge Island 293,851 302,608 596,459

Battle Ground 118,303 121,828 240,131

Beaux Arts 1,784 1,837 3,621

Bellevue 524,203 539,824 1,064,027

Bellingham 369,121 380,121 749,242

Benton City 111,380 114,699 226,079

Bingen 6,602 6,799 13,401

Black Diamond 254,698 262,288 516,986

Blaine 20,853 21,474 42,327

Bonney Lake 158,738 163,468 322,206

Bothell 137,270 141,361 278,631

Bremerton 214,020 220,398 434,418

Brewster 11,250 11,585 22,835

Bridgeport 188,216 193,825 382,041

Brier 532,011 547,865 1,079,876

Buckley 68,227 70,260 138,487

Bucoda 52,876 54,452 107,328

Burien 284,265 292,736 577,001

Burlington 27,407 28,224 55,631

Camas 53,654 55,253 108,907

Carbonado 56,785 58,477 115,262

Carnation 9,593 9,879 19,472

Cashmere 120,801 124,401 245,202

Castle Rock 29,980 30,873 60,853

Cathlamet 6,265 6,452 12,717

Centralia 101,426 104,448 205,874

Chehalis 34,601 35,632 70,233

Chelan 19,515 20,097 39,612

Cheney 314,316 323,683 637,999

Chewelah 66,731 68,720 135,451

Clarkston 83,910 86,411 170,321

Cle Elum 8,692 8,951 17,643

Clyde Hill 136,778 140,854 277,632

Colfax 74,672 76,897 151,569

College Place 526,480 542,169 1,068,649

Colton 27,473 28,292 55,765

Colville 23,389 24,086 47,475

Conconully 13,675 14,083 27,758

Concrete 27,006 27,811 54,817

Connell 164,950 169,866 334,816

Cosmopolis 15,395 15,854 31,249

Coulee City 2,804 2,888 5,692

Coulee Dam 61,408 63,238 124,646

Coupeville 7,708 7,938 15,646

Covington 690,851 711,438 1,402,289

Creston 12,905 13,290 26,195

Cusick 9,341 9,619 18,960

Darrington 59,838 61,621 121,459

Davenport 66,350 68,327 134,677

Dayton 92,685 95,447 188,132

Deer Park 16,059 16,538 32,597

Des Moines 1,482,120 1,526,287 3,008,407

Dupont 8,109 8,351 16,460

Duvall 66,128 68,099 134,227

East Wenatchee 30,678 31,592 62,270

Eatonville 8,848 9,112 17,960

Edgewood 901,766 928,639 1,830,405

Edmonds 456,336 469,935 926,271

Electric City 87,243 89,843 177,086

Ellensburg 81,982 84,425 166,407

Elma 84,676 87,199 171,875

Elmer City 29,811 30,699 60,510

Endicott 28,758 29,615 58,373

Entiat 58,244 59,980 118,224

Enumclaw 53,013 54,593 107,606

Ephrata 59,987 61,775 121,762

Everett 495,428 510,192 1,005,620

Everson 67,517 69,529 137,046

Fairfield 18,540 19,092 37,632

Farmington 12,072 12,432 24,504

Federal Way 470,179 484,190 954,369

Ferndale 74,669 76,894 151,563

Fife 25,411 26,168 51,579

Fircrest 386,146 397,653 783,799

Forks 110,712 114,011 224,723

Friday Harbor 9,791 10,083 19,874

Garfield 45,263 46,612 91,875

George 19,319 19,895 39,214

Gig Harbor 31,615 32,557 64,172

Gold Bar 134,531 138,540 273,071

Goldendale 49,519 50,995 100,514

Grand Coulee 5,805 5,978 11,783

Grandview 256,347 263,986 520,333

Granger 173,094 178,252 351,346

Granite Falls 10,946 11,272 22,218

Hamilton 17,437 17,957 35,394

Harrah 46,947 48,346 95,293

Harrington 18,107 18,647 36,754

Hartline 11,392 11,731 23,123

Hatton 12,176 12,539 24,715

Hoquiam 374,903 386,075 760,978

Hunts Point 2,432 2,504 4,936

Ilwaco 13,150 13,542 26,692

Index 4,181 4,306 8,487

Ione 17,566 18,089 35,655

Issaquah 50,002 51,492 101,494

Kahlotus 20,210 20,812 41,022

Kalama 7,892 8,127 16,019

Kelso 68,904 70,957 139,861

Kenmore 1,099,395 1,132,157 2,231,552

Kennewick 293,534 302,281 595,815

Kent 360,624 371,371 731,995

Kettle Falls 64,422 66,342 130,764

Kirkland 221,429 228,028 449,457

Kittitas 72,698 74,864 147,562

Krupp 4,445 4,577 9,022

La Center 34,415 35,441 69,856

La Conner 3,817 3,931 7,748

La Crosse 20,141 20,741 40,882

Lacey 143,243 147,512 290,755

Lake Forest Park 897,932 924,690 1,822,622

Lake Stevens 142,295 146,535 288,830

Lakewood 2,955,109 3,043,171 5,998,280

Lamont 7,492 7,715 15,207

Langley 5,303 5,461 10,764

Latah 11,962 12,318 24,280

Leavenworth 12,189 12,552 24,741

Lind 2,217 2,283 4,500

Long Beach 10,269 10,575 20,844

Longview 249,836 257,281 507,117

Lyman 16,741 17,240 33,981

Lynden 42,717 43,990 86,707

Lynnwood 163,579 168,454 332,033

Mabton 142,491 146,737 289,228

Malden 21,588 22,231 43,819

Mansfield 26,744 27,541 54,285

Maple Valley 359,478 370,190 729,668

Marcus 14,126 14,547 28,673

Marysville 102,028 105,068 207,096

Mattawa 100,064 103,046 203,110

McCleary 105,807 108,960 214,767

Medical Lake 114,323 117,730 232,053

Medina 14,355 14,783 29,138

Mercer Island 383,527 394,956 778,483

Mesa 16,835 17,337 34,172

Metaline 14,150 14,572 28,722

Metaline Falls 7,718 7,948 15,666

Mill Creek 174,495 179,695 354,190

Millwood 22,619 23,293 45,912

Milton 28,030 28,865 56,895

Monroe 56,517 58,201 114,718

Montesano 60,229 62,024 122,253

Morton 5,891 6,067 11,958

Moses Lake 105,670 108,819 214,489

Mossyrock 16,545 17,038 33,583

Mount Vernon 130,780 134,677 265,457

Mountlake Terrace 711,188 732,381 1,443,569

Moxee 40,448 41,653 82,101

Mukilteo 274,482 282,662 557,144

Naches 7,632 7,859 15,491

Napavine 96,030 98,892 194,922

Nespelem 17,614 18,139 35,753

Newcastle 290,801 299,467 590,268

Newport 13,223 13,617 26,840

Nooksack 58,178 59,912 118,090

Normandy Park 489,113 503,689 992,802

North Bend 20,754 21,372 42,126

North Bonneville 30,574 31,485 62,059

Northport 23,489 24,189 47,678

Oak Harbor 278,157 286,446 564,603

Oakesdale 31,060 31,986 63,046

Oakville 43,411 44,705 88,116

Ocean Shores 64,837 66,769 131,606

Odessa 4,721 4,862 9,583

Okanogan 12,323 12,690 25,013

Olympia 198,476 204,391 402,867

Omak 26,117 26,895 53,012

Oroville 12,506 12,879 25,385

Orting 191,211 196,909 388,120

Othello 26,808 27,607 54,415

Pacific 69,124 71,184 140,308

Palouse 55,067 56,708 111,775

Pasco 131,298 135,211 266,509

Pateros 28,021 28,856 56,877

Pe Ell 54,800 56,433 111,233

Pomeroy 52,485 54,049 106,534

Port Angeles 124,595 128,308 252,903

Port Orchard 41,797 43,043 84,840

Port Townsend 47,126 48,530 95,656

Poulsbo 31,812 32,760 64,572

Prescott 12,349 12,717 25,066

Prosser 24,137 24,856 48,993

Pullman 584,659 602,082 1,186,741

Puyallup 151,732 156,254 307,986

Quincy 20,244 20,847 41,091

Rainier 111,521 114,844 226,365

Raymond 85,311 87,853 173,164

Reardan 38,184 39,322 77,506

Redmond 215,259 221,674 436,933

Renton 235,053 242,058 477,111

Republic 25,085 25,833 50,918

Richland 441,733 454,897 896,630

Ridgefield 55,637 57,295 112,932

Ritzville 8,498 8,751 17,249

Riverside 27,204 28,015 55,219

Rock Island 36,527 37,616 74,143

Rockford 18,965 19,530 38,495

Rosalia 36,719 37,813 74,532

Roslyn 64,571 66,495 131,066

Roy 1,709 1,760 3,469

Royal City 66,657 68,643 135,300

Ruston 50,309 51,808 102,117

Sammamish 2,361,433 2,431,804 4,793,237

Seatac 132,183 136,122 268,305

Seattle 3,189,346 3,284,389 6,473,735

Sedro-Woolley 54,896 56,532 111,428

Selah 80,704 83,109 163,813

Sequim 21,867 22,519 44,386

Shelton 58,160 59,893 118,053

Shoreline 1,485,138 1,529,395 3,014,533

Skykomish 1,417 1,459 2,876

Snohomish 40,722 41,936 82,658

Snoqualmie 9,587 9,873 19,460

Soap Lake 102,783 105,846 208,629

South Bend 75,826 78,086 153,912

South Cle Elum 46,847 48,243 95,090

South Prairie 18,788 19,348 38,136

Spangle 1,397 1,439 2,836

Spokane 1,116,419 1,149,688 2,266,107

Sprague 22,930 23,613 46,543

Springdale 11,080 11,410 22,490

St. John 4,245 4,372 8,617

Stanwood 21,141 21,771 42,912

Starbuck 8,949 9,216 18,165

Steilacoom 285,807 294,324 580,131

Stevenson 11,673 12,021 23,694

Sultan 63,199 65,082 128,281

Sumas 7,885 8,120 16,005

Sumner 41,931 43,181 85,112

Sunnyside 70,805 72,915 143,720

Tacoma 1,384,646 1,425,908 2,810,554

Tekoa 49,373 50,844 100,217

Tenino 68,820 70,871 139,691

Tieton 74,506 76,726 151,232

Toledo 8,084 8,325 16,409

Tonasket 5,500 5,664 11,164

Toppenish 443,488 456,704 900,192

Tukwila 75,320 77,565 152,885

Tumwater 61,848 63,691 125,539

Twisp 4,793 4,936 9,729

Union Gap 27,129 27,937 55,066

Uniontown 19,805 20,395 40,200

University Place 1,889,912 1,946,231 3,836,143

Vader 40,643 41,854 82,497

Vancouver 1,177,584 1,212,676 2,390,260

Waitsburg 81,097 83,514 164,611

Walla Walla 318,679 328,176 646,855

Wapato 230,783 237,660 468,443

Warden 105,612 108,759 214,371

Washougal 177,022 182,297 359,319

Washtucna 20,654 21,269 41,923

Waterville 72,880 75,052 147,932

Waverly 10,256 10,562 20,818

Wenatchee 147,602 152,001 299,603

West Richland 489,752 504,347 994,099

Westport 13,715 14,124 27,839

White Salmon 53,746 55,348 109,094

Wilbur 23,614 24,318 47,932

Wilkeson 18,762 19,321 38,083

Wilson Creek 18,403 18,951 37,354

Winlock 35,212 36,261 71,473

Winthrop 1,756 1,808 3,564

Woodinville 56,052 57,722 113,774

Woodland 17,960 18,495 36,455

Woodway 12,513 12,886 25,399

Yacolt 36,636 37,728 74,364

Yakima 487,766 502,301 990,067

Yarrow Point 32,121 33,078 65,199

Yelm 15,677 16,144 31,821

Zillah 100,818 103,822 204,640

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 45,545,942 46,903,217 92,449,159

(2) $338,668 for fiscal
year 2002 and $348,622 for fiscal year 2003 from this appropriation are
provided solely to address the contingencies listed in this subsection. The
department shall distribute the moneys no later than March 31, 2002, and March
31, 2003, for the respective appropriations. Moneys shall be distributed for
the following purposes, ranked in order of priority:

(a) To correct for data
errors in the determination of distributions in subsection (1) of this section;

(b) To distribute to
newly qualifying jurisdictions as if the jurisdiction had been in existence
prior to November 1999;

(c) To allocate under
emergency situations as determined by the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development in consultation with the association
of Washington cities; and

(d) After April 1st of
each year in the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2003, any moneys remaining
from the amounts provided in this subsection shall be prorated and distributed
to cities and towns on the basis of the amounts distributed for emergency
considerations in November 2000 as provided in section 729, chapter 1, Laws of
2000, 2nd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
729. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH
ASSISTANCE

Health Services Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 48,270,802

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
director of the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
distribute the appropriations to the following counties and health districts in
the amounts designated:

2001-03

Health District FY 2002 FY 2003 Biennium

Adams County Health District 30,824 31,428 62,252

Asotin County Health District 65,375 70,818 136,193

Benton-Franklin Health District 1,147,987 1,196,390 2,344,377

Chelan-Douglas Health District 176,979 194,628 371,607

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department 140,557 144,547 285,104

Southwest Washington Health District 1,067,962 1,113,221 2,181,183

Columbia County Health District 40,362 41,153 81,515

Cowlitz County Health Department 273,147 287,116 560,263

Garfield County Health District 14,966 15,259 30,225

Grant County Health District 111,767 126,762 238,529

Grays Harbor Health Department 183,113 186,702 369,815

Island County Health Department 86,600 98,221 184,821

Jefferson County Health and Human Services 82,856 89,676 172,532

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health 9,489,273 9,681,772 19,171,045

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District 551,913 563,683 1,115,596

Kittitas County Health Department 87,822 98,219 186,041

Klickitat County Health Department 57,872 67,636 125,508

Lewis County Health Department 103,978 108,817 212,795

Lincoln County Health Department 26,821 32,924 59,745

Mason County Department of Health Services 91,638 101,422 193,060

Okanogan County Health District 62,844 64,788 127,632

Pacific County Health Department 77,108 78,619 155,727

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department 2,802,613 2,870,392 5,673,005

San Juan County Health and Community Services 35,211 40,274 75,485

Skagit County Health Department 215,464 234,917 450,381

Snohomish Health District 2,238,523 2,303,371 4,541,894

Spokane County Health District 2,091,092 2,135,477 4,226,569

Northeast Tri-County Health District 106,019 116,135 222,154

Thurston County Health Department 593,358 614,255 1,207,613

Wahkiakum County Health Department 13,715 13,984 27,699

Walla Walla County-City Health Department 170,852 175,213 346,065

Whatcom County Health Department 846,015 875,369 1,721,384

Whitman County Health Department 78,081 80,274 158,355

Yakima Health District 617,792 636,841 1,254,633

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $23,780,499 $24,490,303 $48,270,802

NEW SECTION. Sec.
730. FOR THE LIABILITY ACCOUNT

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003)......... $ 6,392,000

State Surplus Assets
Reserve Fund‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 25,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 31,392,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for deposit in the liability
account.

(End
of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER TRANSFERS AND
APPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
801. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation
for fire insurance

premium distributions...................... $ 6,528,600

General Fund Appropriation
for public utility

district excise tax
distributions.......... $ 36,427,306

General Fund Appropriation
for prosecuting

attorney distributions..................... $ 3,090,000

General Fund Appropriation
for boating safety/

education and law
enforcement

distributions.............................. $ 3,780,000

General Fund Appropriation
for other tax

distributions.............................. $ 39,566

Death Investigations
Account Appropriation for

distribution to
counties for publicly

funded autopsies........................... $ 1,621,537

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account Appropriation

for harbor improvement
revenue

distribution............................... $ 147,500

Timber Tax Distribution
Account Appropriation for

distribution to
"timber" counties.......... $ 68,562,000

County Criminal Justice
Assistance

Appropriation.............................. $ 49,835,213

Municipal Criminal Justice
Assistance

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,988,097

Liquor Excise Tax Account
Appropriation for

liquor excise tax
distribution............. $ 28,659,331

Liquor Revolving Account
Appropriation for

liquor profits
distribution................ $ 55,344,817

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 274,023,967

The total expenditures
from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not
exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
802. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR
THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety
Account Appropriation... $........................................... 1,843,260

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the
2001-03 biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to
counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred
prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws
of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI
penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of
1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties);
and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
803. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR
THE MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL
JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired Driving Safety
Account Appropriation... $........................................... 1,228,840

The appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the
2001-03 biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined
by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that
substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990,
and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases
under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the
city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of
implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to:
Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209,
Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition
interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of
1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
804. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-FEDERAL REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION

General Fund Appropriation
for federal grazing

fees distribution.......................... $ 2,050,334

General Fund Appropriation
for federal flood

control funds
distribution.................. $ 26,524

Forest Reserve Fund
Appropriation for federal

forest reserve fund
distribution........... $ 47,689,181

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 49,766,039

The total expenditures
from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not
exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
805. FOR THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

Public Facilities
Construction Loan and

Grant Revolving
Account: For transfer

to the digital
government revolving account

on or before December
31, 2001............. $ 1,418,456

Financial Services
Regulation Fund: To be

transferred from the
financial services

regulation fund to the
digital government

revolving account
during the period

between July 1, 2001,
and December 31,

2001....................................... $ 2,000,000

Local Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the state toxics
control account.

Transferred funds will
be utilized

for methamphetamine lab
cleanup, to

address areawide soil
contamination

problems, and clean up
contaminated

sites as part of the
clean sites

initiative................................. $ 6,000,000

State Toxics Control
Account: For transfer

to the water quality
account for water

quality related
projects funded in the

capital budget............................. $ 9,000,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the flood

control assistance
account.................. $ 4,000,000

Water Quality Account: For
transfer to the

water pollution control
account. Transfers

shall be made at
intervals coinciding with

deposits of federal
capitalization grant

money into the
account. The amounts

transferred shall not
exceed the match

required for each
federal deposit.......... $ 12,564,487

State Treasurer's Service
Account: For

transfer to the general
fund on or

before June 30, 2003,
an amount in excess

of the cash
requirements of the state

treasurer's service
account................ $ 8,000,000

Public Works Assistance
Account: For

transfer to the
drinking water

assistance account......................... $ 7,700,000

Tobacco Settlement
Account: For transfer

to the health services
account, in an

amount not to exceed
the actual balance

of the tobacco
settlement account.......... $ 310,000,000

General Fund: For transfer
to the water quality

account.................................... $ 60,325,000

Health Services Account:
For

transfer to the state
general fund

by June 30, 2002.
Pursuant to RCW

43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be increased
in fiscal

year 2002 to reflect
this transfer......... $ 130,000,000

Health Services Account:
For

transfer to the state
general fund

by June 30, 2003.
Pursuant to RCW

43.135.035(5), the
state expenditure

limit shall be
increased in fiscal

year 2003 to reflect
this transfer......... $ 20,000,000

State Surplus Assets
Reserve Fund: For

transfer to the
multimodal transportation

account by June 30,
2002................... $ 70,000,000

Multimodal Transportation
Account: For

transfer to the state
general fund

by June 30, 2002........................... $ 70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec.
806. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-TRANSFERS

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation: For

transfer to the
department of retirement

systems expense
account: For the

administrative expenses
of the judicial

retirement
system.......................... $ 26,605

(End
of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
901. EXPENDITURE
AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure authorizations.
Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a
formal loan agreement shall be recorded as loans receivable and not as
expenditures for accounting purposes. To the extent that moneys are disbursed
on a loan basis, the corresponding appropriation shall be reduced by the amount
of loan moneys disbursed from the treasury during the 1999-01 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
902. INFORMATION SYSTEMS
PROJECTS. Agencies shall comply
with the following requirements regarding information systems projects when
specifically directed to do so by this act.

(1) Agency planning and
decisions concerning information technology shall be made in the context of its
information technology portfolio. "Information technology portfolio"
means a strategic management approach in which the relationships between agency
missions and information technology investments can be seen and understood,
such that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and business
functions are assessed and understood before implementation; and agency
activities are consistent with the development of an integrated, nonduplicative
statewide infrastructure.

(2) Agencies shall use
their information technology portfolios in making decisions on matters related
to the following:

(a) System
refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(b) Setting goals and
objectives for using information technology in meeting legislatively-mandated
missions and business needs;

(c) Assessment of
overall information processing performance, resources, and capabilities;

(d) Ensuring
appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of any new
systems developed using external resources; and

(e) Progress toward
enabling electronic access to public information.

(3) Each project will
be planned and designed to take optimal advantage of Internet technologies and
protocols. Agencies shall ensure that the project is in compliance with the
architecture, infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.

(4) The agency shall
produce a feasibility study for information technology projects at the
direction of the information services board and in accordance with published
department of information services policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such
studies shall include a statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change;
(b) the business value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation
of benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment based on
the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state operations, its
visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d) the impact on agency and
statewide information infrastructure; and (e) the impact of the proposed
enhancements to an agency's information technology capabilities on meeting
service delivery demands.

(5) The agency shall
produce a comprehensive management plan for each project. The plan or plans
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of each project.
The plan(s) shall include, but is not limited to, the following elements: A
description of the problem or opportunity that the information technology
project is intended to address; a statement of project objectives and
assumptions; a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for the
phased approach shall be such that the business case justification for a
project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or adds measurable
value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business functions within each
development cycle.

(6) The agency shall
produce quality assurance plans for information technology projects.
Consistent with the direction of the information services board and the
published policies and guidelines of the department of information services,
the quality assurance plan shall address all factors critical to successful
completion of the project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance plans
shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project progress can be
measured, a specification of quality assurance responsibilities, and a
statement of reporting requirements. The quality assurance plans shall set out
the functionality requirements for each phase of a project.

(7) A copy of each
feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan shall be
provided to the department of information services, the office of financial
management, and legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall
demonstrate a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer
funds on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system on
the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined use of
preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of private-sector
expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for individual information
systems projects is conditioned on the approval of the relevant feasibility
study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan by the department of
information services and the office of financial management.

(8) Quality assurance
status reports shall be submitted to the department of information services,
the office of financial management, and legislative fiscal committees at
intervals specified in the project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
903. VIDEO
TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The
department of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating
video telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased and
purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in developing
a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may spend any portion
of any appropriation in this act for new video telecommunication equipment, new
video telecommunication transmission, or new video telecommunication
programming, or for expanding current video telecommunication systems without
first complying with chapter 43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW
43.105.041(2), and without first submitting a video telecommunications
expenditure plan, in accordance with the policies of the department of
information services, for review and assessment by the department of
information services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall submit the plans to the department of information
services in a form prescribed by the department. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate the use of video
telecommunications in public schools by providing educational information to
local school districts and shall assist local school districts and educational
service districts in telecommunications planning and curriculum development.
Prior to any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by the
higher education coordinating board. The higher education coordinating board
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications for instruction and
instructional support in postsecondary education, including the review and
approval of instructional telecommunications course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
904. PROGRAM COST SHIFTS. Any program costs or moneys in this act that
are shifted to the general fund from another fund or account require an
adjustment to the expenditure limit under RCW 43.135.035(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
905. RECONCILIATION OF
TREASURER TRANSFERS. (1) To
reflect the fact that Initiative 728 (chapter 3, Laws of 2001) took effect
January 1, 2001, after transfers are made based on prior fiscal year
calculations, any balance in the emergency reserve fund in excess of five percent
of annual general fund‑-state revenues for fiscal year 2001 shall be
deposited as follows: Pursuant to section 3(3), chapter 2, Laws of 2000 2nd
sp. sess., 50 percent to the education construction fund; and pursuant to
section 9(3), chapter 3, Laws of 2001, 37.5 percent to the student achievement
fund and 12.5 percent to the general fund.

(2) After the close of
the fiscal year, to reconcile these accounts, the treasurer shall make
transfers between accounts as necessary to ensure that the amounts deposited
are consistent with these percentages and reflect the revised expenditure
limit, actual revenues as reported by the economic and revenue forecast
council, and the balance in the emergency reserve fund after the close of the
fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
906. EMERGENCY FUND
ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an
agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys,
the director of financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated
amount to the general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance
the agency. No appropriation shall be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
907. STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution, state
contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing bond
registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants,
and certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further
amounts as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory
formula or under chapters 39.94 and 39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made
under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
908. BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other appropriations as are
made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee
from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building
funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred
in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
909. VOLUNTARY SEPARATION
INCENTIVES. As a management
tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while improving
employee productivity and morale, agencies may offer voluntary separation
and/or downshifting incentives and options according to procedures and
guidelines established by the department of personnel and the department of
retirement systems in consultation with the office of financial management.
The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for:
Voluntary resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or temporary
separation for development purposes. No employee shall have a contractual
right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this section.

Agencies shall report
on the outcomes of their plans, and offers shall be reviewed and monitored
jointly by the department of personnel and the department of retirement
systems, for reporting to the office of financial management by December 1,
2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
910. VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT
INCENTIVES. It is the intent of
the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary retirement incentive
program that is cost neutral or results in cost savings provided that such a
program is approved by the director of retirement systems and the office of
financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization are
required to submit a report by June 30, 2003, to the legislature and the office
of financial management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the program
including resulting service delivery changes, agency efficiencies, the cost of
the retirement incentive per participant, the total cost to the state, and the
projected or actual net dollar savings over the 2001-03 biennium.

Sec. 911. RCW 43.320.110 and 2001
c 177 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a
local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which
shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of
financial institutions, except for the division of securities which shall
deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, and which shall be used for the
purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries, wages,
and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs
required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to
regulation by the department. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of
the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the
director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

Between July 1,
2001, and December 31, 2001, the legislature may transfer up to two million
dollars from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund.

Sec. 912. RCW 76.12.110 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 915 are each amended to read as follows:

There is created a
forest development account in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall
keep an account of all sums deposited therein and expended or withdrawn
therefrom. Any sums placed in the account shall be pledged for the purpose of
paying interest and principal on the bonds issued by the department, and for
the purchase of land for growing timber. Any bonds issued shall constitute a
first and prior claim and lien against the account for the payment of principal
and interest. No sums for the above purposes shall be withdrawn or paid out of
the account except upon approval of the department.

Appropriations may be
made by the legislature from the forest development account to the department
for the purpose of carrying on the activities of the department on state forest
lands, lands managed on a sustained yield basis as provided for in RCW
79.68.040, and for reimbursement of expenditures that have been made or may be
made from the resource management cost account in the management of state
forest lands. For the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
moneys from the account shall be distributed as directed in the omnibus
appropriations act to the beneficiaries of the revenues derived from state
forest lands. Funds that accrue to the state from such a distribution shall be
deposited into the salmon recovery account. These funds shall be used for a
grant program for cities and counties for the preservation and restoration of
riparian, marine, and estuarine areas.

Sec. 913. RCW 49.70.170 and 1999 c
309 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The worker and
community right to know fund is hereby established in the custody of the state
treasurer. The department shall deposit all moneys received under this chapter
in the fund. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes of this
chapter following legislative appropriation. Disbursements from the fund shall
be on authorization of the director or the director's designee. During the ((1999-2001))
2001-2003 fiscal biennium, moneys in the fund may also be used by the
military department for the purpose of assisting the state emergency response
commission and coordinating local emergency planning activities. The fund is
subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2) The department
shall assess each employer who reported ten thousand four hundred or more
worker hours in the prior calendar year an annual fee to provide for the
implementation of this chapter. The department shall promulgate rules
establishing a fee schedule for all employers who reported ten thousand four
hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year and are engaged in
business operations having a standard industrial classification, as designated
in the standard industrial classification manual prepared by the federal office
of management and budget, within major group numbers 01 through 08 (agriculture
and forestry industries), numbers 10 through 14 (mining industries), numbers 15
through 17 (construction industries), numbers 20 through 39 (manufacturing
industries), numbers 41, 42, and 44 through 49 (transportation, communications,
electric, gas, and sanitary services), number 75 (automotive repair, services,
and garages), number 76 (miscellaneous repair services), number 80 (health
services), and number 82 (educational services). The department shall
establish the annual fee for each employer who reported ten thousand four
hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year in industries
identified by this section, provided that fees assessed shall not be more than
two dollars and fifty cents per full time equivalent employee. The annual fee
shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. The fees shall be collected solely
from employers whose industries have been identified by rule under this
chapter. The department shall promulgate rules allowing employers who do not
have hazardous substances at their workplace to request an exemption from the
assessment and shall establish penalties for fraudulent exemption requests.
All fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be
collected in a cost-efficient manner and shall be deposited in the fund.

(3) Records required by
this chapter shall at all times be open to the inspection of the director, or
his designee including, the traveling auditors, agents or assistants of the
department provided for in RCW 51.16.070 and 51.48.040. The information
obtained from employer records under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to the same confidentiality requirements as set forth in RCW 51.16.070.

(4) An employer may
appeal the assessment of the fee or penalties pursuant to the procedures set
forth in Title 51 RCW and accompanying rules except that the employer shall not
have the right of appeal to superior court as provided in Title 51 RCW. The
employer from whom the fee or penalty is demanded or enforced, may however,
within thirty days of the board of industrial insurance appeal's final order,
pay the fee or penalty under written protest setting forth all the grounds upon
which such fee or penalty is claimed to be unlawful, excessive or otherwise
improper and thereafter bring an action in superior court against the
department to recover such fee or penalty or any portion of the fee or penalty which
was paid under protest.

(5) Repayment shall be
made to the general fund of any moneys appropriated by law in order to
implement this chapter.

Sec. 914. RCW 43.08.250 and 2000
sp.s c 1 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

The money received by
the state treasurer from fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or
assessments by any court organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08
RCW, shall be deposited in the public safety and education account which is
hereby created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway safety,
criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation, judicial education, the
judicial information system, civil representation of indigent persons, winter
recreation parking, and state game programs. During the fiscal biennium ending
June 30, ((2001)) 2003, the legislature may appropriate moneys
from the public safety and education account for purposes of appellate indigent
defense and other operations of the office of public defense, the criminal
litigation unit of the attorney general's office, the treatment alternatives to
street crimes program, crime victims advocacy programs, justice information
network telecommunication planning, sexual assault treatment, operations of the
office of administrator for the courts, security in the common schools,
alternative school start-up grants, programs for disruptive students, criminal
justice data collection, Washington state patrol criminal justice activities,
drug court operations, ((department of ecology)) methamphetamine-related
enforcement, drug, and alcohol treatment activities, financial
assistance to local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs incurred in the
adjudication of criminal cases, domestic violence treatment and related
services, the department of corrections' costs in implementing chapter 196,
Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local governments for costs associated with
implementing criminal and civil justice legislation, and the replacement of the
department of corrections' offender-based tracking system.

Sec. 915. RCW 82.14.310 and 1999 c
309 s 920 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county criminal
justice assistance account is created in the state treasury. Beginning in
fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the county criminal
justice assistance account from the general fund the sum of twenty-three million
two hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July
1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the
state treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor,
as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of
financial management in November of the preceding year.

(2) The moneys
deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for distribution
under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection
(4) of this section, shall be distributed at such times as distributions are
made under RCW 82.44.150 and on the relative basis of each county's funding
factor as determined under this subsection.

(a) A county's funding
factor is the sum of:

(i) The population of
the county, divided by one thousand, and multiplied by two-tenths;

(ii) The crime rate of
the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii) The annual number
of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for each one thousand in
population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b) Under this section
and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i) The population of
the county or city shall be as last determined by the office of financial
management;

(ii) The crime rate of
the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified criminal offenses, as
calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in Washington state as
published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, for each
one thousand in population;

(iii) The annual number
of criminal cases filed in the county superior court shall be determined by the
most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as published by the
office of the administrator for the courts;

(iv) Distributions and
eligibility for distributions in the 1989‑91 biennium shall be based on
1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection
and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii)
of this subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent
figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this subsection and
the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of
this subsection.

(3) Moneys distributed
under this section shall be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes
and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal
justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the
criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary
benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a)
domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence
programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020,
and (b) during the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
juvenile dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth,
truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for purposes of
this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures
for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures
for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions
for criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(4) Not more than five
percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal justice assistance account
shall be available for appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol
crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to these
enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall
not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 916. RCW 43.72.902 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 913 are each amended to read as follows:

The public health
services account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be expended only
for maintaining and improving the health of Washington residents through the
public health system. For purposes of this section, the public health system
shall consist of the state board of health, the state department of health, and
local health departments and districts. During the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003
biennium, moneys in the fund may also be used for costs associated with
hepatitis C testing and treatment in correctional facilities.

Sec. 917. RCW 43.79.465 and 1998 c
302 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The education savings
account is created in the state treasury. The account shall consist of all
moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.

(1) Ten percent of
legislative appropriations to the education savings account shall be
distributed as follows: (a) Fifty percent to the distinguished professorship
trust fund under RCW 28B.10.868; (b) seventeen percent to the graduate fellowship
trust fund under RCW 28B.10.882; and (c) thirty-three percent to the college
faculty awards trust fund under RCW 28B.50.837.

(2) The remaining
moneys in the education savings account may be appropriated solely for (a)
common school construction projects that are eligible for funding from the
common school construction account, ((and)) (b) technology improvements
in the common schools, and (c) during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium,
technology improvements in public higher education institutions.

Sec. 918. RCW 46.10.040 and 1997 c
241 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Application for
registration shall be made to the department in the manner and upon forms the
department prescribes, and shall state the name and address of each owner of
the snowmobile to be registered, and shall be signed by at least one such
owner, and shall be accompanied by an annual registration fee to be established
by the commission, after consultation with the committee and any state-wide
snowmobile user groups. ((The fee shall be fifteen dollars pending action
by the commission to increase the fee.)) The commission shall increase the
current fee of twenty dollars by ((two)) five
dollars ((and fifty cents)) effective September 30, ((1996)) 2001,
and the commission shall increase the fee by another ((two)) five
dollars ((and fifty cents)) effective September 30, ((1997)) 2002.
After the fee increase effective September 30, ((1997)) 2002, the
commission shall not increase the fee. Upon receipt of the application and the
application fee, the snowmobile shall be registered and a registration number
assigned, which shall be affixed to the snowmobile in a manner provided in RCW
46.10.070.

The registration
provided in this section shall be valid for a period of one year. At the end
of the period of registration, every owner of a snowmobile in this state shall
renew his or her registration in the manner the department prescribes, for an
additional period of one year, upon payment of the annual registration fee as
determined by the commission.

Any person acquiring a
snowmobile already validly registered under the provisions of this chapter
must, within ten days of the acquisition or purchase of the snowmobile, make
application to the department for transfer of the registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar and
twenty-five cents.

A snowmobile owned by a
resident of another state or Canadian province where registration is not
required by law may be issued a nonresident registration permit valid for not
more than sixty days. Application for the permit shall state the name and
address of each owner of the snowmobile to be registered and shall be signed by
at least one owner and shall be accompanied by a registration fee of five
dollars. The registration permit shall be carried on the vehicle at all times
during its operation in this state.

The registration fees
provided in this section shall be in lieu of any personal property or excise
tax heretofore imposed on snowmobiles by this state or any political
subdivision thereof, and no city, county, or other municipality, and no state
agency shall hereafter impose any other registration or license fee on any
snowmobile in this state.

The department shall
make available a pair of uniform decals consistent with the provisions of RCW
46.10.070. In addition to the registration fee provided in this section the
department shall charge each applicant for registration the actual cost of the
decal. The department shall make available replacement decals for a fee
equivalent to the actual cost of the decals.

Sec. 919. RCW 72.11.040 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:

The cost of supervision
fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
assessments made under RCW 9.94A.270 and 72.04A.120 shall be deposited into the
fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only to support the collection of
legal financial obligations. During the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003
biennium, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated with the
department's supervision of the offenders in the community((, and the
replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system)).
Only the secretary of the department of corrections or the secretary's designee
may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures.

Sec. 920. RCW 69.50.520 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

The violence reduction
and drug enforcement account is created in the state treasury. All designated
receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(h)(1),
82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of
1989 shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and
chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds
from the account may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for
costs associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the ((1999-2001)) 2001-2003
biennium, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated with
providing grants to local governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997,
((the design, sitework, and construction of the special commitment center,))
the replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking
system, maintenance and operating costs of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting system, and for
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, ((2001)) 2003,
at least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall be
used for providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the
family policy council.

Sec. 921. RCW 70.146.030 and 1996
c 37 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The water quality
account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be
used only in a manner consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the
account shall be administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject
to legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include tax
receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390, principal and
interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and
any other moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.

(2) The department may
use or permit the use of any moneys in the account to make grants or loans to
public bodies, including grants to public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any
case where federal, local, or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing
basis, for water pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes
of assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water pollution
control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments made by a public
body to a service provider under a service agreement entered into pursuant to
RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this chapter and for related
administrative expenses. For the period July 1, 2001, to June 30, 2003,
moneys in the account may be used to process applications received by the
department that seek to make changes to or transfer existing water rights.
No more than three percent of the moneys deposited in the account may be used
by the department to pay for the administration of the grant and loan program
authorized by this chapter.

(3) Beginning with the
biennium ending June 30, 1997, the department shall present a biennial progress
report on the use of moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate
committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on
appropriations. The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The report
shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description, and amount of
the grant, loan, or both.

(4) During the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 1997, moneys in the account may be transferred by the
legislature to the water right permit processing account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
922. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 923. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 911 of this act which takes effect July 1,
2001.

(End
of part)

INDEX

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
COURTS.................................... 8

ATTORNEY
GENERAL............................................... 16

SALARY
ADJUSTMENTS............................................ 174

BELATED
CLAIMS................................................ 165

BOARD
FOR VOLUNTEER FIRE FIGHTERS.............................. 31

BOARD
OF ACCOUNTANCY........................................... 29

BOARD
OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS.......................... 67

BOARD
OF TAX APPEALS........................................... 27

BOND
EXPENSES................................................. 195

CASELOAD
FORECAST COUNCIL...................................... 17

CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 152

CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS......... 16

COLUMBIA
RIVER GORGE COMMISSION................................ 80

COMMISSION
ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS......................... 24

COMMISSION
ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS........................... 15

COMMISSION
ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS................................. 24

COMMISSION
ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT.................................. 8

CONSERVATION
COMMISSION........................................ 88

COURT
OF APPEALS................................................ 7

CRIMINAL
JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION........................... 67

DEATH
BENEFIT

COMMON
SCHOOLS................................................ 168

STATE
AGENCIES................................................ 169

DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE...................................... 97

DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT....... 18

COUNTY
CORPORATION ASSISTANCE................................. 176

COUNTY
PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE............................... 184

MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION ASSISTANCE.............................. 177

DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 73

DEPARTMENT
OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 80

DEPARTMENT
OF FISH AND WILDLIFE................................ 89

DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION........................... 27

DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH........................................... 71

DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES............................. 28

DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES............................. 68

DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING........................................ 99

DEPARTMENT
OF NATURAL RESOURCES................................ 94

DISTRIBUTION
FROM THE FOREST DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT.............. 166

DEPARTMENT
OF PERSONNEL........................................ 24

DEPARTMENT
OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS........................... 171

OPERATIONS..................................................... 24

TRANSFERS..................................................... 190

DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE.......................................... 25

DEPARTMENT
OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND........................... 77

DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES....................... 35

ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM................. 64

AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM............................... 53

ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM............................ 59

CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM........................... 36

DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM............................. 50

ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM...................................... 57

JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM................................ 39

MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM..................................... 60

MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM.......................................... 44

PAYMENTS
TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM............................. 65

VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM.............................. 64

DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS................................. 70

EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 161

EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 152

ECONOMIC
AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL.......................... 23

EMERGENCY
FUND ALLOCATIONS.................................... 194

EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT................................. 78

ENVIRONMENTAL
HEARINGS OFFICE.................................. 88

EXPENDITURE
AUTHORIZATIONS.................................... 191

FORENSIC
INVESTIGATION COUNCIL................................. 29

GOVERNOR

COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS.............................. 169

GOVERNOR'S
OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS............................ 15

GROWTH
PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD................................. 34

HIGHER
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS.............................. 155

POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION........................ 155

HORSE
RACING COMMISSION........................................ 30

HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES........................................ 2

HUMAN
RIGHTS COMMISSION........................................ 67

INCENTIVE
SAVINGS

FY
2000....................................................... 174

FY
2001....................................................... 175

INDETERMINATE
SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD............................ 70

INFORMATION
SYSTEMS PROJECTS.................................. 191

INSURANCE
COMMISSIONER......................................... 29

INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION................... 87

JOINT
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE.................... 3

JOINT
LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE............................. 6

K-12
CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS........... 141

LAW
LIBRARY..................................................... 7

LEGISLATIVE
AGENCIES............................................ 7

LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE..... 6

LIABILITY
ACCOUNT............................................. 185

LIEUTENANT
GOVERNOR............................................ 12

LIQUOR
CONTROL BOARD........................................... 30

LOCAL
GOVERNMENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE......................... 175

MILITARY
DEPARTMENT............................................ 31

MUNICIPAL
RESEARCH COUNCIL..................................... 27

OFFICE
OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.............................. 24

OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT................................. 23

COMPENSATION
ACTIONS OF PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD............. 174

CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS........................... 172

DIGITAL
GOVERNMENT POOL....................................... 167

DIGITAL
GOVERNMENT REVOLVING ACCOUNT.......................... 168

EDUCATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT........................ 173

EMERGENCY
FUND................................................ 164

EXTRAORDINARY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS.......................... 165

FIRE
CONTINGENCY POOL......................................... 165

TECHNOLOGY
POOL............................................... 167

OFFICE
OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES............ 27

OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE....................................... 10

OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR......................................... 11

OFFICE
OF THE STATE ACTUARY..................................... 6

PERSONNEL
APPEALS BOARD........................................ 24

PROGRAM
COST SHIFTS........................................... 194

PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION................................... 12

PUBLIC
EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION......................... 34

PUGET
SOUND FERRY OPERATIONS ACCOUNT.......................... 175

RECONCILIATION
OF TREASURER TRANSFERS......................... 194

REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION....................................... 15

SALARY
COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT.............................. 172

SECRETARY
OF STATE............................................. 12

SENATE.......................................................... 2

SENTENCING
GUIDELINES COMMISSION............................... 77

SPOKANE
INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE..... 161

STATE
AUDITOR.................................................. 15

STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES.............. 147

STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 142

STATE
CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER.............................. 34

STATE
HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY.................................... 66

STATE
INVESTMENT BOARD......................................... 25

STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION.......................... 86

STATE
PATROL.................................................. 100

STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 162

STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 162

STATE
TREASURER................................................ 15

BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST............................. 163, 164

COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT.................... 187

FEDERAL
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION............................. 188

MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT................. 187

STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION............................... 186

TRANSFERS..................................................... 188

STATUTE
LAW COMMITTEE........................................... 6

STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS...................................... 195

SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION.......................... 140

BASIC
EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION......................... 116

EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS..................................... 130

EDUCATIONAL
SERVICE DISTRICTS................................. 128

ELEMENTARY
AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT............... 130

GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT......................................... 109

INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.............................. 128

LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM................................... 137

LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE....................................... 128

LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS....................................... 139

PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS.......................... 129

PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION.......................................... 122

SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS...................... 120

SCHOOL
FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS.................................. 123

SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS.................................... 123

STUDENT
ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM................................... 140

TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS............................. 127

TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS............................... 137

SUPREME
COURT................................................... 7

THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 152

UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON...................................... 150

UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION........................ 31

VIDEO
TELECOMMUNICATIONS...................................... 193

VOLUNTARY
RETIREMENT INCENTIVES............................... 196

VOLUNTARY
SEPARATION INCENTIVES............................... 195

WASHINGTON
POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM............. 98

WASHINGTON
STATE ARTS COMMISSION.............................. 161

WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY........................... 161

WASHINGTON
STATE LIBRARY...................................... 161

WASHINGTON
STATE LOTTERY....................................... 24

WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 151

WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 155

WORK
FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD.......... 160

---
END ---