BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND
DECLARATION. Plan 1 of the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system (LEOFF plan 1) has been closed to new members for nearly a
quarter of a century. During that time, LEOFF plan 1 has achieved full funding
and has assets which exceed all projected future liabilities and has a surplus
approaching one billion dollars. In recognition of the contributions of
working fire fighters and police officers to LEOFF plan 1, it is the purpose of
this chapter, in part, to provide for an enhanced retirement benefit to LEOFF
plan 1 members.

LEOFF plan 1 also
provides substantial postretirement health and long-term care benefits. The
financial burden of this benefit, which is an integral part of LEOFF plan 1,
falls exclusively on the cities, counties, and fire districts that employed the
retired fire fighters and police officers. In recognition of the fiscal
burdens facing these political subdivisions, it is appropriate to provide an
additional source of funding to ensure the integrity of the benefit without
undermining the financial stability of the employing governments.

The supreme court of
the state of Washington, in the 1956 decision Bakenhus v. City of Seattle,
established that the fire fighters and police officers, active and retired,
have a constitutionally protected contractual right to a secure retirement
benefit, funded on a sound actuarial basis. The legislature recognizes that
the state of Washington is the ultimate guarantor of the LEOFF plan 1
retirement benefits. While members have a constitutionally protected right to
the pension benefits that are provided as part of their contract of employment,
there is no such right in surplus assets which are unnecessary to the actuarial
soundness of the retirement plan.

The state retains the
inherent power to terminate a retirement plan and, upon the dedication of
sufficient resources to ensure the actuarial soundness of the benefits
promised, is entitled to a reversion of the surplus assets upon termination of
the plan.

The legislature has
determined that, in order to accomplish the foregoing goals and objectives, it
is in the best interest of the members and beneficiaries of LEOFF plan 1 that
the plan be terminated and that a restated retirement plan with enhanced
benefits be created. It is further determined to be in the best interest of
the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the state that surplus
assets remaining after adequate actuarial provision for the obligated
retirement benefits revert to the state and be allocated for the purposes
outlined in this chapter.

It is the intent of the
legislature that the LEOFF plan 1 termination be performed in accordance with
the applicable provisions of the federal internal revenue code and in recognition
of the contract rights of the members and beneficiaries of the plan to an
actuarially sound retirement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. TERMINATION OF LEOFF PLAN
1. Plan 1 of the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system (LEOFF plan 1) is hereby terminated. During the transition
between the termination of LEOFF plan 1 and the establishment of the restated
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, all LEOFF plan
1 benefits, as they existed prior to December 1, 2001, shall continue without
interruption.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. RESTATED LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS' AND FIRE FIGHTERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM ESTABLISHED. The restated law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system is hereby
established as provided in this chapter. The restated law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system established by this chapter may
also be referred to by statute and rule as the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. RESTATED LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS' AND FIRE FIGHTERS' DEFINED BENEFIT RETIREMENT FUND ESTABLISHED. (1)
The restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit
retirement fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The fund shall
consist of assets transferred from the Washington law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement fund, investment earnings, and other
amounts deposited to the fund. On direction of the director of retirement
systems, the state treasurer shall transfer to the restated defined benefit
retirement fund an amount equal to the actuarial present value of the fully
projected liabilities of plan 1 of the Washington law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system based on the actuarial valuation for calendar
year 2000, adjusted to the transfer date, and the long-term economic
assumptions in effect on July 1, 2001, under chapter 41.45 RCW. For purposes
of funding the plan 1 lump-sum defined benefit created in section 6 of this
act, on direction of the director of retirement systems, the state treasurer
shall also transfer an amount to the restated defined benefit retirement fund
equal to twelve percent of the assets in the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement fund in excess of the
actuarial present value of the fully projected liabilities of plan 1, as
calculated under this subsection.

(2) The pension funding
council shall conduct an independent audit of the calculation of the present
value amount determined by the state actuary. The transfer of these assets to
the restated defined benefit retirement fund shall occur as soon as practical
after December 1, 2001. The remaining assets in the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement fund shall continue to be invested
by the state investment board until the transfers occur under sections 5 and 8
of this act.

(3) Expenditures from
the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit retirement
fund may be used only for the purposes of this chapter. Only the director of
retirement systems or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the fund. No appropriation is required for expenditures.

(4) The director of
retirement systems may direct the state treasurer, subsequent to the initial
transfer of assets under sections 1 through 8 of this act, to make such
additional transfers as are necessary to reconcile the amounts transferred and
the requirements of sections 1 through 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. STATE SURPLUS ASSETS
RESERVE FUND ESTABLISHED. (1) The state surplus assets reserve fund is created
in the state treasury. By December 1, 2001, the state surplus assets reserve
fund shall receive all assets of the Washington law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement fund remaining after (a) the
distributions to the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
defined benefit retirement fund required by section 4 of this act; and (b) the
distribution to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' medical
benefits risk pool under section 8 of this act and chapter 41.--- RCW (sections
301 through 310 of this act).

(2) Sufficient assets
shall be maintained in the state surplus assets reserve fund at all times to
ensure the actuarial soundness of the defined benefits of the restated law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit retirement plan
without the necessity of further employee or employer contributions. Any
actuarial shortfall in the defined benefit plan shall be amortized in equal
installments over a period not to exceed fifteen years. Payments required by
this subsection shall be made first from the assets of the state surplus assets
reserve fund. The state investment board shall develop an investment policy,
taking into account the purposes of the reserve fund and the preservation of
capital, for the purpose of accomplishing the objective of this section.

(3) The office of the
state actuary shall perform an annual actuarial valuation of the restated law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit plan to determine its
continued actuarial soundness. Such sums shall be transferred by the
legislature from the state surplus assets reserve fund as may be necessary
under subsection (2) of this section to maintain the actuarial soundness of the
defined benefit plan.

(4) Subject to the
actuarial needs of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
defined benefit plan, the remaining assets of the reserve fund shall be
retained as a budget reserve and may be expended exclusively to fund any
unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities of the public retirement systems under
chapter 41.45 RCW, and for other one-time costs of the state. Except as
required by subsection (2) of this section, no appropriation shall be made from
the reserve fund for any fiscal year unless the office of the state actuary has
certified that the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
defined benefit plan remains fully funded on a sound actuarial basis. No
appropriation shall be made from the reserve fund that would reduce the fund
balance below two hundred twenty million dollars unless the state actuary has
certified that the defined benefit plan assets are greater than one hundred
twenty-five percent of the present value of the fully projected liabilities of
the defined benefit plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. LUMP-SUM DEFINED BENEFIT.
(1) The amount equal to twelve percent of the excess assets of the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement fund
transferred to the restated defined benefit retirement fund by section 4 of
this act shall fund the plan 1 lump-sum defined benefit created by this
section.

(2) Law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 1 active members, term-vested members,
retirees, and spousal survivors eligible for benefits under sections 226, 227,
and 228 of this act shall be eligible to receive the plan 1 lump-sum defined
benefit pursuant to the conditions established in this section. All assets
identified in subsection (1) of this section shall be allocated to the eligible
recipients of the plan 1 lump-sum defined benefit. The allocation to each
eligible recipient shall be based on the number of months of service credit
earned under chapter 41.26 RCW through June 30, 2000, or credited pursuant to
RCW 41.26.040, in proportion to the total months of such service credit earned
by all eligible recipients. The allocations for eligible recipients who are
spousal survivors or dependents shall be based on the number of months of such
service credit earned by the deceased member. This distribution shall occur on
the date of the transfer of assets to the restated defined benefit retirement
fund in section 4 of this act, or as soon thereafter as is practical and
reasonable, consistent with applicable provisions of the federal internal
revenue code.

(3) If a member is
active or term-vested, interest as determined by the director shall accumulate
from the date the lump-sum defined benefit is allocated until distribution to
the participant upon retirement from service or for disability. For the
purposes of this section, a term-vested member is a member who has rendered
five years of service, has not withdrawn his or her member contributions, and
who has not applied for retirement.

(4) If a member dies
before distribution of the lump-sum benefit created in this section occurs, the
distribution shall be made according to the member's designation in section 216
of this act.

(5) The lump-sum
benefit created in this section is subject to the provisions of section 209 of
this act.

(6) If this section is
held to be invalid, by section 503 of this act or otherwise, recipients of the
lump-sum benefit provided by this section shall no longer be entitled to this
benefit and shall be required to return any funds received according to the
provisions of RCW 41.50.135, 41.50.136, 41.50.137, and 41.50.138.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. INVESTMENT OF FUNDS. (1)
The state investment board has the full power to invest, reinvest, manage,
contract, sell, or exchange investment money in (a) the restated law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit retirement fund, (b)
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' medical benefits risk pool
account, and (c) the state surplus assets reserve fund. All investment and
operating costs of the state investment board and the state treasurer associated
with these funds shall be paid under RCW 43.08.190, 43.33A.160, 43.79A.040, and
43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, the earnings from the
investment of the funds shall be retained by the funds.

(2) All investments
made by the state investment board shall be made with the exercise of that
degree of judgment and care under RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policy
established by the state investment board.

(3) As deemed
appropriate by the state investment board, money in the funds may be commingled
for investment with other funds under the investment authority of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. TRANSFER TO LEOFF MEDICAL
BENEFITS RISK POOL. By December 1, 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer
from the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement fund to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' medical
benefits risk pool account under chapter 41.--- RCW (sections 301 through 310
of this act) an amount equal to the transfer to the restated law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit fund made for purposes of funding
the plan 1 lump-sum defined benefit required by section 6 of this act. The
distribution shall be for the exclusive purposes of chapter 41.--- RCW
(sections 301 through 310 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. RESERVATION OF RIGHTS.
The legislature reserves the right to make such amendments and modifications as
may be necessary in the future to accomplish the goals of sections 1 through 10
of this act, without any diminution of the rights and benefits of the LEOFF
plan 1 members, retirees, and surviving spouses, as they existed prior to
December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS.
Any claim filed challenging the validity of sections 1 through 10 of this act
not filed before July 1, 2002, is forever barred, if not already barred by an
otherwise applicable statute of limitations. By December 31, 2001, the
department of retirement systems shall send notification of the provisions of
sections 1 through 10 of this act, by first class mail, to the last known
address of each plan 1 active member, retiree, and spousal survivor.

PART
I

AMENDMENTS TO CHAPTER 41.26 RCW

Sec. 101. RCW 41.26.010 and 1969
ex.s. c 209 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall be
known and cited as the "Washington Law Enforcement Officers' and Fire
Fighters' Retirement System‑-Plan 2 Act".

Sec. 102. RCW 41.26.030 and 1996 c
178 s 11 and 1996 c 38 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1) "Retirement
system" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2" provided herein.

(2)(((a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any
city, town, county, or district or the elected officials of any municipal
corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter, any
authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of
RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents
the fire fighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over
20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which
is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or fire fighters
as defined in this chapter.

(b))) "Employer" ((for plan 2 members,))
means the following entities to the extent that the entity employs any law
enforcement officer and/or fire fighter:

(((i))) (a)
The legislative authority of any city, town, county, or district;

(((ii))) (b)
The elected officials of any municipal corporation;

(((iii))) (c)
The governing body of any other general authority law enforcement agency; or

(((iv))) (d)
A four-year institution of higher education having a fully operational fire
department as of January 1, 1996.

(3) "Law
enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is
commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated
basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with
the following qualifications:

(a) No person who is
serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and
who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;

(b) Only those deputy
sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county
charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy
sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those
persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a
private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;

(c) Only such full time
commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices,
positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically
created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter
provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be
considered city police officers;

(d) ((The term
"law enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a
labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer under RCW
41.26.030(2)) if that individual has five years previous membership in the
retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this
subsection (3)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members; and

(e))) The term "law enforcement officer"
also includes a person employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety
officer or director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially
involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a
city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The provisions of
this subsection (3)(((e))) (d) shall not apply to any public
safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a retirement
allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(4) "Fire
fighter" means:

(a) Any person who is
serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire
department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires
passing a civil service examination for fire fighter, and who is actively
employed as such;

(b) Anyone who is
actively employed as a full time fire fighter where the fire department does
not have a civil service examination;

(c) Supervisory fire fighter
personnel; and

(d) ((Any full time
executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized
under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection (4)(d) shall not apply
to plan 2 members;

(e) The executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer
under RCW 41.26.030(2) as now or hereafter amended), if such individual has
five years previous membership in a retirement system established in chapter
41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (4)(e) shall not apply
to plan 2 members;

(f))) Any person who is serving on a full time,
fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department
in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil
service examination for fire fighter((; and

(g) Any person who
on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated basis by an
employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under
the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW)).

(5)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(6) "Surviving
spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. (("Surviving
spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as
provided in RCW 41.26.162.))

(7)(a)
"Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is
under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically handicapped as determined
by the department, except a handicapped person in the full time care of a state
institution, who is:

(i) A natural born
child;

(ii) A stepchild where
that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under
this chapter;

(iii) A posthumous
child;

(iv) A child legally
adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable
under this chapter; or

(v) An illegitimate
child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this
chapter.

(b) A person shall also
be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven
months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other
educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which
it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal and
regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which
the child returns to school.

(8) "Member"
means any fire fighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply
under subsection((s)) (3) or (4) of this section ((whose membership
is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer
and fire fighter)) who is employed in that capacity on or after ((such
date)) October 1, 1977.

(9) "Retirement
fund" means the "Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' ((retirement)) system plan 2 retirement fund" as
provided for ((herein)) in RCW 41.50.075.

(10)
"Employee" means any law enforcement officer or fire fighter as
defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(11)(((a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit
described herein.

(b))) "Beneficiary" ((for plan 2
members,)) means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other
benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer
by another person.

(12)(((a)
"Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member
holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the
date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at
time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member
who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank
preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries
payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within
such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed,
computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests
pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of vesting.

(b))) "Final average salary" ((for plan
2 members,)) means the monthly average of the member's basic salary for the
highest consecutive sixty service credit months of service prior to such
member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized
unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average
salary.

(13)(((a)
"Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of
salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or
special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be
computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be
based.

(b))) "Basic salary" ((for plan 2
members,)) means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll
period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include
wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections
403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall
exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated
vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay. In
any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the
option of having such member's basic salary be the greater of:

(((i))) (a)
The basic salary the member would have received had such member not served in
the legislature; or

(((ii))) (b)
Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment
and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the
retirement system required because basic salary under (((b)(i))) (a)
of this subsection is greater than basic salary under (b)(((ii))) of
this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions.

(14)(((a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an
employer as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation
is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in
duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service
in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit
shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member
from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a fire
fighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy
or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only
service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any
retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(i) For members
retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of a prior
pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also include (A)
such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member
as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (B)
such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member
under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160 or 41.20.170. However, in no
event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970,
where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a
position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time
credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such
prior act.

(ii) A member who is
employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service
to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual
service.

(b))) "Service" ((for plan 2 members,))
means periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which
basic salary is earned for ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall
constitute a service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one
or more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy hours
but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute one-half service
credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for
which basic salary is earned for less than seventy hours shall constitute a
one-quarter service credit month.

Members of the
retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective position may
elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service credit years of
service shall be determined by dividing the total number of service credit
months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit year of service
as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation of such
retirement allowance or benefits.

If a member receives
basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar month, the
individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit during any
calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered;
or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar month in
which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours is
rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar month in
which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(15) "Accumulated
contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest
credited thereon.

(16) "Actuarial
reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein
reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred
in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of
each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of
retirement.

(17) "Actuarial
valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition
of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary
value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of
future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among
active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement,
withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(18) (("Disability
board" for plan 1 members means either the county disability board or the
city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.

(19)
"Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion
thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's
full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The definition
contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20) "Disability
retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period following termination of
a member's disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a
disability retirement allowance.

(21))) "Position" means the employment held
at any particular time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(((22) "Medical
services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as minimum
services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid
in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a) Hospital
expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for

(i) Board and room
not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the
attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii) Necessary
hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.

(b) Other medical
expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical
expenses", provided that they have not been considered as "hospital
expenses".

(i) The fees of the
following:

(A) A physician or
surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B) An osteopathic
physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;

(C) A chiropractor
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii) The charges of
a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the
member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the
member's spouse.

(iii) The charges
for the following medical services and supplies:

(A) Drugs and
medicines upon a physician's prescription;

(B) Diagnostic x-ray
and laboratory examinations;

(C) X-ray, radium,
and radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D) Anesthesia and
oxygen;

(E) Rental of iron
lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F) Artificial limbs
and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G) Professional
ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when
injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H) Dental charges
incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and
who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after
the accident;

(I) Nursing home
confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J) Physical therapy
by a registered physical therapist;

(K) Blood
transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by
voluntary donors;

(L) An optometrist
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(23))) (19) "Regular interest" means
such rate as the director may determine.

(((24))) (20)
"Retiree" ((for persons who establish membership in the retirement
system on or after October 1, 1977,)) means any member in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by such member.

(((25))) (21)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(((26))) (22)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(((27))) (23)
"State elective position" means any position held by any person
elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of
the legislature.

(((28))) (24)
"Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1,
1977, which plan was terminated effective December 1, 2001, and members
transferred to the retirement system established by chapter 41.26A RCW.

(((29))) (25)
"Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1,
1977.

(((30))) (26)
"Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service
credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(((31))) (27)
"Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(((32))) (28)
"General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency,
department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or
other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or
division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and
apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal
laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such an
agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority law
enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection
of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws
relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state
departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and social and health
services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the
state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation
commission, the state liquor control board, and the state department of
corrections.

Sec. 103. RCW 41.26.040 and 1991 c
35 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 is
hereby created for fire fighters and law enforcement officers.

(1) ((Notwithstanding
RCW 41.26.030(8),)) All fire fighters and law enforcement officers
employed as such on or after ((March 1, 1970)) October 1, 1977,
on a full time fully compensated basis in this state shall be members of the
retirement system established by this chapter with respect to all periods of
service as such, to the exclusion of any pension system existing under any
prior act.

(2) ((Any employee
serving as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter on March 1, 1970, who is
then making retirement contributions under any prior act shall have his membership
transferred to the system established by this chapter as of such date. Upon
retirement for service or for disability, or death, of any such employee, his
retirement benefits earned under this chapter shall be computed and paid. In
addition, his benefits under the prior retirement act to which he was making
contributions at the time of this transfer shall be computed as if he had not
transferred. For the purpose of such computations, the employee's
creditability of service and eligibility for service or disability retirement
and survivor and all other benefits shall continue to be as provided in such
prior retirement act, as if transfer of membership had not occurred. The
excess, if any, of the benefits so computed, giving full value to survivor benefits,
over the benefits payable under this chapter shall be paid whether or not the
employee has made application under the prior act. If the employee's prior
retirement system was the Washington public employees' retirement system,
payment of such excess shall be made by that system; if the employee's prior
retirement system was the statewide city employees' retirement system, payment
of such excess shall be made by the employer which was the member's employer
when his transfer of membership occurred: PROVIDED, That any death in line of
duty lump sum benefit payment shall continue to be the obligation of that
system as provided in RCW 41.44.210; in the case of all other prior retirement
systems, payment of such excess shall be made by the employer which was the
member's employer when his transfer of membership occurred.

(3))) All funds held by any firemen's or policemen's
relief and pension fund shall remain in that fund for the purpose of paying the
obligations of the fund. The municipality shall continue to levy the dollar
rate as provided in RCW 41.16.060, and this dollar rate shall be used for the
purpose of paying the benefits provided in chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW. The
obligations of chapter 41.20 RCW shall continue to be paid from whatever financial
sources the city has been using for this purpose.

Sec. 104. RCW 41.26.061 and 1997 c
103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A member shall not
receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW ((41.26.120, 41.26.125,
41.26.130, or)) 41.26.470 if the disability is the result of criminal
conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

PART
II

CHAPTER 41.26A RCW: RESTATED LEOFF
RETIREMENT SYSTEM

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. APPLICATION OF CHAPTER.
This chapter applies to members of the restated law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system. Membership in the system is limited to those
persons who were members of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 RCW prior to December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Retirement
system" means the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system.

(2)
"Employer" means the legislative authority of any city, town, county,
or district or the elected officials of any municipal corporation that employs
any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter, any authorized association of
such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of section 225 of this act,
any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the fire
fighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over twenty
thousand population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which
is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or fire fighters
as defined in this chapter.

(3) "Law
enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person who is
commissioned and employed by an employer on a full-time, fully compensated
basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with
the following qualifications:

(a) No person who is
serving in a position that is basically clerical or secretarial in nature, and
who is not commissioned shall be considered a law enforcement officer;

(b) Only those deputy
sheriffs, including those serving under a different title pursuant to county
charter, who have successfully completed a civil service examination for deputy
sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those
persons serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a
private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;

(c) Only such full-time
commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been appointed to offices,
positions, or ranks in the police department which have been specifically
created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by city charter
provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be
considered city police officers;

(d) The term "law
enforcement officer" also includes the executive secretary of a labor
guild, association, or organization (which is an employer under this section)
if that individual has five years previous membership in the retirement system
established in chapter 41.20 RCW; and

(e) The term "law
enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on or after January
1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public safety, so long as
the job duties substantially involve only either police or fire duties, or
both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population of less than ten
thousand. The provisions of this subsection (3)(e) shall not apply to any
public safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a
retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(4) "Fire
fighter" means:

(a) Any person who is
serving on a full-time, fully compensated basis as a member of a fire
department of an employer and who is serving in a position which requires
passing a civil service examination for fire fighter, and who is actively
employed as such;

(b) Anyone who is
actively employed as a full-time fire fighter where the fire department does
not have a civil service examination;

(c) Supervisory fire
fighter personnel;

(d) Any full-time
executive secretary of an association of fire protection districts authorized
under RCW 52.12.031;

(e) The executive
secretary of a labor guild, association, or organization (which is an employer
under this section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a
retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW;

(f) Any person who is
serving on a full-time, fully compensated basis for an employer, as a fire
dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was
required to have passed a civil service examination for fire fighter; and

(g) Any person who on
March 1, 1970, was employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis by an
employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement contributions under
the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW.

(5)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(6) "Surviving
spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member. "Surviving
spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member except as
provided in section 228 of this act.

(7)(a)
"Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is
under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically handicapped as determined
by the department, except a handicapped person in the full-time care of a state
institution, who is:

(i) A natural born
child;

(ii) A stepchild where
that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits are payable under
this chapter;

(iii) A posthumous
child;

(iv) A child legally
adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits are payable
under this chapter; or

(v) An illegitimate
child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable under this
chapter.

(b) A person shall also
be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of twenty years and eleven
months while attending any high school, college, or vocational or other
educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in
which it is located, including the summer vacation months and all other normal
and regular vacation periods at the particular educational institution after
which the child returns to school.

(8) "Member"
means any fire fighter, law enforcement officer, or other person as would apply
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section whose membership is transferred to
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
on or after March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and fire fighter
who is employed in that capacity on or after such date.

(9) "Retirement
fund" means the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
defined benefit retirement fund.

(10)
"Employee" means any law enforcement officer or fire fighter as
defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(11)
"Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance,
disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit described herein.

(12) "Final
average salary" means (a) for a member holding the same position or rank
for a minimum of twelve months preceding the date of retirement, the basic
salary attached to such same position or rank at time of retirement; (b) for
any other member, including a civil service member who has not served a minimum
of twelve months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement,
the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member during any
consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's last ten years of
service for which service credit is allowed, computed by dividing the total
basic salaries payable to such member during the selected twenty-four month
period by twenty-four; (c) in the case of disability of any member, the basic
salary payable to such member at the time of disability retirement; (d) in the
case of a member who hereafter vests pursuant to section 216 of this act, the
basic salary payable to such member at the time of vesting.

(13) "Basic
salary" means the basic monthly rate of salary or wages, including
longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or special salary or wages,
upon which pension or retirement benefits will be computed and upon which
employer contributions and salary deductions will be based.

(14)
"Service" means all periods of employment for an employer as a fire
fighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation is paid, together
with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the
purposes of this chapter service also includes service in the armed forces of
the United States as provided in section 230 of this act. Credit shall be
allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member from and
after the member's initial commencement of employment as a fire fighter or law
enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more hours,
or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only service credit months
of service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or
other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(a) For members
retiring after May 21, 1971, who were employed under the coverage of a prior
pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" also includes (i) such
military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to the member as of
March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension act, and (ii) such
other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular member under
the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160 or 41.20.170. However, in no event
shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where
the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a position
covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time credit is
claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such prior act.

(b) A member who is
employed by two employers at the same time shall only be credited with service
to one such employer for any month during which the member rendered such dual
service.

(15) "Accumulated
contributions" means the employee's contributions made by a member,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest
credited thereon.

(16) "Actuarial
reserve" means a method of financing a pension or retirement plan wherein
reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit payments are incurred
in order that sufficient funds will be available on the date of retirement of
each member to pay the member's future benefits during the period of
retirement.

(17) "Actuarial
valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial condition
of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present monetary
value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary value of
future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among
active and retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement,
withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(18) "Disability
board" means either the county disability board or the city disability
board established in section 218 of this act.

(19) "Disability
leave" means the period of six months or any portion thereof during which
a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's full salary prior to
the commencement of disability retirement.

(20) "Disability
retirement" means the period following termination of a member's
disability leave, during which the member is in receipt of a disability
retirement allowance.

(21)
"Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which
may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(22) "Medical
services" include the following as minimum services to be provided.
Reasonable charges for these services shall be paid in accordance with section
225 of this act.

(a) Hospital expenses:
These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own behalf, for:

(i) Board and room not
to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is required by the
attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii) Necessary hospital
services, other than board and room, furnished by the hospital.

(b) Other medical
expenses: The following charges are considered "other medical
expenses," provided that they have not been considered as "hospital
expenses."

(i) The fees of the
following:

(A) A physician or
surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B) An osteopathic
physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;

(C) A chiropractor
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii) The charges of a
registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily resides in the
member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member or the
member's spouse.

(iii) The charges for
the following medical services and supplies:

(A) Drugs and medicines
upon a physician's prescription;

(B) Diagnostic x-ray
and laboratory examinations;

(C) X-ray, radium, and
radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D) Anesthesia and
oxygen;

(E) Rental of iron lung
and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F) Artificial limbs
and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G) Professional
ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a hospital when
injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H) Dental charges
incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or her teeth and
who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within ninety days after
the accident;

(I) Nursing home
confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J) Physical therapy by
a registered physical therapist;

(K) Blood transfusions,
including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;

(L) An optometrist
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(23) "Regular
interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(25) "State actuary"
or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(26) "State
elective position" means any position held by any person elected or
appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the
legislature.

(27) "Service
credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is
equal to one when divided by twelve.

(28) "Service
credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of
partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(29) "General
authority law enforcement agency" means any agency, department, or
division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of
local government of this state, and any agency, department, or division of
state government, having as its primary function the detection and apprehension
of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in
general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency,
department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority law
enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection
of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws
relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state
departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and social and health
services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the
state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation
commission, the state liquor control board, and the state department of
corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. SYSTEM CREATED‑‑MEMBERSHIP‑‑FUNDS.
The restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system is
hereby created for fire fighters and law enforcement officers.

(1) Notwithstanding
section 202(8) of this act, all fire fighters and law enforcement officers
employed as such on or after March 1, 1970, on a full-time fully compensated
basis in this state shall be members of the retirement system established by
this chapter with respect to all periods of service as such, to the exclusion
of any pension system existing under any prior act.

(2) Any employee
serving as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter on March 1, 1970, who is
then making retirement contributions under any prior act shall have his or her
membership transferred to the system established by this chapter as of such
date. Upon retirement for service or for disability, or death, of any such
employee, his or her retirement benefits earned under this chapter shall be
computed and paid. In addition, his or her benefits under the prior retirement
act to which he or she was making contributions at the time of this transfer
shall be computed as if he or she had not transferred. For the purpose of such
computations, the employee's creditability of service and eligibility for
service or disability retirement and survivor and all other benefits shall
continue to be as provided in such prior retirement act, as if transfer of
membership had not occurred. The excess, if any, of the benefits so computed,
giving full value to survivor benefits, over the benefits payable under this
chapter shall be paid whether or not the employee has made application under
the prior act. If the employee's prior retirement system was the Washington
public employees' retirement system, payment of such excess shall be made by
that system; if the employee's prior retirement system was the statewide city
employees' retirement system, payment of such excess shall be made by the
employer which was the member's employer when his or her transfer of membership
occurred: PROVIDED, That any death in line of duty lump sum benefit payment
shall continue to be the obligation of that system as provided in RCW 41.44.210;
in the case of all other prior retirement systems, payment of such excess shall
be made by the employer which was the member's employer when his or her
transfer of membership occurred.

(3) All funds held by
any firemen's or policemen's relief and pension fund shall remain in that fund
for the purpose of paying the obligations of the fund. The municipality shall
continue to levy the dollar rate as provided in RCW 41.16.060, and this dollar
rate shall be used for the purpose of paying the benefits provided in chapters
41.16 and 41.18 RCW. The obligations of chapter 41.20 RCW shall continue to be
paid from whatever financial sources the city has been using for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
204. "MINIMUM MEDICAL AND
HEALTH STANDARDS" DEFINED. The term "minimum medical and health
standards" means minimum medical and health standards adopted by the
department under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
205. MINIMUM MEDICAL AND
HEALTH STANDARDS. Notwithstanding any other provision of law after February
19, 1974, no law enforcement officer or fire fighter, may become eligible for
coverage in the pension system established by this chapter until the individual
has met and has been certified as having met minimum medical and health
standards: PROVIDED, That an elected sheriff or an appointed chief of police
or fire chief, shall not be required to meet the age standard: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in cities and towns having not more than two law enforcement
officers and/or not more than two fire fighters and if one or more of such
persons do not meet the minimum medical and health standards as required by the
provisions of this chapter, then such person or persons may join any other
pension system that the city has available for its other employees: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for one year after February 19, 1974, any such medical
or health standard now existing or hereinafter adopted, insofar as it
establishes a maximum age beyond which an applicant is to be deemed ineligible
for coverage, shall be waived as to any applicant for employment or
reemployment who is otherwise eligible except for his or her age, who has been
a member of any one or more of the retirement systems created by chapter 41.20
RCW and who has restored all contributions which he or she has previously
withdrawn from any such system or systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
206. MINIMUM MEDICAL AND
HEALTH STANDARDS‑‑BOARD TO ADOPT‑‑PUBLICATION AND
DISTRIBUTION‑‑EMPLOYER CERTIFICATION PROCEDURES. The department
shall adopt minimum medical and health standards for membership coverage into
the retirement system. In adopting such standards the department shall
consider existing standards recommended by the international association of
chiefs of police and the international association of fire fighters, and shall
adopt equal or higher standards, together with appropriate standards and
procedures to ensure uniform compliance with this chapter. The standards when
adopted shall be published and distributed to each employer, and each employer
shall adopt certification procedures and such other procedures as are required
to ensure that no law enforcement officer or fire fighter receives membership
coverage unless and until he or she has actually met minimum medical and health
standards: PROVIDED, That an elected sheriff or an appointed chief of police,
fire chief, or director of public safety shall not be required to meet the age
standard. The department may amend the minimum medical and health standards as
experience indicates, even if the standards as so amended are lower or less
rigid than those recommended by the international associations mentioned
above. The cost of the medical examination contemplated by this section is to
be paid by the employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
207. MINIMUM MEDICAL AND
HEALTH STANDARDS‑‑EXEMPTIONS‑‑EMPLOYER MAY ADOPT HIGHER
STANDARDS. Nothing in sections 204 through 206 of this act shall apply to any
fire fighters or law enforcement officers who are employed as such on or before
August 1, 1971, as long as they continue in such employment; nor to promotional
appointments after becoming a member in the police or fire department of any
employer nor to the reemployment of a law enforcement officer or fire fighter
by the same or a different employer within six months after the termination of
his or her employment, nor to the reinstatement of a law enforcement officer or
fire fighter who has been on military or disability leave, disability
retirement status, or leave of absence status. Nothing in this chapter shall
be deemed to prevent any employer from adopting higher medical and health
standards than those which are adopted by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
208. SPECIAL DEATH BENEFIT‑‑DEATH
IN THE COURSE OF EMPLOYMENT. (1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death
benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust
or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's death
benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such
surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.

(2) The benefit under
this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result of injuries
sustained in the course of employment. The determination of eligibility for
the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
209. EXEMPTION FROM JUDICIAL
PROCESS, TAXES‑‑EXCEPTIONS‑‑DEDUCTION FOR INSURANCE
UPON REQUEST. (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
right of a person to a retirement allowance, disability allowance, or death
benefit, to the return of accumulated contributions, the retirement,
disability, or death allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right
accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the
moneys in the fund created under this chapter, are hereby exempt from any
state, county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject to
execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency
laws, or any other process of law whatsoever, and shall be unassignable.

(2) On the written
request of any person eligible to receive benefits under this section, the
department may deduct from such payments the premiums for life, health, or
other insurance. The request on behalf of any child or children shall be made
by the legal guardian of such child or children. The department may provide
for such persons one or more plans of group insurance, through contracts with
regularly constituted insurance carriers or health care service contractors.

(3) Subsection (1) of
this section shall not prohibit the department from complying with (a) a wage
assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an
order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a
notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory
benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing
the department to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order
as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and
41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by
federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
210. NO BOND REQUIRED ON
APPEAL TO COURT. No bond of any kind shall be required of a claimant appealing
to the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court from a
decision of the director affecting such claimant's right to retirement or disability
benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
211. BENEFIT CALCULATION‑‑LIMITATION.
(1) The annual compensation taken into account in calculating retiree benefits
under this system shall not exceed the limits imposed by section 401(a)(17) of
the federal internal revenue code for qualified trusts.

(2) The department
shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
212. ESTABLISHING, RESTORING
SERVICE CREDIT. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, persons who
fail to:

(1) Establish allowable
membership service not previously credited;

(2) Restore all or a
part of that previously credited membership service represented by withdrawn
contributions; or

(3) Restore service
credit represented by a lump sum payment in lieu of benefits, before the
deadline established by statute, may do so under the conditions set forth in
RCW 41.50.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
213. DISABILITY RETIREMENT‑‑CRIMINAL
CONDUCT. A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under
sections 220 through 222 of this act if the disability is the result of
criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
214. FALSIFICATION‑‑PENALTY.
Any employer, member, or beneficiary who knowingly makes false statements or
falsifies or permits to be falsified any record or records of the retirement
system in an attempt to defraud the retirement system, is guilty of a felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
215. FUNDING TOTAL LIABILITY
OF SYSTEM. No employer or member contribution is required. The total
liability of the retirement system is funded as provided in sections 4 and 5 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
216. RETIREMENT FOR SERVICE.
Retirement of a member for service shall be made by the department as follows:

(1) Any member having
five or more service credit years of service and having attained the age of
fifty years shall be eligible for a service retirement allowance and shall be
retired upon the member's written request effective the first day following the
date upon which the member is separated from service.

(2) Any member having
five or more service credit years of service, who terminates his or her
employment with any employer, may leave his or her contributions in the fund.
Any employee who so elects, upon attaining age fifty, shall be eligible to
apply for and receive a service retirement allowance based on his or her years
of service, commencing on the first day following his or her attainment of age
fifty.

(3) Any member
selecting optional vesting under subsection (2) of this section with less than
twenty service credit years of service shall not be covered by the provisions
of section 225 of this act, and the member's survivors shall not be entitled to
the benefits of section 226 of this act unless his or her death occurs after he
or she has attained the age of fifty years. Those members selecting this optional
vesting with twenty or more years service shall not be covered by the
provisions of section 225 of this act until the attainment of the age of fifty
years. A member selecting this optional vesting, with less than twenty service
credit years of service credit, who dies prior to attaining the age of fifty
years, shall have paid from the restated law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' defined benefit retirement fund, to such member's surviving spouse,
if any, otherwise to such beneficiary as the member shall have designated in
writing, or if no such designation has been made, to the personal
representative of his or her estate, a lump sum which is equal to the amount of
such member's accumulated contributions plus accrued interest. If the vested
member has twenty or more service credit years of service credit the surviving
spouse or children shall then become eligible for the benefits of section 226
of this act regardless of the member's age at the time of his or her death, to
the exclusion of the lump sum amount provided by this subsection.

(4) Any member who has
attained the age of sixty years shall be retired on the first day of the
calendar month next succeeding that in which said member shall have attained
the age of sixty and may not thereafter be employed as a law enforcement
officer or fire fighter: PROVIDED, That for any member who is elected or
appointed to the office of sheriff, chief of police, or fire chief, his or her
election or appointment shall be considered as a waiver of the age sixty
provision for retirement and nonemployment for whatever number of years remain
in his or her present term of office and any succeeding periods for which he or
she may be so elected or appointed. The provisions of this subsection shall
not apply to any member who is employed as a law enforcement officer or fire
fighter on March 1, 1970.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
217. ALLOWANCE ON RETIREMENT
FOR SERVICE. A member upon retirement for service shall receive a monthly
retirement allowance computed according to his or her completed creditable
service credit years of service as follows: Five years but under ten years,
one-twelfth of one percent of his or her final average salary for each month of
service; ten years but under twenty years, one-twelfth of one and one-half
percent of his or her final average salary for each month of service; and
twenty years and over one-twelfth of two percent of his or her final average
salary for each month of service: PROVIDED, That the recipient of a retirement
allowance who shall return to service as a law enforcement officer or fire
fighter shall be considered to have terminated his or her retirement status and
he or she shall immediately become a member of the retirement system with the
status of membership he or she had as of the date of retirement. Retirement
benefits shall be suspended during the period of his or her return to service
and he or she shall make contributions and receive service credit. Such a
member shall have the right to again retire at any time and his or her
retirement allowance shall be recomputed, and paid, based upon additional
service rendered and any change in final average salary: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That no retirement allowance paid pursuant to this section shall exceed sixty
percent of final average salary, except as such allowance may be increased by
virtue of section 238 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
218. CITY AND COUNTY
DISABILITY BOARDS AUTHORIZED. (1) All claims for disability shall be acted
upon and either approved or disapproved by either type of disability board
created under this section.

(a) Each city having a
population of twenty thousand or more shall establish a disability board having
jurisdiction over all members employed by the cities and composed of the
following five members: Two members of the city legislative body to be
appointed by the mayor, one active or retired fire fighter to be elected by the
fire fighters employed by or retired from the city, one active or retired law
enforcement officer to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed by
or retired from the city, and one member from the public at large who resides
within the city to be appointed by the other four members designated in this
subsection. Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board
have both the right to elect and the right to be elected under this section.
Each of the elected members shall serve a two-year term. The members appointed
pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two-year terms: PROVIDED, That
cities of the first class only, shall retain existing firemen's pension boards
established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and existing boards of trustees of the
relief and pension fund of the police department as established pursuant to RCW
41.20.010 which such boards shall have authority to act upon and approve or
disapprove claims for disability by fire fighters or law enforcement officers
as provided under this chapter. No disability boards shall be established under
the authority of this subsection (1)(a) after December 31, 2001.

(b) Each county shall
establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members residing in
the county and not employed by a city in which a disability board is
established. The county disability board so created shall be composed of five
members to be chosen as follows: One member of the legislative body of the
county to be appointed by the county legislative body, one member of a city or
town legislative body located within the county which does not contain a city
disability board established pursuant to (a) of this subsection to be chosen by
a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the county which does
not contain a city disability board, one fire fighter or retired fire fighter
to be elected by the fire fighters employed or retired in the county who are
not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is
established, one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer to
be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in or retired from the
county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability
board is established, and one member from the public at large who resides
within the county but does not reside within a city in which a city disability
board is established, to be appointed by the other four members designated in
this subsection. However, in counties with a population less than sixty
thousand, the member of the disability board appointed by a majority of the
mayors of the cities and towns within the county that do not contain a city
disability board must be a resident of one of the cities and towns but need not
be a member of a city or town legislative body. Retired members who are
subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both the right to elect and the
right to be elected under this section. All members appointed or elected
pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two-year terms.

(2) The members of both
the county and city disability boards shall not receive compensation for their
service upon the boards but the members shall be reimbursed by their respective
county or city for all expenses incidental to such service as to the amount
authorized by law.

(3) The disability
boards authorized for establishment by this section shall perform all
functions, exercise all powers, and make all such determinations as specified
in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
219. DIRECTOR TO ADOPT RULES
GOVERNING DISABILITY BOARDS. (1) The director shall adopt rules, in accordance
with chapter 34.05 RCW, under which each disability board shall execute its
disability retirement duties under this chapter. The rules shall include, but
not be limited to, the following:

(a) Standards governing
the type and manner of presentation of medical, employability, and other
evidence before disability boards; and

(b) Standards governing
the necessity and frequency of medical and employability reexaminations of
persons receiving disability benefits.

(2) If the director
determines that an order or determination of a disability board was not
processed in accordance with the rules established under this section, the
director may remand the order or determination for further proceedings
consistent with the rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
220. RETIREMENT FOR DISABILITY
INCURRED IN THE LINE OF DUTY. Any member, regardless of age or years of
service, may be retired by the disability board, subject to approval by the
director, for any disability incurred in the line of duty which has been
continuous since his or her discontinuance of service and which renders the
member unable to continue service. No disability retirement allowance shall be
paid until the expiration of a period of six months after the discontinuance of
service during which period the member, if found to be physically or mentally
unfit for duty by the disability board following receipt of his or her
application for disability retirement, shall be granted a disability leave by
the disability board and shall receive an allowance equal to the full monthly
salary and shall continue to receive all other benefits provided to active
employees from the employer for such period. However, if, at any time during
the initial six-month period, the disability board finds the beneficiary is no
longer disabled, the disability leave allowance shall be canceled and the
member shall be restored to duty in the same rank or position, if any, held by
the beneficiary at the time the member became disabled. Applications for
disability retirement shall be processed in accordance with the following
procedures:

(1) Any member who
believes he or she is or is believed to be physically or mentally disabled
shall be examined by such medical authority as the disability board shall
employ, upon application of the member, or a person acting in his or her
behalf, stating that the member is disabled, either physically or mentally:
PROVIDED, That no such application shall be considered unless the member or someone
in his or her behalf, in case of the incapacity of a member, shall have filed
the application within a period of one year from and after the discontinuance
of service of the member.

(2) If the examination
shows, to the satisfaction of the disability board, that the member is
physically or mentally disabled from the further performance of duty, that such
disability was incurred in the line of duty, and that such disability has been
continuous from the discontinuance of service, the disability board shall enter
its written decision and order, accompanied by appropriate findings of fact and
by conclusions evidencing compliance with this chapter, granting the member a
disability retirement allowance; otherwise, if the member is not found by the
disability board to be so disabled, the application shall be denied pursuant to
a similar written decision and order, subject to appeal to the director in
accordance with section 235 of this act: PROVIDED, That in any order granting
a duty disability retirement allowance, the disability board shall make a
finding that the disability was incurred in line of duty.

(3) Every order of a
disability board granting a duty disability retirement allowance shall
immediately be reviewed by the director except the finding that the disability
was incurred in the line of duty. The director may affirm the decision of the
disability board or remand the case for further proceedings, or the director
may reverse the decision of the disability board if the director finds the
disability board's findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

(a) In violation of
constitutional provisions;

(b) In excess of the
statutory authority or jurisdiction of the disability board;

(c) Made upon unlawful
procedure;

(d) Affected by other
error of law;

(e) Clearly erroneous
in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in
this chapter; or

(f) Arbitrary or
capricious.

(4) Every member who
can establish, to the disability board, that he or she is physically or mentally
disabled from the further performance of duty, that such disability was
incurred in the line of duty, and that such disability will be in existence for
a period of at least six months may waive the six-month period of disability
leave and be immediately granted a duty disability retirement allowance,
subject to the approval of the director as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
221. RETIREMENT FOR DISABILITY
NOT INCURRED IN THE LINE OF DUTY. Any member, regardless of age or years of
service, may be retired by the disability board, subject to approval by the
director as provided in this section, for any disability not incurred in the
line of duty which has been continuous since discontinuance of service and
which renders the member unable to continue service. No disability retirement
allowance may be paid until the expiration of a period of six months after the
discontinuance of service during which period the member, if found to be
physically or mentally unfit for duty by the disability board following receipt
of the member's application for disability retirement, shall be granted a
disability leave by the disability board and shall receive an allowance equal
to the member's full monthly salary and shall continue to receive all other
benefits provided to active employees from the member's employer for the
period. However, if, at any time during the initial six-month period, the disability
board finds the beneficiary is no longer disabled, the disability leave
allowance shall be canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the
same rank or position, if any, held by the member at the time the member became
disabled. Applications for disability retirement shall be processed in
accordance with the following procedures:

(1) Any member who
believes he or she is, or is believed to be, physically or mentally disabled
shall be examined by such medical authority as the disability board shall
employ, upon application of the member, or a person acting in the member's
behalf, stating that the member is disabled, either physically or mentally:
PROVIDED, That no such application shall be considered unless the member or
someone acting in the member's behalf, in case of the incapacity of a member,
has filed the application within a period of one year from and after the
discontinuance of service of the member.

(2) If the examination
shows, to the satisfaction of the disability board, that the member is
physically or mentally disabled from the further performance of duty, that such
disability was not incurred in the line of duty, and that such disability had
been continuous from the discontinuance of service, the disability board shall
enter its written decision and order, accompanied by appropriate findings of
fact and by conclusions evidencing compliance with this chapter, granting the
member a disability retirement allowance. Otherwise, if the member is not
found by the disability board to be so disabled, the application shall be
denied pursuant to a similar written decision and order, subject to appeal to
the director in accordance with section 235 of this act: PROVIDED, That in any
order granting a nonduty disability retirement allowance, the disability board
shall make a finding that the disability was not incurred in the line of duty.

(3) Every order of a
disability board granting a nonduty disability retirement allowance shall
immediately be reviewed by the director except the finding that the disability
was not incurred in the line of duty. The director may affirm the decision of
the disability board or remand the case for further proceedings, or the
director may reverse the decision of the disability board if the director finds
the disability board's findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

(a) In violation of
constitutional provisions;

(b) In excess of the
statutory authority or jurisdiction of the disability board;

(c) Made upon unlawful
procedure;

(d) Affected by other
error of law;

(e) Clearly erroneous
in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in
this chapter; or

(f) Arbitrary or
capricious.

(4) Every member who
can establish to the disability board that the member is physically or mentally
disabled from the further performance of duty, that such disability was not
incurred in the line of duty, and that such disability will be in existence for
a period of at least six months, may waive the six-month period of disability
leave and be immediately granted a nonduty disability retirement allowance,
subject to the approval of the director as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
222. ALLOWANCE ON RETIREMENT
FOR DISABILITY. (1) Upon retirement for disability a member shall be entitled
to receive a monthly retirement allowance computed as follows: (a) A basic
amount of fifty percent of final average salary at time of disability
retirement, and (b) an additional five percent of final average salary for each
child as defined in section 202(7) of this act, (c) the combined total of (a)
and (b) of this subsection shall not exceed a maximum of sixty percent of final
average salary.

(2) A disabled member
shall begin receiving the disability retirement allowance as of the expiration
of his or her six-month period of disability leave or, if his or her
application was filed after the sixth month of discontinuance of service but
prior to the one-year time limit, the member's disability retirement allowance
shall be retroactive to the end of the sixth month.

(3) Benefits under this
section will be payable until the member recovers from the disability or dies.
If at the time that the disability ceases the member is over the age of fifty,
he or she shall then receive either disability retirement allowance or
retirement for service allowance, whichever is greater.

(4) Benefits under this
section for a disability that is incurred while in other employment will be
reduced by any amount the member receives or is entitled to receive from
workers' compensation, social security, group insurance, other pension plan, or
any other similar source provided by another employer on account of the same
disability.

(5) A member retired
for disability shall be subject to periodic examinations by a physician
approved by the disability board prior to attainment of age fifty, pursuant to
rules adopted by the director under section 219 of this act. Examinations of
members who retired for disability prior to July 26, 1981, shall not exceed two
medical examinations per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
223. CESSATION OF DISABILITY‑-DETERMINATION.
(1) A disabled member who believes that his or her disability has ceased in
accordance with section 222(3) of this act may make application to the
disability board which originally found the member to be disabled, for a
determination that the disability has ceased.

(2) Every order of a
disability board determining that a member's disability has ceased pursuant to
section 222(3) of this act shall immediately be reviewed by the director. The
director may affirm the decision of the disability board or remand the case for
further proceedings if the director finds the disability board's findings,
inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

(a) In violation of
constitutional provisions;

(b) In excess of the
statutory authority or jurisdiction of the disability board;

(c) Made upon unlawful
procedure;

(d) Affected by other
error of law;

(e) Clearly erroneous
in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in
this chapter; or

(f) Arbitrary or
capricious.

(3) Determinations of
whether a disability has ceased under section 222(3) of this act and this
section shall be made in accordance with the same procedures and standards
governing other cancellations of disability retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
224. REEXAMINATIONS OF
DISABILITY BENEFICIARIES‑-REENTRY‑-APPEAL. (1) Upon the basis of reexaminations
of members on disability retirement as provided in section 222 of this act, the
disability board shall determine whether such disability beneficiary is still
unable to perform his or her duties either physically or mentally for service
in the department where he or she was employed.

(2) If the disability
board determines that the beneficiary is not so incapacitated the retirement
allowance shall be canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the
same civil service rank, if any, held by the beneficiary at the time of his or
her retirement or if unable to perform the duties of that rank, then, at his or
her request, in such other like or lesser rank as may be or become open and
available, the duties of which he or she is then able to perform. In no event,
shall a beneficiary previously drawing a disability allowance be returned or be
restored to duty at a salary or rate of pay less than the current salary
attached to the rank or position held by the beneficiary at the date of retirement
for disability. If the disability board determines that the beneficiary is
able to return to service he or she shall be entitled to notice and a hearing,
both the notice and the hearing shall comply with the requirements of chapter
34.05 RCW.

(3) Should a disability
beneficiary reenter service and be eligible for membership in the retirement
system, the retirement allowance shall be canceled and he or she shall
immediately become a member of the retirement system.

(4) Should any
disability beneficiary under age fifty refuse to submit to examination, the
retirement allowance shall be discontinued until withdrawal of such refusal,
and should such refusal continue for one year or more, the retirement allowance
shall be canceled.

(5) Should the
disability retirement allowance of any disability beneficiary be canceled for
any cause other than reentrance into service or retirement for service, he or
she shall be paid the excess, if any, of the accumulated contributions at the
time of retirement over all payments made on his or her behalf under this
chapter.

(6) Any person feeling
aggrieved by an order of a disability board determining that a beneficiary's
disability has not ceased, pursuant to section 222(3) of this act has the right
to appeal the order or determination to the director. The director shall have
no jurisdiction to entertain the appeal unless a notice of appeal is filed with
the director within thirty days following the rendition of the order by the
disability board. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served upon the
director and the applicable disability board and, within ninety days thereof,
the disability board shall certify its decision and order which shall include
findings of fact and conclusions of law, together with a transcript of all
proceedings in connection therewith, to the director for review. Upon review
of the record, the director may affirm the order of the disability board or may
remand the case for further proceedings if the director finds that the
disability board's findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

(a) In violation of
constitutional provisions;

(b) In excess of the
statutory authority or jurisdiction of the disability board;

(c) Made upon unlawful
procedure;

(d) Affected by other
error of law;

(e) Clearly erroneous
in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in
this chapter; or

(f) Arbitrary or
capricious.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
225. SICKNESS OR DISABILITY
BENEFITS‑-MEDICAL SERVICES. (1) Whenever any active member, or any
member hereafter retired, on account of service, sickness, or disability, not
caused or brought on by dissipation or abuse, of which the disability board
shall be judge, is confined in any hospital or in home, and whether or not so
confined, requires medical services, the employer shall pay for the active or
retired member the necessary medical services not payable from some other
source as provided for in subsection (2) of this section. In the case of
active or retired fire fighters the employer may make the payments provided for
in this section from the firemen's pension fund established pursuant to RCW
41.16.050 where the fund had been established prior to March 1, 1970. If this
pension fund is depleted, the employer shall have the obligation to pay all
benefits payable under chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW.

(a) The disability
board in all cases may have the active or retired member suffering from such
sickness or disability examined at any time by a licensed physician or physicians,
to be appointed by the disability board, for the purpose of ascertaining the
nature and extent of the sickness or disability, the physician or physicians to
report to the disability board the result of the examination within three days
thereafter. Any active or retired member who refuses to submit to such
examination or examinations shall forfeit all rights to benefits under this
section for the period of the refusal.

(b) The disability
board shall designate the medical services available to any sick or disabled
member.

(2) The medical
services payable under this section will be reduced by any amount received or
eligible to be received by the member under workers' compensation, social
security including the changes incorporated under Public Law 89‑97,
insurance provided by another employer, other pension plan, or any other
similar source. Failure to apply for coverage if otherwise eligible under the
provisions of Public Law 89‑97 shall not be deemed a refusal of payment
of benefits thereby enabling collection of charges under the provisions of this
chapter.

(3) Upon making the
payments provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the employer shall be
subrogated to all rights of the member against any third party who may be held
liable for the member's injuries or for payment of the cost of medical services
in connection with a member's sickness or disability to the extent necessary to
recover the amount of payments made by the employer.

(4) Any employer under
this chapter, either singly, or jointly with any other such employer or
employers through an association thereof as provided for in chapter 48.21 RCW,
may provide for all or part of one or more plans of group hospitalization and
medical aid insurance to cover any of its employees who are members of the
restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, and/or
retired former employees who were, before retirement, members of the retirement
system, through contracts with regularly constituted insurance carriers, with health
maintenance organizations as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW, or with health care
service contractors as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW. Benefits payable under
the plan or plans shall be deemed to be amounts received or eligible to be
received by the active or retired member under subsection (2) of this section.

(5) Any employer,
jointly with any other employer or employers of the state, may participate in
the medical benefits risk pool established under chapter 41.--- RCW (sections
301 through 310 of this act).

(6) Any employer under
this chapter may, at its discretion, elect to reimburse a retired former
employee under this chapter for premiums the retired former employee has paid
for medical insurance that supplements medicare, including premiums the retired
former employee has paid for medicare part B coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
226. DEATH BENEFITS‑‑DUTY
CONNECTED. (1) In the event of the duty connected death of any member who is
in active service, or who has vested under section 216 of this act with twenty
or more service credit years of service, or who is on duty connected disability
leave or retired for duty connected disability, the surviving spouse shall
become entitled to receive a monthly allowance equal to fifty percent of the
final average salary at the date of death if active, or the amount of
retirement allowance the vested member would have received at age fifty, or the
amount of the retirement allowance such retired member was receiving at the
time of death if retired for duty connected disability. The amount of this
allowance will be increased five percent of final average salary for each child
as defined in section 202(7) of this act, subject to a maximum combined
allowance of sixty percent of final average salary: PROVIDED, That if the
child or children is or are in the care of a legal guardian, payment of the
increase attributable to each child will be made to the child's legal guardian
or, in the absence of a legal guardian and if the member has created a trust
for the benefit of the child or children, payment of the increase attributable
to each child will be made to the trust.

(2) If at the time of
the duty connected death of a vested member with twenty or more service credit
years of service as provided in subsection (1) of this section or a member
retired for duty connected disability, the surviving spouse has not been
lawfully married to such member for one year prior to retirement or separation
from service if a vested member, the surviving spouse shall not be eligible to
receive the benefits under this section: PROVIDED, That if a member dies as a
result of a disability incurred in the line of duty, then if he or she was
married at the time he or she was disabled, the surviving spouse shall be
eligible to receive the benefits under this section.

(3) If there be no
surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits at the time of such member's duty
connected death, then the child or children of such member shall receive a
monthly allowance equal to thirty percent of final average salary for one child
and an additional ten percent for each additional child subject to a maximum
combined payment, under this subsection, of sixty percent of final average
salary. When there cease to be any eligible children as defined in section
202(7) of this act, there shall be paid to the legal heirs of the member the
excess, if any, of accumulated contributions of the member at the time of death
over all payments made to survivors on his or her behalf under this chapter:
PROVIDED, That payments under this subsection to children shall be prorated
equally among the children, if more than one. If the member has created a
trust for the benefit of the child or children, the payment shall be made to
the trust.

(4) In the event that
there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits under this section,
and that there be no child or children eligible to receive benefits under this
section, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the
member.

(5) If a surviving
spouse receiving benefits under the provisions of this section thereafter dies
and there are children as defined in section 202(7) of this act, payment to the
spouse shall cease and the child or children shall receive the benefits as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(6) The payment
provided by this section shall become due the day following the date of death
and payments shall be retroactive to that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
227. DEATH BENEFITS‑-NONDUTY
CONNECTED. (1) In the event of the nonduty connected death of any member who
is in active service, or who has vested under section 216 of this act with
twenty or more service credit years of service, or who is on disability leave
or retired, whether for nonduty connected disability or service, the surviving
spouse shall become entitled to receive a monthly allowance equal to fifty percent
of the final average salary at the date of death if active, or the amount of
retirement allowance the vested member would have received at age fifty, or the
amount of the retirement allowance such retired member was receiving at the
time of death if retired for service or nonduty connected disability. The
amount of this allowance will be increased five percent of final average salary
for each child as defined in section 202(7) of this act, subject to a maximum
combined allowance of sixty percent of final average salary: PROVIDED, That if
the child or children is or are in the care of a legal guardian, payment of the
increase attributable to each child will be made to the child's legal guardian
or, in the absence of a legal guardian and if the member has created a trust
for the benefit of the child or children, payment of the increase attributable
to each child will be made to the trust.

(2) If at the time of
the death of a vested member with twenty or more service credit years of
service as provided in subsection (1) of this section or a member retired for
service or disability, the surviving spouse has not been lawfully married to
such member for one year prior to retirement or separation from service if a
vested member, the surviving spouse shall not be eligible to receive the
benefits under this section.

(3) If there be no
surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits at the time of such member's
death, then the child or children of such member shall receive a monthly
allowance equal to thirty percent of final average salary for one child and an
additional ten percent for each additional child subject to a maximum combined
payment, under this subsection, of sixty percent of final average salary. When
there cease to be any eligible children as defined in section 202(7) of this
act, there shall be paid to the legal heirs of the member the excess, if any,
of accumulated contributions of the member at the time of death over all
payments made to survivors on his or her behalf under this chapter: PROVIDED,
That payments under this subsection to children shall be prorated equally among
the children, if more than one. If the member has created a trust for the
benefit of the child or children, the payment shall be made to the trust.

(4) In the event that
there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits under this section,
and that there be no child or children eligible to receive benefits under this
section, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the
member.

(5) If a surviving
spouse receiving benefits under the provisions of this section thereafter dies
and there are children as defined in section 202(7) of this act, payment to the
spouse shall cease and the child or children shall receive the benefits as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(6) The payment
provided by this section shall become due the day following the date of death
and payments shall be retroactive to that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
228. EX SPOUSE QUALIFYING AS
SURVIVING SPOUSE‑-WHEN. (1) An ex spouse of a retiree shall qualify as
surviving spouse under section 226 of this act if the ex spouse:

(a) Has been provided
benefits under any currently effective court decree of dissolution or legal
separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement
agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation
entered after the member's retirement and prior to December 31, 1979; and

(b) Was married to the
retiree for at least thirty years, including at least twenty years prior to the
member's retirement or separation from service if a vested member.

(2) If two or more
persons are eligible for a surviving spouse benefit under this subsection,
benefits shall be divided between the surviving spouses based on the percentage
of total service credit the member accrued during each marriage.

(3) This section shall
apply retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
229. REFUND OF CONTRIBUTIONS
ON DISCONTINUANCE OF SERVICE‑-REENTRY. (1) Should service of a member be
discontinued except by death, disability, or retirement, the member shall, upon
application therefor, be paid the accumulated contributions within sixty days
after the day of application and the rights to all benefits as a member shall
cease: PROVIDED, That any member with at least five years' service may elect
the provisions of section 216(2) of this act.

(2) Any member whose
contributions have been paid in accordance with subsection (1) of this section
and who reenters the service of an employer shall upon the restoration of
withdrawn contributions, which restoration must be completed within a total
period of five years of service following resumption of employment, then
receive credit toward retirement for the period of previous service which these
contributions are to cover.

(3) If the member fails
to meet the time limitations of subsection (2) of this section, the member may
make the payment required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement. The
member shall then receive credit toward retirement for the period of previous
service that the withdrawn contributions cover.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
230. CREDIT FOR MILITARY
SERVICE. Each person affected by this chapter who at the time of entering the
armed services was a member of this system or plan 1 under chapter 41.26 RCW,
and has honorably served in the armed services of the United States, shall have
added to the period of service as computed under this chapter, the period of
service in the armed forces: PROVIDED, That such credited service shall not
exceed five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
231. CREDIT FOR SERVICE UNDER
PRIOR PENSION SYSTEM‑-RESTORATION OF WITHDRAWN CONTRIBUTIONS. If a
member of this retirement system served as a law enforcement officer or fire
fighter under a prior pension system and that service is not creditable to this
retirement system because the member withdrew his or her contributions plus
accrued interest from the prior pension system, the member's prior service as a
law enforcement officer shall be credited to this retirement system if the
member pays to the retirement system the amount under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to
retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
232. CREDIT FOR SERVICE UNDER
PRIOR PENSION SYSTEM‑-SERVICE NOT COVERED UNDER PRIOR SYSTEM. If a
member's prior service as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter under a
prior pension system is not creditable because, although employed in a position
covered by a prior pension act, the member had not yet become a member of the
pension system governed by the act, the member's prior service as a law
enforcement officer or fire fighter shall be creditable if the member pays to
the plan the amount set forth under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
233. TRANSFER OF SERVICE
CREDIT FROM OTHER RETIREMENT SYSTEM‑-IRREVOCABLE ELECTION ALLOWED. Any
member of the teachers' retirement system plans 1, 2, or 3, the public
employees' retirement system plans 1 or 2, or the Washington state patrol
retirement system who has previously established service credit in the restated
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system may make an
irrevocable election to have such service transferred to their current
retirement system and plan subject to the following conditions:

(1) If the individual
is employed by an employer in an eligible position, as of July 1, 1997, the
election to transfer service must be filed in writing with the department no
later than July 1, 1998. If the individual is not employed by an employer in
an eligible position, as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must
be filed in writing with the department no later than one year from the date
they are employed by an employer in an eligible position.

(2) An individual
transferring service under this section forfeits the rights to all benefits as
a member of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system and will be permanently excluded from membership.

(3) Any individual
choosing to transfer service under this section will have transferred to their
current retirement system and plan: (a) All the individual's accumulated
contributions; (b) an amount sufficient to ensure that the employer
contribution rate in the individual's current system and plan will not increase
due to the transfer; and (c) all applicable months of service, as defined in
section 202(14) of this act.

(4) If an individual
has withdrawn contributions from the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1 or the plan established by this chapter, the
individual may restore the contributions, together with interest as determined
by the director, and recover the service represented by the contributions for
the sole purpose of transferring service under this section. The contributions
must be restored before the transfer can occur and the restoration must be
completed within the time limitations specified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(5) Any service
transferred under this section does not apply to the eligibility requirements
for military service credit as defined in RCW 41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260(3).

(6) If an individual
does not meet the time limitations of subsection (1) of this section, the
individual may elect to restore any withdrawn contributions and transfer
service under this section by paying the amount required under subsection
(3)(b) of this section less any employee contributions transferred.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
234. SERVICE CREDIT FOR PAID
LEAVE OF ABSENCE--APPLICATION TO ELECTED OFFICIALS OF LABOR ORGANIZATIONS. (1)
A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer
shall continue to receive service credit as provided under this chapter.

(2) A member who
receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence
to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is
reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member
during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of
absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member
retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The
basic salary reported for a member who establishes service credit under this
subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job
class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
235. APPEAL TO DIRECTOR. Any
person feeling aggrieved by any order or determination of a disability board
denying disability leave or disability retirement, or canceling a previously
granted disability retirement allowance, shall have the right to appeal the
order or determination to the director. The director shall have no jurisdiction
to entertain the appeal unless a notice of appeal is filed with the director
within thirty days following the rendition of the order by the applicable
disability board. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served upon the
director and the applicable disability board and, within ninety days thereof,
the disability board shall certify its decision and order which shall include
findings of fact and conclusions of law, together with a transcript of all
proceedings in connection therewith, to the director for review. Upon review
of the record, the director may affirm the order of the disability board or may
remand the case for such further proceedings as he or she may direct, in
accordance with such rules of procedure as the director shall adopt.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
236. NOTICE FOR HEARING
REQUIRED PRIOR TO PETITIONING FOR JUDICIAL REVIEW. Any person aggrieved by any
final decision of the director must, before petitioning for judicial review,
file with the director by mail or personally within sixty days from the day the
decision was communicated to the person, a notice for a hearing. The notice of
hearing shall set forth in full detail the grounds upon which such person
considers such decision unjust or unlawful and shall include every issue to be
considered, and it must contain a detailed statement of facts upon which such
person relies in support thereof. Such persons shall be deemed to have waived
all objections or irregularities concerning the matter on which such appeal is
taken other than those specifically set forth in the notice of hearing or
appearing in the records of the retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
237. HEARING‑-CONDUCT.
A hearing shall be held by the director, or the director's duly authorized
representative, in the county of the residence of the claimant at a time and
place designated by the director. Such hearing shall be de novo and shall
conform to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. The disability board and the department
shall be entitled to appear in all such proceedings and introduce testimony in
support of the decision. Judicial review of any final decision by the director
shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
238. INCREASES OR DECREASES IN
RETIREMENT ALLOWANCES TO BE DETERMINED BY DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
CONSUMER PRICE INDEX. For purposes of this section:

(1) "Index"
means, for any calendar year, that year's average consumer price index for the
Seattle, Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items
(1957‑1959=100), compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United
States department of labor;

(2) "Retirement
allowance" means the retirement allowance provided for in sections 217 and
222 of this act, and the monthly allowance provided for in section 226 of this
act.

On April 1st of each
year, every retirement allowance which has been in effect for more than one
year shall be adjusted to that dollar amount which exceeds its original dollar
amount by the percentage difference which the department finds to exist between
the index for the previous calendar year and the index for the calendar year
prior to the effective retirement date of the person to whom, or on behalf of
whom, such retirement allowance is being paid.

For the purposes of
this section, "basic allowance" means that portion of a total
retirement allowance, and any cost-of-living adjustment thereon, attributable
to a member (individually) and shall not include the increased amounts
attributable to the existence of a child or children. In those cases where a
child ceases to be qualified as an eligible child, so as to lessen the total
allowance, the allowance shall, at that time, be reduced to the basic allowance
plus the amount attributable for the appropriate number of eligible children.
In those cases where a child qualifies as an eligible child subsequent to the
retirement of a member so as to increase the total allowance payable, such
increased allowance shall at the time of the next and appropriate subsequent
cost-of-living adjustments, be considered the original dollar amount of the
allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
239. INCREASE IN PRESENTLY
PAYABLE BENEFITS FOR SERVICE OR DISABILITY AUTHORIZED. All benefits presently
payable pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060, and 41.20.080
as such RCW sections existed prior to the effective date of the amendment of
such RCW sections by sections 1, 2, 3, chapter 191, Laws of 1961 to persons who
retired prior to the effective date of the 1961 amendatory act, shall be
increased annually as provided in this section. The local pension board shall
meet subsequent to March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the
purpose of adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to RCW 41.20.050,
41.20.060, and 41.20.080. The local board shall determine the increase in the
consumer price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year
and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July 1st of
the year in which the board makes such determination by a dollar amount
proportionate to the increase in the consumer price index: PROVIDED, That
regardless of the change in the consumer price index, such increase shall be at
least two percent each year such adjustment is made.

Each year effective
with the July payment all benefits specified in this section, shall be increased
as authorized by this section. This benefit increase shall be paid monthly as
part of the regular pension payment and shall be cumulative.

For the purpose of this
section, "consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, the
consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau
of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
240. INCREASE IN CERTAIN
PRESENTLY PAYABLE DEATH BENEFITS AUTHORIZED. All benefits presently payable
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.20.085 which are not related to the amount
of current salary attached to the position held by the deceased member shall be
increased annually in the same manner and to the same extent as provided for
pursuant to section 239 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
241. DECLARATION OF POLICY
RESPECTING BENEFITS FOR INJURY OR DEATH‑-CIVIL ACTIONS ABOLISHED. The
legislature of the state of Washington hereby declares that the relationship
between members of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system and their governmental employers is similar to that of
workers to their employers and that the sure and certain relief granted by this
chapter is desirable, and as beneficial to such law enforcement officers and
fire fighters as workers' compensation coverage is to persons covered by Title
51 RCW. The legislature further declares that removal of law enforcement
officers and fire fighters from workers' compensation coverage under Title 51
RCW necessitates the (1) continuance of sure and certain relief for personal
injuries incurred in the course of employment or occupational disease, which
the legislature finds to be accomplished by the provisions of this chapter and
(2) protection for the governmental employer from actions at law; and to this
end the legislature further declares that the benefits and remedies conferred
by this chapter upon law enforcement officers and fire fighters covered under
this chapter shall be to the exclusion of any other remedy, proceeding, or
compensation for personal injuries or sickness, caused by the governmental
employer except as otherwise provided by this chapter; and to that end all
civil actions and civil causes of actions by such law enforcement officers and
fire fighters against their governmental employers for personal injuries or
sickness are hereby abolished, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
242. CAUSE OF ACTION FOR
INJURY OR DEATH, WHEN. If injury or death results to a member from the
intentional or negligent act or omission of a member's governmental employer,
the member, the widow, widower, child, or dependent of the member shall have
the privilege to benefit under this chapter and also have cause of action
against the governmental employer as otherwise provided by law, for any excess
of damages over the amount received or receivable under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
243. Sections 1 through 10 and
201 through 242 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW, to be
designated chapter 41.26A RCW.

PART
III

LEOFF MEDICAL BENEFITS RISK POOL

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. The purpose of this
chapter is to establish a risk assumption program whereby employers of active
and retired members of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26A RCW voluntarily enter into
membership in a risk pool for the purpose of sharing the noninsured medical
costs of long-term care and major medical services for retired members of the
retirement system. Such long-term care and major medical services are those
required under chapter 41.26A RCW and approved by city and county disability
boards.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
302. The definitions in this
section apply to this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Actuary"
means the state actuary, office of the state actuary.

(2)
"Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance
or disability allowance who is eligible for medical services under the restated
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system under chapter
41.26A RCW.

(3)
"Employer" means the legislative authority of any city, town, county,
or district or the elected officials of any municipal corporation that employs
any member of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, or any authorized association of such municipalities.

(4) "Executive
board" means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' risk pool
executive board.

(5) "Long-term
care" means those medically necessary services required under section
202(22) of this act, authorized under section 225 of this act, and received in
a facility for skilled nursing care, intermediate care, custodial care, hospice
care, day care, in-home nursing care, or other in-home care or services. For
purposes of expenditures from the medical account, long-term care only includes
qualified long-term care services as defined in internal revenue code section
7702B(2), and qualified long-term care insurance contract as defined in
internal revenue code section 7702B(b).

(6) "Medical
costs" means those costs incurred in the provision of the medically
necessary medical services required under section 202(22) of this act and
authorized under section 225 of this act. For purposes of expenditures from
the medical account, medical costs only include cost of medical care as defined
in internal revenue code section 213(d).

(7) "Risk
assumption" means a decision to absorb the entity's financial exposure to
a risk of loss without the creation of a formal program of advance funding of
anticipated losses.

(8) "Risk
pool" means the long-term care and medical costs risk pool created for the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' medical benefits risk pool.

(9) "State risk
manager" means the risk manager, risk management division, department of
general administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
303. (1) There is hereby
established the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' medical benefits
risk pool.

(2) The risk pool is a
risk assumption insurance program for the sole purpose of employers sharing the
noninsured medical costs of long-term care and medical costs for beneficiaries.

(3) An employer's
participation and withdrawal from the risk pool is subject to rules established
by the executive board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
304. (1) The law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' risk pool executive board is hereby established.

(2)(a) The membership
of the executive board shall consist of seven persons as follows:

(i) The chair is
appointed by the governor for a four-year term of office. The chair shall be
familiar with risk pool operation, medical, and long-term care matters but
shall not have been employed as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter or
served on a law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' disability board; and

(ii) Six others
selected by the governor from lists of recommended persons made by their
respective organizations as follows:

(A) Two persons
representing counties, one of which is an elected official;

(B) Two persons
representing cities and towns, one of which is an elected official; and

(C) Two persons
representing fire protection districts, one of which is an elected
commissioner.

(b) If a member vacates
his or her position, the governor shall select a person from a list recommended
by his or her respective organization to replace the vacating member for the
remainder of the term of office for the vacated position.

(3) One position of the
county, city, or town, and fire protection district groups has an initial term
of two years and four years thereafter. The remaining positions have terms of
four years.

(4) A vice-chair shall
be elected at the first meeting of the executive board and every two years
thereafter. Upon the absence of the chair, the vice-chair shall act in his or
her place.

(5) The executive board
shall meet at least quarterly and shall maintain minutes of each meeting and
any records as may be necessary, which are public records.

(6) The chair and three
other members constitute a quorum.

(7) The members of the
executive board shall not receive compensation for their service upon the
executive board but shall be reimbursed for all expenses incidental to such
service as to the amount authorized by either RCW 42.24.090 or 43.03.050 and
43.03.060, whichever is applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. The duties of the
executive board are as follows:

(1) Establish the basis
of membership in the risk pool;

(2) Define and
establish the benefits to be reimbursed by the risk pool;

(3) Authorize
distribution of moneys from the risk pool account;

(4) Determine, with the
assistance of the actuary, employer premiums to the risk pool;

(5) Authorize
reimbursement for medical and long-term care costs, required under section
202(22) of this act and authorized under section 225 of this act that are not
covered by standard medical insurance policies. The board shall adopt rules
governing these reimbursements consistent with the provisions of the internal
revenue code and rules and regulations established by the internal revenue
service;

(6) Purchase
reinsurance as necessary;

(7) Appoint other staff
as necessary for the operation of the risk pool; fix their compensation within
the limits provided by law; and prescribe their duties; and

(8) Enter into
contracts necessary for the operation of the risk pool, including risk
management, claims, and administrative services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. Funding for the risk pool
account, established in section 310 of this act, may come from three sources:
(1) Employer premiums; (2) surplus assets which are transferred from the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
fund under section 8 of this act; and (3) investment earnings.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
307. The state risk manager
shall adopt rules governing the implementation, management, and operation of
the risk pool in consultation with the health and welfare advisory board under
RCW 48.62.051. All rules shall be appropriate for the type of program and
class of risk covered. The state risk manager's rules shall include:

(1) Standards for the
implementation, management, operation, and solvency of the risk pool, including
the necessity and frequency of actuarial analyses and claims audits;

(2) Standards for
claims management procedures;

(3) Standards for
contracts between the risk pool and private businesses including standards for
contracts between third-party administrators and the risk pool; and

(4) Standards for an
annual report with the state risk manager and state auditor including, but not
limited to:

(a) Copies of all the
insurance coverage documents;

(b) A description of
the program structure;

(c) An actuarial
analysis, if required;

(d) A list of
contractors and service providers;

(e) The financial and
loss experience of the program; and

(f) Such other
information as required by rule of the state risk manager.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
308. The risk pool may not
engage in an act or practice that in any respect significantly differs from the
management and operation plan that formed the basis for the state risk
manager's approval unless the risk pool first notifies the state risk manager
in writing and obtains the state risk manager's approval. The state risk
manager shall approve or disapprove the proposed change within sixty days of
receipt of the notice. If the state risk manager denies a requested change,
the risk manager shall specify in detail the reasons for denial and the manner
in which the risk pool would fail to meet the requirements of this chapter or
any rules adopted in accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
309. (1) The state risk
manager shall establish and charge an investigation fee in an amount necessary
to cover the costs for the initial review and approval of the risk pool. The
fee must accompany the initial submission of the plan of operation and
management.

(2) The costs of
subsequent reviews and investigations shall be charged to the risk pool being
reviewed or investigated in accordance with the actual time and expenses
incurred in the review or investigation.

(3) The risk pool shall
pay any required fee or assessment required by the health and welfare advisory
board under RCW 48.62.051.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
310. (1) The law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' medical benefits risk pool account is hereby established
in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall be invested by the
Washington state investment board pursuant to section 7 of this act.

(2) The account shall
consist of such money as is directed by law for deposit in the account, and such
other money not subject to appropriation that the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' risk pool executive board authorizes to be deposited in the
account. Any money deposited in the account, the use of which has been
restricted by law, may only be expended in accordance with those restrictions.

(3) Only the executive
board or the board's designee may make disbursements from the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
311. Sections 301 through 310
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

Sec. 312. RCW 44.44.040 and 1987 c
25 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of the state
actuary shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) Perform all
actuarial services for the department of retirement systems, including all
studies required by law, the state board for volunteer fire fighters and
reserve officers, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' risk
pool executive board. Reimbursement for such services shall be made to the
state actuary pursuant to the provisions of RCW 39.34.130 as now or hereafter
amended.

(2) Advise the
legislature and the governor regarding pension benefit provisions, and funding
policies and investment policies of the state investment board.

(3) Consult with the
legislature and the governor concerning determination of actuarial assumptions
used by the department of retirement systems.

(4) Prepare a report,
to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on each pension bill introduced in
the legislature which briefly explains the financial impact of the bill. The
actuarial fiscal note shall include: (a) The statutorily required contribution
for the biennium and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of
the increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c) any
change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An actuarial fiscal
note shall also be prepared for all amendments which are offered in committee
or on the floor of the house of representatives or the senate to any pension
bill. However, a majority of the members present may suspend the requirement
for an actuarial fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house
of representatives or the senate.

(5) Provide such
actuarial services to the legislature as may be requested from time to time.

(6) Provide staff and
assistance to the committee established under ((RCW 46.44.050)) RCW
44.44.050.

(7) Provide
assistance as required under section 305 of this act.

Sec. 313. RCW 48.62.031 and 1991
sp.s. c 30 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governing body
of a local government entity may individually self-insure, may join or form a
self-insurance program together with other entities, and may jointly purchase
insurance or reinsurance with other entities for property and liability risks,
and health and welfare benefits only as permitted under this chapter. In
addition, the entity or entities may contract for or hire personnel to provide
risk management, claims, and administrative services in accordance with this
chapter.

(2) The governing
body of a local government entity individually may join or form a risk
assumption program together with other entities, and may jointly purchase
insurance or reinsurance with other entities for health and welfare benefits.
In addition, the entity or entities may contract for or hire personnel to
provide risk management, claims, and administrative services in accordance with
this chapter.

(3) The
agreement to form a joint self-insurance or risk assumption program
shall be made under chapter 39.34 RCW.

(((3))) (4)
Every individual and joint self-insurance program and a health and welfare
risk assumption program is subject to audit by the state auditor.

(((4))) (5)
If provided for in the agreement or contract established under chapter 39.34
RCW, a joint self-insurance or risk assumption program may, in
conformance with this chapter:

(a) Contract or
otherwise provide for risk management and loss control services;

(b) Contract or
otherwise provide legal counsel for the defense of claims and other legal
services;

(c) Consult with the
state insurance commissioner and the state risk manager;

(d) Jointly purchase
insurance and reinsurance coverage in such form and amount as the program's
participants agree by contract; and

(e) Possess any other
powers and perform all other functions reasonably necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

(((5))) (6)
A local government entity or a health and welfare risk assumption program
that has decided to assume a risk of loss must have available for inspection by
the state auditor a written report indicating the class of risk or risks the
governing body of the entity has decided to assume.

(((6))) (7)
Every joint self-insurance or risk assumption program governed by this
chapter shall appoint the risk manager as its attorney to receive service of,
and upon whom shall be served, all legal process issued against it in this
state upon causes of action arising in this state.

(a) Service upon the risk
manager as attorney shall constitute service upon the program. Service upon
joint insurance programs subject to chapter 30, Laws of 1991 1st sp. sess. can
be had only by service upon the risk manager. At the time of service, the
plaintiff shall pay to the risk manager a fee to be set by the risk manager,
taxable as costs in the action.

(b) With the initial
filing for approval with the risk manager, each joint self-insurance program
shall designate by name and address the person to whom the risk manager shall
forward legal process so served upon him or her. The joint self-insurance
program may change such person by filing a new designation.

(c) The appointment of
the risk manager as attorney shall be irrevocable, shall bind any successor in
interest or to the assets or liabilities of the joint self-insurance program,
and shall remain in effect as long as there is in force in this state any
contract made by the joint self-insurance program or liabilities or duties
arising therefrom.

(d) The risk manager
shall keep a record of the day and hour of service upon him or her of all legal
process. A copy of the process, by registered mail with return receipt
requested, shall be sent by the risk manager, to the person designated for the
purpose by the joint self-insurance or risk assumption program in its
most recent such designation filed with the risk manager. No proceedings shall
be had against the joint self-insurance or risk assumption program, and
the program shall not be required to appear, plead, or answer, until the
expiration of forty days after the date of service upon the risk manager.

Sec. 314. RCW 48.62.051 and 1991
sp.s. c 30 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The health and
welfare advisory board is created consisting of the insurance commissioner and
the state risk manager, or their designees, as ex officio members and six
members appointed by the governor on the basis of their experience and
knowledge pertaining to local government self-insured health and welfare
benefits programs. The board shall include one city management representative;
one county management representative; two management representatives from local
government self-insured health and welfare programs; and two representatives of
statewide employee organizations representing local government employees.

(2) The board shall
assist the state risk manager in:

(a) Adopting rules
governing the operation and management of both individual and joint
self-insured health and welfare benefits programs and the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' medical benefits risk pool;

(b) Reviewing and
approving the creation of both individual and joint self-insured health and
welfare benefits programs;

(c) Reviewing annual
reports filed by health and welfare benefits programs and in recommending that
corrective action be taken by the programs when necessary; and

(d) Responding to
concerns of the state auditor related to the management and operation of health
and welfare benefits programs.

(3) The board shall
annually elect a chair and a vice-chair from its members. The board shall meet
at least quarterly at such times as the state risk manager may fix. The board
members who are appointed shall serve without compensation from the state but
shall suffer no loss because of absence from their regular employment. Members
of the board who are not public employees shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240.

(4) A majority of the
board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(5) The board shall
keep public records of its proceedings.

PART
IV

MISCELLANEOUS AMENDATORY
SECTIONS

Sec. 401. RCW 2.10.155 and 1990 c
274 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No judge shall be
eligible to receive the judge's monthly service or disability retirement
allowance if the retired judge is employed:

(a) For more than eight
hundred ten hours in a calendar year as a pro tempore judge; or

(b) In an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.40.010 or 41.32.010, or as a law enforcement
officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 202 of this
act.

(2) Subsection (1) of
this section notwithstanding, a previously elected judge of the superior court
who retired before June 7, 1990, leaving a pending case in which the judge had
made discretionary rulings may hear the pending case as a judge pro tempore
without having his or her retirement allowance suspended.

(3) If a retired
judge's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits
shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his
or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retired judge's
benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the
department.

(4) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 402. RCW 6.15.020 and 1999 c
81 s 1 and 1999 c 42 s 603 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of
the state of Washington to ensure the well-being of its citizens by protecting
retirement income to which they are or may become entitled. For that purpose
generally and pursuant to the authority granted to the state of Washington
under 11 U.S.C. Sec. 522(b)(2), the exemptions in this section relating to
retirement benefits are provided.

(2) Unless otherwise
provided by federal law, any money received by any citizen of the state of
Washington as a pension from the government of the United States, whether the
same be in the actual possession of such person or be deposited or loaned,
shall be exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under
any legal process whatever, and when a debtor dies, or absconds, and leaves his
or her family any money exempted by this subsection, the same shall be exempt
to the family as provided in this subsection. This subsection shall not apply
to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or
74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law.

(3) The right of a
person to a pension, annuity, or retirement allowance or disability allowance,
or death benefits, or any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or
accruing to any citizen of the state of Washington under any employee benefit
plan, and any fund created by such a plan or arrangement, shall be exempt from
execution, attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process
whatever. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection actions
issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW if otherwise permitted by
federal law. This subsection shall permit benefits under any such plan or
arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent
of a participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a
qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such orders
under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan described in
sections 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or
section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent
provided in any order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides
for maintenance or support. This subsection shall not prohibit actions against
an employee benefit plan, or fund for valid obligations incurred by the plan or
fund for the benefit of the plan or fund.

(4) For the purposes of
this section, the term "employee benefit plan" means any plan or
arrangement that is described in RCW 49.64.020, including any Keogh plan,
whether funded by a trust or by an annuity contract, and in sections 401(a) or
403(a) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; or that is a
tax-sheltered annuity described in section 403(b) of such code or an individual
retirement account described in section 408 of such code; or a Roth individual
retirement account described in section 408A of such code; or a medical savings
account described in section 220 of such code; or an education individual
retirement account described in section 530 of such code; or a retirement bond
described in section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984. The
term "employee benefit plan" also means any rights accruing on
account of money paid currently or in advance for purchase of tuition units
under the advanced college tuition payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW. The
term "employee benefit plan" shall not include any employee benefit
plan that is established or maintained for its employees by the government of
the United States, by the state of Washington under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.26A,
41.32, 41.34, 41.35, 41.40 or 43.43 RCW or RCW 41.50.770, or by any agency or
instrumentality of the government of the United States.

(5) An employee benefit
plan shall be deemed to be a spendthrift trust, regardless of the source of
funds, the relationship between the trustee or custodian of the plan and the
beneficiary, or the ability of the debtor to withdraw or borrow or otherwise
become entitled to benefits from the plan before retirement. This subsection
shall not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18,
26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law. This subsection
shall permit benefits under any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a
spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan
to the extent expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order
that meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case of
benefits payable under a plan described in sections 403(b) or 408 of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in
effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a
court of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support.

(6) Unless contrary to
applicable federal law, nothing contained in subsection (3), (4), or (5) of
this section shall be construed as a termination or limitation of a spouse's
community property interest in an individual retirement account held in the
name of or on account of the other spouse, the account holder spouse. At the
death of the nonaccount holder spouse, the nonaccount holder spouse may
transfer or distribute the community property interest of the nonaccount holder
spouse in the account holder spouse's individual retirement account to the
nonaccount holder spouse's estate, testamentary trust, inter vivos trust, or
other successor or successors pursuant to the last will of the nonaccount
holder spouse or the law of intestate succession, and that distributee may, but
shall not be required to, obtain an order of a court of competent jurisdiction,
including a nonjudicial dispute resolution agreement entered into pursuant to
RCW 11.96.170 or other order entered under chapter 11.96A RCW, to confirm the
distribution. For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, the distributee
of the nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an individual
retirement account shall be considered a person entitled to the full protection
of subsection (3) of this section. The nonaccount holder spouse's consent to a
beneficiary designation by the account holder spouse with respect to an
individual retirement account shall not, absent clear and convincing evidence
to the contrary, be deemed a release, gift, relinquishment, termination,
limitation, or transfer of the nonaccount holder spouse's community property
interest in an individual retirement account. For purposes of this subsection,
the term "nonaccount holder spouse" means the spouse of the person in
whose name the individual retirement account is maintained. The term
"individual retirement account" includes an individual retirement
account and an individual retirement annuity both as described in section 408
of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, a Roth individual retirement
account as described in section 408A of the internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended, and an individual retirement bond as described in section 409 of the
internal revenue code as in effect before January 1, 1984. As used in this
subsection, an order of a court of competent jurisdiction includes an
agreement, as that term is used under RCW 11.96A.220.

Sec. 403. RCW 26.09.138 and 1991 c
365 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any obligee of a
court order or decree establishing a spousal maintenance obligation may seek a
mandatory benefits assignment order under chapter 41.50 RCW if any spousal
maintenance payment is more than fifteen days past due and the total of such
past due payments is equal to or greater than one hundred dollars, or if the
obligor requests a withdrawal of accumulated contributions from the department
of retirement systems.

(2) Any court order or
decree establishing a spousal maintenance obligation may state that, if any
spousal maintenance payment is more than fifteen days past due and the total of
such past due payments is equal to or greater than one hundred dollars, or if
the obligor requests a withdrawal of accumulated contributions from the
department of retirement systems, the obligee may seek a mandatory benefits
assignment order under chapter 41.50 RCW without prior notice to the obligor.
Any such court order or decree may also, or in the alternative, contain a
provision that would allow the department to make a direct payment of all or
part of a withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to RCW
41.50.550(3). Failure to include this provision does not affect the validity
of the court order or decree establishing the spousal maintenance, nor does
such failure affect the general applicability of RCW 41.50.500 through
41.50.650 to such obligations.

(3) The remedies in RCW
41.50.530 through 41.50.630 are the exclusive provisions of law enforceable
against the department of retirement systems in connection with any action for
enforcement of a spousal maintenance obligation ordered pursuant to a divorce,
dissolution, or legal separation, and no other remedy ordered by a court under
this chapter shall be enforceable against the department of retirement systems
for collection of spousal maintenance.

(4)(a) Nothing in this
section regarding mandatory assignment of benefits to enforce a spousal
maintenance obligation shall abridge the right of an ex spouse to receive
direct payment of retirement benefits payable pursuant to: (i) A court decree
of dissolution or legal separation; or (ii) any court order or court-approved
property settlement agreement; or (iii) incident to any court decree of
dissolution or legal separation, if such dissolution orders fully comply with
RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090,
41.04.310, 41.04.320, 41.04.330, ((41.26.180)) 41.26.053, section 209
of this act, 41.32.052, 41.40.052, or 43.43.310 as those statutes existed
before July 1, 1987, and as those statutes exist on and after July 28, 1991.

(b) Persons whose
dissolution orders as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) were entered between July 1,
1987, and July 28, 1991, shall be entitled to receive direct payments of
retirement benefits to satisfy court-ordered property divisions if the
dissolution orders filed with the department comply or are amended to comply
with RCW 41.50.670 through 41.50.720 and, as applicable, RCW 2.10.180,
2.12.090, ((41.26.180)) 41.26.053, section 209 of this act,
41.32.052, 41.40.052, or 43.43.310.

Sec. 404. RCW 36.28A.010 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs is hereby declared to be a
combination of units of local government: PROVIDED, That such association
shall not be considered an "employer" within the meaning of RCW
41.26.030(2), section 202 of this act, or 41.40.010(4): PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no compensation received as an employee of the association shall
be considered salary for purposes of the provisions of any retirement system
created pursuant to the general laws of this state: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
such association shall not qualify for inclusion under the unallocated two
mills of the property tax of any political subdivision: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the association shall not have the authority to assess any excess levy or bond
measure.

Sec. 405. RCW 41.04.205 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 6 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 41.04.180, the employees, with their dependents, of any
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state shall be
eligible to participate in any insurance or self-insurance program for
employees administered under chapter 41.05 RCW if the legislative authority of
any such county, municipality, or other political subdivisions of this state
determines, subject to collective bargaining under applicable statutes, a
transfer to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under chapter
41.05 RCW should be made. In the event of a special district employee transfer
pursuant to this section, members of the governing authority shall be eligible
to be included in such transfer if such members are authorized by law as of
June 25, 1976, to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by such members of all costs of insurance for
members.

(2) When the
legislative authority of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision
determines to so transfer, the state health care authority shall:

(a) Establish the
conditions for participation; and

(b) Have the sole right
to reject the application.

Approval of the
application by the state health care authority shall effect a transfer of the
employees involved to the insurance, self-insurance, or health care program
applied for.

(3) Any application of
this section to members of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system under chapter 41.26 or 41.26A RCW is subject to
chapter 41.56 RCW.

(4) School districts
may voluntarily transfer, except that all eligible employees in a bargaining unit
of a school district may transfer only as a unit and all nonrepresented
employees in a district may transfer only as a unit.

Sec. 406. RCW 41.04.270 and 1988 c
195 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
provision of chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.26A, 41.28, 41.32, 41.40, or
43.43 RCW to the contrary, on and after March 19, 1976, any member or former
member who (a) receives a retirement allowance earned by said former member as
deferred compensation from any public retirement system authorized by the
general laws of this state, or (b) is eligible to receive a retirement
allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030, but
chooses not to apply, or (c) is the beneficiary of a disability allowance from
any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 shall be estopped from
becoming a member of or accruing any contractual rights whatsoever in any other
public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030: PROVIDED, That (a) and (b) of
this subsection shall not apply to persons who have accumulated less than
fifteen years service credit in any such system.

(2) Nothing in this
section is intended to apply to any retirement system except those listed in
RCW 41.50.030 and the city employee retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and
Spokane. Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply to a dual member as
defined in RCW 41.54.010.

Sec. 407. RCW 41.04.350 and 1979
ex.s. c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any
other provisions of law, no employee of the state of Washington or any of its
political subdivisions or any institution supported in total or in part by the
state or any of its political subdivisions, other than employees covered by
chapters 41.26, 41.26A, and 43.43 RCW, shall be compelled to retire
solely on the basis of age prior to attaining seventy years of age.

(2) All compulsory
retirement provisions relating to public employees, other than employees
covered by chapters 41.26, 41.26A, and 43.43 RCW, may be waived for
individuals attaining seventy years of age by the individual's employer.

Sec. 408. RCW 41.04.400 and 1984 c
184 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the purpose of
RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 to govern the retirement rights of persons
whose employment status is altered when: (1) Two or more units of local
government of this state, at least one of which is a first class city with its
own retirement system, enter into an agreement for the consolidated performance
of a governmental service, activity, or undertaking; (2) the service, activity,
or undertaking is to be performed either by one of the participating local
governmental units or by a newly established separate legal entity; and (3) the
employees of the participating local governmental units are not all members of
the same Washington public retirement system.

RCW 41.04.405 through
41.04.430 are not intended to and do not govern retirement rights of any
members of the retirement systems established by chapter 41.16, 41.18, 41.20,
((or)) 41.26, or 41.26A RCW, or of employees described in RCW
35.58.265, 35.58.390, or 70.08.070. To the extent there is any conflict
between RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 and RCW 41.04.110, the provisions of
RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 shall govern.

Sec. 409. RCW 41.05.320 and 1995
1st sp.s. c 6 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Elected officials
and all permanent employees of the state are eligible to participate in the
benefits contribution plan and contribute amount(s) by agreement with the
authority. The authority may adopt rules to permit participation in the plan
by temporary employees of the state.

(2) Persons eligible
under subsection (1) of this section may enter into benefits contribution
agreements with the state.

(3)(a) In the initial
year of the medical flexible spending arrangement or cafeteria plan, if authorized,
an eligible person may become a participant after the adoption of the plan and
before its effective date by agreeing to have a portion of his or her gross
salary contributed and deposited into a health care and other benefits account
to be used for reimbursement of expenses covered by the plan.

(b) After the initial
year of the medical flexible spending arrangement or cafeteria plan, if
authorized, an eligible person may become a participant for a full plan year,
with annual benefit selection for each new plan year made before the beginning
of the plan year, as determined by the authority, or upon becoming eligible.

(c) Once an eligible
person elects to participate and the amount of gross salary that he or she
shall contribute and the benefit for which the funds are to be used during the
plan year is determined, the agreement shall be irrevocable and may not be
amended during the plan year except as provided in (d) of this subsection.
Prior to making an election to participate in the ((benefit[s])) benefits
contribution plan, the eligible person shall be informed in writing of all the
benefits and contributions that will occur as a result of such election.

(d) The authority shall
provide in the benefits contribution plan that a participant may enroll,
terminate, or change his or her election after the plan year has begun if there
is a significant change in a participant's status, as provided by 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 125 and the regulations adopted under that section and defined by the
authority.

(4) The authority shall
establish as part of the benefits contribution plan the procedures for and
effect of withdrawal from the plan by reason of retirement, death, leave of
absence, or termination of employment. To the extent possible under federal
law, the authority shall protect participants from forfeiture of rights under
the plan.

(5) Any contribution
under the benefits contribution plan shall continue to be included as
reportable compensation for the purpose of computing the state retirement and
pension benefits earned by the employee pursuant to chapters 41.26, 41.26A,
41.32, 41.40, and 43.43 RCW.

Sec. 410. RCW 41.18.210 and 1974
ex.s. c 148 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any former employee of
a department of a city of the first class, who (1) was a member of the
employees' retirement system of such city, and (2) is now employed within the
fire department of such city, may transfer his former membership credit from
the city employees' retirement system to the fireman's pension system created
by chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW by filing a written request with the board of
administration and the municipal fireman's pension board, respectively.

Upon the receipt of
such request, the transfer of membership to the city's fireman's pension system
shall be made, together with a transfer of all accumulated contributions
credited to such member. The board of administration shall transmit to the
municipal fireman's pension board a record of service credited to such member
which shall be computed and credited to such member as a part of his period of
employment in the city's fireman's pension system. For the purpose of the
transfer contemplated by this section, those affected individuals who have
formerly withdrawn funds from the city employees' retirement system shall be
allowed to restore contributions withdrawn from that retirement system directly
to the fireman's pension system and receive credit in the fireman's pension
system for their former membership service in the prior system.

Any employee so
transferring shall have all the rights, benefits, and privileges that he would
have been entitled to had he been a member of the city's fireman's pension
system from the beginning of his employment with the city.

No person so transferring
shall thereafter be entitled to any other public pension, except that provided
by chapter 41.26 or 41.26A RCW or social security, which is based upon
such service with the city.

The right of any
employee to file a written request for transfer of membership as set forth in
this section shall expire December 31, 1974.

Sec. 411. RCW 41.20.170 and 1973 c
143 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any former employee of
a department of a city of the first class who (1) was a member of the
employees' retirement system of such city, and (2) is now employed within the
police department of such city, may transfer his or her membership from
the city employees' retirement system to the city's police relief and pension
fund system by filing a written request with the board of administration and
the board of trustees, respectively, of the two systems.

Upon the receipt of
such request, the transfer of membership to the city's police relief and
pension fund system shall be made, together with a transfer of all accumulated
contributions credited to such member. The board of administration of the
city's employees' retirement system shall transmit to the board of trustees of
the city's police relief and pension fund system a record of service credited
to such member which shall be computed and credited to such member as a part of
his or her period of employment in the city's police relief and pension
fund system. For the purpose of the transfer contemplated by this section, the
affected individuals shall be allowed to restore withdrawn contributions to the
city employees' retirement system and reinstate their membership service records.

Any employee so
transferring shall have all the rights, benefits and privileges that he or
she would have been entitled to had he or she been a member of the
city's police relief and pension fund system from the beginning of his or
her employment with the city.

No person so
transferring shall thereafter be entitled to any other public pension, except
that provided by chapter 41.26 or 41.26A RCW or social security, which
is based upon service with the city.

The right of any
employee to file a written request for transfer of membership as set forth
herein shall expire December 31, 1973.

Sec. 412. RCW 41.20.175 and 1974
ex.s. c 148 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A former employee of a
fire department of a city of the first class who (1) was a member of the
fireman's pension system created by chapters 41.16 or 41.18 RCW, and (2) is
now employed within the police department of such city, will be regarded as
having received membership service credit for such service to the fire
department in the city's police and relief pension system at the time he
recovers such service credit by paying withdrawn contributions to the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
pursuant to RCW 41.26.030(((14))) or section 202 of this act.

Sec. 413. RCW 41.24.400 and 1999 c
148 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, any municipality may make provision by
appropriate legislation and payment of fees required by RCW 41.24.030(1) solely
for the purpose of enabling any reserve officer to enroll under the retirement pension
provisions of this chapter or fees required under RCW 41.24.030(1) to pay for
the costs of extending the relief provisions of this chapter to its reserve
officers.

(2) A reserve officer
is not eligible to receive a benefit under the retirement provisions of this
chapter for service under chapter 41.26, 41.26A, 41.32, or 41.40 RCW.

(3) Every municipality
shall make provisions for the collection and payment of the fees required under
this chapter, and shall continue to make provisions for all reserve officers
who come under this chapter as long as they continue to be employed as reserve
officers.

(4) Except as provided
under RCW 41.24.450, a reserve officer is not eligible to receive a benefit
under the relief provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 414. RCW 41.32.800 and 1998 c
341 s 605 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 41.32.802, no retiree under the provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible
to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed
in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, or 41.35.010,
or as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or
section 202 of this act.

If a retiree's benefits
have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated
when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to
be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially
recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

(2) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 415. RCW 41.32.860 and 1997 c
254 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except under RCW
41.32.862, no retiree shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly
retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as
defined in RCW 41.40.010 or 41.32.010, or as a law enforcement officer or fire
fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section 202 of this act.

(2) If a retiree's
benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be
reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused the
suspension of benefits. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

Sec. 416. RCW 41.35.230 and 1998 c
341 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 41.35.060, no retiree under the provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible
to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed
in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.35.010, RCW 41.40.010 or
41.32.010, or as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW
41.26.030 or section 202 of this act, except that a retiree who ends his
or her membership in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is
not subject to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective
official.

(2) If a retiree's
benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be
reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her
benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

(3) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 417. RCW 41.40.690 and 1998 c
341 s 606 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 41.40.037, no retiree under the provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible
to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed
in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, or 41.35.010,
or as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or
section 202 of this act, except that a retiree who ends his or her
membership in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not
subject to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective
official of a city or town.

(2) If a retiree's
benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be
reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her
benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

(3) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 418. RCW 41.40.850 and 2000 c
247 s 315 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 41.40.037, no retiree under the provisions of plan 3 shall be eligible
to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed
in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, or 41.35.010,
or as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or
section 202 of this act, except that a retiree who ends his or her
membership in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not
subject to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective
official of a city or town.

(2) If a retiree's
benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be
reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her
benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

(3) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 419. RCW 41.45.010 and 1998 c
341 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to provide a dependable and systematic process for funding the
benefits provided to members and retirees of the public employees' retirement
system, chapter 41.40 RCW; the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW;
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems,
chapter 41.26 and 41.26A RCW; the school employees' retirement system,
chapter 41.35 RCW; and the Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter
43.43 RCW.

The funding processes
established by this chapter ((is)) are intended to achieve the
following goals:

(1) To continue to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 2, the teachers'
retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 as provided by law;

(2) To fully amortize
the total costs of the public employees' retirement system plan 1((,)) and
the teachers' retirement system plan 1((, and the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1)) not later than June 30, 2024;

(3) To maintain the
sound actuarially funding of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system;

(4) To enable
taxpayers and retirement system members to benefit from favorable actuarial
experience and investment returns by means of contribution rate reductions for
plan 2 members and employers, and by a return of surplus assets from the
termination of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 1 to employees, employers, and the state;

(5) To establish
predictable long-term employer contribution rates which will remain a
relatively constant proportion of the future state budgets; and

(((4))) (6)
To fund, to the extent feasible, benefit increases for plan 1 members and all
benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so
that the cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the
benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 420. RCW 41.45.010 and 2000 c
247 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the intent of the
legislature to provide a dependable and systematic process for funding the
benefits provided to members and retirees of the public employees' retirement
system, chapter 41.40 RCW; the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW;
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems,
chapter 41.26 and 41.26A RCW; the school employees' retirement system,
chapter 41.35 RCW; and the Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter
43.43 RCW.

The funding processes
established by this chapter ((is)) are intended to achieve the
following goals:

(1) To continue to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers'
retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 as provided by law;

(2) To fully amortize
the total costs of the public employees' retirement system plan 1((,)) and
the teachers' retirement system plan 1((, and the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1)) not later than June 30, 2024;

(3) To maintain the
sound actuarial funding of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system;

(4) To enable taxpayers
and retirement system members to benefit from favorable actuarial experience
and investment returns by means of contribution rate reductions for plan 2
members and employers, and by a return of surplus assets from the termination
of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 to
employees, employers, and the state;

(5) To establish
predictable long-term employer contribution rates which will remain a
relatively constant proportion of the future state budgets; and

(((4))) (6)
To fund, to the extent feasible, benefit increases for plan 1 members and all
benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so
that the cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the
benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 421. RCW 41.45.020 and 1998 c
341 s 402 and 1998 c 283 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Council"
means the pension funding council created in RCW 41.45.100.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3) "Restated law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system ((plan 1))"
and "law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
2" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26A and
41.26 RCW, respectively.

(4) "Public
employees' retirement system plan 1" and "public employees'
retirement system plan 2" mean the benefits and funding provisions under
chapter 41.40 RCW.

(5) "Teachers'
retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement system plan 2,"
and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and
funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(6) "School
employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school employees'
retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under
chapter 41.35 RCW.

(7) "Washington
state patrol retirement system" means the retirement benefits provided
under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(8) "Unfunded
liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of a retirement
system.

(9) "Actuary"
or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed under chapter
44.44 RCW.

(10) "State
retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030.

(11) "Work
group" means the pension funding work group created in RCW 41.45.120.

(12) "Classified
employee" means a member of the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(13)
"Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).

Sec. 422. RCW 41.45.020 and 2000 c
247 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Council"
means the pension funding council created in RCW 41.45.100.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3) "Restated law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system ((plan 1))"
and "law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
2" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.26A and
41.26 RCW, respectively.

(4) "Public
employees' retirement system plan 1," "public employees' retirement
system plan 2," and "public employees' retirement system plan 3"
mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.40 RCW.

(5) "Teachers'
retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement system plan 2,"
and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and
funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(6) "School
employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school employees'
retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under
chapter 41.35 RCW.

(7) "Washington
state patrol retirement system" means the retirement benefits provided
under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(8) "Unfunded
liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of a retirement
system.

(9) "Actuary"
or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed under chapter
44.44 RCW.

(10) "State
retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030.

(11) "Work
group" means the pension funding work group created in RCW 41.45.120.

(12) "Classified
employee" means a member of the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(13) "Teacher"
means a member of the teachers' retirement system as defined in RCW
41.32.010(15).

Sec. 423. RCW 41.45.050 and 1998 c
341 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employers of
members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement
system, the school employees' retirement system, and the Washington state
patrol retirement system shall make contributions to those systems based on the
rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.

(2) The state shall
make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060
and 41.45.070. The state treasurer shall transfer the required contributions
each month on the basis of salary data provided by the department. The
state shall make contributions pursuant to section 5 of this act to maintain
the sound actuarial status of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
defined benefit retirement plan.

(3) The department
shall bill employers, and the state shall make contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, using
the combined rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 regardless of the
level of pension funding provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an
affected retirement system may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding,
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

(4) The contributions
received for the public employees' retirement system shall be allocated between
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and public employees'
retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully
fund the public employees' retirement system plan 2 employer contribution
required by RCW 41.40.650 shall first be deposited in the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 fund. All remaining public employees' retirement
system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 fund.

(5) The contributions
received for the teachers' retirement system shall be allocated between the
plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The
contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer
contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund.
All remaining teachers' retirement system employer contributions shall be
deposited in the plan 1 fund.

(6) The contributions
received for the school employees' retirement system shall be allocated between
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The
contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer
contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund.
All remaining school employees' retirement system employer contributions shall
be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(7) The contributions
received under RCW 41.26.450 for the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system shall be allocated ((between the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 and)) to the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 fund ((as
follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 employer contributions
shall be first deposited in the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 fund. All remaining law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund)).

(8) The funding of
the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit
retirement plan shall be provided pursuant to section 5 of this act.

Sec. 424. RCW 41.45.050 and 2000 c
247 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employers of
members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement
system, the school employees' retirement system, and the Washington state
patrol retirement system shall make contributions to those systems based on the
rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.

(2) The state shall
make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060
and 41.45.070. The state treasurer shall transfer the required contributions
each month on the basis of salary data provided by the department. The
state shall make contributions pursuant to section 5 of this act to maintain
the sound actuarial status of the restated law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' defined benefit retirement plan.

(3) The department
shall bill employers, and the state shall make contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, using
the combined rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 regardless of the
level of pension funding provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an
affected retirement system may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding,
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

(4) The contributions
received for the public employees' retirement system shall be allocated between
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The
contributions necessary to fully fund the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in
the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All
remaining public employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be
deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(5) The contributions
received for the teachers' retirement system shall be allocated between the
plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The
contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer
contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund.
All remaining teachers' retirement system employer contributions shall be
deposited in the plan 1 fund.

(6) The contributions
received for the school employees' retirement system shall be allocated between
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The
contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer
contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund.
All remaining school employees' retirement system employer contributions shall
be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(7) The contributions
received under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system shall be allocated ((between
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 and))
to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 fund ((as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 employer
contributions shall be first deposited in the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 fund. All remaining law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system employer contributions shall be
deposited in the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 1 fund)).

(8) The funding of
the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit
retirement plan shall be provided pursuant to section 5 of this act.

Sec. 425. RCW 41.45.060 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 905 and 2000 c 247 s 504 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:

(1) The state actuary
shall provide actuarial valuation results based on the assumptions adopted
under RCW 41.45.030.

(2) Not later than
September 30, 1998, and every two years thereafter, consistent with the
assumptions adopted under RCW 41.45.030, the council shall adopt and may make
changes to:

(a) A basic state
contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2;

(b) Basic employer
contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers'
retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system to be used
in the ensuing biennial period; and

(c) A basic employer
contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system for funding the
public employees' retirement system plan 1.

For the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, the rates adopted by the council shall be effective for the
period designated in section 902, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess. and RCW
41.45.0602.

(3) The employer and
state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the level percentages
of pay that are needed:

(a) To fully amortize
the total costs of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the
teachers' retirement system plan 1, ((the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1,)) and the unfunded liability of the
Washington state patrol retirement system not later than June 30, 2024, except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section;

(b) To also continue to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers'
retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 2 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and

(c) For the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2, the rate charged
to employers, except as provided in RCW 41.26.450, shall be thirty percent of
the cost of the retirement system and the rate charged to the state shall be
twenty percent of the cost of the retirement system.

(4) The aggregate
actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3
employer contribution rate.

(5) An amount equal to
the amount of extraordinary investment gains as defined in RCW 41.31.020 shall
be used to shorten the amortization period for the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(6) The council shall
immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management and
department of retirement systems of the state and employer contribution rates
adopted.

(7) The director of the
department of retirement systems shall collect those rates adopted by the
council.

Sec. 426. RCW 41.45.070 and 1998 c
340 s 10 and 1998 c 341 s 406 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1) In addition to the
basic employer contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060, the department
shall also charge employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers'
retirement system, school employees' retirement system, or Washington state
patrol retirement system members an additional supplemental rate to pay for the
cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems.
Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the supplemental
contribution rates required by this section shall be calculated by the state
actuary and shall be charged regardless of language to the contrary contained
in the statute which authorizes additional benefits.

(2) In addition to the
basic state contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060 for the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 the
department shall also establish a supplemental rate to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, this supplemental rate shall be
calculated by the state actuary and the state treasurer shall transfer the
additional required contributions regardless of language to the contrary
contained in the statute which authorizes the additional benefits.

(3) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active
members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, ((the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1,)) and Washington state patrol retirement system,
shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund
the cost of the benefit not later than June 30, 2024.

(4) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active
and retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2, the
teachers' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the school employees' retirement
system plan 2 and plan 3, or the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, shall be calculated as the level percentage of all
members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW
41.40.650 or 41.26.450, respectively.

(5) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund postretirement adjustments which are
provided on a nonautomatic basis to current retirees shall be calculated as the
percentage of pay needed to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the
retirees. The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1
shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of
the automatic adjustments not later than June 30, 2024.

(6) A supplemental rate
shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to
members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of 1998.

(7) A supplemental rate
shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to
members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW; section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998;
or section 701, chapter 341, Laws of 1998.

Sec. 427. RCW 41.45.070 and 2000 c
247 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the
basic employer contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060, the department
shall also charge employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers'
retirement system, school employees' retirement system, or Washington state
patrol retirement system members an additional supplemental rate to pay for the
cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems.
Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the supplemental
contribution rates required by this section shall be calculated by the state
actuary and shall be charged regardless of language to the contrary contained
in the statute which authorizes additional benefits.

(2) In addition to the
basic state contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060 for the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 the
department shall also establish a supplemental rate to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, this supplemental rate shall be
calculated by the state actuary and the state treasurer shall transfer the
additional required contributions regardless of language to the contrary
contained in the statute which authorizes the additional benefits.

(3) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active
members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, ((the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1,)) and Washington state patrol retirement system,
shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund
the cost of the benefit not later than June 30, 2024.

(4) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active
and retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan
3, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, or the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2, shall be calculated as the level percentage
of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated under
RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, or 41.45.067.

(5) The supplemental
rate charged under this section to fund postretirement adjustments which are
provided on a nonautomatic basis to current retirees shall be calculated as the
percentage of pay needed to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the
retirees. The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1
shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of
the automatic adjustments not later than June 30, 2024.

(6) A supplemental rate
shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to
members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of 1998.

(7) A supplemental rate
shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to
members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW; section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998;
or section 701, chapter 341, Laws of 1998.

Sec. 428. RCW 41.48.030 and 1971
ex.s. c 257 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor is
hereby authorized to enter on behalf of the state into an agreement with the
secretary of health, education, and welfare consistent with the terms and
provisions of this chapter, for the purpose of extending the benefits of the
federal old-age and survivors insurance system to employees of the state or any
political subdivision not members of an existing retirement system, or to
members of a retirement system established by the state or by a political
subdivision thereof or by an institution of higher learning with respect to
services specified in such agreement which constitute "employment" as
defined in RCW 41.48.020. Such agreement may contain such provisions relating
to coverage, benefits, contributions, effective date, modification and
termination of the agreement, administration, and other appropriate provisions
as the governor and secretary of health, education, and welfare shall agree
upon, but, except as may be otherwise required by or under the social security
act as to the services to be covered, such agreement shall provide in effect
that‑-

(a) Benefits will be
provided for employees whose services are covered by the agreement (and their
dependents and survivors) on the same basis as though such services constituted
employment within the meaning of title II of the social security act;

(b) The state will pay
to the secretary of the treasury, at such time or times as may be prescribed
under the social security act, contributions with respect to wages (as defined
in RCW 41.48.020), equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by the
federal insurance contributions act if the services covered by the agreement
constituted employment within the meaning of that act;

(c) Such agreement
shall be effective with respect to services in employment covered by the
agreement or modification thereof performed after a date specified therein but
in no event may it be effective with respect to any such services performed
prior to the first day of the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year in which such agreement or modification of the agreement is accepted by
the secretary of health, education and welfare.

(d) All services which
constitute employment as defined in RCW 41.48.020 and are performed in the
employ of the state by employees of the state, shall be covered by the
agreement;

(e) All services which
(i) constitute employment as defined in RCW 41.48.020, (ii) are performed in
the employ of a political subdivision of the state, and (iii) are covered by a
plan which is in conformity with the terms of the agreement and has been
approved by the governor under RCW 41.48.050, shall be covered by the
agreement; and

(f) As modified, the
agreement shall include all services described in either paragraph (d) or
paragraph (e) of this subsection and performed by individuals to whom section
218(c)(3)(C) of the social security act is applicable, and shall provide that
the service of any such individual shall continue to be covered by the
agreement in case he thereafter becomes eligible to be a member of a retirement
system; and

(g) As modified, the
agreement shall include all services described in either paragraph (d) or
paragraph (e) of this subsection and performed by individuals in positions
covered by a retirement system with respect to which the governor has issued a
certificate to the secretary of health, education, and welfare pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section.

(h) Law enforcement
officers and firemen of each political subdivision of this state who are
covered by the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement systems ((Act (chapter 209,
Laws of 1969 ex. sess.))) under chapters 41.26 and 41.26A RCW as now
in existence or hereafter amended shall constitute a separate "coverage
group" for purposes of the agreement entered into under this section and
for purposes of section 218 of the social security act. To the extent that the
agreement between this state and the federal secretary of health, education,
and welfare in existence on the date of adoption of this subsection is
inconsistent with this subsection, the governor shall seek to modify the
inconsistency.

(2) Any instrumentality
jointly created by this state and any other state or states is hereby
authorized, upon the granting of like authority by such other state or states,
(a) to enter into an agreement with the secretary of health, education, and
welfare whereby the benefits of the federal old-age and survivors insurance
system shall be extended to employees of such instrumentality, (b) to require
its employees to pay (and for that purpose to deduct from their wages)
contributions equal to the amounts which they would be required to pay under
RCW 41.48.040(1) if they were covered by an agreement made pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, and (c) to make payments to the secretary of the
treasury in accordance with such agreement, including payments from its own
funds, and otherwise to comply with such agreements. Such agreement shall, to
the extent practicable, be consistent with the terms and provisions of
subsection (1) and other provisions of this chapter.

(3) The governor is
empowered to authorize a referendum, and to designate an agency or individual
to supervise its conduct, in accordance with the requirements of section
218(d)(3) of the social security act, and subsection (4) of this section on the
question of whether service in all positions covered by a retirement system
established by the state or by a political subdivision thereof should be
excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter. If a
retirement system covers positions of employees of the state of Washington, of
the institutions of higher learning, and positions of employees of one or more
of the political subdivisions of the state, then for the purpose of the
referendum as provided herein, there may be deemed to be a separate retirement
system with respect to employees of the state, or any one or more of the
political subdivisions, or institutions of higher learning and the governor
shall authorize a referendum upon request of the subdivisions' or institutions'
of higher learning governing body: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That if a referendum of
state employees generally fails to produce a favorable majority vote then the
governor may authorize a referendum covering positions of employees in any
state department who are compensated in whole or in part from grants made to
this state under title III of the federal social security act: PROVIDED, That
any city or town affiliated with the statewide city employees retirement system
organized under chapter 41.44 RCW may at its option agree to a plan submitted
by the board of trustees of said statewide city employees retirement system for
inclusion under an agreement under this chapter if the referendum to be held as
provided herein indicates a favorable result: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
teachers' retirement system be considered one system for the purpose of the
referendum except as applied to the several colleges of education. The notice
of referendum required by section 218(d)(3)(C) of the social security act to be
given to employees shall contain or shall be accompanied by a statement, in
such form and such detail as the agency or individual designated to supervise
the referendum shall deem necessary and sufficient, to inform the employees of
the rights which will accrue to them and their dependents and survivors, and
the liabilities to which they will be subject, if their services are included
under an agreement under this chapter.

(4) The governor,
before authorizing a referendum, shall require the following conditions to be
met:

(a) The referendum
shall be by secret written ballot on the question of whether service in
positions covered by such retirement system shall be excluded from or included
under the agreement between the governor and the secretary of health,
education, and welfare provided for in RCW 41.48.030(1);

(b) An opportunity to
vote in such referendum shall be given and shall be limited to eligible
employees;

(c) Not less than
ninety days' notice of such referendum shall be given to all such employees;

(d) Such referendum
shall be conducted under the supervision (of the governor or) of an agency or
individual designated by the governor;

(e) The proposal for
coverage shall be approved only if a majority of the eligible employees vote in
favor of including services in such positions under the agreement;

(f) The state
legislature, in the case of a referendum affecting the rights and liabilities
of state employees covered under the state employees' retirement system and
employees under the teachers' retirement system, and in all other cases the
local legislative authority or governing body, shall have specifically approved
the proposed plan and approved any necessary structural adjustment to the
existing system to conform with the proposed plan.

(5) Upon receiving
satisfactory evidence that with respect to any such referendum the conditions
specified in subsection (4) of this section and section 218(d)(3) of the social
security act have been met, the governor shall so certify to the secretary of
health, education, and welfare.

(6) If the legislative
body of any political subdivision of this state certifies to the governor that
a referendum has been held under the terms of RCW 41.48.050(1)(i) and gives
notice to the governor of termination of social security for any coverage group
of the political subdivision, the governor shall give two years advance notice
in writing to the federal department of health, education, and welfare of such
termination of the agreement entered into under this section with respect to
said coverage group.

Sec. 429. RCW 41.48.050 and 1981 c
119 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each political
subdivision of the state is hereby authorized to submit for approval by the
governor a plan for extending the benefits of title II of the social security
act, in conformity with the applicable provisions of such act, to those
employees of such political subdivisions who are not covered by an existing
pension or retirement system. Each pension or retirement system established by
the state or a political subdivision thereof is hereby authorized to submit for
approval by the governor a plan for extending the benefits of title II of the
social security act, in conformity with applicable provisions of such act, to
members of such pension or retirement system. Each such plan and any amendment
thereof shall be approved by the governor if he finds that such plan, or such
plan as amended, is in conformity with such requirements as are provided in
regulations of the governor, except that no such plan shall be approved unless‑-

(a) It is in conformity
with the requirements of the social security act and with the agreement entered
into under RCW 41.48.030;

(b) It provides that
all services which constitute employment as defined in RCW 41.48.020 and are
performed in the employ of the political subdivision by employees thereof,
shall be covered by the plan;

(c) It specifies the
source or sources from which the funds necessary to make the payments required
by paragraph (a) of subsection (3) and by subsection (4) of this section are
expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that such sources will
be adequate for such purposes;

(d) It provides that in
the plan of coverage for members of the state teachers' retirement system or
for state employee members of the state employees' retirement system, there
shall be no additional cost to or involvement of the state until such plan has
received prior approval by the legislature;

(e) It provides for
such methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision as are
found by the governor to be necessary for the proper and efficient
administration of the plan;

(f) It provides that
the political subdivision will make such reports, in such form and containing
such information, as the governor may from time to time require and comply with
such provisions as the governor or the secretary of health, education, and
welfare may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and
verification of such reports; and

(g) It authorizes the
governor to terminate the plan in its entirety, in his discretion, if he finds
that there has been a failure to comply substantially with any provision
contained in such plan, such termination to take effect at the expiration of
such notice and on such conditions as may be provided by regulations of the
governor and may be consistent with the provisions of the social security act.

(h) It provides that
law enforcement officers and fire fighters of each political subdivision of
this state who are covered by the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement systems ((Act
(chapter 209, Laws of 1969 ex. sess.))) under chapters 41.26 and 41.26A
RCW as now in existence or hereafter amended shall constitute a separate
"coverage group" for purposes of the plan or agreement entered into
under this section and for purposes of section 216 of the social security act.
To the extent that the plan or agreement entered into between the state and any
political subdivision of this state is inconsistent with this subsection, the
governor shall seek to modify the inconsistency.

(i) It provides that
the plan or agreement may be terminated by any political subdivision as to any
such coverage group upon giving at least two years advance notice in writing to
the governor, effective at the end of the calendar quarter specified in the
notice. It shall specify that before notice of such termination is given, a
referendum shall be held among the members of the coverage group under the
following conditions:

(i) The referendum shall
be conducted under the supervision of the legislative body of the political
subdivision.

(ii) Not less than
sixty days' notice of such referendum shall be given to members of the coverage
group.

(iii) An opportunity to
vote by secret ballot in such referendum shall be given and shall be limited to
all members of the coverage group.

(iv) The proposal for
termination shall be approved only if a majority of the coverage group vote in
favor of termination.

(v) If a majority of
the coverage group vote in favor of termination, the legislative body of the
political subdivision shall certify the results of the referendum to the
governor and give notice of termination of such coverage group.

(2) The governor shall
not finally refuse to approve a plan submitted by a political subdivision under
subsection (1), and shall not terminate an approved plan, without reasonable
notice and opportunity for hearing to the political subdivision affected thereby.

(3)(a) Each political
subdivision as to which a plan has been approved under this section shall pay
into the contribution ((fund)) account, with respect to wages (as
defined in RCW 41.48.020), at such time or times as the governor may by
regulation prescribe, contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified
in the applicable agreement entered into by the governor under RCW 41.48.030.

(b) Each political
subdivision required to make payments under paragraph (a) of this subsection is
authorized, in consideration of the employee's retention in, or entry upon,
employment after enactment of this chapter, to impose upon each of its
employees, as to services which are covered by an approved plan, a contribution
with respect to his wages (as defined in RCW 41.48.020), not exceeding the
amount of employee tax which is imposed by the federal insurance contributions
act, and to deduct the amount of such contribution from his wages as and when
paid. Contributions so collected shall be paid into the OASI contribution ((fund))
account in partial discharge of the liability of such political
subdivision or instrumentality under paragraph (a) of this subsection. Failure
to deduct such contribution shall not relieve the employee or employer of
liability therefor.

(4) Delinquent reports
and payments due under paragraph (f) of subsection (1) and paragraph (a) of
subsection (3) of this section will be subject to an added interest charge of
six percent per year or, if higher, the rate chargeable to the state by the secretary
by virtue of federal law, if the late report or payment contributes to any
federal penalty for late filing of reports or for late deposit of
contributions. Delinquent contributions, interest and penalties may be
recovered by civil action or may, at the request of the governor, be deducted
from any other moneys payable to the political subdivision by any department or
agency of the state.

Sec. 430. RCW 41.50.030 and 1998 c
341 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As soon as possible
but not more than one hundred and eighty days after March 19, 1976, there is
transferred to the department of retirement systems, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, all powers, duties, and functions of:

(a) The Washington
public employees' retirement system;

(b) The Washington
state teachers' retirement system;

(c) The Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system;

(d) The Washington
state patrol retirement system;

(e) The Washington judicial
retirement system; and

(f) The state treasurer
with respect to the administration of the judges' retirement fund imposed
pursuant to chapter 2.12 RCW.

(2) On July 1, 1996,
there is transferred to the department all powers, duties, and functions of the
deferred compensation committee.

(3) The department
shall administer chapter 41.34 RCW.

(4) The department
shall administer the Washington school employees' retirement system created
under chapter 41.35 RCW.

(5) The department
shall administer the restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system under chapter 41.26A RCW.

Sec. 431. RCW 41.50.055 and 1991 c
35 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The administration of
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems
((is)) under chapters 41.26 and 41.26A RCW are hereby vested in
the director of retirement systems, and the director shall:

(1) Keep in convenient
form such data as shall be deemed necessary for actuarial evaluation purposes;

(2) As of March 1,
1970, and at least every two years thereafter, through the state actuary, make
an actuarial valuation as to the mortality and service experience of the
beneficiaries under this chapter and the various accounts created for the
purpose of showing the financial status of the retirement fund;

(3) Adopt for the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems
the mortality tables and such other tables as shall be deemed necessary;

(4) Keep a record of
all its proceedings, which shall be open to inspection by the public;

(5) From time to time
adopt such rules and regulations not inconsistent with chapters 41.26 and
41.26A RCW, for the administration of the provisions of this chapter, for
the administration of the funds created by this chapter and chapter
41.26A RCW and the several accounts thereof, and for the transaction of the
business of the system;

(6) Prepare and publish
annually a financial statement showing the condition of the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' funds and the various accounts
thereof, and setting forth such other facts, recommendations and data as may be
of use in the advancement of knowledge concerning the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems, and furnish
a copy thereof to each employer, and to such members as may request copies
thereof;

(7) Perform such other
functions as are required for the execution of the provisions of chapters
41.26 and 41.26A RCW;

(8) Fix the amount of
interest to be credited at a rate which shall be based upon the net annual
earnings of the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' funds
for the preceding twelve-month period and from time to time make any necessary
changes in such rate;

(9) Pay from the
department of retirement systems expense fund the expenses incurred in
administration of the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement systems from those funds appropriated for that purpose;

(10) Perform any other
duties prescribed elsewhere in chapter 41.26 or 41.26A RCW;

(11) Issue decisions
relating to appeals initiated pursuant to RCW 41.16.145 and 41.18.104 as now or
hereafter amended and shall be authorized to order increased benefits pursuant
to RCW 41.16.145 and 41.18.104 as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 432. RCW 41.50.075 and 1998 c
341 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Two funds are))
A fund is hereby created and established in the state treasury to be
known as ((the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement fund, and)) the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement fund which shall consist
of all moneys paid into ((them)) the fund in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the
form of cash, securities, or other assets. The ((plan 1 fund shall consist
of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, and the))
plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided
to members of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2.

(2) All of the assets
of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be credited according
to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be maintained in the
state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall
consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the
Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2
and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to
members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 2 and 3.

(3) There is hereby
established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to
finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement
system plan 1, and the plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance
the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system
plan 2.

(4) There is hereby
established in the state treasury the school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of
all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the school
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3.

Sec. 433. RCW 41.50.075 and 2000 c
247 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Two funds are))
A fund is hereby created and established in the state treasury to be
known as ((the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement fund, and)) the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement fund which shall consist
of all moneys paid into ((them)) the fund in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the
form of cash, securities, or other assets. The ((plan 1 fund shall consist
of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, and the))
plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided
to members of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2.

(2) All of the assets
of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be credited according
to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be maintained in the
state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall
consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the
Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2
and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to
members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 2 and 3.

(3) There is hereby
established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all
moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund
shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of
the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3.

(4) There is hereby established
in the state treasury the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2
and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to
finance the benefits provided to members of the school employees' retirement
system plan 2 and plan 3.

(5) The department
shall administer the funds established under the restated law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26A RCW,
including:

(a) The restated law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit retirement fund; and

(b) The state
surplus assets reserve fund.

Sec. 434. RCW 41.50.080 and 1998 c
341 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

The state investment
board shall provide for the investment of all funds of the Washington public
employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement systems under chapters 41.26 and 41.26A RCW, the
Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement
system, and the judges' retirement fund, pursuant to RCW 43.84.150, and may
sell or exchange investments acquired in the exercise of that authority.

Sec. 435. RCW 41.50.090 and 1985 c
102 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, on the effective date of transfer as provided in RCW
41.50.030, the department shall succeed to and is vested with all powers,
duties, and functions now or by any concurrent act of this 1976 legislature
vested in the individual retirement boards set forth in RCW 41.50.030 relating
to the administration of their various retirement systems, including but not
limited to the power to appoint a staff and define the duties thereof:
PROVIDED, That actuarial services required by the department shall be performed
by the state actuary as provided in RCW 44.44.040.

(2) The department
shall keep each retirement board fully informed on the administration of the
corresponding retirement system, and shall furnish any information requested by
a retirement board.

(3) Rules proposed by
the director under RCW 2.10.070, 41.50.055, 41.32.025, or 41.40.020 shall be
submitted to the appropriate retirement boards for review prior to adoption.
After receiving approval of the members of the appropriate board, such rules
shall become effective as provided by the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW.

(4) Each retirement board
shall continue to perform all functions as are vested in it by law with respect
to applications for benefits paid upon either temporary or permanent
disability, with such staff assistance from the department as may be required.
The director shall perform those functions with respect to disability benefits
as are vested in him or her by ((RCW 41.26.120, 41.26.125, and 41.26.200))
chapter 41.26A RCW.

Sec. 436. RCW 41.50.110 and 1998 c
341 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this section, all expenses of the
administration of the department and the expenses of administration of the
retirement systems created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.26A, 41.32,
41.40, 41.34, 41.35, and 43.43 RCW shall be paid from the department of
retirement systems expense fund.

(2) In order to
reimburse the department of retirement systems expense fund on an equitable
basis the department shall ascertain and report to each employer, as defined in
RCW 41.26.030, section 202 of this act, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or
41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional share of the entire
expense of the administration of the retirement system that the employer
participates in during the ensuing biennium or fiscal year whichever may be
required. Such sum is to be computed in an amount directly proportional to the
estimated entire expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries
of the employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the
entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in
their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.

(3) The department
shall compute and bill each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, section
202 of this act, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of each
month for the amount due for that month to the department of retirement systems
expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its other obligations. Such
computation as to each employer shall be made on a percentage rate of salary
established by the department. However, the department may at its discretion
establish a system of billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event
the said billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.

(4) The director may
adjust the expense fund contribution rate for each system at any time when
necessary to reflect unanticipated costs or savings in administering the
department.

(5) An employer who
fails to submit timely and accurate reports to the department may be assessed
an additional fee related to the increased costs incurred by the department in
processing the deficient reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be
deposited in the retirement system expense fund.

(a) Every six months
the department shall determine the amount of an employer's fee by reviewing the
timeliness and accuracy of the reports submitted by the employer in the
preceding six months. If those reports were not both timely and accurate the
department may prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.

(b) An additional fee
assessed by the department under this subsection shall not exceed fifty percent
of the standard fee.

(c) The department
shall adopt rules implementing this section.

(6) Expenses other than
those under RCW 41.34.060(((2))) (3) shall be paid pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 437. RCW 41.50.112 and 2000 c
247 s 1107 are each amended to read as follows:

Employers, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, section 202 of this act, 41.32.010, 41.34.020,
41.35.010, and 41.40.010, must report all member data to the department in a
format designed and communicated by the department. Employers failing to
comply with this reporting requirement shall be assessed an additional fee as
defined under RCW 41.50.110(5).

Sec. 438. RCW 41.50.150 and 1998 c
341 s 509 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The employer of any
employee whose retirement benefits are based in part on excess compensation, as
defined in this section, shall, upon receipt of a billing from the department,
pay into the appropriate retirement system the present value at the time of the
employee's retirement of the total estimated cost of all present and future
benefits from the retirement system attributable to the excess compensation.
The state actuary shall determine the estimated cost using the same method and
procedure as is used in preparing fiscal note costs for the legislature.
However, the director may in the director's discretion decline to bill the
employer if the amount due is less than fifty dollars. Accounts unsettled
within thirty days of the receipt of the billing shall be assessed an interest
penalty of one percent of the amount due for each month or fraction thereof
beyond the original thirty-day period.

(2) "Excess
compensation," as used in this section, includes the following payments,
if used in the calculation of the employee's retirement allowance:

(a) A cash out of
unused annual leave in excess of two hundred forty hours of such leave.
"Cash out" for purposes of this subsection means:

(i) Any payment in lieu
of an accrual of annual leave; or

(ii) Any payment added
to salary or wages, concurrent with a reduction of annual leave;

(b) A cash out of any
other form of leave;

(c) A payment for, or
in lieu of, any personal expense or transportation allowance to the extent that
payment qualifies as reportable compensation in the member's retirement system;

(d) The portion of any
payment, including overtime payments, that exceeds twice the regular daily or
hourly rate of pay; and

(e) Any termination or
severance payment.

(3) This section
applies to the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030 and to retirements
occurring on or after March 15, 1984. Nothing in this section is intended to
amend or determine the meaning of any definition in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.26A,
41.32, 41.40, 41.35, or 43.43 RCW or to determine in any manner what payments
are includable in the calculation of a retirement allowance under such
chapters.

(4) An employer is not
relieved of liability under this section because of the death of any person
either before or after the billing from the department.

Sec. 439. RCW 41.50.255 and 1998 c
341 s 511 are each amended to read as follows:

The director is
authorized to pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds of the public
employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the Washington
state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the
judges' retirement system, the school district employees' retirement system, or
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems under
chapter 41.26 and 41.26A RCW lawful obligations of the appropriate system
for legal expenses and medical expenses which expenses are primarily incurred
for the purpose of protecting the appropriate trust fund or are incurred in
compliance with statutes governing such funds.

The term "legal
expense" includes, but is not limited to, legal services provided through
the legal services revolving fund, fees for expert witnesses, travel expenses,
fees for court reporters, cost of transcript preparation, and reproduction of
documents.

The term "medical
costs" includes, but is not limited to, expenses for the medical
examination or reexamination of members or retirees, the costs of preparation
of medical reports, and fees charged by medical professionals for attendance at
discovery proceedings or hearings.

The director may also
pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds specified in this section
costs incurred in investigating fraud and collecting overpayments, including
expenses incurred to review and investigate cases of possible fraud against the
trust funds and collection agency fees and other costs incurred in recovering
overpayments. Recovered funds must be returned to the appropriate trust funds.

Sec. 440. RCW 41.50.500 and 1998 c
341 s 512 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.650, 41.50.670 through 41.50.720, and 26.09.138.

(1)
"Benefits" means periodic retirement payments or a withdrawal of
accumulated contributions.

(2) "Disposable
benefits" means that part of the benefits of an individual remaining after
the deduction from those benefits of any amount required by law to be
withheld. The term "required by law to be withheld" does not include
any deduction elective to the member.

(3) "Dissolution
order" means any judgment, decree, or order of spousal maintenance,
property division, or court-approved property settlement incident to a decree
of divorce, dissolution, invalidity, or legal separation issued by the superior
court of the state of Washington or a judgment, decree, or other order of
spousal support issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or
country, that has been registered or otherwise made enforceable in this state.

(4) "Mandatory
benefits assignment order" means an order issued to the department of
retirement systems pursuant to RCW 41.50.570 to withhold and deliver benefits payable
to an obligor under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.26A, 41.32, 41.40,
41.35, or 43.43 RCW.

(5) "Obligee"
means an ex spouse or spouse to whom a duty of spousal maintenance or property
division obligation is owed.

(6) "Obligor"
means the spouse or ex spouse owing a duty of spousal maintenance or a property
division obligation.

(7) "Periodic
retirement payments" means periodic payments of retirement allowances,
including but not limited to service retirement allowances, disability
retirement allowances, and survivors' allowances. The term does not include a
withdrawal of accumulated contributions.

(8) "Property
division obligation" means any outstanding court-ordered property division
or court-approved property settlement obligation incident to a decree of
divorce, dissolution, or legal separation.

(9) "Standard
allowance" means a benefit payment option selected under RCW
2.10.146(1)(a), 41.26.460(1)(a), 41.32.785(1)(a), 41.40.188(1)(a),
41.40.660(1), or 41.35.220 that ceases upon the death of the retiree. Standard
allowance also means the benefit allowance provided under RCW 2.10.110,
2.10.130, 43.43.260, ((41.26.100, 41.26.130(1)(a))) section 217 of
this act, section 222(1)(a) of this act, or chapter 2.12 RCW. Standard
allowance also means the maximum retirement allowance available under RCW
41.32.530(1) following member withdrawal of accumulated contributions, if any.

(10) "Withdrawal
of accumulated contributions" means a lump sum payment to a retirement
system member of all or a part of the member's accumulated contributions,
including accrued interest, at the request of the member including any lump sum
amount paid upon the death of the member.

Sec. 441. RCW 41.50.500 and 2000 c
247 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.650, 41.50.670 through 41.50.720, and 26.09.138.

(1)
"Benefits" means periodic retirement payments or a withdrawal of
accumulated contributions.

(2) "Disposable
benefits" means that part of the benefits of an individual remaining after
the deduction from those benefits of any amount required by law to be
withheld. The term "required by law to be withheld" does not include
any deduction elective to the member.

(3) "Dissolution
order" means any judgment, decree, or order of spousal maintenance, property
division, or court-approved property settlement incident to a decree of
divorce, dissolution, invalidity, or legal separation issued by the superior
court of the state of Washington or a judgment, decree, or other order of
spousal support issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or
country, that has been registered or otherwise made enforceable in this state.

(4) "Mandatory
benefits assignment order" means an order issued to the department of
retirement systems pursuant to RCW 41.50.570 to withhold and deliver benefits
payable to an obligor under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.26A, 41.32,
41.40, 41.35, or 43.43 RCW.

(5) "Obligee"
means an ex spouse or spouse to whom a duty of spousal maintenance or property
division obligation is owed.

(6) "Obligor"
means the spouse or ex spouse owing a duty of spousal maintenance or a property
division obligation.

(7) "Periodic
retirement payments" means periodic payments of retirement allowances,
including but not limited to service retirement allowances, disability
retirement allowances, and survivors' allowances. The term does not include a
withdrawal of accumulated contributions.

(8) "Property
division obligation" means any outstanding court-ordered property division
or court-approved property settlement obligation incident to a decree of
divorce, dissolution, or legal separation.

(9) "Standard
allowance" means a benefit payment option selected under RCW
2.10.146(1)(a), 41.26.460(1)(a), 41.32.785(1)(a), 41.40.188(1)(a),
41.40.660(1), 41.40.845(1)(a), or 41.35.220 that ceases upon the death of the
retiree. Standard allowance also means the benefit allowance provided under
RCW 2.10.110, 2.10.130, 43.43.260, ((41.26.100, 41.26.130(1)(a))) section
217 of this act, section 222(1)(a) of this act, or chapter 2.12 RCW.
Standard allowance also means the maximum retirement allowance available under
RCW 41.32.530(1) following member withdrawal of accumulated contributions, if
any.

(10) "Withdrawal
of accumulated contributions" means a lump sum payment to a retirement
system member of all or a part of the member's accumulated contributions,
including accrued interest, at the request of the member including any lump sum
amount paid upon the death of the member.

Sec. 442. RCW 41.50.670 and 1998 c
341 s 513 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this
chapter regarding mandatory assignment of benefits to enforce a spousal
maintenance obligation shall abridge the right of an obligee to direct payments
of retirement benefits to satisfy a property division obligation ordered
pursuant to a court decree of dissolution or legal separation or any court
order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court
decree of dissolution or legal separation as provided in RCW 2.10.180,
2.12.090, 41.04.310, 41.04.320, 41.04.330, 41.26.053, section 209 of this
act, 41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070(((3))) (4), 41.40.052,
43.43.310, or 26.09.138, as those statutes existed before July 1, 1987, and as
those statutes exist on and after July 28, 1991. The department shall pay
benefits under this chapter in a lump sum or as a portion of periodic
retirement payments as expressly provided by the dissolution order. A
dissolution order may not order the department to pay a periodic retirement
payment or lump sum unless that payment is specifically authorized under the
provisions of chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.26A, 41.32, 41.35, 41.34,
41.40, or 43.43 RCW, as applicable.

(2) The department
shall pay directly to an obligee the amount of periodic retirement payments or
lump sum payment, as appropriate, specified in the dissolution order if the
dissolution order filed with the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section includes a provision that states in the following form:

If
. . . . . . (the obligor) receives periodic retirement
payments as defined in RCW 41.50.500, the department of retirement systems
shall pay to . . . . . . (the obligee)
. . . . . . dollars from such payments or
. . . percent of such payments. If the obligor's debt is expressed
as a percentage of his or her periodic retirement payment and the obligee does
not have a survivorship interest in the obligor's benefit, the amount received
by the obligee shall be the percentage of the periodic retirement payment that
the obligor would have received had he or she selected a standard allowance.

If
. . . . . . (the obligor) requests or has requested a
withdrawal of accumulated contributions as defined in RCW 41.50.500, or becomes
eligible for a lump sum death benefit, the department of retirement systems
shall pay to . . . . . . (the obligee)
. . . . . . dollars plus interest at the rate paid by
the department of retirement systems on member contributions. Such interest to
accrue from the date of this order's entry with the court of record.

(3) This section does
not require a member to select a standard allowance upon retirement nor does it
require the department to recalculate the amount of a retiree's periodic
retirement payment based on a change in survivor option.

(4) A court order under
this section may not order the department to pay more than seventy-five percent
of an obligor's periodic retirement payment to an obligee.

(5) Persons whose court
decrees were entered between July 1, 1987, and July 28, 1991, shall also be
entitled to receive direct payments of retirement benefits to satisfy
court-ordered property divisions if the dissolution orders comply or are
modified to comply with this section and RCW 41.50.680 through 41.50.720 and,
as applicable, RCW 2.10.180, 2.12.090, 41.26.053, section 209 of this act,
41.32.052, 41.35.100, 41.34.070, 41.40.052, 43.43.310, and 26.09.138.

(6) The obligee must
file a copy of the dissolution order with the department within ninety days of
that order's entry with the court of record.

(7) A division of
benefits pursuant to a dissolution order under this section shall be based upon
the obligor's gross benefit prior to any deductions. If the department is
required to withhold a portion of the member's benefit pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 3402 and the sum of that amount plus the amount owed to the obligee
exceeds the total benefit, the department shall satisfy the withholding
requirements under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402 and then pay the remainder to the
obligee. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to amounts withheld
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3402(i).

Sec. 443. RCW 41.56.030 and 2000 c
23 s 1 and 2000 c 19 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Public
employer" means any officer, board, commission, council, or other person
or body acting on behalf of any public body governed by this chapter, or any
subdivision of such public body. For the purposes of this section, the public
employer of district court or superior court employees for wage-related matters
is the respective county legislative authority, or person or body acting on
behalf of the legislative authority, and the public employer for
nonwage-related matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective
district court or superior court.

(2) "Public
employee" means any employee of a public employer except any person (a)
elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to office pursuant to statute,
ordinance or resolution for a specified term of office as a member of a
multimember board, commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive
head or body of the public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy,
administrative assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential
relationship to (i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining
unit, or (ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified term of
office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether
appointed by the executive head or body of the public employer, or (d) who is a
court commissioner or a court magistrate of superior court, district court, or
a department of a district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who
is a personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner, or (f) excluded from a bargaining unit under RCW
41.56.201(2)(a). For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more than one
assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from a bargaining
unit.

(3) "Bargaining
representative" means any lawful organization which has as one of its
primary purposes the representation of employees in their employment relations
with employers.

(4) "Collective
bargaining" means the performance of the mutual obligations of the public
employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable
times, to confer and negotiate in good faith, and to execute a written
agreement with respect to grievance procedures and collective negotiations on
personnel matters, including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be
peculiar to an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that
by such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal or
be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

(5)
"Commission" means the public employment relations commission.

(6) "Executive
director" means the executive director of the commission.

(7) "Uniformed
personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as defined in RCW
41.26.030 and section 202 of this act employed by the governing body of
any city or town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with a
population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who are
uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned security personnel
employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(5), by a county with a
population of seventy thousand or more, and who are trained for and charged
with the responsibility of controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in
the jail and safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority
Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port
district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d) security
forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) fire fighters as that term is
defined in RCW 41.26.030 and section 202 of this act; (f) employees of a
port district in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties
include crash fire rescue or other fire fighting duties; (g) employees of fire
departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or
emergency medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.

(8) "Institution
of higher education" means the University of Washington, Washington State
University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University,
Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and the various
state community colleges.

Sec. 444. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state
treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the health
system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the
state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state surplus
assets reserve account, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, ((the Washington law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,)) the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account,
the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 445. RCW 43.84.092 and 2000
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of
investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the
treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income
account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal
programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990.
The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest
earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest
to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall
under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of
financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the
provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for
the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4) Monthly, the state
treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income
account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the
earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account,
the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the state surplus assets reserve account, the supplemental
pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal
fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, ((the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,))
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
3 account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account, the
county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the special
category C account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 446. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2000
c 79 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the
treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state
treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same
extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2) All income received
from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set aside in an account
in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment
income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on
behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected
state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial
institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the
state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the investment income
account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.

(b) The following
accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based
upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the agricultural
local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the basic health
plan self-insurance reserve account, the Washington international exchange
scholarship endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment trust
fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account,
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' medical benefits risk pool
account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition
center account, the youth athletic facility ((grant)) account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the
restated law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' defined benefit
retirement fund, and the children's trust fund. However, the earnings to
be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c) The following accounts
and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate share of earnings
based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The
advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation
revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with
Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds
shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this
section.

Sec. 447. RCW 46.52.130 and 1998 c
165 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A certified abstract of
the driving record shall be furnished only to the individual named in the
abstract, an employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of
an employer or prospective employer, the insurance carrier that has insurance
in effect covering the employer or a prospective employer, the insurance
carrier that has insurance in effect covering the named individual, the
insurance carrier to which the named individual has applied, an alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of social and health
services, to which the named individual has applied or been assigned for
evaluation or treatment, or city and county prosecuting attorneys. City
attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys may provide the driving record to
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies approved by the department of
social and health services to which the named individual has applied or been
assigned for evaluation or treatment. The director, upon proper request, shall
furnish a certified abstract covering the period of not more than the last
three years to insurance companies. Upon proper request, the director shall
furnish a certified abstract covering a period of not more than the last five
years to state approved alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies, except
that the certified abstract shall also include records of alcohol-related
offenses as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) covering a period of not more than the
last ten years. Upon proper request, a certified abstract of the full driving
record maintained by the department shall be furnished to a city or county
prosecuting attorney, to the individual named in the abstract or to an employer
or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an employer or
prospective employer of the named individual. The abstract, whenever possible,
shall include an enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person was
driving; the total number of vehicles involved; whether the vehicles were
legally parked or moving; whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the
accident; whether the accident resulted in any fatality; any reported
convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that an infraction was committed
based upon a violation of any motor vehicle law; and the status of the person's
driving privilege in this state. The enumeration shall include any reports of
failure to appear in response to a traffic citation or failure to respond to a
notice of infraction served upon the named individual by an arresting officer.
Certified abstracts furnished to prosecutors and alcohol/drug assessment or
treatment agencies shall also indicate whether a recorded violation is an
alcohol-related offense as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) that was originally
charged as one of the alcohol-related offenses designated in RCW
46.01.260(2)(b)(i).

The abstract provided
to the insurance company shall exclude any information, except that related to
the commission of misdemeanors or felonies by the individual, pertaining to law
enforcement officers or fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030 or section
202 of this act, or any officer of the Washington state patrol, while
driving official vehicles in the performance of occupational duty. The
abstract provided to the insurance company shall include convictions for RCW
46.61.5249 and 46.61.525 except that the abstract shall report them only as
negligent driving without reference to whether they are for first or second
degree negligent driving. The abstract provided to the insurance company shall
exclude any deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.060, except that if a person
is removed from a deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.090, the abstract shall
show the deferred prosecution as well as the removal.

The director shall
collect for each abstract the sum of four dollars and fifty cents which shall
be deposited in the highway safety fund.

Any insurance company
or its agent receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for its
own underwriting purposes and shall not divulge any of the information
contained in it to a third party. No policy of insurance may be canceled,
nonrenewed, denied, or have the rate increased on the basis of such information
unless the policyholder was determined to be at fault. No insurance company or
its agent for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of commercial
motor vehicles may use any information contained in the abstract relative to
any person's operation of motor vehicles while not engaged in such employment,
nor may any insurance company or its agent for underwriting purposes relating
to the operation of noncommercial motor vehicles use any information contained
in the abstract relative to any person's operation of commercial motor
vehicles.

Any employer or
prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an employer or prospective
employer receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for his or
her own purpose to determine whether the licensee should be permitted to
operate a commercial vehicle or school bus upon the public highways of this
state and shall not divulge any information contained in it to a third party.

Any alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of social and health
services receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively for the
purpose of assisting its employees in making a determination as to what level
of treatment, if any, is appropriate. The agency, or any of its employees,
shall not divulge any information contained in the abstract to a third party.

Release of a certified
abstract of the driving record of an employee or prospective employee requires
a statement signed by: (1) The employee or prospective employee that
authorizes the release of the record, and (2) the employer attesting that the
information is necessary to determine whether the licensee should be employed
to operate a commercial vehicle or school bus upon the public highways of this
state. If the employer or prospective employer authorizes an agent to obtain
this information on their behalf, this must be noted in the statement.

Any violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 448. RCW 72.72.060 and 1983 c
279 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The state shall
reimburse cities and counties for their costs incurred under chapters
41.26 and 41.26A RCW if the costs are the direct result of physical
injuries sustained in the implementation of a contingency plan adopted under
RCW 72.02.150 and if reimbursement is not precluded by the following
provisions: If the secretary of corrections identifies in the contingency plan
the prison walls or other perimeter of the secured area, then reimbursement
will not be made unless the injuries occur within the walls or other perimeter
of the secured area. If the secretary of corrections does not identify prison
walls or other perimeter of the secured area, then reimbursement shall not be
made unless the injuries result from providing assistance, requested by the
secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee, which is beyond the
description of the assistance contained in the contingency plan. In no case
shall reimbursement be made when the injuries result from conduct which either
is not requested by the secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee,
or is in violation of orders by superiors of the local law enforcement agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
449. EFFECTIVE DATES AND
EXPIRATION DATES. (1) Sections 419, 421, 423, 426, 432, 440, and 444 of this
act expire March 1, 2002.

(2) Sections 418, 420,
422, 424, 427, 433, 437, 441, and 445 of this act take effect March 1, 2002.

PART
V

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
501. REPEALER. The following
acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 41.26.005 (Provisions applicable to
"plan 1" and "plan 2") and 1992 c 72 s 2, 1991 c 35 s 12,
1989 c 273 s 10, 1985 c 102 s 5, 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 294 s
18;

(2) RCW 41.26.035 ("Minimum medical and
health standards" defined) and 1991 c 35 s 14 & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 2;

(3) RCW 41.26.045 (Minimum medical and
health standards) and 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 3, 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 20, 1974 ex.s. c
120 s 8, & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 3;

(4) RCW 41.26.046 (Minimum medical and
health standards--Board to adopt--Publication and distribution--Employer
certification procedures) and 1987 c 418 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 21, 1974 ex.s.
c 120 s 12, 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 2, & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 4;

(5) RCW 41.26.047 (Minimum medical and
health standards--Exemptions--Employer may adopt higher standards) and 1972
ex.s. c 131 s 3 & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 5;

(6) RCW 41.26.075 (Provisions applicable to
plan 1) and 1992 c 72 s 3 & 1991 c 35 s 101;

(7) RCW 41.26.080 (Funding total liability
of plan 1 system) and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 907, 1991 c 35 s 17, 1989 c 273 s
13, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 8;

(8) RCW 41.26.090 (Retirement for service)
and 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 4;

(9) RCW 41.26.100 (Allowance on retirement
for service) and 1991 c 343 s 16, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 3, 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 7,
1971 ex.s. c 257 s 9, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 5, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 10;

(10) RCW 41.26.110 (City and county
disability boards authorized--Composition--Terms--Reimbursement for travel
expenses--Duties) and 2000 c 234 s 1, 1988 c 164 s 1, 1982 c 12 s 1, 1974 ex.s.
c 120 s 9, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 6, 1969 ex.s. c 219 s 3, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s
11;

(11) RCW 41.26.115 (Director of retirement
systems to adopt rules governing disability boards--Remand of orders not in
accordance with rules) and 1981 c 294 s 1;

(12) RCW 41.26.120 (Retirement for disability
incurred in the line of duty) and 1991 c 35 s 19, 1986 c 176 s 5, 1985 c 102 s
2, 1981 c 294 s 2, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 10, 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 8, 1970 ex.s. c 6
s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 12;

(13) RCW 41.26.125 (Retirement for disability
not incurred in the line of duty) and 1986 c 176 s 6 & 1985 c 102 s 3;

(14) RCW 41.26.130 (Allowance on retirement
for disability) and 1991 c 35 s 20, 1987 c 185 s 11, 1981 c 294 s 3, 1970 ex.s.
c 6 s 8, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 13;

(15) RCW 41.26.135 (Cessation of
disability--Determination) and 1985 c 103 s 1;

(16) RCW 41.26.140 (Reexaminations of
disability beneficiaries--Reentry--Appeal) and 1991 c 35 s 21, 1985 c 103 s 2,
1981 c 294 s 4, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 4, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 9, & 1969 ex.s. c
209 s 14;

(17) RCW 41.26.150 (Sickness or disability benefits--Medical
services) and 1992 c 22 s 3, 1991 c 35 s 22, 1987 c 185 s 12, 1983 c 106 s 23,
1974 ex.s. c 120 s 11, 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 10, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 10, 1969 ex.s. c
219 s 4, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 15;

(18) RCW 41.26.160 (Death benefits--Duty
connected) and 1999 c 134 s 2 & 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 5;

(19) RCW 41.26.161 (Death benefits--Nonduty
connected) and 1999 c 134 s 3;

(20) RCW 41.26.162 (Ex spouse qualifying as
surviving spouse--When) and 1991 sp.s. c 12 s 2;

(21) RCW 41.26.170 (Refund of contributions
on discontinuance of service--Reentry) and 1994 c 197 s 6, 1991 c 35 s 24, 1970
ex.s. c 6 s 14, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 22;

(22) RCW 41.26.190 (Credit for military
service) and 1991 c 35 s 26, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 13, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 18;

(23) RCW 41.26.192 (Credit for service under
prior pension system--Restoration of withdrawn contributions) and 1994 c 197 s
7 & 1992 c 157 s 1;

(24) RCW 41.26.194 (Credit for service under
prior pension system--Service not covered under prior system) and 1994 c 197 s
8 & 1992 c 157 s 2;

(25) RCW 41.26.195 (Transfer of service
credit from other retirement system--Irrevocable election allowed) and 1997 c
122 s 1;

(26) RCW 41.26.197 (Service credit for paid
leave of absence--Application to elected officials of labor organizations) and
1993 c 95 s 3;

(27) RCW 41.26.200 (Appeal to director of
retirement systems) and 1981 c 294 s 5, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 6, 1971 ex.s. c 257 s
13, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 11, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 16;

(28) RCW 41.26.211 (Notice for hearing
required prior to petitioning for judicial review) and 1984 c 184 s 16, 1981 c
294 s 6, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 19;

(29) RCW 41.26.221 (Hearing--Conduct) and
1984 c 184 s 17, 1981 c 294 s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 20;

(30) RCW 41.26.240 (Increases or decreases in
retirement allowances to be determined by department in accordance with consumer
price index) and 1991 c 35 s 27, 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 13, 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 16,
& 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 24;

(31) RCW 41.26.250 (Increase in presently
payable benefits for service or disability authorized) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 178
s 3, 1974 ex.s. c 190 s 3, 1970 ex.s. c 37 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 34;

(32) RCW 41.26.260 (Increase in certain
presently payable death benefits authorized) and 1974 ex.s. c 190 s 4 &
1969 ex.s. c 209 s 35;

(33) RCW 41.26.270 (Declaration of policy
respecting benefits for injury or death--Civil actions abolished) and 1989 c 12
s 13, 1987 c 185 s 13, 1985 c 102 s 4, & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 14;

(34) RCW 41.26.281 (Cause of action for
injury or death, when) and 1991 c 35 s 28 & 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 15;

(35) RCW 41.26.3901 (Severability--1969 ex.s.
c 209) and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 42;

(36) RCW 41.26.3902 (Act to control
inconsistencies) and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 43;

(37) RCW 41.26.3903 (Effective date--1969
ex.s. c 209) and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 45; and

(38) RCW 41.26.410 (Provisions applicable to
plan 2) and 1991 c 35 s 29 & 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
502. SAVINGS. The repeals in
section 501 of this act do not affect any existing right acquired or liability
or obligation incurred under the statutes repealed or under any rule or order
adopted under those statutes nor do they affect any proceeding instituted under
them. Rules adopted by the department of retirement systems relating to plan 1
of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system under
chapter 41.26 RCW shall continue in effect and apply to the restated law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26A
RCW unless expressly inconsistent therewith and until repealed or superseded.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
503. NONSEVERABILITY.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act are not severable, and if any provision of
those sections is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, this
entire act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
504. CAPTIONS. Part headings
and captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 505. EFFECTIVE DATE. Except
as provided in section 449 of this act, this act takes effect December 1, 2001.

---
END ---