BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1) "Regional
congestion relief district" or "district" means a quasi-municipal
corporation created pursuant to this chapter.

(2)
"Transportation projects" or "projects" means major capital
facility improvements of such significant impact to the district that without
regionally raised new revenue, coupled with state funds, the improvements could
not be accomplished.

(3) "Funding
qualification" means designation as congestion relief projects by the
district and inclusion in the transportation plan of the state, a regional
transportation planning organization, or a metropolitan planning organization
whose primary goal is to relieve congestion.

(4) "Project
sponsor" means the state department of transportation.

(5) "District
formation committee" or "committee" means the body responsible
for drafting the plan which is submitted to the voters for approval and
includes a person appointed by the governor and the county executive, or chair
of the county commissioners of each county included in a proposed district.

(6)
"Directors" means individuals appointed by the governor to direct
district affairs; however, the secretary of the department of transportation
and the chair or vice-chair of the metropolitan planning organization of the
region, or his or her designees, shall be ex officio, nonvoting, noncompensated
directors of districts created pursuant to this chapter.

(7) "Congestion
relief plan" or "plan" means a document which sets forth
projects which meet funding qualification requirements and which makes
provision for financing such projects, including proposed taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The legislature finds
that:

(1) The capacity of
many of Washington state's transportation facilities have failed to keep up
with the state's growth, particularly in major urban regions;

(2) The state cannot by
itself fund, in a timely way, many of the major capacity and other improvements
required on state and interstate highways in urban regions;

(3) Providing a
comprehensive multimodal transportation system which provides efficient
mobility choices for persons and freight requires a partnership between the
state, local, and regional governments, and the private sector; and

(4) Timely construction
and development of congestion relief projects can best be achieved by
establishing regional congestion relief districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A county executive or
chair of a county commission, except those counties identified in section 4 of
this act, may convene a committee to form a district by providing written
notice to eligible members of the district formation committee, the governor,
and the chairs of the transportation committees in the senate and house of
representatives. If the members agree to activate the committee, it shall have
the following duties and powers:

(1) To set the
boundaries of the proposed district which reasonably incorporate areas
benefited by the projects proposed in the plan;

(2) To appoint such
advisors and conduct such public meetings as needed to assure active public
participation in the development of the plan;

(3) To adopt a plan
which shall include projects that meet funding qualifications and provide for
the financing for those projects;

(4) To forward the
proposed plan to the cities within the district. Sixty percent of the cities
within the district representing a minimum of seventy-five percent of the
cities' and towns' population, by action of the cities' and towns' legislative
authorities, must respond within sixty days of receiving it. The cities shall
not alter the plan; they may approve or disapprove the plan as submitted to
them;

(5) To submit to the
governor, at the time a plan is certified to the ballot, the names of three
nominees for each director position set forth in the plan;

(6) To submit a plan to
a general election ballot for approval or rejection of the voters. If the
board submits a plan to a general election, it shall draft a ballot title, give
notice as required by law for ballot measures, and perform such other duties as
may be required to put the plan before the voters of the proposed district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. If the voters approve the
plan and taxes, the district shall be declared formed. The county election
official of a county, or if the district is composed of more than a single
county, county election officials jointly, shall, within fifteen days of the final
certification of the election results, publish a notice in a newspaper or
newspapers of general circulation in the district declaring the district
formed, and shall mail copies of the notice to the governor, secretary of
transportation, members of the committee, and to the treasurer of the county
or, if the district is multicounty, the treasurer of the largest county who
shall thereafter serve as the treasurer of the district. Any party challenging
the formation of a voter-approved district must file his or her challenge in
writing by serving the prosecuting attorneys of each county within the district
and the attorney general within thirty days after the final certification of
the election. Failure to challenge within the time provided shall forever bar
further challenge of the district's valid formation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. Each district shall have
three directors to manage its affairs. Directors shall be appointed by the
governor from a list of nominees provided by the district formation committee.
The initial nominees list shall be submitted to the governor not less than
twenty days after the district is declared formed. Thereafter, the district
formation committee shall convene at the call of the county executive or chair
of the county commission of the county or, if a multicounty district, by the
chair or executive of the largest county, to provide the governor with
additional nominees to fill vacant positions. The governor shall, in making
initial appointments, number the positions and stagger the terms of the
positions so that approximately one-third of the member's terms shall expire
each year. Except for initial terms, or to fill a vacancy where the term has
not expired, appointments shall be for three-year terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Directors shall be
residents and registered voters within the districts and shall be free of
conflicts with project sponsors. Directors may, by resolution, set a meeting
fee of not more than one hundred fifty dollars per official meeting, but total
compensation may not exceed five thousand dollars in any calendar year.
Directors may be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses when
traveling on authorized district business outside the district's boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. The directors constitute
the governing board of the district and are responsible for the execution of
the voter-approved plan. The board shall:

(1) Adopt bylaws to
govern its affairs which may include:

(a) The time and place
of its regular meetings;

(b) Rules for calling
special meetings;

(c) The method of
keeping records of its proceedings and official acts;

(d) Titles of district
officers and terms and method of election;

(e) The requirements
for hiring employees and consultants;

(f) Procedures for the
safekeeping and disbursement of funds; and

(g) Any other
provisions the directors find necessary to include in the district bylaws;

(2) Provide for the
levying and collection of taxes authorized by the voters;

(3) Request from time
to time, that a new committee with membership as provided for the district
formation committees, to place on a ballot for voter approval a new or revised
plan with additional projects and taxes;

(4) Hire such
employees, professional service providers, or contractors as may be required
for district purposes. However, it is the legislature's intent that projects
be contracted with the project sponsor;

(5) Enter into
agreements with state, local and regional agencies, and departments as
necessary to accomplish district purposes and protect the district's investment
in projects;

(6) Accept gifts,
grants, or other contributions of funds which will support the purposes and
programs of the district;

(7) Monitor and audit
the progress and execution of projects to protect the investment of the public
and make public its findings; and

(8) Exercise such other
powers and duties as may be reasonable related to carrying out the mission of
the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The district shall
accomplish its purposes by entering into agreements with the project sponsor as
to who will acquire, construct, or develop projects approved by the voters.
The district shall negotiate reasonable terms and conditions to assist project
sponsors in funding projects. The overall plan of the district must leverage
the district's financial contributions so that project sponsors and other
revenue sources continue to fund major congestion relief and transportation
capacity improvement projects in the district. The plan submitted to the
voters shall provide funding estimates for each priority project. The plan may
also list additional projects that may be funded if the district has a surplus
because a priority project is abandoned or curtailed by the project sponsor, or
surplus revenues become available for any other reason. Plans submitted to the
voters must provide that ninety-five percent of all funds raised will fund
projects in the plan including environmental improvements and mitigation. Not
more than five percent of funds authorized by the plan may be used for the
administrative costs of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. (1) The district's plan
may recommend within its geographic boundaries the imposition of some or all of
the following revenue sources:

(a) A regional sales
and use tax as a percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax. The tax authorized under
this section is in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of a taxable event within the taxing
district;

(b) A vehicle license
fee of up to seventy-five dollars for each vehicle registered in the district,
except commercial vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.140, per year on motor
vehicles and trailers or trailing units. The department of licensing shall
administer and collect this fee on behalf of a district and remit this fee to
the custody of the county treasurer, who shall distribute it as directed by a
district;

(c) A commercial
vehicle fee of up to one hundred fifty dollars for each commercial vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.140 registered in the district. The department of
licensing shall administer and collect this fee on behalf of a district and
remit this fee to the custody of the county treasurer, who shall distribute it
as directed by a district;

(d) User fees on
projects improved under this chapter;

(e) A charge based upon
the miles traveled by a vehicle registered in the district;

(f) The county property
levy provided in section 14 of this act.

(2) Taxes may not be
imposed without an affirmative vote of the voters within the boundaries of the
district on a referendum as set forth in this act. Money collected under this
section must be used only to implement the district plan in accordance with this
act. A district may contract with the state department of revenue or the
department of licensing for administration and collection of any of the taxes
or fees authorized in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. The district may not
issue any debt of its own for more than two years duration. A district may,
when authorized by the plan, enter into agreements with the project sponsor to
pledge taxes or other revenues of the district for the purpose of paying in
part or whole principal and interest on bonds issued by the project sponsor.
The contracts pledging revenues and taxes shall be binding for the term of the
agreement, but not to exceed twenty-five years, and no tax pledged by an
agreement may be eliminated or modified if it would impair the pledge of the
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. A district once formed
shall continue so long as projects are being actively developed or taxes levied
to meet continuing district obligations. When a district is no longer engaged
in a project's development or levying taxes to fund projects, the directors
shall submit to the county legislative bodies of the district a resolution of
dissolution. Such resolution shall be published in newspapers of general circulation
within the district at least three times in a period of thirty days. Creditors
must file claims for payment of claims due within thirty days of the last
published notice or such claim shall be considered extinguished. The district
treasurer shall within ninety days of the last published notice forward
remaining funds in the accounts of the district to the motor vehicle fund to be
used to fund state transportation projects within the former district
boundaries.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. To assure accountability
to the public for the timely construction of the transportation project or
projects within cost projections, the district shall issue a public report
every six months from the date the project begins to the date it concludes. In
the report, the district shall detail the progress of the project in two
areas: (1) Whether the project or projects costs-to-date are within the amount
of revenue raised for the project or projects under the vote of the people as
provided in section 3 of this act; and (2) whether the project or projects are
proceeding in accordance with the original construction schedule. If the
progress of the project is inconsistent with either the cost projections or
timeliness, the district shall provide the public with a plan to move the
project or projects back into compliance with the original construction
schedule and cost projections.

Sec. 13. RCW 84.52.043 and 1995 c
99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within and subject to
the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax
levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named
shall be as follows:

(1) Levies of the
senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the state shall
not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio
fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support
of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy by any
road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or town shall not exceed three
dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from one
dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and
one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for general county
purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district within
the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result
of the increased county levy.

(2) The aggregate
levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the
state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all
taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns,
port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this
subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing
law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c)
levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230;
(d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed
under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing for very
low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; ((and)) (f) the portions
of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120;
and (g) levies for county transportation projects under section 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. (1) A county may impose
additional regular property tax levies in an amount equal to fifty cents or
less per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property in the county. The
tax will be imposed (a) each year for six consecutive years, (b) each year for
ten consecutive years, or (c) permanently. A tax levy under this section must
be specifically authorized by a majority of at least three-fifths of the
registered voters voting on the proposition and the number of persons voting
"yes" on the proposition must constitute three-fifths of a number
equal to forty percent of the total number of voters voting in the county at
the last preceding general election. Ballot propositions must conform with RCW
29.30.111. A county must not submit to the voters at the same election
multiple propositions to impose a levy under this section.

(2) A county imposing a
permanent levy under this section must provide for separate accounting of
expenditures of the revenues generated by the levy. The taxing district must maintain
a statement of the accounting which will be updated at least every two years
and will be available to the public upon request at no charge.

(3) A taxing district
imposing a permanent levy under this section must provide for a referendum
procedure to apply to the ordinance or resolution imposing the tax. This
referendum procedure must specify that a referendum petition may be filed at
any time with a filing officer, as identified in the ordinance or resolution.
Within ten days, the filing officer will confer with the petitioner concerning
form and style of the petition, issue the petition an identification number,
and secure an accurate, concise, and positive ballot title from the designated
local official. The petitioner will have thirty days in which to secure the
signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the
county, as of the last general election, upon petition forms which contain the
ballot title and the full text of the measure to be referred. The filing
officer will verify the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition and, if
sufficient valid signatures are properly submitted, will certify the referendum
measure to the next election within the county if one is to be held within one
hundred eighty days from the date of filing of the referendum petition, or at a
special election to be called for that purpose in accordance with RCW
29.13.020.

(4) Any tax imposed
under this section must be used only for the provision of county road or other
transportation purposes.

(5) The limitations in
RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy authorized in this section.

(6) If a ballot
proposition approved under subsection (1) of this section did not impose the
maximum allowable levy amount authorized for the county under this section, any
future increase up to the maximum allowable levy amount must be specifically
authorized by the voters in accordance with subsection (1) of this section at a
general or special election.

(7) The limitation in
RCW 84.55.010 shall not apply to the first levy imposed pursuant to this
section following the approval of such levy by the voters pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 1 through 12 and
14 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

---
END ---