BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In a proceeding
before a superior court involving property taxes, the judge may allow
reasonable attorneys' fees and other reasonable expenses, as determined by the
court, incurred by the taxpayer during the current proceeding and all prior
proceedings before the board of tax appeals, department of revenue, or county
board of equalization for the matter in dispute. These attorneys' fees and
reasonable expenses are in addition to costs or disbursements allowed prior to
the effective date of this act.

(2) Fees and expenses
allowed under this section for proceedings before the county board of
equalization will be paid by checks drawn upon the appropriate fund by the
county treasurer.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, "reasonable expenses" includes, but is not limited to,
expert witness fees paid by the taxpayer in preparing for and conducting all
proceedings related to the matter in the dispute.

--- END ---