BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) A sufficient and
reliable supply of energy is critically important to the health and welfare of
the citizens of the state and to the prosperity of the state and region;

(b) The cyclical nature
of wholesale markets has affected the ability of independent energy producers
to forecast long-term prices sufficient to ensure recovery of their
investments. Low wholesale prices in the region for nearly a decade have
curtailed the development of generation resources by independent power
producers that could have addressed the region's growing electricity deficit,
which was predicted as early as 1993 and acknowledged in the Washington state
energy strategy. The prospect of potential new regulations over the wholesale
electricity market, and concerns about the ability of utilities and energy
marketers to recover their costs, have further undermined confidence in
financial markets. Without greater regulatory incentives, needed investments
in new resource and system upgrades by electrical companies may not be realized;

(c) Energy supply,
generation, and distribution systems and technologies have changed greatly
since the original enactment of the state's energy facility siting laws thirty
years ago. Experience during this time has demonstrated that a state council
with the primary responsibility for energy facility siting approval is
warranted, but that its procedures and authorities can be improved to enhance
energy supplies;

(d) The state enjoys an
abundance of hydroelectric capacity. Additional generation can be achieved
without increasing the amount of water used and without adversely impacting
fish and wildlife;

(e) Domestic industries
have become innovators in clean, new energy generation, and demand-management
technologies. Those technologies could be marketed internationally to promote
the economic development of the state, and further advance the reputation of
the state as a technological leader; and

(f) The current energy
situation requires that the state undertake economic and policy decisions to
effectuate both short-term and long-term solutions. Actions and incentives by
the state to promote the expansion of generation capacity and the development
and application of clean, new energy technologies would be of great benefit to
the citizens of the state.

(2) The legislature
intends this act to:

(a) Modify the
statutory procedures and authorities of the energy facility siting evaluation
council for a limited time to encourage generators to operate their facilities
to their fullest capacity;

(b) Provide a
regulatory incentive for electrical companies to invest in demand-management
systems, promote distributive generation technologies, upgrade hydroelectric
facilities, increase transmission and distribution efficiencies, and encourage
certain renewable resource projects; and

(c) Offer limited tax
incentives to encourage:

(i) Installation of new
air pollution control equipment at existing peaking plants to decrease certain
toxic emissions and increase overall generation output;

(ii) Upgrades of
existing hydroelectric facilities to increase efficiency and generation
capacity;

(iii) Development of
cogeneration facilities to maximize the efficient use of gas while increasing
electricity supply nearer the load;

(iv) Research,
development, and manufacture of innovative energy technologies and
demand-management technologies; and

(v) Deployment of
demand-management systems.

I. PROMOTING ADDITIONAL GENERATION
CAPACITY

Sec. 101. RCW 80.50.020 and 1995 c
69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter((;)).

(2)
"Application" means any request for approval of a particular site or
sites filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires((;)).

(3) "Person"
means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation,
association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal
corporation, government agency, public utility district, or any other entity,
public or private, however organized((;)).

(4) "Site"
means any proposed or approved location of an energy facility((;)).

(5)
"Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant and
the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines, in effect as
of the date of certification, which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040
as now or hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or concurrent with
the construction or operation of any energy facility((;)).

(6) "Associated
facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or other related and
supporting facilities connecting an energy plant with the existing energy
supply, processing, or distribution system, including, but not limited to,
communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment, instrumentation,
and other types of ancillary transmission equipment, off-line storage or
venting required for efficient operation or safety of the transmission system
and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the
inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and
new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages in excess of
200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest power grid:
PROVIDED, That common carrier railroads or motor vehicles shall not be
included((;)).

(7) "Transmission
facility" means any of the following together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Crude or refined
petroleum or liquid petroleum product transmission pipeline of the following
dimensions: A pipeline larger than six inches minimum inside diameter between
valves for the transmission of these products with a total length of at least
fifteen miles;

(b) Natural gas, synthetic
fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas transmission pipeline of the following
dimensions: A pipeline larger than fourteen inches minimum inside diameter
between valves, for the transmission of these products, with a total length of
at least fifteen miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a distribution
facility, except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by the United
States federal power commission((;)).

(8) "Independent
consultants" means those persons who have no financial interest in the
applicant's proposals and who are retained by the council to evaluate the
applicant's proposals, supporting studies, or to conduct additional studies((;)).

(9) "Thermal power
plant" means, for the purpose of certification, any electrical generating
facility using any fuel, including nuclear materials, for distribution of
electricity by electric utilities((;)).

(10) "Energy
facility" means an energy plant or transmission facilities: PROVIDED,
That the following are excluded from the provisions of this chapter:

(a) Facilities for the
extraction, conversion, transmission or storage of water, other than water
specifically consumed or discharged by energy production or conversion for
energy purposes; and

(b) Facilities operated
by and for the armed services for military purposes or by other federal
authority for the national defense((;)).

(11)
"Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council created
by RCW 80.50.030((;)).

(12) "Counsel for
the environment" means an assistant attorney general or a special
assistant attorney general who shall represent the public in accordance with
RCW 80.50.080((;)).

(13)
"Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding exploratory
work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars((;)).

(14) "Energy
plant" means the following facilities together with their associated
facilities:

(a) Any stationary
thermal power plant with generating capacity of ((two)) three
hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum continuous
electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and pressure, and floating thermal power plants of fifty thousand
kilowatts or more, including associated facilities;

(b) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive liquified natural gas in the equivalent of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per day, which
has been transported over marine waters;

(c) Facilities which
will have the capacity to receive more than an average of fifty thousand
barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum or liquified petroleum gas which
has been or will be transported over marine waters, except that the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such
new facility construction;

(d) Any underground
reservoir for receipt and storage of natural gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010
capable of delivering an average of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day; and

(e) Facilities capable
of processing more than twenty-five thousand barrels per day of petroleum into
refined products((;)).

(15) "Land use
plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element thereof adopted by a
unit of local government pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW((;)).

(16) "Zoning
ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local government regulating the
use of land and adopted pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW or
Article XI of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
102. A new section is added
to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

The council shall
actively seek to implement the intent of this chapter as set forth in RCW 80.50.010
by diligently and expediently facilitating the siting of energy facilities to
meet present and emergent energy supply needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
103. A new section is added
to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

The council may only
develop rules, policies, procedures, guidelines, or operating protocols that
are based directly on, and no more stringent than federal or state statutory or
administrative code authority, and the standards and criteria set forth
therein. A site certification agreement may not require compliance with air
quality, water quality, or health protection measures unless such compliance is
based on and no more stringent than standards adopted into federal or state
statute or administrative code authority.

Sec. 104. RCW 80.50.060 and 1977
ex.s. c 371 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall apply to the construction of energy facilities which
includes the new construction of energy facilities and the reconstruction or
enlargement of existing energy facilities where the net increase in physical
capacity or dimensions resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets
or exceeds those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (((17)))
(14), as now or hereafter amended. No construction of such energy
facilities may be undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
after July 15, 1977, without first obtaining certification in the manner
provided in this chapter.

(2) The provisions
of this chapter apply to the construction of any new energy facility or the
reconstruction or enlargement of any existing energy facility that chooses to
utilize the process established in this chapter, regardless of the generating
capacity of the project.

(3) The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal maintenance and repairs
which do not increase the capacity or dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW
80.50.020 (7) and (((17))) (14), as now or hereafter amended.

(((3))) (4)
Applications for certification of energy facilities made prior to July 15, 1977,
shall continue to be governed by the applicable provisions of law in effect on
the day immediately preceding July 15, 1977, with the exceptions of RCW
80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which shall apply to such prior applications and to
site certifications prospectively from July 15, 1977.

(((4))) (5)
Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed by the council
and shall be supported by such information and technical studies as the council
may require.

Sec. 105. RCW 80.50.100 and 1989 c
175 s 174 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council shall
report to the governor its recommendations as to the approval or rejection of
an application for certification within ((twelve)) six months of
receipt by the council of such an application, or such later time as is
mutually agreed by the council and the applicant. If the council recommends
approval of an application for certification, it shall also submit a draft
certification agreement with the report. The council shall include conditions
in the draft certification agreement to implement the provisions of this
chapter, including, but not limited to, conditions to protect state or local
governmental or community interests affected by the construction or operation
of the energy facility, and conditions designed to recognize the purpose of
laws or ordinances, or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, that are
preempted or superseded pursuant to RCW 80.50.110 as now or hereafter amended.

(2) Within ((sixty))
thirty days of receipt of the council's report the governor shall take
one of the following actions:

(a) Approve the
application and execute the draft certification agreement; or

(b) Reject the
application; or

(c) Direct the council
to reconsider certain aspects of the draft certification agreement.

The council shall
reconsider such aspects of the draft certification agreement by reviewing the
existing record of the application or, as necessary, by reopening the
adjudicative proceeding for the purposes of receiving additional evidence.
Such reconsideration shall be conducted expeditiously. The council shall
resubmit the draft certification to the governor incorporating any amendments
deemed necessary upon reconsideration within ninety days of receipt of such
direction for reconsideration. Within ((sixty)) fifteen days
of receipt of such draft certification agreement, the governor shall either
approve the application and execute the certification agreement or reject the
application. The certification agreement shall be binding upon execution by
the governor and the applicant.

(3) The rejection of an
application for certification by the governor shall be final as to that
application but shall not preclude submission of a subsequent application for
the same site on the basis of changed conditions or new information.

Sec. 106. RCW 80.52.030 and 1995 c
69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set
forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(1) "Public
agency" means a public utility district, joint operating agency, city,
county, or any other state governmental agency, entity, or political
subdivision.

(2) "Major public
energy project" means a nuclear power plant ((or installation
capable, or intended to be capable, of generating electricity in an amount
greater than two hundred fifty megawatts, measured using maximum continuous
electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and pressure. Where two or more such plants are located within the
same geographic site, each plant shall be considered a major public energy
project. An addition to an existing facility is not deemed to be a major
energy project unless the addition itself is capable, or intended to be
capable, of generating electricity in an amount greater than two hundred fifty
megawatts)). A project which is under construction on July 1, 1982, shall
not be considered a major public energy project unless the official agency
budget or estimate for total construction costs for the project as of July 1,
1982, is more than two hundred percent of the first official estimate of total
construction costs as specified in the senate energy and utilities committee
WPPSS inquiry report, volume one, January 12, 1981, and unless, as of July 1,
1982, the projected remaining cost of construction for that project exceeds two
hundred million dollars.

(3) "Cost of
construction" means the total cost of planning and building a major public
energy project and placing it into operation, including, but not limited to,
planning cost, direct construction cost, licensing cost, cost of fuel inventory
for the first year's operation, interest, and all other costs incurred prior to
the first day of full operation, whether or not incurred prior to July 1, 1982.

(4) "Cost of
acquisition" means the total cost of acquiring a major public energy
project from another party, including, but not limited to, principal and
interest costs.

(5) "Bond"
means a revenue bond, a general obligation bond, or any other indebtedness
issued by a public agency or its assignee.

(6)
"Applicant" means a public agency, or the assignee of a public
agency, requesting the secretary of state to conduct an election pursuant to
this chapter.

(7)
"Cost-effective" means that a project or resource is forecast:

(a) To be reliable and
available within the time it is needed; and

(b) To meet or reduce
the electric power demand of the intended consumers at an estimated incremental
system cost no greater than that of the least-cost similarly reliable and
available alternative project or resource, or any combination thereof.

(8) "System
cost" means an estimate of all direct costs of a project or resource over
its effective life, including, if applicable, the costs of distribution to the
consumer, and, among other factors, waste disposal costs, end-of-cycle costs,
and fuel costs (including projected increases), and such quantifiable
environmental costs and benefits as are directly attributable to the project or
resource.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
107. A new section is added
to chapter 80.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Before approving
financing for any large public energy project that is not subject to the voter
approval requirements of this chapter, a public agency must submit to its
governing board a cost-effectiveness study pertaining to the project under
consideration. The study must be prepared by an independent consultant and
must be available for public review and comment for at least thirty days after
submission to the governing board.

(2) At the end of the
thirty-day period, the public agency must conduct a public hearing on the
project under consideration and the cost-effectiveness study. Notice of the
public hearing must provide at least the following information:

(a) The name, location,
and type of large public energy project, expressed in common terms;

(b) The dollar amount
and type of bonds being requested;

(c) If the bond
issuance is intended to finance the acquisition of all or a portion of the
project, the anticipated total cost of the acquisition of the project;

(d) If the bond
issuance is intended to finance the planning or construction of all or a
portion of the project, the anticipated total cost of construction of the
project;

(e) The projected
average rate increase for consumers of the electricity to be generated by the
project. The rate increase must be that which is necessary to repay the total
indebtedness incurred for the project, including estimated interest;

(f) A summary of the
final cost-effectiveness study conducted under subsection (1) of this section;

(g) The anticipated functional
life of the project; and

(h) The anticipated
decommissioning costs of the project.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, a "large public energy project that is not subject to the
voter approval requirements of this chapter" means a nonnuclear plant or
installation capable, or intended to be capable, of generating electricity in
an amount greater than two hundred fifty megawatts, measured using maximum
continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at
average ambient temperature and pressure. Where two or more such plants are
located within the same geographic site, each plant is considered a large
public energy project. An addition to an existing facility is not a large
public energy project unless the addition itself is capable, or intended to be
capable, of generating electricity in an amount greater than two hundred fifty
megawatts.

II. MAXIMIZING EFFICIENT GENERATION
CAPACITY

NEW SECTION. Sec.
201. A new section is added
to chapter 82.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.

(a) "Qualifying
facility" means an air pollution control facility as that term is defined
in RCW 82.34.010(1)(a) to be installed or acquired for a thermal electric
peaking plant and which is approved under the Washington clean air act, chapter
70.94 RCW.

(b) "Thermal
electric peaking plant" means a natural gas‑fired thermal electric
generating facility operated by a light and power business and placed into
service between January 1, 1978, and December 31, 1984, and that is registered
for the calendar year 2000 pursuant to RCW 70.94.151.

(c) "Light and
power business" has the same meaning as that term is defined in RCW
82.16.010.

(2) The department
shall, upon written request of a light and power business to which the approval
issued under chapter 70.94 RCW is attached, make a determination as to whether
a plant is a thermal electric peaking plant acquiring or installing a
qualifying facility eligible under this section. The department shall consult
with the department of community, trade, and economic development and the
department of ecology in making the determination. If the determination is in
the affirmative, the department shall issue the light and power business a
sales and use tax exemption certificate in a form and manner as deemed
appropriate by the department.

(3) The charges for
installation or acquisition of a qualifying facility by the holder of the
certificate are exempt from sales tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW and use
tax imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW. The purchaser must provide the seller
with a copy of the sales and use tax exemption certificate. The seller shall
retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(4) The exemption in
this section is limited to the installation or acquisition of a qualifying
facility and does not apply to servicing, maintenance, operation, or repairs of
a thermal electric peaking plant or of an air pollution control facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
202. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) Sales of tangible
personal property to an electric utility for improving the output or efficiency
of hydroelectric generating facilities in existence on the effective date of
this section; or

(b) Sales of or charges
made for labor and services performed in respect to improving the output or
efficiency of hydroelectric generating facilities in existence on the effective
date of this section.

(2) The following
definitions apply to this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(a) "Electric
utility" has the same meaning as provided under RCW 19.29A.010.

(b) "Hydroelectric
generating facilities" means any machinery, equipment, structure,
property, property improvement, or accessory installed, built, or acquired for
the purpose of producing or generating electrical energy from falling water.

(3) The purchaser must
provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate
for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
203. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use of tangible personal property by an
electric utility for improving the output or efficiency of hydroelectric
generating facilities in existence on the effective date of this section.

(2) The following
definitions apply to this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Electric
utility" has the same meaning as provided under RCW 19.29A.010.

(b) "Hydroelectric
generating facilities" means any machinery, equipment, structure,
property, property improvement, or accessory installed, built, or acquired for
the purpose of producing or generating electrical energy from falling water.

(3) The purchaser must
provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate
for the seller's files.

Sec. 204. RCW 82.16.055 and 1980 c
149 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax
under this chapter there shall be deducted from the gross income:

(a) An amount equal to
the cost of production at the plant for consumption within the state of
Washington of:

(i) Electrical energy
produced or generated from cogeneration as defined in RCW 82.35.020; and

(ii) Electrical energy
or gas produced or generated from renewable energy resources such as solar
energy, wind energy, hydroelectric energy, geothermal energy, wood, wood
wastes, municipal wastes, agricultural products and wastes, and end-use waste
heat; and

(b) Those amounts
expended to improve consumers' efficiency of energy end use or to otherwise
reduce the use of electrical energy or gas by the consumer.

(2) This section
applies ((only)) to new facilities for the production or generation of
energy from cogeneration or renewable energy resources or measures to improve
the efficiency of energy end use on which construction or installation is begun
after June 12, 1980, and before January 1, 1990.

(3)(a) In addition,
this section applies to new or expanded cogeneration from a facility on which
construction or installation is begun after June 30, 2001, and before January
1, 2011.

(b) For purposes of
this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i)
"Cogeneration facility" means any machinery, equipment, structure,
process, or property, or any part thereof, installed or acquired by a person or
corporation for the purpose of the sequential generation, in either order, of
electrical energy and useful thermal energy, such as heat or steam, from the
same primary energy source or fuel in which the useful thermal energy is used:

(A) For a
manufacturing process;

(B) To improve the
operating efficiency of a facility that produces electrical energy through
biomass generation as defined in RCW 19.29A.010; or

(C) In space heating
or cooling.

(ii) "Expanded
cogeneration" means the amount of electrical energy produced for sale at a
facility that exceeds the amount of electrical energy sold on an average annual
basis in the three years prior to June 30, 2001.

(c) This subsection
does not apply to:

(i) A cogeneration
facility fueled by diesel; or

(ii) A cogeneration
facility that has a combined fuel conversion efficiency of less than sixty
percent, unless the cogeneration facility is used to improve the operating
efficiency of a facility that produces electrical energy through biomass
generation as defined in RCW 19.29A.010, in which case this subsection shall
apply unless the cogeneration facility has a combined fuel conversion
efficiency of less than forty percent.

(d) By August 25th
of each fiscal year in which a taxpayer intends to claim the deduction under
this subsection, the taxpayer shall file with the department, on a form and in
a manner prescribed by the department, the following information concerning
production at the cogeneration facility during the previous twelve months:

(i) The amount of
fuel consumed;

(ii) The energy
content of the fuel measured in British thermal units per unit of fuel;

(iii) The amount of
electricity produced measured in kilowatt hours;

(iv) The gallons of
hot water or pounds of steam produced;

(v) The temperature
of the hot water, or temperature and pressure of the steam, produced; and

(vi) The temperature
of the hot water or condensate returned to the boiler.

(e) The department
may disclose information received under (d)(i) through (vi) of this subsection
to energy policy staff of the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the Washington State University cooperative extension solely for
the purpose of determining a taxpayer's eligibility for a deduction under this
subsection. In addition, prior to the time a cogeneration facility has
operated for a full fiscal year, the department may require such information
that it finds necessary to determining a taxpayer's eligibility under this
subsection, and may disclose the information received to energy policy staff of
the department of community, trade, and economic development or the Washington
State University cooperative extension solely for the purpose of determining
the taxpayer's eligibility for a deduction under this subsection.

(4) Deductions
under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be allowed for a period not to
exceed thirty years after the project is placed in operation.

(((4))) (5)
Measures or projects encouraged under this section shall at the time they are
placed in service be reasonably expected to save, produce, or generate energy
at a total incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end use
which is less than or equal to the incremental system cost per unit of energy
delivered to end use from similarly available conventional energy resources
which utilize nuclear energy or fossil fuels and which the gas or electric
utility could acquire to meet energy demand in the same time period.

(((5))) (6)
The department of revenue, after consultation with the utilities and
transportation commission in the case of investor-owned utilities and the
governing bodies of locally regulated utilities, shall determine the
eligibility of individual projects and measures for deductions under this
section.

III. PROMOTING
NEW CLEAN TECHNOLOGIES FOR ENERGY

PRODUCTION AND DEMAND MANAGEMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec.
301. A new section is added
to chapter 19.29A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January
1, 2002, each electric utility must provide to its retail electricity customers
a voluntary option to purchase qualified renewable energy resources in
accordance with this section.

(2) Each electric
utility must include on its retail electric customer's regular billing
statements a voluntary option to purchase qualified renewable energy
resources. The option may allow customers to purchase qualified renewable
energy resources at fixed or variable rates and for fixed or variable periods
of time. A utility may provide qualified renewable energy resource options
through either: (a) Resources it owns or contracts for; or (b) the purchase of
credits issued by a clearinghouse or other system by which the utility may
secure, for trade or other consideration, verifiable evidence that a second
party has developed a qualified renewable energy resource and that the second
party agrees to transfer such evidence exclusively to the credit of the
utility.

(3) For the purposes of
this section, a "qualified renewable energy resource" means the
electricity produced from generation facilities initiating operations after
January 1, 2001, that are fueled by: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c)
geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; (f) gas produced
during the treatment of wastewater; (g) environmentally qualified hydropower,
as defined in RCW 82.08.02567; (h) fuel cells, as defined in RCW 82.08.02567;
or (i) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field
residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol,
or copper‑chrome‑arsenic.

(4) The rates, terms,
conditions, and customer notification of each utility's option or options
offered in accordance with this section must be approved by the governing body
of the consumer-owned utility or by the commission for investor-owned
utilities.

(5) Each consumer-owned
utility must report to the department and each investor-owned utility must
report annually to the commission beginning October 1, 2002, until October 1,
2012, describing the option or options it is offering its customers under the
requirements of this section, the rate of customer participation, the amount of
qualified renewable energy resources purchased by customers, and the amount of
utility investments in qualified renewable energy resources. The department
and the commission together shall report annually to the legislature, beginning
December 1, 2002, until December 1, 2012, with the results of the utility
reports.

Sec. 302. RCW 19.29A.040 and 1998
c 300 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of RCW
19.29A.020, 19.29A.030, ((and)) section 5, chapter 300, Laws of 1998,
and section 301 of this act do not apply to a small utility. However,
nothing in this section prohibits the governing body of a small utility from
determining the utility should comply with any or all of the provisions of RCW
19.29A.020, 19.29A.030, ((and)) section 5, chapter 300, Laws of 1998, and
section 301 of this act, which governing bodies are encouraged to do.

Sec. 303. RCW 82.08.02567 and 1999
c 358 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of machinery and equipment used directly
in generating electricity using fuel cells, environmentally qualified
hydropower, wind, sun, or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or
to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such machinery and equipment, but only if the purchaser develops
with such machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than two hundred ((kilowatts)) watts of electricity and
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department ((by rule)). The seller shall retain a
copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2) For purposes of
this section and RCW 82.12.02567:

(a) "Landfill
gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for federal tax credits
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill. "Landfill" means
a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;

(b) "Machinery and
equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices, and support facilities that
are integral and necessary to the generation of electricity using wind, sun, environmentally
qualified hydropower, or landfill gas as the principal source of power;

(c) "Machinery and
equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered tools; (ii) property with a
useful life of less than one year; (iii) repair parts required to restore
machinery and equipment to normal working order; (iv) replacement parts that do
not increase productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that are not
integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are permanently
affixed to and become a physical part of a building;

(d) Machinery and
equipment is "used directly" in generating electricity with fuel
cells or by wind energy, environmentally qualified hydropower, solar
energy, or landfill gas power if it provides any part of the process
that captures the energy of the wind, sun, or landfill gas, converts that
energy to electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that
electricity for entry into or operation with electric transmission and
distribution systems;

(e) "Fuel
cell" means a technology involving an electrochemical reaction that
generates electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst;

(f)
"Environmentally qualified hydropower" means (i) the additional
energy produced by existing hydropower facilities that have been modernized or
upgraded after June 1, 1998, to increase capacity or efficiency; or (ii) energy
produced by run-of-the-river or run-of-the-canal hydropower facilities that are
not responsible for obstructing the passage of anadromous fish.

(3) This section
expires June 30, ((2005)) 2009.

Sec. 304. RCW 82.12.02567 and 1999
c 358 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply with respect to machinery and equipment used
directly in generating not less than two hundred ((kilowatts)) watts
of electricity using wind, sun, or landfill gas as the principal source of
power.

(2) The definitions in
RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.

(3) This section
expires June 30, ((2005)) 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
305. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of smart metering technology purchased after
July 1, 2003, by an electric utility as defined in RCW 80.60.010, up to a
selling price of fifty dollars per utility customer to be served by the technology.
For the purposes of this section, "smart metering technology" means
equipment, including specialized meters, that provide two‑way electronic
communication between the utility and a residential customer's electric meter
or electric appliances, and that will enable the utility to charge different
rates during different times of the day to encourage a shifting of residential
customers' demand in order to minimize peak demand. By December 1, 2001, the
utilities and transportation commission shall provide information to the
department and to the electric utility in regard to how many residential
customers are being served by smart metering technology on June 30, 2001, and
how many additional residential customers will be served by application of the
smart metering technology after July 1, 2001.

This section expires
June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
306. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not
apply in respect to smart metering technology purchased after July 1, 2003, by
an electric utility as defined in RCW 80.60.010, up to a selling price of fifty
dollars per utility customer to be served by the technology. For the purposes
of this section, "smart metering technology" means equipment,
including specialized meters, that provide two‑way electronic
communication between the utility and a residential customer's electric meter
or electric appliances, and that will enable the utility to charge different
rates during different times of the day to encourage a shifting of residential
customers' demand in order to minimize peak demand.

This section expires
June 30, 2007.

IV. MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec.
401. Part headings used in
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
402. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---