BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that any rights political parties have in the choosing of candidates
is implicit in the sovereign citizens' expressed choice. The legislature
further finds that the citizens of Washington are satisfied with the blanket
primary election system and reject any attack on that system by political
parties, courts, legislators, or administrators. Washington's blanket primary
election system is hereby reenacted and affirmed.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.18.200 and 1990 c
59 s 88 are each reenacted to read as follows:

Except as provided
otherwise in chapter 29.19 RCW, all properly registered voters may vote for
their choice at any primary held under this title, for any candidate for each
office, regardless of political affiliation and without a declaration of
political faith or adherence on the part of the voter.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.30.005 and 1990 c
59 s 93 are each reenacted to read as follows:

Except for the candidates
for the positions of president and vice-president or for a partisan or
nonpartisan office for which no primary is required, the names of all
candidates who have filed for nomination under chapter 29.18 RCW and those
independent candidates and candidates of minor political parties who have been
nominated under chapter 29.24 RCW shall appear on the appropriate ballot at the
primary throughout the jurisdiction in which they are to be nominated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The secretary of state
shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance
with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

---
END ---