BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 89.08 RCW to read as follows:

The state conservation
commission must provide grants to conservation districts to assist the
agricultural community to implement water conservation measures and irrigation
efficiencies in the sixteen water resource inventory areas identified by the
governor's salmon recovery office where more water has been allocated than is
naturally available for at least part of the year and in which one or more fish
stocks are listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered
species act.

In consultation with
the department of ecology, a conservation district receiving funds must manage
each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water
conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed in the trust water
rights program under chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW, to enhance instream flow, in
the following manner:

(1) The portion of
saved water placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the
percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation
efficiency; and

(2) The saved water
placed in the trust water rights program must remain in the program for one
year for every five percent of public investment in the conservation measure or
irrigation efficiency.

In awarding the grants,
a conservation district must give first priority to family farms as defined in
RCW 90.66.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. By February 1, 2003, the
state conservation commission must submit a progress report to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature concerning: (1) The amount of public
funds expended under section 1 of this act; (2) the location and amount of
water placed in the trust water rights program under section 1 of this act; and
(3) the methods used by conservation districts to ensure a portion of the water
saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency actually
enhanced instream flows.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The sum of eight million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2001, from the emergency reserve fund to the state
conservation commission for the purposes of section 1 of this act. Moneys that
are not expended from this appropriation by June 30, 2001, are reappropriated
for expenditure in fiscal years 2002 and 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The sum of seven million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to the department of ecology.
The appropriation in this section is provided solely to lease water rights to
be placed in the trust water rights program under chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW
and to purchase water use metering equipment and stream flow monitoring equipment.
The department of ecology must allocate eighty percent of the appropriation for
the purchase of trust water rights. Any moneys remaining unexpended from the
appropriation in this section on June 30, 2001, are reappropriated for
expenditures in fiscal years 2002 and 2003.

---
END ---