BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

_5 Sec. 1. RCW
47.60.326 and 1999 c 94 s 27 are each amended to read

_6 as follows:

_7 (1) In order to maintain an adequate, fair, and
economically

_8 sound schedule of charges for the transportation of
passengers,

_9 vehicles, and commodities on the Washington state
ferries, the

10 department of transportation each year shall conduct a
full review

11 of such charges.

12 (2) Prior to February 1st of each odd-numbered year
the

13 department shall transmit to the transportation
commission a

14 report of its review together with its recommendations
for the

15 revision of a schedule of charges for the ensuing
biennium. The

16 commission on or before July 1st of that year shall
adopt as a

17 rule, in the manner provided by the Washington administrative

18 procedure act, a schedule of charges for the Washington
state

p. 1 SB
6181

_1 ferries for the ensuing biennium commencing July 1st.
The schedule

_2 may initially be adopted as an emergency rule if
necessary to take

_3 effect on, or as near as possible to, July 1st.

_4 (3) The department in making its review and
formulating

_5 recommendations and the commission in adopting a
schedule of

_6 charges may consider any of the following factors:

_7 (a) The amount of subsidy available to the ferry
system for

_8 maintenance and operation;

_9 (b) The time and distance of ferry runs;

10 (c) The maintenance and operation costs for ferry
runs with a

11 proper adjustment for higher costs of operating outmoded
or less

12 efficient equipment;

13 (d) The efficient distribution of traffic between
cross-sound

14 routes;

15 (e) The desirability of reasonable commutation rates
for

16 persons using the ferry system to commute daily to work;

17 (f) The effect of proposed fares in increasing
walk-on and

18 vehicular passenger use;

19 (g) The effect of proposed fares in promoting all
types of

20 ferry use during nonpeak periods;

21 (h) Such other factors as prudent managers of a
major ferry

22 system would consider.

23 (4) If at any time during the biennium it appears
that

24 projected revenues from the Puget Sound ferry operations
account

25 and any other operating subsidy available to the
Washington state

26 ferries will be less than the projected total cost of
maintenance

27 and operation of the Washington state ferries for the
biennium,

28 the department shall forthwith undertake a review of its
schedule

29 of charges to ascertain whether or not the schedule of
charges

30 should be revised. The department shall, upon
completion of its

31 review report, submit its recommendation to the
transportation

32 commission which may in its sound discretion revise the
schedule

33 of charges as required to meet necessary maintenance and
operation

34 expenditures of the ferry system for the biennium or may
defer

35 action until the regular annual review and revision of
ferry

36 charges as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

37 (5) The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to
public

SB 6181 p. 2

_1 participation shall apply to the process of revising
ferry tolls

_2 under this section.

_3 (6) Under RCW 43.135.055, the transportation
commission may

_4 increase ferry tolls included in the schedule of
charges adopted

_5 under this section by a percentage that exceeds the
fiscal growth

_6 factor.

_7 NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary
for the immediate

_8 preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of

_9 the state government and its existing public
institutions, and

10 takes effect immediately.

‑‑‑ END ‑‑‑

p. 3 SB
6181