BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. It is the intent of the
legislature to create a primary for all elected offices, other than president
and vice president, that:

(1) Allows all voters,
including independents and those unaffiliated with a political party, to
participate;

(2) Preserves the
privacy of voters' ballot selection and party affiliation, if any;

(3) Rejects mandatory
voter registration by political party;

(4) Protects ballot
access for minor political parties and independent candidates;

(5) Maintains the right
of any candidate to self-identify with any major political party; and

(6) Upholds a political
party's First Amendment right of association.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.01.090 and 1977
ex.s. c 329 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Major
political party" means a political party of which at least one nominee for
president, vice president, United States senator, or a statewide office
received at least five percent of the total vote cast at the last preceding
state general election in an even-numbered year((: PROVIDED, That any
political party qualifying as a major political party under the previous
subsection (2) or subsection (3) of this section prior to its 1977 amendment
shall retain such status until after the next state general election following
June 30, 1977)).

(2) A political
party that has not achieved major political party status before the November
2000 general election must indicate by party rule filed with the secretary of
state that the party accepts its status as a major political party. If such a
rule is not filed with the secretary of state within sixty days of attaining
major party status under this section or within sixty days of the effective
date of this act, the party remains a minor party under RCW 29.01.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.01 RCW to read as follows:

"Standard
ballot" is a primary ballot that includes the name of each candidate for
any office for which a primary is being conducted and each ballot measure. If
a major political party requests the use of a party ballot, the names of
candidates who have indicated an affiliation with that major party on their
declaration of candidacy filed under RCW 29.15.010 may not appear on the
standard ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 29.01 RCW to read as follows:

"Party
ballot" is a major political party's primary ballot that includes only:

(1) The names of
candidates for partisan office who have indicated affiliation with that major
party in filing a declaration of candidacy under RCW 29.15.010, or have been
nominated by that major party's state or county central committee to fill a
vacancy under section 15 or 16 of this act;

(2) The names of each
candidate for every nonpartisan office appearing on the ballot; and

(3) All ballot measures
appearing on the ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 29.07 RCW to read as follows:

Under no circumstances
may an individual be required to join, affiliate with, adhere to, express faith
in, or declare a preference for a political party or organization upon
registering to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. Candidates for all
elected offices, except for president and vice president, precinct committee
officer, and offices exempted from the primary under RCW 29.15.150 or
29.21.015, will be nominated at primaries held under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. So far as applicable, the
provisions of this title relating to conducting general elections govern the
conduct of primaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. (1) For each primary, the
county auditor shall prepare a standard ballot.

(2) For each primary in
which a major party has, by party rule adopted under section 11 of this act,
requested a party ballot, the county auditor shall prepare the party ballot.
However, in any given precinct in which no candidate from a major political
party has filed or been nominated to fill a vacancy for any office, the
jurisdiction of which includes the precinct, then no ballot for that major
political party need be printed and made available to voters residing in the
precinct.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. When casting a ballot in
a primary, a voter must be allowed to select, in private, either a party ballot
or a standard ballot, but a party ballot need be made available only if the
party requested one and the name of at least one candidate affiliated with the
major political party appears on the ballot. Each voter is limited to casting
only one ballot. If more than one ballot is submitted by a voter, then each
ballot is disqualified, except that if one of the ballots is a special ballot,
then the county auditor retains the right to consider whether disqualification
of either ballot is appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Voters must be afforded
privacy when selecting between each of the party ballots and the standard
ballot. No record may be created or maintained by a state or local
governmental agency or political organization of an individual voter's choice
of ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. (1) A major political
party may request, by party rule adopted under this chapter, that a primary
party ballot containing only the names of candidates of that party be prepared.

(2) A major political
party shall give written notification of the adoption and current status of the
rule adopted under subsection (1) of this section to the secretary of state by
July 1st of each year.

(3) If a major
political party adopts an appropriate rule under subsection (1) of this
section, then the party's nominee will be determined by tabulating votes cast
by party ballot only.

(4) The decision by a
major political party to accept only ballots cast by party ballot does not
affect the right of any other political party to accept votes cast by standard
ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Prominent notification
regarding whether or not a major political party has requested a party ballot
for use in the primary must be made on:

(1) The standard
ballot;

(2) A voters' pamphlet
prepared under chapter 29.81A RCW;

(3) The web site of the
office of the secretary of state;

(4) Each county
auditors' web site if a web site is in existence; and

(5) The local voters'
pamphlet of candidates for office if the legislative authority of a county or
first-class or code city provides for the inclusion of partisan candidates in
the local voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. The secretary of state as
chief election officer shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to facilitate
the operation, accomplishment, and purpose of this chapter. Rules adopted
under this chapter that establish standards for the layout, design, production,
preparation, distribution, receipt, handling, tabulation, canvassing,
recounting, and storage of ballots must account for and protect each voter's
right to privacy regarding ballot choice and candidate selection.

Sec. 14. RCW 29.04.180 and 1999 c
157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who desires
to be a write-in candidate and have such votes counted at a primary or election
may, if the jurisdiction of the office sought is entirely within one county,
file a declaration of candidacy with the county auditor not later than the day
before the primary or election. If the jurisdiction of the office sought
encompasses more than one county the declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the secretary of state not later than the day before the primary or
election. Declarations of candidacy for write-in candidates must be
accompanied by a filing fee in the same manner as required of other candidates
filing for the office as provided in RCW 29.15.050.

Votes cast for write-in
candidates who have filed such declarations of candidacy and write-in votes for
persons appointed by political parties ((pursuant to RCW 29.18.160)) under
section 16 of this act need only specify the name of the candidate in the
appropriate location on the ballot in order to be counted. Write-in votes cast
for any other candidate, in order to be counted, must designate the office
sought and position number or political party, if applicable. In order for
write-in votes to be valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense
ballot systems the voter must complete the proper mark next to the write-in
line for that office.

No person may file as a
write-in candidate where:

(1) At a general
election, the person attempting to file either filed as a write-in candidate
for the same office at the preceding primary or the person's name appeared on
the ballot for the same office at the preceding primary;

(2) The person
attempting to file as a write-in candidate has already filed a valid write-in declaration
for that primary or election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for
the office of precinct committeeperson;

(3) The name of the
person attempting to file already appears on the ballot as a candidate for
another office, unless one of the two offices for which he or she is a
candidate is precinct committeeperson.

The declaration of
candidacy shall be similar to that required by RCW 29.15.010. No write-in
candidate filing under ((RCW 29.04.180)) this section may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter ((29.80)) 29.81
RCW unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29.81A RCW may provide, by
ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such pamphlets.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. A new section is added
to chapter 29.15 RCW to read as follows:

If a place on the
ticket of a major political party is vacant because no person has filed for
nomination as the candidate of that major political party after the last day
allowed for candidates to withdraw under RCW 29.15.120, and if the vacancy is
for a state or county office to be voted on solely by the electors of a single
county, the county central committee of the major political party may select
and certify a candidate to fill the vacancy. If the vacancy is for any other
office, the state central committee of the major political party may select and
certify a candidate to fill the vacancy. The certificate must set forth the
cause of the vacancy, the name of the person nominated, the office for which
nominated, and other pertinent information required in an ordinary certificate
of nomination and be filed in the proper office no later than the first Friday
after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, together with the
candidate's fee applicable to that office and a declaration of candidacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. A new section is added
to chapter 29.15 RCW to read as follows:

A vacancy caused by the
death or disqualification of a candidate or nominee of a major or minor
political party may be filled at any time up to and including the day before
the election for that position. For state partisan offices in a political
subdivision voted on solely by electors of a single county, the county central
committee in the case of a major political party or the state central committee
or comparable governing body in the case of a minor political party shall
appoint a person to fill the vacancy. For other partisan offices, including
federal or statewide offices, the state central committee or comparable
governing body of the appropriate political party shall appoint a person to
fill the vacancy.

If the vacancy occurs
no later than the third Tuesday before the primary or general election
concerned and the ballots and voting machine labels have been printed, the
appropriate election officers shall correct the ballots and labels. In making
the correction, it is not necessary to reprint complete ballots if any other
less expensive technique can be used and the resulting correction is reasonably
clear.

If the vacancy occurs
after the third Tuesday before the primary or general election and time does
not exist in which to correct paper ballots (including absentee ballots) or
voting machine labels, either in total or in part, then the votes cast or
recorded for the person who has died or become disqualified must be counted for
the person who has been named to fill the vacancy.

When the secretary of
state is the person with whom the appointment by the major or minor political
party is filed, the secretary of state shall, in certifying candidates or
nominations to the various county officers, insert the name of the person
appointed to fill a vacancy.

If the secretary of
state has already sent forth the certificate when the appointment to fill a
vacancy is filed, the secretary of state shall immediately certify to the
county auditors of the proper counties the name and place of residence of the
person appointed to fill a vacancy, the office for which the person is a
candidate or nominee, the party represented, and all other pertinent facts
pertaining to the vacancy.

Sec. 17. RCW 29.24.070 and 1990 c
59 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

Not later than the
Friday immediately preceding the first day for candidates to file, the
secretary of state shall notify the county auditors of the names and designations
of all minor party and independent candidates who have filed valid convention
certificates and nominating petitions with that office. Except for the offices
of president and vice president, persons nominated under this chapter shall
file declarations of candidacy as provided by RCW 29.15.010 and 29.15.030. The
name of a candidate nominated at a convention shall not be printed upon the ((primary))
ballot at a primary unless ((he)) the candidate pays the
fee required by law to be paid by candidates for the same office to be
nominated at a primary.

Sec. 18. RCW 29.27.020 and 1990 c
59 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

On or before the day
following the last day for political parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as
provided by ((RCW 29.18.150)) section 15 of this act, the
secretary of state shall certify to each county auditor a list of the
candidates who have filed declarations of candidacy in his or her office for
the primary. For each office, the certificate shall include the name of each
candidate, his or her address, and his or her party designation, if any.

Sec. 19. RCW 29.27.030 and 1965 c
9 s 29.27.030 are each amended to read as follows:

Not more than ten nor
less than three days prior to the primary election the county auditor shall
publish notice of such primary in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the county. Said notice shall contain the proper party designations,
the names and addresses of all persons who have filed a declaration of
candidacy to be voted upon at that primary election, the request, if any, by
a major political party that a party ballot be prepared and used for the
primary, the hours during which the polls will be open, and that the
election will be held in the regular polling place in each precinct, giving the
address of each polling place((: PROVIDED, That)). The names of
all candidates for nonpartisan offices shall be published separately with
designation of the offices for which they are candidates but without party
designation. This shall be the only notice required for the holding of any
primary election.

Sec. 20. RCW 29.30.005 and 1990 c
59 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for the
candidates for the positions of president and vice president or for ((a
partisan or nonpartisan)) an office for which no primary is
required, the names of all candidates who have filed for ((nomination under
chapter 29.18 RCW and those independent candidates and candidates of minor
political parties who have been nominated under chapter 29.24 RCW shall)) office
under chapter 29.15 RCW must appear on the appropriate ballot at the
primary throughout the jurisdiction in which they are to be nominated.

Sec. 21. RCW 29.30.095 and 1990 c
59 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The name of
a candidate for a partisan office for which a primary was conducted shall not
be printed on the ballot for that office at the subsequent general election
unless the candidate receives a number of votes equal to at least one percent
of the total number cast for all candidates for that position sought and a
plurality of the votes cast for the candidates of his or her party for that
office at the preceding primary on the standard ballot.

(2) If a major
political party has requested a party ballot, the name of a major political
party candidate for which a primary was conducted may not appear on the ballot
for that office at the subsequent general election unless the candidate
receives a number of votes equal to at least one percent of the total number
cast for all candidates for that position sought and a plurality of the votes
cast for the candidates of his or her party for that office at the preceding
primary on the party ballot.

Sec. 22. RCW 29.30.101 and 1999 c
298 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The names of the
persons certified as nominees by the secretary of state or the county
canvassing board shall be printed on the ballot at the ensuing election.

No name of any
candidate whose nomination at a primary is required by law shall be placed upon
the ballot at a general or special election unless it appears upon the
certificate of either (1) the secretary of state, or (2) the county canvassing
board, or (3) a minor party convention or the state or county central committee
of a major political party to fill a vacancy on its ticket under ((RCW
29.18.160)) section 16 of this act.

Excluding the office of
precinct committee officer or a temporary elected position such as a charter
review board member or freeholder, a candidate's name shall not appear more
than once upon a ballot for a position regularly nominated or elected at the
same election.

Sec. 23. RCW 29.42.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 329 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Each political party
organization ((shall have the power to)) may:

(1) Make its own rules
and regulations;

(2) Call conventions;

(3) Elect delegates to
conventions, state and national;

(4) Fill vacancies on
the ticket;

(5) Provide for the
nomination of presidential electors; and

(6)
Perform all functions inherent in such an organization((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, only major political parties ((shall have the power to)) may
designate candidates to appear on the state primary election ballot as provided
in ((RCW 29.18.150 as now or hereafter amended)) section 15 of this
act.

Sec. 24. RCW 29.42.050 and 1991 c
363 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The statutory
requirements for filing as a candidate at the primaries shall apply to
candidates for precinct committee officer except that the filing period for
this office alone shall be extended to and include the Friday immediately
following the last day for political parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as
provided by ((RCW 29.18.150)) section 15 of this act, and the
office shall not be voted upon at the primaries, but the names of all
candidates must appear under the proper party and office designations on the
ballot for the general November election for each even-numbered year and the
one receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected: PROVIDED,
That to be declared elected, a candidate must receive at least ten percent of
the number of votes cast for the candidate of the candidate's party receiving
the greatest number of votes in the precinct. Any person elected to the office
of precinct committee officer who has not filed a declaration of candidacy
shall pay the fee of one dollar to the county auditor for a certificate of
election. The term of office of precinct committee officer shall be for two
years, commencing upon completion of the official canvass of votes by the
county canvassing board of election returns. Should any vacancy occur in this
office by reason of death, resignation, or disqualification of the incumbent,
or because of failure to elect, the respective county chair of the county
central committee shall be empowered to fill such vacancy by appointment:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in legislative districts having a majority of its
precincts in a county with a population of one million or more, such
appointment shall be made only upon the recommendation of the legislative
district chair: PROVIDED, That the person so appointed shall have the same
qualifications as candidates when filing for election to such office for such
precinct: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when a vacancy in the office of precinct
committee officer exists because of failure to elect at a state general election,
such vacancy shall not be filled until after the organization meeting of the
county central committee and the new county chair selected as provided by RCW
29.42.030.

Sec. 25. RCW 42.17.020 and 1995 c
397 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Agency"
includes all state agencies and all local agencies. "State agency"
includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission,
or other state agency. "Local agency" includes every county, city,
town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose
district, or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or
agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(2) "Authorized
committee" means the political committee authorized by a candidate, or by
the public official against whom recall charges have been filed, to accept
contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public
official.

(3) "Ballot
proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW 29.01.110, or
any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition proposed to be submitted to
the voters of the state or any municipal corporation, political subdivision, or
other voting constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that constituency
prior to its circulation for signatures.

(4) "Benefit"
means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary advantage, or
the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary
disadvantage.

(5) "Bona fide
political party" means:

(a) An organization
that has filed a valid certificate of nomination with the secretary of state
under chapter 29.24 RCW;

(b) The governing body
of the state organization of a major political party, as defined in RCW
29.01.090, that is the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to
exercise authority on behalf of the state party; or

(c) The county central
committee or legislative district committee of a major political party. There
may be only one legislative district committee for each party in each
legislative district.

(6)
"Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or political
committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.

(7)
"Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW 42.17.050, to
perform the duties specified in that section.

(8)
"Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for election or
election to public office. An individual seeks nomination or election when he
or she first:

(a) Receives
contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities with intent
to promote his or her candidacy for office;

(b) Announces publicly
or files for office;

(c) Purchases
commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote his or her candidacy;
or

(d) Gives his or her
consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual any of the
actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.

(9) "Caucus
political committee" means a political committee organized and maintained
by the members of a major political party in the state senate or state house of
representatives.

(10) "Commercial
advertiser" means any person who sells the service of communicating
messages or producing printed material for broadcast or distribution to the
general public or segments of the general public whether through the use of
newspapers, magazines, television and radio stations, billboard companies,
direct mail advertising companies, printing companies, or otherwise.

(11)
"Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.

(12)
"Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services of any
kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17.241, the
term "compensation" shall not include per diem allowances or other
payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official business of the
governmental entity.

(13) "Continuing
political committee" means a political committee that is an organization
of continuing existence not established in anticipation of any particular
election campaign.

(14)(a) "Contribution"
includes:

(i) A loan, gift,
deposit, subscription, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge,
payment, transfer of funds between political committees, or anything of value,
including personal and professional services for less than full consideration;

(ii) An expenditure
made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate, a political committee, or their agents;

(iii) The financing by
a person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in
part, of broadcast, written, graphic, or other form of political advertising
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized agent;

(iv) Sums paid for
tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners and parties, except for the
actual cost of the consumables furnished at the event.

(b)
"Contribution" does not include:

(i) Standard interest
on money deposited in a political committee's account;

(ii) Ordinary home
hospitality;

(iii) A contribution
received by a candidate or political committee that is returned to the
contributor within five business days of the date on which it is received by
the candidate or political committee;

(iv) A news item,
feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is
of primary interest to the general public, that is in a news medium controlled
by a person whose business is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a
candidate or a political committee;

(v) An internal
political communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to
a political party organization or political committee, or to the officers,
management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to
the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;

(vi) The rendering of
personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers,
or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in
excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer
services," for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for
which the individual is not compensated by any person;

(vii) Messages in the
form of reader boards, banners, or yard or window signs displayed on a person's
own property or property occupied by a person. However, a facility used for
such political advertising for which a rental charge is normally made must be
reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable
contribution limit of the person providing the facility;

(viii) Legal or
accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:

(A) A political party
or caucus political committee if the person paying for the services is the
regular employer of the person rendering such services; or

(B) A candidate or an
authorized committee if the person paying for the services is the regular
employer of the individual rendering the services and if the services are
solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with state election or public
disclosure laws.

(c) Contributions other
than money or its equivalent are deemed to have a monetary value equivalent to
the fair market value of the contribution. Services or property or rights
furnished at less than their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any
candidate or political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a
contribution must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market
value and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.

(15) "Elected
official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any
public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.

(16)
"Election" includes any primary, general, or special election for
public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is submitted to
the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the qualifications for voting
include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1
(Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be
considered an election for purposes of this chapter.

(17) "Election
campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition to a candidate
for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or in opposition
to, a ballot proposition.

(18) "Election
cycle" means the period beginning on the first day of December after the
date of the last previous general election for the office that the candidate
seeks and ending on November 30th after the next election for the office. In
the case of a special election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election
cycle" means the period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending
on November 30th after the special election.

(19)
"Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value,
and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally
enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for
the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or
candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For
the purposes of this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and
promises to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment
is made. The term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or
complete repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.

(20) "Final
report" means the report described as a final report in RCW 42.17.080(2).

(21) "General
election" means the election that results in the election of a person to a
state office. It does not include a primary.

(22) "Gift,"
is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.

(23) "Immediate
family" includes the spouse, dependent children, and other dependent
relatives, if living in the household. For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640
through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse,
and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother,
half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the spouse of any
such person and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse and the spouse of any such person.

(24) "Independent
expenditure" means an expenditure that has each of the following elements:

(a) It is made in
support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person who is not
(i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an authorized committee of that candidate
for that office, (iii) a person who has received the candidate's encouragement
or approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in
part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the
defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person
with whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other
candidate or candidates for that office;

(b) The expenditure
pays in whole or in part for political advertising that either specifically
names the candidate supported or opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt
identifies the candidate without using the candidate's name; and

(c) The expenditure,
alone or in conjunction with another expenditure or other expenditures of the
same person in support of or opposition to that candidate, has a value of five
hundred dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five
hundred dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative value
is five hundred dollars or more.

(25)(a)
"Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a
candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the
individual's employer, immediate family as defined for purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an association to which the individual belongs.

(b) A treasurer or a
candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee that the
treasurer or candidate serves.

(c) A professional
fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for
fund-raising services at the usual and customary rate.

(d) A volunteer hosting
a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an intermediary for
purposes of that event.

(26)
"Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of the state
legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the subject of action by
either house or any committee of the legislature and all bills and resolutions
that, having passed both houses, are pending approval by the governor.

(27) "Lobby"
and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the passage or
defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, or the
adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative
enactment of any state agency under the state Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes
an association's or other organization's act of communicating with the members
of that association or organization.

(28)
"Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or her own
or another's behalf.

(29) "Lobbyist's
employer" means the person or persons by whom a lobbyist is employed and
all persons by whom he or she is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.

(30) "Person"
includes an individual, partnership, joint venture, public or private
corporation, association, federal, state, or local governmental entity or
agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political committee,
political party, executive committee thereof, or any other organization or
group of persons, however organized.

(31) "Person in
interest" means the person who is the subject of a record or any
representative designated by that person, except that if that person is under a
legal disability, the term "person in interest" means and includes
the parent or duly appointed legal representative.

(32) "Political
advertising" includes any advertising displays, newspaper ads, billboards,
signs, brochures, articles, tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television
presentations, or other means of mass communication, used for the purpose of
appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support
in any election campaign.

(33) "Political
committee" means any person (except a candidate or an individual dealing
with his or her own funds or property) having the expectation of receiving
contributions or making expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any
candidate or any ballot proposition.

(34)
"Primary" for purposes of the limits in RCW 42.17.640 means
the ((procedure for nominating)) election that nominates a
candidate to state office ((under chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other
primary for an election that uses, in large measure, the procedures established
in chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW)).

(35) "Public
office" means any federal, state, county, city, town, school district,
port district, special district, or other state political subdivision elective
office.

(36) "Public
record" includes any writing containing information relating to the
conduct of government or the performance of any governmental or proprietary
function prepared, owned, used, or retained by any state or local agency
regardless of physical form or characteristics. For the office of the
secretary of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, public records means legislative records as defined in RCW
40.14.100 and also means the following: All budget and financial records;
personnel leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated a public
record by any official action of the senate or the house of representatives.

(37) "Recall campaign"
means the period of time beginning on the date of the filing of recall charges
under RCW 29.82.015 and ending thirty days after the recall election.

(38) "State
legislative office" means the office of a member of the state house of
representatives or the office of a member of the state senate.

(39) "State
office" means state legislative office or the office of governor,
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of public instruction,
state auditor, or state treasurer.

(40) "State
official" means a person who holds a state office.

(41) "Surplus
funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or candidate, the
balance of contributions that remain in the possession or control of that
committee or candidate subsequent to the election for which the contributions
were received, and that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining
debts incurred by the committee or candidate prior to that election. In the
case of a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee that are
in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its
final report under RCW 42.17.065.

(42)
"Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating,
photographing, and every other means of recording any form of communication or
representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words, pictures,
sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof, and all papers, maps, magnetic or
paper tapes, photographic films and prints, motion picture, film and video
recordings, magnetic or punched cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound
recordings, and other documents including existing data compilations from which
information may be obtained or translated.

As used in this
chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any gender, the other, as the
context requires.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 29.18.010 (Application of chapter)
and 1990 c 59 s 78 & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.010;

(2) RCW 29.18.120 (General election laws
govern primaries) and 1990 c 59 s 87, 1971 ex.s. c 112 s 1, & 1965 c 9 s
29.18.120;

(3) RCW 29.18.150 (Vacancies on major party
ticket caused by no filing--How filled) and 1990 c 59 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s
12, & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.150;

(4) RCW 29.18.160 (Vacancies by death or
disqualification--How filled--Correcting ballots and labels--Counting votes
already cast) and 2001 c 46 s 4 & 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 13; and

(5) RCW 29.18.200 (Blanket primary
authorized) and 1990 c 59 s 88 & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
27. Sections 1 and 6 through
13 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
28. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 29. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---