BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.30.085 and 1992 c
181 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 29.30.086 and in subsection (2) of this section, on the ballot at the
general election for ((a nonpartisan)) an office for which a
primary was held, only the names of the candidate who received the greatest
number of votes and the candidate who received the next greatest number of
votes for that office shall appear under the title of that office, and the
names shall appear in that order. If a primary was conducted, no candidate's
name may be printed on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she
receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that office at the
preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election for ((any other
nonpartisan)) an office for which no primary was held, the names of
the candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW 29.30.025.

(2) On the ballot at
the general election for the office of justice of the supreme court, judge of
the court of appeals, judge of the superior court, or state superintendent of
public instruction, if a candidate in a contested primary receives a majority
of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the name of that
candidate may be printed under the title of the office for that position.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 29.07 RCW to read as follows:

Under no circumstances
may an individual be required to affiliate with, join, adhere to, express faith
in, or declare a preference for, a political party or organization upon
registering to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 29.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A primary is a
critical stage in the public process by which voters elect candidates to public
office. A primary may not be used to select the nominees of a political party.

(2) Whenever candidates
for a partisan office are to be elected, the general election must be preceded
by a primary conducted under this chapter, except as otherwise provided in
law. Based upon votes cast at the primary, either one or two candidates must
be certified as qualified to appear on the general election ballot, under RCW
29.27.050 and 29.30.085.

(3) If a candidate
expresses a party preference on his or her declaration of candidacy, then the
preference will be listed for the candidate on the primary and general election
ballots. Each candidate who does not express a preference for a political
party will be listed as an independent candidate on the primary and general
election ballots. Party preferences will be listed for the information of
voters only, and may not be used for any purpose relating to the conduct,
canvassing, or certification of the primary, and may in no way limit the
options available to voters in deciding for whom to cast a vote.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.01.090 and 1977
ex.s. c 329 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

"Major political
party" means a political party of which at least one ((nominee for
president, vice president, United States senator, or a statewide office
received at least five percent of the total vote cast at the last preceding
state general election in an even-numbered year: PROVIDED, That any political
party qualifying as a major political party under the previous subsection (2)
or subsection (3) of this section prior to its 1977 amendment shall retain such
status until after the next state general election following June 30, 1977))
candidate for an office voted upon statewide who expressed a preference for
that party on his or her declaration of candidacy received at least five
percent of the total vote cast at the last preceding primary election or
general election occurring in a year in which the governor is elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 29.01 RCW to read as follows:

"Partisan
office" means the following offices:

(1) United States
senator and United States representative;

(2) All state offices
except (a) judicial offices and (b) the office of superintendent of public
instruction;

(3) All county offices
except (a) judicial offices and (b) those offices where a county home rule
charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.01.130 and 1965 c
9 s 29.01.130 are each amended to read as follows:

"Primary"
or "primary election" means a statutory procedure ((for nominating
candidates to public office at the polls)) held before a general election
by which each voter is permitted to cast a vote for his or her preferred
candidate for each office appearing on the ballot, without any limitation based
on party preference or affiliation, of either the voter or the candidate, with
the result of qualifying not more than two candidates for each office to appear
on the general election ballot.

Sec. 7. RCW 29.04.180 and 1999 c
157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person
who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such votes counted at a primary
or election may((, if the jurisdiction of the office sought is entirely
within one county,)) file a declaration of candidacy ((with the county
auditor not later than the day before the primary or election. If the
jurisdiction of the office sought encompasses more than one county the
declaration of candidacy shall be filed)) similar to the form in RCW
29.15.010 with the ((secretary of state)) same officer as
provided in RCW 29.15.030 not later than the day before the primary or
election. Declarations of candidacy for write-in candidates must be
accompanied by a filing fee in the same manner as required of other candidates
filing for the office as provided in RCW 29.15.050.

(2) Votes cast
for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations of candidacy ((and
write-in votes for persons appointed by political parties pursuant to RCW
29.18.160)) need only specify the name of the candidate in the appropriate
location on the ballot in order to be counted. Write-in votes cast for any
other candidate, in order to be counted, must designate the office sought and
position number ((or political party)), if applicable. In order for
write-in votes to be valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense
ballot systems the voter must complete the proper mark next to the write-in
line for that office.

(3) No person
may file as a write-in candidate where:

(((1))) (a)
At a general election, the person attempting to file either filed as a write-in
candidate for the same office at the preceding primary or the person's name
appeared on the ballot for the same office at the preceding primary;

(((2))) (b)
The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has already filed a valid
write-in declaration for that primary or election, unless one or the other of
the two filings is for the office of precinct committeeperson;

(((3))) (c)
The name of the person attempting to file already appears on the ballot as a
candidate for another office, unless one of the two offices for which he or she
is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.

(4) The
declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by RCW 29.15.010.
No write-in candidate filing under RCW 29.04.180 may be included in any voter's
pamphlet produced under chapter ((29.80)) 29.81 RCW unless that
candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the general election
ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction producing a local
voter's pamphlet under chapter 29.81A RCW may provide, by ordinance, for the
inclusion of write-in candidates in such pamphlets.

Sec. 8. RCW 29.04.190 and 1988 c
181 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state or
county auditor who received a write-in declaration for a district encompassing
more than one county shall notify each county auditor of any declarations
filed with the secretary under RCW 29.04.180 for offices appearing on the
ballot in that county. The county auditor shall ensure that those persons
charged with counting the ballots for a primary or election are notified of all
valid write-in candidates before the tabulation of those ballots.

Sec. 9. RCW 29.13.070 and 1977
ex.s. c 361 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

((Nominating)) Primaries
for general elections to be held in November shall be held at the regular
polling places in each precinct on the third Tuesday of the preceding September
or on the seventh Tuesday immediately preceding such general election,
whichever occurs first.

Sec. 10. RCW 29.15.010 and 1990 c
59 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

A ((candidate)) person
who desires to have his or her name printed on the ballot as a candidate
for ((election to)) an office where ownership of property is not a
prerequisite to vote, other than president of the United States((,))
or vice president of the United States, ((or an office for which
ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting)) shall complete and file
a declaration and affidavit of candidacy for the office. The secretary
of state shall adopt, by rule, a ((declaration of candidacy)) separate
form for candidates for the office of precinct committee officer and a
((separate)) standard form for candidates for all other offices filing
under this chapter. Included on the standard form ((shall)) must
be:

(1) A place for the
candidate to declare that he or she is a registered voter within the
jurisdiction of the office for which he or she is filing, and the address at
which he or she is registered;

(2) A place for the
candidate to indicate the position for which he or she is filing;

(3) For partisan
offices only, a place for the candidate to indicate ((a party
designation, if applicable)) which major or minor political party, if
any, or independent status, the candidate regards as best approximating his or
her personal preference. A candidate may only list one party preference or may
list independent;

(4) A place for the
candidate to indicate the amount of the filing fee accompanying the declaration
and affidavit of candidacy or for the candidate to indicate that he or
she is filing a ((nominating)) petition of candidacy in lieu of
the filing fee under RCW 29.15.050;

(5) A place for the candidate
to sign the declaration and affidavit of candidacy, stating that the
information provided on the form is true and swearing or affirming that he or
she will support the Constitution and laws of the United States and the
Constitution and laws of the state of Washington((.

The secretary of
state may require)); and

(6) Any other
information ((on the form he or she)) that the secretary of state
deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

Sec. 11. RCW 29.15.025 and 1999 c
298 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person filing a
declaration and affidavit of candidacy for an office shall, at the time of
filing, be a registered voter and possess the qualifications specified by law
for persons who may be elected to the office.

(2) The name of a
candidate for an office shall not appear on a ballot for that office unless,
except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and 3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time
the candidate's declaration and affidavit of candidacy is filed, properly
registered to vote in the geographic area represented by the office. For the
purposes of this section, each geographic area in which registered voters may
cast ballots for an office is represented by that office. If a person elected
to an office must be ((nominated)) qualified from a district or
similar division of the geographic area represented by the office, the name of
a candidate for the office shall not appear on a primary ballot for that office
unless the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration and affidavit
of candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in that district or
division. The officer with whom declarations and affidavits of candidacy must
be filed under this title shall review each such declaration filed regarding
compliance with this subsection.

(3) This section does
not apply to the office of a member of the United States congress.

Sec. 12. RCW 29.15.040 and 1987 c
110 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any candidate may mail
his or her declaration of candidacy for an office to the filing officer. Such
declarations of candidacy shall be processed by the filing officer in the
following manner:

(1) Any declaration
received by the filing officer by mail before the tenth business day
immediately preceding the first day for candidates to file for office shall be
returned to the candidate submitting it, together with a notification that the
declaration of candidacy was received too early to be processed. The candidate
shall then be permitted to resubmit his or her declaration of candidacy during
the filing period.

(2) Any properly
executed declaration of candidacy received by mail on or after the tenth
business day immediately preceding the first day for candidates to file for
office and before the close of business on the last day of the filing period
shall be included with filings made in person during the filing period. In primaries
for partisan offices and judicial ((elections)) offices
the filing officer shall determine by lot the order in which the names of those
candidates shall appear upon sample and absentee primary ballots.

(3) Any declaration of
candidacy received by the filing officer after the close of business on the
last day for candidates to file for office shall be rejected and returned to
the candidate attempting to file it.

Sec. 13. RCW 29.15.050 and 1999 c
298 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A filing fee
of one dollar shall accompany each declaration of candidacy for precinct
committee officer; a filing fee of ten dollars shall accompany the declaration
of candidacy for any office with a fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars
or less; a filing fee equal to one percent of the annual salary of the office
at the time of filing shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any
office with a fixed annual salary of more than one thousand dollars per annum.
No filing fee need accompany a declaration of candidacy for any office for
which compensation is on a per diem or per meeting attended basis.

(2) A candidate
who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of filing to pay the filing
fee required by this section shall submit a petition of candidacy with
his or her declaration of candidacy ((a nominating petition)). The
petition shall contain not less than a number of signatures of registered
voters equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee. The signatures shall
be of voters registered to vote within the jurisdiction of the office for which
the candidate is filing.

(3) When the
candidacy is for:

(((1))) (a)
A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from more than one
county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state for equal division
between the treasuries of the counties comprising the district.

(((2))) (b)
A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the county auditor who shall
transmit it to the city or town clerk for deposit in the city or town treasury.

Sec. 14. RCW 29.15.060 and 1984 c
142 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((nominating))
petition of candidacy authorized by RCW 29.15.050 shall be printed on
sheets of uniform color and size, shall contain no more than twenty numbered
lines, and shall be in substantially the following form:

"WARNING

Any
person who signs this petition with any other than his or her true name, or who
knowingly (1) signs more than one petition for any single candidate, (2) signs
the petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or (3) makes any false
statement may be subject to fine, or imprisonment, or both.

We, the undersigned
registered voters of (( (the state of Washington or the
political subdivision for which the petition of candidacy is
made) )) the state of Washington, hereby
petition that the name of (candidate's
name) be printed on the official primary ballot for
the office of (insert
name of office) .

│ │ │ │

Signature │ Printed Name │ Residence Address │ City │ County

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

1B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

2B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

3B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

etc."

Sec. 15. RCW 29.15.070 and 1984 c
142 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((Nominating)) (1)
Petitions of candidacy may be rejected for the following reasons:

(((1))) (a)
The petition is not in the proper form;

(((2))) (b)
The petition clearly bears insufficient signatures;

(((3))) (c)
The petition is not accompanied by a declaration of candidacy;

(((4))) (d)
The time within which the petition and the declaration of candidacy could have
been filed has expired.

(2) If the
petition is accepted, the officer with whom it is filed shall canvass the
signatures contained on it and shall reject the signatures of those persons who
are not registered voters ((and the signatures of those persons who are not
registered to vote)) within the jurisdiction of the office for which the ((nominating))
petition of candidacy is filed. He or she shall additionally reject any
signature that appears on the ((nominating)) petitions of candidacy
of two or more candidates for the same office ((and shall also reject, each
time it appears, the name of any person who signs the same petition more than
once)). If the filing officer finds that the same voter has signed the
same petition more than once, he or she shall reject all but the first valid
signature.

(3) If the
officer with whom the petition is filed refuses to accept the petition or
refuses to certify the petition as bearing sufficient valid signatures, the
person filing the petition may appeal that action to the superior court. The
application for judicial review shall take precedence over other cases and
matters and shall be speedily heard and determined.

Sec. 16. RCW 29.15.080 and 1984 c
142 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The following apply to
persons signing ((nominating)) petitions of candidacy prescribed
by RCW 29.15.060:

(1) A person who signs
a petition with any other than his or her name ((shall be)) is
guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A person ((shall
be)) is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person knowingly: Signs more
than one petition for any single candidacy of any single candidate; signs the
petition when he or she is not a legal voter; or makes a false statement as to
his or her residence.

Sec. 17. RCW 29.15.150 and 1973 c
4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever it shall be
necessary to hold a special election in an odd-numbered year to fill an
unexpired term of any office which is scheduled to be voted upon for a full
term in an even-numbered year, no ((September)) primary election shall
be held in the odd-numbered year if, after the last day allowed for candidates
to withdraw, ((either of the following circumstances exist:

(1) No more than one
candidate of each qualified political party has filed a declaration of
candidacy for the same partisan office to be filled; or

(2))) no more than two candidates have filed
a declaration of candidacy for a single ((nonpartisan)) office to be
filled.

In ((either)) this
event, the officer with whom the declarations of candidacy were filed shall
immediately notify all candidates concerned and the names of the candidates
that would have been printed upon the ((September)) primary ballot, but
for the provisions of this section, shall be printed as ((nominees)) candidates
for the positions sought upon the ((November)) general election ballot.

Sec. 18. RCW 29.15.160 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A void in candidacy for
((a nonpartisan)) an office occurs when an election for such
office, except for the short term, has been scheduled and no valid declaration
of candidacy has been filed for the position or all persons filing such valid
declarations of candidacy have died or been disqualified.

Sec. 19. RCW 29.15.170 and 2001 c
46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings for ((a
nonpartisan)) an office shall be reopened for a period of three
normal business days, such three day period to be fixed by the election officer
with whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by
notifying press, radio, and television in the county or counties involved,
and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by law whenever
before the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary:

(1) A void in candidacy
occurs;

(2) A vacancy occurs in
((any nonpartisan)) an office leaving an unexpired term to be
filled by an election for which filings have not been held; or

(3) A ((nominee))
candidate for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of
election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state
Constitution, dies or is disqualified.

Candidacies validly
filed within said three-day period shall appear on the ballot as if made during
the earlier filing period.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 29.15 RCW to read as follows:

If the death or
disqualification of a candidate for a partisan or nonpartisan office does not
give rise to the opening of a new filing period under RCW 29.15.170 and if no
appointment is made under RCW 29.18.160, then the following will occur:

(1) If the candidate dies
or becomes disqualified after filing a declaration of candidacy but before the
close of the filing period, then the declaration of candidacy is void and his
or her name will not appear on the ballot.

(2)(a) If the candidate
dies or becomes disqualified after the close of the filing period but before
the day of the primary, then his or her name will appear on the primary ballot
and all otherwise valid votes for that candidate will be tabulated. The
candidate's name will not appear on the general election ballot even if he or
she otherwise would have qualified to do so, but no other candidate will
advance or be substituted in place of that candidate.

(b) If the candidate
was the only candidate to qualify to advance to the general election, then the
general election for that office lapses, and the office will be regarded as
vacant as of the time the newly elected official would have otherwise taken
office.

(3) If the candidate
dies or becomes disqualified on or after the day of the primary, and he or she
would have otherwise qualified to appear on the general election ballot, then
his or her name will appear on the general election ballot and all otherwise
valid votes for that candidate will be tabulated. If the candidate received a
number of votes sufficient to be elected to office, but for his or her death or
disqualification, then the office will be regarded as vacant as of the time the
newly elected official would have otherwise taken office.

Sec. 21. RCW 29.15.190 and 1975-'76
2nd ex.s. c 120 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

A scheduled election ((shall
be lapsed)) lapses, the office is deemed stricken from the
ballot, no purported write-in votes may be counted, and no candidate may
be certified as elected, when:

(1) In an election for
judge of the supreme court ((or)), superintendent of public
instruction, or a partisan office, a void in candidacy occurs on or
after the fourth Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the primary
being an indispensable phase of the election process for such offices;

(2) Except as otherwise
specified in RCW 29.15.180, ((as now or hereafter amended, a nominee)) a
candidate for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of
election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state
Constitution dies or is disqualified on or after the fourth Tuesday prior to a
primary;

(3) In other elections
for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy occurs or a vacancy occurs involving
an unexpired term to be filled on or after the fourth Tuesday prior to an
election.

Sec. 22. RCW 29.15.210 and 1972
ex.s. c 61 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy are filed shall give
notice of a void in candidacy for ((a nonpartisan)) an office((,))
by notifying press, radio, and television in the county or counties involved
and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by law. The notice
shall state the office, and the time and place for filing declarations of
candidacy.

Sec. 23. RCW 29.15.220 and 1972
ex.s. c 61 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings to fill a void
in candidacy for ((nonpartisan)) an office shall be made in the
same manner and with the same official as required during the regular filing
period for such office((: PROVIDED, That nominating signature)). Petitions
((which may be)) of candidacy that are required of candidates
filing ((for certain district offices)) during the normal filing period
shall not be required of candidates filing during the special three day filing
period.

Sec. 24. RCW 29.18.010 and 1990 c
59 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

Candidates for ((the
following offices shall be nominated at)) partisan offices will appear
on the ballot at primaries held ((pursuant to the provisions of)) under
this chapter((:

(1) Congressional
offices;

(2) All state
offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) the office of superintendent of
public instruction;

(3) All county
offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) those offices where a county home
rule charter provides otherwise)).

Sec. 25. RCW 29.18.160 and 2001 c
46 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A vacancy caused by the
death or disqualification of any candidate ((or nominee of)) for a
partisan office who is affiliated with a major or minor political party that
would result in no candidate affiliated with that party being on the primary
ballot for a partisan office, may be filled at any time up to and including
the day ((prior to the election)) before the primary for that
position. For ((state)) partisan offices ((in any political
subdivision voted on solely by electors)) of a county or the state
legislature voted on solely by voters all or part of a single county, an
individual ((shall)) may be appointed to fill ((such)) a
vacancy by the county central committee in the case of a major political party
or by the state central committee or comparable governing body in the case of a
minor political party. For other partisan offices, including federal or
statewide offices, an individual ((shall)) may be appointed to
fill ((such)) the vacancy by the state central committee or
comparable governing body of the appropriate political party.

((Should such)) If
the vacancy occurs and the appointment is made no later than the
sixth Tuesday ((prior to the state)) before the primary ((or
general election)) concerned and the ballots have been printed, ((it
shall be mandatory that)) they must be corrected by the appropriate
election officers. In making ((such)) the correction, it ((shall))
is not ((be)) necessary to reprint complete ballots if any other
less expensive technique can be used and the resulting correction is reasonably
clear.

((Should such)) If
the vacancy occurs after the sixth Tuesday ((prior to said state))
before the primary ((or general election)) and time does not
exist in which to correct ballots (including absentee ballots), either in total
or in part, then the votes cast or recorded at the primary for the
person who has died or become disqualified ((shall)) must be
counted for the person who has been named to fill ((such)) the
vacancy.

When the secretary of
state is the person with whom the appointment by the major or minor political
party is filed, ((he)) the secretary of state shall, in
certifying candidates ((or nominations)) to the various county officers
insert the name of the person appointed to fill a vacancy.

((In
the event that)) If the secretary of state has already sent forth ((his))
a certificate when the appointment to fill a vacancy is filed with ((him,
he)) that office, the secretary of state shall forthwith certify to
the county auditors of the proper counties the name and place of residence of
the person appointed to fill a vacancy, the office for which ((he)) the
person is a candidate ((or nominee)), the party ((he represents))
with which that person is affiliated, and all other pertinent facts
pertaining to the vacancy.

Sec. 26. RCW 29.27.020 and 1990 c
59 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

On or before the day
following the last day allowed for ((political parties to fill
vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29.18.150)) candidates to
withdraw under RCW 29.15.120, the secretary of state shall certify to each
county auditor a list of the candidates who have filed declarations of
candidacy in his or her office for the primary. For each office, the
certificate shall include the name of each candidate, his or her address, and
his or her party designation, if any.

Sec. 27. RCW 29.27.050 and 1990 c
59 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No later than the day
following the certification of the returns of any primary, the secretary of
state shall certify to the appropriate county auditors, the names of all persons
((nominated)) qualified to appear on the general election ballot as
candidates for offices, the returns of which have been canvassed by the
secretary of state.

Sec. 28. RCW 29.27.080 and 1999 c
4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 29.81A.060, notice for any state, county, district, or municipal
election, whether special or general, shall be given by at least one
publication not more than ten nor less than three days prior to the election by
the county auditor or the officer conducting the election as the case may be,
in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the county. ((Said))
The legal notice shall contain the title of each office under the proper
party ((designation)) preference, the names and addresses of all
((officers)) candidates who have been ((nominated)) qualified
to appear on the ballot for an office to be voted upon at that election,
together with the ballot titles of all measures, the hours during which the polls
will be open, and that the election will be held in the regular polling places
in each precinct, giving the address of each polling place: PROVIDED, That the
names of all candidates for nonpartisan offices shall be published separately
with designation of the offices for which they are candidates but without party
designation. This shall be the only notice required for a state, county,
district, or municipal general or special election and shall supersede the
provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or special in nature,
having different requirements for the giving of notice of any general or
special elections.

(2) All school district
elections held on February 5, 1980, at which the number and proportion of
persons required by law voted to authorize bonds or tax levies, are hereby
validated regardless of any failure to publish notice of such election. No
action challenging the validity of any such election may be brought later than
April 15, 1980, or thirty days from June 12, 1980, whichever is later. Notice
of provisions of this subsection shall be published within five days after
February 28, 1980, in a newspaper of general circulation within each county
where a school district election was held on February 5, 1980, and where notice
of such election was not published as provided in subsection (1) of this
section.

(3) All school district
elections held on May 19, 1998, at which the number and proportion of persons
required by law voted to authorize bonds or tax levies, are hereby validated
regardless of any failure to publish notice of such election. No action
challenging the validity of any such election may be brought later than thirty
days after January 29, 1999. Notice of provisions of this subsection shall be
published within five days after January 29, 1999, in a newspaper of general
circulation within each county where a school district election was held on May
19, 1998, and where notice of such election was not published as provided in
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 29. RCW 29.27.090 and 1965 c
9 s 29.27.090 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of
state((, county)) and the auditor of each county((, and clerks
of the several municipal corporations)) shall preserve ((all certificates
of nomination)) documentation indicating which candidates have qualified
to appear on a general election ballot filed in their respective offices
for six months. All certificates shall be open to public inspection under
proper regulations made by the officer with whom they are filed.

Sec. 30. RCW 29.30.005 and 1990 c
59 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for the
candidates for the positions of president and vice president or for a partisan
or nonpartisan office for which no primary is required, the names of all
candidates who have ((filed for nomination under chapter 29.18 RCW and those
independent candidates and candidates of minor political parties who have been
nominated under chapter 29.24 RCW shall)) satisfied all requirements of
law will appear on the appropriate ballot at the primary throughout the
jurisdiction ((in which they are to be nominated)) of the office for
which they are a candidate.

Sec. 31. RCW 29.30.020 and 2001 c
30 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The positions or
offices on a primary ballot shall be arranged in substantially the following
order: United States senator; United States representative; governor;
lieutenant governor; secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor;
attorney general; commissioner of public lands; superintendent of public
instruction; insurance commissioner; state senator; state representative;
county officers; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of appeals;
judges of the superior court; and judges of the district court. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction shall be
grouped together and be in the order of the position numbers assigned to those
offices, if any.

(2) The order of the
positions or offices on an election ballot shall be substantially the same as
on a primary ballot except that the offices of president and vice-president of
the United States shall precede all other offices on a presidential election
ballot. State ballot issues shall be placed before all offices on an election
ballot. The positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot measures regarding
local units of government shall be established by the secretary of state by
rule.

(3) The political party
or independent candidacy of each candidate for partisan office shall be
indicated next to the name of the candidate on the primary and election
ballot. ((A candidate shall file a written notice with the filing officer
within three business days after the close of the filing period designating the
political party to be indicated next to the candidate's name on the ballot if
either: (a) The candidate has been nominated by two or more minor political
parties or independent conventions; or (b) the candidate has both filed a
declaration of candidacy declaring an affiliation with a major political party
and been nominated by a minor political party or independent convention. If no
written notice is filed the filing officer shall give effect to the party
designation shown upon the first document filed. A candidate may be deemed
nominated by a minor party or independent convention only if all documentation
required by chapter 29.24 RCW has been timely filed.))

Sec. 32. RCW 29.30.101 and 1999 c
298 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The names of the
persons certified ((as nominees)) by the secretary of state or the
county canvassing board as having qualified to appear on the general
election ballot shall be printed on the ballot at the ensuing election.

No name of any
candidate ((whose nomination at a primary is required by law shall)) for
an office for which a primary is conducted may be placed upon the ballot at
a general or special election unless it appears upon the certificate of either
(1) the secretary of state, or (2) the county canvassing board, or (3) ((a
minor party convention or)) the state or county central committee of a
major political party to fill a vacancy on its ticket under RCW 29.18.160.

Excluding the office of
precinct committee officer or a temporary elected position such as a charter
review board member or freeholder, a candidate's name shall not appear more
than once upon a ballot for a position regularly ((nominated)) qualified
or elected at the same election.

Sec. 33. 2001 c ... (SB 5275) s
17 is amended to read as follows:

In an odd-numbered
year, the county auditor may conduct a primary or a special election by mail
ballot concurrently with the primary:

(1) For an office or
ballot measure of a special purpose district that is entirely within the
county;

(2) For an office or
ballot measure of a special purpose district that lies in the county and one or
more other counties if the auditor first secures the concurrence of the county
auditors of those other counties to conduct the primary in this manner
district-wide; and

(3) For a ballot
measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city, or town if the auditor first
secures the concurrence of the legislative authority of the county, city, or
town involved.

The county auditor
shall notify an election jurisdiction for which a primary is to be held that
the primary will be conducted by mail ballot.

A primary in an
odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail ballot in a precinct with two
hundred or more active registered voters if a partisan office or state office
or state ballot measure is to be voted upon at that primary in the precinct.

To the extent they are
not inconsistent with other provisions of law, the laws governing the conduct
of mail ballot special elections apply to ((nonpartisan)) primaries for
nonpartisan offices conducted by mail ballot.

Sec. 34. RCW 29.42.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 329 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Each political party
organization ((shall have the power to)) may:

(1) Make its own rules
and regulations;

(2) Call conventions;

(3) Elect delegates to
conventions, state and national;

(4) Fill vacancies on
the ticket under RCW 29.18.160;

(5) Provide for the
nomination of presidential electors; and

(6)
Perform all functions inherent in such an organization((: PROVIDED, That
only major political parties shall have the power to designate candidates to
appear on the state primary election ballot as provided in RCW 29.18.150 as now
or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 35. RCW 29.42.020 and 1987 c
295 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The state committee of
each major political party shall consist of one committeeman and one
committeewoman from each county elected by the county committee at its
organization meeting. It shall have a chair and vice-chair who must be of
opposite sexes. This committee shall meet during January of each odd-numbered
year for the purpose of organization at a time and place designated by a
sufficient notice to all the newly elected state committeemen and
committeewomen by the authorized officers of the retiring committee. For the
purpose of this section a notice mailed at least one week prior to the date of
the meeting shall constitute sufficient notice. At its organizational meeting
it shall elect its chair and vice-chair, and such officers as its bylaws may
provide, and adopt bylaws, rules and regulations. It shall have power to:

(1) Call conventions at
such time and place and under such circumstances and for such purposes as the
call to convention shall designate. The manner, number and procedure for
selection of state convention delegates shall be subject to the committee's
rules and regulations duly adopted;

(2) Provide for the
election of delegates to national conventions;

(3) Fill vacancies on
the ticket for any federal or state office to be voted on by the ((electors))
voters of more than one county under RCW 29.18.160;

(4) Provide for the
nomination of presidential electors; and

(5) Perform all
functions inherent in such an organization.

Notwithstanding any
provision of this chapter, the committee shall not set rules which shall govern
the conduct of the actual proceedings at a party state convention.

Sec. 36. RCW 29.42.050 and 1991 c
363 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The statutory
requirements for filing as a candidate at the primaries shall apply to
candidates for precinct committee officer except that the filing period for
this office alone shall be extended to and include the second Friday
immediately following the last day for ((political parties to fill vacancies
in the ticket as provided by RCW 29.18.150)) the filing of declarations
of candidacy under RCW 29.15.020, and the office shall not be voted upon at
the primaries, but the names of all candidates must appear under the proper
party and office designations on the ballot for the general November election
for each even-numbered year and the one receiving the highest number of votes
shall be declared elected: PROVIDED, That to be declared elected, a candidate
must receive at least ten percent of the number of votes cast for the candidate
of the candidate's party receiving the greatest number of votes in the
precinct. Any person elected to the office of precinct committee officer who
has not filed a declaration of candidacy shall pay the fee of one dollar to the
county auditor for a certificate of election. The term of office of precinct
committee officer shall be for two years, commencing upon completion of the
official canvass of votes by the county canvassing board of election returns.
Should any vacancy occur in this office by reason of death, resignation, or
disqualification of the incumbent, or because of failure to elect, the
respective county chair of the county central committee shall be empowered to
fill such vacancy by appointment: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in legislative
districts having a majority of its precincts in a county with a population of
one million or more, such appointment shall be made only upon the
recommendation of the legislative district chair: PROVIDED, That the person so
appointed shall have the same qualifications as candidates when filing for election
to such office for such precinct: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when a vacancy in the
office of precinct committee officer exists because of failure to elect at a
state general election, such vacancy shall not be filled until after the
organization meeting of the county central committee and the new county chair
selected as provided by RCW 29.42.030.

Sec. 37. RCW 29.62.010 and 1990 c
59 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

Every canvassing board
or officer responsible for canvassing and certifying the returns of any primary
or election shall:

(1) Adopt
administrative rules to facilitate and govern the canvassing process in that
jurisdiction;

(2) For each primary
and election, prepare and sign a statement of the returns for each office,
candidate, and issue voted on in that jurisdiction;

(3) If, at a ((partisan))
primary, two or more candidates ((of the same party)) receive the
greatest or second greatest, and identical, number of votes for an
office or position, resolve the tie vote by lot((;

(4) If, at a
nonpartisan or judicial primary, two or more candidates receive the second
greatest, and identical, number of votes for that office or position, resolve
the tie vote by lot)).

Sec. 38. RCW 29.62.180 and 1999 c
157 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For any office at
any election or primary, any voter may write in on the ballot the name of any person
for an office who has filed as a write-in candidate for the office in the
manner provided by RCW 29.04.180 and such vote shall be counted the same as if
the name had been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. No write-in
vote made for any person who has not filed a declaration of candidacy pursuant
to RCW 29.04.180 is valid if that person filed for the same office, either as a
regular candidate or a write-in candidate, at the preceding primary, except
that nothing in this section invalidates a vote for the sole reason that the
vote was cast as a write-in for a candidate whose name appears on the same
ballot for the same office. Any abbreviation used to designate office,
position, or political party shall be accepted if the canvassing board can
determine, to their satisfaction, the voter's intent.

(2) The number of
write-in votes cast for each office must be recorded and reported with the
canvass for the election.

(3) Write-in votes cast
for an individual candidate for an office need not be tallied if the total
number of write-in votes cast for the office is not greater than the number of
votes cast for ((the)) a candidate apparently ((nominated))
qualified to appear on the general election ballot or elected, and the
write-in votes could not have altered the outcome of the primary or election.
In the case of write-in votes for statewide office or for any office whose
jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, write-in votes for an individual
candidate must be tallied whenever the county auditor is notified by either the
office of the secretary of state or another auditor in a multicounty
jurisdiction that it appears that the write-in votes could alter the outcome of
the primary or election.

(4) In the case of
statewide offices or jurisdictions that encompass more than one county, if the
total number of write-in votes cast for an office within a county is greater
than the number of votes cast for a candidate apparently ((nominated)) qualified
to appear on the general election ballot or elected in a primary or
election, the auditor shall tally all write-in votes for individual candidates
for that office and notify the office of the secretary of state and the
auditors of the other counties within the jurisdiction, that the write-in votes
for individual candidates should be tallied.

Sec. 39. RCW 29.64.010 and 2001 c
225 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An officer
of a political party or any person for whom votes were cast in a primary who
was not declared ((nominated)) qualified to appear on the general
election ballot may file a written application for a recount of the votes
or a portion of the votes cast at that primary for all persons for whom votes
were cast for ((nomination to)) that office.

(2) An officer
of a political party or any person for whom votes were cast at any election may
file a written application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes
cast at that election for all candidates for election to that office.

(3) Any group of
five or more registered voters may file a written application for a recount of
the votes or a portion of the votes cast upon any question or issue. They
shall designate one of the members of the group as chairman and shall indicate
the voting residence of each member of the group.

(4) An
application for a recount of the votes cast for an office or on a ballot
measure must be filed with the officer with whom filings are made for the
jurisdiction.

(5) An
application for a recount must specify whether the recount will be done
manually or by the vote tally system. A recount done by the vote tally system
must use programming that recounts and reports only the office or ballot
measure in question. The county shall also provide for a test of the logic and
accuracy of that program.

(6) An
application for a recount shall be filed within three business days after the
county canvassing board or secretary of state has declared the official results
of the primary or election for the office or issue for which the recount is
requested.

(7) This chapter
applies to the recounting of votes cast by paper ballots and to the recounting
of votes recorded on ballots counted by a vote tally system.

Sec. 40. RCW 29.64.015 and 2001 c
225 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the official
canvass of all of the returns for any office at any primary or election reveals
that the difference in the number of votes cast for a candidate apparently ((nominated))
qualified to appear on the general election ballot or elected to any
office and the number of votes cast for the closest apparently defeated
opponent is less than two thousand votes and also less than one-half of one
percent of the total number of votes cast for both candidates, the county canvassing
board shall conduct a recount of all votes cast on that position.

(a) Whenever such a
difference occurs in the number of votes cast for candidates for a position the
declaration of candidacy for which was filed with the secretary of state, the secretary
of state shall, within three business days of the day that the returns of the
primary or election are first certified by the canvassing boards of those
counties, direct those boards to recount all votes cast on the position.

(b) If the difference
in the number of votes cast for the apparent winner and the closest apparently
defeated opponent is less than one hundred fifty votes and also less than
one-fourth of one percent of the total number of votes cast for both
candidates, the votes shall be recounted manually or as provided in subsection
(3) of this section.

(2) A mandatory recount
shall be conducted in the manner provided by RCW 29.64.020, 29.64.030, and
29.64.040. No cost of a mandatory recount may be charged to any candidate.

(3) The apparent winner
and closest apparently defeated opponent for an office for which a manual
recount is required under subsection (1)(b) of this section may select an
alternative method of conducting the recount. To select such an alternative,
the two candidates shall agree to the alternative in a signed, written
statement filed with the election official for the office. The recount shall
be conducted using the alternative method if: It is suited to the balloting
system that was used for casting the votes for the office; it involves the use
of a vote tallying system that is approved for use in this state by the
secretary of state; and the vote tallying system is readily available in each
county required to conduct the recount. If more than one balloting system was
used in casting votes for the office, an alternative to a manual recount may be
selected for each system.

Sec. 41. RCW 29.64.030 and 2001 c
225 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time and
place established for a recount, the canvassing board or its duly authorized
representatives, in the presence of all witnesses who may be in attendance,
shall open the sealed containers containing the ballots to be recounted, and
shall recount the votes for the offices or issues for which the recount has
been ordered. Ballots shall be handled only by the members of the canvassing
board or their duly authorized representatives.

Witnesses shall be
permitted to observe the ballots and the process of tabulating the votes, but
they shall not be permitted to handle the ballots. The canvassing board shall
not permit the tabulation of votes for any ((nomination)) qualification,
election, or issue other than the ones for which a recount was applied for or
required.

(2) At any time before
the ballots from all of the precincts listed in the application for the recount
have been recounted, the applicant may file with the board a written request to
stop the recount.

(3) The recount may be
observed by persons representing the candidates affected by the recount or the
persons representing both sides of an issue that is being recounted. The
observers may not make a record of the names, addresses, or other information
on the ballots, poll books, or applications for absentee ballots unless
authorized by the superior court. The secretary of state or county auditor may
limit the number of observers to not less than two on each side if, in his or
her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of the
recount process.

Sec. 42. RCW 29.64.040 and 2001 c
225 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon completion of the
canvass of a recount, the canvassing board shall prepare and certify an amended
abstract showing the votes cast in each precinct for which the recount was
conducted. Copies of the amended abstracts must be transmitted to the same
officers who received the abstract on which the recount was based.

If the ((nomination,
election,)) office or issue for which the recount was conducted was
submitted only to the voters of a county, the canvassing board shall file the
amended abstract with the original results of that election or primary.

If the ((nomination,
election,)) office or issue for which a recount was conducted was submitted
to the voters of more than one county, the secretary of state shall canvass the
amended abstracts and shall file an amended abstract with the original results
of that election. An amended abstract certified under this section supersedes
any prior abstract of the results for the same offices or issues at the same
primary or election.

Sec. 43. RCW 29.64.060 and 2001 c
225 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The canvassing board
shall determine the expenses for conducting a recount of votes.

The cost of the recount
shall be deducted from the amount deposited by the applicant for the recount at
the time of filing the request for the recount, and the balance shall be
returned to the applicant. If the costs of the recount exceed the deposit, the
applicant shall pay the difference. No charges may be deducted by the
canvassing board from the deposit for a recount if the recount changes the
result of the ((nomination)) primary or election for the
office or issue for which the recount was ordered.

Sec. 44. RCW 29.68.080 and 1990 c
59 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a vacancy
occurs in the office of United States representative or United States senator
from this state or any congressional district of this state, the governor shall
order a special election to fill the vacancy.

(2) Within ten days of
such vacancy occurring, he or she shall issue a writ of election fixing a date
for the special vacancy election not less than ninety days after the issuance
of the writ, fixing a date for the primary for ((nominating)) qualifying
candidates for the special vacancy election not less than thirty days before
the day fixed for holding the special vacancy election, fixing the dates for
the special filing period, and designating the term or part of the term for
which the vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the office of United States
representative, the writ of election shall specify the congressional district
that is vacant.

(3) If the vacancy
occurs less than six months before a state general election and before the
second Friday following the close of the filing period for that general
election, the special primary and special vacancy elections shall be held in
concert with the state primary and state general election in that year.

(4) If the vacancy
occurs on or after the first day for filing under RCW 29.15.020 and on or
before the second Friday following the close of the filing period, a special
filing period of three normal business days shall be fixed by the governor and
notice thereof given to all media, including press, radio, and television
within the area in which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that,
insofar as possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing
period. The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the third
Tuesday before the primary ((at which candidates are to be nominated)).
The names of candidates who have filed valid declarations of candidacy during
this three-day period shall appear on the approaching primary ballot.

(5) If the vacancy
occurs later than the second Friday following the close of the filing period, a
special primary and special vacancy election to fill the position shall be held
after the next state general election but, in any event, no later than the
ninetieth day following the November election.

(6) As used in this
chapter, "county" means, in the case of a vacancy in the office of
United States senator, any or all of the counties in the state and, in the case
of a vacancy in the office of United States representative, only those counties
wholly or partly within the congressional district in which the vacancy has
occurred.

Sec. 45. RCW 29.68.130 and 1985 c
45 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The general election
laws and laws relating to ((partisan)) primaries ((shall)) for
partisan offices apply to the special primaries and vacancy elections
provided for in RCW 29.68.080 through 29.68.120 to the extent that they are not
inconsistent with the provisions of these sections. Statutory time deadlines
relating to availability of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and
related procedures that cannot be met in a timely fashion may be modified for
the purposes of a specific primary or vacancy election under this chapter by
the secretary of state through emergency rules adopted under RCW 29.04.080.

Sec. 46. RCW 29.71.020 and 1990 c
59 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

In the year in which a
presidential election is held, each major political party and each minor
political party or independent candidate convention ((held under chapter
29.24 RCW)) that nominates candidates for president and vice president of
the United States shall nominate presidential electors for this state. The
party or convention shall file with the secretary of state a certificate signed
by the presiding officer of the convention at which the presidential electors
were chosen, listing the names and addresses of the presidential electors.
Each presidential elector shall execute and file with the secretary of state a
pledge that, as an elector, he or she will vote for the candidates nominated by
that party. The names of presidential electors shall not appear on the
ballots. The votes cast for candidates for president and vice president of
each political party shall be counted for the candidates for presidential
electors of that political party.

Sec. 47. RCW 29.81.220 and 1999 c
260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The voters' pamphlet
must contain:

(1) Information about
each ballot measure initiated by or referred to the voters for their approval
or rejection as required by RCW 29.81.250;

(2) In even-numbered
years, statements, if submitted, advocating the candidacies of ((nominees))
candidates qualified to appear on the ballot for the office of president
and vice president of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state
treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of public lands,
superintendent of public instruction, insurance commissioner, state senator,
state representative, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, or judge of the superior court. Candidates may also submit a campaign
mailing address and telephone number and a photograph not more than five years
old and of a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to be
suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;

(3) In odd-numbered
years, if any office voted upon statewide appears on the ballot due to a vacancy,
then statements and photographs for candidates for any vacant office listed in
subsection (2) of this section must appear;

(4) In even-numbered
years, a section explaining how voters may participate in the election campaign
process; the address and telephone number of the public disclosure commission
established under RCW 42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements
that apply when contributions are made to candidates and political committees;

(5) In even-numbered
years the name, address, and telephone number of each political party ((with
nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed with the secretary of state by the
state committee of a major political party or the presiding officer of the
convention of a minor political party)) for which a candidate appearing
on the ballot has expressed a preference on his or her declaration of
candidacy, if the party has provided that information to the secretary of state;

(6) In each
odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a president of the United
States is to be nominated and elected, information explaining the precinct
caucus and convention process used by each major political party to elect
delegates to its national presidential candidate nominating convention. The
pamphlet must also provide a description of the statutory procedures by which
minor political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;

(7) In even-numbered
years, a description of the office of precinct committee officer and its
duties;

(8) An application form
for an absentee ballot;

(9) A brief statement
explaining the deletion and addition of language for proposed measures under
RCW 29.81.260; and

(10) Any additional
information pertaining to elections as may be required by law or in the
judgment of the secretary of state is deemed informative to the voters.

Sec. 48. RCW 29.85.100 and 1991 c
81 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person who:

(1) Knowingly and
falsely issues a certificate of ((nomination or)) election or a
certificate stating which candidates for office have qualified to appear on the
general election ballot; or

(2) ((Knowingly
provides false information on a certificate which must be filed with an
elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW; or

(3))) Knowingly provides false information on his or
her declaration of candidacy or petition of ((nomination)) candidacy;
or

(((4))) (3)
Conceals or fraudulently defaces or destroys a ((certificate which has been
filed with an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW or a)) declaration
of candidacy or petition of ((nomination which)) candidacy that
has been filed with an elections officer, or any part of such a certificate,
declaration, or petition, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW
9A.20.021.

Sec. 49. RCW 42.17.020 and 1995 c
397 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Agency"
includes all state agencies and all local agencies. "State agency"
includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission,
or other state agency. "Local agency" includes every county, city,
town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose
district, or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or
agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(2) "Authorized
committee" means the political committee authorized by a candidate, or by
the public official against whom recall charges have been filed, to accept
contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public
official.

(3) "Ballot
proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW 29.01.110, or
any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition proposed to be submitted to
the voters of the state or any municipal corporation, political subdivision, or
other voting constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that constituency
prior to its circulation for signatures.

(4) "Benefit"
means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary advantage, or
the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.

(5) "Bona fide
political party" means:

(a) ((An
organization that has filed a valid certificate of nomination with the
secretary of state under chapter 29.24 RCW;

(b))) The governing body of the state organization
of a major political party, as defined in RCW 29.01.090, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority on
behalf of the state party; ((or

(c))) (b) The county central committee or
legislative district committee of a major political party. There may be only
one legislative district committee for each party in each legislative district;
or

(c) The governing
body of the state organization of a minor political party, the name of which
appears on a candidates's declaration of candidacy filed pursuant to RCW
29.15.010.

(6)
"Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or political
committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.

(7)
"Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW 42.17.050, to
perform the duties specified in that section.

(8)
"Candidate" means any individual who seeks ((nomination)) qualification
for election or election to public office. An individual seeks ((nomination))
qualification or election when he or she first:

(a) Receives
contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities with intent
to promote his or her candidacy for office;

(b) Announces publicly
or files for office;

(c) Purchases
commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote his or her candidacy;
or

(d) Gives his or her
consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual any of the
actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.

(9) "Caucus
political committee" means a political committee organized and maintained
by the members of a major political party in the state senate or state house of
representatives.

(10) "Commercial
advertiser" means any person who sells the service of communicating
messages or producing printed material for broadcast or distribution to the
general public or segments of the general public whether through the use of
newspapers, magazines, television and radio stations, billboard companies,
direct mail advertising companies, printing companies, or otherwise.

(11)
"Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.

(12)
"Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services of any
kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17.241, the
term "compensation" shall not include per diem allowances or other
payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official business of the
governmental entity.

(13) "Continuing
political committee" means a political committee that is an organization
of continuing existence not established in anticipation of any particular
election campaign.

(14)(a)
"Contribution" includes:

(i) A loan, gift,
deposit, subscription, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge,
payment, transfer of funds between political committees, or anything of value,
including personal and professional services for less than full consideration;

(ii) An expenditure
made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate, a political committee, or their agents;

(iii) The financing by
a person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in
part, of broadcast, written, graphic, or other form of political advertising
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized agent;

(iv) Sums paid for
tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners and parties, except for the
actual cost of the consumables furnished at the event.

(b)
"Contribution" does not include:

(i) Standard interest
on money deposited in a political committee's account;

(ii) Ordinary home
hospitality;

(iii) A contribution
received by a candidate or political committee that is returned to the
contributor within five business days of the date on which it is received by
the candidate or political committee;

(iv) A news item,
feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is
of primary interest to the general public, that is in a news medium controlled
by a person whose business is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a
candidate or a political committee;

(v) An internal political
communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to a
political party organization or political committee, or to the officers,
management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to
the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;

(vi) The rendering of
personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers,
or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in
excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer
services," for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for
which the individual is not compensated by any person;

(vii) Messages in the
form of reader boards, banners, or yard or window signs displayed on a person's
own property or property occupied by a person. However, a facility used for
such political advertising for which a rental charge is normally made must be
reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution
limit of the person providing the facility;

(viii) Legal or
accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:

(A) A political party
or caucus political committee if the person paying for the services is the
regular employer of the person rendering such services; or

(B) A candidate or an
authorized committee if the person paying for the services is the regular
employer of the individual rendering the services and if the services are
solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with state election or public
disclosure laws.

(c) Contributions other
than money or its equivalent are deemed to have a monetary value equivalent to
the fair market value of the contribution. Services or property or rights
furnished at less than their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any
candidate or political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a
contribution must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market
value and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.

(15) "Elected
official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any
public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.

(16)
"Election" includes any primary, general, or special election for
public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is submitted to
the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the qualifications for voting
include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1
(Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be
considered an election for purposes of this chapter.

(17) "Election
campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition to a candidate
for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or in opposition
to, a ballot proposition.

(18) "Election
cycle" means the period beginning on the first day of December after the
date of the last previous general election for the office that the candidate
seeks and ending on November 30th after the next election for the office. In
the case of a special election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election
cycle" means the period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending
on November 30th after the special election.

(19)
"Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value,
and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally
enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for
the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or
candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For
the purposes of this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and
promises to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment
is made. The term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or
complete repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.

(20) "Final
report" means the report described as a final report in RCW 42.17.080(2).

(21) "General
election" for purposes of the limitation under RCW 42.17.640 means
the election that results in the election of a person to a state office. It
does not include a primary.

(22) "Gift,"
is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.

(23) "Immediate
family" includes the spouse, dependent children, and other dependent
relatives, if living in the household. For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640
through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse,
and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother,
half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the spouse of any
such person and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and
the spouse of any such person.

(24) "Independent
expenditure" means an expenditure that has each of the following elements:

(a) It is made in
support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person who is not
(i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an authorized committee of that candidate
for that office, (iii) a person who has received the candidate's encouragement
or approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in
part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the
defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person
with whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the expenditure,
if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political advertising
supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other candidate or
candidates for that office;

(b) The expenditure
pays in whole or in part for political advertising that either specifically
names the candidate supported or opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt
identifies the candidate without using the candidate's name; and

(c) The expenditure,
alone or in conjunction with another expenditure or other expenditures of the
same person in support of or opposition to that candidate, has a value of five
hundred dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five
hundred dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.

(25)(a)
"Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a
candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the
individual's employer, immediate family as defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640
through 42.17.790, or an association to which the individual belongs.

(b) A treasurer or a
candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee that the
treasurer or candidate serves.

(c) A professional
fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for
fund-raising services at the usual and customary rate.

(d) A volunteer hosting
a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an intermediary for
purposes of that event.

(26)
"Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of the state
legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the subject of action by
either house or any committee of the legislature and all bills and resolutions
that, having passed both houses, are pending approval by the governor.

(27) "Lobby"
and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the passage or
defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, or the
adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative
enactment of any state agency under the state Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes
an association's or other organization's act of communicating with the members
of that association or organization.

(28)
"Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or her own
or another's behalf.

(29) "Lobbyist's
employer" means the person or persons by whom a lobbyist is employed and
all persons by whom he or she is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.

(30) "Person"
includes an individual, partnership, joint venture, public or private
corporation, association, federal, state, or local governmental entity or
agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political committee,
political party, executive committee thereof, or any other organization or
group of persons, however organized.

(31) "Person in
interest" means the person who is the subject of a record or any
representative designated by that person, except that if that person is under a
legal disability, the term "person in interest" means and includes
the parent or duly appointed legal representative.

(32) "Political
advertising" includes any advertising displays, newspaper ads, billboards,
signs, brochures, articles, tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television
presentations, or other means of mass communication, used for the purpose of
appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support
in any election campaign.

(33) "Political
committee" means any person (except a candidate or an individual dealing
with his or her own funds or property) having the expectation of receiving
contributions or making expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any
candidate or any ballot proposition.

(34)
"Primary" for purposes of the limitation under RCW 42.17.640
means the procedure for ((nominating a candidate to state office under
chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in
large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29.18 or 29.21)) qualifying
candidates to the general election ballot under Title 29 RCW.

(35) "Public
office" means any federal, state, county, city, town, school district,
port district, special district, or other state political subdivision elective
office.

(36) "Public
record" includes any writing containing information relating to the
conduct of government or the performance of any governmental or proprietary
function prepared, owned, used, or retained by any state or local agency
regardless of physical form or characteristics. For the office of the
secretary of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, public records means legislative records as defined in RCW
40.14.100 and also means the following: All budget and financial records;
personnel leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated a public
record by any official action of the senate or the house of representatives.

(37) "Recall
campaign" means the period of time beginning on the date of the filing of
recall charges under RCW 29.82.015 and ending thirty days after the recall
election.

(38) "State
legislative office" means the office of a member of the state house of
representatives or the office of a member of the state senate.

(39) "State
office" means state legislative office or the office of governor,
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of public instruction,
state auditor, or state treasurer.

(40) "State
official" means a person who holds a state office.

(41) "Surplus
funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or candidate, the
balance of contributions that remain in the possession or control of that
committee or candidate subsequent to the election for which the contributions
were received, and that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining
debts incurred by the committee or candidate prior to that election. In the
case of a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee that are
in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its
final report under RCW 42.17.065.

(42)
"Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating,
photographing, and every other means of recording any form of communication or
representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words, pictures,
sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof, and all papers, maps, magnetic or
paper tapes, photographic films and prints, motion picture, film and video
recordings, magnetic or punched cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound
recordings, and other documents including existing data compilations from which
information may be obtained or translated.

As used in this
chapter, the singular ((shall)) takes the plural and any gender,
the other, as the context requires.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
50. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 29.01.160 (September primary) and
1965 c 9 s 29.01.160;

(2) RCW 29.15.200 (Lapse of election when no
filing for single positions--Effect) and 1994 c 223 s 8 & 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 120 s 13;

(3) RCW 29.18.150 (Vacancies on major party
ticket caused by no filing--How filled) and 1990 c 59 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s
12, & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.150; and

(4) RCW 29.30.095 (Partisan candidates
qualified for general election) and 1990 c 59 s 96.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
51. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 29.24.010
(Definitions--"Convention" and "election jurisdiction") and
1977 ex.s. c 329 s 1 & 1965 c 9 s 29.24.010;

(2) RCW 29.24.020 (Nomination by convention
or write-in--Date for convention--Multiple conventions by single party) and
2001 c 30 s 2, 1989 c 215 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 2, & 1965 c 9 s
29.24.020;

(3) RCW 29.24.025 (Notice of convention) and
1989 c 215 s 1;

(4) RCW 29.24.030 (Requirements for validity
of convention) and 1989 c 215 s 3, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 3, & 1965 c 9 s
29.24.030;

(5) RCW 29.24.035 (Nominating
petition--Name--Registered voters) and 2001 c 64 s 1, 2001 c 30 s 3, & 1989
c 215 s 5;

(6) RCW 29.24.040 (Certificate of
nomination--Requisites) and 1989 c 215 s 4, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 4, & 1965 c
9 s 29.24.040;

(7) RCW 29.24.060 (Certificate of
nomination--Checking signatures--Appeal of determination) and 1989 c 215 s 7,
1977 ex.s. c 329 s 6, & 1965 c 9 s 29.24.060;

(8) RCW 29.24.070 (Declarations of candidacy
required, exceptions--Payment of fees) and 1990 c 59 s 103, 1989 c 215 s 8,
1977 ex.s. c 329 s 7, & 1965 c 9 s 29.24.070; and

(9) RCW 29.24.--- and 2001 c 30 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
52. RCW 29.24.055 is
recodified as a section in chapter 29.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
53. (1) The code reviser
shall recaption chapter 29.18 RCW as "Primaries and elections for partisan
offices."

(2) The code reviser
shall recaption RCW 29.30.085 as "Candidates qualified for general
election."

(3) The code reviser
shall recaption RCW 29.18.200 as "Rights of voters in primary
elections."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
54. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 55. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---