BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the recent state supreme court decision in Simpson Investment Co. v.
Dept. of Revenue could lead to an unusually restrictive, narrow
interpretation of the deductibility of investment income for business and
occupation tax purposes. If allowed to stand, this interpretation could be
extremely detrimental.

Through its ruling, the
court called into question the application of the state's business and
occupation tax to investment income derived by nonfinancial businesses such as
family investment vehicles, estate planning entities, personal holding
companies, mutual funds, venture capital companies, and other similar entities
that have traditionally deducted their investment income pursuant to RCW
82.04.4281. The court's decision could also be read to expand the business and
occupation tax to individual citizens' investment earnings even though they
have never been considered to be engaging in business.

The court's decision
has the potential of discouraging capital investment in this state's businesses
and inhibiting individual citizens, their families, and noncommercial investors
from preserving or increasing their financial security. The legislature
recognizes that capital and investment income is easily moved out of state.
Interpretations that would apply the business and occupation tax to certain
investment income will definitely cause a reduction of overall capital
available to businesses and could cause some to take their operations and
family-wage jobs out of this state.

The legislature finds
that a narrow interpretation of RCW 82.04.4281 is clearly not in the best
interest of this state or its citizens. Therefore, it is the intent of this
act to clarify the deductibility of investment income and to specifically
identify persons who may not take the deduction provided in RCW 82.04.4281.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.4281 and 1980
c 37 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing
tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax:

(a) Amounts
derived ((by persons, other than those engaging in banking, loan, security,
or other financial businesses,)) from investments or the use of money ((as
such, and also)); and

(b) Amounts
derived as dividends by a parent from its subsidiary corporations.

(2) The following
persons are not entitled to the deduction provided in subsection (1)(a) of this
section:

(a) Persons who
engage in business as a banking, loan, or other financial institution chartered
under:

(i) Title 30, 31,
32, or 33 RCW;

(ii) The national
bank act, as amended; or

(iii) The homeowners
loan act, as amended;

(b) A holding
company of any person described in (a) of this subsection that is subject to:

(i) The bank holding
company act, as amended; or

(ii) The homeowners
loan act, as amended;

(c) Persons who
engage in business as a lender approved by the United States secretary of
housing and urban development for participation in any mortgage insurance
program under the national housing act, as amended;

(d) Persons who
engage in business as a subsidiary of or affiliate owned or controlled by one
or more persons described in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection;

(e) Persons who
engage in business as an underwriter and distributor of securities issued by
other persons, a seller of securities to the public, a broker of securities, or
any combination of these activities, whose gross income is normally derived
principally from these activities. However, this subsection shall not be
construed to deny the deduction provided in subsection (1) of this section to
the entity that issues any of the securities that are underwritten,
distributed, sold, or brokered by any of the persons identified in this
subsection. In addition, this subsection shall not be construed to deny the
deduction provided in subsection (1) of this section to any collective
investment entity such as a mutual fund, venture capital fund, hedge fund,
deferred compensation trust or account, or any similar fund or account;

(f) Persons who
engage in business as a provider of revolving credit accounts. However, this
subsection shall only be construed to deny the deduction provided in subsection
(1) of this section to interest income derived from the provision of the
revolving credit accounts. If the person providing revolving credit accounts
is also engaged in business as a person identified in (a), (b), (c), or (d) of
this subsection, that person shall be denied the deduction provided in
subsection (1) of this section in its entirety;

(g) Persons who make
installment sales through installment sales contracts. However, this
subsection shall only be construed to deny the deduction provided in subsection
(1) of this section to interest income derived from the installment sales
contracts. In addition, a person making installment sales through installment
sales contracts shall not be deemed to be engaged in business for the purposes of
this subsection unless they hold two or more installment sales contracts; and

(h)
Persons whose primary business activity is substantially identical to the
activities of any person listed in (a) through (g) of this subsection.
However, this subsection shall not be construed to deny the deduction provided
in subsection (1) of this section to any person who qualifies as a personal
holding company as defined in section 542 of the internal revenue code, nor any
person who would meet the definition of a personal holding company if that
person were a corporation.

---
END ---