BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 29.18 RCW to read as follows:

Unless each major
political party submits a request to the secretary of state by June 1st that
asks for the party's nominees to be nominated at the primary election, binds
the party to the results of a blanket primary, and waives the party's First
Amendment rights of association for that election cycle, the primary will not
be held and all candidates will advance to the general election based upon
party nominations decided at a convention.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.18.010 and 1990 c
59 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

In accordance with
section 1 of this act, candidates for the following offices shall be either
nominated at party conventions or at partisan primaries held pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter:

(1) Congressional
offices;

(2) All state offices
except (a) judicial offices and (b) the office of superintendent of public
instruction;

(3) All county offices
except (a) judicial offices and (b) those offices where a county home rule
charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.24.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 329 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
"convention" for the purposes of this chapter, is an organized
assemblage of registered voters representing an independent candidate or
candidates or a ((new or minor)) political party, organization, or
principle. As used in this chapter, the term "election jurisdiction"
shall mean the state or any political subdivision or jurisdiction of the state
from which partisan officials are elected. This term shall include county
commissioner districts or council districts for members of a county legislative
authority, counties for county officials who are nominated and elected on a
county-wide basis, legislative districts for members of the legislature,
congressional districts for members of congress, and the state for president
and vice president, members of the United States senate, and state officials
who are elected on a statewide basis.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.24.025 and 1989 c
215 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each ((minor)) political
party or independent candidate must publish a notice in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county in which the party or the candidate intends to
hold a convention. The notice must appear at least ten days before the
convention is to be held, and shall state the date, time, and place of the
convention. Additionally, it shall include the mailing address of the person
or organization sponsoring the convention.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.24.035 and 2001 c
64 s 1 and 2001 c 30 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

A nominating petition
submitted under this chapter shall clearly identify the name of the ((minor))
political party or independent candidate convention as it appears on the
certificate of nomination as required by RCW 29.24.040(3). The petition shall
also contain a statement that the person signing the petition is a registered
voter of the state of Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign
his or her name and to print his or her name and address. No person may sign
more than one nominating petition under this chapter for an office for a
primary or election.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.24.040 and 1989 c
215 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A certificate
evidencing nominations made at a convention must:

(1) Be in writing;

(2) Contain the name of
each person nominated, his residence, and the office for which he is named, and
if the nomination is for the offices of president and vice president of the
United States, a sworn statement from both nominees giving their consent to the
nomination;

(3) Identify the ((minor))
political party or the independent candidate on whose behalf the convention was
held;

(4) Be verified by the
oath of the presiding officer and secretary;

(5) Be accompanied by a
nominating petition or petitions bearing the signatures and addresses of
registered voters equal in number to that required by RCW 29.24.030;

(6) Contain proof of
publication of the notice of calling the convention; and

(7) Be submitted to the
appropriate filing officer not later than one week following the adjournment of
the convention at which the nominations were made. If the nominations are made
only for offices whose jurisdiction is entirely within one county, the certificate
and nominating petitions must be filed with the county auditor. If a ((minor))
political party or independent candidate convention nominates any
candidates for offices whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, all
nominating petitions and the convention certificates must be filed with the
secretary of state.

Sec. 7. RCW 29.24.070 and 1990 c
59 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

Not later than the
Friday immediately preceding the first day for candidates to file, the
secretary of state shall notify the county auditors of the names and
designations of all ((minor)) political party and independent
candidates who have filed valid convention certificates and nominating
petitions with that office. Except for the offices of president and vice
president, persons nominated under this chapter shall file declarations of
candidacy as provided by RCW 29.15.010 and 29.15.030. The name of a candidate
nominated at a convention shall not be printed upon the primary ballot unless
((he)) the candidate pays the fee required by law to be paid by
candidates for the same office to be nominated at a primary.

Sec. 8. RCW 29.30.085 and 1992 c
181 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 29.30.086, section 1 of this act, and in subsection (2) of this
section, on the ballot at the general election for a nonpartisan office for
which a primary was held, only the names of the candidate who received the
greatest number of votes and the candidate who received the next greatest
number of votes for that office shall appear under the title of that office,
and the names shall appear in that order. If a primary was conducted, no
candidate's name may be printed on the subsequent general election ballot
unless he or she receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that
office at the preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election for any
other nonpartisan office for which no primary was held, the names of the
candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW 29.30.025.

(2) On the ballot at
the general election for the office of justice of the supreme court, judge of
the court of appeals, judge of the superior court, or state superintendent of
public instruction, if a candidate in a contested primary receives a majority
of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the name of that
candidate may be printed under the title of the office for that position.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---