BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the procurement and distribution of groceries, general merchandise,
products, and commodities that are necessary or useful in the retail grocery
business incur different tax costs, depending upon the means chosen to procure
and distribute such inventory. Independent grocery stores have organized
themselves into cooperatives to gain volume-buying power that enable them to
benefit from the economies of scale. It is the intent of the legislature to
provide these grocery distribution cooperatives the same tax treatment enjoyed
by vertically integrated grocery chains.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The amount of tax
with respect to a grocery distribution cooperative's sales to customer-owners
of the grocery distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the
grocery distribution cooperative is equal to the gross income of the business
derived from sales multiplied by the rate of one and one‑half percent.

(2) A grocery
distribution cooperative is allowed a deduction from the gross income derived
from sales of groceries or related goods for resale, excluding items subject to
tax under RCW 82.04.260(4), to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery distribution cooperative
that is equal to the gross income the represents the actual cost of the
merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to customer-owners.

(3) For purposes of
this section, a "grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity
that: (a) Sells groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative or to customer-owners of another entity controlling
the grocery distribution cooperative; (b) has annual gross income derived from
sales to customer-owners whose stores are primarily located in the state of
Washington in excess of three hundred million dollars annually; and (c) has
customer-owners, in the aggregate, who own a majority of the outstanding
ownership interests of the grocery distribution cooperative or of the entity
controlling the grocery distribution cooperative. A "customer-owner"
means a person who has an ownership interest in a grocery distribution
cooperative or an entity controlling a grocery distribution cooperative, and
purchases groceries and related items at wholesale from that grocery
distribution cooperative. "Controlling" means holding fifty percent
or more of the voting interests of an entity and having at least equal power to
direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity, whether
through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.270 and 1999 c
358 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon every person
except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(5), section 2 of this act, or
82.04.272 engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
wholesale; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by the
rate of 0.484 percent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2001.

---
END ---