BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.370 and 1999 c
311 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative
authority of a rural county may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.08 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax((, except that for rural counties with population
densities between sixty and one hundred persons per square mile, the rate shall
not exceed 0.04 percent before January 1, 2000)). No tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the
date that a tax is first imposed under this section.

(2) The tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3) Moneys collected
under this section shall only be used for the purpose of private sector job
creation or retention by financing the acquisition, construction,
rehabilitation, alteration, expansion, or improvements and related costs of
public facilities in rural counties. The public facility must be listed as an
item in the officially adopted county overall economic development plan, or the
economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan, or the
comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for those
counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that do not have an
adopted overall economic development plan and do not plan under the growth
management act, the public facility must be listed in the county's capital
facilities plan or the capital facilities plan of a city or town located within
the county. In implementing this section, the county shall consult with
cities, towns, and port districts located within the county. ((For the
purposes of))

(4) The definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section((,)).

(a) "Public
facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water
facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth stabilization, storm sewer
facilities, railroad, electricity, natural gas, buildings, structures,
telecommunications infrastructure, transportation infrastructure, or commercial
infrastructure, and port facilities in the state of Washington.

(((4) No tax may be
collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be collected
under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the date that
a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5) For purposes of
this section,))

(b) "Related
costs" may include development of land and improvements for public
facilities, project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility and marketing studies and plans, project design, site
planning and analysis, and project debt and revenue impact analysis.

(c) "Rural
county" means a county with a population density of less than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial management and
published each year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

(5) Notwithstanding
the provisions of this section, moneys collected under this section may not be
used for financing (a) electrical distribution or transmission facilities on
property or premises that currently take electric service from an electric
utility as defined in RCW 19.29A.010; (b) electric distribution or transmission
facilities beyond the legal boundary of an undeveloped site; or (c) electric
generation facilities that provide electricity for use beyond the legal
boundary of a development site.

(6) No
moneys collected under this section may be provided to an electric utility as
defined in RCW 19.29A.010 for the purpose of funding a public facility for
electricity generation, transmission, or distribution.

--- END ---