BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND
FINDINGS.
The legislature finds that the public health and safety of its citizens, the
natural resources, and the environment are vital interests of the state that
need to be protected and preserved. The legislature further finds that the
safety of the traveling public and the state's economic well-being are vital interests
that depend upon the development of cost-effective and efficient transportation
systems planned, designed, constructed, and maintained through expedited permit
decision-making processes.

It is the intent of the
legislature to achieve transportation permit reform that expedites the delivery
of statewide significant transportation projects through a streamlined approach
to environmental permit decision making. To optimize the limited resources
available for transportation system improvements and environmental protection,
state regulatory and natural resource agencies, public and private sector
interests, Indian tribes, and the department of transportation must work
cooperatively to establish common goals, minimize project delays, develop
consistency in the application of environmental standards, maximize
environmental benefits through coordinated investment strategies, and eliminate
duplicative processes through assigned responsibilities of selected permit
drafting and compliance activities between state and federal agencies.

Therefore, the
transportation permit efficiency and accountability committee is created. The
committee shall integrate current environmental standards, but may not create
new environmental standards. The committee shall conduct three environmental
permit streamlining pilot projects and create a process to develop general
permits. Additionally, the committee shall seek federal delegation to the
state where appropriate to streamline transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
indicates otherwise.

(1) "Assigned
responsibilities" means those components of developing and implementing
environmental permits, including but not limited to, environmental review and
assessment, selected permit drafting, and selected on-site compliance
activities that may be conducted by the department.

(2) "Best
available information" means the existing sources of data, including
limiting factors analyses required under chapter 77.85 RCW that can be used to
make informed decisions regarding environmental conditions within a watershed.

(3) "Best
management practices" means currently available and generally accepted
techniques, including new technologies or strategies that seek to reduce the
negative impacts of transportation facilities, projects, and services on
communities and the environment, and promote more efficient and effective use
of transportation facilities.

(4) "Committee"
means the transportation permit efficiency and accountability committee created
in section 3 of this act.

(5) "Least cost
planning" means the use of best available information within a watershed
basin applied to transportation decision making in the planning, permit
decision making, and mitigation phases of a project.

(6) "Low-impact
development project" means an activity or series of actions that conform
to a comprehensive land use planning and engineering design approach with a
goal of maintaining or restoring existing natural habitat functions and
hydrologic regime of urban and developing watersheds. These projects
incorporate strategic watershed planning with site-specific management
techniques to reduce development impacts to better replicate natural watershed
hydrology and water quality, while allowing for development or infrastructure
rehabilitation to occur.

(7) "One-stop
permit decision making" means a coordinated permit decision-making process
that streamlines environmental review and permit decision making for
transportation projects by providing concurrent, consolidated review by each
agency required to review the project.

(8) "Programmatic
approach" means a permit or other action that covers a geographic or
statewide area and applies to a variety of projects, activities, or locales. A
programmatic approach may allow actions to proceed without individual approval
by each permit decision-making agency.

(9)
"Transportation project of statewide significance" means a surface
transportation project or combination of surface transportation projects, that
crosses multiple city or county jurisdictional boundaries or connects major
state destinations in support of the state's economy and is so designated by
the department of transportation and approved by the transportation committees
of the senate and house of representatives. The transportation committees of
the senate and house of representatives may also jointly designate these
projects. The pilot projects established in this chapter are examples of
transportation projects of statewide significance, but transportation projects
of statewide significance are not limited to the pilot projects.

(10)
"Watershed" means a water resource inventory area.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. TRANSPORTATION PERMIT
EFFICIENCY AND ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE. The transportation permit efficiency
and accountability committee is created.

(1) The committee
consists of nine voting members, including two members from the house of
representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses; two senators, one
from each of the two largest caucuses; one member designated by the secretary
of transportation; one member designated by the director of fish and wildlife;
one member designated by the director of ecology; one member designated by the
Association of Washington Cities; and one member designated by the Washington
State Association of Counties. The committee shall elect a chair from the four
legislators appointed to the committee.

(2) The committee also
includes eight nonvoting members, including one member designated by the
Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission; one member designated by the Columbia
River Intertribal Fisheries Commission; one member designated by the Consulting
Engineers Council of Washington; one member designated by the Associated
General Contractors of Washington; one member designated by the Association of
Washington Business; one member designated by the Washington State Building and
Construction Trades Council; one member designated by statewide environmental
organizations; and one member designated by the State Fish and Wildlife
Commission, to represent the interests of citizens engaged in fish and wildlife
recovery.

(3) A representative
from the department of natural resources and representatives from federal
regulatory and transportation agencies, including the Environmental Protection
Agency, National Marine Fisheries Service, United States Army Corps of
Engineers, Federal Highways Administration, and United States Fish and Wildlife
Service must be invited to participate in committee deliberations as nonvoting
members.

(4) The committee may
create technical subcommittees as needed. Technical subcommittees created for
a specific pilot project or pilot projects must include, but are not limited
to, representatives of local governments from jurisdictions affected by those
projects. Recommendations made by a technical subcommittee must be approved by
a majority of the voting members of the committee.

(5) Nonvoting members will
not be compensated but will receive reimbursement for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) The department of
transportation office of environmental affairs shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the committee.

(7) No vote of the
committee may overrule existing statutes, regulations, or local ordinances.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. COMMITTEE
RESPONSIBILITIES. (1) The committee and its authorized technical subcommittees
shall develop a one-stop permit decision-making process that uses
interdisciplinary review of transportation projects of statewide significance
to streamline and expedite permit decision making. The committee shall
collaborate with appropriate agencies and parties to identify existing
environmental standards, to assess the application of those standards, and
develop an integrated permitting process based upon environmental standards and
best management practices, which may use prescriptive or performance standards,
for transportation projects of statewide significance that can be applied with
certainty, consistency, and assurance of swift permit action, while taking into
account the varying environmental conditions throughout the state.

(2) The committee shall
give notice to the legislative authority of each affected county and city of
the projects that are designated as transportation projects of statewide
significance.

(3) The committee shall
create a technical subcommittee with representation at a minimum from the
department of fish and wildlife, the department of ecology, and the department
of transportation.

(a) Within six months
from the first meeting of the committee, the subcommittee shall create a
process to develop a programmatic approach for transportation projects. The
committee shall review the department's construction project list to determine
which projects or activities may be included in the programmatic approach and
develop agreements to cover those projects or activities. At a minimum, this
process must require that decisions on minor variations to the requirements of
a programmatic approach must be provided by the permit decision-making agencies
within twenty-one days of submittal.

(b) The technical
subcommittee's recommendations must be approved by a majority of the voting
members of the committee.

(4) The committee shall
explore the development of a consolidated local permit process.

(5) The committee shall
develop and prioritize a list of permit streamlining opportunities,
specifically identifying substantive and procedural duplications and
recommendations for resolving those duplications. The committee shall evaluate
current laws and regulations and develop recommendations on ways to minimize
the lapsing of permits. The committee shall evaluate flexible approaches that
maximize transportation and environmental interests and make recommendations
regarding where those approaches should be implemented. The committee shall
report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by January 15, 2002.

(6) The committee shall
undertake the following activities to develop a watershed approach to
environmental mitigation:

(a) Develop methodologies
for analyzing environmental impacts and applying compensatory mitigation
consistent with a watershed-based approach before final design, including least
cost methodology and low-impact development methodology;

(b) Assess models to
collate and access watershed data to support early agency involvement in
transportation planning and reviews under the national Environmental Policy Act
and the State Environmental Policy Act; and

(c) Use existing best
available information from watershed planning efforts, lead entities, regional
fisheries enhancement groups, and other recognized entities as deemed
appropriate by the committee, to determine potential mitigation requirements
for projects within a watershed. Priority consideration should be given to the
use of the state's alternative mitigation policy guidance to best link
transportation mitigation needs with local watershed and lead entity project
lists.

(7) The committee shall
seek federal delegation to the state where appropriate to streamline permit
processes for transportation projects of statewide significance including:
Delegation of section 404 permit authority under the Clean Water Act;
nonfederal lead agency status under the federal Endangered Species Act; section
106 cultural resource designation under the National Historic Preservation Act;
and other appropriate authority that when delegated should result in permit
streamlining.

(8) The committee shall
develop a dispute resolution process to resolve conflicts in interpretation of
environmental standards and best management practices, mitigation requirements,
permit requirements, assigned responsibilities, and other related issues by
September 1, 2001. The dispute resolution process may not abrogate or supplant
any appeal right of any party under existing statutes. The dispute resolution
process must be designed to include federal agencies if they choose to
participate.

(9) The committee shall
develop preliminary models and strategies for agencies to test how best to
maximize the environmental investment of transportation funds on a watershed
basis. After agencies test the models and strategies developed by the
committee, the committee shall evaluate the models and strategies and make
recommendations to the legislature.

(10) The committee
shall develop a consistent methodology for the timely and predictable submittal
and evaluation of completed plans and specifications detailing project elements
that impact environmental resources as well as proposed mitigation measures
during the preliminary specifications and engineering phase of project
development and submit information on the consistent methodology to the
legislature.

(11) The committee
shall provide a summary report to the legislature on September 15, 2001, and
every six months thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. PILOT PROJECTS. (1) The
committee shall select and conduct permit reform pilot projects in three
locales: (a) Urban near built-out conditions; (b) urban centers serving as
crucial rural connectors; and (c) rural corridors critical to statewide
economic productivity. The pilot projects must test the assignment of
responsibilities such as selected permit drafting and selected compliance
activities to the department.

(2) The committee shall
commence efforts to apply streamlining lessons learned from the streamlined
permit process for the pilot projects to as many other transportation projects
of statewide significance as quickly as possible. In reporting to the
legislature, the committee may recommend statutory or regulatory changes that
would result in streamlining for future projects.

(3) The department and
permitting agencies shall apply an interim interdisciplinary permit review
process for the pilot projects as set forth in this section. This process must
provide coordinated review and approval of permit applications; provide
coordinated and consolidated public hearings where required by one or more
regulatory agencies under state law; and coordinate timelines for permit
decision making.

(4) The committee shall
give notice to the legislative authority of each affected county and city of
the projects the committee has designated as pilot projects. Each county and
city notified must be offered the opportunity to participate in the pilot
projects as provided for in this chapter. The department shall provide funding
assistance for participation.

(5) The committee shall
develop a dispute resolution process to resolve conflicts in interpretation of
environmental standards and best management practices, mitigation requirements,
permit requirements, assigned responsibilities, the streamlined process for
pilot projects set forth in this section, and other related issues by September
1, 2001. The dispute resolution process may not abrogate or supplant any appeal
right of any party under existing statutes. The dispute resolution process
must be designed to include federal agencies if they choose to participate.
The dispute resolution process must be applied to the pilot projects.

(6) The streamlined
process for the pilot projects must be based on the following model:

(a) Step 1: The
department and permitting agencies will agree on coordination for environmental
review under the state and national environmental policy acts, including
document preparation, public comment opportunities, and timelines.

(b) Step 2: For each
project, the department will convene a meeting of all entities with permitting
authority to review:

(i) The proposed
conceptual design for the project and alternative routes, construction
approaches, or mitigation approaches;

(ii) All known
reviewing entities, permit application and approval requirements, and
timelines; and

(iii) A coordinated
timeline that allows all statutory requirements to be met.

(c) Step 3: The
department will draft all necessary permits to proceed with the preferred
alternative using relevant agreements with permitting agencies.

(d) Step 4: The
department will provide public notice in conformity with all applicable
statutes and regulations and allow the required time for public hearings and
written comments.

(e) Step 5: The
department may revise the draft permits after consideration of public comments
and applying all relevant agreed upon standards.

(f) Step 6: All
permits will be disseminated to permitting agencies for final review. All
reviews will be completed within forty-five days, at which time the permitting
agencies will act upon the permit and either approve the permit or return it
without approval.

(g) Step 7: If the
permit is returned to the department without approval, the permitting agencies
will have one opportunity to identify errors or omissions and any remaining
specific deficiencies or circumstances not previously addressed by agreements
between the department and agencies that must be met or addressed to be
compliant with applicable law. The department may revise the permit as
warranted and resubmit the permit to the permitting agency, which will have
fifteen days from receipt of the revised permit to take final action.

(h) Step 8: Disputes
related to permit decisions will be addressed by the dispute resolution process
established by the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. LOCAL GOVERNMENT
PARTICIPATION. (1) This section establishes procedures for city, town, and
county governments to participate in the processes identified in this chapter
to provide for coordinated, multijurisdictional environmental review and
permitting decisions for pilot projects and transportation projects of
statewide significance.

(2) Each city, town,
and county within whose boundaries is located or partially located one or more
projects identified in subsection (1) of this section, shall elect whether or
not to participate in coordinated processes for environmental review and
permitting of those projects as required in this chapter. If the city, town,
or county elects to participate, it may do so as either a participating entity
or as an assigning entity.

(a) If a city, town, or
county elects to be considered as a participating entity, the committee must
then include a representative designated by the city, town, or county in the
coordinated review of the project. The department shall compensate the
jurisdiction for technical support required for participation in the process.
The jurisdiction will also be eligible for reimbursement for permit fees set by
local ordinances and other agreed upon costs associated with the issuance of
project permits.

(b) For the purposes of
expediting the permit process, a city, town, or county may elect to assign its
permit responsibilities under chapter 39.34 RCW to the department
simultaneously with its notification to the department as specified in this
section. The city, town, or county electing to assign its responsibilities
shall enter into an agreement with the department to define the local permit
requirements that must be met. Permits issued under the negotiated agreement
are presumed to at least meet local environmental permit requirements. A city,
town, or county choosing to use this option is eligible for a permit fee set by
local ordinances associated with the issuance of the project permits.

(3) If the city, town,
or county elects not to participate in the coordinated processes for the pilot
projects designated in this chapter or transportation projects of statewide
significance the department will issue the locally required permits, when
allowable. The department shall comply with all provisions of city, town, and
county ordinances, and the department permit approval is presumed to at least
meet the local environmental review and permit requirements.

(4) Any city, town, or
county shall notify the department within sixty days of receipt of the
committee's notification of project designation, as to whether it elects to be
considered as a participating entity or an assigning entity, or elects not to
participate in the coordinated process provided in this chapter.

(5) The committee shall
review and evaluate the process by which local governments review and approve
pilot projects and transportation projects of statewide significance, and shall
provide recommendations to the legislature to improve the coordination of the
local process with state and federal reviews as part of the reports required by
this chapter.

(6) A city, town, or
county is not liable for decisions made by the department that result in a
failure to comply with city, town, or county ordinances except as provided in
the interlocal agreements, and the department shall defend and answer to any actions
or complaints challenging the validity of permits issued under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. INTERIM PERMIT PROCESS.
Until integrated standards and best management practices have been adopted by
the committee, the department may use the following process for transportation
projects of statewide significance, including projects requested by a project
sponsor.

(1) Step 1: Conceptual
description. The department will identify project purposes, the approximate
location or alternative locations, and the federal, state, and local agencies
that might have authority to review and approve the project or portions of it
at any such locations, and a preliminary interagency communication list
identifying agencies that may be interested in the proposed project and, where
known, contact persons in such agencies. If the department is going to proceed
with step 2 or to abandon the project, it may complete step 1 by: (a)
Providing a summary of the outcome to all agencies on the list; and (b) making
the summary available to the public.

(2) Step 2: Early
involvement of other agencies. (a) At any time after completing step 1, the
department will provide notice to all agencies on the interagency communication
list and the public. Within thirty days, or a longer time if specified by the
department, each state, local, and federal agency will be encouraged to
identify:

(i) A primary contact
person to coordinate future communications with the department and other
interested agencies regarding the project, or indicate that it has no interest
in the project and need not remain on the project information list;

(ii) Its role with
respect to the proposed project;

(iii) Additional
alternative locations the department should consider and the roles it would
expect to have with the project at those locations;

(iv) Other agencies it
believes should be added to the list for the project; and

(v) Other information
the agency requests the department to consider.

(b) After all state and
local agencies on the list have responded, or at least ten days after
expiration of the specified response time, the department may complete step 2
by: (i) Proposing one or more conceptual designs for the project at a proposed
location and any alternative locations then being considered; (ii) providing a
summary of the results of step 2, including a statement that the department
considers step 2 to be complete or complete except for specified issues
remaining to be resolved with specified agencies, to all agencies on the
interagency communication list; and (iii) making the summary available to the
public.

(3) Step 3: Identify
environmental reviews, permits, and other approvals, application procedures,
and decision standards. (a) At any time after completing step 2, the
department may initiate step 3 by notice to all agencies on the list and the
public. This notice may include a threshold determination on whether an
environmental impact statement (EIS) or supplemental EIS will be prepared or an
environmental checklist and request for comments on what steps should be taken
to comply with chapter 43.21C RCW, the State Environmental Policy Act (SEPA).
Within thirty days, or a longer time if specified by the department, each
state, local, and federal agency will be encouraged to identify:

(i) The procedures
under which it expects environmental reviews of the project to occur;

(ii) All permits and
other approvals it might require for the project at each alternative location
and conceptual design;

(iii) What is needed
for the department to file a complete application for each permit or other
approval;

(iv) The laws,
regulations, ordinances, and policies it would administer with respect to the
project at each alternative location and conceptual design; and

(v) Other information
the agency requests the department to consider in deciding whether, when,
where, or how to proceed with the project.

(b) After all state and
local agencies on the list have responded, or at least ten days after
expiration of the specified response time, the department may complete step 3
by:

(i) Adopting a list of
all environmental reviews, permits, and other approvals it believes are needed
for the project under each alternative being considered;

(ii) Providing all
agencies on the list a copy of that list and a summary of the other results of
step 3, including a statement that the department considers step 3 to be
complete or complete except for specified issues remaining to be resolved with
specified agencies; and

(iii) Making the list
and summary available to the public.

(c) The list and
summary will be presumed to accurately identify all environmental reviews,
permits, and other approvals needed for each alternative described, what is
required for applications to be considered complete, and the standards under
which applications will be reviewed and approved, unless an aggrieved agency or
person files objections within thirty days after the list and summary are
distributed.

(4) Step 4: Tentative
selection of preferred alternative. (a) At any time after completing step 3,
the department may initiate step 4 by notice to all agencies on the list and
the public. This notice may be accompanied by a scoping notice for an EIS or
supplemental EIS or, if available, be accompanied by a draft EIS or
supplemental EIS. It also may be accompanied by the department's preliminary
analysis of the advantages and disadvantages of each identified alternative, or
other information that may be helpful to other interested agencies and the
public in identifying advantages and disadvantages. Within fourteen days, or a
longer time if specified by the department, each state, local, and federal
agency will be encouraged to identify:

(i) For each identified
alternative, the specific features it considers significant with respect to its
role in environmental reviews, permits, or other approvals for the project; the
reasons these features are significant, and any concerns it may have about the
alternative because of potential adverse impacts of these features on resources
or social policies within its jurisdiction;

(ii) For each feature
for which it raises concerns, recommendations on how the potential adverse
impacts could be avoided, minimized, and mitigated;

(iii) For each feature
for which it raises concerns, an assessment of the relative ranking of each
alternative with respect to whether and to what extent these concerns apply;

(iv) Recommendations
the agency may have as to which alternatives should be retained or dropped from
further consideration, and ways in which alternatives might be modified or
combined to address its concerns, recognizing that final decisions can be made
only through the applicable environmental review, permit, and other approval
processes and the agency making them is not bound with respect to any future
decisions it may make regarding the project;

(v) Other information
the agency requests the department to consider in deciding whether, when,
where, or how to proceed with the project.

(b) After all state and
local agencies on the list have responded, or at least ten days after
expiration of the specified response time, the department may complete step 4
by:

(i) Selecting a
preferred alternative for purposes of all environmental reviews, permits, and
other approvals needed for the project;

(ii) Providing all
agencies on the list a description of the preferred alternative and summary of
the other results of step 4, including a statement that the department
considers step 4 to be complete or complete except for specified issues
remaining to be resolved with specified agencies; and

(iii) Making the preferred
alternative and summary available to the public. The preferred alternative
will be identified in all environmental reviews, permits, and other approvals
needed for the project.

(5) Step 5: Completing
environmental reviews and applications for permits and other approvals. (a) At
any time after completing step 4, the department may initiate step 5 by notice
to all agencies on the list and the public. A draft EIS or supplemental EIS,
the department's draft plans and specifications for the project, and draft
applications for some or all permits and other approvals may be provided with
the notice or when they subsequently become available. Within thirty days, or
a longer time if specified by the department, each state, local, and federal
agency will be encouraged to identify:

(i) All concerns it
previously raised regarding the alternative, and other alternatives still under
consideration, that have not been resolved to its satisfaction;

(ii) Additional
concerns it may have, particularly concerns resulting from additional
information about the project location and design, and other new information
received since the completion of step 4;

(iii) Additional
environmental reviews, permits, or other approvals needed for the preferred
alternative because of changes in laws, regulations, or policies or changes in
the project location or design since these issues were last reviewed in step 3
or 4;

(iv) Changes in
applicable requirements for complete applications for permits or other
approvals under its jurisdiction since these issues were last reviewed in step
3 or 4;

(v) Other changes in
applicable laws, regulations, ordinances, or policies administered by the
agency since these issues were last reviewed in step 3 or 4;

(vi) Whether a draft
application proposed by the department for a permit or other approval from the
agency is complete, and if not, what additional information or other changes
are needed for it to be complete.

(b) When all state and
local agencies on the list have responded, or at least ten days after
expiration of the specified response time, the department may complete step 5
by:

(i) Completing some or
all environmental review processes and draft application forms for permits and
other approvals that it reasonably believes to be complete;

(ii) Providing all
agencies on the interagency communication list with environmental review and
application documents and a summary of the other results of step 5, including a
statement that the department considers step 5 to be complete or complete except
for specified issues remaining to be resolved with specified agencies; and

(iii) Making the
completed environmental review documents and summary available to the public.
The preferred alternative will be identified in all environmental reviews,
permits, and other approvals needed for the project.

(c) However, if an
interested agency or aggrieved person files objections within fourteen days
after the preferred alternative and summary are distributed, the objections
will be addressed in subsequent environmental reviews and agency decisions
regarding the project.

(6) Step 6: Completing
the environmental review, permit, and other approval processes. (a) At any
time after completing step 5, the department may initiate step 6 by notice to
all agencies on the list and the public and filing applications for some or all
permits and other approvals needed for the project. Within thirty days, or a
longer time if specified by the department, each state, local, and federal
agency will be encouraged to:

(i) Acknowledge receipt
of draft environmental review documents provided to them and provide comments
on them;

(ii) Acknowledge
receipt of final environmental review documents and determine that they are
adequate for purposes of their roles regarding the project or specify what
additional information or changes are needed for them to be considered
adequate;

(iii) Acknowledge
receipt of each application filed with them and determine that the application
is complete or specify what additional information or changes are needed for it
to be considered complete;

(iv) Acknowledge that
the applications submitted to them will be processed under the laws,
regulations, ordinances, and policies previously identified under steps 3, 4,
and 5 or specify what changes have occurred in the governing standards that
were in effect on the date a complete application was filed and thus apply to
the project;

(v) Identify the
significant steps necessary for the agency to reach a final decision on
applications and the estimated time needed for each step;

(vi) Identify ways its
decision-making process might be made more efficient and effective through
additional coordination with other agencies, with any recommendations for such
methods as joint solicitation and review of public comments and jointly
conducting public hearings.

(b) It is recognized
that step 6 may require an iterative process with several drafts of various
environmental review documents and applications being considered and revised,
and that changes in project location or design resulting from the permit
decisions of one agency may require revising applications or even reopening
permit decisions of other agencies. All state and local agencies are expected,
and federal agencies are encouraged, to communicate and cooperate to minimize
the number of iterations required and make the process as efficient and
effective as possible. Unless significant new information is obtained,
decisions made under step 6 should not be reopened except at the request of the
department, and the most recent information available under steps 3, 4, and 5
should be presumed accurate until significant new information becomes
available.

(c) If all
environmental reviews have not been completed and all permits and other
approvals obtained within forty-five days after step 6 is initiated, the
department, by notice to all agencies on the list and the public, may set a
deadline for completing reviews and decisions. At any time after the deadline,
the department may terminate the coordination process of this section as to
some or all of the reviews and decisions that are still not completed.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. DEPARTMENT ORGANIZATION
AND ADMINISTRATIVE ACTIONS. The legislature finds that an essential component
of streamlined permit decision making is the ability of the department to
demonstrate the capacity to meet environmental responsibilities. Therefore, the
legislature directs that:

(1) The department may
amend its operating practices applicable to obtaining project permits when:

(a) Agreements on
standards or best management practices as appropriate, are reached under
section 4 of this act;

(b) The committee
determines that streamlining procedures and methodologies implemented for pilot
projects consistent with section 5 of this act warrant broader application;

(c) The committee
determines that the assignment of responsibilities between regulating agencies
and the department is appropriate for broader use.

(2) The department may
develop permits for review by permitting agencies when agreement on the
standards and best management practices covered by such permits have been
reached under section 4 of this act. Regulating agencies shall review permits
based upon the agreed upon standards and timelines developed in section 4 of
this act, as well as any other applicable existing standards.

(3) Qualified
environmental staff within the department shall lead the development of all
environmental documentation associated with department projects and permit
activities in accordance with the department's project delivery tools.

(4) The department
shall conduct special prebid meetings for projects that are environmentally
complex. In addition, the department shall review environmental considerations
related to these projects during the preconstruction meeting held with the
contractor who is awarded the bid.

(5) Environmental staff
at the department shall conduct field inspections to ensure that project
activities are performed under permit conditions. These inspectors:

(a) May issue stop work
orders when compliance with permit standards are not being met; and

(b) For this portion of
their job duties, are accountable to the director of environmental affairs of
the department.

(6) Failure to comply
with a stop work order may result in civil penalties being assessed against the
department and individuals involved. Willful violation of a stop work notice
issued by the department is subject to civil penalties assessed on the agency
as well as the individuals involved. Persistent violations by the department
may result in loss of permit drafting and program management responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. TRAINING AND COMPLIANCE.
The legislature expects the department to continue its efforts to improve
training and compliance. The department shall:

(1) Provide training in
environmental procedures and permit requirements for those responsible for
project delivery activities;

(2) Require wetland
mitigation sites to be designed by a qualified interdisciplinary team that
meets training requirements developed by the department's environmental affairs
office in consultation with the department of ecology. Environmental
mitigation site improvements must have oversight by environmental staff;

(3) Develop an
environmental compliance data system to track all permit conditions;

(4) Report all
noncompliance activities to applicable agencies of jurisdiction along with a
remedy plan;

(5) Fund the
departments of ecology, natural resources, and fish and wildlife, operating
under their permit-granting authority to conduct audits of the department's
permit drafting and compliance activities. The department of ecology must
collate the audits in an annual report to the legislature;

(6) Seek federal
funding for dedicated technical staff at federal permit decision-making
agencies and for state costs associated with implementation of this act;

(7) Fund dedicated
technical staff at federal permit decision-making entities, as appropriate, and
the state departments of ecology, natural resources, community, trade, and
economic development, and fish and wildlife to implement the requirements of
this chapter;

(8) Fund a technical
specialist at the Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission and the Columbia River
Intertribal Fisheries Commission for the purpose of implementing this chapter;

(9) Reimburse local
jurisdictions for costs associated with local participation on the committee
and technical subcommittees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. COST REIMBURSEMENT. The
committee shall negotiate a method of cost reimbursement for the costs
associated with carrying out the purposes of this chapter, including prior
departmental agreements with permitting agencies to cover their costs for
transportation projects of statewide significance.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. CAPTIONS. Captions used
in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. This act expires March
31, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances
is not affected.

---
END ---