BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The purpose of this act
is to place a priority on the removal of Cytisus scoparius, more
commonly known as Scotch broom, from Washington state's roadsides. The
legislature recognizes that Scotch broom is a noxious weed that poses a threat
to public health and safety along our state's roadsides. The legislature
recognizes that many of the state's citizens are highly allergic to Scotch
broom and by having it along the roadside where people travel causes serious
health problems and traffic hazards from the effects of allergic reaction. The
legislature recognizes that Scotch broom spreads quickly and is very difficult
to control, and therefore the removal and the prevention of further growth
should be first priority when considering any roadside construction or
maintenance project.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 47.40 RCW to read as follows:

The first
priority of any roadside maintenance or construction project on state highway
property must be the removal, control, or prevention of future growth of Cytisus
scoparius, more commonly known as Scotch broom.

---
END ---