BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.055 and 1999 c
274 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Driver's
instruction permit. The department may issue a driver's instruction permit
with a photograph to an applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the
examination other than the driving test, provided the information required by
RCW 46.20.091, paid a ((five-dollar)) thirty-dollar fee, and
meets the following requirements:

(a) Is at least fifteen
and one-half years of age; or

(b) Is at least fifteen
years of age and:

(i) Has submitted a
proper application; and

(ii) Is enrolled in a
traffic safety education program approved and accredited by the superintendent
of public instruction that includes practice driving.

(2) Nonphoto permit
fee. An applicant who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section other than payment of the ((five-dollar)) thirty-dollar
fee may obtain a driver's instruction permit without a photograph by paying a
fee of ((four)) twenty-nine dollars.

(3) Waiver of written
examination for instruction permit. The department may waive the written
examination, if, at the time of application, an applicant is enrolled in:

(a) A traffic safety
education course as defined by RCW 28A.220.020(2); or

(b) A course of
instruction offered by a licensed driver training school as defined by RCW
46.82.280(1).

The department may
require proof of registration in such a course as it deems necessary.

(4) Effect of
instruction permit. A person holding a driver's instruction permit may drive
a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, upon the public highways if:

(a) The person has
immediate possession of the permit; and

(b) An approved
instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five years of driving
experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.

(5) Term of
instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is valid for one year
from the date of issue.

(a) The department may
issue one additional one-year permit.

(b) The
department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds after an investigation
that the permittee is diligently seeking to improve driving proficiency.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.120 and 1999 c
308 s 1 and 1999 c 199 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

An applicant for a new
or renewed driver's license must successfully pass a driver licensing
examination to qualify for a driver's license. The department shall give
examinations at places and times reasonably available to the people of this
state.

(1) Waiver. The
department may waive:

(a) All or any part of
the examination of any person applying for the renewal of a driver's license
unless the department determines that the applicant is not qualified to hold a
driver's license under this title; or

(b) The actual
demonstration of the ability to operate a motor vehicle if the applicant:

(i) Surrenders a valid
driver's license issued by the person's previous home state; and

(ii) Is otherwise
qualified to be licensed.

(2) Fee. Each
applicant for a new license must pay an examination fee of ((seven)) twenty-four
dollars.

(a) The examination fee
is in addition to the fee charged for issuance of the license.

(b) "New
license" means a license issued to a driver:

(i) Who has not been
previously licensed in this state; or

(ii) Whose last
previous Washington license has been expired for more than five years.

(3) A person whose
license expired or will expire on or after January 1, 1998, while he or she was
or is living outside the state may:

(a) Apply to the
department to extend the validity of his or her license for no more than twelve
months. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction that he or
she is unable to return to Washington before the date his or her license
expires, the department shall extend the person's license. The department may
grant consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this section does
not change the expiration date of the license for purposes of RCW 46.20.181.
The department shall charge a fee of five dollars for each license extension;

(b) Apply to the
department to renew his or her license by mail. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to Washington
within twelve months of the date that his or her license expires, the
department shall renew the person's license by mail. If a person qualifies for
a mail-in renewal he or she is not required to pass an examination nor provide
an updated photograph. He or she must, however, pay the fee required by RCW
46.20.181 plus an additional five-dollar mail-in renewal fee. A license
renewed by mail that does not include a photograph of the licensee must be
labeled "not valid for identification purposes."

(4) If a person's
driver's license is extended or renewed under subsection (3) of this section
while he or she is outside the state, he or she must submit to the examination
required under this section within sixty days of returning to this state. The
department will not assess a penalty or examination fee for the examination.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.041 and 1998 c
212 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) The department shall
forward all funds accruing under the provisions of chapter 46.20 RCW together
with a proper identifying, detailed report to the state treasurer ((who
shall deposit such moneys to the credit of the highway safety fund)).

(2) The treasurer
shall deposit twenty-five dollars of each driver's instruction permit fee and
seventeen dollars of each driver's license examination fee to the credit of the
public safety and education account for use in traffic safety education in
public schools.

(3) The treasurer
shall deposit sixty-three percent of each fee collected by the department
under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(b)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) ((shall be deposited
in)) to the credit of the impaired driving safety account.

(4) The
treasurer shall deposit the balance of the funds forwarded under subsection (1)
of this section to the credit of the highway safety fund.

---
END ---