BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

A countywide port
district located in part or in whole within the Grays Harbor pilotage district,
as defined by RCW 88.16.050(2), may commence pilotage service with the
following powers and subject to the conditions contained in this section.

(1) Persons employed to
perform the pilotage service of a port district must be licensed under chapter
88.16 RCW to provide pilotage.

(2) Before establishing
pilotage service, a port district shall give at least sixty days' written
notice to the chairman of the board of pilotage commissioners to provide
pilotage.

(3) A port district
providing pilotage service under this section requiring additional pilots may
petition the board of pilotage commissioners to qualify and license as a pilot
a person who has passed the examination and is on the waiting list for the training
program for the district. If there are no persons on the waiting list, the
board shall solicit applicants and offer the examination.

(4) In addition to the
power to employ or contract with pilots, a port district providing pilotage
services under this section has such other powers as are reasonably necessary
to accomplish the purpose of this section including, but not limited to,
providing through ownership or contract pilots launches, dispatcher services,
or ancillary tug services required for operations or safety.

(5) A port district
providing pilotage services under this section may recommend to the board of
pilotage commissioners rules of service, rates, and tariffs governing its
pilotage services for consideration and adoption pursuant to RCW 88.16.035.
The rules, rates, and tariffs recommended by the port district must have been
approved in open meetings of the port district ten or more days after published
notice in a newspaper of general circulation and after mailing a copy of the
notice to the chairman of the board of pilotage commissioners.

(6) A pilot providing
pilotage services under this section must comply with all requirements of the
pilotage act, chapter 88.16 RCW, and all rules adopted thereunder.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall study the authorization for the provision of
pilotage services in the Grays Harbor pilotage district and issue a report to
the house of representatives and senate transportation committees no later than
June 30, 2006. Specifically, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall review whether the provisions of this act continue to ensure safe
pilotage in the Grays Harbor port, whether there was a shortage of pilots,
whether shipping has declined since the effective date of this act, and whether
other ports have indicated an interest in providing pilotage services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Nothing in this act is
intended to amend chapter 88.16 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---