BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A tax equal to one
percent of the income determined under subsection (2) of this section is
imposed on an individual who is a nonresident of Washington and who is an
athlete or entertainer.

(2) Income from compensation
for labor or personal services performed within this state will be determined
in the following manner:

(a) The amount of
income to be assigned to Washington for an individual who is a nonresident
salaried athletic team employee will be determined by using a fraction in which
the denominator contains the total number of days in which the individual is
under a duty to perform for the employer, and the numerator is the total number
of those days spent in Washington. For purposes of this section, off-season
training activities, unless conducted at the team's facilities as part of a
team imposed program, are not included in the total number of duty days.
Bonuses earned as a result of play during the regular season or for
participation in championship, play-off, or all-star games must be allocated
under the formula. Signing bonuses are not subject to allocation under the
formula if they are not conditional on playing any games for the team, are
payable separately from any other compensation, and are nonrefundable; and

(b) The amount of
income to be assigned to Washington for an individual who is a nonresident, and
who is an athlete or entertainer not listed in (a) of this subsection, the
person's athletic or entertainment performance in Washington will be determined
by assigning to this state all income directly earned from performances or
athletic contests in this state.

(3)
Revenue collected under this section will be deposited in the youth athletic
facility account created in RCW 43.99N.060.

--- END ---