BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.18.030 and 1998 c
276 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Dwelling
unit" is a structure or that part of a structure which is used as a home,
residence, or sleeping place by one person or by two or more persons
maintaining a common household, including but not limited to single family
residences and units of multiplexes, apartment buildings, and mobile homes.

(2)
"Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the dwelling unit
or the property of which it is a part, and in addition means any person
designated as representative of the landlord.

(3) "Person"
means an individual, group of individuals, corporation, government, or
governmental agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, or
association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any
other legal or commercial entity.

(4) "Occupant"
means any person, including a live-in care provider, other than a tenant, who
occupies a dwelling unit.

(5)
"Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom is
vested:

(a) All or any part of
the legal title to property; or

(b) All or part of the
beneficial ownership, and a right to present use and enjoyment of the property.

(((5))) (6)
"Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances thereto, grounds, and
facilities held out for the use of tenants generally and any other area or
facility which is held out for use by the tenant.

(((6))) (7)
"Rental agreement" means all agreements which establish or modify the
terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any other provisions concerning the
use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.

(((7))) (8)
"Risk level III offender" means any person required to register as a
sex offender or kidnapping offender under RCW 9A.44.130 and classified as a
risk level III offender by a local law enforcement agency under RCW 4.24.550,
the indeterminate sentence review board under RCW 9.95.145, the department of
social and health services under RCW 13.40.217, or the department of
corrections under RCW 72.09.345.

(9) A
"single family residence" is a structure maintained and used as a
single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares one or more
walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be deemed a single family residence
if it has direct access to a street and shares neither heating facilities nor
hot water equipment, nor any other essential facility or service, with any
other dwelling unit.

(((8))) (10)
A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling unit
primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental agreement.

(((9))) (11)
"Reasonable attorney's fees", where authorized in this chapter, means
an amount to be determined including the following factors: The time and labor
required, the novelty and difficulty of the questions involved, the skill
requisite to perform the legal service properly, the fee customarily charged in
the locality for similar legal services, the amount involved and the results
obtained, and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers
performing the services.

(((10))) (12)
"Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or more persons;
(b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name, sign, or symbol; and
(c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for
criminal purposes.

(((11))) (13)
"Gang-related activity" means any activity that occurs within the
gang or advances a gang purpose.

Sec. 2. RCW 59.18.130 and 1998 c
276 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each tenant shall pay
the rental amount at such times and in such amounts as provided for in the
rental agreement or as otherwise provided by law and comply with all
obligations imposed upon tenants by applicable provisions of all municipal,
county, and state codes, statutes, ordinances, and regulations, and in addition
shall:

(1) Keep that part of
the premises which he or she occupies and uses as clean and sanitary as the
conditions of the premises permit;

(2) Properly dispose
from his or her dwelling unit all rubbish, garbage, and other organic or
flammable waste, in a clean and sanitary manner at reasonable and regular
intervals, and assume all costs of extermination and fumigation for infestation
caused by the tenant;

(3) Properly use and
operate all electrical, gas, heating, plumbing and other fixtures and
appliances supplied by the landlord;

(4) Not intentionally
or negligently destroy, deface, damage, impair, or remove any part of the
structure or dwelling, with the appurtenances thereto, including the
facilities, equipment, furniture, furnishings, and appliances, or permit any member
of his or her family, invitee, licensee, or any person acting under his or her
control to do so. Violations may be prosecuted under chapter 9A.48 RCW if the
destruction is intentional and malicious;

(5) Not permit a
nuisance or common waste;

(6) Not engage in
drug-related activity at the rental premises, or allow a subtenant, sublessee,
resident, or anyone else to engage in drug-related activity at the rental
premises with the knowledge or consent of the tenant. "Drug-related
activity" means that activity which constitutes a violation of chapter
69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW;

(7) Provide written
notice to the landlord, prior to physical occupation of the property, that a
tenant or a prospective occupant of the property to be rented is required to
register under RCW 9A.44.130 and is classified as a risk level III offender.
If a tenant or occupant is classified as a risk level III offender after the
property has been occupied by the tenant or occupant, or if a risk level III
offender moves into the residence or on the rental property as a cotenant or
occupant after the original tenant takes occupancy, the tenant must notify the
landlord in writing, within twenty-four hours, of the risk level III offender's
status and intent to occupy the property.

(8) Maintain the
smoke detection device in accordance with the manufacturer's recommendations,
including the replacement of batteries where required for the proper operation
of the smoke detection device, as required in RCW 48.48.140(3);

(((8))) (9)
Not engage in any activity at the rental premises that is:

(a) Imminently
hazardous to the physical safety of other persons on the premises; and

(b)(i) Entails physical
assaults upon another person which result in an arrest; or

(ii) Entails the
unlawful use of a firearm or other deadly weapon as defined in RCW 9A.04.110
which results in an arrest, including threatening another tenant or the
landlord with a firearm or other deadly weapon under RCW 59.18.352. Nothing in
this subsection (8) shall authorize the termination of tenancy and eviction of
the victim of a physical assault or the victim of the use or threatened use of
a firearm or other deadly weapon;

(((9))) (10)
Not engage in any gang-related activity at the premises, as defined in RCW
59.18.030, or allow another to engage in such activity at the premises, that
renders people in at least two or more dwelling units or residences insecure in
life or the use of property or that injures or endangers the safety or health
of people in at least two or more dwelling units or residences. In determining
whether a tenant is engaged in gang-related activity, a court should consider
the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as whether there have
been a significant number of complaints to the landlord about the tenant's
activities at the property, damages done by the tenant to the property,
including the property of other tenants or neighbors, harassment or threats
made by the tenant to other tenants or neighbors that have been reported to law
enforcement agencies, any police incident reports involving the tenant, and the
tenant's criminal history; and

(((10))) (11)
Upon termination and vacation, restore the premises to their initial condition
except for reasonable wear and tear or conditions caused by failure of the
landlord to comply with his or her obligations under this chapter: PROVIDED,
That the tenant shall not be charged for normal cleaning if he or she has paid
a nonrefundable cleaning fee.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.18.180 and 1998 c
276 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the tenant fails
to comply with any portion of RCW 59.18.130 or 59.18.140, and such
noncompliance can substantially affect the health and safety of the tenant or other
tenants, or substantially increase the hazards of fire or accident that can be
remedied by repair, replacement of a damaged item, or cleaning, the tenant
shall comply within thirty days after written notice by the landlord specifying
the noncompliance, or, in the case of emergency as promptly as conditions
require. If the tenant fails to remedy the noncompliance within that period
the landlord may enter the dwelling unit and cause the work to be done and
submit an itemized bill of the actual and reasonable cost of repair, to be
payable on the next date when periodic rent is due, or on terms mutually agreed
to by the landlord and tenant, or immediately if the rental agreement has
terminated. Any substantial noncompliance by the tenant of RCW 59.18.130 or
59.18.140 shall constitute a ground for commencing an action in unlawful
detainer in accordance with the provisions of chapter 59.12 RCW, and a landlord
may commence such action at any time after written notice pursuant to such
chapter. The tenant shall have a defense to an unlawful detainer action filed
solely on this ground if it is determined at the hearing authorized under the
provisions of chapter 59.12 RCW that the tenant is in substantial compliance
with the provisions of this section, or if the tenant remedies the noncomplying
condition within the thirty day period provided for above or any shorter period
determined at the hearing to have been required because of an emergency:
PROVIDED, That if the defective condition is remedied after the commencement of
an unlawful detainer action, the tenant may be liable to the landlord for
statutory costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

(2) If drug-related
activity is alleged to be a basis for termination of tenancy under RCW
59.18.130(6), 59.12.030(5), or 59.20.140(5), the compliance provisions of this
section do not apply and the landlord may proceed directly to an unlawful
detainer action.

(3) If failure to
notify the landlord that the tenant or an occupant is required to be registered
under RCW 9A.44.130 and is classified as a risk level III offender is alleged
to be a basis for termination of tenancy under RCW 59.18.130(8), the compliance
provisions of this section do not apply and the landlord may proceed directly
to an unlawful detainer action in accordance with chapter 59.12 RCW.

(4) If activity
on the premises that creates an imminent hazard to the physical safety of other
persons on the premises as defined in RCW 59.18.130(((8))) (9) is
alleged to be the basis for termination of the tenancy, and the tenant is
arrested as a result of this activity, then the compliance provisions of this
section do not apply and the landlord may proceed directly to an unlawful
detainer action against the tenant who was arrested for this activity.

(((4))) (5)
If gang-related activity, as prohibited under RCW 59.18.130(((9))) (10),
is alleged to be the basis for termination of the tenancy, then the compliance
provisions of this section do not apply and the landlord may proceed directly
to an unlawful detainer action in accordance with chapter 59.12 RCW, and a
landlord may commence such an action at any time after written notice under
chapter 59.12 RCW.

(((5))) (6)
A landlord may not be held liable in any cause of action for bringing an
unlawful detainer action against a tenant for drug-related activity, for
failure to notify in the rental agreement of the tenant's or occupant's
requirement to register under RCW 9A.44.130 and the tenant's or occupant's
classification as a risk level III offender, for creating an imminent
hazard to the physical safety of others, or for engaging in gang-related
activity that renders people in at least two or more dwelling units or
residences insecure in life or the use of property or that injures or endangers
the safety or health of people in at least two or more dwelling units or
residences under this section, if the unlawful detainer action was brought in
good faith. Nothing in this section shall affect a landlord's liability under
RCW 59.18.380 to pay all damages sustained by the tenant should the writ of
restitution be wrongfully sued out.

Sec. 4. RCW 59.18.250 and 1983 c
264 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Initiation by the
landlord of any action listed in RCW 59.18.240 within ninety days after a good
faith and lawful act by the tenant as enumerated in RCW 59.18.240, or within
ninety days after any inspection or proceeding of a governmental agency
resulting from such act, shall create a rebuttable presumption affecting the
burden of proof, that the action is a reprisal or retaliatory action against
the tenant: PROVIDED, That if at the time the landlord gives notice of
termination of tenancy pursuant to chapter 59.12 RCW the tenant is in arrears
in rent or in breach of any other lease or rental obligation, there is a
rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof that the landlord's action
is neither a reprisal nor retaliatory action against the tenant: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if, at the time the landlord gives notice of termination of
tenancy pursuant to chapter 59.12 RCW, the tenant failed to notify the landlord
that the tenant or an occupant is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 and
that the tenant or occupant is classified as a risk level III offender, it is a
rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof that the landlord's action
is neither a reprisal nor retaliatory action against the tenant: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if the court finds that the tenant made a complaint or report to
a governmental authority within ninety days after notice of a proposed increase
in rent or other action in good faith by the landlord, there is a rebuttable
presumption that the complaint or report was not made in good faith: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no presumption against the landlord shall arise under this
section, with respect to an increase in rent, if the landlord, in a notice to
the tenant of increase in rent, specifies reasonable grounds for said increase,
which grounds may include a substantial increase in market value due to
remedial action under this chapter: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the presumption of
retaliation, with respect to an eviction, may be rebutted by evidence that it
is not practical to make necessary repairs while the tenant remains in
occupancy. In any action or eviction proceeding where the tenant prevails upon
his claim or defense that the landlord has violated this section, the tenant
shall be entitled to recover his costs of suit or arbitration, including a
reasonable attorney's fee, and where the landlord prevails upon his claim he
shall be entitled to recover his costs of suit or arbitration, including a
reasonable attorney's fee: PROVIDED FURTHER, That neither party may recover
attorney's fees to the extent that their legal services are provided at no cost
to them.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 59.20 RCW to read as follows:

A person seeking to
rent or occupy a dwelling must provide written notice to the landlord, prior to
physical occupation of the property, that a tenant or a prospective occupant of
the property to be rented is required to register as a sex offender or
kidnapping offender under RCW 9A.44.130 and is classified as a risk level III
offender. If a tenant or occupant is classified as a risk level III offender
after the property has been occupied by the tenant or occupant, or if a risk
level III offender moves into the residence or on the rental property as a
cotenant or occupant after the original tenant takes occupancy, the tenant must
notify the landlord in writing, within twenty-four hours, of the risk level III
offender's status and intent to occupy the property.

For the purposes of
this section, "risk level III offender" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 59.18.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 59.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
requirement that any tenant or occupant register as a sex offender or
kidnapping offender under RCW 9A.44.130 is grounds for eviction under this
section.

---
END ---