BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Administrator" means the Washington pharmacy access initiative
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the Washington
state health care authority.

(2) "Eligible
person" means a resident of the state who is:

(a) Ineligible for
medicaid prescription drug benefits;

(b) Ineligible for, or
not receiving, or both, a prescription drug benefit under a medicare
supplemental policy or any other third-party payer prescription drug benefit;

(c) Not confined or
residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she meets
eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator;

(d)(i) At least
sixty-five years old; or (ii) between the ages of nineteen and sixty-four who
is otherwise eligible for benefits under Title II of the social security act
(federal old age, survivors, and disability insurance benefits); and

(e) A person whose
gross family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services.

(3) "Labeler"
means an entity or person that receives prescription drugs from a manufacturer
or wholesaler and repackages those drugs for later retail sale, and that has a
labeler code from the federal food and drug administration under 21 C.F.R. Sec.
207.20 (1999).

(4) "Mail order
program" means a program to dispense prescription drugs by postal delivery
service designated and administered by the Washington state health care
authority, and any entity with which it contracts, upon an enrollee's
submission of a prescription and the applicable copayment.

(5) "Maintenance
drug" means a prescription drug prescribed to an individual for a chronic
condition, the use of which is medically necessary for a consecutive period of
ninety days or longer.

(6)
"Manufacturer" means a manufacturer of prescription drugs and
includes a subsidiary or affiliate of a manufacturer.

(7) "Pharmacy
benefit manager" means an entity under contract with the Washington state
health care authority, whether organized on a for-profit or a not-for-profit
basis, contracted to manage the Washington prescription drug insurance plan
established by sections 3 through 9 of this act.

(8) "Pharmacy
services" means services provided by a pharmacist, consistent with chapter
18.64 RCW, intended to assist an enrollee in the safe, appropriate, and
cost-effective use of drugs that he or she has been prescribed. These services
may include but are not limited to disease management, case management,
education and counseling, special pharmaceutical packaging, and medication
compliance programs.

(9) "Premium"
means a periodic payment, based upon gross family income, that an individual or
a financial sponsor makes to the plan as consideration for an eligible person's
enrollment in the plan.

(10) "Prescription
drug" means any drug required by state or federal law or regulation to be
dispensed only by a prescription, including finished dosage forms and active
ingredients subject to section 503(b) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic
act.

(11)
"Program" means the prescription drug price program created in
section 16 of this act.

(12) "Retail
pharmacy" means a retail pharmacy or other business licensed to dispense
prescription drugs in this state.

(13)
"Subsidy" means the difference between the full cost of participation
in the plan and the amount determined to be the enrollee's responsibility under
section 4(3) of this act.

(14) "Washington
prescription drug insurance plan" or "plan" means the plan for
providing coverage for prescription drugs and pharmacy services established in
sections 3 through 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) The Washington
pharmacy access initiative is established within the Washington state health
care authority. The administrative head and appointing authority of the
initiative is the administrator of the Washington state health care authority.
The initiative includes the following components:

(a) A subsidized
prescription drug insurance plan for seniors and the disabled, designed and
implemented pursuant to sections 3 through 9 of this act;

(b) Prescription drug
information and education grants awarded to local organizations pursuant to
section 10 of this act;

(c) A uniform formulary
of prescription drugs and a system for prescription drug utilization review for
state-purchased health care programs as provided in section 13 of this act. In
consultation with appropriate state agencies, the administrator may determine
the extent to which the formulary or prescription drug utilization review will
apply to each state-purchased health care program;

(d) A system of
academic detailing and consumer counterdetailing that educates physicians and
other prescribers and consumers on the therapeutic and cost-effective
utilization of prescription drugs. In developing this, the administrator
shall:

(i) First assess
current private and public sector academic detailing and consumer
counterdetailing activities in Washington state. The system developed under
this subsection should be designed to complement, coordinate, and strengthen
these existing activities; and

(ii) Ensure that the
system developed under this subsection is consistent with and supports
successful implementation of the formulary developed pursuant to section 13 of
this act and complements the grants awarded pursuant to section 10 of this act;

(e) Recommendations for
continuing medical education opportunities for physicians and other health care
professionals who prescribe, dispense, or administer prescription drugs. Any
continuing medical education recommended or offered as a result of efforts
under this section must ensure that information presented to attendees
regarding utilization of prescription drugs is unbiased;

(f) Disease management
pilot projects, as provided in section 14 of this act; and

(g) The prescription
drug price program, implemented pursuant to sections 16 through 21 of this act.

(2) In carrying out his
or her duties under this act, the administrator shall request the participation
of the department of social and health services, the department of health, the
state board of health, the department of corrections, the department of labor
and industries, the office of the insurance commissioner, physicians, advanced
registered nurse practitioners, hospitals, pharmacists, the state board of
pharmacy and any other appropriate licensing boards, consumer representatives,
health plans as defined in RCW 48.43.005, pharmacy benefits management
companies, self-insured employer sponsored health benefits plans, and any other
interested party.

(3) In carrying out his
or her duties under this act, the administrator may:

(a) Contract with third
parties for services necessary to carry out the administrator's activities
under this act where contracting will promote economy, avoid duplication of
effort, and make the best use of available expertise. Any such contractor or
consultant is prohibited from releasing, publishing, or otherwise using any
information made available to it under its contractual responsibility without
specific permission of the administrator;

(b) Call upon state
agencies to provide available information as necessary to assist the
administrator in meeting his or her responsibilities under this act, which
information shall be supplied as promptly as circumstances permit;

(c) Appoint technical
or advisory committees, as he or she deems necessary. Individuals appointed to
any technical or other advisory committee may be reimbursed for their travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060;

(d) Solicit, accept,
and spend public and private grants, contributions, and other funds to match
public funds appropriated to carry out the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The Washington
prescription drug insurance plan is established within the Washington pharmacy
access initiative. The plan shall be actuarially sound and designed to provide
eligible persons with coverage for prescription drugs and pharmacy services.
Enrollment in the plan is voluntary.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. In implementing the
Washington prescription drug insurance plan, the administrator shall take all
necessary steps to ensure that the plan is structured in a way that maximizes
savings, efficiencies, affordability, benefits, and coverage, and in so doing,
has the following powers and duties:

(1) To design and from
time to time revise a schedule of covered prescription drugs and pharmacy
services. No prescription drug shall be excluded from any formulary
established for the plan unless another prescription drug is available on the
formulary that is therapeutically equivalent to the excluded prescription
drug. All enrollees are entitled to receive covered drugs and services in
return for premium payments to the plan. In designing and revising the
schedule of drugs and services, the administrator's decisions shall be based on
scientific evidence and be intended to optimize patient care, discourage
prescribing that is not medically indicated, and encourage the most
cost-effective selection of medications. The administrator shall adopt any
uniform formulary developed pursuant to section 13 of this act;

(2) To negotiate price
discounts and rebates from pharmaceutical manufacturers for prescription drugs
covered under the plan;

(3) To determine the
periodic premiums due the plan from enrollees, based upon gross family income.
A financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the administrator, pay the
premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of an enrollee, by arrangement
with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator;

(4) Subject to section
5 of this act, to design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing.
The structure shall discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of drugs and
services, and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier
to appropriate utilization of necessary drugs and services;

(5) To limit enrollment
of persons so as to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations by the plan.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the administrator
finds the danger no longer exists;

(6) To limit the
payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees;

(7) To enter into a
competitively procured contract with one or more entities including, but not
limited to, a pharmacy benefit manager, to administer benefits under the plan.
The procurement shall explicitly be made a part of, or the contract shall be
performed in conjunction with, any established state agency aggregate
purchasing program. The health care authority may contract with entities to
perform marketing, enrollment, billing, claims processing, claims management,
or any other function it deems necessary;

(8) To offer a mail
order program and require the use of a mail order program for maintenance
drugs. No mail order program for maintenance drugs may be required unless the
administrator determines in writing that material savings will result to the
state or enrollees without compromising the health or safety of enrollees. In
making such a determination, the administrator shall consider the impact of a
mail order program on the value of the retail pharmacy services in the
communities. Prior to making such a determination, the administrator shall
hold at least one public hearing in order to hear testimony from members of the
public. Any mail order program must be administered by the Washington state
health care authority, and the contracted pharmacy benefit manager;

(9) To receive periodic
premiums from or on behalf of enrollees, deposit them in the prescription drug
insurance plan operating account, and keep records of enrollee status;

(10) To accept
applications from individuals for enrollment in the Washington prescription
drug insurance plan, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for
enrollees as may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a
reasonable schedule defined by the health care authority, or at the request of
any enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale
premiums. Funds received by a family as part of participation in the adoption
support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145
shall not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the
purposes of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income
changes accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill
the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties
of up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the
enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to
define the appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to
implement the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available
resources. No subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current
gross family income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or who is a
recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter 74.09
RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they are allowed to reenroll in the
plan;

(11) To establish a
time period, not to exceed nine months from the effective date of coverage,
within which benefits will not be provided for any condition for which a health
care provider recommended or provided treatment within six months of a person's
application for enrollment. A process to waive the preexisting condition
waiting period in appropriate circumstances may also be established;

(12) To evaluate the
effects this chapter has on private employer-based prescription drug coverage
and to take appropriate measures consistent with state and federal statutes
that will discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state;

(13) To design and
implement prescriber education programs and other interventions directed at
health care providers intended to promote the safest, most appropriate, and
cost-effective use of prescription drugs by plan enrollees;

(14) In consultation
with appropriate state and local government agencies, to establish criteria
defining eligibility for persons confined or residing in government-operated
institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. The plan shall pay the
costs of all generic and preferred prescription drugs and pharmacy services for
an enrollee once that enrollee's out‑of‑pocket expenditures in a
calendar year on prescription drugs and pharmacy services exceeds the lesser
of: (1) Ten percent of the enrollee's gross annual household income; or (2)
two thousand dollars. For purposes of this section, out‑of‑pocket
expenditures do not include monthly premiums, for which an enrollee remains
responsible.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The Washington state
health care authority, and any entity with which it contracts, shall inform
enrollees in writing of the plan's scope, coverage, cost-sharing requirements,
and any limitations on access to prescription drugs. The Washington state
health care authority, and any entity with which it contracts, shall provide
for a clear and timely process by which enrollees can appeal a decision by the
health care authority or any contracted entity to deny or limit coverage or
benefits under this section.

(2) The appeal process
shall, at a minimum, provide enrollees with: (a) The opportunity to obtain a
nonpreferred drug at the copayment level of a preferred drug, or to obtain any
prescription drug excluded by the plan, upon a separate written certification
by the enrollee's physician, satisfactory to the health care authority, that
the nonpreferred or excluded drug is medically necessary and there is no
therapeutically equivalent preferred drug available to the enrollee; (b) a
provision allowing enrollees to appeal the exclusion of any prescription drug
from any formulary established for the plan. An enrollee may apply to be
exempt from any mail order requirement of the plan upon a separate written
certification by the enrollee's physician, satisfactory to the health care
authority, that due to a disability or other significant limiting factor, the
use of such a mail order program would be medically inappropriate for the
enrollee. A retail pharmacy may not be required to dispense a prescription upon
the failure of an enrollee to make the required copayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Any enrollee whose
premium payments to the plan are delinquent or who moves his or her residence
out of the state may be dropped from enrollment status. The administrator
shall provide delinquent enrollees with advance written notice of their removal
from the plan and shall provide for a hearing under chapters 34.05 and 34.12
RCW for any enrollee who contests the decision to drop the enrollee from the
plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The activities and
operations of the Washington prescription drug insurance plan under this
chapter, including those of pharmacy benefit managers to the extent of their
participation in the plan, are exempt from the provisions and requirements of
Title 48 RCW, except that persons appointed or authorized to solicit
applications for enrollment in the plan, including employees of the health care
authority, must comply with chapter 48.17 RCW. For the purposes of this
section, "solicit" does not include distributing information and
applications for the plan and responding to questions.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The prescription drug
insurance plan trust account is hereby established in the state treasury. All
nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this program shall be deposited in
the prescription drug insurance plan trust account. Moneys in the account
shall be used exclusively for the purposes of sections 3 through 9 of this
act. Only the administrator or the administrator's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. (1) The Washington
pharmacy access initiative shall award prescription drug information and
education grants to local government or nonprofit organizations for the design
and implementation of programs intended to inform and train persons age
sixty-five and older in the safe and appropriate use of prescription and
nonprescription medications.

(2) The grants shall be
awarded on a competitive basis, using the following criteria:

(a) The demonstrated
ability of the applicant organization to effectively administer such a program,
including appropriate outreach and follow-up;

(b) The financial and
in-kind resources that the applicant organization will bring to the program in
addition to those funded by the grant;

(c) The extent to which
the proposed program design reflects a comprehensive understanding of issues
related to the safe and appropriate use of prescription drugs by seniors, and
how to effectively communicate with the target audience;

(d) The extent to which
the proposed program reflects a collaborative effort between the applicant
organization and other health care providers and programs in the location to be
served, including doctors, pharmacists, and long-term care providers;

(e) The extent to which
the proposed program will serve as a model that can be replicated by other
organizations around the state; and

(f) Any other criteria
deemed appropriate by the administrator to ensure the quality and
cost-effectiveness of the programs funded.

In awarding the grants,
the administrator shall make every effort to ensure that the programs are
geographically dispersed around the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. Notwithstanding the
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW, records obtained, reviewed by, or on file with
the Washington pharmacy access initiative containing information concerning
medical treatment of individuals is exempt from public inspection and copying.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The legislature reserves
the right to amend or repeal all or any part of this chapter at any time and
there shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or
repeal. All the rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by this chapter or
any acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of the
legislature to amend or repeal this chapter at any time.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. (1) The administrator
shall establish a pharmacy and therapeutics committee to develop a uniform
formulary for state-purchased health care.

(a) The pharmacy and
therapeutics committee may be established directly or through a contract with a
private organization. The committee must be composed of actively practicing
health care professionals, including physicians, pharmacists, advanced
registered nurse practitioners, at least one health care professional employed
by a health plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, and experts in
pharmacoeconomics. Additional specialty expertise and participation may be
obtained when necessary.

(b) The formulary must
be based upon careful consideration and pharmacoeconomic analysis, giving
primary consideration to clinical efficacy of prescription drugs that have been
approved by the federal food and drug administration. Cost considerations can
influence decisions regarding prescription drugs to be included in the
formulary only after safety, efficacy, and therapeutic need have been
evaluated. When safety, efficacy, and clinical outcomes of a drug are similar
to those of existing formulary drugs, or where a positive economic outcome is
not expected with a new drug, it is rational to make a drug formulary decision
based upon the unit cost of that drug. Any other public or private entity may
choose to adopt the formulary developed under this subsection.

(c) The formulary must
include clear standards and procedures for an exception process to ensure
consumer access to medically necessary alternatives to the formulary. No
formulary can account for every therapeutic eventuality or unique patient
need. The procedures to allow the prescribing of nonformulary medications must
neither pose a substantial barrier to the prescribing health care professional
nor hinder the consumer's ability to receive necessary medication. However, to
encourage the use of clinically efficacious and cost-effective drugs, the
administrator may relate prescription drug cost-sharing to the formulary status
of a drug.

(d) The administrator
may require pharmaceutical manufacturers to submit available pharmacoeconomic
data, including clinical and cost outcomes, safety, efficacy, and effectiveness
information, to the pharmacy and therapeutics committee in a standardized
format to assist the committee in its evaluation of prescription drug products.

(e) Due to the
sensitivity of proprietary or nonpublished data that may be used to evaluate
prescription drug products for inclusion on the formulary, meetings of the
pharmacy and therapeutics committee shall be exempted from application of the
open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

(2) The drug
utilization review program must include but is not limited to prescription drug
review, management, and education, including prospective, concurrent, and
retrospective review, to improve the quality of pharmaceutical care by ensuring
that prescription drugs provided through state-purchased health care programs
are appropriate, medically necessary, and not likely to produce adverse medical
results.

The administrator may
establish a drug utilization review committee either directly or through a
contract with a private organization to assist in development and
implementation of the drug utilization review program. The committee should be
composed of actively practicing health care professionals. Additional
specialty expertise may be obtained as needed. Due to the sensitivity of
proprietary or nonpublished data that may be used by the drug utilization
review committee, meetings of the committee shall be exempted from application
of the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The administrator shall
design and implement at least two pilot disease management programs for persons
covered through state-purchased health care programs. The programs shall begin
operation on or before July 1, 2002.

(1) The administrator
shall determine, in consultation with appropriate state agencies, the disease
groups most appropriate for disease management and the state-purchased health
care programs to which the disease management programs will apply, after
reviewing claims and cost information and research on the effectiveness of
disease management programs. The following disease groups should first be
considered for disease management programs: Asthma, diabetes, cardiovascular
disease, malignancies, obesity, hemophilia, renal disease, transplants,
intervertebral disc disorders, and populations at highest risk of improper use of
medication.

(2) Each pilot disease
management program must include physicians, pharmacists, and other appropriate
health care providers in the design and implementation of the program.
Physicians may not be required to participate in a disease management program
as a condition of contracting to provide state-purchased health care services.

(3) The programs must
incorporate an evaluation component that will allow the administrator to
identify successful programs that are candidates for statewide expansion. The
evaluation should consider the impact of the disease management program upon
the health status of participating enrollees, the use of health services by
these enrollees, and the overall costs of treating these enrollees.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
15. Any savings to health
care benefit programs administered by the public employees' benefits board that
result from implementation of the pharmacy access initiative under this act
must be deposited into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account
established under RCW 41.05.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
16. (1) The prescription drug
price program is established within the Washington pharmacy access initiative
to lower prescription drug prices for uninsured and underinsured residents of
the state.

(2) A drug manufacturer
or labeler that sells prescription drugs in the state may voluntarily elect to
enter into a rebate agreement with the health care authority.

(3) The administrator
shall negotiate the terms of the rebate from a manufacturer or labeler, taking
into consideration the rebate calculated under the medicaid rebate program
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8, the average wholesale price of prescription
drugs, and any other available information on prescription drug prices and
price discounts.

(4) If a drug
manufacturer or labeler elects not to agree to a rebate, the administrator
shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services, who
shall review those manufacturer's products for prior authorization for the
state medicaid program pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW. The administrator shall
take similar actions involving prior authorization or formularies for any other
state-funded prescription drug program. The administrator and each relevant
agency shall adopt rules creating clear procedures for the implementation of
this subsection. The names of manufacturers and labelers that do not enter
into rebate agreements are public information and the administrator shall release
this information to the public. The administrator shall also publicize to
doctors, pharmacists, and other health professionals information about the
relative cost of drugs produced by manufacturers and labelers that enter into
rebate agreements compared to those who do not enter into rebate agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A retail pharmacy shall
discount the price of prescription drugs sold to program participants.

(1) The health care
authority shall establish discounted prices for drugs covered by a rebate
agreement and shall promote the use of efficacious and reduced-cost drugs,
taking into consideration reduced prices for state and federally capped drug
programs, differential dispensing fees, administrative overhead, and incentive
payments.

(2) Beginning no later
than January 1, 2002, a retail pharmacy shall offer prescription drugs at or
below the average wholesale price, minus six percent, plus a dispensing fee
designated by the administrator. These initial price levels shall be
calculated by the administrator and the dispensing fee shall not be less than
that provided under the state medicaid program. The average wholesale price is
the wholesale price charged on a specific commodity that is assigned by the
drug manufacturer and is listed in a nationally recognized drug pricing file.

(3) No later than
October 1, 2002, a retail pharmacy shall offer prescription drugs at or below
the initial price levels specified in subsection (2) of this section minus the
amount of any rebate paid by the state to the retail pharmacy. These
discounted price levels shall be calculated by the administrator. In
determining the discounted price levels, the administrator shall consider an
average of all rebates weighted by sales of drugs subject to these rebates over
the most recent twelve-month period for which the information is available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. All residents of the
state are authorized to participate in the program. The administrator shall
establish simplified procedures for issuing program enrollment cards to
authorized residents. The health care authority shall undertake outreach
efforts to build public awareness of the program and maximize enrollment by
authorized residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. (1) The board of
pharmacy, created under RCW 18.64.001, shall adopt rules requiring disclosure
by retail pharmacies to program participants of the amount of savings provided
as a result of the program. The rules must protect information that is
proprietary in nature.

(2) The health care
authority may not impose transaction charges on retail pharmacies that submit
claims or receive payments under the program.

(3) A retail pharmacy
shall submit claims to the health care authority to verify the amount charged
to program participants.

(4) On a weekly or
biweekly basis, the health care authority shall reimburse a retail pharmacy for
discounted prices provided to program participants and dispensing fees set by
the administrator.

(5) The health care
authority shall collect from the retail pharmacies utilization data necessary
to calculate the amount of the rebate from the manufacturer or labeler. The
health care authority shall protect the confidentiality of all information
subject to confidentiality protection under state or federal law, rule, or
regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. Discrepancies in rebate
amounts must be resolved using the process established in this section.

(1) If there is a
discrepancy in the manufacturer's or labeler's favor between the amount claimed
by a pharmacy and the amount rebated by the manufacturer or labeler, the health
care authority, at the health care authority's expense, may hire a mutually
agreed-upon independent auditor. If a discrepancy still exists following the
audit, the manufacturer or labeler shall justify the reason for the discrepancy
or make payment to the health care authority for any additional amount due.

(2) If there is a
discrepancy against the interest of the manufacturer or labeler in the
information provided by the health care authority to the manufacturer or
labeler regarding the manufacturer's or labeler's rebate, the manufacturer or
labeler, at the manufacturer's or labeler's expense, may hire a mutually
agreed-upon independent auditor to verify the accuracy of the data supplied to
the health care authority. If a discrepancy still exists following the audit,
the health care authority shall justify the reason for the discrepancy or
refund to the manufacturer any excess payment made by the manufacturer or
labeler.

(3) Following the
procedures established in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, either the
health care authority or the manufacturer or labeler may request a hearing.
Supporting documentation must accompany the request for a hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. The prescription drug
price account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from revenues paid by manufacturers or labelers who pay rebates and any
appropriations made to the account must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to reimburse retail pharmacies
for discounted prices provided to program participants and to reimburse the
health care authority for the costs of administering the program. Only the
administrator or the administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
22. By January 1, 2002, and
by January 1st of each year through 2005, the administrator shall submit to the
governor and the legislature a progress report regarding the implementation and
impact of the pharmacy access initiative, including, where appropriate,
information regarding enrollment in and the financial status of each of its
components. The report shall be prepared in consultation with the agencies and
organizations participating in the development of the initiative under section
2 of this act, and may present recommendations for modifications to the
initiative, or for additional strategies that should be pursued to provide
affordable access to and promote therapeutic and cost-effective utilization of
prescription drugs by residents of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. The health care authority
may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. The health care authority
may seek any waivers of federal law, rule, or regulation necessary to implement
the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 25. RCW 41.05.026 and 1991 c
79 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When soliciting
proposals for the purpose of awarding contracts for goods or services, the
administrator shall, upon written request by the bidder, exempt from public
inspection and copying such proprietary data, trade secrets, or other
information contained in the bidder's proposal that relate to the bidder's
unique methods of conducting business or of determining prices or premium rates
to be charged for services under terms of the proposal.

(2) Actuarial formulas,
statistics, cost and utilization data, or other proprietary information
submitted upon request of the administrator or board by a contracting insurer,
health care service contractor, health maintenance organization, or vendor may
be withheld at any time from public inspection when necessary to preserve trade
secrets or prevent unfair competition.

(3) Proprietary
information submitted upon request of the administrator by any insurer, vendor,
pharmaceutical manufacturer, or other entity/person for the purpose of
analyzing and developing cost containment options, delivery alternatives,
prescription drug education and utilization systems, and consolidated
purchasing for state-purchased health care programs may be withheld at any time
from public inspection when necessary to preserve trade secrets or prevent
unfair competition.

(4) The board
may hold an executive session during any regular or special meeting to discuss
information submitted in accordance with subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27. Sections 1 through 24 and
26 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---