BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.06.--- and 2001 c
235 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The governor is
authorized to enter into cigarette tax contracts with the Squaxin Island Tribe,
the Nisqually Tribe, Tulalip Tribes, the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, the Quinault
Nation, the Jamestown S'Klallam Indian Tribe, the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe,
the Stillaguamish Tribe, the Sauk-Suiattle Tribe, the Skokomish Indian Tribe, the
Yakama Nation, the Suquamish Tribe, the Nooksack Indian Tribe, the Lummi
Nation, the Chehalis Confederated Tribes, and the Upper Skagit Tribe. Each
contract adopted under this section shall provide that the tribal cigarette tax
rate be one hundred percent of the state cigarette and state and local sales
and use taxes within three years of enacting the tribal tax and shall be set no
lower than eighty percent of the state cigarette and state and local sales and
use taxes during the three-year phase-in period. The three-year phase-in
period shall be shortened by three months each quarter the number of cartons of
nontribal manufactured cigarettes is at least ten percent or more than the
quarterly average number of cartons of nontribal manufactured cigarettes from
the six-month period preceding the imposition of the tribal tax under the
contract. Sales at a retailer operation not in existence as of the date a
tribal tax under this section is imposed are subject to the full rate of the
tribal tax under the contract. The tribal cigarette tax is in lieu of the
state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes, as provided in RCW
43.06.---(3) (section 2, chapter 235, Laws of 2001).

(2) A
cigarette tax contract under this section is subject to RCW 43.06.--- (section
2, chapter 235, Laws of 2001).

--- END ---