BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that affordability is critical in providing access to prescription drugs for
Washington residents. The legislature intends to make prescription drugs more
affordable for qualified Washington residents, thereby increasing the overall
health of Washington residents, promoting healthy communities, and protecting
the public health and welfare of Washington residents.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.010 and 1990 c
296 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Children's
health program" means the health care services program provided to
children under eighteen years of age and in households with incomes at or below
the federal poverty level as annually defined by the federal department of
health and human services as adjusted for family size, and who are not
otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the
medically needy.

(2) (("Committee"
means the children's health services committee created in section 3 of this
act.)) "Commission" means the prescription drug advisory
commission.

(3) "County"
means the board of county commissioners, county council, county executive, or
tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A combination of two or more county
authorities or tribal jurisdictions may enter into joint agreements to fulfill
the requirements of RCW 74.09.415 through 74.09.435.

(4)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(5) "Department of
health" means the Washington state department of health created pursuant
to RCW 43.70.020.

(6) "Internal
management" means the administration of medical assistance, medical care
services, the children's health program, and the limited casualty program.

(7) "Limited
casualty program" means the medical care program provided to medically
needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social security act,
and to medically indigent persons who are without income or resources
sufficient to secure necessary medical services.

(8) "Medical
assistance" means the federal aid medical care program provided to
categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social
security act.

(9) "Medical care
services" means the limited scope of care financed by state funds and
provided to general assistance recipients, and recipients of alcohol and drug
addiction services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.

(10) "Nursing
home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.

(11)
"Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually by the
United States department of health and human services, or successor agency.

(12)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The prescription
drug advisory commission is established to review access to and the pricing of
prescription drugs for state residents, to advise the secretary on prescription
drug pricing and to provide periodic reports to the secretary, the governor,
and the legislature.

(2) The commission
consists of the following twelve members:

(a) Three members of
the public, appointed by the president of the senate, one of whom must
represent the interests of senior citizens. Of the initial appointees, one
must be appointed for a two-year term and two for three-year terms;

(b) Three members of
the public, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one of
whom must represent the interests of senior citizens. Of the initial
appointees, one must be appointed for a two-year term and two for three-year
terms;

(c) Two members who are
authorized by the laws of this state to prescribe drugs, appointed by the
governor. Of the initial appointees, one must be appointed for a two-year term
and one for a three-year term;

(d) Two pharmacists,
appointed by the governor. Of the initial appointees, one must be appointed
for a two-year term and one for a three-year term. To be appointed to and
remain on the commission, each pharmacist must: (i) Be licensed to practice
pharmacy and be engaged in the practice of retail pharmacy in this state; (ii)
have at least five years of experience in this state as a licensed pharmacist;
and (iii) be a resident of this state; and

(e) The insurance
commissioner and the executive director of the state board of pharmacy, or
their designees, who shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members.

(3) With the exception
of the initial appointees, all members of the commission serve for terms of
three years and may be reappointed. With the exception of the pharmacist
members, if the profession or qualifications of a commission member change
during the term of commission membership, the member may continue to complete
the term for which the appointment was made.

(4) The commission
shall meet at least four times per year. The members shall select a chair from
among the members. Additional meetings may be called by the chair.

(5) The duties of the
commission include the following:

(a) To review access to
prescription drugs for residents of the state, including, but not limited to,
pricing and affordability information;

(b) To advise the
secretary on access to prescription drugs and prescription drug prices,
including, but not limited to, insurance and third-party payments for
prescription drugs, the need for maximum retail prices, and, if maximum retail
prices are established, the procedures for adoption and periodic review of
maximum retail prices, the procedures for establishing maximum retail prices
for new prescription drugs and for reviewing maximum retail prices of selected
drugs and the procedures for phasing out or terminating maximum retail prices;

(c) To advise the
secretary on the adoption of rules necessary to implement this section and
section 4 of this act; and

(d) To report to the
secretary, the legislature, and the governor by April 1, 2002, and annually
thereafter by the second week in January, including in the report any
recommendations for action regarding access to and the pricing of prescription
drugs.

(6) The department
shall provide staffing for the commission.

(7) Members of the
commission may receive compensation for their services in accordance with RCW
43.03.220.

(8) In performing its
duties, the commission shall work with the department, the state board of
pharmacy, and the insurance commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The following
provisions apply to determinations regarding maximum retail prices for
prescription drugs and to the procedures for establishing those prices:

(a) By July 1, 2003,
the department must adopt rules establishing the procedures for adoption and
periodic review of maximum retail prices, the procedures for establishing
maximum retail prices for new prescription drugs and for reviewing maximum retail
prices of selected drugs, and the procedures for phasing out or terminating
maximum retail prices. Before adopting rules under this subsection, the
secretary must consult with and consider the recommendations of the commission
regarding the rules.

(b) By January 5, 2004,
the secretary must determine whether the cost of prescription drugs provided to
qualified residents under the prescription drug price program is reasonably
comparable to the lowest cost paid for the same drugs delivered or dispensed in
the state. In making this determination the following provisions apply:

(i) The secretary must
review prescription drug use in the medicaid program using data from the most
recent six-month period for which data is available.

(ii) Using the data
reviewed in (b)(i) of this subsection, the secretary must determine the one
hundred drugs for which the most units were provided and the one hundred drugs
for which the total cost was the highest.

(iii) For each
prescription drug listed in (b)(ii) of this subsection, the secretary must
determine the cost for each drug for qualified residents provided those drugs
under the prescription drug price program on a certain date. The average cost
for each such drug must be calculated.

(iv) For each
prescription drug listed in (b)(ii) of this subsection, the secretary must
determine the lowest cost for each drug paid by any purchaser on the date that
is used for (b)(iii) of this subsection delivered or dispensed in the state,
taking into consideration the federal supply schedule and prices paid by
pharmaceutical benefits managers and by large purchasers and excluding drugs
purchased through the prescription drug price program. The average cost for
each such drug must be calculated.

(v) If the average cost
for one or more prescription drugs under the prescription drug price program as
determined in (b)(iii) of this subsection is not reasonably comparable to the
average lowest cost for the same drug or drugs as determined in (b)(iv) of this
subsection, the secretary must establish maximum retail prices for any or all
prescription drugs sold in the state. Maximum prescription drug prices
established under this subsection must take effect July 1, 2004.

(c) In establishing
maximum retail prices under this subsection, the secretary must consider the
advice of the commission and follow procedures set forth by rules adopted by
the department.

(2) In making a
determination under this section the secretary may rely on pricing information
on a selected number of prescription drugs if that list is representative of
the prescription drug needs of the residents of the state and is made public as
part of the process of establishing maximum retail prices.

(3) The secretary may
take actions that the secretary determines necessary if there is a severe
limitation or shortage of or lack of access to prescription drugs in the state
that could threaten or endanger the public health or welfare.

(4) A retailer of prescription
drugs may appeal the maximum retail price of a prescription drug established
under this section in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW.

(5) The legislature
finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally affecting
the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of the maximum retail prices established by
this section is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation
of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an
unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 3 and 4 of this
act may be known and cited as the prescription drugs price reduction act.

---
END ---