BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. (1) The legislature finds
that:

(a) Approximately one
in four residents of Washington state have no or wholly inadequate prescription
drug insurance coverage.

(b) These uninsured
residents pay excessive prices for prescription drugs, far higher prices than
are paid by managed care organizations, insurance companies, and the federal
government for the same medicines and dosages. In many cases, these excessive drug
prices have the effect of denying residents access to medically necessary care,
and thereby threatening their health and safety.

(c) Many residents
require repeated doctor or medical clinic appointments, having gotten sicker
because they cannot afford to take the prescriptions prescribed for them. Many
residents are admitted to or treated at hospitals each year because they cannot
afford the drugs prescribed for them that could have prevented the need for
hospitalization. Many others enter expensive institutional care settings
because they cannot afford their necessary prescription drugs that could have
supported them outside of an institution. In each of these circumstances,
state medical assistance programs, including the medicaid program, literally
pay the price.

(d) One major reason
uninsured residents pay so much for prescription drugs is that, unlike insured
residents, they have no prescription benefits manager negotiating a fair price
with the drug companies on their behalf.

(e) The state government
is the only agent that, as a practical matter, can play an effective role as a
market participant on behalf of all residents who are uninsured or
underinsured. The state can and should act as a prescription benefits manager,
negotiating voluntary drug rebates and using these funds to reimburse retail
pharmacies for offering lower drug prices.

(f) The state is a
major purchaser of prescription drugs and should use its position to assist all
residents to purchase drugs at a reasonable price.

(2) This chapter is
enacted by the legislature to create a program whereby the state acts as a
participant in the prescription drug marketplace, negotiating voluntary rebates
from drug companies and using the funds to make prescription drugs more
affordable to Washington residents. Such a program will improve public health
and welfare, promote the economic strength of our society, and substantially
benefit state health assistance programs, including the medicaid program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Labeler"
means an entity or person that receives prescription drugs from a manufacturer
or wholesaler and repackages those drugs for later retail sale, and that has a
labeler code from the federal food and drug administration under 21 C.F.R. Sec.
207.20 (1999).

(3)
"Manufacturer" means a manufacturer of prescription drugs and
includes a subsidiary or affiliate of a manufacturer.

(4) "Program"
means the prescription drug price program created in section 3 of this act.

(5) "Retail
pharmacy" means a retail pharmacy or other business licensed to dispense
prescription drugs in this state.

(6)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services, or the
secretary's designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. (1) The prescription drug
price program is established within the department to lower prescription drug
prices for uninsured and underinsured residents of the state.

(2) A drug manufacturer
or labeler that sells prescription drugs in the state may voluntarily elect to
enter into a rebate agreement with the department.

(3) The secretary shall
negotiate the terms of the rebate from a manufacturer or labeler, taking into
consideration the rebate calculated under the medicaid rebate program pursuant
to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8, the average wholesale price of prescription drugs,
and any other available information on prescription drug prices and price
discounts.

(4) If a drug
manufacturer or labeler elects not to agree to a rebate, the secretary shall
review those manufacturer's products for prior authorization for the state
medicaid program pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW, and take similar actions
involving prior authorization or formularies for any other state-funded
prescription drug program. The secretary shall adopt rules creating clear
procedures for the implementation of this subsection. The names of
manufacturers and labelers that do not enter into rebate agreements are public
information and the department shall release this information to the public.
The secretary shall also publicize to doctors, pharmacists, and other health
professionals information about the relative cost of drugs produced by
manufacturers and labelers that enter into rebate agreements compared to those
who do not enter into rebate agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A retail pharmacy shall
discount the price of prescription drugs sold to program participants.

(1) The department
shall establish discounted prices for drugs covered by a rebate agreement and
shall promote the use of efficacious and reduced-cost drugs, taking into
consideration reduced prices for state and federally capped drug programs,
differential dispensing fees, administrative overhead, and incentive payments.

(2) Beginning no later
than January 1, 2002, a retail pharmacy shall offer prescription drugs at or
below the average wholesale price, minus six percent, plus a dispensing fee
designated by the secretary. These initial price levels shall be calculated by
the secretary and the dispensing fee shall not be less than that provided under
the state medicaid program. The average wholesale price is the wholesale price
charged on a specific commodity that is assigned by the drug manufacturer and
is listed in a nationally recognized drug pricing file.

(3) No later than
October 1, 2002, a retail pharmacy shall offer prescription drugs at or below
the initial price levels specified in subsection (2) of this section minus the
amount of any rebate paid by the state to the retail pharmacy. These
discounted price levels shall be calculated by the secretary. In determining
the discounted price levels, the secretary shall consider an average of all
rebates weighted by sales of drugs subject to these rebates over the most
recent twelve-month period for which the information is available.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. All residents of the
state are eligible to participate in the program. The department shall
establish simplified procedures for issuing program enrollment cards to
eligible residents. The department shall undertake outreach efforts to build
public awareness of the program and maximize enrollment by eligible residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) The board of
pharmacy, created under RCW 18.64.001, shall adopt rules requiring disclosure
by retail pharmacies to program participants of the amount of savings provided
as a result of the program. The rules must protect information that is
proprietary in nature.

(2) The department may
not impose transaction charges on retail pharmacies that submit claims or
receive payments under the program.

(3) A retail pharmacy
shall submit claims to the department to verify the amount charged to program
participants.

(4) On a weekly or
biweekly basis, the department shall reimburse a retail pharmacy for discounted
prices provided to program participants and dispensing fees set by the
secretary.

(5) The department
shall collect from the retail pharmacies utilization data necessary to
calculate the amount of the rebate from the manufacturer or labeler. The
department shall protect the confidentiality of all information subject to
confidentiality protection under state or federal law, rule, or regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. Discrepancies in rebate
amounts must be resolved using the process established in this section.

(1) If there is a
discrepancy in the manufacturer's or labeler's favor between the amount claimed
by a pharmacy and the amount rebated by the manufacturer or labeler, the
department, at the department's expense, may hire a mutually agreed-upon
independent auditor. If a discrepancy still exists following the audit, the
manufacturer or labeler shall justify the reason for the discrepancy or make
payment to the department for any additional amount due.

(2) If there is a discrepancy
against the interest of the manufacturer or labeler in the information provided
by the department to the manufacturer or labeler regarding the manufacturer's
or labeler's rebate, the manufacturer or labeler, at the manufacturer's or
labeler's expense, may hire a mutually agreed-upon independent auditor to
verify the accuracy of the data supplied to the department. If a discrepancy
still exists following the audit, the department shall justify the reason for
the discrepancy or refund to the manufacturer any excess payment made by the
manufacturer or labeler.

(3) Following the
procedures established in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, either the
department or the manufacturer or labeler may request a hearing. Supporting
documentation must accompany the request for a hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. The prescription drug
price account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from revenues paid by manufacturers or labelers who pay rebates and any
appropriations made to the account must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to reimburse retail pharmacies
for discounted prices provided to program participants and to reimburse the
department for the costs of administering the program. Only the secretary or
the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. The department shall
report the enrollment and financial status of the program to the legislature by
the second week in January each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. In implementing this chapter,
the department shall coordinate with other governmental programs to increase
efficiency and, where it is beneficial to another state program, combine drug
pricing negotiations to maximize drug rebates for this and other programs,
including but not limited to the state medicaid program, the health care
authority, the department of health, and other participating public and private
entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
11. The department may adopt
rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. The department may seek
any waivers of federal law, rule, or regulation necessary to implement the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. This act may be known and
cited as the "prescription drug fair pricing act."

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder
of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 1 through 14 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---