BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. As a pilot program, the
department of transportation shall authorize the use of shoulder lanes as
general purpose lanes, open to passenger cars, on state route 520 between the
hours of seven o'clock a.m. and nine o'clock a.m., and between the hours of four
o'clock p.m. and seven o'clock p.m. The department of transportation shall
report to the legislature on the effects on traffic flow of opening these
shoulder lanes no later than June 30, 2002.

---
END ---