BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.230.060 and 1991
c 116 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Students
in the twelfth grade who have not completed a course of study in Washington's
history and state government because of previous residence outside the state
may have the requirement in RCW 28A.230.090 waived by their principal. Those
students of military families who have successfully completed a course in
history in another state shall have the requirement in RCW 28A.230.090 waived
by their principal.

--- END ---