BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The district manager for
district two as defined in WAC 16-458-075 is authorized to transfer four
hundred fifty thousand dollars from the fruit and vegetable inspection district
fund to the plant pest account within the agricultural local fund. The amount
transferred is to be derived from fees collected for state inspections of tree
fruits and is to be used solely to reimburse county horticultural pest and
disease boards within district two for the cost of pest control activities,
including tree removal, conducted under their existing authorities in chapters
15.08 and 15.09 RCW. The transfer of funds shall occur by July 1, 2001. On
June 30, 2003, any unexpended portion of the four hundred fifty thousand
dollars shall be returned to the fruit and vegetable inspection district fund.

Sec. 2. RCW 15.17.240 and 1998 c
154 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The district
managers shall collect the fees provided for under this chapter and deposit
them in the fruit and vegetable inspection district fund in any bank in
the district approved for the deposit of state funds. The fees shall be used
to carry out the provisions of this chapter and no appropriation is required
for disbursement from the fund. District managers shall approve payments from
the fruit and vegetable inspection district funds to the fruit and vegetable
inspection trust account in accordance with RCW 15.17.245. On a monthly basis,
each district manager shall provide to the director a detailed account of the
receipts and disbursements for the preceding month.

(2) Assessments and
other fees approved by the director or authorized by law and collected by the
district managers shall be deposited in the fruit and vegetable inspection
district funds and distributed to the appropriate fund or agency.

Sec. 3. RCW 15.17.243 and 2001 c
92 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The district manager
for district two as defined in WAC 16‑458‑075 is authorized to
transfer two hundred thousand dollars from the fruit and vegetable inspection
district fund to the plant pest account within the agricultural local fund.
The amount transferred is to be derived from fees collected for state
inspections of tree fruits and is to be used solely for activities related to
the control of Rhagoletis pomonella in district two. The transfer of funds
shall occur by June 1, 1997. On June 30, 2003, any unexpended portion of the
two hundred thousand dollars shall be returned to the fruit and vegetable inspection
district fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 1 of this act is
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---