BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

Real and
personal property owned or leased by a nonprofit corporation, association, or
other entity that is certified under chapter 70.96A RCW and used for chemical
dependency treatment is exempt from taxation.

--- END ---