BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(2) "Electrical
generating equipment or facilities" means any machinery, equipment, and
buildings used in the generation of electricity. The term excludes
administrative buildings and other buildings or parts of buildings not related
to the generation of electricity. The term does not include transmission lines
or towers or other distribution equipment located away from the industrial
facility.

(3) "Eligible
area" means a county with fewer than one hundred persons per square mile
as determined annually by the office of financial management and published by
the department of revenue effective for the period July 1st through June 30th.

(4) "High price or
unavailability of electricity" means electricity was not available to the
facility at any price or the price of electricity was too high to operate
economically. The price of electricity is "too high to operate
economically" if the person certifies to the department of revenue that
its decision to not operate the plant in question is based on the high price of
electricity.

(5) "Industrial
facility" means a manufacturing plant located in an eligible area that has
the capacity to consume twenty-five megawatt hours of electricity or more per
calendar year and at least twenty-five percent of the facility was idle due to
the high price, as certified by the person, or unavailability of electricity
for a minimum of thirty consecutive days after October 1, 2000.

(6)
"Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.

(7) "Person"
has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) A person who owns and
operates an industrial facility is allowed to defer taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on sales or charges made for tangible personal
property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the
construction or installation of electrical generating equipment or facilities
necessary to increase production at the industrial facility to levels prior to
October 1, 2000, subject to the requirements of this chapter.

(2) A person who owns
and operates an industrial facility may defer taxes due under chapter 82.04 RCW
on sales of electricity to the Bonneville power administration or to a light
and power business taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW if the sale occurred after
October 1, 2000, and before the earlier of October 1, 2003, or the date the
production at the industrial facility reaches levels of production prior to
October 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. Electrical generating
equipment or facilities eligible for deferral under this chapter shall be
located at the industrial facility. However, electrical generating equipment
or facilities located off the site of the industrial facility are eligible:

(1) To the extent that
the industrial facility is contractually required to purchase the equipment and
services without reimbursement and must purchase at least ten percent of the
electricity generated from that equipment; or

(2) If the eligible
industrial facility has at least a twenty-five percent ownership interest in
the electrical generating equipment or facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. Application for deferral
of taxes under section 2(1) of this act shall be made before purchase, or use
in the case of a use tax, of tangible personal property, labor, or services in
respect to the construction or installation of the electrical generating
equipment or facilities. Application for deferral of taxes under section 2(2)
of this act shall be made before payment of the taxes. The application shall
be made to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
The application shall contain any information required by the department to
determine eligibility under this chapter. The department shall rule on the
application within sixty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. If the department
approves an application under section 4 of this act for a deferral under
section 2(1) of this act, the department shall issue a sales and use tax
deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW for the electrical generating equipment and
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be
repaid.

(2) If the department
finds that an industrial facility has not increased production to October 1,
2000, levels by October 1, 2003, or that the industrial facility does not
remain in operation for eight years after it has reached the October 1, 2000,
levels, a portion of deferred taxes shall be immediately due. To determine the
portion of deferred taxes that shall be due, subtract the production level on
October 1, 2003, from the production level on October 1, 2000. Divide the
result by the production level on October 1, 2000, less the production level on
the date of application under section 4 of this act. That portion shall be
paid according to the following schedule:

Year in
which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2
87.5%

3
75%

4
62.5%

5
50%

6
37.5%

7
25%

8
12.5%

The department shall assess
interest at the rate provided for delinquent taxes, but not penalties,
retroactively to the date of deferral. The debt for deferred taxes shall not
be extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject to the
successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter, for the
remaining periods of the deferral.

(3) Notwithstanding
subsection (2) of this section, deferred taxes on the following need not be
repaid:

(a) Machinery and
equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor and services, which at the
time of purchase would have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and

(b) Machinery and
equipment which at the time of first use would have qualified for exemption
under RCW 82.12.02565.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. No application may be
approved under this chapter after October 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies
to the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. Applications and
supporting documents received by the department under this chapter are not
confidential and are subject to disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. Sections 1 through 9 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---