BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that there are numerous regulations requiring local governments to
protect the environment, and salmon in particular. The growth management act
requires that county and city development regulations include best available
science when designating and protecting critical areas, including fish and
wildlife areas, wetlands, and frequently flooded areas. The growth management
act also requires counties and cities to give special consideration to
conservation and protection measures necessary to preserve or enhance
anadromous fisheries. In addition, most counties and cities must comply with
the federal clean water act. Many counties and cities must develop storm water
management plans and must require those developing property to use best
management practices to prevent storm water runoff. Counties and cities must
also comply with the state environmental policy act. Many counties and cities
also have in place flood hazard reduction programs, are engaged in watershed
planning, and are engaged in salmon recovery limiting factors analysis.

It is the intent of
this act to coordinate the planning process of the growth management act,
chapter 36.70A RCW, and the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.130 and 1997
c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent
of this section to coordinate the planning process and timelines of the growth
management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, and the shoreline management act, chapter
90.58 RCW. The legislature finds the planning under these chapters should be
on the same schedule to fully integrate the statutory requirements of each.
The legislature recognizes the significant time, effort, and expense for local
governments and the department associated with the review and evaluation
required by this section and recognizes a need to balance the importance of
this review and evaluation with the associated time, efforts, and expense.
Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a phased schedule for review
and evaluation of comprehensive plans and development regulations under this
chapter.

(2)(a) Each
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to
continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. ((Not
later than September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter,)) A
county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review
and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and development
regulations to ensure ((that)) the plan and regulations ((are
complying)) comply with the requirements of this chapter according
to the time periods specified in subsection (5) of this section. A county or
city not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if
needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding critical
areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (5) of this section.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be combined with the
review required by subsection (((3))) (4) of this section.

(b) Any
amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform
to this chapter((, and)). Any ((change)) amendment of
or revision to development regulations shall be consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan.

(((2))) (3)(a)
Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments
or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of
the county or city no more frequently than once every year ((except that)).
Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year under
the following circumstances:

(i) The initial
adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii) The adoption or
amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in
chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii) The amendment of
the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently
with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the
governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals
can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county
or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that
conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal of
a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board or with the
court.

(((3))) (4)
Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall
review, at least every ten years, its designated urban growth area or areas,
and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated
portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the
county, each city located within an urban growth area shall review the
densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban
growth occurring within the county has located within each city and the
unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive
plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban
growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located
within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period. The
review required by this subsection may be combined with the review and
evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.

(5) The department
shall establish a schedule for counties and cities to conduct the review and
evaluation required by subsection (2) of this section. The schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and evaluations to
be completed as follows:

(a) On or before the
following dates, and at least every five years thereafter, for Clark, King,
Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, and Thurston counties and the cities within those
counties:

(i) December 1,
2003, for policies and regulations regarding critical areas. However, any
amendments to these policies and regulations adopted as a result of this review
and evaluation shall not be effective before July 1, 2004; and

(ii) July 1, 2004,
for policies, comprehensive plans, and development regulations other than
policies and regulations regarding critical areas that are adopted according to
this chapter;

(b) On or before
December 1, 2004, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Clallam,
Jefferson, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;

(c) On or before
December 1, 2005, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island,
Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within
those counties;

(d) On or before
December 1, 2006, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Benton, Chelan,
Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within
those counties; and

(e) On or before
December 1, 2007, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Adams, Asotin,
Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln,
Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman
counties and the cities within those counties.

(6) Nothing in this
section precludes a county or city from conducting the review and evaluation
required by this section before the time limits established in subsection (5)
of this section. Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be
eligible for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.

(7) A county or city
subject to the time periods in subsection (5)(a) of this section that, pursuant
to an ordinance adopted by the county or city establishing a schedule for
periodic review of its comprehensive plan and development regulations, has
conducted a review and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to
that review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first review
required by subsection (5)(a) of this section. Subsequent review and
evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the time periods established
under subsection (5)(a) of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 90.58.060 and 1995 c
347 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall periodically review and adopt guidelines consistent with RCW 90.58.020,
containing the elements specified in RCW 90.58.100 for:

(a) Development of
master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines; and

(b) Development of
master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines of statewide
significance.

(2) Before adopting or
amending guidelines under this section, the department shall provide an
opportunity for public review and comment as follows:

(a) The department
shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities, counties, and federally
recognized Indian tribes, and to any other person who has requested a copy, and
shall publish the proposed guidelines in the Washington state register.
Comments shall be submitted in writing to the department within sixty days from
the date the proposal has been published in the register.

(b) The department
shall hold at least four public hearings on the proposal in different locations
throughout the state to provide a reasonable opportunity for residents in all
parts of the state to present statements and views on the proposed guidelines.
Notice of the hearings shall be published at least once in each of the three
weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more newspapers of general
circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment to the guidelines
addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the number and location of
hearings may be adjusted consistent with the intent of this subsection to assure
all parties a reasonable opportunity to comment on the proposed amendment. The
department shall accept written comments on the proposal during the sixty-day
public comment period and for seven days after the final public hearing.

(c) At the conclusion
of the public comment period, the department shall review the comments received
and modify the proposal consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The
proposal shall then be published for adoption pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The department may
propose amendments to the guidelines not more than once each year. At least
once every ((five)) ten years the department shall conduct a
review of the guidelines pursuant to the procedures outlined in subsection (2)
of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c
347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) It is the
intent of this section to coordinate the planning process and timelines of the
growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, and the shoreline management act,
chapter 90.58 RCW. The legislature finds the planning under these chapters
should be on the same schedule to fully integrate the statutory requirements of
each. The legislature recognizes a need to balance the importance of master
program development or amendment with the associated time, effort, and expense
of preparing, adopting, and implementing master programs. Therefore, the
legislature intends to establish a phased schedule of master program
development or amendment based on guidelines adopted according to RCW
90.58.060.

(b) It is also the
intent of this section to provide a time period for review and consideration of
the financial, environmental, economic, and other impacts of preparing,
adopting, and implementing shoreline master programs according to guidelines
adopted under this chapter. The legislature recognizes the significant time,
effort, and expense for local governments and the department associated with
master program development and the potential for substantial environmental and
economic impacts associated with master program development or amendment.
Therefore, the legislature intends, through its phased schedule, to provide for
development or amendment of master programs by the larger counties and cities
first so that:

(i) The experiences
of these jurisdictions with implementing the requirements of this section shall
be reviewed by the committee created in section 5 of this act before the
deadlines established for other jurisdictions;

(ii) The committee
established in section 5 of this act shall consider and recommend to the
legislature any changes to the requirements of this section or the schedule
established in this section before the deadlines established for other
jurisdictions; and

(iii) The legislature
may consider, based on the experiences of the larger jurisdictions and the
recommendations of the committee, whether any statutory or regulatory changes
are needed before the deadlines established for other jurisdictions.

(2) Local
governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after the
adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program for
regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the required
elements of the guidelines adopted by the department according to the time
periods specified in this subsection. The department shall establish a
schedule for local governments to develop or amend their master programs as
follows:

(a) On or before
December 1, 2003, and at least every five years thereafter, for Clark, King,
Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, and Thurston counties and the cities within those
counties;

(b) On or before
December 1, 2004, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Clallam,
Jefferson, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;

(c) On or before
December 1, 2005, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island,
Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within
those counties;

(d) On or before
December 1, 2006, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Benton, Chelan,
Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within
those counties; and

(e) On or before
December 1, 2007, and at least every ten years thereafter, for Adams, Asotin,
Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln,
Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman
counties and the cities within those counties.

(3) Nothing in this
section precludes a local government from developing or amending its master
program before the time limits established in this section. Local governments
may begin this process early and may be eligible for available grants from the
department, subject to available funding, if they elect to do so.

(4) Local
governments shall report the actual costs of satisfying the requirements of
this section, including but not limited to all costs related to effects
identified in section 5(2)(b) of this act, to the committee created in section
5 of this act.

(5) In revising the
provisions of this section, the legislature does not intend to imply
legislative approval or disapproval of any administrative actions taken or
guidelines adopted by the department under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A shorelines
oversight committee is hereby established. The committee shall consist of the
following twelve members or their designees:

(a) Six members of the
house of representatives, with three from each major political party, appointed
by the co-speakers, or by the speaker and the minority leader, of the house of
representatives; and

(b) Six members of the
senate, with three from each major political party, appointed by the majority
and minority leaders of the senate.

(2) The committee shall
conduct a shoreline master program guidelines implementation assessment as provided
in subsection (3) of this section, periodically review the information and
findings from this assessment, consider whether any statutory or regulatory
changes are needed or desirable based on the results of this assessment, and
provide periodic reports on the assessment, including any legislative
recommendations, as specified in subsection (4) of this section. At a minimum,
the shoreline master program guidelines implementation assessment shall include
review and study of and findings regarding:

(a) Progress of the
larger jurisdictions in developing or amending master programs consistent with
the guidelines;

(b) Actual immediate
and ongoing effects to the larger jurisdictions in developing or amending
master programs consistent with the guidelines, including but not limited to
effects associated with planning, public review and comment, amendments,
adoption, department review and approval, appeals, any required revisions, and
implementation;

(c) Actual immediate
and ongoing effects to businesses and property owners from implementation of
master programs developed or amended consistent with the guidelines;

(d) Comparison of the
effects of alternative approaches to guidelines implementation authorized by
the guidelines;

(e) Use or impact, if
any, of master programs developed or amended consistent with the guidelines in
seeking or obtaining approval of a habitat conservation plan under 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1539, a no jeopardy opinion or an exemption under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1536, or
an exemption under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1533(d) by any local government that includes
area subject to a listing of a species as either threatened or endangered under
the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1538;

(f) The impact, if any,
of implementing master programs developed or amended consistent with the
guidelines on natural resource extraction and natural resource-based
industries;

(g) The need or
desirability, if any, of adapting the guidelines for master programs to be
implemented in rural areas;

(h) Actual immediate
and ongoing effects for water quality, habitat protection, public access to the
shorelines, and other shoreline values and qualities to businesses and property
owners, local governments, and the general public from implementation of master
programs developed or amended consistent with the guidelines;

(i) The amount of
lineal acreage, public and private, restricted in no-use buffers, and the
effects on local tax assessments;

(j) Any potential
statutory or regulatory changes needed or desirable for facilitating
development or amendment of master programs by other jurisdictions or for
addressing concerns raised by the implementation of master programs developed
or amended consistent with the guidelines in the larger jurisdictions; and

(k) Any other topic or
issue the committee deems relevant to the review required by this section.

(3)(a) The committee
shall contract for the assessment required by subsection (2) of this section.
The committee shall select the contractor or contractors to perform the
assessment. The contractor or contractors shall work with and provide periodic
reports to the committee on the status of the assessment. At a minimum, the
contractor or contractors shall present annual reports to the committee on or
before November 1st of each year from 2001 through 2005.

(b) In developing the
assessment, the contractor or contractors shall establish and work with an
advisory committee or committees, including but not limited to representatives
of the following: State agencies, local governments, businesses, environmental
organizations, agricultural organizations, residential construction and
development organizations, the appropriate unions, commercial and recreational
fishing organizations, tribes, recreation and public access organizations, and
any other members as determined by the contractor or contractors.

(4) The committee shall
commence July 1, 2001, and shall provide annual reports to the legislature on
or before November 30th of each year between 2001 and 2005. The annual reports
and the final report of the committee shall include any agreed upon
recommendations for legislation made by the committee or other options
discussed by the committee during the relevant time period. The committee
shall expire June 30, 2006.

(5) The committee shall
be cochaired by one state senator and one state representative chosen by the
committee. Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 44.04.120. The staff of senate committee services and the
office of program research of the house of representatives shall staff the
committee. The open public meetings act shall apply to all meetings and
hearings of the committee. Rules of procedure shall be established at the
first meeting of the committee.

(6) Based upon its experiences
with the larger jurisdictions' implementation of master programs developed or
amended consistent with the guidelines and in consideration of the committee's
recommendations, the department shall submit to the legislature any proposed
amendments to this chapter or to the guidelines before December 31, 2005. Any
proposed amendments to the guidelines submitted to the legislature according to
this subsection shall not take effect before the end of the regular legislative
session. Based on the committee's final report, the department shall propose
final guideline amendments developed through a negotiated rule making process
and submit them to the legislature on or before December 31, 2005. During the
regular legislative session following receipt of the committee's final report
and the department's final proposed guideline amendments, the legislature shall
consider modifying this chapter to sunset or amend the guidelines.

Sec. 6. RCW 90.58.090 and 1997 c
429 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A master program,
segment of a master program, or an amendment to a master program shall become
effective when approved by the department. Within the time period provided in
RCW 90.58.080, each local government shall have submitted a master program,
either totally or by segments, for all shorelines of the state within its
jurisdiction to the department for review and approval.

(2) Upon receipt of a
proposed master program or amendment, the department shall:

(a) Provide notice to
and opportunity for written comment by all interested parties of record as a
part of the local government review process for the proposal and to all
persons, groups, and agencies that have requested in writing notice of proposed
master programs or amendments generally or for a specific area, subject matter,
or issue. The comment period shall be at least thirty days, unless the
department determines that the level of complexity or controversy involved
supports a shorter period;

(b) In the department's
discretion, conduct a public hearing during the thirty-day comment period in
the jurisdiction proposing the master program or amendment;

(c) Within fifteen days
after the close of public comment, request the local government to review the
issues identified by the public, interested parties, groups, and agencies and
provide a written response as to how the proposal addresses the identified
issues;

(d) Within thirty days
after receipt of the local government response pursuant to (c) of this
subsection, make written findings and conclusions regarding the consistency of
the proposal with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines,
provide a response to the issues identified in (c) of this subsection, and
either approve the proposal as submitted, recommend specific changes necessary
to make the proposal approvable, or deny approval of the proposal in those
instances where no alteration of the proposal appears likely to be consistent
with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines. The written
findings and conclusions shall be provided to the local government, all
interested persons, parties, groups, and agencies of record on the proposal;

(e) If the department
recommends changes to the proposed master program or amendment, within thirty
days after the department mails the written findings and conclusions to the
local government, the local government may:

(i) Agree to the
proposed changes. The receipt by the department of the written notice of
agreement constitutes final action by the department approving the amendment;
or

(ii) Submit an
alternative proposal. If, in the opinion of the department, the alternative is
consistent with the purpose and intent of the changes originally submitted by
the department and with this chapter it shall approve the changes and provide
written notice to all recipients of the written findings and conclusions. If
the department determines the proposal is not consistent with the purpose and
intent of the changes proposed by the department, the department may resubmit
the proposal for public and agency review pursuant to this section or reject
the proposal.

(3) The department
shall approve the segment of a master program relating to shorelines unless it
determines that the submitted segments are not consistent with the policy of
RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.

(4) The department
shall approve those segments of the master program relating to shorelines of
statewide significance only after determining the program provides the optimum
implementation of the policy of this chapter to satisfy the statewide
interest. If the department does not approve a segment of a local government
master program relating to a shoreline of statewide significance, the
department may develop and by rule adopt an alternative to the local
government's proposal.

(5) The department
shall recognize that local governments must plan for reasonable and appropriate
uses along with the public interest and environmental objectives in
implementing the policy of this chapter. This planning may allow alterations
of the natural conditions of the shoreline in those limited instances provided
for in RCW 90.58.020.

(6) In the event
a local government has not complied with the requirements of RCW 90.58.070 it
may thereafter upon written notice to the department elect to adopt a master
program for the shorelines within its jurisdiction, in which event it shall
comply with the provisions established by this chapter for the adoption of a
master program for such shorelines.

Upon approval of such
master program by the department it shall supersede such master program as may
have been adopted by the department for such shorelines.

(((6))) (7)
A master program or amendment to a master program takes effect when and in such
form as approved or adopted by the department. Shoreline master programs that
were adopted by the department prior to July 22, 1995, in accordance with the
provisions of this section then in effect, shall be deemed approved by the
department in accordance with the provisions of this section that became
effective on that date. The department shall maintain a record of each master
program, the action taken on any proposal for adoption or amendment of the
master program, and any appeal of the department's action. The department's
approved document of record constitutes the official master program.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The guidelines
adopted by the department and master programs developed or amended by local
governments according to RCW 90.58.080 shall not require modification of or
limit agricultural activities occurring on agricultural lands. In
jurisdictions where agricultural activities occur, master programs developed or
amended after the effective date of this act shall include provisions
addressing new agricultural activities on land not meeting the definition of
agricultural land, conversion of agricultural lands to other uses, and
development not meeting the definition of agricultural activities. Nothing in
this section limits or changes the terms of the current exception to the
definition of substantial development in RCW 90.58.030(3)(e)(iv).

(2) For the purposes of
this section:

(a) "Agricultural
activities" means agricultural uses and practices including, but not
limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing agricultural products; rotating
and changing agricultural crops; allowing land used for agricultural activities
to lie fallow in which it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land
used for agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural activities
to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local, state, or federal
conservation program, or the land is subject to a conservation easement;
conducting agricultural operations; maintaining, repairing, and replacing
agricultural equipment; maintaining, repairing, and replacing agricultural
facilities, provided that the replacement facility is no closer to the
shoreline than the original facility; and maintaining agricultural lands under
production or cultivation;

(b) "Agricultural
products" includes but is not limited to horticultural, viticultural,
floricultural, vegetable, fruit, berry, grain, hops, hay, straw, turf, sod,
seed, and apiary products; feed or forage for livestock; Christmas trees;
hybrid cottonwood and similar hardwood trees grown as crops and harvested
within twenty years of planting; and livestock including both the animals
themselves and animal products including but not limited to meat, upland
finfish, poultry and poultry products, and dairy products;

(c) "Agricultural
equipment" and "agricultural facilities" includes, but is not
limited to: (i) The following used in agricultural operations: Equipment;
machinery; constructed shelters, buildings, and ponds; fences; upland finfish
rearing facilities; water diversion, withdrawal, conveyance, and use equipment
and facilities including but not limited to pumps, pipes, tapes, canals,
ditches, and drains; (ii) corridors and facilities for transporting personnel,
livestock, and equipment to, from, and within agricultural lands; (iii) farm
residences and associated equipment, lands, and facilities; and (iv) roadside
stands and on-farm markets for marketing fruit or vegetables; and

(d) "Agricultural
land" means those specific land areas on which agriculture activities are
conducted.

(3) The department and
local governments shall assure that local shoreline master programs use
definitions consistent with the definitions in this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 36.70A.035 and 1999
c 315 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public
participation requirements of this chapter shall include notice procedures that
are reasonably calculated to provide notice to property owners and other
affected and interested individuals, tribes, government agencies, businesses,
school districts, and organizations of proposed amendments to comprehensive
plans and development regulations. Examples of reasonable notice
provisions include:

(a) Posting the
property for site-specific proposals;

(b) Publishing notice
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or general area
where the proposal is located or that will be affected by the proposal;

(c) Notifying public or
private groups with known interest in a certain proposal or in the type of
proposal being considered;

(d) Placing notices in
appropriate regional, neighborhood, ethnic, or trade journals; and

(e) Publishing notice
in agency newsletters or sending notice to agency mailing lists, including
general lists or lists for specific proposals or subject areas.

(2) The public
participation process established by counties and cities to satisfy the requirements
of this chapter shall include measures to satisfy the requirements of RCW
90.58.130 for the shoreline master program developed or amended according to
chapter 90.58 RCW.

(3)(a) Except as
otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, if the legislative body for a
county or city chooses to consider a change to an amendment to a comprehensive
plan or development regulation, and the change is proposed after the
opportunity for review and comment has passed under the county's or city's
procedures, an opportunity for review and comment on the proposed change shall
be provided before the local legislative body votes on the proposed change.

(b) An additional
opportunity for public review and comment is not required under (a) of this
subsection if:

(i) An environmental
impact statement has been prepared under chapter 43.21C RCW for the pending
resolution or ordinance and the proposed change is within the range of
alternatives considered in the environmental impact statement;

(ii) The proposed
change is within the scope of the alternatives available for public comment;

(iii) The proposed
change only corrects typographical errors, corrects cross-references, makes
address or name changes, or clarifies language of a proposed ordinance or
resolution without changing its effect;

(iv) The proposed
change is to a resolution or ordinance making a capital budget decision as
provided in RCW 36.70A.120; or

(v) The proposed change
is to a resolution or ordinance enacting a moratorium or interim control
adopted under RCW 36.70A.390.

(((3))) (4)
This section is prospective in effect and does not apply to a comprehensive
plan, development regulation, or amendment adopted before July 27, 1997.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
9. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1) At least two years
before the deadline specified for the county or city in RCW 36.70A.130, each
county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish by ordinance or
resolution an integrated and consolidated planning process for the development
and adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations under this
chapter and shoreline master programs under chapter 90.58 RCW. Counties and
cities not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may adopt an integrated and
consolidated planning process consistent with this section for review,
revision, development, amendment, or adoption of development regulations
regarding critical areas and natural resource lands according to this chapter and
master programs according to chapter 90.58 RCW.

(2) The process shall
include the following elements:

(a) Coordination of the
planning process to satisfy the requirements of this chapter and chapter 90.58
RCW;

(b) Development of a
public participation program to satisfy the requirements of this chapter and
chapter 90.58 RCW;

(c) Review of
scientific and other information to satisfy the requirements of this chapter
and chapter 90.58 RCW;

(d) Opportunity for
review and consideration of comment from agencies and other interested parties
as required by this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW;

(e) Consolidation of
public hearing and comment processes to satisfy the requirements of this
chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW;

(f) Timing of submittal
of master program elements to the department of ecology to allow sufficient
time for review and approval of master programs by the department of ecology
and to coordinate with the schedule for review, revision, and adoption of
comprehensive plans and development regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.130;

(g) Consolidation of
amendment and adoption procedures and processes to satisfy the requirements of
this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(h) Any other
provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter, chapter
43.21C RCW, or chapter 90.58 RCW.

(3) The integration and
coordination of planning processes under this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW
does not alter the department's authority to review comprehensive plans and
development regulations adopted under this chapter and does not create any
authority for the department of ecology to review or approve comprehensive
plans and development regulations adopted according to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
10. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The department shall
provide technical assistance and conduct training to assist counties and cities
in implementing the requirements of sections 9 and 12 of this act.

Sec. 11. RCW 36.70A.140 and 1995
c 347 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county
and city ((that is required or chooses to plan)) planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public
participation program identifying procedures providing for early and continuous
public participation in the review, revision, development ((and)),
amendment, or adoption of comprehensive land use plans and development
regulations implementing such plans under this chapter and master programs
under chapter 90.58 RCW.

(2) The
procedures shall provide for broad dissemination of proposals and alternatives,
opportunity for written comments, public meetings after effective notice,
provision for open discussion, communication programs, information services,
and consideration of and response to public comments.

(3) In enacting
legislation in response to the board's decision pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300
declaring part or all of a comprehensive plan or development regulation
invalid, the county or city shall provide for public participation that is
appropriate and effective under the circumstances presented by the board's
order.

(4) Errors in
exact compliance with the established program and procedures established
according to this section shall not render the comprehensive land use plan
or development regulations invalid if the spirit of the program and procedures
is observed.

(5) In addition to
meeting the other requirements of this section, the public participation
program of counties and cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that is
established as required by this section shall satisfy the local government
public participation requirements of RCW 90.58.100 and 90.58.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
12. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1) At least two years
before the deadline specified for the local government in RCW 36.70A.130, each
local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish by ordinance or
resolution an integrated and consolidated planning process for the review,
revision, development, amendment, or adoption of comprehensive plans and
development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW and shoreline master programs
under this chapter. Local governments not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may
adopt an integrated and consolidated planning process consistent with this
section for review, revision, development, amendment, or adoption of
development regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands
according to chapter 36.70A RCW and master programs according to this chapter.

(2) The planning
process shall include the following elements:

(a) Coordination of the
planning process to satisfy the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW and this
chapter;

(b) Development of a
public participation program to satisfy the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW
and this chapter;

(c) Review of
scientific and other information to satisfy the requirements of chapter 36.70A
RCW and this chapter;

(d) Opportunity for
review and consideration of comment from agencies and other interested parties
as required by chapter 36.70A RCW and this chapter;

(e) Consolidation of
public hearing and comment processes to satisfy the requirements of chapter
36.70A RCW and this chapter;

(f) Timing of submittal
of master program elements to the department to allow sufficient time for
review and approval by the department and to coordinate master program review
and approval with the schedule for review, revision, and adoption of
comprehensive plans and development regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.130;

(g) Consolidation of
amendment and adoption procedures and processes to satisfy the requirements of
chapter 36.70A RCW and this chapter; and

(h) Any other
provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW,
chapter 43.21C RCW, or this chapter.

(3) The integration and
coordination of planning processes under this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW
does not alter the department's authority to review and approve master programs
developed or amended under this chapter and does not create any authority for
the department to review or approve comprehensive plans and development
regulations adopted according to chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
13. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

If a county's or city's
critical areas regulations are the subject of an appeal to the board, the
department of ecology's determination regarding the county's or city's
shoreline master program compliance with chapter 90.58 RCW does not modify the
presumption of validity established by RCW 36.70A.320(1) or the burden of
persuasion established by RCW 36.70A.320(2) with respect to the question of
whether the critical areas regulations under appeal comply with the
requirements of this chapter for those areas not subject to the shoreline
management act.

Sec. 14. RCW 90.58.250 and 1971
ex.s. c 286 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is
directed to cooperate fully with local governments in discharging their
responsibilities under this chapter. Funds shall be available for distribution
to local governments on the basis of applications for preparation of master
programs. Such applications shall be submitted in accordance with regulations
developed by the department. The department is authorized to make and
administer grants within appropriations authorized by the legislature to any
local government within the state for the purpose of developing a master ((shorelines))
program.

((No grant shall be
made in an amount in excess of the recipient's contribution to the estimated
cost of such program.))

Sec. 15. RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997
c 429 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All requests for
review to a growth management hearings board shall be initiated by filing a
petition that includes a detailed statement of issues presented for resolution
by the board. The board shall render written decisions articulating the basis
for its holdings. The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not
presented to the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any
prehearing order.

(2) All petitions
relating to whether or not an adopted comprehensive plan, development
regulation, or permanent amendment thereto, is in compliance with the goals and
requirements of this chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed
within sixty days after publication by the legislative bodies of the county or
city.

(a) Except as provided
in (c) of this subsection, the date of publication for a city shall be the date
the city publishes the ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the
comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is
required to be published.

(b) Promptly after
adoption, a county shall publish a notice that it has adopted the comprehensive
plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto.

Except as provided in
(c) of this subsection, for purposes of this section the date of publication
for a county shall be the date the county publishes the notice that it has
adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment
thereto.

(c) For local governments
planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly after approval or disapproval of a
local government’s shoreline master program or amendment thereto by the
department of ecology as provided in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall
publish a notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has
been approved or disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of
this section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes notice that
the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology.

(3)(a) Unless
the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds that the person filing
the petition lacks standing, or the parties have filed an agreement to have the
case heard in superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall,
within ten days of receipt of the petition, set a time for hearing the matter.

(b) If a county or
city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 develops or amends a shoreline master
program according to chapter 90.58 RCW concurrent with the adoption or
amendment of a comprehensive plan or development regulations according to this
chapter, the county or city shall notify the board of the concurrent adoption
no later than ten days after receipt of notice of the hearing date being set by
the board.

(c) If the board
receives a notice of concurrent adoption from a county or city planning under
RCW 36.70A.040, and unless the parties otherwise agree in writing, the board
shall stay proceedings regarding the petition until the end of the appeal
period for the shoreline master program or master program amendment under
chapter 90.58 RCW. The board shall set a time for hearing of the matter within
ten days of the end of the stay period. The board shall not stay the
proceedings if all parties agree in writing within twenty days after the
county's or city's notice of concurrent adoption to a hearing on the petition
separately from any appeal of the shoreline master program or master program
amendment.

(4) The board shall
base its decision on the record developed by the city, county, or the state and
supplemented with additional evidence if the board determines that such
additional evidence would be necessary or of substantial assistance to the
board in reaching its decision.

(5) The board, shall
consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions involving the review of the same
comprehensive plan or the same development regulation or regulations.

Sec. 16. RCW 36.70A.300 and 1997
c 429 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall
issue a final order that shall be based exclusively on whether or not a state
agency, county, or city is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to adoption or amendment of shoreline master
programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW.

(2)(a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, the final order shall be issued within one
hundred eighty days of receipt of the petition for review, or, if multiple
petitions are filed, within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the last petition
that is consolidated.

(b) The board may
extend the period of time for issuing a decision to enable the parties to
settle the dispute if additional time is necessary to achieve a settlement, and
(i) an extension is requested by all parties, or (ii) an extension is requested
by the petitioner and respondent and the board determines that a negotiated
settlement between the remaining parties could resolve significant issues in
dispute. The request must be filed with the board not later than seven days before
the date scheduled for the hearing on the merits of the petition. The board
may authorize one or more extensions for up to ninety days each, subject to the
requirements of this section.

(c) If a board stays
proceedings regarding a petition pursuant to RCW 36.70A.290(3)(c), the board
shall issue a final order within one hundred eighty days of the end of the stay
period. The board shall consolidate all petitions for review of the
concurrently adopted shoreline master program or amendment with the plan or
development regulations appealed under this chapter.

(3) In the final order,
the board shall either:

(a) Find that the state
agency, county, or city is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption or amendment of shoreline
master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans,
development regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or
chapter 90.58 RCW; or

(b) Find that the state
agency, county, or city is not in compliance with the requirements of this
chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption or amendment of
shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of
plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or
chapter 90.58 RCW, in which case the board shall remand the matter to the
affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall specify a reasonable
time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such longer period as
determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or complexity, within which
the state agency, county, or city shall comply with the requirements of this
chapter. The board may require periodic reports to the board on the progress
the jurisdiction is making towards compliance.

(4) Unless the board
makes a determination of invalidity as provided in RCW 36.70A.302, a finding of
noncompliance and an order of remand shall not affect the validity of
comprehensive plans and development regulations during the period of remand.

(5) Any party aggrieved
by a final decision of the hearings board may appeal the decision to superior
court as provided in RCW 34.05.514 or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final
order of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
17. A new section is added
to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

To encourage efficient
and effective planning and implementation, cities not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may adopt shoreline master programs or master program amendments
under chapter 90.58 RCW concurrently with policies and regulations adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW or plans and regulations adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
18. A new section is added
to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

To encourage efficient
and effective planning and implementation, cities not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may adopt shoreline master programs or master program amendments
under chapter 90.58 RCW concurrently with policies and regulations adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW or plans and regulations adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
19. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

To encourage efficient
and effective planning and implementation, counties not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may adopt shoreline master programs or master program amendments
under chapter 90.58 RCW concurrently with policies and regulations adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW or plans and regulations adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
20. A new section is added
to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

To encourage efficient
and effective planning and implementation, counties and cities may adopt
shoreline master programs or master program amendments under chapter 90.58 RCW
concurrently with comprehensive plans and development regulations adopted under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
21. A new section is added
to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

To encourage efficient
and effective planning and implementation, local governments may adopt
shoreline master programs or master program amendments under this chapter
concurrently with comprehensive plans, policies, and regulations adopted under
chapter 35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW.

Sec. 22. RCW 36.70A.215 and 1997
c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the
limitations in subsection (7) of this section, a county shall adopt, in
consultation with its cities, countywide planning policies to establish a
review and evaluation program. This program shall be in addition to the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In developing and
implementing the review and evaluation program required by this section, the
county and its cities shall consider information from other appropriate
jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review and evaluation program
shall be to:

(a) Determine whether a
county and its cities are achieving urban densities within urban growth areas
by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets, and objectives
contained in the countywide planning policies and the county and city
comprehensive plans with actual growth and development that has occurred in the
county and its cities; ((and))

(b) Determine
whether sufficient land suitable for development is included within designated
urban growth areas at densities sufficient to accommodate the growth management
population projections established pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110(2); and

(c) Identify
reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth areas, that will be
taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2) The review and
evaluation program shall:

(a) Encompass land uses
and activities both within and outside of urban growth areas and provide for
annual collection of data on urban and rural land uses, development, critical
areas, and capital facilities to the extent necessary to determine the quantity
and type of land suitable for development, both for residential and
employment-based activities;

(b) Provide for
evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every five years
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The first evaluation shall be
completed not later than September 1, 2002. The county and its cities may
establish in the countywide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and other
similar criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;

(c) Provide for methods
to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the countywide planning
policies required by this section and procedures to resolve inconsistencies in
collection and analysis of data; and

(d) Provide for the
amendment of the countywide policies and county and city comprehensive plans as
needed to remedy an inconsistency identified through the evaluation required by
this section, or to bring these policies into compliance with the requirements
of this chapter.

(3) At a minimum, the
evaluation component of the program required by subsection (1) of this section
shall:

(a) Determine whether
there is sufficient suitable land to accommodate the countywide population
projection established for the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the
subsequent population allocations within the county and between the county and
its cities and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(b) Determine the
actual density of housing that has been constructed and the actual amount of
land developed for commercial and industrial uses within the urban growth area
since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter or since the last
periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this section; ((and))

(c) Based on the actual
density of development as determined under (b) of this subsection, review
commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type and density range to determine
the amount of land needed for commercial, industrial, and housing for the
remaining portion of the twenty-year planning period used in the most recently
adopted comprehensive plan;

(d) Determine the
acreage and qualitative change in the quantity or density of land suitable for
development within the designated urban growth area that has occurred as a
result of designating land within the urban growth area as critical areas after
January 1, 2001, or based on any other amendment to a comprehensive plan or
development regulation adopted after January 1, 2001, that after taking into
account new land made available for development or increases in authorized
densities, effectively changes any land development potential within the
designated urban growth area;

(e) Based on the
change determined under (d) of this subsection:

(i) Include in the
land capacity docket any amount determined as a deficiency or an excess in land
suitable for development within the urban growth area; and

(ii) Within the time
periods specified in RCW 36.70A.130, review the docketed amount and consider
changes to the countywide planning policies, comprehensive plan or development
regulations, including density determinations, urban growth area designations,
or other changes, to address the quantity of sufficient land suitable for
development within designated urban growth areas at densities sufficient to
accommodate the growth management population projections established pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.110(2); and

(f) Based upon the
needed development capacity, as determined pursuant to this subsection (3), the
jurisdiction shall make every effort to:

(i) First, if
feasible, include a transfer of development densities or uses to remaining
portions of a lot or parcel;

(ii) Second, if
feasible, include a transfer of development densities or uses to appropriate
adjoining properties; and

(iii) Finally,
include a transfer of development densities or uses to other appropriate lands
within the jurisdiction.

(4) If the evaluation
required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates an inconsistency
between what has occurred since the adoption of the countywide planning
policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the county and its cities shall adopt and implement measures that are
reasonably likely to increase consistency during the subsequent five-year
period. If necessary, a county, in consultation with its cities as required by
RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to countywide planning policies to
increase consistency. The county and its cities shall annually monitor the
measures adopted under this subsection to determine their effect and may revise
or rescind them as appropriate.

(5)(a) Not later than
July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list of methods used by counties
and cities in carrying out the types of activities required by this section.
The department shall provide this information and appropriate technical
assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing to comply with the
provisions of this section.

(b) By December 31,
2007, the department shall submit to the appropriate committees of the
legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness of the activities described in
this section in achieving the goals envisioned by the countywide planning
policies and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of the
counties and cities.

(6) From funds
appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the department shall provide
grants to counties, cities, and regional planning organizations required under
subsection (7) of this section to conduct the review and perform the evaluation
required by this section.

(7) The provisions of
this section shall apply to counties, and the cities within those counties,
that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand in population in 1995 as
determined by office of financial management population estimates and that are
located west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range. Any other county
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out the review, evaluation, and
amendment programs and procedures as provided in this section.

(8) For the purposes
of this section, "land capacity docket" means to compile and maintain
a detailed list of land and land use changes resulting from the actions
specified in subsection (3)(d) of this section in a manner that will ensure
that such changes will be presented for the required periodic action specified
in subsection (3)(e)(ii) of this section and will be available for review by
the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
23. In revising provisions of
chapter 90.58 RCW and including new provisions in chapter 90.58 RCW, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or disapproval of any
administrative actions taken or guidelines adopted by the department of ecology
under chapter 90.58 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
24. Section 5 of this act
expires August 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
25. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
26. (1)(a) The sum of three
million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2002 is appropriated from
the general fund to the department of ecology to implement this act. Of the
amount in this subsection, three million two hundred thousand dollars is
provided solely for grants to local governments to update shoreline master
programs according to section 4 of this act, and three hundred thousand dollars
is provided solely for technical assistance and the shoreline oversight
committee contractor in section 5 of this act.

(b) The sum of three
million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2003 is appropriated from
the general fund to the department of ecology to implement this act. Of the
amount in this subsection, three million two hundred thousand dollars is
provided solely for grants to local governments to update shoreline master
programs according to section 4 of this act, and three hundred thousand dollars
is provided solely for technical assistance and the shoreline oversight
committee contractor in section 5 of this act.

(2)(a) The sum of one
million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2002 is appropriated from
the general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic
development to implement this act. The entire appropriation in this subsection
is provided solely for grants to local governments to implement section 2 of
this act.

(b) The sum of one
million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2003 is appropriated from
the general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic
development to implement this act. The entire appropriation in this subsection
is provided solely for grants to local governments to implement section 2 of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---