BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
"Compensation" means remuneration that equals the reduction in the
fair market value of private real property that is attributable to a
restriction on the use of the property or any part thereof.

(2) "Government
entity" means Washington state, state agencies, agencies and commissions
funded, in whole or in part, by the state, counties, cities, towns, special
districts, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations.

(3) "Real
property" means any interest in real property recognized under Washington
law, including but not limited to, water, crops, forest products, minerals, or
other natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. (1) If any action by a
government entity to change the land use or zoning status of real property
causes at least a thirty percent reduction in the use or exchange value of that
property, the property is considered to have been taken for the use of the
public.

(2) The owner of the
property that is taken under subsection (1) of this section has a right to
receive compensation for the reduction in value caused by the government
entity's action.

(3) If, in an action
under this chapter, a court awards compensation to a property owner, the court
may also award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to such property owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If any action by a
government entity results in a taking of property under this chapter and causes
at least a thirty percent reduction in the full cash value of real property,
the government entity's assessor or, if appropriate, the department of revenue
shall reflect the reduction in valuation by reducing the assessed valuation of
the property on the tax rolls as of the next valuation date.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. This chapter shall not be
construed as an exclusive remedy or to diminish other rights of property owners
under existing law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. This chapter does not
apply in the case of an exercise of police power to prevent noxious use of
property or tangible harm to the health and safety of the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. This act takes effect
January 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 19.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In the adoption of
a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency shall prepare a takings analysis:
(a) If the proposed rule will cause a reduction in the use or exchange value of
any private property; or (b) if requested to do so by a majority vote of the
joint administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of receiving
the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

An agency shall prepare
a takings analysis in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, and file
it with the code reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320.
An agency shall file a takings analysis prepared at the request of the joint
administrative rules review committee with the code reviser upon its completion
before the adoption of the rule. An agency shall provide a copy of the takings
analysis to any person requesting it.

(2) A takings analysis
must include:

(a) A brief description
of the elements of a rule that would place new restrictions on the use or
exchange value of private property; and

(b) A statement of the
steps taken by the agency to reduce or eliminate any reduction in the use or
exchange value of any private property, or reasonable justification for not
doing so.

(3) To obtain
information for purposes of this section, an agency may survey a representative
sample of affected private property and should, whenever possible, appoint a
committee under RCW 34.05.310(2) to assist in the accurate assessment of the
impact of a proposed rule, and the means to reduce the impact.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 6 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

---
END ---