BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.15.190 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

A scheduled election
shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken from the ballot, no purported
write-in votes counted, and no candidate certified as elected, when:

(1) In an election for
judge of the supreme court or superintendent of public instruction, a void in
candidacy occurs on or after the ((fourth)) sixth Tuesday prior
to a primary, public filings and the primary being an indispensable phase of
the election process for such offices;

(2) Except as otherwise
specified in RCW 29.15.180, ((as now or hereafter amended,)) a nominee
for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election pursuant
to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution dies or is
disqualified on or after the ((fourth)) sixth Tuesday prior to a
primary;

(3) In other elections
for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy occurs or a vacancy occurs involving
an unexpired term to be filled on or after the ((fourth)) sixth
Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.12.040 and 1981 c
180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If a vacancy occurs in
any partisan elective office in the executive or legislative branches of state
government or in any partisan county elective office before the ((fourth))
sixth Tuesday prior to the primary for the next general election following
the occurrence of the vacancy, a successor shall be elected to that office at
that general election. Except during the last year of the term of office, if
such a vacancy occurs on or after the ((fourth)) sixth Tuesday
prior to the primary for that general election, the election of the successor
shall occur at the next succeeding general election. The elected successor
shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term. This section shall
not apply to any vacancy occurring in a charter county which has charter
provisions inconsistent with this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---