BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.28.261 and 2001 c
211 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in RCW
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to require that a person obtain
a license or a certified electrician in order to do electrical work at his or
her residence or farm or place of business or on other property owned by him or
her unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new building
intended for rent, sale, or lease. However, if the construction is of a new
residential building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease,
the owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license or
use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit to the
department stating that he or she will be performing the work and will occupy
one of the units as his or her principal residence. The owner shall apply to
the department for this exemption and may only receive an exemption once every
twenty-four months. It is intended that the owner receiving this exemption
shall occupy the unit as his or her principal residence for twenty-four months
after completion of the units. Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
shall be intended to derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any
valid electrical code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3),
except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to
demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other license or
pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical construction trade. RCW
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part
I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees. Nothing
in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be deemed to apply to the installation
or maintenance of telephone, telegraph, radio, or television wires and
equipment; nor to any electrical utility or its employees in the installation,
repair, and maintenance of electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for
the utility, or comprising a part of its plants, lines or systems. The
licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to:

(1) Persons making
electrical installations on their own property or to regularly employed
employees working on the premises of their employer, unless the electrical work
is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease;

(2) Employees of an
employer while the employer is performing utility type work of the nature
described in RCW 19.28.091 so long as such employees have registered in the
state of Washington with or graduated from a state-approved outside lineman
apprenticeship course that is recognized by the department and that qualifies a
person to perform such work; ((or))

(3) Any work exempted
under RCW 19.28.091(6); or

(4) Persons
installing, servicing, maintaining, repairing, or replacing:

(a) Low voltage,
class 2 HVAC/refrigeration control circuit cables or equipment for irrigation
systems, garage door openers, built-in vacuum cleaning systems, control of
furnaces, heat pumps, and similar HVAC or refrigeration equipment when such
conductors do not connect to other than HVAC or refrigeration equipment and
when such buildings do not exceed three floors above grade, except for
residential occupancies; or

(b)
HVAC/refrigeration, water heater, electric range, electric oven, garbage
disposal, dishwasher, clothes washers, clothes dryers, ventilation fans, and
other common household appliances. This includes replacing the device having
no greater electrical supply requirements than the device being replaced if the
person uses the same electrical circuit used to power the equipment being replaced,
without modification, to operate the replacement equipment. This also includes
replacing electrical components within the device, only if the components are
like in kind with equivalent voltage and current ratings. This exemption does
not allow the installation of branch circuit (line voltage) conductors,
services, feeders, panelboards, or disconnect switches to devices exempted by
this subsection. Short sections of raceway may be installed for access to or
physical protection of cables, however wiring in conduit systems and wiring in
classified locations are not included in this exemption.

Nothing in
RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to restrict the right of any
householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative
or other person when none of the individuals doing the electrical installation
hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or business of electrical
installations. Nothing precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing
requirements of this chapter under this section from obtaining a journeyman or
specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise meet the requirements of
this chapter.

--- END ---