BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29.30.085 and 1992 c
181 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided
in RCW 29.30.086 and in subsection (2) of this section, on the ballot at the
general election for ((a nonpartisan)) an office for which a
primary was held, only the names of the candidate who received the greatest
number of votes and the candidate who received the next greatest number of
votes for that office shall appear under the title of that office, and the
names shall appear in that order. ((If a primary was conducted, no
candidate's name may be printed on the subsequent general election ballot
unless he or she receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that
office at the preceding primary.)) On the ballot at the general election
for ((any other nonpartisan)) an office for which no primary was
held, the names of the candidates shall be listed in the order determined under
RCW 29.30.025.

(2) On the ballot at
the general election for the office of justice of the supreme court, judge of
the court of appeals, judge of the superior court, or state superintendent of
public instruction, if a candidate in a contested primary receives a majority
of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the name of that
candidate may be printed under the title of the office for that position.

Sec. 2. RCW 29.15.150 and 1973 c
4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever it shall be
necessary to hold a special election in an odd-numbered year to fill an
unexpired term of any office which is scheduled to be voted upon for a full
term in an even-numbered year, no September primary election shall be held in
the odd-numbered year if, after the last day allowed for candidates to
withdraw, ((either of the following circumstances exist:

(1) No more than one
candidate of each qualified political party has filed a declaration of
candidacy for the same partisan office to be filled; or

(2))) no more than two candidates have filed
a declaration of candidacy for a single ((nonpartisan)) office to be
filled.

In ((either)) this
event, the officer with whom the declarations of candidacy were filed shall
immediately notify all candidates concerned and the names of the candidates
that would have been printed upon the September primary ballot, but for the
provisions of this section, shall be printed as nominees for the positions
sought upon the November general election ballot.

Sec. 3. RCW 29.15.160 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A void in candidacy for
((a nonpartisan)) an office occurs when an election for such
office, except for the short term, has been scheduled and no valid declaration
of candidacy has been filed for the position or all persons filing such valid declarations
of candidacy have died or been disqualified.

Sec. 4. RCW 29.15.170 and 2001 c
46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings for ((a
nonpartisan)) an office shall be reopened for a period of three
normal business days, such three day period to be fixed by the election officer
with whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by
notifying press, radio, and television in the county or counties involved
and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by law whenever
before the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary:

(1) A void in candidacy
occurs;

(2) A vacancy occurs in
((any nonpartisan)) an office leaving an unexpired term to be
filled by an election for which filings have not been held; or

(3) A nominee for judge
of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election pursuant to Article
4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.

Candidacies validly
filed within said three-day period shall appear on the ballot as if made during
the earlier filing period.

Sec. 5. RCW 29.15.190 and
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

A scheduled election
shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken from the ballot, no purported
write-in votes counted, and no candidate certified as elected, when:

(1) In an election for
judge of the supreme court ((or)), superintendent of public
instruction, or a partisan office, a void in candidacy occurs on or after
the fourth Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the primary being an
indispensable phase of the election process for such offices;

(2) Except as otherwise
specified in RCW 29.15.180, as now or hereafter amended, a nominee for judge of
the superior court entitled to a certificate of election pursuant to Article 4,
section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution dies or is disqualified on
or after the fourth Tuesday prior to a primary;

(3) In other elections
for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy occurs or a vacancy occurs involving
an unexpired term to be filled on or after the fourth Tuesday prior to an
election.

Sec. 6. RCW 29.15.210 and 1972
ex.s. c 61 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy are filed shall give
notice of a void in candidacy for ((a nonpartisan)) an office((,))
by notifying press, radio, and television in the county or counties involved
and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by law. The notice
shall state the office, and the time and place for filing declarations of
candidacy.

Sec. 7. RCW 29.15.220 and 1972
ex.s. c 61 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings to
fill a void in candidacy for ((nonpartisan)) an office shall be
made in the same manner and with the same official as required during the
regular filing period for such office: PROVIDED, That nominating signature
petitions which may be required of candidates filing for certain district
offices during the normal filing period shall not be required of candidates
filing during the special three day filing period.

Sec. 8. RCW 29.27.020 and 1990 c
59 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

On or before the day
following the last day allowed for ((political parties to fill
vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29.18.150)) candidates to
withdraw under RCW 29.15.120, the secretary of state shall certify to each
county auditor a list of the candidates who have filed declarations of
candidacy in his or her office for the primary. For each office, the
certificate shall include the name of each candidate, his or her address, and
his or her party designation, if any.

Sec. 9. RCW 29.30.101 and 1999 c
298 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The names of the
persons certified as nominees by the secretary of state or the county
canvassing board shall be printed on the ballot at the ensuing election.

No name of any
candidate whose nomination at a primary is required by law shall be placed upon
the ballot at a general or special election unless it appears upon the
certificate of either (1) the secretary of state((,)) or (2) the county
canvassing board((, or (3) a minor party convention or the state or county
central committee of a major political party to fill a vacancy on its ticket
under RCW 29.18.160)).

Excluding the office of
precinct committee officer or a temporary elected position such as a charter
review board member or freeholder, a candidate's name shall not appear more
than once upon a ballot for a position regularly nominated or elected at the
same election.

Sec. 10. RCW 29.42.010 and 1977
ex.s. c 329 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Each political party
organization shall have the power to:

(1) Make its own rules
and regulations;

(2) Call conventions;

(3) Elect delegates to
conventions, state and national;

(4) ((Fill vacancies
on the ticket;

(5))) Provide for the nomination of presidential
electors; and

(((6)))
(5) Perform all functions inherent in such an organization((:
PROVIDED, That only major political parties shall have the power to designate
candidates to appear on the state primary election ballot as provided in RCW
29.18.150 as now or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 11. RCW 29.42.020 and 1987 c
295 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The state committee of
each major political party shall consist of one committeeman and one
committeewoman from each county elected by the county committee at its
organization meeting. It shall have a chair and vice-chair who must be of
opposite sexes. This committee shall meet during January of each odd-numbered
year for the purpose of organization at a time and place designated by a
sufficient notice to all the newly elected state committeemen and
committeewomen by the authorized officers of the retiring committee. For the
purpose of this section a notice mailed at least one week prior to the date of
the meeting shall constitute sufficient notice. At its organizational meeting
it shall elect its chair and vice-chair, and such officers as its bylaws may
provide, and adopt bylaws, rules and regulations. It shall have power to:

(1) Call conventions at
such time and place and under such circumstances and for such purposes as the
call to convention shall designate. The manner, number and procedure for selection
of state convention delegates shall be subject to the committee's rules and
regulations duly adopted;

(2) Provide for the
election of delegates to national conventions;

(3) ((Fill vacancies
on the ticket for any federal or state office to be voted on by the electors of
more than one county;

(4))) Provide for the nomination of presidential
electors; and

(((5))) (4)
Perform all functions inherent in such an organization.

Notwithstanding any
provision of this chapter, the committee shall not set rules which shall govern
the conduct of the actual proceedings at a party state convention.

Sec. 12. RCW 29.42.050 and 1991 c
363 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The statutory
requirements for filing as a candidate at the primaries shall apply to
candidates for precinct committee officer except that the filing period for
this office alone shall be extended to and include the second Friday
immediately following the last day for ((political parties to fill vacancies
in the ticket as provided by RCW 29.18.150)) the filing of declarations
of candidacy under RCW 29.15.020, and the office shall not be voted upon at
the primaries, but the names of all candidates must appear under the proper
party and office designations on the ballot for the general November election
for each even-numbered year and the one receiving the highest number of votes
shall be declared elected: PROVIDED, That to be declared elected, a candidate
must receive at least ten percent of the number of votes cast for the candidate
of the candidate's party receiving the greatest number of votes in the
precinct. Any person elected to the office of precinct committee officer who
has not filed a declaration of candidacy shall pay the fee of one dollar to the
county auditor for a certificate of election. The term of office of precinct
committee officer shall be for two years, commencing upon completion of the
official canvass of votes by the county canvassing board of election returns.
Should any vacancy occur in this office by reason of death, resignation, or
disqualification of the incumbent, or because of failure to elect, the
respective county chair of the county central committee shall be empowered to
fill such vacancy by appointment: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in legislative
districts having a majority of its precincts in a county with a population of
one million or more, such appointment shall be made only upon the
recommendation of the legislative district chair: PROVIDED, That the person so
appointed shall have the same qualifications as candidates when filing for
election to such office for such precinct: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when a
vacancy in the office of precinct committee officer exists because of failure
to elect at a state general election, such vacancy shall not be filled until
after the organization meeting of the county central committee and the new
county chair selected as provided by RCW 29.42.030.

Sec. 13. RCW 29.62.010 and 1990 c
59 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

Every canvassing board
or officer responsible for canvassing and certifying the returns of any primary
or election shall:

(1) Adopt
administrative rules to facilitate and govern the canvassing process in that
jurisdiction;

(2) For each primary
and election, prepare and sign a statement of the returns for each office,
candidate, and issue voted on in that jurisdiction;

(3) If, at a ((partisan))
primary, two or more candidates of the same party receive the second
greatest, and identical, number of votes for an office or position,
resolve the tie vote by lot((;

(4) If, at a
nonpartisan or judicial primary, two or more candidates receive the second
greatest, and identical, number of votes for that office or position, resolve
the tie vote by lot)).

NEW SECTION. Sec.
14. The following acts or
parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 29.15.200 (Lapse of election when no
filing for single positions--Effect) and 1994 c 223 s 8 & 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 120 s 13;

(2) RCW 29.15.230 (Vacancy in partisan
elective office--Special filing period) and 2001 c 46 s 3 & 1981 c 180 s 2;

(3) RCW 29.18.150 (Vacancies on major party
ticket caused by no filing--How filled) and 1990 c 59 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s
12, & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.150;

(4) RCW 29.18.160 (Vacancies by death or
disqualification--How filled--Correcting ballots and labels--Counting votes
already cast) and 2001 c 46 s 4 & 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 13; and

(5) RCW 29.30.095 (Partisan candidates
qualified for general election) and 1990 c 59 s 96.

---
END ---