BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. Washington has
successfully worked to diversify the economy of Washington state in recent
years. As part of a comprehensive strategy for addressing the severe Puget
Sound congestion problem, the legislature recognizes the importance of
addressing the geographic diversification of economic development within
Washington. While economic development is causing problems in the Puget Sound
region, it is desperately needed in rural Washington. The legislature intends
to encourage businesses to move to rural counties, providing both a solution to
the congestion problem and a means to turn around the economies of rural
Washington.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.60.010 and 1985 c
232 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds
that there are several areas in the state that are characterized by very high
levels of unemployment and poverty. The ((legislative [legislature])) legislature
further finds that economic stagnation is the primary cause of this high
unemployment rate and poverty; that new state policies are necessary in order
to promote economic stimulation and new employment opportunities in these rural
and distressed areas; and that policies providing incentives for economic
growth in these rural and distressed areas are essential. For these
reasons, the legislature hereby establishes a tax deferral program to be
effective solely in rural and distressed areas and under circumstances
where the deferred tax payments are for investments or costs that result in the
creation of a specified number of jobs. The legislature declares that this
limited program serves the vital public purpose of creating employment
opportunities and reducing poverty in the rural and distressed areas of
the state.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.60.020 and 1999
sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3) "Eligible area"
means a rural county ((with fewer than one hundred persons per square
mile as determined annually by the office of financial management and published
by the department of revenue effective for the period July 1st through June
30th)) as defined in this section.

(4)(a) "Eligible
investment project" means an investment project in an eligible area as
defined in subsection (3) of this section.

(b) The lessor/owner of
a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless the underlying
ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the
same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

(c) "Eligible
investment project" does not include any portion of an investment project
undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(5), other
than that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to generate power for
consumption within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is
an integral part, or investment projects which have already received deferrals
under this chapter.

(5) "Investment
project" means an investment in qualified buildings or qualified machinery
and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the planning,
installation, and construction of the project.

(6)
"Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the activities
performed by research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories.

(7) "Person"
has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(8) "Qualified
buildings" means construction of new structures, and expansion or
renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or
production capacity used for manufacturing and research and development
activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other facilities for the
storage of raw material or finished goods if such facilities are an essential
or an integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for
manufacturing or research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other purposes, the
applicable tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department.

(9) "Qualified
machinery and equipment" means all new industrial and research fixtures,
equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a
manufacturing or research and development operation. "Qualified machinery
and equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment;
laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts,
and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all
equipment used to control or operate the machinery.

(10)
"Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(11) "Research and
development" means the development, refinement, testing, marketing, and
commercialization of a product, service, or process before commercial sales
have begun. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes
sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total gross receipts
from such sales of the product, service, or process do not exceed one million
dollars.

(12) "Rural
county" means a county with fewer than one hundred persons per square mile
or less than two hundred fifty square miles as determined annually by the
office of financial management and published by the department of revenue
effective for the period July 1st through June 30th.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.62.010 and 2001 c
320 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3) "Eligible
area" means ((an area)) a rural county as defined in RCW
82.60.020.

(4)(a) "Eligible
business project" means manufacturing or research and development
activities which are conducted by an applicant in an eligible area at a
specific facility, provided the applicant's average full-time qualified
employment positions at the specific facility will be at least fifteen percent
greater in the year for which the credit is being sought than the applicant's
average full-time qualified employment positions at the same facility in the
immediately preceding year.

(b) "Eligible
business project" does not include any portion of a business project
undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(5) or that
portion of a business project creating qualified full-time employment positions
outside an eligible area.

(5)
"Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the activities
performed by research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories.

(6) "Person"
has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(7) "Qualified
employment position" means a permanent full-time employee employed in the
eligible business project during the entire tax year.

(8) "Tax
year" means the calendar year in which taxes are due.

(9)
"Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this chapter.

(10) "Research and
development" means the development, refinement, testing, marketing, and
commercialization of a product, service, or process before commercial sales
have begun. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes
sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total gross receipts
from such sales of the product, service, or process do not exceed one million
dollars.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.62.030 and 2001 c
320 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person shall be
allowed a credit against the tax due under chapter 82.04 RCW as provided in
this section. The credit shall equal: (a) Four thousand dollars for each
qualified employment position with wages and benefits greater than forty
thousand dollars annually that is directly created in an eligible business and
(b) two thousand dollars for each qualified employment position with wages and
benefits less than or equal to forty thousand dollars annually that is directly
created in an eligible business.

(2) The department
shall keep a running total of all credits allowed under this chapter during
each fiscal year. The department shall not allow any credits which would cause
the total to exceed ((seven)) eight million five hundred thousand
dollars in any fiscal year, however no less than one million dollars per
fiscal year may be allocated toward credits for qualified employment positions
created as a result of a business relocation or expansion to an eligible area
from a county with a population greater than five hundred thousand. If all
or part of an application for credit is disallowed under this subsection, the
disallowed portion shall be carried over to the next fiscal year. However, the
carryover into the next fiscal year is only permitted to the extent that the
cap for the next fiscal year is not exceeded.

(3) No recipient may
use the tax credits to decertify a union or to displace existing jobs in any ((community
in the state)) rural county or designated community empowerment zone,
approved under RCW 43.31C.020.

(4) The credit may be
used against any tax due under chapter 82.04 RCW, and may be carried over until
used. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.62.045 and 1999 c
164 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of
this section "eligible area" also means a designated community empowerment
zone approved under RCW ((43.63A.700)) 43.31C.020.

(2) An eligible
business project located within an eligible area as defined in this section
qualifies for a credit under this chapter for those employees who at the time
of hire are residents of the community empowerment zone in which the project is
located, if the fifteen percent threshold is met. As used in this subsection,
"resident" means the person makes his or her home in the community
empowerment zone. A mailing address alone is insufficient to establish that a
person is a resident for the purposes of this section.

(3) All other
provisions and eligibility requirements of this chapter apply to applicants
eligible under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
7. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a person, located in an eligible area,
of machinery and equipment used directly in a call center operation, or to
sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and
equipment, but only if the purchaser provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller
shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to constructing or improving of buildings or other
structures, or sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to constructing or improving of buildings or other structures, located
in eligible areas, that are used directly as a call center, but only if the
purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.

(3) For purposes of
this section:

(a)
"Buildings" means only those structures used directly in a call
center operation. If a building is used partly for a call center operation and
partly for other purposes, the applicable tax exemption shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department. The term "buildings" also includes machinery and
equipment that is permanently affixed to and becomes a physical part of a
building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air conditioning,
plumbing, phones, or electrical.

(b) "Call
centers" means a business operation employing fifty or more employees, who
are engaged in telecommunications business activities involving financial
transactions, technical support operations, and customer services.

(c) "Eligible
area" means a community empowerment zone, as defined in chapter 43.31C RCW
and a county with fewer than one hundred persons per square mile or a county
smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as determined annually by the
office of financial management and published by the department of revenue
effective for the period July 1st through June 30th.

(d)(i) "Machinery
and equipment" means commercial fixtures, devices, and support facilities,
and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component thereof,
including repair parts and replacement parts. "Machinery and equipment"
includes electronic communications equipment, communications systems
infrastructure components, computer software, computer hardware, associated
support equipment that is necessary to maintain the communications operations
of a call center, and office furniture.

(ii) "Machinery
and equipment" does not include:

(A) Hand-powered tools;
and

(B) Property with a
useful life of less than one year.

(4) A person claiming
the exemption under this section shall make an annual report to the
department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: The type of activity, the location of the person, how
long the person has been located in the county, and the taxpayer name and
registration number. The report must be filed by January 30th of each year in
which the exemption was claimed during the previous year. Failure to file a
report will not result in the loss of eligibility under this section. However,
the department, through its research division, shall contact taxpayers who have
not filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the
taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the data and information
necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
8. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply in respect to the use by a business, located within
an eligible area, of machinery and equipment used directly in a call center.

(2) The definitions in
section 7 of this act apply to this section.

(3) A person claiming
the exemption under this section shall make an annual report to the
department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: The type of activity, the location of the person, how
long the person has been located in the county, and the taxpayer name and
registration number. The report must be filed by January 30th of each year in
which the exemption was claimed during the previous year. Failure to file a
report will not result in the loss of eligibility under this section. However,
the department, through its research division, shall contact taxpayers who have
not filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the
taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the data and information
necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This act may be known and
cited as the Puget Sound congestion relief act.

---
END ---