BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 89.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding RCW
29.13.020, and consistent with this chapter, the election of all conservation
district supervisor positions that expire in calendar years 2001 and 2002 shall
be conducted under the procedures in this chapter during the first quarter of
calendar year 2002.

(2) Until the review
under subsection (3) of this section is completed and recommendations, if any,
are implemented, any potential changes required by virtue of the section 1,
chapter 305, Laws of 1999 amendments to RCW 89.08.020 shall not be implemented.

(3) Before December 31,
2002, the appropriate legislative committees of the senate and house of
representatives shall review the appointment and election processes for
conservation district supervisors and assess alternative appointment and
election processes. Any recommendation based on the review in this subsection
shall specify the method and amount of funding.

Sec. 2. RCW 89.08.020 and 1999 c
305 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, as used in this chapter:

"Commission"
and "state conservation commission" means the agency created
hereunder. All former references to "state soil and water conservation
committee", "state committee" or "committee" shall be
deemed to be references to the "state conservation commission";

"District",
or "conservation district" means a governmental subdivision of this
state and a public body corporate and politic, organized in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess., for the purposes, with
the powers, and subject to the restrictions set forth in this chapter. All
districts created under chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. shall be known
as conservation districts and shall have all the powers and duties set out in
chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. All references in chapter 184, Laws of
1973 1st ex. sess. to "districts", or "soil and water
conservation districts" shall be deemed to be reference to "conservation
districts";

"Board" and
"supervisors" mean the board of supervisors of a conservation
district;

"Land
occupier" or "occupier of land" includes any person, firm,
political subdivision, government agency, municipality, public or private
corporation, copartnership, association, or any other entity whatsoever which
holds title to, or is in possession of, any lands lying within a district
organized under the provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.,
whether as owner, lessee, renter, tenant, or otherwise;

"District
elector" or "voter", except as provided in section 1(2) of
this act, means a registered voter in the county where the district is
located who resides within the district boundary or in the area affected by a
petition;

"Due notice"
means a notice published at least twice, with at least six days between
publications, in a publication of general circulation within the affected area,
or if there is no such publication, by posting at a reasonable number of public
places within the area, where it is customary to post notices concerning county
and municipal affairs. Any hearing held pursuant to due notice may be
postponed from time to time without a new notice;

"Renewable natural
resources", "natural resources" or "resources"
includes land, air, water, vegetation, fish, wildlife, wild rivers, wilderness,
natural beauty, scenery and open space;

"Conservation"
includes conservation, development, improvement, maintenance, preservation,
protection and use, and alleviation of floodwater and sediment damages, and the
disposal of excess surface waters.

"Farm and
agricultural land" means either (a) land in any contiguous ownership of
twenty or more acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses; (b) any parcel of
land five acres or more but less than twenty acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses, which has produced a gross income from agricultural uses
equivalent to one hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification under
this chapter; or (c) any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted
primarily to agricultural uses which has produced a gross income of one
thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five calendar years
preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter.
Agricultural lands shall also include farm woodlots of less than twenty and
more than five acres and the land on which appurtenances necessary to
production, preparation or sale of the agricultural products exist in
conjunction with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands shall
also include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not contiguous,
but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming operations being
conducted on land qualifying under this section as "farm and agricultural
lands".

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---