BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 51.16.035 and 1999 c
7 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department
shall classify all occupations or industries in accordance with their degree of
hazard and fix therefor basic premium rates ((of premium which shall
be the lowest necessary to maintain actuarial solvency of the accident and
medical aid funds in accordance with recognized insurance principles)) as
required in subsection (2) of this section. The department shall formulate
and adopt rules ((and regulations)) governing the method of premium
calculation and collection and providing for a rating system consistent with
recognized principles of workers' compensation insurance which shall be
designed to stimulate and encourage accident prevention and to facilitate
collection. The department may annually, or at such other times as it deems
necessary to ((maintain solvency of the funds)) comply with
subsection (2) of this section, readjust rates in accordance with the
rating system to become effective on such dates as the department may
designate.

(2) The department
must fix basic premium rates that are the lowest necessary to maintain
actuarial solvency of the accident and medical aid funds in accordance with
recognized insurance principles, subject to the following:

(a) If on June 30th
of any year, the balance in the accident fund attributable to contingency
reserve exceeds ten percent of the sum of actuarial loss estimates and other
financial statement liabilities as of that June 30th, the department shall
implement by September 1st of that year refunds to employers in a total amount
that approximates the excess amount in the fund.

(b) If on June 30th
of any year, the balance in the medical aid fund attributable to contingency
reserve exceeds ten percent of the sum of actuarial loss estimates and other
financial statement liabilities as of that June 30th, the department shall fix
basic medical aid fund premium rates for the following calendar year at a level
that will reduce revenue to the medical aid fund in an amount that approximates
the excess amount in the fund.

(3) In providing
a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010, the department may consider
each individual retrospective rating group as a single employing entity for
purposes of dividends or premium discounts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---