BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The sum of five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the Sunnyside
and Roza irrigation districts for the purposes of funding a feasibility study
of the Blackrock and Wymer offstream storage site. The funds distributed under
this section must be administered by the irrigation districts' joint board of
control.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---