BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:

(a) Sales of machinery
and equipment used in a farming activity; and

(b) Sales of services
or labor with respect to the construction, installation, repair, and
maintenance of machinery and equipment used in a farming activity.

(2) "Farmer"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.213.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this
chapter do not apply with respect to the use of machinery and equipment by a
farmer. "Farmer" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.213.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---