BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. A new section is added
to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In computing the
tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed for the amount of taxes
otherwise due under this chapter for businesses essential to agriculture whose
business substantially involves the sale of equipment or supplies to farmers,
and the business has gross income from the business or gross proceeds from
sales that have decreased because of the 2001 drought by seven percent or more
from the same reporting period the year before.

(2) The credit equals
seven percent multiplied by the gross proceeds from sales or gross income from
the business during the same reporting period for the prior year.

(3) Application for the
credit shall be made in the form and manner prescribed by the department. A
person taking the credit must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section. No tax credit may be claimed for
periods prior to April 2001 and after July 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---