BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c
1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Until January 1,
1999, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached
the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than four dollars and
ninety cents per hour.

(2) Beginning January
1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every employer shall pay to each of his or
her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not
less than five dollars and seventy cents per hour.

(3) Beginning January
1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every employer shall pay to each of his or
her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not
less than six dollars and fifty cents per hour.

(4)(a) Beginning on
January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st as set forth under (b) of this
subsection, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has
reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the amount
established under (b) of this subsection. However, this subsection does not
apply to persons employed in agricultural labor as defined in RCW 50.04.150.

(b) On September 30,
2000, and on each following September 30th, the department of labor and
industries shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain employee
purchasing power by increasing the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate
of inflation. The adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the
nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to each
September 1st as calculated by the United States department of labor. Each
adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this subsection (4)(b) takes effect
on the following January 1st.

(5) Every employer
shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen
years and who performs agricultural labor as defined in RCW 50.04.150 wages at
a rate of not less than six dollars and seventy-two cents per hour.

(6)
The director shall by regulation establish the minimum wage for employees under
the age of eighteen years.

--- END ---