BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The sum of two million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2003, from the water quality account to the department
of ecology for grants to irrigation districts to implement water conservation measures
and irrigation efficiency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---