BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The sum of one million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to the department of
agriculture for grants to farmers whose crops were damaged by a storm event that
resulted in a request for a federal disaster area declaration by the governor.
Grant moneys are to be provided only to cover the costs of controlling pests
and diseases on damaged crop land. The grants may be made only to farmers who
sustained documented crop damage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---