BE IT ENACTED
BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

SUBPART A. SHORT TITLE AND DEFINITIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited
as the Uniform Computer Information Transactions Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. DEFINITIONS. (1) In this
chapter:

(a) "Access contract" means a contract to obtain by
electronic means access to, or information from, an information processing
system of another person, or the equivalent of such access.

(b) "Access material" means any information or material,
such as a document, address, or access code, that is necessary to obtain
authorized access to information or control or possession of a copy.

(c) "Aggrieved party" means a party entitled to a remedy
for breach of contract.

(d) "Agreement" means the bargain of the parties in fact
as found in their language or by implication from other circumstances,
including course of performance, course of dealing, and usage of trade as
provided in this chapter.

(e) "Attribution procedure" means a procedure to verify
that an electronic authentication, display, message, record, or performance is
that of a particular person or to detect changes or errors in information. The
term includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes,
identifying words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment.

(f) "Authenticate" means:

(i) To sign; or

(ii) With the intent to sign a record, otherwise to execute or
adopt an electronic symbol, sound, message, or process referring to, attached
to, included in, or logically associated or linked with, that record.

(g) "Automated transaction" means a transaction in which
a contract is formed in whole or part by electronic actions of one or both
parties which are not previously reviewed by an individual in the ordinary
course.

(h) "Cancellation" means the ending of a contract by a
party because of breach of contract by another party.

(i) "Computer" means an electronic device that accepts
information in digital or similar form and manipulates it for a result based on
a sequence of instructions.

(j) "Computer information" means information in
electronic form which is obtained from or through the use of a computer or
which is in a form capable of being processed by a computer. The term includes
a copy of the information and any documentation or packaging associated with
the copy.

(k) "Computer information transaction" means an agreement
or the performance of it to create, modify, transfer, or license computer
information or informational rights in computer information. The term includes
a support contract under section 612 of this act. The term does not include a
transaction merely because the parties' agreement provides that their
communications about the transaction will be in the form of computer
information.

(l) "Computer program" means a set of statements or
instructions to be used directly or indirectly in a computer to bring about a certain
result. The term does not include separately identifiable informational
content.

(m) "Consequential damages" resulting from breach of
contract includes (i) any loss resulting from general or particular
requirements and needs of which the breaching party at the time of contracting
had reason to know and which could not reasonably be prevented and (ii) any
injury to an individual or damage to property other than the subject matter of
the transaction proximately resulting from breach of warranty. The term does
not include direct damages or incidental damages.

(n) "Conspicuous," with reference to a term, means so
written, displayed, or presented that a reasonable person against which it is
to operate ought to have noticed it. A term in an electronic record intended
to evoke a response by an electronic agent is conspicuous if it is presented in
a form that would enable a reasonably configured electronic agent to take it
into account or react to it without review of the record by an individual.
Conspicuous terms include the following:

(i) With respect to a person:

(A) A heading in capitals in a size equal to or greater than, or in
contrasting type, font, or color to, the surrounding text;

(B) Language in the body of a record or display in larger or other
contrasting type, font, or color or set off from the surrounding text by
symbols or other marks that draw attention to the language; and

(C) A term prominently referenced in an electronic record or
display which is readily accessible or reviewable from the record or display;
and

(ii) With respect to a person or an electronic agent, a term or
reference to a term that is so placed in a record or display that the person or
electronic agent cannot proceed without taking action with respect to the
particular term or reference.

(o) "Consumer" means an individual who is a licensee of
information or informational rights that the individual at the time of
contracting intended to be used primarily for personal, family, or household
purposes. The term does not include an individual who is a licensee primarily
for professional or commercial purposes, including agriculture, business
management, and investment management other than management of the individual's
personal or family investments.

(p) "Consumer contract" means a contract between a
merchant licensor and a consumer.

(q) "Contract" means the total legal obligation resulting
from the parties' agreement as affected by this chapter and other applicable
law.

(r) "Contract fee" means the price, fee, rent, or royalty
payable in a contract under this chapter or any part of the amount payable.

(s) "Contractual use term" means an enforceable term that
defines or limits the use, disclosure of, or access to licensed information or
informational rights, including a term that defines the scope of a license.

(t) "Copy" means the medium on which information is fixed
on a temporary or permanent basis and from which it can be perceived,
reproduced, used, or communicated, either directly or with the aid of a machine
or device.

(u) "Course of dealing" means a sequence of previous
conduct between the parties to a particular transaction which establishes a
common basis of understanding for interpreting their expressions and other
conduct.

(v) "Course of performance" means repeated performances,
under a contract that involves repeated occasions for performance, which are
accepted or acquiesced in without objection by a party having knowledge of the
nature of the performance and an opportunity to object to it.

(w) "Court" includes an arbitration or other
dispute-resolution forum if the parties have agreed to use of that forum or its
use is required by law.

(x) "Delivery," with respect to a copy, means the
voluntary physical or electronic transfer of possession or control.

(y) "Direct damages" means compensation for losses
measured by section 808(2)(a) or 809(1)(a) of this act. The term does not
include consequential damages or incidental damages.

(z) "Electronic" means relating to technology having
electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar
capabilities.

(aa) "Electronic agent" means a computer program, or
electronic or other automated means, used by a person to initiate an action, or
to respond to electronic messages or performances, on the person's behalf
without review or action by an individual at the time of the action or response
to the message or performance.

(bb) "Electronic message" means a record or display that
is stored, generated, or transmitted by electronic means for the purpose of
communication to another person or electronic agent.

(cc) "Financial accommodation contract" means an
agreement under which a person extends a financial accommodation to a licensee
and which does not create a security interest governed by Article 62A.9A RCW.
The agreement may be in any form, including a license or lease.

(dd) "Financial services transaction" means an agreement
that provides for, or a transaction that is, or entails access to, use,
transfer, clearance, settlement, or processing of:

(i) A deposit, loan, funds, or monetary value represented in
electronic form and stored or capable of storage by electronic means and
retrievable and transferable by electronic means, or other right to payment to
or from a person;

(ii) An instrument or other item;

(iii) A payment order, credit card transaction, debit card
transaction, funds transfer, automated clearing house transfer, or similar
wholesale or retail transfer of funds;

(iv) A letter of credit, document of title, financial asset,
investment property, or similar asset held in a fiduciary or agency capacity;
or

(v) Related identifying, verifying, access-enabling, authorizing,
or monitoring information.

(ee) "Financier" means a person that provides a financial
accommodation to a licensee under a financial accommodation contract and either
(i) becomes a licensee for the purpose of transferring or sublicensing the
license to the party to which the financial accommodation is provided or (ii)
obtains a contractual right under the financial accommodation contract to
preclude the licensee's use of the information or informational rights under a
license in the event of breach of the financial accommodation contract. The
term does not include a person that selects, creates, or supplies the
information that is the subject of the license, owns the informational rights
in the information, or provides support for, modifications to, or maintenance
of the information.

(ff) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the
observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.

(gg) "Goods" means all things that are movable at the
time relevant to the computer information transaction. The term includes the
unborn young of animals, growing crops, and other identified things to be
severed from realty which are covered by RCW 62A.2‑107. The term does
not include computer information, money, the subject matter of foreign exchange
transactions, documents, letters of credit, letter-of-credit rights,
instruments, investment property, accounts, chattel paper, deposit accounts, or
general intangibles.

(hh) "Incidental damages" resulting from breach of
contract:

(i) Means compensation for any commercially reasonable charges,
expenses, or commissions reasonably incurred by an aggrieved party with respect
to:

(A) Inspection, receipt, transmission, transportation, care, or
custody of identified copies or information that is the subject of the breach;

(B) Stopping delivery, shipment, or transmission;

(C) Effecting cover or retransfer of copies or information after
the breach;

(D) Other efforts after the breach to minimize or avoid loss
resulting from the breach; and

(E) Matters otherwise incident to the breach; and

(ii) Does not include consequential damages or direct damages.

(ii) "Information" means data, text, images, sounds, mask
works, or computer programs, including collections and compilations of them.

(jj) "Information processing system" means an electronic
system for creating, generating, sending, receiving, storing, displaying, or
processing information.

(kk) "Informational content" means information that is
intended to be communicated to or perceived by an individual in the ordinary
use of the information, or the equivalent of that information.

(ll) "Informational rights" includes all rights in
information created under laws governing patents, copyrights, mask works, trade
secrets, trademarks, publicity rights, or any other law that gives a person,
independently of contract, a right to control or preclude another person's use
of or access to the information on the basis of the rights holder's interest in
the information.

(mm) "Insurance services transaction" means an agreement
between the insurer and the insured that provides for, or a transaction that
is, or entails access to, use, transfer, clearance, settlement, or processing
of:

(i) An insurance policy, contract, or certificate; or

(ii) A right to payment under an insurance policy, contract, or
certificate.

(nn) "Knowledge," with respect to a fact, means actual
knowledge of the fact.

(oo) "License" means a contract that authorizes access
to, or use, distribution, performance, modification, or reproduction of,
information or informational rights, but expressly limits the access or uses
authorized or expressly grants fewer than all rights in the information,
whether or not the transferee has title to a licensed copy. The term includes
an access contract, a lease of a computer program, and a consignment of a
copy. The term does not include a reservation or creation of a security
interest to the extent the interest is governed by Article 62A.9A RCW.

(pp) "Licensee" means a person entitled by agreement to
acquire or exercise rights in, or to have access to or use of, computer
information under an agreement to which this chapter applies. A licensor is
not a licensee with respect to rights reserved to it under the agreement.

(qq) "Licensor" means a person obligated by agreement to
transfer or create rights in, or to give access to or use of, computer
information or informational rights in it under an agreement to which this
chapter applies. Between the provider of access and a provider of the
informational content to be accessed, the provider of content is the licensor.
In an exchange of information or informational rights, each party is a licensor
with respect to the information, informational rights, or access it gives.

(rr) "Mass-market license" means a standard form used in
a mass-market transaction.

(ss) "Mass-market transaction" means a transaction that
is:

(i) A consumer contract; or

(ii) Any other transaction with an end-user licensee if:

(A) The transaction is for information or informational rights
directed to the general public as a whole, including consumers, under
substantially the same terms for the same information;

(B) The licensee acquires the information or informational rights
in a retail transaction under terms and in a quantity consistent with an
ordinary transaction in a retail market; and

(C) The transaction is not:

(I) A contract for redistribution or for public performance or
public display of a copyrighted work;

(II) A transaction in which the information is customized or
otherwise specially prepared by the licensor for the licensee, other than minor
customization using a capability of the information intended for that purpose;

(III) A site license; or

(IV) An access contract.

(tt) "Merchant" means a person:

(i) That deals in information or informational rights of the kind
involved in the transaction;

(ii) That by the person's occupation holds itself out as having
knowledge or skill peculiar to the relevant aspect of the business practices or
information involved in the transaction; or

(iii) To which the knowledge or skill peculiar to the practices or
information involved in the transaction may be attributed by the person's
employment of an agent or broker or other intermediary that by its occupation
holds itself out as having the knowledge or skill.

(uu) "Nonexclusive license" means a license that does not
preclude the licensor from transferring to other licensees the same
information, informational rights, or contractual rights within the same
scope. The term includes a consignment of a copy.

(vv) "Notice" of a fact means knowledge of the fact,
receipt of notification of the fact, or reason to know the fact exists.

(ww) "Notify" or "give notice" means to take
such steps as may be reasonably required to inform the other person in the
ordinary course, whether or not the other person actually comes to know of it.

(xx) "Party" means a person that engages in a transaction
or makes an agreement under this chapter.

(yy) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, governmental subdivision, instrumentality, or agency, public
corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(zz) "Published informational content" means
informational content prepared for or made available to recipients generally,
or to a class of recipients, in substantially the same form. The term does not
include informational content that is:

(i) Customized for a particular recipient by one or more
individuals acting as or on behalf of the licensor, using judgment or
expertise; or

(ii) Provided in a special relationship of reliance between the
provider and the recipient.

(aaa) "Receipt" means:

(i) With respect to a copy, taking delivery; or

(ii) With respect to a notice:

(A) Coming to a person's attention; or

(B) Being delivered to and available at a location or system
designated by agreement for that purpose or, in the absence of an agreed location
or system:

(I) Being delivered at the person's residence, or the person's
place of business through which the contract was made, or at any other place
held out by the person as a place for receipt of communications of the kind; or

(II) In the case of an electronic notice, coming into existence in
an information processing system or at an address in that system in a form
capable of being processed by or perceived from a system of that type by a
recipient, if the recipient uses, or otherwise has designated or holds out,
that place or system for receipt of notices of the kind to be given and the
sender does not know that the notice cannot be accessed from that place.

(bbb) "Receive" means to take receipt.

(ccc) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.

(ddd) "Release" means an agreement by a party not to
object to, or exercise any rights or pursue any remedies to limit, the use of
information or informational rights which agreement does not require an
affirmative act by the party to enable or support the other party's use of the
information or informational rights. The term includes a waiver of
informational rights.

(eee) "Return," with respect to a record containing
contractual terms that were rejected, refers only to the computer information
and means:

(i) In the case of a licensee that rejects a record regarding a
single information product transferred for a single contract fee, a right to
reimbursement of the contract fee paid from the person to which it was paid or
from another person that offers to reimburse that fee, on:

(A) Submission of proof of purchase; and

(B) Proper redelivery of the computer information and all copies
within a reasonable time after initial delivery of the information to the
licensee;

(ii) In the case of a licensee that rejects a record regarding an
information product provided as part of multiple information products
integrated into and transferred as a bundled whole but retaining their separate
identity:

(A) A right to reimbursement of any portion of the aggregate
contract fee identified by the licensor in the initial transaction as charged
to the licensee for all bundled information products which was actually paid,
on:

(I) Rejection of the record before or during the initial use of the
bundled product;

(II) Proper redelivery of all computer information products in the
bundled whole and all copies of them within a reasonable time after initial
delivery of the information to the licensee; and

(III) Submission of proof of purchase; or

(B) A right to reimbursement of any separate contract fee
identified by the licensor in the initial transaction as charged to the
licensee for the separate information product to which the rejected record
applies, on:

(I) Submission of proof of purchase; and

(II) Proper redelivery of that computer information product and all
copies within a reasonable time after initial delivery of the information to
the licensee; or

(iii) In the case of a licensor that rejects a record proposed by
the licensee, a right to proper redelivery of the computer information and all
copies from the licensee, to stop delivery or access to the information by the
licensee, and to reimbursement from the licensee of amounts paid by the
licensor with respect to the rejected record, on reimbursement to the licensee
of contract fees that it paid with respect to the rejected record, subject to
recoupment and setoff.

(fff) "Scope," with respect to terms of a license, means:

(i) The licensed copies, information, or informational rights
involved;

(ii) The use or access authorized, prohibited, or controlled;

(iii) The geographic area, market, or location; or

(iv) The duration of the license.

(ggg) "Seasonable," with respect to an act, means taken
within the time agreed or, if no time is agreed, within a reasonable time.

(hhh) "Send" means, with any costs provided for and
properly addressed or directed as reasonable under the circumstances or as
otherwise agreed, to deposit a record in the mail or with a commercially
reasonable carrier, to deliver a record for transmission to or re-creation in
another location or information processing system, or to take the steps
necessary to initiate transmission to or re-creation of a record in another
location or information processing system. In addition, with respect to an
electronic message, the message must be in a form capable of being processed by
or perceived from a system of the type the recipient uses or otherwise has
designated or held out as a place for the receipt of communications of the kind
sent. Receipt within the time in which it would have arrived if properly sent,
has the effect of a proper sending.

(iii) "Standard form" means a record or a group of
related records containing terms prepared for repeated use in transactions and
so used in a transaction in which there was no negotiated change of terms by
individuals except to set the price, quantity, method of payment, selection
among standard options, or time or method of delivery.

(jjj) "State" means a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United
States.

(kkk) "Term," with respect to an agreement, means that
portion of the agreement which relates to a particular matter.

(lll) "Termination" means the ending of a contract by a
party pursuant to a power created by agreement or law otherwise than because of
breach of contract.

(mmm) "Transfer":

(i) With respect to a contractual interest, includes an assignment
of the contract, but does not include an agreement merely to perform a
contractual obligation or to exercise contractual rights through a delegate or
sublicensee; and

(ii) With respect to computer information, includes a sale,
license, or lease of a copy of the computer information and a license or
assignment of informational rights in computer information.

(nnn) "Usage of trade" means any practice or method of
dealing that has such regularity of observance in a place, vocation, or trade
as to justify an expectation that it will be observed with respect to the
transaction in question.

(2) The following definitions in Title 62A RCW apply to this
chapter:

(a) "Burden of establishing" RCW 62A.1‑201.

(b) "Document of title" RCW 62A.1‑201.

(c) "Financial asset" RCW 62A.8‑102.

(d) "Funds transfer" RCW 62A.4A‑104.

(e) "Identification" to the contract RCW 62A.2‑501.

(f) "Instrument" RCW 62A.9A‑102.

(g) "Investment property" RCW 62A.9A‑102.

(h) "Item" RCW 62A.4‑104.

(i) "Letter of credit" RCW 62A.5‑102.

(j) "Payment order" RCW 62A.4A‑103.

(k) "Sale" RCW 62A.2‑106.

SUBPART B. GENERAL SCOPE AND
TERMS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. SCOPE; EXCLUSIONS. (1)
This chapter applies to computer information transactions.

(2) Except for subject matter excluded in subsection (4) of this
section and as otherwise provided in section 104 of this act, if a computer
information transaction includes subject matter other than computer information
or subject matter excluded under subsection (4) of this section, the following
rules apply:

(a) If a transaction includes computer information and goods, this
Article applies to the part of the transaction involving computer information,
informational rights in it, and creation or modification of it. However, if a
copy of a computer program is contained in and sold or leased as part of goods,
this chapter applies to the copy and the computer program only if:

(i) The goods are a computer or computer peripheral; or

(ii) Giving the buyer or lessee of the goods access to or use of
the program is ordinarily a material purpose of transactions in goods of the
type sold or leased.

(b) Subject to subsection (4)(c)(i) of this section, if a
transaction includes an agreement for creating or for obtaining rights to
create computer information and a motion picture, this chapter does not apply
to the agreement if the dominant character of the agreement is for creating or
obtaining rights to create a motion picture. In all other such agreements,
this chapter does not apply to the part of the agreement that involves a motion
picture excluded under subsection (4)(c) of this section, but does apply to the
computer information.

(c) In all other cases, this Article applies to the entire
transaction if the computer information and informational rights, or access to
them, is the primary subject matter, but otherwise applies only to the part of
the transaction involving computer information, informational rights in it, and
creation or modification of it.

(3) To the extent of a conflict between this Article and Article
62A.9A RCW, Article 62A.9A RCW governs.

(4) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) A financial services transaction;

(b) An insurance services transaction;

(c) An agreement to create, perform or perform in, include
information in, acquire, use, distribute, modify, reproduce, have access to,
adapt, make available, transmit, license, or display:

(i) A motion picture or audio or visual programming, other than in
(A) a mass-market transaction or (B) a submission of an idea or information or
release of informational rights that may result in making a motion picture or a
similar information product; or

(ii) Sound recording, musical work, or phonorecord as defined or
used in Title 17 U.S.C. as of July 1, 1999, or an enhanced sound recording,
other than in the submission of an idea or information or release of
informational rights that may result in the creation of such material or a
similar information product;

(d) A compulsory license;

(e) A contract of employment of an individual, other than an
individual hired as an independent contractor to create or modify computer
information, unless the independent contractor is a freelancer in the news
reporting industry as that term is commonly understood in that industry;

(f) A contract that does not require that information be furnished
as computer information or a contract in which, under the agreement, the form
of the information as computer information is otherwise insignificant with
respect to the primary subject matter of the part of the transaction pertaining
to the information;

(g) Unless otherwise agreed in a record between the parties:

(i) Telecommunications products or services provided pursuant to
federal or state tariffs; or

(ii) Telecommunications products or services provided pursuant to
agreements required or permitted to be filed by the service provider with a
federal or state authority regulating these services or under pricing subject
to approval by a federal or state regulatory authority; or

(h) Subject matter within the scope of Article 62A.3, 62A.4,
62A.4A, 62A.5, 62A.7, or 62A.8 RCW.

(5) As used in subsection (4)(c)(ii) of this section,
"enhanced sound recording" means a separately identifiable product or
service the dominant character of which consists of recorded sounds but which
includes (a) statements or instructions whose purpose is to allow or control
the perception, reproduction, or communication of those sounds or (b) other
information so long as recorded sounds constitute the dominant character of the
product or service despite the inclusion of the other information.

(6) In this section, "motion picture" means:

(a) "Motion picture" as defined in Title 17 U.S.C. as of
July 1, 1999; or

(b) A separately identifiable product or service the dominant
character of which consists of a linear motion picture, but which includes (i)
statements or instructions whose purpose is to allow or control the perception,
reproduction, or communication of the motion picture or (ii) other information
as long as the motion picture constitutes the dominant character of the product
or service despite the inclusion of the other information.

(7) In this section, "audio or visual programming" means
audio or visual programming that is provided by broadcast, satellite, or cable
as defined or used in the Communications Act of 1934 and related regulations as
they existed on July 1, 1999, or by similar methods of delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. MIXED TRANSACTIONS:
AGREEMENT TO OPT-IN OR OPT-OUT. The parties may agree that this chapter,
including contract-formation rules, governs the transaction, in whole or part,
or that other law governs the transaction and this chapter does not apply, if a
material part of the subject matter to which the agreement applies is computer
information or informational rights in it that are within the scope of this
chapter, or is subject matter within this chapter under section 103(2) of this
act, or is subject matter excluded by section 103(4)(a) or (c) of this act.
However, any agreement to do so is subject to the following rules:

(1) An agreement that this chapter governs a transaction does not
alter the applicability of any statute, rule, or procedure that may not be
varied by agreement of the parties or that may be varied only in a manner
specified by the rule or procedure, including a consumer protection statute.
In addition, in a mass-market transaction, the agreement does not alter the
applicability of a law applicable to a copy of information in printed form.

(2) An agreement that this chapter does not govern a transaction:

(a) Does not alter the applicability of section 214 or 816 of this
act; and

(b) In a mass-market transaction, does not alter the applicability
under this chapter of the doctrine of unconscionability or fundamental public
policy or the obligation of good faith.

(3) In a mass-market transaction, any term under this section which
changes the extent to which this Article governs the transaction must be
conspicuous.

(4) A copy of a computer program contained in and sold or leased as
part of goods and which is excluded from this Article by section 103(2)(a) of
this act cannot provide the basis for an agreement under this section that this
Article governs the transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. RELATION TO FEDERAL LAW;
FUNDAMENTAL PUBLIC POLICY; TRANSACTIONS SUBJECT TO OTHER STATE LAW. (1) A
provision of this chapter which is preempted by federal law is unenforceable to
the extent of the preemption.

(2) If a term of a contract violates a fundamental public policy,
the court may refuse to enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract
without the impermissible term, or limit the application of the impermissible
term so as to avoid a result contrary to public policy, in each case to the
extent that the interest in enforcement is clearly outweighed by a public
policy against enforcement of the term.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,
if this chapter or a term of a contract under this chapter conflicts with a
consumer protection statute, the consumer protection statute governs.

(4) If a law of this state in effect on the effective date of this
act applies to a transaction governed by this chapter, the following rules
apply:

(a) A requirement that a term, waiver, notice, or disclaimer be in
a writing is satisfied by a record;

(b) A requirement that a record, writing, or term be signed is
satisfied by an authentication;

(c) A requirement that a term be conspicuous, or the like, is
satisfied by a term that is conspicuous under this chapter;

(d) A requirement of consent or agreement to a term is satisfied by
a manifestation of assent to the term in accordance with this chapter.

(5) The following laws govern in the case of a conflict between
this Article and the other law: Chapter 19.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. RULES OF CONSTRUCTION.
(1) This chapter must be liberally construed and applied to promote its
underlying purposes and policies to:

(a) Support and facilitate the realization of the full potential of
computer information transactions;

(b) Clarify the law governing computer information transactions;

(c) Enable expanding commercial practice in computer information
transactions by commercial usage and agreement of the parties;

(d) Promote uniformity of the law with respect to the subject matter
of this chapter among states that enact it; and

(e) Permit the continued expansion of commercial practices in the
excluded transactions through custom, usage, and agreement of the parties.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 113(1) of this act, the
use of mandatory language or the absence of a phrase such as "unless
otherwise agreed" in a provision of this chapter does not preclude the
parties from varying the effect of the provision by agreement.

(3) The fact that a provision of this chapter imposes a condition
for a result does not by itself mean that the absence of that condition yields
a different result.

(4) To be enforceable, a term need not be conspicuous, negotiated,
or expressly assented or agreed to, unless this chapter expressly so requires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. LEGAL RECOGNITION OF
ELECTRONIC RECORD AND AUTHENTICATION; USE OF ELECTRONIC AGENTS. (1) A record
or authentication may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely
because it is in electronic form.

(2) This chapter does not require that a record or authentication
be generated, stored, sent, received, or otherwise processed by electronic
means or in electronic form.

(3) In any transaction, a person may establish requirements regarding
the type of authentication or record acceptable to it.

(4) A person that uses an electronic agent that it has selected for
making an authentication, performance, or agreement, including manifestation of
assent, is bound by the operations of the electronic agent, even if no
individual was aware of or reviewed the agent's operations or the results of
the operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. PROOF AND EFFECT OF
AUTHENTICATION. (1) Authentication may be proven in any manner, including a
showing that a party made use of information or access that could have been
available only if it engaged in conduct or operations that authenticated the
record or term.

(2) Compliance with a commercially reasonable attribution procedure
agreed to or adopted by the parties or established by law for authenticating a
record authenticates the record as a matter of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. CHOICE OF LAW. (1) The
parties in their agreement may choose the applicable law. However, the choice
is not enforceable in a consumer contract to the extent it would vary a rule
that may not be varied by agreement under the law of the jurisdiction whose law
would apply under subsections (2) and (3) of this section in the absence of the
agreement.

(2) In the absence of an enforceable agreement on choice of law,
the following rules determine which jurisdiction's law governs in all respects
for purposes of contract law:

(a) An access contract or a contract providing for electronic
delivery of a copy is governed by the law of the jurisdiction in which the
licensor was located when the agreement was entered into;

(b) A consumer contract that requires delivery of a copy on a
tangible medium is governed by the law of the jurisdiction in which the copy is
or should have been delivered to the consumer;

(c) In all other cases, the contract is governed by the law of the
jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the transaction.

(3) In cases governed by subsection (2) of this section, if the
jurisdiction whose law governs is outside the United States, the law of that
jurisdiction governs only if it provides substantially similar protections and
rights to a party not located in that jurisdiction as are provided under this
chapter. Otherwise, the law of the state that has the most significant
relationship to the transaction governs.

(4) For purposes of this section, a party is located at its place
of business if it has one place of business, at its chief executive office if
it has more than one place of business, or at its place of incorporation or
primary registration if it does not have a physical place of business.
Otherwise, a party is located at its primary residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110. CONTRACTUAL CHOICE OF
FORUM. (1) The parties in their agreement may choose an exclusive judicial
forum unless the choice is unreasonable and unjust.

(2) A judicial forum specified in an agreement is not exclusive
unless the agreement expressly so provides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111. UNCONSCIONABLE CONTRACT
OR TERM. (1) If a court as a matter of law finds a contract or a term thereof
to have been unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to
enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract without the
unconscionable term, or limit the application of the unconscionable term so as
to avoid an unconscionable result.

(2) If it is claimed or appears to the court that a contract or
term thereof may be unconscionable, the parties must be afforded a reasonable
opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose, and
effect to aid the court in making the determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112. MANIFESTING ASSENT;
OPPORTUNITY TO REVIEW. (1) A person manifests assent to a record or term if
the person, acting with knowledge of, or after having an opportunity to review
the record or term or a copy of it:

(a) Authenticates the record or term with intent to adopt or accept
it; or

(b) Intentionally engages in conduct or makes statements with
reason to know that the other party or its electronic agent may infer from the
conduct or statement that the person assents to the record or term.

(2) An electronic agent manifests assent to a record or term if,
after having an opportunity to review it, the electronic agent:

(a) Authenticates the record or term; or

(b) Engages in operations that in the circumstances indicate
acceptance of the record or term.

(3) If this chapter or other law requires assent to a specific
term, a manifestation of assent must relate specifically to the term.

(4) Conduct or operations manifesting assent may be proved in any
manner, including a showing that a person or an electronic agent obtained or
used the information or informational rights and that a procedure existed by
which a person or an electronic agent must have engaged in the conduct or
operations in order to do so. Proof of compliance with subsection (1)(b) of
this section is sufficient if there is conduct that assents and subsequent
conduct that reaffirms assent by electronic means.

(5) With respect to an opportunity to review, the following rules
apply:

(a) A person has an opportunity to review a record or term only if
it is made available in a manner that ought to call it to the attention of a
reasonable person and permit review.

(b) An electronic agent has an opportunity to review a record or
term only if it is made available in a manner that would enable a reasonably
configured electronic agent to react to the record or term.

(c) If a record or term is available for review only after a person
becomes obligated to pay or begins its performance, the person has an
opportunity to review only if it has a right to a return if it rejects the
record. However, a right to a return is not required if:

(i) The record proposes a modification of contract or provides
particulars of performance under section 305 of this act; or

(ii) The primary performance is other than delivery or acceptance
of a copy, the agreement is not a mass-market transaction, and the parties at
the time of contracting had reason to know that a record or term would be
presented after performance, use, or access to the information began.

(d) The right to a return under (c) of this subsection may arise by
law or by agreement.

(6) The effect of provisions of this section may be modified by an
agreement setting out standards applicable to future transactions between the
parties.

(7) Providers of online services, network access, and
telecommunications services, or the operators of facilities thereof, do not
manifest assent to a contractual relationship simply by their provision of
these services to other parties, including but not limited to transmission,
routing, or providing connections, linking, caching, hosting, information
location tools, or storage of materials at the request or initiation of a
person other than the service provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113. VARIATION BY AGREEMENT;
COMMERCIAL PRACTICE. (1) The effect of any provision of this chapter,
including an allocation of risk or imposition of a burden, may be varied by
agreement of the parties. However, the following rules apply:

(a) Obligations of good faith, diligence, reasonableness, and care
imposed by this chapter may not be disclaimed by agreement, but the parties by
agreement may determine the standards by which the performance of the
obligation is to be measured if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

(b) The limitations on enforceability imposed by unconscionability
under section 111 of this act and fundamental public policy under section
105(2) of this act may not be varied by agreement.

(c) Limitations on enforceability of, or agreement to, a contract,
term, or right expressly stated in the sections listed in the following
subparagraphs may not be varied by agreement except to the extent provided in
each section:

(i) The limitations on agreed choice of law in section 109(1) of this
act;

(ii) The limitations on agreed choice of forum in section 110 of
this act;

(iii) The requirements for manifesting assent and opportunity for
review in section 112 of this act;

(iv) The limitations on enforceability in section 201 of this act;

(v) The limitations on a mass-market license in section 209 of this
act;

(vi) The consumer defense arising from an electronic error in
section 214 of this act;

(vii) The requirements for an enforceable term in sections 303(2),
307(7), 406 (2) and (3), and 804(1) of this act;

(viii) The limitations on a financier in sections 507 through 511
of this act;

(ix) The restrictions on altering the period of limitations in
section 805 (1) and (2) of this act; and

(x) The limitations on self-help repossession in sections 815(2)
and 816 of this act.

(2) Any usage of trade of which the parties are or should be aware
and any course of dealing or course of performance between the parties are
relevant to determining the existence or meaning of an agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114. SUPPLEMENTAL PRINCIPLES;
GOOD FAITH; DECISION FOR COURT; REASONABLE TIME; REASON TO KNOW. (1) Unless
displaced by this chapter, principles of law and equity, including the law
merchant and the common law of this state relative to capacity to contract,
principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion,
mistake, and other validating or invalidating cause, supplement this chapter.
Among the laws supplementing and not displaced by this chapter are trade secret
laws and unfair competition laws.

(2) Every contract or duty within the scope of this chapter imposes
an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

(3) Whether a term is conspicuous or is unenforceable under section
105 (1) or (2), 111, or 209(1) of this act and whether an attribution procedure
is commercially reasonable or effective under section 108, 212, or 213 of this
act are questions to be determined by the court.

(4) Whether an agreement has legal consequences is determined by
this chapter.

(5) Whenever this chapter requires any action to be taken within a
reasonable time, the following rules apply:

(a) What is a reasonable time for taking the action depends on the
nature, purpose, and circumstances of the action.

(b) Any time that is not manifestly unreasonable may be fixed by
agreement.

(6) A person has reason to know a fact if the person has knowledge
of the fact or, from all the facts and circumstances known to the person
without investigation, the person should be aware that the fact exists.

PART
2

FORMATION AND TERMS

SUBPART A. FORMATION OF
CONTRACT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201. FORMAL REQUIREMENTS. (1)
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a contract requiring payment of a
contract fee of five thousand dollars or more is not enforceable by way of
action or defense unless:

(a) The party against which enforcement is sought authenticated a
record sufficient to indicate that a contract has been formed and which
reasonably identifies the copy or subject matter to which the contract refers;
or

(b) The agreement is a license for an agreed duration of one year
or less or which may be terminated at will by the party against which the
contract is asserted.

(2) A record is sufficient under subsection (1) of this section
even if it omits or incorrectly states a term, but the contract is not
enforceable under that subsection beyond the number of copies or subject matter
shown in the record.

(3) A contract that does not satisfy the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section is nevertheless enforceable under that subsection if:

(a) A performance was tendered or the information was made
available by one party and the tender was accepted or the information accessed
by the other; or

(b) The party against which enforcement is sought admits in court,
by pleading or by testimony or otherwise under oath, facts sufficient to
indicate a contract has been made, but the agreement is not enforceable under
this subsection (3)(b) beyond the number of copies or the subject matter
admitted.

(4) Between merchants, if, within a reasonable time, a record in
confirmation of the contract and sufficient against the sender is received and
the party receiving it has reason to know its contents, the record satisfies
subsection (1) of this section against the party receiving it unless notice of
objection to its contents is given in a record within a reasonable time after
the confirming record is received.

(5) An agreement that the requirements of this section need not be
satisfied as to future transactions is effective if evidenced in a record
authenticated by the person against which enforcement is sought.

(6) A transaction within the scope of this chapter is not subject
to a statute of frauds contained in another law of this state including RCW
19.36.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202. FORMATION IN GENERAL.
(1) A contract may be formed in any manner sufficient to show agreement,
including offer and acceptance or conduct of both parties or operations of
electronic agents which recognize the existence of a contract.

(2) If the parties so intend, an agreement sufficient to constitute
a contract may be found even if the time of its making is undetermined, one or
more terms are left open or to be agreed on, the records of the parties do not
otherwise establish a contract, or one party reserves the right to modify
terms.

(3) Even if one or more terms are left open or to be agreed upon, a
contract does not fail for indefiniteness if the parties intended to make a
contract and there is a reasonably certain basis for giving an appropriate remedy.

(4) In the absence of conduct or performance by both parties to the
contrary, a contract is not formed if there is a material disagreement about a
material term, including a term concerning scope.

(5) If a term is to be adopted by later agreement and the parties
intend not to be bound unless the term is so adopted, a contract is not formed
if the parties do not agree to the term. In that case, each party shall
deliver to the other party, or with the consent of the other party destroy, all
copies of information, access materials, and other materials received or made,
and each party is entitled to a return with respect to any contract fee paid
for which performance has not been received, has not been accepted, or has been
redelivered without any benefit being retained. The parties remain bound by
any restriction in a contractual use term with respect to information or copies
received or made from copies received pursuant to the agreement, but the
contractual use term does not apply to information or copies properly received
or obtained from another source.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. OFFER AND ACCEPTANCE IN
GENERAL. Unless otherwise unambiguously indicated by the language or the
circumstances:

(1) An offer to make a contract invites acceptance in any manner
and by any medium reasonable under the circumstances.

(2) An order or other offer to acquire a copy for prompt or current
delivery invites acceptance by either a prompt promise to ship or a prompt or
current shipment of a conforming or nonconforming copy. However, a shipment of
a nonconforming copy is not an acceptance if the licensor seasonably notifies
the licensee that the shipment is offered only as an accommodation to the
licensee.

(3) If the beginning of a requested performance is a reasonable
mode of acceptance, an offeror that is not notified of acceptance or
performance within a reasonable time may treat the offer as having lapsed
before acceptance.

(4) If an offer in an electronic message evokes an electronic
message accepting the offer, a contract is formed:

(a) When an electronic acceptance is received; or

(b) If the response consists of beginning performance, full
performance, or giving access to information, when the performance is received
or the access is enabled and necessary access materials are received.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204. ACCEPTANCE WITH VARYING
TERMS. (1) In this section, an acceptance materially alters an offer if it
contains a term that materially conflicts with or varies a term of the offer or
that adds a material term not contained in the offer.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 205 of this act, a
definite and seasonable expression of acceptance operates as an acceptance,
even if the acceptance contains terms that vary from the terms of the offer,
unless the acceptance materially alters the offer.

(3) If an acceptance materially alters the offer, the following
rules apply:

(a) A contract is not formed unless:

(i) A party agrees, such as by manifesting assent, to the other
party's offer or acceptance; or

(ii) All the other circumstances, including the conduct of the
parties, establish a contract.

(b) If a contract is formed by the conduct of both parties, the
terms of the contract are determined under section 210 of this act.

(4) If an acceptance varies from but does not materially alter the
offer, a contract is formed based on the terms of the offer. In addition, the
following rules apply:

(a) Terms in the acceptance which conflict with terms in the offer
are not part of the contract.

(b) An additional nonmaterial term in the acceptance is a proposal
for an additional term. Between merchants, the proposed additional term
becomes part of the contract unless the offeror gives notice of objection
before, or within a reasonable time after, it receives the proposed terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205. CONDITIONAL OFFER OR ACCEPTANCE.
(1) In this section, an offer or acceptance is conditional if it is conditioned
on agreement by the other party to all the terms of the offer or acceptance.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a conditional offer or acceptance precludes formation of a contract unless the
other party agrees to its terms, such as by manifesting assent.

(3) If an offer and acceptance are in standard forms and at least
one form is conditional, the following rules apply:

(a) Conditional language in a standard term precludes formation of
a contract only if the actions of the party proposing the form are consistent
with the conditional language, such as by refusing to perform, refusing to
permit performance, or refusing to accept the benefits of the agreement, until
its proposed terms are accepted.

(b) A party that agrees, such as by manifesting assent, to a
conditional offer that is effective under (a) of this subsection adopts the
terms of the offer under section 208 or 209 of this act, except a term that
conflicts with an expressly agreed term regarding price or quantity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. OFFER AND ACCEPTANCE:
ELECTRONIC AGENTS. (1) A contract may be formed by the interaction of
electronic agents. If the interaction results in the electronic agents'
engaging in operations that under the circumstances indicate acceptance of an
offer, a contract is formed, but a court may grant appropriate relief if the
operations resulted from fraud, electronic mistake, or the like.

(2) A contract may be formed by the interaction of an electronic
agent and an individual acting on the individual's own behalf or for another
person. A contract is formed if the individual takes an action or makes a
statement that the individual can refuse to take or say and that the individual
has reason to know will:

(a) Cause the electronic agent to perform, provide benefits, or
allow the use or access that is the subject of the contract, or send
instructions to do so; or

(b) Indicate acceptance, regardless of other expressions or actions
by the individual to which the individual has reason to know the electronic
agent cannot react.

(3) The terms of a contract formed under subsection (2) of this
section are determined under section 208 or 209 of this act but do not include
a term provided by the individual if the individual had reason to know that the
electronic agent could not react to the term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. FORMATION: RELEASES OF
INFORMATIONAL RIGHTS. (1) A release is effective without consideration if it
is:

(a) In a record to which the releasing party agrees, such as by
manifesting assent, and which identifies the informational rights released; or

(b) Enforceable under estoppel, implied license, or other law.

(2) A release continues for the duration of the informational
rights released if the release does not specify its duration and does not
require affirmative performance after the grant of the release by:

(a) The party granting the release; or

(b) The party receiving the release, except for relatively
insignificant acts.

(3) In cases not governed by subsection (2) of this section, the
duration of a release is governed by section 308 of this act.

SUBPART B. TERMS OF RECORDS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208. ADOPTING TERMS OF
RECORDS. Except as otherwise provided in section 209 of this act, the
following rules apply:

(1) A party adopts the terms of a record, including a standard
form, as the terms of the contract if the party agrees to the record, such as
by manifesting assent.

(2) The terms of a record may be adopted pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section after beginning performance or use if the parties had reason to
know that their agreement would be represented in whole or part by a later
record to be agreed on and there would not be an opportunity to review the
record or a copy of it before performance or use begins. If the parties fail
to agree to the later terms and did not intend to form a contract unless they
so agreed, section 202(5) of this act applies.

(3) If a party adopts the terms of a record, the terms become part
of the contract without regard to the party's knowledge or understanding of
individual terms in the record, except for a term that is unenforceable because
it fails to satisfy another requirement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209. MASS-MARKET LICENSE. (1)
A party adopts the terms of a mass-market license for purposes of section 208
of this act only if the party agrees to the license, such as by manifesting
assent, before or during the party's initial performance or use of or access to
the information. A term is not part of the license if:

(a) The term is unconscionable or is unenforceable under section
105 (1) or (2) of this act; or

(b) Subject to section 301 of this act, the term conflicts with a
term to which the parties to the license have expressly agreed.

(2) If a mass-market license or a copy of the license is not
available in a manner permitting an opportunity to review by the licensee
before the licensee becomes obligated to pay and the licensee does not agree,
such as by manifesting assent, to the license after having an opportunity to
review, the licensee is entitled to a return under section 112 of this act and,
in addition, to:

(a) Reimbursement of any reasonable expenses incurred in complying
with the licensor's instructions for returning or destroying the computer
information or, in the absence of instructions, expenses incurred for return
postage or similar reasonable expense in returning the computer information;
and

(b) Compensation for any reasonable and foreseeable costs of
restoring the licensee's information processing system to reverse changes in
the system caused by the installation, if:

(i) The installation occurs because information must be installed
to enable review of the license; and

(ii) The installation alters the system or information in it but
does not restore the system or information after removal of the installed
information because the licensee rejected the license.

(3) In a mass-market transaction, if the licensor does not have an
opportunity to review a record containing proposed terms from the licensee
before the licensor delivers or becomes obligated to deliver the information,
and if the licensor does not agree, such as by manifesting assent, to those
terms after having that opportunity, the licensor is entitled to a return.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210. TERMS OF CONTRACT FORMED
BY CONDUCT. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section
and subject to section 301 of this act, if a contract is formed by conduct of
the parties, the terms of the contract are determined by consideration of the
terms and conditions to which the parties expressly agreed, course of
performance, course of dealing, usage of trade, the nature of the parties'
conduct, the records exchanged, the information or informational rights
involved, and all other relevant circumstances. If a court cannot determine
the terms of the contract from the foregoing factors, the supplementary
principles of this chapter apply.

(2) This section does not apply if the parties authenticate a
record of the contract or a party agrees, such as by manifesting assent, to the
record containing the terms of the other party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211. PRETRANSACTION
DISCLOSURES IN INTERNET-TYPE TRANSACTIONS. This section applies to a licensor
that makes its computer information available to a licensee by electronic means
from its Internet or similar electronic site. In such a case, the licensor
affords an opportunity to review the terms of a standard form license which
opportunity satisfies section 112(5) of this act with respect to a licensee
that acquires the information from that site, if the licensor:

(1) Makes the standard terms of the license readily available for
review by the licensee before the information is delivered or the licensee
becomes obligated to pay, whichever occurs first, by:

(a) Displaying prominently and in close proximity to a description
of the computer information, or to instructions or steps for acquiring it, the
standard terms or a reference to an electronic location from which they can be
readily obtained; or

(b) Disclosing the availability of the standard terms in a
prominent place on the site from which the computer information is offered and
promptly furnishing a copy of the standard terms on request before the transfer
of the computer information; and

(2) Does not take affirmative acts to prevent printing or storage
of the standard terms for archival or review purposes by the licensee.

SUBPART C. ELECTRONIC CONTRACTS:
GENERALLY

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212. COMMERCIAL REASONABLENESS
OF ATTRIBUTION PROCEDURE. The commercial reasonableness or efficacy of an
attribution procedure is determined by the court. In making this
determination, the following rules apply:

(1) An attribution procedure established by law is commercially
reasonable and effective for transactions within the coverage of the statute or
rule.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section,
commercial reasonableness and effectiveness is determined in light of the
purposes of the procedure and the commercial circumstances at the time the
parties agreed to or adopted the procedure.

(3) A commercially reasonable attribution procedure may use any
security device or method that is commercially reasonable under the
circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213. DETERMINING ATTRIBUTION
OF ELECTRONIC EVENT TO PERSON. (1) An electronic event, including an
electronic message, display, record, authentication, or performance, is attributed
to a person if:

(a) It was the act of that person or its electronic agent;

(b) The person is otherwise bound by it under the law of agency or
other law; or

(c) Attribution is verified pursuant to an attribution procedure as
provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) If there is an attribution procedure between the parties with
respect to the electronic event, the following rules apply:

(a) The effect of compliance with an attribution procedure
established by other law or administrative rule is determined by that law or
rule.

(b) In all other cases and subject to (c), (d), and (e) of this
subsection, if the person relying on the electronic event and the person to
whom the electronic event is attributed agreed to use or knowingly adopted an
attribution procedure, the electronic event is attributable to the person
identified by the procedure, if the person relying on that attribution
satisfies the burden of establishing that:

(i) The attribution procedure was commercially reasonable;

(ii) The person so relying accepted or relied on the electronic
event in good faith and in compliance with the attribution procedure and any
additional agreement with or separate instructions of, the other party;
provided that the party relying on the electronic event is not required to
follow an instruction that violates an agreement evidenced by a record
authenticated by the parties or an instruction which is not received at a time
and in a manner affording the person relying on the electronic act a reasonable
opportunity to verify its attribution and act on the notice; and

(iii) The attribution procedure indicated that the electronic event
was that of the person to which attribution is sought.

(c) Attribution under the provisions of (b), (d), and (e) of this
subsection shall not apply to a consumer. This limitation is intended to leave
to existing law and the courts the determination of when an electronic event
should be attributed to a consumer. The court may not infer from this
limitation the nature of existing law or the proper rule for attributing an
electronic event to a consumer.

(d) By agreement evidenced by an authenticated record, a person who
could otherwise attribute an electronic event to another person pursuant to (b)
of this subsection may limit the extent to which such person is entitled to do
so.

(e) If an electronic event is attributed to a person under (b) of
this subsection, that person may prevent such attribution by satisfying the
burden of establishing that the electronic event was not caused directly or
indirectly by another person:

(i) Entrusted at any time with the right or duty to act for the
person to whom the electronic event is attributed (the "attributed
person") with respect to such event or the attribution procedure; or

(ii) Who obtained, from a source controlled by the attributed
person and without authority of the person relying on the electronic event,
information facilitating breach of the attribution procedure, regardless of how
the information was obtained or whether the attributed person was at fault.
Information includes any access device, computer information, or the like.

In order to avoid attribution under this subsection (2)(e), this
burden must be satisfied with respect to both (e)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection.

(3) The rights and obligations arising under this section may not
be varied by agreement except that nothing in this section prohibits an
agreement with a consumer for an attribution procedure that includes different
rights and obligations if such an agreement could be made under a statute or
law other than this chapter.

(4) As used in this section, "burden of establishing" a
fact means the burden of persuading the triers of fact that the existence of
the fact is more probable than its nonexistence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214. ELECTRONIC ERROR:
CONSUMER DEFENSES. (1) In this section, "electronic error" means an
error in an electronic message created by a consumer using an information
processing system if a reasonable method to detect and correct or avoid the
error was not provided.

(2) In an automated transaction, a consumer is not bound by an
electronic message that the consumer did not intend and which was caused by an
electronic error, if the consumer:

(a) Promptly on learning of the error:

(i) Notifies the other party of the error; and

(ii) Causes delivery to the other party or, pursuant to reasonable
instructions received from the other party, delivers to another person or
destroys all copies of the information; and

(b) Has not used, or received any benefit or value from, the
information or caused the information or benefit to be made available to a
third party.

(3) If subsection (2) of this section does not apply, the effect of
an electronic error is determined by other law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215. ELECTRONIC MESSAGE: WHEN
EFFECTIVE; EFFECT OF ACKNOWLEDGMENT. (1) Receipt of an electronic message is
effective when received even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

(2) Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment of an electronic
message establishes that the message was received but by itself does not
establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

SUBPART D. IDEA OR INFORMATION
SUBMISSIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216. IDEA OR INFORMATION
SUBMISSION. (1) The following rules apply to a submission of an idea or
information for the creation, development, or enhancement of computer
information which is not made pursuant to an existing agreement requiring the
submission:

(a) A contract is not formed and is not implied from the mere
receipt of an unsolicited submission.

(b) Engaging in a business, trade, or industry that by custom or
practice regularly acquires ideas is not in itself an express or implied
solicitation of the information.

(c) If the recipient seasonably notifies the person making the
submission that the recipient maintains a procedure to receive and review
submissions, a contract is formed only if:

(i) The submission is made and a contract accepted pursuant to that
procedure; or

(ii) The recipient expressly agrees to terms concerning the
submission.

(2) An agreement to disclose an idea creates a contract enforceable
against the receiving party only if the idea as disclosed is confidential,
concrete, and novel to the business, trade, or industry or the party receiving
the disclosure otherwise expressly agreed.

PART
3

CONSTRUCTION

SUBPART A. GENERAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301. PAROL OR EXTRINSIC
EVIDENCE. Terms with respect to which confirmatory records of the parties
agree or which are otherwise set forth in a record intended by the parties as a
final expression of their agreement with respect to terms included therein may
not be contradicted by evidence of any previous agreement or of a
contemporaneous oral agreement but may be explained or supplemented by:

(1) Course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade;
and

(2) Evidence of consistent additional terms, unless the court finds
the record to have been intended as a complete and exclusive statement of the
terms of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. PRACTICAL CONSTRUCTION.
(1) The express terms of an agreement and any course of performance, course of
dealing, or usage of trade must be construed whenever reasonable as consistent
with each other. However, if that construction is unreasonable:

(a) Express terms prevail over course of performance, course of
dealing, and usage of trade;

(b) Course of performance prevails over course of dealing and usage
of trade; and

(c) Course of dealing prevails over usage of trade.

(2) An applicable usage of trade in the place where any part of
performance is to occur must be used in interpreting the agreement as to that
part of the performance.

(3) Evidence of a relevant course of performance, course of
dealing, or usage of trade offered by one party in a proceeding is not
admissible unless and until the party offering the evidence has given the other
party notice that the court finds sufficient to prevent unfair surprise.

(4) The existence and scope of a usage of trade must be proved as
facts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303. MODIFICATION AND
RESCISSION. (1) An agreement modifying a contract subject to this chapter
needs no consideration to be binding.

(2) An authenticated record that precludes modification or
rescission except by an authenticated record may not otherwise be modified or
rescinded. In a standard form supplied by a merchant to a consumer, a term
requiring an authenticated record for modification of the contract is not
enforceable unless the consumer manifests assent to the term.

(3) A modification of a contract and the contract as modified must
satisfy the requirements of sections 201(1) and 307(7) of this act if the
contract as modified is within those provisions.

(4) An attempt at modification or rescission which does not satisfy
subsection (2) or (3) of this section may operate as a waiver if section 702 of
this act is satisfied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. CONTINUING CONTRACTUAL
TERMS. (1) Terms of an agreement involving successive performances apply to
all performances, even if the terms are not displayed or otherwise brought to
the attention of a party with respect to each successive performance, unless
the terms are modified in accordance with this chapter or the contract.

(2) If a contract provides that terms may be changed as to future
performances by compliance with a described procedure, a change proposed in
good faith pursuant to that procedure becomes part of the contract if the
procedure:

(a) Reasonably notifies the other party of the change; and

(b) In a mass-market transaction, permits the other party to
terminate the contract as to future performance if the change alters a material
term and the party in good faith determines that the modification is
unacceptable.

(3) The parties by agreement may determine the standards for
reasonable notice unless the agreed standards are manifestly unreasonable in
light of the commercial circumstances.

(4) The enforceability of changes made pursuant to a procedure that
does not comply with subsection (2) of this section is determined by the other
provisions of this Article or other law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. TERMS TO BE SPECIFIED.
An agreement that is otherwise sufficiently definite to be a contract is not
invalid because it leaves particulars of performance to be specified by one of
the parties. If particulars of performance are to be specified by a party, the
following rules apply:

(1) Specification must be made in good faith and within limits set
by commercial reasonableness.

(2) If a specification materially affects the other party's
performance but is not seasonably made, the other party:

(a) Is excused for any resulting delay in its performance; and

(b) May perform, suspend performance, or treat the failure to
specify as a breach of contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. PERFORMANCE UNDER OPEN
TERMS. A performance obligation of a party that cannot be determined from the
agreement or from other provisions of this chapter requires the party to
perform in a manner and in a time that is reasonable in light of the commercial
circumstances existing at the time of agreement.

SUBPART B. INTERPRETATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. INTERPRETATION AND
REQUIREMENTS FOR GRANT. (1) A license grants:

(a) The contractual rights that are expressly described; and

(b) A contractual right to use any informational rights within the
licensor's control at the time of contracting which are necessary in the
ordinary course to exercise the expressly described rights.

(2) If a license expressly limits use of the information or
informational rights, use in any other manner is a breach of contract. In all
other cases, a license contains an implied limitation that the licensee will
not use the information or informational rights otherwise than as described in
subsection (1) of this section. However, use inconsistent with this implied
limitation is not a breach if it is permitted under applicable law in the
absence of the implied limitation.

(3) An agreement that does not specify the number of permitted
users permits a number of users which is reasonable in light of the
informational rights involved and the commercial circumstances existing at the
time of the agreement.

(4) A party is not entitled to any rights in new versions of, or
improvements or modifications to, information made by the other party. A
licensor's agreement to provide new versions, improvements, or modifications
requires that the licensor provide them as developed and made generally
commercially available from time to time by the licensor.

(5) Neither party is entitled to receive copies of source code,
schematics, master copy, design material, or other information used by the
other party in creating, developing, or implementing the information.

(6) Terms concerning scope must be construed under ordinary
principles of contract interpretation in light of the informational rights and
the commercial context. In addition, the following rules apply:

(a) A grant of "all possible rights and for all media" or
"all rights and for all media now known or later developed," or a
grant in similar terms, includes all rights then existing or later created by
law and all uses, media, and methods of distribution or exhibition, whether
then existing or developed in the future and whether or not anticipated at the
time of the grant.

(b) A grant of an "exclusive license," or a grant in
similar terms, means that:

(i) For the duration of the license, the licensor will not
exercise, and will not grant to any other person, rights in the same
information or informational rights within the scope of the exclusive grant;
and

(ii) The licensor affirms that it has not previously granted those
rights in a contract in effect when the licensee's rights may be exercised.

(7) The rules in this section may be varied only by a record that
is sufficient to indicate that a contract has been made and which is:

(a) Authenticated by the party against which enforcement is sought;
or

(b) Prepared and delivered by one party and adopted by the other
under section 208 or 209 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308. DURATION OF CONTRACT. If
an agreement does not specify its duration, to the extent allowed by other law,
the following rules apply:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the agreement is enforceable for a time reasonable in light of the licensed
subject matter and commercial circumstances but may be terminated as to future
performances at will by either party during that time on giving seasonable
notice to the other party.

(2) The duration of contractual rights to use licensed subject
matter is a time reasonable in light of the licensed informational rights and
the commercial circumstances. However, subject to cancellation for breach of
contract, the duration of the license is perpetual as to the contractual rights
and contractual use terms if:

(a) The license is of a computer program that does not include
source code and the license:

(i) Transfers ownership of a copy; or

(ii) Delivers a copy for a contract fee the total amount of which
is fixed at or before the time of delivery of the copy; or

(b) The license expressly grants the right to incorporate or use
the licensed information or informational rights with information or
informational rights from other sources in a combined work for public
distribution or public performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309. AGREEMENT FOR PERFORMANCE
TO PARTY'S SATISFACTION. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of
this section, an agreement that provides that the performance of one party is
to be to the satisfaction or approval of the other party requires performance
sufficient to satisfy a reasonable person in the position of the party that
must be satisfied.

(2) Performance must be to the subjective satisfaction of the other
party if:

(a) The agreement expressly so provides, such as by stating that
approval is in the "sole discretion" of the party, or words of
similar import; or

(b) The agreement is for informational content to be evaluated in
reference to subjective characteristics such as aesthetics, appeal, suitability
to taste, or subjective quality.

PART
4

WARRANTIES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401. WARRANTY AND OBLIGATIONS
CONCERNING NONINTERFERENCE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. (1) A licensor of information
that is a merchant regularly dealing in information of the kind warrants that
the information will be delivered free of the rightful claim of any third
person by way of infringement or misappropriation, but a licensee that
furnishes detailed specifications to the licensor and the method required for
meeting the specifications holds the licensor harmless against any such claim
that arises out of compliance with either the required specification or the
required method except for a claim that results from the failure of the
licensor to adopt, or notify the licensee of, a noninfringing alternative of
which the licensor had reason to know.

(2) A licensor warrants:

(a) For the duration of the license, that no person holds a
rightful claim to, or interest in, the information which arose from an act or
omission of the licensor, other than a claim by way of infringement or
misappropriation, which will interfere with the licensee's enjoyment of its
interest; and

(b) As to rights granted exclusively to the licensee, that within
the scope of the license:

(i) To the knowledge of the licensor, any licensed patent rights
are valid and exclusive to the extent exclusivity and validity are recognized
by the law under which the patent rights were created; and

(ii) In all other cases, the licensed informational rights are
valid and exclusive for the information as a whole to the extent exclusivity
and validity are recognized by the law applicable to the licensed rights in a
jurisdiction to which the license applies.

(3) The warranties in this section are subject to the following
rules:

(a) If the licensed informational rights are subject to a right of
privileged use, collective administration, or compulsory licensing, the
warranty is not made with respect to those rights.

(b) The obligations under subsections (1) and (2)(b) of this
section apply solely to informational rights arising under the laws of the
United States or a state, unless the contract expressly provides that the
warranty obligations extend to rights under the laws of other countries.
Language is sufficient for this purpose if it states "The licensor
warrants 'exclusivity' 'noninfringement' 'in specified countries'
'worldwide'," or words of similar import. In that case, the warranty
extends to the specified country or, in the case of a reference to
"worldwide" or the like, to all countries within the description, but
only to the extent the rights are recognized under a treaty or international
convention to which the country and the United States are signatories.

(c) The warranties under subsections (1) and (2)(b) of this section
are not made by a license that merely permits use, or covenants not to claim infringement
because of the use, of rights under a licensed patent.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section,
a warranty under this section may be disclaimed or modified only by specific
language or by circumstances that give the licensee reason to know that the
licensor does not warrant that competing claims do not exist or that the
licensor purports to grant only the rights it may have. In an automated
transaction, language is sufficient if it is conspicuous. Otherwise, language
in a record is sufficient if it states "There is no warranty against
interference with your enjoyment of the information or against
infringement," or words of similar import.

(5) Between merchants, a grant of a "quitclaim," or a
grant in similar terms, grants the information or informational rights without
an implied warranty as to infringement or misappropriation or as to the rights
actually possessed or transferred by the licensor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. EXPRESS WARRANTY. (1)
Subject to subsection (3) of this section, an express warranty by a licensor is
created as follows:

(a) An affirmation of fact or promise made by the licensor to its
licensee, including by advertising, which relates to the information and
becomes part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the
information to be furnished under the agreement will conform to the affirmation
or promise.

(b) Any description of the information which is made part of the
basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the information will
conform to the description.

(c) Any sample, model, or demonstration of a final product which is
made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the
performance of the information will reasonably conform to the performance of
the sample, model, or demonstration, taking into account differences that would
appear to a reasonable person in the position of the licensee between the
sample, model, or demonstration and the information as it will be used.

(2) It is not necessary to the creation of an express warranty that
the licensor use formal words, such as "warranty" or
"guaranty," or state a specific intention to make a warranty.
However, an express warranty is not created by:

(a) An affirmation or prediction merely of the value of the
information or informational rights;

(b) A display or description of a portion of the information to
illustrate the aesthetics, appeal, suitability to taste, subjective quality, or
the like of informational content; or

(c) A statement purporting to be merely opinion or commendation of
the information or informational rights.

(3) An express warranty or similar express contractual obligation,
if any, exists with respect to published informational content covered by this
chapter to the same extent that it would exist if the published informational
content had been published in a form that placed it outside this chapter.
However, if the warranty or similar express contractual obligation is breached,
the remedies of the aggrieved party are those under this chapter and the
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. IMPLIED WARRANTY:
MERCHANTABILITY OF COMPUTER PROGRAM. (1) Unless the warranty is disclaimed or
modified, a licensor that is a merchant with respect to computer programs of
the kind warrants:

(a) To the end user that the computer program is fit for the
ordinary purposes for which such computer programs are used;

(b) To the distributor that:

(i) The program is adequately packaged and labeled as the agreement
requires;

(ii) In the case of multiple copies, the copies are within the
variations permitted by the agreement, of even kind, quality, and quantity
within each unit and among all units involved; and

(iii) That the program conforms to any promises or affirmations of
fact made on the container or label.

(2) Unless disclaimed or modified, other implied warranties with
respect to computer programs may arise from course of dealing or usage of
trade.

(3) No warranty is created under this section with respect to
informational content, but an implied warranty may arise under section 404 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404. IMPLIED WARRANTY:
INFORMATIONAL CONTENT. (1) Unless the warranty is disclaimed or modified, a
merchant that, in a special relationship of reliance with a licensee, collects,
compiles, processes, provides, or transmits informational content warrants to
that licensee that there is no inaccuracy in the informational content caused
by the merchant's failure to perform with reasonable care.

(2) A warranty does not arise under subsection (1) of this section
with respect to:

(a) Published informational content; or

(b) A person that acts as a conduit or provides no more than
editorial services in collecting, compiling, distributing, processing,
providing, or transmitting informational content that under the circumstances
can be identified as that of a third person.

(3) The warranty under this section is not subject to the
preclusion in section 113(1)(a) of this act on disclaiming obligations of
diligence, reasonableness, or care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405. IMPLIED WARRANTY:
LICENSEE'S PURPOSE; SYSTEM INTEGRATION. (1) Unless the warranty is disclaimed
or modified, if a licensor at the time of contracting has reason to know any
particular purpose for which the computer information is required and that the
licensee is relying on the licensor's skill or judgment to select, develop, or
furnish suitable information, the following rules apply:

(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, there
is an implied warranty that the information is fit for that purpose.

(b) If from all the circumstances it appears that the licensor was
to be paid for the amount of its time or effort regardless of the fitness of
the resulting information, the warranty under (a) of this subsection is that
the information will not fail to achieve the licensee's particular purpose as a
result of the licensor's lack of reasonable effort.

(2) There is no warranty under subsection (1) of this section with
regard to:

(a) The aesthetics, appeal, suitability to taste, or subjective
quality of informational content; or

(b) Published informational content, but there may be a warranty
with regard to the licensor's selection among published informational content
from different providers if the selection is made by an individual acting as or
on behalf of the licensor.

(3) If an agreement requires a licensor to provide or select a
system consisting of computer programs and goods, and the licensor has reason
to know that the licensee is relying on the skill or judgment of the licensor
to select the components of the system, there is an implied warranty that the
components provided or selected will function together as a system.

(4) The warranty under this section is not subject to the
preclusion in section 113(1)(a) of this act on disclaiming diligence,
reasonableness, or care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406. DISCLAIMER OR
MODIFICATION OF WARRANTY. (1) Words or conduct relevant to the creation of an
express warranty and words or conduct tending to disclaim or modify an express
warranty must be construed wherever reasonable as consistent with each other.
Subject to section 301 of this act with regard to parol or extrinsic evidence,
the disclaimer or modification is inoperative to the extent that such
construction is unreasonable.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5)
of this section, to disclaim or modify an implied warranty or any part of it,
but not the warranty in section 401 of this act, the following rules apply:

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection:

(i) To disclaim or modify the implied warranty arising under
section 403 of this act, language must mention "merchantability" or
"quality" or use words of similar import and, if in a record, must be
conspicuous.

(ii) To disclaim or modify the implied warranty arising under
section 404 of this act, language in a record must mention "accuracy"
or use words of similar import.

(b) Language to disclaim or modify the implied warranty arising
under section 405 of this act must be in a record and be conspicuous. It is
sufficient to state "There is no warranty that this information, our
efforts, or the system will fulfill any of your particular purposes or
needs," or words of similar import.

(c) Language in a record is sufficient to disclaim all implied
warranties if it individually disclaims each implied warranty or, except for
the warranty in section 401 of this act, if it is conspicuous and states
"Except for express warranties stated in this contract, if any, this
'information' 'computer program' is provided with all faults, and the entire
risk as to satisfactory quality, performance, accuracy, and effort is with the
user," or words of similar import.

(d) A disclaimer or modification sufficient under Article 62A.2 or
62A.2A RCW to disclaim or modify an implied warranty of merchantability is
sufficient to disclaim or modify the warranties under sections 403 and 404 of
this act. A disclaimer or modification sufficient under Article 62A.2 or
62A.2A RCW to disclaim or modify an implied warranty of fitness for a particular
purpose is sufficient to disclaim or modify the warranties under section 405 of
this act.

(3) Unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied
warranties, but not the warranty under section 401 of this act, are disclaimed
by expressions like "as is" or "with all faults" or other
language that in common understanding calls the licensee's attention to the
disclaimer of warranties and makes plain that there are no implied warranties.

(4) If a licensee before entering into a contract has examined the
information or the sample or model as fully as it desired or has refused to
examine the information, there is no implied warranty with regard to defects
that an examination ought in the circumstances to have revealed to the
licensee.

(5) An implied warranty may also be disclaimed or modified by
course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade.

(6) If a contract requires ongoing performance or a series of
performances by the licensor, language of disclaimer or modification which
complies with this section is effective with respect to all performances under
the contract.

(7) Remedies for breach of warranty may be limited in accordance
with this chapter with respect to liquidation or limitation of damages and
contractual modification of remedy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407. MODIFICATION OF COMPUTER
PROGRAM. A licensee that modifies a computer program, other than by using a
capability of the program intended for that purpose in the ordinary course,
does not invalidate any warranty regarding performance of an unmodified copy
but does invalidate any warranties, express or implied, regarding performance
of the modified copy. A modification occurs if a licensee alters code in,
deletes code from, or adds code to the computer program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408. CUMULATION AND CONFLICT
OF WARRANTIES. Warranties, whether express or implied, must be construed as
consistent with each other and as cumulative, but if that construction is
unreasonable, the intention of the parties determines which warranty is
dominant. In ascertaining that intention, the following rules apply:

(1) Exact or technical specifications displace an inconsistent
sample or model or general language of description.

(2) A sample displaces inconsistent general language of
description.

(3) Express warranties displace inconsistent implied warranties
other than an implied warranty under section 405(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409. THIRD-PARTY BENEFICIARIES
OF WARRANTY. (1) Except for published informational content, a warranty to a
licensee extends to persons for whose benefit the licensor intends to supply
the information or informational rights and which rightfully use the
information in a transaction or application of a kind in which the licensor
intends the information to be used.

(2) A warranty to a consumer extends to each individual consumer in
the licensee's immediate family or household if the individual's use would have
been reasonably expected by the licensor.

(3) A contractual term that excludes or limits the persons to which
a warranty extends is effective except as to individuals described in
subsection (2) of this section.

(4) A disclaimer or modification of a warranty or remedy which is
effective against the licensee is also effective against third persons to which
a warranty extends under this section.

PART
5

TRANSFER OF INTERESTS AND RIGHTS

SUBPART A. OWNERSHIP AND
TRANSFERS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. OWNERSHIP OF INFORMATION
RIGHTS. (1) If an agreement provides for conveyance of ownership of
informational rights in a computer program, ownership passes at the time and
place specified by the agreement but does not pass until the program is in existence
and identified to the contract. If the agreement does not specify a different
time, ownership passes when the program and the informational rights are in
existence and identified to the contract.

(2) Transfer of a copy does not transfer ownership of informational
rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502. TITLE TO COPY. (1) In a
license:

(a) Title to a copy is determined by the license;

(b) A licensee's right under the license to possession or control
of a copy is governed by the license and does not depend solely on title to the
copy; and

(c) If a licensor reserves title to a copy, the licensor retains
title to that copy and any copies made of it, unless the license grants the
licensee a right to make and sell copies to others, in which case the
reservation of title applies only to copies delivered to the licensee by the
licensor.

(2) If an agreement provides for transfer of title to a copy, title
passes:

(a) At the time and place specified in the agreement; or

(b) If the agreement does not specify a time and place:

(i) With respect to delivery of a copy on a tangible medium, at the
time and place the licensor completed its obligations with respect to tender of
the copy; or

(ii) With respect to electronic delivery of a copy, if a first sale
occurs under federal copyright law, at the time and place at which the licensor
completed its obligations with respect to tender of the copy.

(3) If the party to which title passes under the contract refuses
delivery of the copy or rejects the terms of the agreement, title revests in
the licensor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. TRANSFER OF CONTRACTUAL
INTEREST. The following rules apply to a transfer of a contractual interest:

(1) A party's contractual interest may be transferred unless the
transfer:

(a) Is prohibited by other law; or

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
would materially change the duty of the other party, materially increase the
burden or risk imposed on the other party, or materially impair the other
party's property or its likelihood or expectation of obtaining return
performance.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section
and section 508(1)(a)(ii) of this act, a term prohibiting transfer of a party's
contractual interest is enforceable, and a transfer made in violation of that
term is a breach of contract and is ineffective to create contractual rights in
the transferee against the nontransferring party, except to the extent that:

(a) The contract is a license for incorporation or use of the
licensed information or informational rights with information or informational
rights from other sources in a combined work for public distribution or public
performance and the transfer is of the completed, combined work; or

(b) The transfer is of a right to payment arising out of the
transferor's due performance of less than its entire obligation and the
transfer would be enforceable under subsection (1) of this section in the
absence of the term prohibiting transfer.

(3) A right to damages for breach of the whole contract or a right
to payment arising out of the transferor's due performance of its entire
obligation may be transferred notwithstanding an agreement otherwise.

(4) A term that prohibits transfer of a contractual interest under
a mass-market license by the licensee must be conspicuous.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504. EFFECT OF TRANSFER OF
CONTRACTUAL INTEREST. (1) A transfer of "the contract" or of
"all my rights under the contract," or a transfer in similar general
terms, is a transfer of all contractual interests under the contract. Whether
the transfer is effective is determined by sections 503 and 508(1)(a)(ii) of
this act.

(2) The following rules apply to a transfer of a party's
contractual interests:

(a) The transferee is subject to all contractual use terms.

(b) Unless the language or circumstances otherwise indicate, as in
a transfer as security, the transfer delegates the duties of the transferor and
transfers its rights.

(c) Acceptance of the transfer is a promise by the transferee to
perform the delegated duties. The promise is enforceable by the transferor and
any other party to the original contract.

(d) The transfer does not relieve the transferor of any duty to
perform, or of liability for breach of contract, unless the other party to the
original contract agrees that the transfer has that effect.

(3) A party to the original contract, other than the transferor,
may treat a transfer that conveys a right or duty of performance without its
consent as creating reasonable grounds for insecurity and, without prejudice to
the party's rights against the transferor, may demand assurances from the
transferee under section 708 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. PERFORMANCE BY A
DELEGATE; SUBCONTRACT. (1) A party may perform its contractual duties or
exercise its contractual rights through a delegate or a subcontract unless:

(a) The contract prohibits delegation or subcontracting; or

(b) The other party has a substantial interest in having the
original promisor perform or control the performance.

(2) Delegating or subcontracting performance does not relieve the
delegating party of a duty to perform or of liability for breach.

(3) An attempted delegation that violates a term prohibiting
delegation is not effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506. TRANSFER BY LICENSEE.
(1) If all or any part of a licensee's interest in a license is transferred,
voluntarily or involuntarily, the transferee does not acquire an interest in
information, copies, or the contractual or informational rights of the licensee
unless the transfer is effective under section 503 or 508(1)(a)(ii) of this
act. If the transfer is effective, the transferee takes subject to the terms
of the license.

(2) Except as otherwise provided under trade secret law, a
transferee acquires no more than the contractual interest or other rights that
the transferor was authorized to transfer.

SUBPART B. FINANCING
ARRANGEMENTS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507. FINANCING IF FINANCIER
DOES NOT BECOME LICENSEE. If a financier does not become a licensee in
connection with its financial accommodation contract, the following rules
apply:

(1) The financier does not receive the benefits or burdens of the
license.

(2) The licensee's rights and obligations with respect to the
information and informational rights are governed by:

(a) The license;

(b) Any rights of the licensor under other law; and

(c) To the extent not inconsistent with (a) and (b) of this
subsection, any financial accommodation contract between the financier and the
licensee, which may add additional conditions to the licensee's right to use
the licensed information or informational rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508. FINANCE LICENSES. (1) If
a financier becomes a licensee in connection with its financial accommodation
contract and then transfers its contractual interest under the license, or
sublicenses the licensed computer information or informational rights, to a
licensee receiving the financial accommodation, the following rules apply:

(a) The transfer or sublicense to the accommodated licensee is not
effective unless:

(i) The transfer or sublicense is effective under section 503 of
this act; or

(ii) The following conditions are fulfilled:

(A) Before the licensor delivered the information or granted the
license to the financier, the licensor received notice in a record from the
financier giving the name and location of the accommodated licensee and clearly
indicating that the license was being obtained in order to transfer the contractual
interest or sublicense the licensed information or informational rights to the
accommodated licensee;

(B) The financier became a licensee solely to make the financial
accommodation; and

(C) The accommodated licensee adopts the terms of the license,
which terms may be supplemented by the financial accommodation contract, to the
extent the terms of the financial accommodation contract are not inconsistent
with the license and any rights of the licensor under other law.

(b) A financier that makes a transfer that is effective under
(a)(ii) of this subsection may make only the single transfer or sublicense
contemplated by the notice unless the licensor consents to a later transfer.

(2) If a financier makes an effective transfer of its contractual
interest in a license, or an effective sublicense of the licensed information
or informational rights, to an accommodated licensee, the following rules
apply:

(a) The accommodated licensee's rights and obligations are governed
by:

(i) The license;

(ii) Any rights of the licensor under other law; and

(iii) To the extent not inconsistent with (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection, the financial accommodation contract, which may impose additional
conditions to the licensee's right to use the licensed information or
informational rights.

(b) The financier does not make warranties to the accommodated
licensee other than the warranty under section 401(2)(a) of this act and any
express warranties in the financial accommodation contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509. FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS:
OBLIGATIONS IRREVOCABLE. Unless the accommodated licensee is a consumer, a
term in a financial accommodation contract providing that the accommodated
licensee's obligations to the financier are irrevocable and independent is
enforceable. The obligations become irrevocable and independent upon the
licensee's acceptance of the license or the financier's giving of value,
whichever occurs first.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510. FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS:
REMEDIES OR ENFORCEMENT. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of
this section, on material breach of a financial accommodation contract by the
accommodated licensee, the following rules apply:

(a) The financier may cancel the financial accommodation contract.

(b) Subject to (c) and (d) of this subsection, the financier may
pursue its remedies against the accommodated licensee under the financial
accommodation contract.

(c) If the financier became a licensee and made a transfer or
sublicense that was effective under section 508 of this act, it may exercise
the remedies of a licensor for breach, including the rights of an aggrieved
party under section 815 of this act, subject to the limitations of section 816
of this act.

(d) If the financier did not become a licensee or did not make a
transfer that was effective under section 508 of this act, it may enforce a
contractual right contained in the financial accommodation contract to preclude
the licensee's further use of the information. However, the following rules
apply:

(i) The financier has no right to take possession of copies, use
the information or informational rights, or transfer any contractual interest
in the license.

(ii) If the accommodated licensee agreed to transfer possession of
copies to the financier in the event of material breach of the financial
accommodation contract, the financier may enforce that contractual right only
if permitted to do so under subsection (2)(a) of this section and section 503
of this act.

(2) The following additional limitations apply to a financier's
remedies under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) A financier described in subsection (1)(c) of this section
which is entitled under the financial accommodation contract to take possession
or prevent use of information, copies, or related materials may do so only if
the licensor consents or if doing so would not result in a material adverse
change of the duty of the licensor, materially increase the burden or risk
imposed on the licensor, disclose or threaten to disclose trade secrets or
confidential material of the licensor, or materially impair the licensor's
likelihood or expectation of obtaining return performance.

(b) The financier may not otherwise exercise control over, have
access to, or sell, transfer, or otherwise use the information or copies
without the consent of the licensor unless the financier or transferee is
subject to the terms of the license and:

(i) The licensee owns the licensed copy, the license does not
preclude transfer of the licensee's contractual rights, and the transfer
complies with federal copyright law for the owner of a copy to make the
transfer; or

(ii) The license is transferable by its express terms and the
financier fulfills any conditions to, or complies with any restrictions on,
transfer.

(c) The financier's remedies under the financial accommodation
contract are subject to the licensor's rights and the terms of the license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511. FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS:
EFFECT ON LICENSOR'S RIGHTS. (1) The creation of a financier's interest does
not place any obligations on or alter the rights of a licensor.

(2) A financier's interest does not attach to any intellectual
property rights of the licensor unless the licensor expressly consents to such
attachment in a license or another record.

PART
6

PERFORMANCE

SUBPART A. GENERAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. PERFORMANCE OF CONTRACT
IN GENERAL. (1) A party shall perform in a manner that conforms to the
contract.

(2) If an uncured material breach of contract by one party precedes
the aggrieved party's performance, the aggrieved party need not perform except with
respect to restrictions in contractual use terms, but the contractual use terms
do not apply to information or copies properly received or obtained from
another source. In addition, the following rules apply:

(a) The aggrieved party may refuse a performance that is a material
breach as to that performance or a performance that may be refused under
section 704(2) of this act.

(b) The aggrieved party may cancel the contract only if the breach
is a material breach of the whole contract or the agreement so provides.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
tender of performance by a party entitles the party to acceptance of that
performance. In addition, the following rules apply:

(a) A tender of performance occurs when the party, with manifest
present ability and willingness to perform, offers to complete the performance.

(b) If a performance by the other party is due at the time of the
tendered performance, tender of the other party's performance is a condition to
the tendering party's obligation to complete the tendered performance.

(c) A party shall pay or render the consideration required by the
agreement for a performance it accepts. A party that accepts a performance has
the burden of establishing a breach of contract with respect to the accepted
performance.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in sections 603 and 604 of this
act, in the case of a performance with respect to a copy, this section is
subject to sections 606 through 610 and 704 through 707 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. LICENSOR'S OBLIGATIONS TO
ENABLE USE. (1) In this section, "enable use" means to grant a
contractual right or permission with respect to information or informational
rights and to complete the acts, if any, required under the agreement to make
the information available to the licensee.

(2) A licensor shall enable use by the licensee pursuant to the
contract. The following rules apply to enabling use:

(a) If nothing other than the grant of a contractual right or
permission is required to enable use, the licensor enables use when the
contract becomes enforceable.

(b) If the agreement requires delivery of a copy, enabling use
occurs when the copy is tendered to the licensee.

(c) If the agreement requires delivery of a copy and steps
authorizing the licensee's use, enabling use occurs when the last of those acts
occurs.

(d) In an access contract, enabling use requires tendering all
access material necessary to enable the agreed access.

(e) If the agreement requires a transfer of ownership of
informational rights and a filing or recording is allowed by law to establish
priority of the transferred ownership, on request by the licensee, the licensor
shall execute and tender a record appropriate for that purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. SUBMISSIONS OF
INFORMATION TO SATISFACTION OF PARTY. If an agreement requires that submitted
information be to the satisfaction of the recipient, the following rules apply:

(1) Sections 606 through 610 and 704 through 707 of this act do not
apply to the submission.

(2) If the information is not satisfactory to the recipient and the
parties engage in efforts to correct the deficiencies in a manner and over a
time consistent with the ordinary standards of the business, trade, or
industry, neither the efforts nor the passage of time required for the efforts
is an acceptance or a refusal of the submission.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,
neither refusal nor acceptance occurs unless the recipient expressly refuses or
accepts the submitted information, but the recipient may not use the submitted
information before acceptance.

(4) Silence and a failure to act in reference to a submission
beyond a commercially reasonable time to respond entitle the submitting party
to demand, in a record delivered to the recipient, a decision on the
submission. If the recipient fails to respond within a reasonable time after
receipt of the demand, the submission is deemed to have been refused.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. IMMEDIATELY COMPLETED
PERFORMANCE. If a performance involves delivery of information or services
which, because of their nature, may provide a licensee, immediately on
performance or delivery, with substantially all the benefit of the performance
or with other significant benefit that cannot be returned, the following rules
apply:

(1) Sections 607 through 610 and 704 through 707 of this act do not
apply.

(2) The rights of the parties are determined under section 601 of
this act and the ordinary standards of the business, trade, or industry.

(3) Before tender of the performance, a party entitled to receive
the tender may inspect the media, labels, or packaging but may not view the
information or otherwise receive the performance before completing any
performance of its own that is then due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. ELECTRONIC REGULATION OF
PERFORMANCE. (1) In this section, "automatic restraint" means a
program, code, device, or similar electronic or physical limitation the
intended purpose of which is to restrict use of information.

(2) A party entitled to enforce a limitation on use of information
may include an automatic restraint in the information or a copy of it and use
that restraint if:

(a) A term of the agreement authorizes use of the restraint;

(b) The restraint prevents a use that is inconsistent with the
agreement;

(c) The restraint prevents use after expiration of the stated
duration of the contract or a stated number of uses; or

(d) The restraint prevents use after the contract terminates, other
than on expiration of a stated duration or number of uses, and the licensor
gives reasonable notice to the licensee before further use is prevented.

(3) This section does not authorize an automatic restraint that
affirmatively prevents or makes impracticable a licensee's access to its own
information or information of a third party, other than the licensor, if that
information is in the possession of the licensee or a third party and accessed
without use of the licensor's information or informational rights.

(4) A party that includes or uses an automatic restraint consistent
with subsection (2) or (3) of this section is not liable for any loss caused by
the use of the restraint.

(5) This section does not preclude electronic replacement or
disabling of an earlier copy of information by the licensor in connection with
delivery of a new copy or version under an agreement to replace or disable the
earlier copy by electronic means with an upgrade or other new information.

(6) This section does not authorize use of an automatic restraint
to enforce remedies in the event of breach of contract or of cancellation for
breach.

SUBPART B. PERFORMANCE IN DELIVERY OF
COPIES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. COPY: DELIVERY; TENDER
OF DELIVERY. (1) Delivery of a copy must be at the location designated by
agreement. In the absence of a designation, the following rules apply:

(a) The place for delivery of a copy on a tangible medium is the
tendering party's place of business or, if it has none, its residence.
However, if the parties know at the time of contracting that the copy is
located in some other place, that place is the place for delivery.

(b) The place for electronic delivery of a copy is an information
processing system designated or used by the licensor.

(c) Documents of title may be delivered through customary banking
channels.

(2) Tender of delivery of a copy requires the tendering party to
put and hold a conforming copy at the other party's disposition and give the
other party any notice reasonably necessary to enable it to obtain access to,
control, or possession of the copy. Tender must be at a reasonable hour and,
if applicable, requires tender of access material and other documents required
by the agreement. The party receiving tender shall furnish facilities
reasonably suited to receive tender. In addition, the following rules apply:

(a) If the contract requires delivery of a copy held by a third
person without being moved, the tendering party shall tender access material or
documents required by the agreement.

(b) If the tendering party is required or authorized to send a copy
to the other party and the contract does not require the tendering party to
deliver the copy at a particular destination, the following rules apply:

(i) In tendering delivery of a copy on a tangible medium, the
tendering party shall put the copy in the possession of a carrier and make a
contract for its transportation that is reasonable in light of the nature of
the information and other circumstances, with expenses of transportation to be
borne by the receiving party.

(ii) In tendering electronic delivery of a copy, the tendering
party shall initiate or cause to have initiated a transmission that is
reasonable in light of the nature of the information and other circumstances,
with expenses of transmission to be borne by the receiving party.

(c) If the tendering party is required to deliver a copy at a
particular destination, the tendering party shall make a copy available at that
destination and bear the expenses of transportation or transmission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607. COPY: PERFORMANCE
RELATED TO DELIVERY; PAYMENT. (1) If performance requires delivery of a copy,
the following rules apply:

(a) The party required to deliver need not complete a tendered
delivery until the receiving party tenders any performance then due.

(b) Tender of delivery is a condition of the other party's duty to
accept the copy and entitles the tendering party to acceptance of the copy.

(2) If payment is due on delivery of a copy, the following rules
apply:

(a) Tender of delivery is a condition of the receiving party's duty
to pay and entitles the tendering party to payment according to the contract.

(b) All copies required by the contract must be tendered in a
single delivery, and payment is due only on tender.

(3) If the circumstances give either party the right to make or
demand delivery in lots, the contract fee, if it can be apportioned, may be
demanded for each lot.

(4) If payment is due and demanded on delivery of a copy or on
delivery of a document of title, the right of the party receiving tender to
retain or dispose of the copy or document, as against the tendering party, is
conditioned on making the payment due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608. COPY: RIGHT TO INSPECT;
PAYMENT BEFORE INSPECTION. (1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 603
and 604 of this act, if performance requires delivery of a copy, the following
rules apply:

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the party
receiving the copy has a right before payment or acceptance to inspect the copy
at a reasonable place and time and in a reasonable manner to determine
conformance to the contract.

(b) The party making the inspection shall bear the expenses of
inspection.

(c) A place or method of inspection or an acceptance standard fixed
by the parties is presumed to be exclusive. However, the fixing of a place,
method, or standard does not postpone identification to the contract or shift
the place for delivery, passage of title, or risk of loss. If compliance with
the place or method becomes impossible, inspection must be made as provided in
this section unless the place or method fixed by the parties was an
indispensable condition the failure of which avoids the contract.

(d) A party's right to inspect is subject to existing obligations
of confidentiality.

(2) If a right to inspect exists under subsection (1) of this
section but the agreement is inconsistent with an opportunity to inspect before
payment, the party does not have a right to inspect before payment.

(3) If a contract requires payment before inspection of a copy,
nonconformity in the tender does not excuse the party receiving the tender from
making payment unless:

(a) The nonconformity appears without inspection and would justify
refusal under section 704 of this act; or

(b) Despite tender of the required documents, the circumstances
would justify an injunction against honor of a letter of credit under Article
62A.5 RCW.

(4) Payment made under circumstances described in subsection (2) or
(3) of this section is not an acceptance of the copy and does not impair a
party's right to inspect or preclude any of the party's remedies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609. COPY: WHEN ACCEPTANCE
OCCURS. (1) Acceptance of a copy occurs when the party to which the copy is
tendered:

(a) Signifies, or acts with respect to the copy in a manner that
signifies, that the tender was conforming or that the party will take or retain
the copy despite the nonconformity;

(b) Does not make an effective refusal;

(c) Commingles the copy or the information in a manner that makes
compliance with the party's duties after refusal impossible;

(d) Obtains a substantial benefit from the copy and cannot return
that benefit; or

(e) Acts in a manner inconsistent with the licensor's ownership,
but the act is an acceptance only if the licensor elects to treat it as an
acceptance and ratifies the act to the extent it was within contractual use
terms.

(2) Except in cases governed by subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this
section, if there is a right to inspect under section 608 of this act or the
agreement, acceptance of a copy occurs only after the party has had a
reasonable opportunity to inspect the copy.

(3) If an agreement requires delivery in stages involving separate
portions that taken together comprise the whole of the information, acceptance
of any stage is conditional until acceptance of the whole.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610. COPY: EFFECT OF
ACCEPTANCE; BURDEN OF ESTABLISHING; NOTICE OF CLAIMS. (1) A party accepting a
copy shall pay or render the consideration required by the agreement for the
copy it accepts. Acceptance of a copy precludes refusal and, if made with knowledge
of a nonconformity in a tender, may not be revoked because of the nonconformity
unless acceptance was on the reasonable assumption that the nonconformity would
be seasonably cured. Acceptance by itself does not impair any other remedy for
nonconformity.

(2) A party accepting a copy has the burden of establishing a
breach of contract with respect to the copy.

(3) If a copy has been accepted, the accepting party shall:

(a) Except with respect to claims of a type described in section
805(4)(a) of this act, within a reasonable time after it discovers or should
have discovered a breach of contract, notify the other party of the breach or
be barred from any remedy for the breach; and

(b) If the claim is for breach of a warranty regarding
noninfringement and the accepting party is sued by a third party because of the
breach, notify the warrantor within a reasonable time after receiving notice of
the litigation or be precluded from any remedy over for the liability
established by the litigation.

SUBPART C. SPECIAL TYPES OF
CONTRACTS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611. ACCESS CONTRACTS. (1) If
an access contract provides for access over a period of time, the following
rules apply:

(a) The licensee's rights of access are to the information as
modified and made commercially available by the licensor from time to time
during that period.

(b) A change in the content of the information is a breach of
contract only if the change conflicts with the agreement of the parties.

(c) Unless it is subject to a contractual use term, information
obtained by the licensee is free of any use restriction other than a
restriction resulting from the informational rights of another person or other
law.

(d) Access must be available:

(i) At times and in a manner conforming to the express terms of the
agreement; and

(ii) To the extent not expressly stated in the agreement, at times
and in a manner reasonable for the particular type of contract in light of the
ordinary standards of the business, trade, or industry.

(2) In an access contract that gives the licensee a right of access
at times substantially of its own choosing during agreed periods, an occasional
failure to have access available during those times is not a breach of contract
if it is:

(a) Consistent with ordinary standards of the business, trade, or
industry for the particular type of contract; or

(b) Caused by:

(i) Scheduled reasonable downtime;

(ii) Reasonable needs for maintenance;

(iii) Reasonable periods of failure of equipment, computer
programs, or communications; or

(iv) Events reasonably beyond the licensor's control, and the
licensor exercises such commercially reasonable efforts as the circumstances
require.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612. CORRECTION AND SUPPORT
CONTRACTS. (1) If a person agrees to provide services regarding the correction
of performance problems in computer information, other than an agreement to
cure its own existing breach of contract, the following rules apply:

(a) If the services are provided by a licensor of the information
as part of a limited remedy, the licensor undertakes that its performance will
provide the licensee with information that conforms to the agreement to which
the limited remedy applies.

(b) In all other cases, the person:

(i) Shall perform at a time and place and in a manner consistent
with the express terms of the agreement and, to the extent not stated in the
express terms, at a time and place and in a manner that is reasonable in light
of ordinary standards of the business, trade, or industry; and

(ii) Does not undertake that its services will correct performance
problems unless the agreement expressly so provides.

(2) Unless required to do so by an express or implied warranty, a
licensor is not required to provide instruction or other support for the
licensee's use of information or access. A person that agrees to provide
support shall make the support available in a manner and with a quality
consistent with express terms of the support agreement and, to the extent not
stated in the express terms, at a time and place and in a manner that is
reasonable in light of ordinary standards of the business, trade, or industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613. CONTRACTS INVOLVING
PUBLISHERS, DEALERS, AND END USERS. (1) In this section:

(a) "Dealer" means a merchant licensee that receives
information directly or indirectly from a licensor for sale or license to end
users.

(b) "End user" means a licensee that acquires a copy of
the information from a dealer by delivery on a tangible medium for the
licensee's own use and not for sale, license, transmission to third persons, or
public display or performance for a fee.

(c) "Publisher" means a licensor, other than a dealer,
that offers a license to an end user with respect to information distributed by
a dealer to the end user.

(2) In a contract between a dealer and an end user, if the end
user's right to use the information or informational rights is subject to a
license by the publisher and there was no opportunity to review the license
before the end user became obligated to pay the dealer, the following rules
apply:

(a) The contract between the end user and the dealer is conditioned
on the end user's agreement to the publisher's license.

(b) If the end user does not agree, such as by manifesting assent,
to the terms of the publisher's license, the end user has a right to a return
from the dealer. A right under this subsection (2)(b) is a return for purposes
of sections 112, 208, and 209 of this act.

(c) The dealer is not bound by the terms, and does not receive the
benefits, of an agreement between the publisher and the end user unless the
dealer and end user adopt those terms as part of the agreement.

(3) If an agreement provides for distribution of copies on a
tangible medium or in packaging provided by the publisher or an authorized
third party, a dealer may distribute those copies and documentation only:

(a) In the form as received; and

(b) Subject to the terms of any license of the publisher that the
publisher provides to the dealer to be furnished to end users.

(4) A dealer that enters into an agreement with an end user is a
licensor with respect to the end user under this chapter.

SUBPART D. LOSS AND
IMPOSSIBILITY

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614. RISK OF LOSS OF COPY.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the risk of loss as to a copy
that is to be delivered to a licensee, including a copy delivered by electronic
means, passes to the licensee upon its receipt of the copy.

(2) If an agreement requires or authorizes a licensor to send a
copy on a tangible medium by carrier, the following rules apply:

(a) If the agreement does not require the licensor to deliver the
copy at a particular destination, the risk of loss passes to the licensee when
the copy is duly delivered to the carrier, even if the shipment is under
reservation.

(b) If the agreement requires the licensor to deliver the copy at a
particular destination and the copy is duly tendered there in the possession of
the carrier, the risk of loss passes to the licensee when the copy is tendered
at that destination.

(c) If a tender of delivery of a copy or a shipping document fails
to conform to the contract, the risk of loss remains with the licensor until
cure or acceptance.

(3) If a copy is held by a third party to be delivered or reproduced
without being moved or a copy is to be delivered by making access available to
a third party resource containing a copy, the risk of loss passes to the
licensee upon:

(a) The licensee's receipt of a negotiable document of title or
other access materials covering the copy;

(b) Acknowledgment by the third party to the licensee of the
licensee's right to possession of or access to the copy; or

(c) The licensee's receipt of a record directing the third party,
pursuant to an agreement between the licensor and the third party, to make
delivery or authorizing the third party to allow access.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615. EXCUSE BY FAILURE OF
PRESUPPOSED CONDITIONS. (1) Unless a party has assumed a different obligation,
delay in performance by a party, or nonperformance in whole or part by a party,
other than of an obligation to make payments or to conform to contractual use
terms, is not a breach of contract if the delay or nonperformance is of a
performance that has been made impracticable by:

(a) The occurrence of a contingency the nonoccurrence of which was
a basic assumption on which the contract was made; or

(b) Compliance in good faith with any foreign or domestic statute,
governmental rule, regulation, or order, whether or not it later proves to be
invalid.

(2) A party claiming excuse under subsection (1) of this section
shall seasonably notify the other party that there will be delay or
nonperformance.

(3) If an excuse affects only a part of a party's capacity to
perform an obligation for delivery of copies, the party claiming excuse shall
allocate performance among its customers in any manner that is fair and
reasonable and notify the other party of the estimated quota to be made
available. In making the allocation, the party claiming excuse may include the
requirements of regular customers not then under contract and its own
requirements.

(4) A party that receives notice pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section of a material or indefinite delay in delivery of copies or of an
allocation under subsection (3) of this section, by notice in a record, may:

(a) Terminate and thereby discharge any executory portion of the
contract; or

(b) Modify the contract by agreeing to take the available
allocation in substitution.

(5) If, after receipt of notice under subsection (2) of this
section, a party does not modify the contract within a reasonable time not
exceeding thirty days, the contract lapses with respect to any performance
affected.

SUBPART E. TERMINATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616. TERMINATION: SURVIVAL OF
OBLIGATIONS. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, on termination all obligations that are still executory on both sides
are discharged.

(2) The following survive termination:

(a) A right based on previous breach or performance of the
contract;

(b) An obligation of confidentiality, nondisclosure, or
noncompetition to the extent enforceable under other law;

(c) A contractual use term applicable to any licensed copy or
information received from the other party, or copies made of it, which are not
returned or returnable to the other party;

(d) An obligation to deliver, or dispose of information, materials,
documentation, copies, records, or the like to the other party, an obligation
to destroy copies, or a right to obtain information from an escrow agent;

(e) A choice of law or forum;

(f) An obligation to arbitrate or otherwise resolve disputes by
alternative dispute resolution procedures;

(g) A term limiting the time for commencing an action or for giving
notice;

(h) An indemnity term or a right related to a claim of a type
described in section 805(4)(a) of this act;

(i) A limitation of remedy or modification or disclaimer of
warranty;

(j) An obligation to provide an accounting and make any payment due
under the accounting; and

(k) Any term that the agreement provides will survive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617. NOTICE OF TERMINATION.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a party may
not terminate a contract except on the happening of an agreed event, such as
the expiration of the stated duration, unless the party gives reasonable notice
of termination to the other party.

(2) An access contract may be terminated without giving notice.
However, except on the happening of an agreed event, termination requires
giving reasonable notice to the licensee if the access contract pertains to
information owned and provided by the licensee to the licensor.

(3) A term dispensing with a notice required under this section is
invalid if its operation would be unconscionable. However, a term specifying
standards for giving notice is enforceable if the standards are not manifestly
unreasonable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618. TERMINATION:
ENFORCEMENT. (1) On termination of a license, a party in possession or control
of information, copies, or other materials that are the property of the other
party, or are subject to a contractual obligation to be delivered to that party
on termination, shall use commercially reasonable efforts to deliver or hold
them for disposal on instructions of that party. If any materials are jointly
owned, the party in possession or control shall make them available to the
joint owners.

(2) Termination of a license ends all right under the license for
the licensee to use or access the licensed information, informational rights,
or copies. Continued use of the licensed copies or exercise of terminated
rights is a breach of contract unless authorized by a term that survives
termination.

(3) Each party may enforce its rights under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section by acting pursuant to section 605 of this act or by judicial
process, including obtaining an order that the party or an officer of the court
take the following actions with respect to any licensed information,
documentation, copies, or other materials to be delivered:

(a) Deliver or take possession of them;

(b) Without removal, render unusable or eliminate the capability to
exercise contractual rights in or use of them;

(c) Destroy or prevent access to them; and

(d) Require that the party or any other person in possession or
control of them make them available to the other party at a place designated by
that party which is reasonably convenient to both parties.

(4) In an appropriate case, a court of competent jurisdiction may
grant injunctive relief to enforce the parties' rights under this section.

PART
7

BREACH OF CONTRACT

SUBPART A. GENERAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. BREACH OF CONTRACT;
MATERIAL BREACH. (1) Whether a party is in breach of contract is determined by
the agreement or, in the absence of agreement, this chapter. A breach occurs
if a party without legal excuse fails to perform an obligation in a timely
manner, repudiates a contract, or exceeds a contractual use term, or otherwise
is not in compliance with an obligation placed on it by this chapter or the
agreement. A breach, whether or not material, entitles the aggrieved party to
its remedies. Whether a breach of a contractual use term is an infringement or
a misappropriation is determined by applicable informational property rights
law.

(2) A breach of contract is material if:

(a) The contract so provides;

(b) The breach is a substantial failure to perform a term that is
an essential element of the agreement; or

(c) The circumstances, including the language of the agreement, the
reasonable expectations of the parties, the standards and practices of the
business, trade, or industry, and the character of the breach, indicate that:

(i) The breach caused or is likely to cause substantial harm to the
aggrieved party; or

(ii) The breach substantially deprived or is likely substantially
to deprive the aggrieved party of a significant benefit it reasonably expected
under the contract.

(3) The cumulative effect of nonmaterial breaches may be material.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. WAIVER OF REMEDY FOR
BREACH OF CONTRACT. (1) A claim or right arising out of a breach of contract
may be discharged in whole or part without consideration by a waiver in a
record to which the party making the waiver agrees after breach, such as by
manifesting assent, or which the party making the waiver authenticates and
delivers to the other party.

(2) A party that accepts a performance with knowledge that the
performance constitutes a breach of contract and, within a reasonable time
after acceptance, does not notify the other party of the breach waives all
remedies for the breach, unless acceptance was made on the reasonable
assumption that the breach would be cured and it has not been seasonably
cured. However, a party that seasonably notifies the other party of a
reservation of rights does not waive the rights reserved.

(3) A party that refuses a performance and fails to identify a
particular defect that is ascertainable by reasonable inspection waives the
right to rely on that defect to justify refusal only if:

(a) The other party could have cured the defect if it were
identified seasonably; or

(b) Between merchants, the other party after refusal made a request
in a record for a full and final statement of all defects on which the refusing
party relied.

(4) Waiver of a remedy for breach of contract in one performance
does not waive any remedy for the same or a similar breach in future
performances unless the party making the waiver expressly so states.

(5) A waiver may not be retracted as to the performance to which
the waiver applies.

(6) Except for a waiver in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section or a waiver supported by consideration, a waiver affecting an executory
portion of a contract may be retracted by seasonable notice received by the
other party that strict performance will be required in the future, unless the
retraction would be unjust in view of a material change of position in reliance
on the waiver by that party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703. CURE OF BREACH OF
CONTRACT. (1) A party in breach of contract may cure the breach at its own
expense if:

(a) The time for performance has not expired and the party in
breach seasonably notifies the aggrieved party of its intent to cure and,
within the time for performance, makes a conforming performance;

(b) The party in breach had reasonable grounds to believe the
performance would be acceptable with or without monetary allowance, seasonably
notifies the aggrieved party of its intent to cure, and provides a conforming
performance within a further reasonable time after performance was due; or

(c) In a case not governed by (a) or (b) of this subsection, the
party in breach seasonably notifies the aggrieved party of its intent to cure
and promptly provides a conforming performance before cancellation by the aggrieved
party.

(2) In a license other than in a mass-market transaction, if the
agreement required a single delivery of a copy and the party receiving tender
of delivery was required to accept a nonconforming copy because the
nonconformity was not a material breach of contract, the party in breach shall
promptly and in good faith make an effort to cure if:

(a) The party in breach receives seasonable notice of the specific
nonconformity and a demand for cure of it; and

(b) The cost of the effort to cure does not disproportionately
exceed the direct damages caused by the nonconformity to the aggrieved party.

(3) A party may not cancel a contract or refuse a performance
because of a breach of contract that has been seasonably cured under subsection
(1) of this section. However, notice of intent to cure does not preclude
refusal or cancellation for the uncured breach.

SUBPART B. DEFECTIVE COPIES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704. COPY: REFUSAL OF
DEFECTIVE TENDER. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section and section
705 of this act, tender of a copy that is a material breach of contract permits
the party to which tender is made to:

(a) Refuse the tender;

(b) Accept the tender; or

(c) Accept any commercially reasonable units and refuse the rest.

(2) In a mass-market transaction that calls for only a single
tender of a copy, a licensee may refuse the tender if the tender does not
conform to the contract.

(3) Refusal of a tender is ineffective unless:

(a) It is made before acceptance;

(b) It is made within a reasonable time after tender or completion
of any permitted effort to cure; and

(c) The refusing party seasonably notifies the tendering party of
the refusal.

(4) Except in a case governed by subsection (2) of this section, a
party that rightfully refuses tender of a copy may cancel the contract only if
the tender was a material breach of the whole contract or the agreement so
provides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705. COPY: CONTRACT WITH
PREVIOUS VESTED GRANT OF RIGHTS. If an agreement grants a right in or
permission to use informational rights which precedes or is otherwise
independent of the delivery of a copy, the following rules apply:

(1) A party may refuse a tender of a copy which is a material
breach as to that copy, but refusal of that tender does not cancel the
contract.

(2) In a case governed by subsection (1) of this section, the
tendering party may cure the breach by seasonably providing a conforming copy
before the breach becomes material as to the whole contract.

(3) A breach that is material with respect to a copy allows
cancellation of the contract only if the breach cannot be seasonably cured and
is a material breach of the whole contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706. COPY: DUTIES UPON
RIGHTFUL REFUSAL. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, after
rightful refusal or revocation of acceptance of a copy, the following rules
apply:

(a) If the refusing party rightfully cancels the contract, section
802 of this act applies and all restrictions in contractual use terms continue.

(b) If the contract is not canceled, the parties remain bound by
all contractual obligations.

(2) On rightful refusal or revocation of acceptance of a copy, the
following rules apply to the extent consistent with section 802 of this act:

(a) Any use, sale, display, performance, or transfer of the copy or
information it contains, or any failure to comply with a contractual use term,
is a breach of contract. The licensee shall pay the licensor the reasonable
value of any use. However, use for a limited time within contractual use terms
is not a breach, and is not an acceptance under section 609(1)(e) of this act,
if it:

(i) Occurs after the tendering party is seasonably notified of
refusal;

(ii) Is not for distribution and is solely part of measures
reasonable under the circumstances to avoid or reduce loss; and

(iii) Is not contrary to instructions concerning disposition of the
copy received from the party in breach.

(b) A party that refuses a copy shall:

(i) Deliver the copy and all copies made of it, all access
materials, and documentation pertaining to the refused information to the
tendering party or hold them with reasonable care for a reasonable time for
disposal at that party's instructions; and

(ii) Follow reasonable instructions of the tendering party for
returning or delivering copies, access material, and documentation, but
instructions are not reasonable if the tendering party does not arrange for
payment of or reimbursement for reasonable expenses of complying with the
instructions.

(c) If the tendering party does not give instructions within a
reasonable time after being notified of refusal, the refusing party, in a
reasonable manner to reduce or avoid loss, may store the copies, access
material, and documentation for the tendering party's account or ship them to
the tendering party and is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable costs of
storage and shipment.

(d) Both parties remain bound by all contractual use terms that
would have been enforceable had the performance not been refused.

(e) In complying with this section, the refusing party shall act in
good faith. Conduct in good faith under this section is not acceptance or
conversion and may not be a ground for an action for damages under the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707. COPY: REVOCATION OF
ACCEPTANCE. (1) A party that accepts a nonconforming tender of a copy may
revoke acceptance only if the nonconformity is a material breach of contract
and the party accepted it:

(a) On the reasonable assumption that the nonconformity would be
cured, and the nonconformity was not seasonably cured;

(b) During a continuing effort by the party in breach at adjustment
and cure, and the breach was not seasonably cured; or

(c) Without discovery of the nonconformity, if acceptance was
reasonably induced either by the other party's assurances or by the difficulty
of discovery before acceptance.

(2) Revocation of acceptance is not effective until the revoking
party notifies the other party of the revocation.

(3) Revocation of acceptance of a copy is precluded if:

(a) It does not occur within a reasonable time after the party
attempting to revoke discovers or should have discovered the ground for it;

(b) It occurs after a substantial change in condition not caused by
defects in the information, such as after the party commingles the information
in a manner that makes its return impossible; or

(c) The party attempting to revoke received a substantial benefit
or value from the information, and the benefit or value cannot be returned.

(4) A party that rightfully revokes has the same duties and is
under the same restrictions as if the party had refused tender of the copy.

SUBPART C. REPUDIATION AND
ASSURANCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708. ADEQUATE ASSURANCE OF
PERFORMANCE. (1) A contract imposes an obligation on each party not to impair
the other's expectation of receiving due performance. If reasonable grounds
for insecurity arise with respect to the performance of either party, the aggrieved
party may:

(a) Demand in a record adequate assurance of due performance; and

(b) Until that assurance is received, if commercially reasonable,
suspend any performance, other than with respect to restrictions in contractual
use terms, for which the agreed return performance has not been received.

(2) Between merchants, the reasonableness of grounds for insecurity
and the adequacy of any assurance offered is determined according to commercial
standards.

(3) Acceptance of any improper delivery or payment does not impair
an aggrieved party's right to demand adequate assurance of future performance.

(4) After receipt of a justified demand under subsection (1) of
this section, failure, within a reasonable time not exceeding thirty days, to
provide assurance of due performance which is adequate under the circumstances
of the particular case is a repudiation of the contract under section 709 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709. ANTICIPATORY
REPUDIATION. (1) If a party to a contract repudiates a performance not yet due
and the loss of performance will substantially impair the value of the contract
to the other party, the aggrieved party may:

(a) Await performance by the repudiating party for a commercially
reasonable time or resort to any remedy for breach of contract, even if it has
urged the repudiating party to retract the repudiation or has notified the
repudiating party that it would await its performance; and

(b) In either case, suspend its own performance or proceed in
accordance with section 812 or 813 of this act, as applicable.

(2) Repudiation includes language that one party will not or cannot
make a performance still due under the contract or voluntary, affirmative
conduct that reasonably appears to the other party to make a future performance
impossible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710. RETRACTION OF
ANTICIPATORY REPUDIATION. (1) A repudiating party may retract its repudiation
until its next performance is due unless the aggrieved party, after the
repudiation, has canceled the contract, materially changed its position, or
otherwise indicated that it considers the repudiation final.

(2) A retraction may be by any method that clearly indicates to the
aggrieved party that the repudiating party intends to perform the contract.
However, a retraction must contain any assurance justifiably demanded under
section 708 of this act.

(3) Retraction restores a repudiating party's rights under the
contract with due excuse and allowance to the aggrieved party for any delay
caused by the repudiation.

PART 8

REMEDIES

SUBPART A. GENERAL

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. REMEDIES IN GENERAL. (1)
The remedies provided in this chapter are cumulative, but a party may not
recover more than once for the same loss.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in sections 803 and 804 of this
act, if a party is in breach of contract, whether or not the breach is
material, the aggrieved party has the remedies provided in the agreement or
this chapter, but the aggrieved party shall continue to comply with any
restrictions in contractual use terms with respect to information or copies
received from the other party and the contractual use terms do not apply to
information or copies properly received or obtained from another source.

(3) Rescission or a claim for rescission of the contract, or
refusal of the information, does not preclude and is not inconsistent with a
claim for damages or other remedy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. CANCELLATION. (1) An
aggrieved party may cancel a contract if there is a material breach that has
not been cured or waived or the agreement allows cancellation for the breach.

(2) Cancellation is not effective until the canceling party gives
notice of cancellation to the party in breach, unless a delay required to
notify the party would cause or threaten material harm or loss to the aggrieved
party. The notification may be in any form reasonable under the
circumstances. However, in an access contract, a party may cancel rights of
access without notice.

(3) On cancellation, the following rules apply:

(a) If a party is in possession or control of licensed information,
documentation, materials, or copies of licensed information, the following
rules apply:

(i) A party that has rightfully refused a copy shall comply with
section 706(2) of this act as to the refused copy.

(ii) A party in breach of contract which would be subject to an
obligation to deliver under section 618 of this act, shall deliver all
information, documentation, materials, and copies to the other party or hold
them with reasonable care for a reasonable time for disposal at that party's
instructions. The party in breach of contract shall follow any reasonable
instructions received from the other party.

(iii) Except as otherwise provided in (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection, the party shall comply with section 618 of this act.

(b) All obligations that are executory on both sides at the time of
cancellation are discharged, but the following survive:

(i) Any right based on previous breach or performance; and

(ii) The rights, duties, and remedies described in section 616(2)
of this act.

(c) Cancellation of a license by the licensor ends any contractual
right of the licensee to use the information, informational rights, copies, or
other materials.

(d) Cancellation of a license by the licensee ends any contractual
right to use the information, informational rights, copies, or other materials,
but the licensee may use the information for a limited time after the license
has been canceled if the use:

(i) Is within contractual use terms;

(ii) Is not for distribution and is solely part of measures
reasonable under the circumstances to avoid or reduce loss; and

(iii) Is not contrary to instructions received from the party in
breach concerning disposition of them.

(e) The licensee shall pay the licensor the reasonable value of any
use after cancellation permitted under (d) of this subsection.

(f) The obligations under this subsection apply to all information,
informational rights, documentation, materials, and copies received by the
party and any copies made therefrom.

(4) A term providing that a contract may not be canceled precludes
cancellation but does not limit other remedies.

(5) Unless a contrary intention clearly appears, an expression such
as "cancellation," "rescission," or the like may not be
construed as a renunciation or discharge of a claim in damages for an
antecedent breach.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803. CONTRACTUAL MODIFICATION
OF REMEDY. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and in section 804
of this act:

(a) An agreement may provide for remedies in addition to or in
substitution for those provided in this chapter and may limit or alter the
measure of damages recoverable under this chapter or a party's other remedies
under this chapter, such as by precluding a party's right to cancel for breach
of contract, limiting remedies to returning or delivering copies and repayment
of the contract fee, or limiting remedies to repair or replacement of the
nonconforming copies; and

(b) Resort to a contractual remedy is optional unless the remedy is
expressly agreed to be exclusive, in which case it is the sole remedy.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, if performance of an
exclusive or limited remedy causes the remedy to fail of its essential purpose,
the aggrieved party may pursue other remedies under this chapter.

(3) Failure or unconscionability of an agreed exclusive or limited
remedy makes a term disclaiming or limiting consequential or incidental damages
unenforceable unless the agreement expressly makes the disclaimer or limitation
independent of the agreed remedy.

(4) Consequential damages and incidental damages may be excluded or
limited by agreement unless the exclusion or limitation is unconscionable.
Exclusion or limitation of consequential damages for personal injury in a
consumer contract for a computer program that is subject to this chapter and is
contained in consumer goods is prima facie unconscionable, but exclusion or
limitation of damages for a commercial loss is not unconscionable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804. LIQUIDATION OF DAMAGES.
(1) Damages for breach of contract by either party may be liquidated by
agreement in an amount that is reasonable in light of:

(a) The loss anticipated at the time of contracting;

(b) The actual loss; or

(c) The actual or anticipated difficulties of proving loss in the
event of breach.

(2) If a term liquidating damages is unenforceable under this
subsection, the aggrieved party may pursue the remedies provided in this
chapter, except as limited by other terms of the contract.

(3) If a party justifiably withholds delivery of copies because of
the other party's breach of contract, the party in breach is entitled to
restitution for any amount by which the sum of the payments it made for the
copies exceeds the amount of the liquidated damages payable to the aggrieved
party in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. The right to
restitution is subject to offset to the extent that the aggrieved party
establishes:

(a) A right to recover damages other than under subsection (1) of
this section; and

(b) The amount or value of any benefits received by the party in
breach, directly or indirectly, by reason of the contract.

(4) A term that does not liquidate damages, but that limits damages
available to the aggrieved party, must be evaluated under section 803 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805. LIMITATION OF ACTIONS.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, an action
for breach of contract must be commenced within the later of four years after
the right of action accrues or one year after the breach was or should have
been discovered, but not later than five years after the right of action
accrues.

(2) If the original agreement of the parties alters the period of
limitations, the following rules apply:

(a) The parties may reduce the period of limitation to not less
than one year after the right of action accrues but may not extend it.

(b) In a consumer contract, the period of limitation may not be
reduced.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,
a right of action accrues when the act or omission constituting a breach of
contract occurs, even if the aggrieved party did not know of the breach. A
right of action for breach of warranty accrues when tender of delivery of a
copy pursuant to section 606 of this act, or access to the information,
occurs. However, if the warranty expressly extends to future performance of
the information or a copy, the right of action accrues when the performance
fails to conform to the warranty, but not later than the date the warranty
expires.

(4) In the following cases, a right of action accrues on the later
of the date the act or omission constituting the breach of contract occurred or
the date on which it was or should have been discovered by the aggrieved party,
but not earlier than the date for delivery of a copy if the claim relates to
information in the copy:

(a) A breach of warranty against third-party claims for:

(i) Infringement or misappropriation; or

(ii) Libel, slander, or the like;

(b) A breach of contract involving a party's disclosure or misuse
of confidential information; or

(c) A failure to provide an indemnity or to perform another
obligation to protect or defend against a third-party claim.

(5) If an action commenced within the period of limitation is so
concluded as to leave available a remedy by another action for the same breach
of contract, the other action may be commenced after expiration of the period
of limitation if the action is commenced within six months after conclusion of
the first action, unless the action was concluded as a result of voluntary
discontinuance or dismissal for failure or neglect to prosecute.

(6) This section does not alter the law on tolling of the statute
of limitations and does not apply to a right of action that accrued before the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806. REMEDIES FOR FRAUD.
Remedies for material misrepresentation or fraud include all remedies available
under this chapter for nonfraudulent breach of contract.

SUBPART B. DAMAGES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 807. MEASUREMENT OF DAMAGES IN
GENERAL. (1) Except as otherwise provided in the contract, an aggrieved party
may not recover compensation for that part of a loss which could have been
avoided by taking measures reasonable under the circumstances to avoid or reduce
loss. The burden of establishing a failure of the aggrieved party to take
measures reasonable under the circumstances is on the party in breach of
contract.

(2) A party may not recover:

(a) Consequential damages for losses resulting from the content of
published informational content unless the agreement expressly so provides; or

(b) Damages that are speculative.

(3) The remedy for breach of contract for disclosure or misuse of
information that is a trade secret or in which the aggrieved party has a right
of confidentiality includes as consequential damages compensation for the
benefit obtained as a result of the breach.

(4) For purposes of this chapter, market value is determined as of
the date of breach of contract and the place for performance.

(5) Damages or expenses that relate to events after the date of
entry of judgment must be reduced to their present value as of that date. In
this subsection, "present value" means the amount, as of a date
certain, of one or more sums payable in the future or the value of one or more
performances due in the future, discounted to the date certain. The discount
is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties in their agreement
unless that rate was manifestly unreasonable when the agreement was entered
into. Otherwise, the discount is determined by a commercially reasonable rate
that takes into account the circumstances of each case when the agreement was
entered into.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 808. LICENSOR'S DAMAGES. (1)
In this section, "substitute transaction" means a transaction by the
licensor which would not have been possible except for the licensee's breach
and which transaction is for the same information or informational rights with
the same contractual use terms as the transaction to which the licensee's
breach applies.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 807 of this act, a
breach of contract by a licensee entitles the licensor to recover the following
compensation for losses resulting in the ordinary course from the breach, less
expenses avoided as a result of the breach, to the extent not otherwise
accounted for under this subsection:

(a) Damages measured in any combination of the following ways but
not to exceed the contract fee and the market value of other consideration
required under the contract for the performance that was the subject of the
breach:

(i) The amount of accrued and unpaid contract fees and the market
value of other consideration earned but not received for:

(A) Any performance accepted by the licensee; and

(B) Any performance to which section 604 of this act applies;

(ii) For performances not governed by (a)(i) of this subsection, if
the licensee repudiated or wrongfully refused the performance or the licensor
rightfully canceled and the breach makes possible a substitute transaction, the
amount of loss as determined by contract fees and the market value of other
consideration required under the contract for the performance less:

(A) The contract fees and market value of other consideration
received from an actual and commercially reasonable substitute transaction
entered into by the licensor in good faith and without unreasonable delay; or

(B) The market value of a commercially reasonable hypothetical
substitute transaction;

(iii) For performances not governed by (a)(i) of this subsection,
if the breach does not make possible a substitute transaction, lost profit,
including reasonable overhead, that the licensor would have realized on
acceptance and full payment for performance that was not delivered to the
licensee because of the licensee's breach; or

(iv) Damages calculated in any reasonable manner; and

(b) Consequential and incidental damages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 809. LICENSEE'S DAMAGES. (1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section and except as otherwise provided in
section 807 of this act, a breach of contract by a licensor entitles the
licensee to recover the following compensation for losses resulting in the
ordinary course from the breach or, if appropriate, as to the whole contract,
less expenses avoided as a result of the breach to the extent not otherwise
accounted for under this section:

(a) Damages measured in any combination of the following ways, but
not to exceed the market value of the performance that was the subject of the
breach plus restitution of any amounts paid for performance not received and
not accounted for within the indicated recovery:

(i) With respect to performance that has been accepted and the
acceptance not rightfully revoked, the value of the performance required less
the value of the performance accepted as of the time and place of acceptance;

(ii) With respect to performance that has not been rendered or that
was rightfully refused or acceptance of which was rightfully revoked:

(A) The amount of any payments made and the value of other
consideration given to the licensor with respect to that performance and not previously
returned to the licensee;

(B) The market value of the performance less the contract fee for
that performance; or

(C) The cost of a commercially reasonable substitute transaction
less the contract fee under the breached contract, if the substitute
transaction was entered into by the licensee in good faith and without
unreasonable delay for substantially similar information with the same
contractual use terms; or

(iii) Damages calculated in any reasonable manner; and

(b) Incidental and consequential damages.

(2) The amount of damages must be reduced by any unpaid contract
fees for performance by the licensor which has been accepted by the licensee
and as to which the acceptance has not been rightfully revoked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 810. RECOUPMENT. (1) Except
as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, an aggrieved party,
upon notifying the party in breach of contract of its intention to do so, may
deduct all or any part of the damages resulting from the breach from any
payments still due under the same contract.

(2) If a breach of contract is not material with reference to the
particular performance, an aggrieved party may exercise its rights under
subsection (1) of this section only if the agreement does not require further
affirmative performance by the other party and the amount of damages deducted
can be readily liquidated under the agreement.

SUBPART C. REMEDIES RELATED TO
PERFORMANCE

NEW SECTION. Sec. 811. SPECIFIC PERFORMANCE.
(1) Specific performance may be ordered:

(a) If the agreement provides for that remedy, other than an
obligation for the payment of money;

(b) If the contract was not for personal services and the agreed
performance is unique; or

(c) In other proper circumstances.

(2) An order for specific performance may contain any conditions
considered just and must provide adequate safeguards consistent with the
contract to protect the confidentiality of information, information, and informational
rights of both parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 812. COMPLETING PERFORMANCE.
(1) On breach of contract by a licensee, the licensor may:

(a) Identify to the contract any conforming copy not already
identified if, at the time the licensor learned of the breach, the copy was in
its possession;

(b) In the exercise of reasonable commercial judgment for purposes
of avoiding loss and effective realization on effort or investment, complete
the information and identify it to the contract, cease work on it, relicense or
dispose of it, or proceed in any other commercially reasonable manner; and

(c) Pursue any remedy for breach that has not been waived.

(2) On breach by a licensee, both parties remain bound by all
restrictions in contractual use terms, but the contractual use terms do not
apply to information or copies properly received or obtained from another
source.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 813. CONTINUING USE. On
breach of contract by a licensor, the following rules apply:

(1) A licensee that has not canceled the contract may continue to
use the information and informational rights under the contract. If the
licensee continues to use the information or informational rights, the licensee
is bound by all terms of the contract, including contractual use terms,
obligations not to compete, and obligations to pay contract fees.

(2) The licensee may pursue any remedy for breach which has not
been waived.

(3) The licensor's rights remain in effect but are subject to the
licensee's remedy for breach, including any right of recoupment or setoff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 814. DISCONTINUING ACCESS. On
material breach of an access contract or if the agreement so provides, a party
may discontinue all contractual rights of access of the party in breach and
direct any person that is assisting the performance of the contract to
discontinue its performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 815. RIGHT TO POSSESSION AND
TO PREVENT USE. (1) On cancellation of a license, the licensor has the right:

(a) To possession of all copies of the licensed information in the
possession or control of the licensee and any other materials pertaining to
that information which by contract are to be returned or delivered by the
licensee to the licensor; and

(b) To prevent the continued exercise of contractual and
informational rights in the licensed information under the license.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 814 of this act, a
licensor may exercise its rights under subsection (1) of this section without
judicial process only if this can be done:

(a) Without a breach of the peace;

(b) Without a foreseeable risk of personal injury or significant
physical damage to information or property other than the licensed information;
and

(c) In accordance with section 816 of this act.

(3) In a judicial proceeding, the court may enjoin a licensee in
breach of contract from continued use of the information and informational
rights and may order the licensor or a judicial officer to take the steps
described in section 618 of this act.

(4) A party has a right to an expedited judicial hearing on a
request for prejudgment relief to enforce or protect its rights under this
section.

(5) The right to possession under this section is not available to
the extent that the information, before breach of the license and in the
ordinary course of performance under the license, was so altered or commingled
that the information is no longer identifiable or separable.

(6) A licensee that provides information to a licensor subject to
contractual use terms has the rights and is subject to the limitations of a
licensor under this section with respect to the information it provides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 816. LIMITATIONS ON ELECTRONIC
SELF-HELP. (1) In this section, "electronic self-help" means the use
of electronic means to exercise a licensor's rights under section 815(2) of
this act.

(2) On cancellation of a license, electronic self-help is not
permitted, except as provided in this section. Electronic self-help is
prohibited in mass-market transactions.

(3) If the parties agree to permit electronic self-help, a licensee
shall separately manifest assent to a term authorizing use of electronic
self-help. The term must:

(a) Provide for notice of exercise as provided in subsection (4) of
this section;

(b) State the name of the person designated by the licensee to
which notice of exercise must be given and the manner in which notice must be
given and place to which notice must be sent to that person; and

(c) Provide a simple procedure for the licensee to change the
designated person or place.

(4) Before resorting to electronic self-help authorized by a term
of the license, the licensor shall give notice in a record to the person
designated by the licensee stating:

(a) That the licensor intends to resort to electronic self-help as
a remedy on or after fifteen days following receipt by the licensee of the
notice;

(b) The nature of the claimed breach that entitles the licensor to
resort to self-help; and

(c) The name, title, and address, including direct telephone
number, facsimile number, or e‑mail address, to which the licensee may
communicate concerning the claimed breach.

(5) A licensee may recover direct and incidental damages caused by
wrongful use of electronic self-help. The licensee may also recover
consequential damages for wrongful use of electronic self-help, whether or not
those damages are excluded by the terms of the license, if:

(a) Within the period specified in subsection (4)(a) of this
section, the licensee gives notice to the licensor's designated person
describing in good faith the general nature and magnitude of damages;

(b) The licensor has reason to know the damages of the type described
in subsection (6) of this section may result from the wrongful use of
electronic self-help; or

(c) The licensor does not provide the notice required in subsection
(4) of this section.

(6) Even if the licensor complies with subsections (3) and (4) of
this section, electronic self-help may not be used if the licensor has reason
to know that its use will result in substantial injury or harm to the public
health or safety or grave harm to the public interest substantially affecting
third persons not involved in the dispute.

(7) A court of competent jurisdiction of this state shall give
prompt consideration to a petition for injunctive relief and may enjoin,
temporarily or permanently, the licensor from exercising electronic self-help
even if authorized by a license term or enjoin the licensee from
misappropriation or misuse of computer information, as may be appropriate, upon
consideration of the following:

(a) Grave harm of the kinds stated in subsection (6) of this
section, or the threat thereof, whether or not the licensor has reason to know
of those circumstances;

(b) Irreparable harm or threat of irreparable harm to the licensee
or licensor;

(c) That the party seeking the relief is more likely than not to
succeed under its claim when it is finally adjudicated;

(d) That all of the conditions to entitle a person to the relief
under the laws of this state have been fulfilled; and

(e) That the party that may be adversely affected is adequately
protected against loss, including a loss because of misappropriation or misuse
of computer information, that it may suffer because the relief is granted under
this chapter.

(8) Before breach of contract, rights or obligations under this
section may not be waived or varied by an agreement, but the parties may prohibit
use of electronic self-help, and the parties, in the term referred to in
subsection (3) of this section, may specify additional provisions more
favorable to the licensee.

(9) This section does not apply if the licensor obtains possession
of a copy without a breach of the peace and the electronic self-help is used
solely with respect to that copy.

PART
9

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. SEVERABILITY. If any
provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is
held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications
of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. PREVIOUS RIGHTS AND
TRANSACTIONS. Contracts that are enforceable and rights of action that accrue
before the effective date of this act are governed by the law then in effect
unless the parties agree to be governed by this chapter.

PART
10

UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE
REVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. A new section is added
to Article 62A.1 RCW to read as follows:

CERTAIN COMPUTER INFORMATION TRANSACTIONS EXCLUDED FROM THIS
ARTICLE. This Article does not apply to a transaction that is covered by
chapter 63.-- RCW (sections 101 through 902 of this act) as provided in section
103 or 104 of this act.

Sec. 1002. RCW 62A.1-107 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 1-107 are each amended to read as follows:

WAIVER OR RENUNCIATION OF CLAIM OR RIGHT AFTER BREACH. Any claim
or right arising out of an alleged breach can be discharged in whole or in part
without consideration by a ((written)) waiver or renunciation ((signed))
authenticated and delivered by the aggrieved party in a record.

Sec. 1003. RCW 62A.1-201 and 2001 c
32 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

GENERAL DEFINITIONS. Subject to additional definitions contained
in the subsequent Articles of this Title which are applicable to specific
Articles or Parts thereof, and unless the context otherwise requires, in this
Title:

(1) "Action" in the sense of a judicial proceeding
includes recoupment, counterclaim, set-off, suit in equity and any other
proceedings in which rights are determined.

(2) "Aggrieved party" means a party entitled to resort to
a remedy.

(3) "Agreement" means the bargain of the parties in fact
as found in their language or by implication from other circumstances including
course of dealing or usage of trade or course of performance as provided in
this Title (RCW 62A.1-205, RCW 62A.2-208, and RCW 62A.2A‑207). Whether
an agreement has legal consequences is determined by the provisions of this
Title, if applicable; otherwise by the law of contracts (RCW 62A.1-103).
(Compare "Contract".)

(4) "Authenticate" means:

(a) To sign; or

(b) With the intent to sign a record, otherwise to execute or
adopt an electronic symbol, sound, message, or process referring to, attached
to, included in, or logically associated or linked with, that record.

(5) "Bank" means any person engaged in the
business of banking.

(((5))) (6) "Bearer" means the person in
possession of an instrument, document of title, or certificated security
payable to bearer or indorsed in blank.

(((6))) (7) "Bill of lading" means a
document evidencing the receipt of goods for shipment issued by a person
engaged in the business of transporting or forwarding goods, and includes an
airbill. "Airbill" means a document serving for air transportation
as a bill of lading does for marine or rail transportation, and includes an air
consignment note or air waybill.

(((7))) (8) "Branch" includes a separately
incorporated foreign branch of a bank.

(((8))) (9) "Burden of establishing" a fact
means the burden of persuading the triers of fact that the existence of the
fact is more probable than its non-existence.

(((9))) (10) "Buyer in ordinary course of
business" means a person that buys goods in good faith, without knowledge
that the sale violates the rights of another person in the goods, and in the
ordinary course from a person, other than a pawnbroker, in the business of
selling goods of that kind. A person buys goods in the ordinary course if the
sale to the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind
of business in which the seller is engaged or with the seller's own usual or
customary practices. A person that sells oil, gas, or other minerals at the
wellhead or minehead is a person in the business of selling goods of that
kind. A buyer in ordinary course of business may buy for cash, by exchange of
other property, or on secured or unsecured credit, and may acquire goods or
documents of title under a pre-existing contract for sale. Only a buyer that
takes possession of the goods or has a right to recover the goods from the
seller under Article 62A.2 RCW may be a buyer in ordinary course of business.
A person that acquires goods in a transfer in bulk or as security for or in
total or partial satisfaction of a money debt is not a buyer in ordinary course
of business.

(((10))) (11) "Conspicuous": A term or
clause is conspicuous when it is so written that a reasonable person against
whom it is to operate ought to have noticed it. A printed heading in capitals
(as: NON-NEGOTIABLE BILL OF LADING) is conspicuous. Language in the body of a
form is "conspicuous" if it is in larger or other contrasting type or
color. But in a telegram any stated term is "conspicuous". Whether
a term or clause is "conspicuous" or not is for decision by the
court.

(((11))) (12) "Contract" means the total
legal obligation which results from the parties' agreement as affected by this
Title and any other applicable rules of law. (Compare "Agreement".)

(((12))) (13) "Creditor" includes a general
creditor, a secured creditor, a lien creditor and any representative of
creditors, including an assignee for the benefit of creditors, a trustee in
bankruptcy, a receiver in equity and an executor or administrator of an
insolvent debtor's or assignor's estate.

(((13))) (14) "Defendant" includes a person
in the position of defendant in a cross-action or counterclaim.

(((14))) (15) "Delivery" with respect to
instruments, documents of title, chattel paper, or certificated securities
means voluntary transfer of possession.

(((15))) (16) "Document of title" includes
bill of lading, dock warrant, dock receipt, warehouse receipt or order for the
delivery of goods, and also any other document which in the regular course of
business or financing is treated as adequately evidencing that the person in
possession of it is entitled to receive, hold and dispose of the document and
the goods it covers. To be a document of title a document must purport to be
issued by or addressed to a bailee and purport to cover goods in the bailee's
possession which are either identified or are fungible portions of an
identified mass.

(((16))) (17) "Fault" means wrongful act,
omission or breach.

(((17))) (18) "Fungible" with respect to
goods or securities means goods or securities of which any unit is, by nature
or usage of trade, the equivalent of any other like unit. Goods which are not
fungible shall be deemed fungible for the purposes of this Title to the extent
that under a particular agreement or document unlike units are treated as
equivalents.

(((18))) (19) "Genuine" means free of
forgery or counterfeiting.

(((19))) (20) "Good faith" means honesty in
fact in the conduct or transaction concerned.

(((20))) (21) "Holder" with respect to a
negotiable instrument, means the person in possession if the instrument is
payable to bearer or, in the case of an instrument payable to an identified
person, if the identified person is in possession. "Holder" with
respect to a document of title means the person in possession if the goods are
deliverable to bearer or to the order of the person in possession.

(((21))) (22) To "honor" is to pay or to
accept and pay, or where a credit so engages to purchase or discount a draft
complying with the terms of the credit.

(((22))) (23) "Insolvency proceedings"
includes any assignment for the benefit of creditors or other proceedings
intended to liquidate or rehabilitate the estate of the person involved.

(((23))) (24) A person is "insolvent" who
either has ceased to pay his or her debts in the ordinary course of business or
cannot pay his or her debts as they become due or is insolvent within the
meaning of the federal bankruptcy law.

(((24))) (25) "Money" means a medium of
exchange authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government and includes
a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or
by agreement between two or more nations.

(((25))) (26) A person has "notice" of a
fact when

(a) he or she has actual knowledge of it; or

(b) he or she has received a notice or notification of it; or

(c) from all the facts and circumstances known to him or her at the
time in question he or she has reason to know that it exists.

A person "knows" or has "knowledge" of a fact when
he or she has actual knowledge of it. "Discover" or
"learn" or a word or phrase of similar import refers to knowledge
rather than to reason to know. The time and circumstances under which a notice
or notification may cease to be effective are not determined by this Title.

(((26))) (27) A person "notifies" or
"gives" a notice or notification to another by taking such steps as
may be reasonably required to inform the other in ordinary course whether or
not such other actually comes to know of it. A person "receives" a
notice or notification when

(a) it comes to his or her attention; or

(b) it is duly delivered at the place of business through which the
contract was made or at any other place held out by him or her as the place for
receipt of such communications.

(((27))) (28) Notice, knowledge or a notice or
notification received by an organization is effective for a particular
transaction from the time when it is brought to the attention of the individual
conducting that transaction, and in any event from the time when it would have
been brought to his or her attention if the organization had exercised due
diligence. An organization exercises due diligence if it maintains reasonable
routines for communicating significant information to the person conducting the
transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Due
diligence does not require an individual acting for the organization to
communicate information unless such communication is part of his or her regular
duties or unless he or she has reason to know of the transaction and that the
transaction would be materially affected by the information.

(((28))) (29) "Organization" includes a
corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership or association, two or more persons having a joint
or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(((29))) (30) "Party", as distinct from
"third party", means a person who has engaged in a transaction or
made an agreement within this Title.

(((30))) (31) "Person" includes an
individual or an organization (See RCW 62A.1-102).

(((31))) (32) "Presumption" or
"presumed" means that the trier of fact must find the existence of
the fact presumed unless and until evidence is introduced which would support a
finding of its nonexistence.

(((32))) (33) "Purchase" includes taking by
sale, discount, negotiation, mortgage, pledge, lien, security interest, issue
or re-issue, gift or any other voluntary transaction creating an interest in
property.

(((33))) (34) "Purchaser" means a person
who takes by purchase.

(((34))) (35) "Record" means information that
is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(36) "Remedy" means any remedial right to which an
aggrieved party is entitled with or without resort to a tribunal.

(((35))) (37) "Representative" includes an
agent, an officer of a corporation or association, and a trustee, executor or
administrator of an estate, or any other person empowered to act for another.

(((36))) (38) "Rights" includes remedies.

(((37))) (39) "Security interest" means an
interest in personal property or fixtures which secures payment or performance
of an obligation, except for lease-purchase agreements under chapter 63.19
RCW. The term also includes any interest of a consignor and a buyer of
accounts, chattel paper, a payment intangible, or a promissory note in a
transaction that is subject to Article 9A. The special property interest of a
buyer of goods on identification of such goods to a contract for sale under RCW
62A.2-401 is not a "security interest", but a buyer may also acquire
a "security interest" by complying with Article 9A. Except as
otherwise provided in RCW 62A.2-505, the right of a seller or lessor of goods
under Article 2 or 2A to retain or acquire possession of the goods is not a
"security interest," but a seller or lessor may also acquire a
"security interest" by complying with Article 9A. The retention or
reservation of title by a seller of goods notwithstanding shipment or delivery
to the buyer (RCW 62A.2-401) is limited in effect to a reservation of a
"security interest."

Whether a transaction creates a lease or security interest is
determined by the facts of each case. However, a transaction creates a
security interest if the consideration the lessee is to pay the lessor for the
right to possession and use of the goods is an obligation for the term of the
lease not subject to termination by the lessee, and:

(a) The original term of the lease is equal to or greater than the
remaining economic life of the goods;

(b) The lessee is bound to renew the lease for the remaining
economic life of the goods or is bound to become the owner of the goods;

(c) The lessee has an option to renew the lease for the remaining
economic life of the goods for no additional consideration or nominal
additional consideration upon compliance with the lease agreement; or

(d) The lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for
no additional consideration or nominal additional consideration upon compliance
with the lease agreement.

A transaction does not create a security interest merely because it
provides that:

(a) The present value of the consideration the lessee is obligated
to pay the lessor for the right to possession and use of the goods is
substantially equal to or is greater than the fair market value of the goods at
the time the lease is entered into;

(b) The lessee assumes risk of loss of the goods, or agrees to pay
taxes, insurance, filing, recording, or registration fees, or service or
maintenance costs with respect to the goods;

(c) The lessee has an option to renew the lease or to become the
owner of the goods;

(d) The lessee has an option to renew the lease for a fixed rent
that is equal to or greater than the reasonably predictable fair market rent
for the use of the goods for the term of the renewal at the time the option is
to be performed;

(e) The lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for a
fixed price that is equal to or greater than the reasonably predictable fair
market value of the goods at the time the option is to be performed; or

(f) The amount of rental payments may or will be increased or
decreased by reference to the amount realized by the lessor upon sale or
disposition of the goods.

For purposes of this subsection (((37))) (39):

(a) Additional consideration is not nominal if (i) when the option
to renew the lease is granted to the lessee the rent is stated to be the fair
market rent for the use of the goods for the term of the renewal determined at
the time the option is to be performed, or (ii) when the option to become the
owner of the goods is granted to the lessee the price is stated to be the fair
market value of the goods determined at the time the option is to be
performed. Additional consideration is nominal if it is less than the lessee's
reasonably predictable cost of performing under the lease agreement if the
option is not exercised;

(b) "Reasonably predictable" and "remaining economic
life of the goods" are to be determined with reference to the facts and
circumstances at the time the transaction is entered into; and

(c) "Present value" means the amount as of a date certain
of one or more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain. The
discount is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties if the
rate is not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction is entered
into; otherwise, the discount is determined by a commercially reasonable rate
that takes into account the facts and circumstances of each case at the time
the transaction was entered into.

(((38))) (40) "Send" in connection with any
((writing)) record or notice means to deposit in the mail or
deliver for transmission by any other usual means of communication with postage
or cost of transmission provided for and properly addressed and in the case of
an instrument to an address specified thereon or otherwise agreed, or if there
be none to any address reasonable under the circumstances. The receipt of any
((writing)) record or notice within the time at which it would
have arrived if properly sent has the effect of a proper sending.

(((39))) (41) "Signed" includes any symbol
executed or adopted by a party with present intention to authenticate a ((writing))
record.

(((40))) (42) "Surety" includes guarantor.

(((41))) (43) "Telegram" includes a message
transmitted by radio, teletype, cable, any mechanical method of transmission,
or the like.

(((42))) (44) "Term" means that portion of
an agreement which relates to a particular matter.

(((43))) (45) "Unauthorized" signature
means one made without actual, implied or apparent authority and includes a
forgery.

(((44))) (46) "Value". Except as otherwise
provided with respect to negotiable instruments and bank collections (RCW
62A.3-303, RCW 62A.4‑210, and RCW 62A.4-211) a person gives
"value" for rights if he or she acquires them

(a) in return for a binding commitment to extend credit or for the
extension of immediately available credit whether or not drawn upon and whether
or not a charge-back is provided for in the event of difficulties in
collection; or

(b) as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a
preexisting claim; or

(c) by accepting delivery pursuant to a pre-existing contract for
purchase; or

(d) generally, in return for any consideration sufficient to
support a simple contract.

(((45))) (47) "Warehouse receipt" means a
receipt issued by a person engaged in the business of storing goods for hire.

(((46))) (48) "Written" or
"writing" includes printing, typewriting or any other intentional
reduction to tangible form.

Sec. 1004. RCW 62A.1-205 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 1-205 are each amended to read as follows:

COURSE OF DEALING AND USAGE OF TRADE. (1) A course of dealing is a
sequence of previous conduct between the parties to a particular transaction
which is fairly to be regarded as establishing a common basis of understanding
for interpreting their expressions and other conduct.

(2) A usage of trade is any practice or method of dealing having
such regularity of observance in a place, vocation or trade as to justify an
expectation that it will be observed with respect to the transaction in
question. The existence and scope of such a usage are to be proved as facts.
If it is established that such a usage is embodied in a ((written))
trade code or similar ((writing)) record the interpretation of
the ((writing)) record is for the court.

(3) A course of dealing between parties and any usage of trade in
the vocation or trade in which they are engaged or of which they are or should
be aware give particular meaning to and supplement or qualify terms of an
agreement.

(4) The express terms of an agreement and an applicable course of
dealing or usage of trade shall be construed wherever reasonable as consistent
with each other; but when such construction is unreasonable express terms control
both course of dealing and usage of trade and course of dealing controls usage
of trade.

(5) An applicable usage of trade in the place where any part of
performance is to occur shall be used in interpreting the agreement as to that
part of the performance.

(6) Evidence of a relevant usage of trade offered by one party is
not admissible unless and until he or she has given the other party such
notice as the court finds sufficient to prevent unfair surprise to the latter.

Sec. 1005. RCW 62A.1-206 and 1995 c
48 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

STATUTE OF FRAUDS FOR KINDS OF PERSONAL PROPERTY NOT OTHERWISE
COVERED. (1) Except in the cases described in subsection (2) of this section a
contract for the sale of personal property is not enforceable by way of action
or defense beyond five thousand dollars in amount or value of remedy unless
there is some ((writing)) record which indicates that a contract
for sale has been made between the parties at a defined or stated price,
reasonably identifies the subject matter, and is ((signed)) authenticated
by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by his or her
authorized agent.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to contracts for
the sale of goods (RCW 62A.2-201) nor of securities (RCW 62A.8-113) nor to
security agreements (RCW ((62A.9-203)) 62A.9A-203).

Sec. 1006. RCW 62A.2-102 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-102 are each amended to read as follows:

SCOPE; CERTAIN SECURITY, COMPUTER INFORMATION, AND OTHER
TRANSACTIONS EXCLUDED FROM THIS ARTICLE. Unless the context otherwise
requires, this Article applies to transactions in goods; it does not apply to
any transaction which although in the form of an unconditional contract to sell
or present sale is intended to operate only as a security transaction nor does
this Article impair or repeal any statute regulating sales to consumers,
farmers or other specified classes of buyers. This Article does not apply
to a transaction that is covered by chapter 63.-- RCW (sections 101 through 902
of this act) as provided in section 103 or 104 of this act.

Sec. 1007. RCW 62A.2-105 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-105 are each amended to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS: TRANSFERABILITY; "GOODS";
"FUTURE" GOODS; "LOT"; "COMMERCIAL UNIT". (1)
"Goods" means all things (including specially manufactured goods)
which are movable at the time of identification to the contract for sale other
than the money in which the price is to be paid, investment securities (Article
8) and things in action. "Goods" also includes the unborn young of
animals and growing crops and other identified things attached to realty as
described in the section on goods to be severed from realty (RCW 62A.2-107). For
purposes of this Article, the term does not include computer information as
defined in chapter 63.-- RCW (sections 101 through 902 of this act), money, the
subject matter of foreign exchange transactions, documents, letters of credit,
letter-of-credit rights, instruments, investment property, accounts, chattel
paper, deposit accounts, or general intangibles.

(2) Goods must be both existing and identified before any interest
in them can pass. Goods which are not both existing and identified are "future"
goods. A purported present sale of future goods or of any interest therein
operates as a contract to sell.

(3) There may be a sale of a part interest in existing identified
goods.

(4) An undivided share in an identified bulk of fungible goods is
sufficiently identified to be sold although the quantity of the bulk is not
determined. Any agreed proportion of such a bulk or any quantity thereof
agreed upon by number, weight or other measure may to the extent of the
seller's interest in the bulk be sold to the buyer who then becomes an owner in
common.

(5) "Lot" means a parcel or a single article which is the
subject matter of a separate sale or delivery, whether or not it is sufficient
to perform the contract.

(6) "Commercial unit" means such a unit of goods as by
commercial usage is a single whole for purposes of sale and division of which
materially impairs its character or value on the market or in use. A
commercial unit may be a single article (as a machine) or a set of articles (as
a suite of furniture or an assortment of sizes) or a quantity (as a bale,
gross, or carload) or any other unit treated in use or in the relevant market
as a single whole.

Sec. 1008. RCW 62A.2-201 and 1965
ex.s c 157 s 2-201 are each amended to read as follows:

FORMAL REQUIREMENTS; STATUTE OF FRAUDS. (1) Except as otherwise
provided in this section a contract for the sale of goods for the price of five
hundred dollars or more is not enforceable by way of action or defense unless
there is some ((writing)) record sufficient to indicate that a
contract for sale has been made between the parties and ((signed)) authenticated
by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by his or her
authorized agent or broker. A ((writing)) record is not
insufficient because it omits or incorrectly states a term agreed upon but the
contract is not enforceable under this paragraph beyond the quantity of goods
shown in such ((writing)) record.

(2) Between merchants if within a reasonable time a ((writing))
record in confirmation of the contract and sufficient against the sender
is received and the party receiving it has reason to know its contents, it
satisfies the requirements of subsection (1) against such party unless ((written))
notice of objection to its contents is given in a record within ten days
after it is received.

(3) A contract which does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection (1) but which is valid in other respects is enforceable

(a) if the goods are to be specially manufactured for the buyer and
are not suitable for sale to others in the ordinary course of the seller's
business and the seller, before notice of repudiation is received and under
circumstances which reasonably indicate that the goods are for the buyer, has
made either a substantial beginning of their manufacture or commitments for
their procurement; or

(b) if the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in his or
her pleading, testimony or otherwise in court that a contract for sale was
made, but the contract is not enforceable under this provision beyond the
quantity of goods admitted; or

(c) with respect to goods for which payment
has been made and accepted or which have been received and accepted (RCW 62A.2-606).

Sec. 1009. RCW 62A.2-202 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-202 are each amended to read as follows:

FINAL ((WRITTEN)) EXPRESSION IN A RECORD: PAROL OR
EXTRINSIC EVIDENCE. Terms with respect to which the confirmatory ((memoranda))
records of the parties agree or which are otherwise set forth in a ((writing))
record intended by the parties as a final expression of their agreement
with respect to such terms as are included therein may not be contradicted by
evidence of any prior agreement or of a contemporaneous oral agreement but may
be explained or supplemented

(a) by course of dealing or usage of trade (RCW 62A.1-205) or by
course of performance (RCW 62A.2-208); and

(b) by evidence of consistent additional terms unless the court
finds the ((writing)) record to have been intended also as a
complete and exclusive statement of the terms of the agreement.

Sec. 1010. RCW 62A.2-203 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-203 are each amended to read as follows:

SEALS INOPERATIVE. The affixing of a seal to
a ((writing)) record evidencing a contract for sale or an offer
to buy or sell goods does not constitute the ((writing)) record a
sealed instrument and the law with respect to sealed instruments does not apply
to such contract or offer.

Sec. 1011. RCW 62A.2-205 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-205 are each amended to read as follows:

FIRM OFFERS. An offer by a merchant to buy or sell goods in ((a
signed writing)) an authenticated record which by its terms gives
assurance that it will be held open is not revocable, for lack of
consideration, during the time stated or if no time is stated for a reasonable
time, but in no event may such period of irrevocability exceed three months;
but any such term of assurance on a form supplied by the offeree must be
separately ((signed)) authenticated by the offeror.

Sec. 1012. RCW 62A.2-207 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-207 are each amended to read as follows:

ADDITIONAL TERMS IN ACCEPTANCE OR CONFIRMATION. (1) A definite and
seasonable expression of acceptance or a ((written)) confirmation by
a record which is sent within a reasonable time operates as an acceptance
even though it states terms additional to or different from those offered or
agreed upon, unless acceptance is expressly made conditional on assent to the
additional or different terms.

(2) The additional terms are to be construed as proposals for
addition to the contract. Between merchants such terms become part of the
contract unless:

(a) the offer expressly limits acceptance to the terms of the
offer;

(b) they materially alter it; or

(c) notification of objection to them has already been given or is
given within a reasonable time after notice of them is received.

(3) Conduct by both parties which recognizes the existence of a
contract is sufficient to establish a contract for sale although the ((writings))
records of the parties do not otherwise establish a contract. In such
case the terms of the particular contract consist of those terms on which the
((writings)) records of the parties agree, together with any
supplementary terms incorporated under any other provisions of this Title.

Sec. 1013. RCW 62A.2-209 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-209 are each amended to read as follows:

MODIFICATION, RESCISSION AND WAIVER. (1) An agreement modifying a
contract within this Article needs no consideration to be binding.

(2) ((A signed)) An authenticated agreement which
excludes modification or rescission except by ((a signed writing)) an
authenticated record cannot be otherwise modified or rescinded, but except
as between merchants such a requirement on a form supplied by the merchant must
be separately ((signed)) authenticated by the other party.

(3) The requirements of the statute of frauds section of this
Article (RCW 62A.2-201) must be satisfied if the contract as modified is within
its provisions.

(4) Although an attempt at modification or rescission does not
satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) it can operate as a waiver.

(5) A party who has made a waiver affecting an executory portion of
the contract may retract the waiver by reasonable notification received by the
other party that strict performance will be required of any term waived, unless
the retraction would be unjust in view of a material change of position in
reliance on the waiver.

Sec. 1014. RCW 62A.2-316 and 1982 c
199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

EXCLUSION OR MODIFICATION OF WARRANTIES. (1) Words or conduct
relevant to the creation of an express warranty and words or conduct tending to
negate or limit warranty shall be construed wherever reasonable as consistent
with each other; but subject to the provisions of this Article on parol or
extrinsic evidence (RCW 62A.2-202) negation or limitation is inoperative to the
extent that such construction is unreasonable.

(2) Subject to subsection (3), to exclude or modify the implied
warranty of merchantability or any part of it the language must mention
merchantability and in case of a ((writing)) record must be
conspicuous, and to exclude or modify any implied warranty of fitness the
exclusion must be by a ((writing)) record and conspicuous.
Language to exclude all implied warranties of fitness is sufficient if it
states, for example, that "There are no warranties which extend beyond the
description on the face hereof."

(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)

(a) unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied
warranties are excluded by expressions like "as is", "with all faults"
or other language which in common understanding calls the buyer's attention to
the exclusion of warranties and makes plain that there is no implied warranty;
and

(b) when the buyer before entering into the contract has examined
the goods or the sample or model as fully as he or she desired or has
refused to examine the goods there is no implied warranty with regard to
defects which an examination ought in the circumstances to have revealed to him
or her;

(c) an implied warranty can also be excluded or modified by course
of dealing or course of performance or usage of trade; and

(d) in sales of livestock, including but not limited to, horses,
mules, cattle, sheep, swine, goats, poultry, and rabbits, there are no implied
warranties as defined in this article that the livestock are free from sickness
or disease: PROVIDED, That the seller has complied with all state and federal
laws and regulations that apply to animal health and disease, and the seller is
not guilty of fraud, deceit or misrepresentation.

(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsections (2) and (3) of this section and the provisions of RCW 62A.2-719, ((as
now or hereafter amended,)) in any case where goods are purchased primarily
for personal, family or household use and not for commercial or business use,
disclaimers of the warranty of merchantability or fitness for particular
purpose shall not be effective to limit the liability of merchant sellers
except insofar as the disclaimer sets forth with particularity the qualities
and characteristics which are not being warranted. Remedies for breach of
warranty can be limited in accordance with the provisions of this Article on
liquidation or limitation of damages and on contractual modification of remedy
(RCW 62A.2-718 and RCW 62A.2-719).

Sec. 1015. RCW 62A.2-503 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-503 are each amended to read as follows:

MANNER OF SELLER'S TENDER OF DELIVERY. (1) Tender of delivery
requires that the seller put and hold conforming goods at the buyer's
disposition and give the buyer any notification reasonably necessary to enable
him or her to take delivery. The manner, time and place for tender are
determined by the agreement and this Article, and in particular

(a) tender must be at a reasonable hour, and if it is of goods they
must be kept available for the period reasonably necessary to enable the buyer
to take possession; but

(b) unless otherwise agreed the buyer must furnish facilities
reasonably suited to the receipt of the goods.

(2) Where the case is within the next section respecting shipment
tender requires that the seller comply with its provisions.

(3) Where the seller is required to deliver at a particular
destination tender requires that he or she comply with subsection (1)
and also in any appropriate case tender documents as described in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section.

(4) Where goods are in the possession of a bailee and are to be
delivered without being moved

(a) tender requires that the seller either tender a negotiable
document of title covering such goods or procure acknowledgment by the bailee
of the buyer's right to possession of the goods; but

(b) tender to the buyer of a non-negotiable document of title or of
a ((written direction to)) record directing the bailee to deliver
is sufficient tender unless the buyer seasonably objects, and receipt by the
bailee of notification of the buyer's rights fixes those rights as against the
bailee and all third persons; but risk of loss of the goods and of any failure
by the bailee to honor the non-negotiable document of title or to obey the
direction remains on the seller until the buyer has had a reasonable time to
present the document or direction, and a refusal by the bailee to honor the document
or to obey the direction defeats the tender.

(5) Where the contract requires the seller to deliver documents

(a) he or she must tender all such documents in correct
form, except as provided in this Article with respect to bills of lading in a
set (subsection (2) of RCW 62A.2-323); and

(b) tender through customary banking channels is sufficient and
dishonor of a draft accompanying the documents constitutes non-acceptance or
rejection.

Sec. 1016. RCW 62A.2-509 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-509 are each amended to read as follows:

RISK OF LOSS IN THE ABSENCE OF BREACH. (1) Where the contract
requires or authorizes the seller to ship the goods by carrier

(a) if it does not require him or her to deliver them at a
particular destination, the risk of loss passes to the buyer when the goods are
duly delivered to the carrier even though the shipment is under reservation
(RCW 62A.2-505); but

(b) if it does require him or her to deliver them at a
particular destination and the goods are there duly tendered while in the
possession of the carrier, the risk of loss passes to the buyer when the goods
are there duly so tendered as to enable the buyer to take delivery.

(2) Where the goods are held by a bailee to be delivered without being
moved, the risk of loss passes to the buyer

(a) on his or her receipt of a negotiable document of title
covering the goods; or

(b) on acknowledgment by the bailee of the buyer's right to
possession of the goods; or

(c) after his or her receipt of a non-negotiable document of
title or other ((written)) direction by record to deliver, as
provided in subsection (4)(b) of RCW 62A.2-503.

(3) In any case not within subsection (1) or (2), the risk of loss
passes to the buyer on his or her receipt of the goods if the seller is
a merchant; otherwise the risk passes to the buyer on tender of delivery.

(4) The provisions of this section are subject to contrary
agreement of the parties and to the provisions of this Article on sale on
approval (RCW 62A.2-327) and on effect of breach on risk of loss (RCW
62A.2-510).

Sec. 1017. RCW 62A.2-605 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-605 are each amended to read as follows:

WAIVER OF BUYER'S OBJECTIONS BY FAILURE TO PARTICULARIZE. (1) The
buyer's failure to state in connection with rejection a particular defect which
is ascertainable by reasonable inspection precludes him or her from
relying on the unstated defect to justify rejection or to establish breach

(a) where the seller could have cured it if stated seasonably; or

(b) between merchants when the seller has after rejection made a
request in ((writing)) a record for a full and final ((written))
statement in a record of all defects on which the buyer proposes to
rely.

(2) Payment against documents made without reservation of rights
precludes recovery of the payment for defects apparent on the face of the
documents.

Sec. 1018. RCW 62A.2-606 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-606 are each amended to read as follows:

WHAT CONSTITUTES ACCEPTANCE OF GOODS. (1) Acceptance of goods
occurs when the buyer

(a) after a reasonable opportunity to inspect the goods signifies
to the seller that the goods are conforming or that he or she will take
or retain them in spite of their non-conformity; or

(b) fails to make an effective rejection (subsection (1) of RCW
62A.2-602), but such acceptance does not occur until the buyer has had a
reasonable opportunity to inspect them; or

(c) does any act inconsistent with the seller's ownership; but if
such act is wrongful as against the seller it is an acceptance only if ratified
by him or her.

(2) Acceptance of a part of any commercial unit is acceptance of
that entire unit.

Sec. 1019. RCW 62A.2-607 and 1965 ex.s.
c 157 s 2-607 are each amended to read as follows:

EFFECT OF ACCEPTANCE; NOTICE OF BREACH; BURDEN OF ESTABLISHING
BREACH AFTER ACCEPTANCE; NOTICE OF CLAIM OR LITIGATION TO PERSON ANSWERABLE
OVER. (1) The buyer must pay at the contract rate for any goods accepted.

(2) Acceptance of goods by the buyer precludes rejection of the
goods accepted and if made with knowledge of a non-conformity cannot be revoked
because of it unless the acceptance was on the reasonable assumption that the
non-conformity would be seasonably cured but acceptance does not of itself
impair any other remedy provided by this Article for non-conformity.

(3) Where a tender has been accepted

(a) the buyer must within a reasonable time after he or she
discovers or should have discovered any breach notify the seller of breach or
be barred from any remedy; and

(b) if the claim is one for infringement or the like (subsection
(3) of RCW 62A.2-312) and the buyer is sued as a result of such a breach he or
she must so notify the seller within a reasonable time after he or she
receives notice of the litigation or be barred from any remedy over for
liability established by the litigation.

(4) The burden is on the buyer to establish any breach with respect
to the goods accepted.

(5) Where the buyer is sued for breach of a warranty or other
obligation for which his or her seller is answerable over

(a) he or she may give his or her seller ((written))
notice of the litigation in a record. If the notice states that the
seller may come in and defend and that if the seller does not do so he or
she will be bound in any action against him or her by his or her
buyer by any determination of fact common to the two litigations, then unless
the seller after seasonable receipt of the notice does come in and defend he or
she is so bound.

(b) if the claim is one for infringement or the like (subsection
(3) of RCW 62A.2-312) the original seller may demand in ((writing)) a
record that his or her buyer turn over to him or her control
of the litigation including settlement or else be barred from any remedy over
and if he or she also agrees to bear all expense and to satisfy any
adverse judgment, then unless the buyer after seasonable receipt of the demand
does turn over control the buyer is so barred.

(6) The provisions of subsections (3), (4) and (5) apply to any
obligation of a buyer to hold the seller harmless against infringement or the
like (subsection (3) of RCW 62A.2-312).

Sec. 1020. RCW 62A.2-609 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-609 are each amended to read as follows:

RIGHT TO ADEQUATE ASSURANCE OF PERFORMANCE. (1) A contract for
sale imposes an obligation on each party that the other's expectation of
receiving due performance will not be impaired. When reasonable grounds for
insecurity arise with respect to the performance of either party the other may
in ((writing)) a record demand adequate assurance of due
performance and until he or she receives such assurance may if
commercially reasonable suspend any performance for which he or she has
not already received the agreed return.

(2) Between merchants the reasonableness of grounds for insecurity
and the adequacy of any assurance offered shall be determined according to
commercial standards.

(3) Acceptance of any improper delivery or payment does not
prejudice the aggrieved party's right to demand adequate assurance of future
performance.

(4) After receipt of a justified demand failure to provide within a
reasonable time not exceeding thirty days such assurance of due performance as
is adequate under the circumstances of the particular case is a repudiation of
the contract.

Sec. 1021. RCW 62A.2-616 and 1965
ex.s. c 157 s 2-616 are each amended to read as follows:

PROCEDURE ON NOTICE CLAIMING EXCUSE. (1) Where the buyer receives
notification of a material or indefinite delay or an allocation justified under
the preceding section he or she may by ((written)) notification in
a record to the seller as to any delivery concerned, and where the
prospective deficiency substantially impairs the value of the whole contract
under the provisions of this Article relating to breach of installment
contracts (RCW 62A.2-612), then also as to the whole,

(a) terminate and thereby discharge any unexecuted portion of the
contract; or

(b) modify the contract by agreeing to take his or her
available quota in substitution.

(2) If after receipt of such notification from the seller the buyer
fails so to modify the contract within a reasonable time not exceeding thirty
days the contract lapses with respect to any deliveries affected.

Sec. 1022. RCW 62A.2-702 and 1981 c
41 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

SELLER'S REMEDIES ON DISCOVERY OF BUYER'S INSOLVENCY. (1) Where
the seller discovers the buyer to be insolvent he or she may refuse
delivery except for cash including payment for all goods theretofore delivered
under the contract, and stop delivery under this Article (RCW 62A.2-705).

(2) Where the seller discovers that the buyer has received goods on
credit while insolvent he or she may reclaim the goods upon demand made
within ten days after the receipt, but if misrepresentation of solvency has
been made to the particular seller in ((writing)) a record within
three months before delivery the ten day limitation does not apply. Except as
provided in this subsection the seller may not base a right to reclaim goods on
the buyer's fraudulent or innocent misrepresentation of solvency or of intent
to pay.

(3) The seller's right to reclaim under
subsection (2) is subject to the rights of a buyer in ordinary course or other
good faith purchaser under this Article (RCW 62A.2-403). Successful
reclamation of goods excludes all other remedies with respect to them.

Sec. 1023. RCW 62A.2A-102 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-102 are each amended to read as follows:

SCOPE; CERTAIN COMPUTER INFORMATION TRANSACTIONS EXCLUDED FROM
THIS ARTICLE. This Article applies to any transaction, regardless of form,
that creates a lease. This Article does not apply to a transaction that is
covered by chapter 63.-- RCW (sections 101 through 902 of this act) as provided
in section 103 or 104 of this act.

Sec. 1024. RCW 62A.2A-103 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-808 are each amended to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS AND INDEX OF DEFINITIONS. (1) In this Article unless
the context otherwise requires:

(a) "Buyer in ordinary course of business" means a person
who in good faith and without knowledge that the sale to him or her is in
violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold interest of
a third party in the goods buys in ordinary course from a person in the
business of selling goods of that kind but does not include a pawnbroker.
"Buying" may be for cash, or by exchange of other property, or on
secured or unsecured credit, and includes receiving goods or documents of title
under a preexisting contract for sale but does not include a transfer in bulk
or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.

(b) "Cancellation" occurs when either party puts an end
to the lease contract for default by the other party.

(c) "Commercial unit" means such a unit of goods as by
commercial usage is a single whole for purposes of lease and division of which
materially impairs its character or value on the market or in use. A
commercial unit may be a single article, as a machine, or a set of articles, as
a suite of furniture or a line of machinery, or a quantity, as a gross or
carload, or any other unit treated in use or in the relevant market as a single
whole.

(d) "Conforming" goods or performance under a lease
contract means goods or performance that are in accordance with the obligations
under the lease contract.

(e) "Consumer lease" means a lease that a lessor
regularly engaged in the business of leasing or selling makes to a lessee who
is an individual who takes under the lease primarily for a personal, family, or
household purpose, if the total payments to be made under the lease contract,
excluding payments for options to renew or buy, do not exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars.

(f) "Fault" means wrongful act, omission, breach, or
default.

(g) "Finance lease" means a lease with respect to which:

(i) The lessor does not select, manufacture, or supply the goods;

(ii) The lessor acquires the goods or the right to possession and
use of the goods in connection with the lease; and

(iii) Only in the case of a consumer lease, either:

(A) The lessee receives a copy of the contract by which the lessor
acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods before ((signing))
authenticating the lease contract;

(B) The lessee's approval of the contract by which the lessor
acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods is a
condition to effectiveness of the lease contract; or

(C) The lessee, before ((signing)) authenticating the
lease contract, receives an accurate and complete statement designating the
promises and warranties, and any disclaimers of warranties, limitations or
modifications of remedies, or liquidated damages, including those of a third
party, such as the manufacturer of the goods, provided to the lessor by the
person supplying the goods in connection with or as part of the contract by
which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the
goods.

(h) "Goods" means all things that are movable at the time
of identification to the lease contract, or are fixtures (RCW 62A.2A-309), but
the term does not include money, documents, instruments, accounts, chattel
paper, general intangibles, computer information as defined in chapter 63.--
RCW (sections 101 through 902 of this act), or minerals or the like,
including oil and gas, before extraction. The term also includes the unborn
young of animals.

(i) "Installment lease contract" means a lease contract
that authorizes or requires the delivery of goods in separate lots to be
separately accepted, even though the lease contract contains a clause
"each delivery is a separate lease" or its equivalent.

(j) "Lease" means a transfer of the right to possession
and use of goods for a term in return for consideration, but a sale, including
a sale on approval or a sale or return, or retention or creation of a security
interest is not a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
term includes a sublease.

(k) "Lease agreement" means the bargain, with respect to
the lease, of the lessor and the lessee in fact as found in their language or
by implication from other circumstances including course of dealing or usage of
trade or course of performance as provided in this Article. Unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublease agreement.

(l) "Lease contract" means the total legal obligation
that results from the lease agreement as affected by this Article and any other
applicable rules of law. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
term includes a sublease contract.

(m) "Leasehold interest" means the interest of the lessor
or the lessee under a lease contract.

(n) "Lessee" means a person who acquires the right to
possession and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublessee.

(o) "Lessee in ordinary course of business" means a
person who in good faith and without knowledge that the lease to him or her is
in violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold interest
of a third party in the goods, leases in ordinary course from a person in the
business of selling or leasing goods of that kind, but does not include a
pawnbroker. "Leasing" may be for cash, or by exchange of other
property, or on secured or unsecured credit and includes receiving goods or
documents of title under a preexisting lease contract but does not include a
transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a
money debt.

(p) "Lessor" means a person who transfers the right to
possession and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublessor.

(q) "Lessor's residual interest" means the lessor's
interest in the goods after expiration, termination, or cancellation of the
lease contract.

(r) "Lien" means a charge against or interest in goods to
secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, but the term does not
include a security interest.

(s) "Lot" means a parcel or a single article that is the
subject matter of a separate lease or delivery, whether or not it is sufficient
to perform the lease contract.

(t) "Merchant lessee" means a lessee that is a merchant
with respect to goods of the kind subject to the lease.

(u) "Present value" means the amount as of a date certain
of one or more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain. The
discount is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties if the
rate was not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction was entered
into; otherwise, the discount is determined by a commercially reasonable rate
that takes into account the facts and circumstances of each case at the time
the transaction was entered into.

(v) "Purchase" includes taking by sale, lease, mortgage,
security interest, pledge, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an
interest in goods.

(w) "Sublease" means a lease of goods the right to
possession and use of which was acquired by the lessor as a lessee under an
existing lease.

(x) "Supplier" means a person from whom a lessor buys or
leases goods to be leased under a finance lease.

(y) "Supply contract" means a contract under which a
lessor buys or leases goods to be leased.

(z) "Termination" occurs when either party pursuant to a
power created by agreement or law puts an end to the lease contract otherwise
than for default.

(2) Other definitions applying to this Article or to specified
Parts thereof, and the sections in which they appear are:

"Accessions." RCW 62A.2A-310(1).

"Construction mortgage." RCW 62A.2A-309(1)(d).

"Encumbrance." RCW 62A.2A-309(1)(e).

"Fixtures." RCW 62A.2A-309(1)(a).

"Fixture filing." RCW 62A.2A-309(1)(b).

"Purchase money lease." RCW 62A.2A-309(1)(c).

(3) The following definitions in other Articles apply to this
Article:

"Account." RCW 62A.9A‑102(a)(2).

"Between merchants." RCW 62A.2-104(3).

"Buyer." RCW 62A.2-103(1)(a).

"Chattel paper." RCW 62A.9A‑102(a)(11).

"Consumer goods." RCW 62A.9A‑102(a)(23).

"Document." RCW 62A.9A‑102(a)(30).

"Entrusting." RCW 62A.2-403(3).

"General intangible." RCW 62A.9A-102(a)(42).

"Good faith." RCW 62A.2-103(1)(b).

"Instrument." RCW 62A.9A‑102(a)(47).

"Merchant." RCW 62A.2-104(1).

"Mortgage." RCW 62A.9A‑102(a)(55).

"Pursuant to commitment." RCW 62A.9A‑102(a)(68).

"Receipt." RCW 62A.2-103(1)(c).

"Sale." RCW 62A.2-106(1).

"Sale on approval." RCW 62A.2-326.

"Sale or return." RCW 62A.2-326.

"Seller." RCW 62A.2-103(1)(d).

(4) In addition, Article 62A.1 RCW contains general
definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable
throughout this Article.

Sec. 1025. RCW 62A.2A-107 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-107 are each amended to read as follows:

WAIVER OR RENUNCIATION OF CLAIM OR RIGHT
AFTER DEFAULT. Any claim or right arising out of an alleged default or breach
of warranty may be discharged in whole or in part without consideration by a ((written))
waiver or renunciation ((signed)) in a record authenticated and
delivered by the aggrieved party.

Sec. 1026. RCW 62A.2A-201 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-201 are each amended to read as follows:

STATUTE OF FRAUDS. (1) A lease contract is not enforceable by way
of action or defense unless:

(a) The total payments to be made under the lease contract,
excluding payments for options to renew or buy, are less than one thousand
dollars; or

(b) There is a ((writing)) record, ((signed)) authenticated
by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by that party's authorized
agent, sufficient to indicate that a lease contract has been made between the
parties and to describe the goods leased and the lease term.

(2) Any description of leased goods or of the lease term is
sufficient and satisfies subsection (1)(b) of this section, whether or not it
is specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.

(3) A ((writing)) record is not insufficient because
it omits or incorrectly states a term agreed upon, but the lease contract is
not enforceable under subsection (1)(b) of this section beyond the lease term
and the quantity of goods shown in the ((writing)) record.

(4) A lease contract that does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, but which is valid in other respects, is
enforceable:

(a) If the goods are to be specially manufactured or obtained for
the lessee and are not suitable for lease or sale to others in the ordinary
course of the lessor's business, and the lessor, before notice of repudiation
is received and under circumstances that reasonably indicate that the goods are
for the lessee, has made either a substantial beginning of their manufacture or
commitments for their procurement;

(b) If the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in that
party's pleading, testimony, or otherwise in court that a lease contract was
made, but the lease contract is not enforceable under this provision beyond the
quantity of goods admitted; or

(c) With respect to goods that have been received and accepted by
the lessee.

(5) The lease term under a lease contract referred to in subsection
(4) of this section is:

(a) If there is a ((writing signed)) record authenticated
by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by that party's authorized
agent specifying the lease term, the term so specified;

(b) If the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in that
party's pleading, testimony, or otherwise in court a lease term, the term so
admitted; or

(c) A reasonable lease term.

Sec. 1027. RCW 62A.2A-202 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-202 are each amended to read as follows:

FINAL ((WRITTEN)) EXPRESSION IN A RECORD: PAROL OR
EXTRINSIC EVIDENCE. Terms with respect to which the confirmatory ((memoranda))
records of the parties agree or which are otherwise set forth in a ((writing))
record intended by the parties as a final expression of their agreement
with respect to such terms as are included therein may not be contradicted by
evidence of any prior agreement or of a contemporaneous oral agreement but may
be explained or supplemented:

(1) By course of dealing or usage of trade or by course of
performance; and

(2) By evidence of consistent additional
terms unless the court finds the ((writing)) record to have been
intended also as a complete and exclusive statement of the terms of the
agreement.

Sec. 1028. RCW 62A.2A-203 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-203 are each amended to read as follows:

SEALS INOPERATIVE. The affixing of a seal to
a ((writing)) record evidencing a lease contract or an offer to
enter into a lease contract does not render the ((writing)) record
a sealed instrument and the law with respect to sealed instruments does not
apply to the lease contract or offer.

Sec. 1029. RCW 62A.2A-205 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-205 are each amended to read as follows:

FIRM OFFERS. An offer by a merchant to lease
goods to or from another person in ((a signed writing)) an
authenticated record that by its terms gives assurance it will be held open
is not revocable, for lack of consideration, during the time stated or, if no
time is stated, for a reasonable time, but in no event may the period of
irrevocability exceed three months. Any such term of assurance on a form
supplied by the offeree must be separately ((signed)) authenticated
by the offeror.

Sec. 1030. RCW 62A.2A-208 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-208 are each amended to read as follows:

MODIFICATION, RESCISSION, AND WAIVER. (1) An agreement modifying a
lease contract needs no consideration to be binding.

(2) ((A signed)) An authenticated lease agreement
that excludes modification or rescission except by ((a signed writing)) an
authenticated record may not be otherwise modified or rescinded, but,
except as between merchants, such a requirement on a form supplied by a
merchant must be separately ((signed)) authenticated by the other
party.

(3) Although an attempt at modification or rescission does not
satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, it may operate as a
waiver.

(4) A party who has made a waiver affecting
an executory portion of a lease contract may retract the waiver by reasonable
notification received by the other party that strict performance will be
required of any term waived, unless the retraction would be unjust in view of a
material change of position in reliance on the waiver.

Sec. 1031. RCW 62A.2A-214 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-214 are each amended to read as follows:

EXCLUSION OR MODIFICATION OF WARRANTIES. (1) Words or conduct
relevant to the creation of an express warranty and words or conduct tending to
negate or limit a warranty must be construed wherever reasonable as consistent
with each other; but, subject to the provisions of RCW 62A.2A-202 on parol or
extrinsic evidence, negation or limitation is inoperative to the extent that
the construction is unreasonable.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, to exclude or modify
the implied warranty of merchantability or any part of it the language must
mention "merchantability," be by a ((writing)) record,
and be conspicuous. Subject to subsection (3) of this section, to exclude or
modify any implied warranty of fitness the exclusion must be by a ((writing))
record and be conspicuous. Language to exclude all implied warranties
of fitness is sufficient if it is in ((writing)) a record, is
conspicuous and states, for example, "There is no warranty that the goods
will be fit for a particular purpose."

(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, but subject to
subsection (4) of this section:

(a) Unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied warranties
are excluded by expressions like "as is," or "with all
faults," or by other language that in common understanding calls the
lessee's attention to the exclusion of warranties and makes plain that there is
no implied warranty, if in ((writing)) a record and conspicuous;

(b) If the lessee before entering into the lease contract has
examined the goods or the sample or model as fully as desired or has refused to
examine the goods, there is no implied warranty with regard to defects that an
examination ought in the circumstances to have revealed; and

(c) An implied warranty may also be excluded or modified by course
of dealing, course of performance, or usage of trade.

(4) To exclude or modify a warranty against interference or against
infringement (RCW 62A.2A-211) or any part of it, the language must be specific,
be by a ((writing)) record, and be conspicuous, unless the
circumstances, including course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of
trade, give the lessee reason to know that the goods are being leased subject
to a claim or interest of any person.

Sec. 1032. RCW 62A.2A-303 and 2001
c 32 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

ALIENABILITY OF PARTY'S INTEREST UNDER LEASE CONTRACT OR OF
LESSOR'S RESIDUAL INTEREST IN GOODS; DELEGATION OF PERFORMANCE; TRANSFER OF
RIGHTS. (1) As used in this section, "creation of a security
interest" includes the sale of a lease contract that is subject to Article
9A, Secured Transactions, by reason of RCW 62A.9A‑109(a)(3).

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and RCW
62A.9A‑407, a provision in a lease agreement which (a) prohibits the
voluntary or involuntary transfer, including a transfer by sale, sublease,
creation or enforcement of a security interest, or attachment, levy, or other
judicial process, of an interest of a party under the lease contract or of the
lessor's residual interest in the goods, or (b) makes such a transfer an event
of default, gives rise to the rights and remedies provided in subsection (4) of
this section, but a transfer that is prohibited or is an event of default under
the lease agreement is otherwise effective.

(3) A provision in a lease agreement which (a) prohibits a transfer
of a right to damages for default with respect to the whole lease contract or
of a right to payment arising out of the transferor's due performance of the
transferor's entire obligation, or (b) makes such a transfer an event of
default, is not enforceable, and such a transfer is not a transfer that
materially impairs the prospect of obtaining return performance by, materially
changes the duty of, or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on, the
other party to the lease contract within the purview of subsection (4) of this
section.

(4) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and RCW 62A.9A‑407:

(a) If a transfer is made which is made an event of default under a
lease agreement, the party to the lease contract not making the transfer,
unless that party waives the default or otherwise agrees, has the rights and
remedies described in RCW 62A.2A-501(2);

(b) If subsection (4)(a) of this section is not applicable and if a
transfer is made that (i) is prohibited under a lease agreement or (ii)
materially impairs the prospect of obtaining return performance by, materially
changes the duty of, or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on, the
other party to the lease contract, unless the party not making the transfer
agrees at any time to the transfer in the lease contract or otherwise, then,
except as limited by contract, (A) the transferor is liable to the party not
making the transfer for damages caused by the transfer to the extent that the
damages could not reasonably be prevented by the party not making the transfer
and (B) a court having jurisdiction may grant other appropriate relief,
including cancellation of the lease contract or an injunction against the
transfer.

(5) A transfer of "the lease" or of "all my rights
under the lease," or a transfer in similar general terms, is a transfer of
rights and, unless the language or the circumstances, as in a transfer for
security, indicate the contrary, the transfer is a delegation of duties by the
transferor to the transferee. Acceptance by the transferee constitutes a
promise by the transferee to perform those duties. The promise is enforceable
by either the transferor or the other party to the lease contract.

(6) Unless otherwise agreed by the lessor and the lessee, a
delegation of performance does not relieve the transferor as against the other
party of any duty to perform or of any liability for default.

(7) In a consumer lease, to prohibit the transfer of an interest of
a party under the lease contract or to make a transfer an event of default, the
language must be specific, by a ((writing)) record, and
conspicuous.

Sec. 1033. RCW 62A.2A-309 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-811 are each amended to read as follows:

LESSOR'S AND LESSEE'S RIGHTS WHEN GOODS BECOME FIXTURES. (1) In
this section:

(a) Goods are "fixtures" when they become so related to
particular real estate that an interest in them arises under real estate law;

(b) A "fixture filing" is the filing, in the office where
a record of a mortgage on the real estate would be filed or recorded, of a
financing statement covering goods that are or are to become fixtures and
conforming to the requirements of RCW 62A.9A‑502 (a) and (b);

(c) A lease is a "purchase money lease" unless the lessee
has possession or use of the goods or the right to possession or use of the
goods before the lease agreement is enforceable;

(d) A mortgage is a "construction mortgage" to the extent
it secures an obligation incurred for the construction of an improvement on
land including the acquisition cost of the land, if the recorded ((writing))
record so indicates; and

(e) "Encumbrance" includes real estate mortgages and
other liens on real estate and all other rights in real estate that are not
ownership interests.

(2) Under this Article a lease may be of goods that are fixtures or
may continue in goods that become fixtures, but no lease exists under this
Article of ordinary building materials incorporated into an improvement on
land.

(3) This Article does not prevent creation of a lease of fixtures
pursuant to real estate law.

(4) The perfected interest of a lessor of fixtures has priority
over a conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real estate if:

(a) The lease is a purchase money lease, the conflicting interest
of the encumbrancer or owner arises before the goods become fixtures, the
interest of the lessor is perfected by a fixture filing before the goods become
fixtures or within twenty days thereafter, and the lessee has an interest of
record in the real estate or is in possession of the real estate; or

(b) The interest of the lessor is perfected by a fixture filing
before the interest of the encumbrancer or owner is of record, the lessor's
interest has priority over any conflicting interest of a predecessor in title
of the encumbrancer or owner, and the lessee has an interest of record in the
real estate or is in possession of the real estate.

(5) The interest of a lessor of fixtures, whether or not perfected,
has priority over the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the
real estate if:

(a) The fixtures are readily removable factory or office machines,
readily removable equipment that is not primarily used or leased for use in the
operation of the real estate, or readily removable replacements of domestic
appliances that are goods subject to a consumer lease, and before the goods
become fixtures the lease contract is enforceable; or

(b) The conflicting interest is a lien on the real estate obtained
by legal or equitable proceedings after the lease contract is enforceable; or

(c) The encumbrancer or owner has consented in ((writing)) a
record to the lease or has disclaimed an interest in the goods as fixtures;
or

(d) The lessee has a right to remove the goods as against the encumbrancer
or owner. If the lessee's right to remove terminates, the priority of the
interest of the lessor continues for a reasonable time.

(6) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a) of this section but otherwise
subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the interest of a lessor of
fixtures, including the lessor's residual interest, is subordinate to the
conflicting interest of an encumbrancer of the real estate under a construction
mortgage recorded before the goods become fixtures if the goods become fixtures
before the completion of the construction. To the extent given to refinance a
construction mortgage, the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer of the real
estate under a mortgage has this priority to the same extent as the
encumbrancer of the real estate under the construction mortgage.

(7) In cases not within the preceding subsections, priority between
the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor's residual interest,
and the conflicting interest of an encumbrancer or owner of the real estate who
is not the lessee is determined by the priority rules governing conflicting
interests in real estate.

(8) If the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the lessor's
residual interest, has priority over all conflicting interests of all owners
and encumbrancers of the real estate, the lessor or the lessee may (a) on
default, expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease agreement but
subject to the lease agreement and this Article, or (b) if necessary to enforce
other rights and remedies of the lessor or lessee under this Article, remove
the goods from the real estate, free and clear of all conflicting interests of
all owners and encumbrancers of the real estate, but the lessor or lessee must
reimburse any encumbrancer or owner of the real estate who is not the lessee
and who has not otherwise agreed for the cost of repair of any physical injury,
but not for any diminution in value of the real estate caused by the absence of
the goods removed or by any necessity of replacing them. A person entitled to
reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the party seeking removal
gives adequate security for the performance of this obligation.

(9) Even though the lease agreement does not
create a security interest, the interest of a lessor of fixtures, including the
lessor's residual interest, is perfected by filing a financing statement as a
fixture filing for leased goods that are or are to become fixtures in
accordance with the relevant provisions of the Article on Secured Transactions,
Article 62A.9A RCW.

Sec. 1034. RCW 62A.2A-310 and 2000
c 250 s 9A-812 are each amended to read as follows:

LESSOR'S AND LESSEE'S RIGHTS WHEN GOODS BECOME ACCESSIONS. (1)
Goods are "accessions" when they are installed in or affixed to other
goods.

(2) The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract
entered into before the goods became accessions is superior to all interests in
the whole except as stated in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) The interest of a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract
entered into at the time or after the goods became accessions is superior to
all subsequently acquired interests in the whole except as stated in subsection
(4) of this section but is subordinate to interests in the whole existing at
the time the lease contract was made unless the holders of such interests in
the whole have in ((writing)) a record consented to the lease, or
disclaimed an interest in the goods as part of the whole, or the accession is
leased under tariff No. 74 for residential conversion burners leased by a
natural gas utility.

(4) Unless the accession is leased under tariff No. 74 for
residential conversion burners leased by a natural gas utility, the interest of
a lessor or a lessee under a lease contract described in subsection (2) or (3)
of this section is subordinate to the interest of:

(a) A buyer in the ordinary course of business or a lessee in the
ordinary course of business of any interest in the whole acquired after the
goods became accessions;

(b) A creditor with a security interest in the whole perfected
before the lease contract was made to the extent that the creditor makes
subsequent advances without knowledge of the lease contract; or

(c) A creditor with a security interest in the whole which is
perfected by compliance with the requirements of a certificate-of-title statute
under RCW 62A.9A-311(b).

(5) When under subsections (2) or (3) and (4)
of this section a lessor or a lessee of accessions holds an interest that is
superior to all interests in the whole, the lessor or the lessee may (a) on
default, expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease contract by the
other party but subject to the provisions of the lease contract and this
Article, or (b) if necessary to enforce his or her other rights and remedies
under this Article, remove the goods from the whole, free and clear of all
interests in the whole, but he or she must reimburse any holder of an interest
in the whole who is not the lessee and who has not otherwise agreed for the
cost of repair of any physical injury but not for any diminution in value of
the whole caused by the absence of the goods removed or by any necessity for
replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to
remove until the party seeking removal gives adequate security for the
performance of this obligation.

Sec. 1035. RCW 62A.2A-401 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-401 are each amended to read as follows:

INSECURITY: ADEQUATE ASSURANCE OF PERFORMANCE. (1) A lease
contract imposes an obligation on each party that the other's expectation of
receiving due performance will not be impaired.

(2) If reasonable grounds for insecurity arise with respect to the
performance of either party, the insecure party may demand in ((writing))
a record adequate assurance of due performance. Until the insecure
party receives that assurance, if commercially reasonable the insecure party
may suspend any performance for which he or she has not already received the
agreed return.

(3) A repudiation of the lease contract occurs if assurance of due
performance adequate under the circumstances of the particular case is not
provided to the insecure party within a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty
days after receipt of a demand by the other party.

(4) Between merchants, the reasonableness of grounds for insecurity
and the adequacy of any assurance offered must be determined according to
commercial standards.

(5) Acceptance of any nonconforming delivery
or payment does not prejudice the aggrieved party's right to demand adequate
assurance of future performance.

Sec. 1036. RCW 62A.2A-406 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-406 are each amended to read as follows:

PROCEDURE ON EXCUSED PERFORMANCE. (1) If the lessee receives
notification of a material or indefinite delay or an allocation justified under
RCW 62A.2A-405, the lessee may by ((written)) notification in a
record to the lessor as to any goods involved, and with respect to all of
the goods if under an installment lease contract the value of the whole lease
contract is substantially impaired (RCW 62A.2A-510):

(a) Terminate the lease contract (RCW 62A.2A-505(2)); or

(b) Except in a finance lease, modify the lease contract by
accepting the available quota in substitution, with due allowance from the rent
payable for the balance of the lease term for the deficiency but without further
right against the lessor.

(2) If, after receipt of a notification from
the lessor under RCW 62A.2A-405, the lessee fails so to modify the lease
agreement within a reasonable time not exceeding thirty days, the lease
contract lapses with respect to any deliveries affected.

Sec. 1037. RCW 62A.2A-514 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-514 are each amended to read as follows:

WAIVER OF LESSEE'S OBJECTIONS. (1) In rejecting goods, a lessee's
failure to state a particular defect that is ascertainable by reasonable
inspection precludes the lessee from relying on the defect to justify rejection
or to establish default:

(a) If, stated seasonably, the lessor or the supplier could have
cured it (RCW 62A.2A-513); or

(b) Between merchants if the lessor or the supplier after rejection
has made a request in ((writing)) a record for a full and final
((written)) statement in a record of all defects on which the
lessee proposes to rely.

(2) A lessee's failure to reserve rights when
paying rent or other consideration against documents precludes recovery of the
payment for defects apparent on the face of the documents.

Sec. 1038. RCW 62A.2A-516 and 1993
c 230 s 2A-516 are each amended to read as follows:

EFFECT OF ACCEPTANCE OF GOODS; NOTICE OF DEFAULT; BURDEN OF
ESTABLISHING DEFAULT AFTER ACCEPTANCE; NOTICE OF CLAIM OR LITIGATION TO PERSON
ANSWERABLE OVER. (1) A lessee must pay rent for any goods accepted in
accordance with the lease contract, with due allowance for goods rightfully
rejected or not delivered.

(2) A lessee's acceptance of goods precludes rejection of the goods
accepted. In the case of a finance lease, if made with knowledge of a
nonconformity, acceptance cannot be revoked because of it. In any other case, if
made with knowledge of a nonconformity, acceptance cannot be revoked because of
it unless the acceptance was on the reasonable assumption that the
nonconformity would be seasonably cured. Acceptance does not of itself impair
any other remedy provided by this Article or the lease agreement for
nonconformity.

(3) If a tender has been accepted:

(a) Within a reasonable time after the lessee discovers or should
have discovered any default, the lessee shall notify the lessor and the
supplier, if any, or be barred from any remedy against the party not notified;

(b) Except in the case of a consumer lease, within a reasonable
time after the lessee receives notice of litigation for infringement or the
like (RCW 62A.2A-211) the lessee shall notify the lessor or be barred from any
remedy over for liability established by the litigation; and

(c) The burden is on the lessee to establish any default.

(4) If a lessee is sued for breach of a warranty or other
obligation for which a lessor or a supplier is answerable over the following
apply:

(a) The lessee may give the lessor or the supplier, or both, ((written))
notice in a record of the litigation. If the notice states that the
person notified may come in and defend and that if the person notified does not
do so that person will be bound in any action against that person by the lessee
by any determination of fact common to the two litigations, then unless the
person notified after seasonable receipt of the notice does come in and defend
that person is so bound.

(b) The lessor or the supplier may demand in ((writing)) a
record that the lessee turn over control of the litigation including
settlement if the claim is one for infringement or the like (RCW 62A.2A-211) or
else be barred from any remedy over. If the demand states that the lessor or
the supplier agrees to bear all expense and to satisfy any adverse judgment,
then unless the lessee after seasonable receipt of the demand does turn over
control the lessee is so barred.

(5) Subsections (3) and (4) of this section apply to any obligation
of a lessee to hold the lessor or the supplier harmless against infringement or
the like (RCW 62A.2A-211).

PART
11

CODIFICATION DIRECTIVE

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. Sections 101 through 902
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 63 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102. Captions used in sections
101 through 902 of this act and part headings and subpart headings used in this
act are not any part of the law.

--- END ---