BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature declares
an emergency caused by a natural disaster, which was the severe storm that
damaged agricultural crops on June 26 and 27, 2001, in thirteen counties as
designated by the governor and the secretary of the United States department of
agriculture.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 50.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An additional
benefit period is established for an individual who is engaged in agricultural
employment in standard industrial classification code 011, 016, 017, or 203,
but who is unemployed as a direct result of an emergency declared by the
governor. These additional benefits are intended to provide partial income
replacement in order that an individual unemployed as a result of the emergency
can provide for the necessities of living.

(a) The additional
benefits provided under this section are payable to an eligible unemployed
worker for a maximum of eight weeks of unemployment during the period July 1,
2001, through July 6, 2002.

(b) The additional
benefits provided by this section are available to any individual who is
unemployed as a result of the emergency and:

(i) At the time of the
emergency, resided in the area that is included in the governor's emergency
declaration. Agricultural workers whose normal work depends on movement from
one area to another will be deemed residing in the emergency area if their
presence in that area is consistent with the normal or reasonable migration
required by their occupation; and

(ii) Is able to,
available for, and actively seeking work as provided in RCW 50.20.010(3).

(c) A worker is
considered unemployed as a result of the emergency if he or she:

(i) Is unemployed due
to crop damage at the farm at which he or she is employed;

(ii) Is unable to reach
the place of employment or self-employment; or

(iii) Had a bona fide
offer of work prior to the emergency, but could not work or is unable to reach
the job due to the emergency.

(d) The additional
benefits provided under this section are available to an individual who is not
eligible for regular unemployment compensation under this title, or who is an
exhaustee as defined in RCW 50.22.010.

(2) For purposes of
this section, and subject to the restrictions in subsection (3) of this
section, the term "agricultural employment" includes:

(a) Services performed
on a farm, in the employ of any person, in connection with the cultivation of
the soil, or in connection with raising or harvesting any agricultural
commodity; or

(b) Services performed
packing, packaging, grading, storing, or delivering to storage, or to market,
or to a carrier for transportation to market, any agricultural commodity.

(3) An individual is
not eligible for additional benefits under this section if he or she is:

(a) Enrolled as a
student and regularly attending classes, or between two successive years or
terms, at an elementary school, a secondary school, or an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 50.44.037;

(b) Performing services
in family employment as defined in RCW 50.04.180;

(c) A school employee
subject to the between and within denial terms as provided in RCW 50.44.050;
and

(d) An alien who is not
authorized by the immigration and naturalization service to work in the United
States.

(4) The total
additional benefit amount shall be:

(a) For an exhaustee,
eight times the weekly benefit amount which was payable to the individual under
this title for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year; or

(b) For individuals not
eligible for regular benefits under this title, eight times the weekly benefit
amount established under subsection (5) of this section.

(5)(a) The weekly
additional benefit amount shall be:

(i) For an exhaustee,
the weekly benefit amount which was payable to the individual under this title
for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year; or

(ii) For an unemployed
person not eligible for regular benefits under this title, the weekly amount
the individual would be entitled to had all the individual's work and earnings,
both covered and noncovered, been included as employment and wages under state
law. "Wages" for these purposes means gross wages paid to a worker.

(b) Notwithstanding the
provisions of (a) of this subsection:

(i) The minimum amount
payable to any individual eligible under this section shall be one hundred six
dollars per week, the minimum weekly benefit amount payable for the benefit
year in effect on July 1, 2001, as provided in RCW 50.20.120(2);

(ii) The maximum amount
payable to any individual eligible under this section shall be four hundred
ninety-six dollars per week, the maximum weekly benefit amount payable for the
benefit year in effect on July 1, 2001, as provided in RCW 50.20.120(2); and

(iii) An individual who
leaves the state of Washington shall not be eligible to receive additional
benefits for more than two weeks following the week in which he or she left the
state.

(6) An application for
additional benefits shall be filed with the department within thirty days after
the announcement of the emergency which resulted in the individual's
unemployment. An application filed later than thirty days after the
announcement date of the emergency shall be accepted if the individual had good
cause for the late filing. In no event shall an application be accepted if it
is filed after July 6, 2002.

(7) Weekly claims for
additional benefits shall be filed in the manner prescribed by the department.
Additional benefits will be paid only for those weeks for which the individual
would have been employed except for the fact that the emergency occurred, or
for which the individual would have been eligible for regular benefits but,
because of the emergency, had exhausted those benefits.

(8) Additional benefits
paid under this section shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution-paying employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All real property,
including perennial vines and orchard trees, owned or leased by a farmer, as
defined in RCW 82.04.213, and exclusively used for the growing of an
agricultural product, as defined in RCW 82.04.213, excluding products of animal
husbandry, which agricultural product was damaged in severe storms that
occurred on June 26 and 27, 2001, is exempt from all regular and excess
property taxes, if the farmer meets the requirements set out in this section.
The property must be located in a county designated as an agricultural disaster
area as a result of the severe storms that occurred on June 26 and 27, 2001, by
the United States department of agriculture. This exemption applies to all
regular and excess property taxes levied for collection in 2001, to the extent
unpaid as of the effective date of this act, to all regular and excess property
taxes levied for collection in 2002, and to all regular and excess property
taxes levied for collection in 2003, that are due and payable on or before
April 30, 2003, and delinquent after that date. If the real property is leased
and the lessee farmer is required under the lease agreement to pay property
taxes, the benefit of this exemption shall inure to the lessee, to the extent
the lessee is liable for property taxes.

(2) In order to be
eligible for this property tax exemption, the farmer must first apply for and
qualify for an emergency loan from the farm service agency of the United States
department of agriculture.

(3) A claim for
exemption under this section must be filed with the treasurer of the county in
which the property is located on or before the dates provided in RCW 84.56.020
for payment of property taxes in order for the exemption to take effect for
payment due on any payment date for which this exemption may apply. Only one
claim needs to be filed and it must be filed solely on forms as prescribed or
approved by the department of revenue. If at the time the claim is filed, a
farmer has not yet received confirmation from the farm service agency that the
farmer qualifies for an emergency loan, payment of any tax for which exemption
is claimed under this section is deferred until such time as the confirmation
is provided. Confirmation must be provided within one year from the effective
date of this act. If confirmation is not subsequently provided to the
treasurer, the farmer must pay all property taxes deferred with interest from
the date the tax would have been due without the deferral, but no penalty may
be assessed, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.56.020. No claim may be
filed more than thirty days after the expiration of the time allowed to apply
for an emergency loan from the farm service agency.

(4) Any taxing
district, other than the state, for which tax revenues are decreased as a
result of the exemptions provided in this act, is entitled to an appropriation
by the state for the difference between what the taxing district would have
received from taxes in the absence of these exemptions and what it actually
received from taxes as a result of the exemptions provided in this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.29A.130 and 1999
c 165 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The following leasehold
interests shall be exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and
82.29A.040:

(1) All leasehold
interests constituting a part of the operating properties of any public utility
which is assessed and taxed as a public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.

(2) All leasehold
interests in facilities owned or used by a school, college or university which
leasehold provides housing for students and which is otherwise exempt from
taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.

(3) All leasehold
interests of subsidized housing where the fee ownership of such property is
vested in the government of the United States, or the state of Washington or
any political subdivision thereof but only if income qualification exists for
such housing.

(4) All leasehold
interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit fair association that sponsors
or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from revenues collected
pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the director of the department of
agriculture where the fee ownership of such property is vested in the
government of the United States, the state of Washington or any of its
political subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association if such
leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary lease.

(5) All leasehold
interests in any property of any public entity used as a residence by an
employee of that public entity who is required as a condition of employment to
live in the publicly owned property.

(6) All leasehold
interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned or held by any Indian or
Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such property is vested in or held in
trust by the United States and which are not subleased to other than to a
lessee which would qualify pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and
84.40.175.

(7) All leasehold
interests in any real property of any Indian or Indian tribe, band, or
community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to a
restriction against alienation imposed by the United States: PROVIDED, That
this exemption shall apply only where it is determined that contract rent paid
is greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be
determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to
establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).

(8) All leasehold
interests for which annual taxable rent is less than two hundred fifty dollars
per year. For purposes of this subsection leasehold interests held by the same
lessee in contiguous properties owned by the same lessor shall be deemed a
single leasehold interest.

(9) All leasehold
interests which give use or possession of the leased property for a continuous
period of less than thirty days: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this
subsection, successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially continuous
use of possession of the same property to the same lessee shall be deemed a
single leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest shall
be deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty days
solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use
the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an occasional,
temporary basis.

(10) All leasehold
interests under month-to-month leases in residential units rented for
residential purposes of the lessee pending destruction or removal for the
purpose of constructing a public highway or building.

(11) All leasehold
interests in any publicly owned real or personal property to the extent such
leasehold interests arises solely by virtue of a contract for public
improvements or work executed under the public works statutes of this state or
of the United States between the public owner of the property and a contractor.

(12) All leasehold
interests that give use or possession of state adult correctional facilities
for the purposes of operating correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.

(13) All leasehold
interests used to provide organized and supervised recreational activities for
disabled persons of all ages in a camp facility and for public recreational
purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that would be
exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the property. If
the publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the leasehold
excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be imposed and
shall be apportioned accordingly.

(14) All leasehold
interests in the public or entertainment areas of a baseball stadium with
natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy that is in a county with a
population of over one million, that has a seating capacity of over forty
thousand, and that is constructed on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or
entertainment areas" include ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies
and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and
stadium club areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other
public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and
exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading,
staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the playing field, and
any other areas to which the public has access or which are used for the
production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and any other
personal property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment
areas" does not include locker rooms or private offices exclusively used
by the lessee.

(15) All leasehold
interests in the public or entertainment areas of a stadium and exhibition
center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that is constructed on or after January
1, 1998. For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment
areas" has the same meaning as in subsection (14) of this section, and
includes exhibition areas.

(16) All leasehold
interests in public facilities districts, as provided in chapter 36.100 or
35.57 RCW.

(17) All leasehold
interests of real property, including perennial vines and orchard trees, held
by a farmer, as defined in RCW 82.04.213, and exclusively used for the growing
of an agricultural product, as defined in RCW 82.04.213, excluding products of
animal husbandry, which agricultural product was damaged in severe storms that
occurred on June 26 and 27, 2001, and for which the farmer would receive the
property tax exemption provided in section 1 of this act if the real property
were privately owned, are exempt from all leasehold excise taxes due from the
effective date of this act until July 1, 2003. To receive the leasehold excise
tax exemption, the property must be located in a county designated as an
agricultural disaster area as a result of the severe storms that occurred on
June 26 and 27, 2001, by the United States department of agriculture. Claims
for this exemption will be administered in the manner described in section 1 of
this act. A lessee farmer who qualifies for an emergency loan from the farm
service agency of the United States department of agriculture shall notify the
treasurer of the county in which the property is located. The county treasurer
shall, in turn, notify the public lessor of all lessee farmers who qualify for
leasehold excise tax exemption under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
5. (1) The sum of one
million five hundred thousand dollars is appropriated from the emergency
reserve fund to the office of community development for fiscal year 2002 solely
for the purposes of providing assistance to farm workers who have been
displaced by the June 26 and 27, 2001, storm in thirteen counties designated by
the governor and the secretary of the United States department of agriculture.
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall distribute
the amount in this section to community agencies that assist displaced farm
workers through the existing program structures in meeting basic needs
including, but not limited to, emergency medical and dental services, food,
mortgage and rental costs, emergency shelter costs, and emergency
transportation costs.

(2) The sum of three
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the emergency reserve fund to the department of revenue for fiscal years 2002
and 2003 solely for the purposes of section 3(4) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---