BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 303
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION COMMISSION

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 32,298,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 32,866,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,690,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 60,000

Winter Recreation Program
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 787,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State
Appropriation... $ 274,000

Snowmobile Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 4,682,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 337,000

Public Safety and Education
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 48,000

Water Trail Program Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,000

Parks Renewal and
Stewardship Account‑-

State Appropriation........................ $ 26,420,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 100,486,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Fees approved by
the state parks and recreation commission in 2001 are authorized to exceed the
fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(2) The state parks and
recreation commission, in collaboration with the office of financial management
and legislative staff, shall develop a cost-effective and readily accessible
approach for reporting revenues and expenditures at each state park. The
reporting system shall be complete and operational by December 1, 2001.

(3) The appropriation
in this section from the off-road vehicle account‑‑state is
provided under RCW 46.09.170(1)(c) and ((is provided solely)) may be
used to bring off-road vehicle recreation facilities into compliance with
the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act.

(4) $79,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $79,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $8,000 of the
winter recreation program account‑‑state appropriation are provided
solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest avalanche center.

(5) $432,000 of the
parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is provided for the
operation of the Silver Lake visitor center. If a long-term management
agreement is not reached with the U.S. forest service by September 30, 2001,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6) $189,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item P+RC-02.

Sec. 2. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 308
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2002).... $ 36,709,000

General Fund‑-State
Appropriation (FY 2003).... $ 36,266,000

General Fund‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,440,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local
Appropriation...... $ 1,865,000

Forest Development Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 52,511,000

Off Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,684,000

Surveys and Maps Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,689,000

Aquatic Lands Enhancement
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,458,000

Resources Management Cost
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 85,979,000

Surface Mining Reclamation
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,549,000

Salmon Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation............ ................. $ 625,000

Water Quality Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 2,900,000

Aquatic Land Dredged
Material Disposal Site

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,056,000

Natural Resource
Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account Appropriation...................... $ 34,000

Air Pollution Control
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 629,000

Metals Mining Account‑-State
Appropriation..... $ 64,000

Agricultural College Trust
Management Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,790,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 237,248,000

The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $18,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $998,000 of
the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01,
DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(2)(a) $625,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation, $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,250,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,900,000 of the water quality account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 4, Laws of 1999
sp. sess. (forest practices and salmon recovery).

(b) $250,000 of the
salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for and shall be
expended to develop a small forest landowner data base in ten counties.
$150,000 of the amount in this subsection shall be used to purchase the data.
$100,000 of the amount in this subsection shall purchase contracted analysis of
the data.

(3) $2,000,000 of the
forest development account appropriation is provided solely for road
decommissioning, maintenance, and repair in the Lake Whatcom watershed.

(4) $543,000 of the
forest fire protection assessment account appropriation, $22,000 of the forest
development account appropriation, and $76,000 of the resource management cost
account appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 279, Laws of
2001, Substitute House Bill No. 2104, (modifying forest fire protection
assessments).

(5) $895,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $895,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.

(((7))) (6)
$4,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $4,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely to compensate the forest board trust for a
portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement district consistent
with RCW 79.12.055.

(((8))) (7)
The appropriation from the off-road vehicle account‑‑state ((is
provided under RCW 46.09.170(1)(a)(ii) and is provided solely)) may be
used for projects that bring off-road vehicle recreation facilities into
compliance with the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal
Americans with disabilities act and do not compromise or impair sensitive
natural resources.

(((9))) (8)
$828,000 of the surface mine reclamation account appropriation is provided to
implement Engrossed House Bill No. 1845 (surface mining fees). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(((10))) (9)
$800,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation and $200,000 of
the resources management cost account appropriation are provided solely to
improve asset management on state-owned aquatic lands. The department shall
streamline the use authorization process for businesses operating on state-owned
aquatic lands and issue decisions on 325 pending lease applications by June 30,
2002. The department, in consultation with the attorney general, shall develop
a strategic program to resolve claims related to contaminated sediments on
state-owned aquatic lands.

(((11))) (10)
$246,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided to
the department for continuing control of spruce budworm.

(((12))) (11)
$100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account is provided solely for the
development and initial implementation of a statewide management plan for
marine reserves.

(((13))) (12)
$7,657,859 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $7,657,859 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.

(((14))) (13)
$7,216,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002
and $6,584,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2003 are provided solely for fire protection activities and to implement
provisions of the 1997 tridata fire program review.

(((15))) (14)
$275,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2002, $275,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $550,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely to the department for planning, management,
and stewardship of natural area preserves and natural resources conservation
areas.

(((16))) (15)
$187,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $375,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely to the department for maintenance and
stewardship of public lands.

(((17))) (16)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2002,
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $400,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided
solely for spartina control.

Sec. 3. 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 346
(uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway Road and
Off-Road Vehicle Activities (NOVA) (02-4-002)

(1) ((The
appropriation in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program
under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(i) is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: Fifty percent of the new appropriation is provided solely for
grants to projects to research, develop, publish, and distribute informational
guides and maps of nonhighway and off-road vehicle trails and associated
facilities meeting the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the
federal Americans with disabilities act.

(2))) The appropriation in this section for the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(ii) is
subject to the following conditions and limitations: The portion of the new
appropriation that applies to grants for capital facilities ((is provided
solely)) may be used for grants to projects that meet the
requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act and do not compromise or impair sensitive natural resources.
The portion of the new appropriation that applies to grants for management,
maintenance, and operation of existing off-road vehicle recreation facilities
may be used to bring the facilities into compliance with the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.

(((3))) (2)
The appropriation in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(iii) is subject to the following conditions
and limitations: $175,000 is provided solely for the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation to contract with an independent entity to study the source
and make recommendations on the distribution and use of funds provided to
off-road vehicle and nonhighway road recreational activities under RCW
46.09.170. The study shall determine the relative portion of the motor vehicle
fuel tax revenues that are attributable to vehicles operating off-road or on
nonhighway roads for recreational purposes as provided in RCW 46.09.170. The
study shall include the types of vehicles and location of their use, the types
of recreational activities, the types of recreational facilities used, and the
recreational use of forest roads relative to other, nonrecreational uses. The
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall review the analysis and
submit a report to the standing committees of the legislature, including
recommendations regarding amendments to RCW 46.09.170 to: (a) Allocate
revenues consistent with the relative proportion of the uses generating such
revenues, and (b) ensure funding for existing off-road vehicle facilities
operated by the state parks and recreation commission and local governments.
The report shall be submitted no later than December 1, 2002.

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account‑-State..................... $ 5,527,551

Prior Biennia
(Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future Biennia
(Projected Costs)................ $ 23,559,218

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,086,769

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---