BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c
221 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prosecutions for
criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods prescribed in this
section.

(a) The following
offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:

(i) Murder;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Arson if a death
results;

(iv) Vehicular
homicide;

(v) Vehicular assault
if a death results;

(vi) Hit-and-run
injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4));

(vii) Any felony
committed with the intent to intimidate or coerce a civilian population,
influence the policy of a unit of government by intimidation or coercion,
affect the conduct of a unit of government by intimidation or coercion, or
retaliate against a branch or level of government for a policy or conduct of
the government.

(b) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten years after their commission:

(i) Any felony
committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection with the
duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her public duty
or a violation of the oath of office;

(ii) Arson if no death
results; or

(iii) Violations of RCW
9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency
within one year of its commission; except that if the victim is under fourteen
years of age when the rape is committed and the rape is reported to a law
enforcement agency within one year of its commission, the violation may be
prosecuted up to three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to
ten years after the rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation of
RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape may not be
prosecuted: (A) More than three years after its commission if the violation
was committed against a victim fourteen years of age or older; or (B) more than
three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years
after the rape's commission, whichever is later, if the violation was committed
against a victim under fourteen years of age.

(c) Violations of the
following statutes shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after their commission,
whichever is later: RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070,
9A.44.080, 9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.

(d) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six years after their commission:
Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(e) The following
offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five years after their commission:
Any class C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.

(f) Bigamy shall not be
prosecuted more than three years after the time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.

(g) A violation of RCW
9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than three years after the discovery of
the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3).

(h) No other felony may
be prosecuted more than three years after its commission; except that in a
prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if the person who was viewed, photographed, or
filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed,
photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two years of
the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns
that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.

(i) No gross
misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years after its commission.

(j) No misdemeanor may
be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.

(2) The periods of
limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not run during any
time when the person charged is not usually and publicly resident within this
state.

(3) If, before the end
of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, an
indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has been filed, and
the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of
limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding
or filing to the setting aside.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---