BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.18.140 and 1989 c
25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The written
instrument, in which a contract of insurance is set forth, is the policy.

(2) A policy shall
specify:

(a) The names of the
parties to the contract. The insurer's name shall be clearly shown in the
policy.

(b) The subject of the
insurance.

(c) The risk insured
against.

(d) The time at which
the insurance thereunder takes effect and the period during which the insurance
is to continue.

(e)(i) A
statement of the premium, and if other than life, disability, or title
insurance, the premium rate where applicable.

(ii) For policies
including only private passenger automobile insurance, a date certain on which
the premium is due and a grace period of at least five days, without a late
charge.

(f) The conditions
pertaining to the insurance.

(3) If under the
contract the exact amount of premiums is determinable only at termination of
the contract, a statement of the basis and rates upon which the final premium
is to be determined and paid shall be specified in the policy.

(4) This section shall
not apply to surety insurance contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 48.18 RCW to read as follows:

No later
than the day after the effective date of this act, all thirty-day premium
payment schedules must be converted to a date certain under RCW
48.18.140(2)(e)(ii). The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this
section.

---
END ---