BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 42.52.185 and 1997 c
320 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During the ((twelve-month))
period beginning on December 1st of the year before a general election for a
state legislator's election to office and continuing through ((November 30th))
the day immediately after the general election, the legislator may not
mail, either by regular mail or electronic mail, to a constituent at public
expense a letter, newsletter, brochure, or other piece of literature, except as
follows:

(a) The legislator may
mail two mailings of newsletters to constituents. All newsletters within each
mailing of newsletters must be identical as to their content but not as to the
constituent name or address. One such mailing may be mailed no later than
thirty days after the start of a regular legislative session, except that a
legislator appointed during a regular legislative session to fill a vacant seat
may have up to thirty days from the date of appointment to send out the first
mailing. The other mailing may be mailed no later than sixty days after the
end of a regular legislative session.

(b) The legislator may
mail an individual letter to (i) an individual constituent who has contacted
the legislator regarding the subject matter of the letter during the
legislator's current term of office; (ii) an individual constituent who holds a
governmental office with jurisdiction over the subject matter of the letter; or
(iii) an individual constituent who has received an award or honor of
extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to be
noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited to: (A) An
international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the Pulitzer prize;
(B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an Eagle Scout award; and (D)
a Medal of Honor.

(2) For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, "legislator" means a legislator who
is a "candidate," as defined by RCW 42.17.020, for any public office.

(3) A violation of this
section constitutes use of the facilities of a public office for the purpose of
assisting a campaign under RCW 42.52.180.

(4) The house of
representatives and senate shall specifically limit expenditures per member for
the total cost of mailings. Those costs include, but are not limited to,
production costs, printing costs, and postage costs. The limits imposed under
this subsection apply only to the total expenditures on mailings per member and
not to any categorical cost within the total.

(5) For
purposes of this section, persons residing outside the legislative district represented
by the legislator are not considered to be constituents, but students, military
personnel, or others temporarily employed outside of the district who normally
reside in the district are considered to be constituents.

--- END ---