BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.84.060 and 1969
ex.s. c 281 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every
municipal corporation which owns or operates an urban public transportation
system as defined in RCW 47.04.082 within its corporate limits, may acquire,
construct, extend, own, or operate such urban public transportation
system to any point or points not to exceed fifteen miles outside of its
corporate limits: PROVIDED, That no municipal corporation shall extend its
urban public transportation system beyond its corporate limits to operate in
any territory already served by a privately operated auto transportation
company holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the
utilities and transportation commission.

(2) A municipal
corporation may not enter into any contract or agreement whereby a private
entity provides services to the corporation, if:

(a) The services
provided under the contract are of the type typically or historically provided
by public passenger transportation system employees covered by RCW 41.56.492;
and

(b) The wages,
pension, sick leave, vacation time, and other benefits to be provided to
employees of the private entity are less than those provided to public
passenger transportation system employees with the same or similar duties.

(3) Prior to
entering into any contract or agreement whereby a private entity provides the
services specified in subsection (2) of this section to a corporation, the
corporation shall notify all affected labor organizations of its intent to
enter into such contract or agreement, and provide the affected labor
organizations with all relevant information regarding the proposed contract or
agreement.

(4) Nothing in this
section may be construed as limiting a corporation's duties to bargain with
labor organizations, as provided by chapter 41.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 36.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county that has
assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan
municipal corporation may not enter into any contract or agreement whereby a
private entity provides services to the county, if:

(a) The services
provided under the contract are of the type typically or historically provided
by public passenger transportation system employees covered by RCW 41.56.492;
and

(b) The wages, pension,
sick leave, vacation time, and other benefits to be provided to employees of
the private entity are less than those provided to public passenger
transportation system employees with the same or similar duties.

(2) Prior to entering
into any contract or agreement whereby a private entity provides the services
specified in subsection (1) of this section to a county, the county shall
notify all affected labor organizations of its intent to enter into such
contract or agreement, and provide the affected labor organizations with all
relevant information regarding the proposed contract or agreement.

(3) Nothing in this
section may be construed as limiting a county's duties to bargain with labor
organizations, as provided by chapter 41.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. A new section is added
to chapter 36.57 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county public
transportation authority may not enter into any contract or agreement whereby a
private entity provides services to the authority, if:

(a) The services
provided under the contract are of the type typically or historically provided by
public passenger transportation system employees covered by RCW 41.56.492; and

(b) The wages, pension,
sick leave, vacation time, and other benefits to be provided to employees of
the private entity are less than those provided to public passenger transportation
system employees with the same or similar duties.

(2) Prior to entering
into any contract or agreement whereby a private entity provides services to an
authority, the authority shall notify all affected labor organizations of its
intent to enter into such contract or agreement, and provide the affected labor
organizations with all relevant information regarding the proposed contract or
agreement.

(3) Nothing in this
section may be construed as limiting an authority's duties to bargain with labor
organizations, as provided by chapter 41.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
4. A new section is added
to chapter 36.57A RCW to read as follows:

(1) A public
transportation benefit area authority may not enter into any contract or
agreement whereby a private entity provides services to the authority, if:

(a) The services
provided under the contract are of the type typically or historically provided
by public passenger transportation system employees covered by RCW 41.56.492;
and

(b) The wages, pension,
sick leave, vacation time, and other benefits to be provided to employees of
the private entity are less than those provided to public passenger transportation
system employees with the same or similar duties.

(2) Prior to entering
into any contract or agreement whereby a private entity provides services to an
authority, the authority shall notify all affected labor organizations of its
intent to enter into such contract or agreement, and provide the affected labor
organizations with all relevant information regarding the proposed contract or
agreement.

(3) Nothing in this
section may be construed as limiting an authority's duties to bargain with labor
organizations, as provided by chapter 41.56 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 39.33.050 and 1969
ex.s. c 255 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The
legislative body of any municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation,
or political subdivision of the state of Washington authorized to develop and
operate a public mass transportation system shall have power to contract with
the legislative body of any other municipal corporation, quasi municipal
corporation, or political subdivision of the state of Washington, or
with any person, firm, or corporation for public transportation services
or for the use of all or any part of any publicly owned transportation
facilities for such period and under such terms and conditions and upon such
rentals, fees, and charges as the legislative body operating such public
transportation system may determine, and may pledge all or any portion of such
rentals, fees, and charges and all other revenue derived from the
ownership or operation of publicly owned transportation facilities to pay and
to secure the payment of general obligation bonds and/or revenue bonds of such
municipality issued for the purpose of acquiring or constructing a public mass
transportation system.

(2) The legislative
body of any municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, or political
subdivision of the state of Washington authorized to develop and operate a
public mass transportation system may not enter into any contract or agreement
whereby a private entity provides services to the system, if:

(a) The services
provided under the contract are of the type typically or historically provided
by public passenger transportation system employees covered by RCW 41.56.492;
and

(b) The wages,
pension, sick leave, vacation time, and other benefits to be provided to
employees of the private entity are less than those provided to public
passenger transportation system employees with the same or similar duties.

(3) Prior to
entering into any contract or agreement whereby a private entity provides the
services specified in subsection (2) of this section, the legislative body
shall notify all affected labor organizations of its intent to enter into such
contract or agreement, and provide the affected labor organizations with all relevant
information regarding the proposed contract or agreement.

(4) Nothing in this
section may be construed as limiting the duty to bargain with labor
organizations, as provided by chapter 41.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
6. A new section is added
to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A regional transit
authority may not enter into any contract or agreement whereby a private entity
provides services to the authority, if:

(a) The services
provided under the contract are of the type typically or historically provided
by public passenger transportation system employees covered by RCW 41.56.492;
and

(b) The wages, pension,
sick leave, vacation time, and other benefits to be provided to employees of
the private entity are less than those provided to public passenger
transportation system employees with the same or similar duties.

(2) Prior to entering
into any contract or agreement whereby a private entity provides services to an
authority, the authority shall notify all affected labor organizations of its
intent to enter into such contract or agreement, and provide the affected labor
organizations with all relevant information regarding the proposed contract or
agreement.

(3)
Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting an authority's duties to
bargain with labor organizations, as provided by chapter 41.56 RCW.

---
END ---