BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature finds
that the use of the term "Oriental" when used to refer to persons of
Asian descent is outdated and pejorative. There is a need to make clear that
the term "Asian" is preferred terminology, and that this more modern
and nonpejorative term must be used to replace outdated terminology.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
2. A new section is added
to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As of July 1, 2002,
all state and local government statutes, codes, rules, regulations, and other
official documents are required to use the term "Asian" when
referring to persons of Asian descent. The use of the term
"Oriental" is prohibited.

(2) The legislature
urges all state and local entities to review their statutes, codes, rules,
regulations, and other official documents and revise them to omit the use of
the term "Oriental" when referring to persons of Asian descent.

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. The economic assistance
authority must revise WAC 175-16-030 and replace the term "Oriental"
with "Asian."

Sec. 4. RCW 35.22.650 and 1975
1st ex.s. c 56 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

All contracts by and
between a first class city and contractors for any public work or improvement
exceeding the sum of ten thousand dollars, or fifteen thousand dollars for construction
of water mains, shall contain the following clause:

"Contractor agrees
that ((he)) the contractor shall actively solicit the employment
of minority group members. Contractor further agrees that ((he)) the
contractor shall actively solicit bids for the subcontracting of goods or
services from qualified minority businesses. Contractor shall furnish evidence
of ((his)) the contractor's compliance with these requirements of
minority employment and solicitation. Contractor further agrees to consider
the grant of subcontracts to said minority bidders on the basis of
substantially equal proposals in the light most favorable to said minority
businesses. The contractor shall be required to submit evidence of compliance
with this section as part of the bid."

As used in this
section, the term "minority business" means a business at least
fifty-one percent of which is owned by minority group members. Minority group
members include, but are not limited to, blacks, women, native Americans, ((Orientals))
Asians, Eskimos, Aleuts, and Spanish Americans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect
July 1, 2002.

---
END ---