BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.300 and 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 429 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for
any person to enter the following places when he or she knowingly possesses or
knowingly has under his or her control a weapon:

(a) The restricted
access areas of a jail, or of a law enforcement facility, or any place used for
the confinement of a person (i) arrested for, charged with, or convicted of an
offense, (ii) held for extradition or as a material witness, or (iii) otherwise
confined pursuant to an order of a court, except an order under chapter 13.32A
or 13.34 RCW. Restricted access areas do not include common areas of egress or
ingress open to the general public;

(b) Those areas in any
building which are used in connection with court proceedings, including
courtrooms, jury rooms, judge's chambers, offices and areas used to conduct
court business, waiting areas, and corridors adjacent to areas used in
connection with court proceedings. The restricted areas do not include common
areas of ingress and egress to the building that is used in connection with
court proceedings, when it is possible to protect court areas without
restricting ingress and egress to the building. The restricted areas shall be
the minimum necessary to fulfill the objective of this subsection (1)(b).

In addition, the local
legislative authority shall provide either a stationary locked box sufficient
in size for pistols and key to a weapon owner for weapon storage, or shall
designate an official to receive weapons for safekeeping, during the owner's
visit to restricted areas of the building. The locked box or designated
official shall be located within the same building used in connection with
court proceedings. The local legislative authority shall be liable for any
negligence causing damage to or loss of a weapon either placed in a locked box
or left with an official during the owner's visit to restricted areas of the
building.

The local judicial
authority shall designate and clearly mark those areas where weapons are
prohibited, and shall post notices at each entrance to the building of the
prohibition against weapons in the restricted areas;

(c) The restricted
access areas of a public mental health facility certified by the department of
social and health services for inpatient hospital care and state institutions
for the care of the mentally ill, excluding those facilities solely for
evaluation and treatment. Restricted access areas do not include common areas
of egress and ingress open to the general public; or

(d) That portion of an
establishment classified by the state liquor control board as off-limits to
persons under twenty-one years of age.

(2) It is unlawful
for any person to enter a building on the state capitol campus when he or she
knowingly possesses or knowingly has under his or her control a firearm.

The state patrol
shall provide either a stationary locked box sufficient in size for pistols and
key to a firearm owner for firearm storage, or shall designate an official to
receive firearms for safekeeping, during the owner's visit to the building.
The locked box or designated official shall be located on the state capitol
campus. The state patrol shall be liable for any negligence causing damage to
or loss of a firearm either placed in a locked box or left with an official
during the owner's visit to the building.

The state patrol
shall designate and clearly mark those areas where firearms are prohibited, and
shall post notices at each entrance to the building of the prohibition against
firearms.

(3) Cities,
towns, counties, and other municipalities may enact laws and ordinances:

(a) Restricting the
discharge of firearms in any portion of their respective jurisdictions where
there is a reasonable likelihood that humans, domestic animals, or property
will be jeopardized. Such laws and ordinances shall not abridge the right of
the individual guaranteed by Article I, section 24 of the state Constitution to
bear arms in defense of self or others; and

(b) Restricting the
possession of firearms in any stadium or convention center, operated by a city,
town, county, or other municipality, except that such restrictions shall not
apply to:

(i) Any pistol in the
possession of a person licensed under RCW 9.41.070 or exempt from the licensing
requirement by RCW 9.41.060; or

(ii) Any showing,
demonstration, or lecture involving the exhibition of firearms.

(((3))) (4)(a)
Cities, towns, and counties may enact ordinances restricting the areas in their
respective jurisdictions in which firearms may be sold, but, except as provided
in (b) of this subsection, a business selling firearms may not be treated more
restrictively than other businesses located within the same zone. An ordinance
requiring the cessation of business within a zone shall not have a shorter
grandfather period for businesses selling firearms than for any other
businesses within the zone.

(b) Cities, towns, and
counties may restrict the location of a business selling firearms to not less
than five hundred feet from primary or secondary school grounds, if the
business has a storefront, has hours during which it is open for business, and
posts advertisements or signs observable to passersby that firearms are
available for sale. A business selling firearms that exists as of the date a
restriction is enacted under this subsection (((3))) (4)(b) shall
be grandfathered according to existing law.

(((4))) (5)
Violations of local ordinances adopted under subsection (((2))) (3)
of this section must have the same penalty as provided for by state law.

(((5))) (6)
The perimeter of the premises of any specific location covered by subsection
(1) or (2) of this section shall be posted at reasonable intervals to
alert the public as to the existence of any law restricting the possession of
firearms on the premises.

(((6))) (7)
Subsections (1) and (2) of this section ((does)) do
not apply to:

(a) A person engaged in
military activities sponsored by the federal or state governments, while
engaged in official duties;

(b) Law enforcement
personnel; or

(c) Security personnel
while engaged in official duties.

(((7))) (8)
Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to a person licensed pursuant
to RCW 9.41.070 who, upon entering the place or facility, directly and promptly
proceeds to the administrator of the facility or the administrator's designee
and obtains written permission to possess the firearm while on the premises or
checks his or her firearm. The person may reclaim the firearms upon leaving
but must immediately and directly depart from the place or facility.

(((8))) (9)
Subsection (1)(c) of this section does not apply to any administrator or
employee of the facility or to any person who, upon entering the place or
facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the administrator of the facility
or the administrator's designee and obtains written permission to possess the
firearm while on the premises.

(((9))) (10)
Subsection (1)(d) of this section does not apply to the proprietor of the
premises or his or her employees while engaged in their employment.

(((10))) (11)
Any person violating subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.

(((11))) (12)
As used in this section:

(a) "State
capitol campus" means those state-owned grounds, and buildings on those
grounds, that constitute the state capitol grounds west of Capitol Way,
including all of the grounds addressed in the 1928 Olmsted Brothers landscape
plan for the state capitol grounds and the state capitol historic district, as
designated in the National Register of Historic Places, but excluding the area
bounded by Union Avenue on the north, Columbia Street on the west, 11th Avenue
on the south, and Capitol Way on the east.

(b)
"Weapon" ((as used in this section)) means any firearm,
explosive as defined in RCW 70.74.010, or instrument or weapon listed in RCW
9.41.250.

--- END ---