BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec.
1. The legislature
recognizes that an individual's right to vote is a hallmark of a free and
inclusive society and that it is in the best interests of society to provide
reasonable opportunities and processes for an offender to regain the right to
vote after completion of all of the requirements of his or her sentence. The
legislature intends to clarify the method by which the court may fulfill its
already existing direction to provide discharged offenders with their
certificates of discharge.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.637 and 2000 c
119 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When an offender
has completed ((the)) all requirements of the sentence, including
any and all legal financial obligations, and while under the custody and supervision
of the department, the secretary ((of the department)) or the
secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall discharge
the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the certificate
to the offender's last known address.

(2) The court shall
send a copy of every signed certificate of discharge to the auditor for the
county in which the court resides and to the department. The department shall
create and maintain a data base containing the names of all felons who have
been issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date of
conviction and offense.

(3) An offender
who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex offense and is sentenced to
a term involving community supervision may be considered for a discharge of
sentence by the sentencing court prior to the completion of community
supervision, provided that the offender has completed at least one-half of the
term of community supervision and has met all other sentence requirements.

(((3))) (4)
Except as provided in subsection (((4))) (5) of this section, the
discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights lost by operation
of law upon conviction, and the certificate of discharge shall so state.
Nothing in this section prohibits the use of an offender's prior record for
purposes of determining sentences for later offenses as provided in this
chapter. Nothing in this section affects or prevents use of the offender's
prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution either as an element of an offense
or for impeachment purposes. A certificate of discharge is not based on a
finding of rehabilitation.

(((4))) (5)
Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate of discharge
shall not terminate the offender's obligation to comply with an order issued
under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or prohibits the offender from having
contact with a specified person or coming within a set distance of any
specified location that was contained in the judgment and sentence. An
offender who violates such an order after a certificate of discharge has been
issued shall be subject to prosecution according to the chapter under which the
order was originally issued.

(((5))) (6)
Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the department for counseling
and help in adjusting to the community. This voluntary help may be provided
for up to one year following the release from custody.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.96.050 and 1993 c
140 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When a prisoner on
parole has performed ((the)) all obligations of his or her
release, including any and all legal financial obligations, for such
time as shall satisfy the indeterminate sentence review board that his or her
final release is not incompatible with the best interests of society and the
welfare of the paroled individual, the board may make a final order of
discharge and issue a certificate of discharge to the prisoner. The
certificate of discharge shall be issued to the offender in person or by mail
to the prisoner's last known address.

The board shall send
a copy of every signed certificate of discharge to the auditor for the county
in which the offender was sentenced and to the department of corrections. The
department shall create and maintain a data base containing the names of all
felons who have been issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge,
and the date of conviction and offense.

The board retains the
jurisdiction to issue a certificate of discharge after the expiration of the
prisoner's or parolee's maximum statutory sentence. If not earlier granted,
the board shall make a final order of discharge three years from the date of
parole unless the parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration
of the three years. Such discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the
effect of restoring all civil rights lost by operation of law upon conviction,
and the certification of discharge shall so state. This restoration of civil
rights shall not restore the right to receive, possess, own, or transport
firearms.

The
discharge provided for in this section shall be considered as a part of the
sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any manner be construed as
affecting the powers of the governor to pardon any such person.

---
END ---