BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 76.09.020 and 2001 c
102 s 1 and 2001 c 97 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this
chapter:

(1) "Adaptive
management" means reliance on scientific methods to test the results of
actions taken so that the management and related policy can be changed promptly
and appropriately.

(2) "Appeals
board" means the forest practices appeals board created by RCW 76.09.210.

(3) "Aquatic
resources" includes water quality, salmon, other species of the vertebrate
classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes identified in the forests and fish
report, the Columbia torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the
Cascade torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent
salamander (Rhyacotriton olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon
dunni), the Van Dyke's salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed
frog (Ascaphus truei), and their respective habitats.

(4)
"Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.

(5)
"Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner or
otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other right of
way shall be considered contiguous.

(6) "Conversion to
a use other than commercial timber operation" means a bona fide conversion
to an active use which is incompatible with timber growing and as may be
defined by forest practices rules.

(7)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(8) "Forest
land" means all land which is capable of supporting a merchantable stand
of timber and is not being actively used for a use which is incompatible with
timber growing. Forest land does not include agricultural land that is or was
enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program by contract if such
agricultural land was historically used for agricultural purposes and the
landowner intends to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the
future.

(9) "Forest
landowner" means any person in actual control of forest land, whether such
control is based either on legal or equitable title, or on any other interest
entitling the holder to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber
on such land in any manner: PROVIDED, That any lessee or other person in
possession of forest land without legal or equitable title to such land shall
be excluded from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such
lessee or other person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all
of the timber located on such forest land.

(10) "Forest
practice" means any activity conducted on or directly pertaining to forest
land and relating to growing, harvesting, or processing timber, including but
not limited to:

(a) Road and trail
construction;

(b) Harvesting, final
and intermediate;

(c) Precommercial
thinning;

(d) Reforestation;

(e) Fertilization;

(f) Prevention and
suppression of diseases and insects;

(g) Salvage of trees;
and

(h) Brush control.

"Forest practice"
shall not include preparatory work such as tree marking, surveying and road
flagging, and removal or harvesting of incidental vegetation from forest lands
such as berries, ferns, greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other
products which cannot normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils,
timber, or public resources.

(11) "Forest
practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to RCW 76.09.040.

(12) "Forest
trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by agricultural methods
in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if the trees were planted on land
that was not in forest use immediately before the trees were planted and before
the land was prepared for planting the trees. "Forest trees"
includes Christmas trees, but does not include Christmas trees that are
cultivated by agricultural methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.

(13) "Forests and
fish report" means the forests and fish report to the board dated April
29, 1999.

(14)
"Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW 76.09.050.

(15)
"Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices except an
employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.

(16) "Person"
means any individual, partnership, private, public, or municipal corporation,
county, the department or other state or local governmental entity, or
association of individuals of whatever nature.

(17) "Public
resources" means water, fish and wildlife, and in addition shall mean
capital improvements of the state or its political subdivisions.

(18) "Timber"
means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial species, including
Christmas trees. However, "timber" does not include Christmas
trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that term is defined in
RCW 84.33.035.

(19) "Timber
owner" means any person having all or any part of the legal interest in
timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract of sale, "timber
owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.

(20) "Board"
means the forest practices board created in RCW 76.09.030.

(21) "Unconfined
avulsing channel migration zone" means the area within which the active
channel of an unconfined avulsing stream is prone to move and where the
movement would result in a potential near-term loss of riparian forest adjacent
to the stream. Sizeable islands with productive timber may exist within the
zone.

(22)
"Unconfined avulsing stream" means generally fifth order or larger
waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel location, creating a complex
flood plain characterized by extensive gravel bars, disturbance species of
vegetation of variable age, numerous side channels, wall-based channels, oxbow
lakes, and wetland complexes. Many of these streams have dikes and levees that
may temporarily or permanently restrict channel movement.

--- END ---